title,post,source
New Moderation,"Hey there, fellow Redditors. I took over moderation of this subreddit earlier today. I had come to ask a question (since answered offline) about a week ago and found the sub unmoderated. I didn’t want to see this sub suspended or deleted due to lack of moderation, so here I am.

I have no idea what happened to the previous moderator(s), the moderation decisions they made, or the reasons for those decisions. However, I'll try to keep the sub reasonably clean and focused.

I've cleared out the last year of post/comment reporting, added some basic rules, and removed restrictions that were preventing unapproved members from posting. That's all I plan for now, but I'm open to suggestions.",AskLawyers
Rules Update (20240316),"Post titles now require the two-letter postal abbreviation for the U.S. state or territory to which the question applies.  If the question applies outside the U.S., use [non-US].

Example title formats:  
`[DC] Is this formatted correctly?`  
`[non-US] Is this formatted correctly?`",AskLawyers
[NC] Leasing agent help,"I am a college student in Wilmington, NC. I live at an apartment complex and we recently switched leasing agents. I told my old leasing agent that we were not re signing and that we were moving out at the end of our lease date. She responded with ""okay, i will put it in the system."" she quits and we get a new agent. I email her just to let her know that we were moving out and that we would be leaving on May 5th. She responds with I cant honor that because its not a full 60 days notice and she wont move forward with out move out. I now cant get in contact with anyone, after emailing multiple times, calling multiple times, and going up to the office multiple times. I don't know what to do anymore. If anyone has any suggestions please let me know. ",AskLawyers
Can my parent legally take away things she gave me as a gift even though I’m 22 years old. [CA],"Let me start off by saying I know a lot of you are going to look down on me and I understand that. I plan on moving out soon and my mom tends to start doing or saying things to try and make me do things her way. I have a feeling she's going to want to take away my phone and car and other things she's given me that I use on a daily by saying something along the lines of ""I pay for them"" but can she legally take them since they were gifts from her. I got the car when I was 16ish and she mostly refers to it as ""my"" car but only has ever said it's her car when I remind her it's mine. Also, the phone was given as a gift when I was younger and I've only ever upgraded since then whenever I absolutely had to (basically I use my phones until they're unusable). She does pay the insurance and phone bill but I'm okay with her taking me off as I know that I'm lucky she's doing that. Once again, I know it's a stupid question and I know that I’ll be looked down on for asking but I can't find anything online.",AskLawyers
[MA] College Grad Job Market,"Hey i’m a soon to be college graduate (undergrad) in 2 weeks. I want to be a lawyer but I need a gap year to study for the lsat especially with the logic games change. In the mean time I would like to get a full time job in a law office, obviously something entry-level like legal assistant or legal secretary. Am I delusional in thinking I can get a job in this before going to law school? My degree is in political science and I have 3 minors with interning/job experience in administrative work and government positions but I don’t come from a well-known or prestigious university. ",AskLawyers
[non-US] Using Brand content on social media,"Dear Ask-Lawyers community- I am starting a series on Instagram and TikTok where I tell the stories of the most famous brands. Of course, this will make use of the brands logos and some publically available marketing materials as part of the videos I plan to post.
Is this covered under fair-use laws or do I need to obtain permission from each brand beforehand?
I am seeing some other videos on these social media sites going around but I am unsure how they do it..",AskLawyers
[TN] Do I have to appear in court? ,"My firearm was stolen a year ago and they caught someone with it and I'm to appear in court tomorrow. I'm not sure what to expect or what they need from me being there. The charge is TOP $1000-$2500 TO WIT FIREARM. If this guy is a dangerous felon, I'd rather not let him see me standing there talking about how my gun was stolen. Do I need to appear tomorrow morning in court? ",AskLawyers
[MI] My sister is trying to involve herself in a nasty child custody situation that involves children going through neglect. Can I reach out to an attorney to set her straight?,"TL;DR - Sister thinks she's ""helping"" her useless boyfriend get custody of his children despite his long record and no paperwork establishing that those children are his other than DNA testing from fall 2023. She's ""collecting evidence"" of current quite terrible neglect of these two children, while two other unrelated children are in BioMom's house. I have no idea how long she intends to wait for biofather to get his shit together while his children rot. Can I hire a lawyer to give my sister the cold hard facts? 

\---

My sister (21) is involved with a man (35m) who has two kids 5 and 7. They were born in new mexico. Everyone currently lives in michigan. He was not on the birth certificate or did any paperwork to acknowledge that they were his children. The girl's mother (\~30sF) is currently pregnant and has a 2yo unrelated to 5F and 7F. My sister has pictures and videos that detail a pretty horrible neglect situation, one where those who work with CPS that I know want to make a report as soon as possible. 

Last year, the babymama abandoned 5F and 7F in their new mexico home from May 2023 - November 2023. In that period, my sister and her bf took care of the girls, up to enrolling them in school. 35M dragged his ass to do anything regarding establishing paternity or even custody, and Babymama successfully ""stole"" the kids during the school semester back to Michigan. I brought my sister to live with me in Michigan. Long story short, sister and 35M are unfortunately ""talking"", and sister wants to help 35M get his children under custody. 

However, 35M has never paid child support, Babymama is engaged in crazy benefits fraud, and he is a two time felon and I THINK in violation of probation. He allegedly is going to turn himself in sometime soon so that he can ""get right"", and ostensibly get a job and an apartment before he tries to get custody of 5F and 7F. HOWEVER, my sister thinks that by 'helping' 35M (who does not show interest in getting the children back, only in my sister), she is taking pictures and video to ""build a case"" against babymama, but is going to wait until 35M nebulously gets his shit together, which can be a long ass time. While they do this, Babymama can leave the state again, or continue to neglect the three, almost four children currently in their home. Babymama currently has no records of anything and, as far as I understand it correctly, she's in the clear legally UNTIL someone fucking reports her. 

My sister loves these children like they're hers, which is sweet, BUT I think she's sacrificing what's actually right for the children for what she *thinks* is right, which is for 35M to reunite and ""finally be a good dad"". She won't listen to me or anyone, and when it comes to talking about potential foster placement, she has ""joked"" that she will just sleep with them on the floor in her bedroom. Let me be clear: My sister has known these children for less than a year, and dated her bf for two years. She is living with myself and my wife while she gets her own shit together and begins attending college in the fall. 

These children and this situation reflect truamatic paralells in our history, which is super fucking tragic, but she's unmedicated and I fear she's approaching scary delusions about her role in these childrens lives. I need help getting her to see reason, but I don't want to waste an attourneys time if they cant answer questions concrete enough for her to realize either a) her bf has an extreme long shot before he can get even partial custody, and b) these children need to be removed from babymama's care ASAP, even if it means she can't see them for the forseeable future. ",AskLawyers
"[PA] $40,000 Perioperative program repayment, unfair contract enforcement by hospital ","I resigned last year from the operating room before my contract is up due to work place harassment and stress from co-workers and surgeons. I received a letter in the mail 2 months later saying I owe what’s left of my contract time to be ~$17,000. I was allowed to set up monthly payments of $425/month. 

I came back as per diem staff because the hospital really needed help and I missed my co-workers. I asked HR if my per-diem time can count towards my contract time so that I can stop making payments. I was told no, because my contract states I have to be full-time, which I re-read my contract and saw. So I understood. 

My co-worker resigned a few months shortly after I came back, and HR re-wrote his contract to release him from all financial obligations to pay it back, which would have been around ~$25,000.  I reached out to him, which he did show me his rewritten contract.

I was upset that they let him go with zero financial obligations, but I’m currently working for the hospital and paying them back at the same time. 

I requested a meeting to discuss this unfair treatment, as I find out earlier that HR has rewritten many other contracts allowing nurses to leave or transfer outside of the operating room, which is a violation of the contract. 

I held a meeting with the CEO to discuss this unfair treatment and how I have found out that the $40,000 program costs is not reflective of the training provided, but told by HR that it is an arbitrary number and a penalty for leaving. To me, this sounds more like financial entrapment and indentured servitude for 4 years. The CEO and the other higher ups in the operating room department made excuses for reasons why the other nurses were allowed to make deals with HR, but I was not allowed to work anything out as a current per-diem employee because of my contract, which is the same contract as the other operating room nurses.

I stopped automatic payments and the hospital is threatening my case for legal review if I don’t pay up. Is there anyway I can seek help for discriminatory contract enforcement and financial entrapment?? I feel wronged that as a current employee, I am being forced to pay 8 hours worth of my salary back every month until the $17,000 is paid off, but they let 5 other nurses that I know of leave without owing a single cent.

Please help!! I don’t know where to begin, will lawyers be willing to take my case?",AskLawyers
[AR] Felony drug charges,"These charges are for a person in the state of Arkansas, they have similar charges in a neighboring county from 6 months ago that has not gone to court.
This individual has a past history of drug charges and has been sentenced to the community corrections for approximately 8 months about 8 years ago. Are these charges something that could lead to prison or just fines and probation?",AskLawyers
[NY] gag orders ,"I was curious on how enforceable is a gag order and when does a gag order actually violate the first amendment? This is Based off what I was reading, that there are some very stringent criteria that has to met for a judge to issue a gag order. As lawyers what are you experiences with this? Even if your from a different state than listed above I would still like to hear your thoughts. This is based off a case in NY I won’t go into names, just that it in NY. ",AskLawyers
[MI] Nonverbal Autistic Charged with Violent Crime,"I have a coworker who's adult child (just turned 18 this year) became violent with his teacher and they have filed charges on him. I am not sure where exactly he lines up on the Autism spectrum, but I do know he can communicate, albeit very limitedly, and has issues expressing himself. (I am uncertain if he has any idea that he understands the charges nor the consequences of his actions.) He was arrested and had bail set for $5000. She doesn't have the money to pay for a lawyer and barely had the funds to afford bail. She is, obviously, distraught. I am trying to find her some resources she may be able to explore as she goes through this ordeal.

In searching, I found:

* [https://www.drmich.org/](https://www.drmich.org/)
* [https://autismallianceofmichigan.org/service/legal-services/](https://autismallianceofmichigan.org/service/legal-services/)

Any other places I can send her or advice you might have I can share?",AskLawyers
Can I refuse to step out of my vehicle if there’s a registered firearm in my car?[TX],"Honestly I’m just curious about it because I saw a video of a man asking for the supervisor after he was told to get out of the car for a registered firearm. Then the cops proceeded to aim a gun at him for not following directions during a traffic stop. It was placed in his trunk so I was just wondering if it’s required to step out when asked. Does the placement of the firearm also matter in this situation? Like if it was in the glove compartment or closer would it make a difference? 
",AskLawyers
[NJ] Can my nephew start and be a member in an LLC?,"He's a non green card holder, non permanent resident, and 14 years old.",AskLawyers
[WA] - Landlord Shenanigans with rent check,"a landlord simply collects the standard handwritten rent check. For over a year now, the checks have been collected but never deposited. Do checks need to be deposited within a certain time? do they expire once written and not deposited? Or are they good until whenever in the future the checks are deposited in a bank?",AskLawyers
[TX] apartment threaten collections for repairs a year later after moving,"I moved out of my Texas apartment in 2023 and did not receive an itemized list of repairs within 30 days. Over a year later, in April 2024, I received an email from the apartment management threatening collections for unpaid repairs. This email, although questionable, comes from a legitimate email address similar to the one used by another employee for official lease communications when I moved out. The email demands payment but doesn’t provide a payment link. I’ve already contacted Legal Shield for advice but haven’t received a response yet. What are my next steps? Should I contact the apartment management directly, or wait until I have legal advice?",AskLawyers
[MI] multiple owners of property and access,"3 signers on house/mortgage. 2 do not live here. 2 owners want out to get off the loan due to credit reasons/liability, no interest in property value/money.

- is this possible without refinancing sole owner on another loan?

- Do the other owners have legal access to the property? What about house? 

- mail to one owner is still being received at the property. Legal to RTS all their mail?",AskLawyers
[NY] Is there a Statute of Limitation for Contempt of Court? ,"Donald Trump has violated the gag order in his current trial in NY several times and it seems the judge doesn't to want to make a martyr out of him by holding him in contempt/throwing him in jail. I was wondering if the judge could wait until the election is over or, if Trump wins the election, wait until after he's out of office, to enforce the contempt of court punishment. 

If there isn't an actual statute, what are some of the rules that would govern this scenario (or I guess, are governing this scenario)?",AskLawyers
"[NJ] Wage law, overpayment","All of the NJ Wage Law stuff I can find is regarding an employer not paying their employee. What happens when an employer makes an overpayment to an employee?

1) is there a statute of limitations of when they can ask for the money back?

2) if it must be paid back, ( if it was paid over many paychecks), does it have to be paid back as a lump sum or over a set period of time?

3) if it is a hardship to pay it back(only source of income and it was used to pay bills already) can you claim hardship and only pay back a percentage of the total?

Thank you in advance!",AskLawyers
[MS] Probate Question,Is there a way around someone not cooperating while trying to get an estate probate? Like can you take it to the court and ask them? My sibling refuses to give an address so we can send them the paperwork.,AskLawyers
[NJ] Can I receive 50k in donations without paying tax?,"If my friend wants to give me $50k will i have to file taxes for it? also answer for 100k as well in case the limit is in between those two numbers
",AskLawyers
[NY] Federal court: Is there a court dismissal document issued if a case is resolved before an indictment is filed?,"Following my arrest under complaint and initial arraignment in 2017,  I  entered a non-prosecution agreement in 2019 with the NYSD before an indictment was brought to court.   

 However, I have not received any final dismissal document from the court. Does such a document exist in cases resolved by non-prosecution agreements? or does the agreement suffice as a 'final disposition'? I am interested in retaining an attorney to solve this.   ",AskLawyers
[ID] I have court this friday. What do I do?,"i’m a minor, 16, and i have to go to court this friday because i am a victim of CSA and the guy outed himself. i have severe anxiety, and i wholeheartedly do not want to go and be practically torn apart by defense lawyers. can i deny going up to the stand? how should i act in court? could i be vague with my answers in court? 

edit: thank you for all the wonderful advice,, although i don’t have energy to respond. i am taking a good portion of it (if not, all) to heart. truly thank you all for your very kind words. &lt;3 will update when court is done.

edit 2: my mom informed me this is NOT a trial. this friday is a preliminary hearing, and i need to get to writing my statement. @_@",AskLawyers
Can I actually get charged for drawing a penis[TX],"So long story short my art teacher fucking despises me and claims to have ""war"" with me after I drew a penis on his face (not his actual head but like a sketch of his face) and he is now threatening to press charges on me and if this was any other teacher I would take it with a grain of salt but this fucker is a psycho literally flat out told me he's not a nice person and he is struggling to act nice with me so yeah I'm just wondering would any court actually take this serious since I don't want me parents to have to deal with this and could he actually make me a registered sex offender dm me if u want to see the drawing Btw this teacher is like pushing 60 and I'm 15",AskLawyers
[CA] Any room for a (well justified) lawsuit? Los Angeles ,"My “landlord” has been charging me rent for a place that was previously unbeknownst to me illegal to rent out. I’ve been paying exorbitant amounts for over a year now. I had no idea that in CA at least you are required to have heating in order for a legitimate place to rent out. Can I sue? Believe me when I say, my landlord is the lowest of the low. It took so long for me to come to this point but my living conditions are borderline abusive, and absolutely neglectful to say the least. Maybe we could get into it on this thread. Anyway. I’ve been an EXCELLENT tenant. There is ZERO pettiness or vindictiveness involved with this. I have been through HELL here and I’m not putting up with it anymore. And, for the cherry on top, I cannot afford to move. Please help me. This is unbearable.",AskLawyers
Do I Have a case? (U.S.) [Az],"I just wanted to know if I have a case against my job as I worked in a moving company, I got injured during work while it wasn’t anything major, after my check up in the hospital I was good to work the next day however, the moving company never called me in to work when I called it always send me to voice mail when I called directly into the office the receptionist said that the manager will give me a call to tell me when I can work again. However that call never came and when I texted my manager when I can get back to work they never responded. It has been a month and half ago since I worked there with never being told if I was fired or not they just ghosted me. ",AskLawyers
[TN] Am I at risk of being sued and losing?,"I’ve been trying to sell my motorcycle on fb marketplace. Today I had a guy and his friend come to look at the bike. The guy who test rode it had been “racing motorcycles since he was a kid” and I figured he knew what he was doing so he test rode it and when he came back he said it was all good and they proceeded to buy the motorcycle. I gave them the signed title, they did not sign it. They leave my driveway and 10 minutes later I get a text saying “hey we need help”. I go down the road to see what happened and the guy had wrecked the motorcycle and said that it “locked up on him”. I had been riding this thing every day and had no issues with it and wasn’t aware of any issues with the bike other than the front brake being very sensitive which I warned them about to be careful with multiple times that you had to be very light on the front brake. I would’ve never let someone ride it if I thought it wasn’t safe.  After further inspection post wreck I notice the front brake seems to be engaged somewhat and isn’t letting the bikes front wheel freely turn. I have no idea if it was a brake malfunction or if the guy grabbed the front brake too hard and wrecked it himself. He had some road rash and seemed like he might have a concussion so they took him to the hospital to get checked out. Some cosmetic damage was done to the bike and I agreed to take $200 for the damages and give the guy his money back because he had to go to the hospital and I didn’t want to keep his money not knowing what actually happened. I have insurance on the bike but now I’m worried that they might try to sue me, any advice or help on this would be appreciated ",AskLawyers
Can I keep a body part after surgery? [GA],"Long story short - I somehow ended up with strep in my liver and I have 4 big abscesses (I’m 20, no health conditions, just bad luck)

2 segments of my liver have to come out. I think it would be kinda cool to get the liver back in a jar even if it’s just kinda like liver soup.
Any way I can convince a doctor to give me the liver? Any legal barriers to doing so?



",AskLawyers
[IL] Chicago tenant rights,"Hi, I am a renter, and my landlord routinely neglects to complete required maintenance. I have resorted to threatening to exercise my right to withhold rent, however I have never actually withheld rent, as the threat is enough to get my landlord moving. Today I recieved this from my landlord:

""It looks like your anxious to exercise your ( rights ) to not pay the rent. If you're not happy living in our property please feel free to not renew your lease.  I believe that it's due soon. (my landlord's lawyer) please forward the required documents to OP for notice of non renewal"".

This seems to me to be illegal retaliation, and I believe I have operated fully within my tenant's rights. Do I have a path to staying in my apartment? I have complete email documentation of my maintenance requests and my payment history. I have reached out to a law firm for a free consultation already, I just wanted some additional input.

Thanks!",AskLawyers
[OK] Could I have kept the money?," About 2O years ago, I once pulled up to the bank's drive through. As I was filling out my deposit slip, I heard the sound of the tube and hear the canister come down. I look over and to my surprise there was an envelope full of cash. It looked to be about a couple of hundred dollars. I debated for a couple of seconds and figured if I did not send it back someone would loose their job. The teller that received it was quite surprised. I finished my deposit and went on my way. I have always wondered could I have kept the money? Would it have been like the Monopoly card, banking error in your favor? ",AskLawyers
[CA] 1050 + Mental Health Evaluation in DV Case ,"Victim located in CA. Can someone break down for me what happens if my abuser passes / fails their mental health evaluations?

Charged with 273.5 and assault with a deadly weapon causing GBI.

Didn't motion for this until his 4th status conference.

Discussing pleas with the DA this week.

TIA!
",AskLawyers
[NC] Green Card Question,"Hi everyone,

I’ll get straight to the point. My mom is living here in the United States on a green card. She has had this green card for 10 years. When she first applied for a green card, my Husband put his name down as her sponsor. My Husband is a US citizen.

I have two questions:
1. Is my husband still considered responsible for her? If she defaulted on a loan for example, would they go after him for the money?

2. My mother needs an expensive medical treatment. If she goes to a hospital and gets the treatment done, but then ignores the hospital bills and does not pay, will they come after my husband for the money? What about if the treatment was done out of state in Oklahoma?

Thank you all so much!",AskLawyers
[NY] Blue Cross Blue Shield lied to me &amp; my healthcare providers,"I was covered under my father's health insurance through HMSA until I turned 26. Because I lived in NY, I had an out-of-state partner plan through Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield. When I turned 26, I attempted to obtain health insurance through an employer-sponsored plan, but was told by my HR that I could not because Empire BCBS was still covering me through the end of the year. I reached out to member services at Empire to confirm my coverage through the end of 2022 and they confirmed in writing and later through multiple letters sent to my home. I continued to receive medical services under this plan. Each time I accessed health services, my insurance was verified as active. In January 2023, Empire denied all claims made after my 26th birthday (3/19/2022). I filed a complaint with the NY State Insurance Commissioner and my case was closed as they deemed the issue to be with HMSA discontinuing coverage. In their decision letter, they state that Empire had been paying Mount Sinai for the care I received and later, in January 2023, retracted the money stating I was not covered (even though they told me in writing that I was covered). So then I filed a complaint with the Hawaii State Insurance Commissioner who deemed the issue to be in NY's jurisdiction. They asked NY to respond to the complaint and the response from BCBS grievances was that ""\[me\] was incorrectly advised by Anthem that her coverage was active until December 31, 2022."" These bills have since been sent to collections.

What recourse to I have at this point? I'm just waiting for these bills to tank my credit.",AskLawyers
Do I have a case? [US] [CA],"Hi well long story short I bought a 2015 Genesis coupe ultimate last year around august the car was incomplete ever since I got it (went back into the dealer for a month after a week of owning it because of the messed up hood it needed to get resprayed, after that job got done the car started acting up a week later the car battery was giving out so I took it back to the dealership a week after that and it turns out the terminal was becoming lose as well as the battery not being fully secured to the spot got it fixed the same day another week goes by and the insulation for the hood was falling out and same thing I took it to the dealership got it fixed as well after I got all that worked on I only drove the car for around 4-5 months til It broke down AGAIN this time it was something more serious turns out the engine was burning oil faster than usual I did the first oil change at 59k miles keep in mind I got the car with 57k car didn't even make it past 61k before the engine started knocking i've been without a car since january and the dealership is just having me go back and forth (they never answer calls, doesn't give us no progress updates, says they are going to call but don't, keep in mind I even got the car without new breaks as well) I'm so stressed out i'm 19 years old and it's the first car I took out with my credit car was 27k with all the warranty plans and apr. I'm struggling to pay off the car and work since I don't have something to move with I'm more upset at the fact that I still have to be paying for a car that most likely is going to break again despite having a whole other engine.",AskLawyers
"[CA] Can I, as the victim, ask for a judge change in a criminal case?","
Location: California   
I’m a victim in a criminal case and the judge is siding with the defendant. Prior to the crime itself I was getting harassed and stalked by this person and I asked the prosecutor to request a restraining order but the judge refused to sign it.   

After looking up the judge, I was able to see numerous negative reviews mentioning corruption and other things   
What should I do?   
Thanks ",AskLawyers
DUI - field testing [WA] ,"[WA] still confused - can a person refuse Field breath test and request blood test without losing their liscense for any period of time? 

Another way to ask this:

Can you request a blood test and not have any liscense issues or does a person have to take the field breathing test?",AskLawyers
"[IN] University took picture of my ID, is that okay?","My university took a picture of my state issued drivers license without my consent, and it’s made me feel quite uncomfortable. Is this okay for a private university to do?",AskLawyers
[TX] Question Regarding New CLIA Amendment ," I have a coworker that just got her MLT through AMT, and was set to start working the bench running patient testing. Then, the organization we work with revoked her MLT; reason unbeknownst to me.

 Details are short, but my guess is someone in the organization is claiming that she doesn't meet the new CLIA requirements in terms of classwork to be considered an MLT, yet in the eyes of AMT she's a certified Medical Laboratory Technician.

 Under the new CLIA revision those won't go into effect until December, and it states that prior subjects that wouldn't normally meet the requirements would be ""grandfathered"" in. 

I'm trying to get more details on this, but I feel would have some merit for a case. Please advise, and thank you for your interest!",AskLawyers
[MI] Need some advice on what to do??,"Hi, I had a storage unit with PODS that had a past due balance get auctioned off recently. I was advised to have a family member assist with purchasing my storage unit back in the auction under their name by the manager at the location if my tax return didn’t come before the auction date and I did just that. When we opened the storage it did not look like how I left it, it did not look like the auction pictures and all of mine and my toddlers valuables were stolen or damaged. My grandmothers ashes are missing also. Is there anything I can do? Or just accept the loss? ",AskLawyers
[NY]  I haven’t filed my taxes in 4 years… please help,"I’m 23 y/o. My mom has always handled my taxes but this year I decided to file my taxes myself… I owed about $1500 and paid it all. No problem. I let my mom know I filed for this year, and she then brings up how she never filed my tax return for 2020, 2021, or 2022. 

Today I received a random check from the IRS from 2019 for $9. This makes me feel like they’re looking into my background. I was already planning on filing for these years but I’m scared the IRS is going come for me before I have a chance. I’m freaking out because i’m applying to law school and I’m worried this is going to be a character and fitness issue. 

What should I do? How much trouble am i going to be in? Am I going to have to disclose this for the bar/law school? I’m a little panicky, if you haven’t noticed. I greatly appreciate any insight &lt;3 :) ",AskLawyers
[NV] Childish boss,"

I was surprised to hear my spouse talking about her day of work today. Her boss seems to be reducing my wife’s workweek from 5 days to 4 days this week because she is « punishing her employee for being sick the week before. » ?¿😖
",AskLawyers
[NC] Can I Leave A Child Out of Will?,"

My wife and I have 3 children all grown. Our oldest bought his own home after living rent free in a home my wife and I owned. We had 3 houses then and planned on leaving one to each child. The oldest has been a huge and expensive challenge all his life but finally turned himself around in his 40s. He has a good position and supports himself financially now. I ended up retiring early due to physical disability and ended up with a good deal of medical debt. My wife has been a stay at home mom since our middle child was born. Our middle son has been a great help and wants one of the homes and contributes financially to helping my wife and I pay down our debt. Our youngest daughter has never worked outside the home. She has moderate anxiety issues and lives with my wife and I. I have term insurance that should pay any debt if I pass and I have a pension that would go to my wife. I am planning on leaving everything to my wife and hers leaves everything to me. We have added if the other spouse should die at same time all property and assets will go to the middle son and youngest daughter to be shared equally. We are not doing this in any way to punish the oldest but he doesn’t want to live where we do and we don’t want our other to children to have to sell anything since this is their home. My wife is worried that if we don’t leave something to the oldest he could contest the will. Our property is in North Carolina. My question is this something that we need to address?",AskLawyers
[OK] Crazy ex stole my passport and is leaving fake reviews of my business,"I recently went on a trip with my now ex, which we broke up on. We stayed at hotel, when I left and got back home I realized my passport was missing from my bag. I asked him about it and he said he has it and found it on the floor.

He refused to either mail it back or take it from the hotel and then stated he would leave the passport on the bed for the cleaners. However, after contacting the hotel owner they stated absolutely no passport was left on the bed and they doubled and triple checked, and were certain they would have seen if it was. 

My ex has been being petty, withholding money he owes me, impersonating me online, trashing me on social media, and even leaving fake one star reviews of my business (which he admitted over text), as well as calling me over 1000 times since the break up with fake numbers. 

Is this enough to start taking legal action? If so what type of lawyer should I go to and is it an issue that I don’t have exact proof he stole my passport?",AskLawyers
[NY] Do trial lawyers actually use full-size legal pads/documents in their day to day (asking for a gift)?,"Sorry if this is annoying or out of the spirit of the sub! Researching the perfect leather padfolio for a friend that is graduating soon and going into criminal defense. Crucial question for practicing trial lawyers (or anyone who knows) out there: is a padfolio that accommodates a full-size legal pad and legal documents (8.5 inches by 14) a necessity, or are those not actually regularly used in court settings? Getting a regular letter-sized portfolio would be cheaper (and there are more options), but I would hate to get my friend something that can't fit their actual work materials. I can provide location or more details on the job if that's relevant. Thank you for your help!",AskLawyers
[NC] Options we have from neighbor smoking marijuana.,"Our neighbor always smokes marijuana and the smoke comes into our apartment. It’s a high rise building so the apartments air vents are connected. We’ve complained in writing 10+ times and maintenance confirmed the smell is present. Is this cause to break our lease?

Only potential issue is that in the lease it says “THERE IS NO WARRANTY OF A SMOKE FREE ENVIRONMENT”

Marijuana is still illegal in North Carolina, even medically. ",AskLawyers
[MN] What other protection options do I have?,"Last year I filed an hro and I got my copy and was told the sheriff/police were going to give the copy to the guy personally. It really messed with me and I moved out, missed a lot of work and found other temporary housing. Well after a while, this guy ended up driving by again and then attempted to friend me on social media that he previously did not have but now does (stalker was an acquaintance/friend) . Well I called the people who first helped me file the hro and they referred me to the county, called the county and they told me that it was never delivered/handed to him because they couldn’t get a hold of him or find him (address is correct 100%). According to the people at the county, they try 3 times and that’s it. I asked if there’s any way to change the HRO and extend it or anything else I could do overall to get help and they told me that I have to wait until it expires or I could choose to make it public and they would put it in the newspaper but I don’t want that. Is there really nothing else I can do or that the police could do to help?? I’m having anxiety attacks again and the fear is creeping back in and affecting daily life but there’s no way that’s really it right?",AskLawyers
[NJ] Can my nephew be self employed?,"can my nephew work?

My nephew is 14, from india, and a dependent of my brother who works here in the us. Apart from that, i know that his mother or my sister in law has an EAD. Also, they don't have a green card. He was interested in dropshipping but doesn't know if he's allowed to be self employed.",AskLawyers
[TX] Do tv judges have legal standing as state appointed judges or are they the equivalent to tv host?,"For as long as I remember I always see tv series like Judge Judy and Paternity Court on cable tv when I was younger and I am seeing more of it now as I grow up like Judge Steve Harvey and this question keeps coming into my head ""Are they legally allowed to order people to pay an amount or to order people to give property to the other person because they are judges or is it just for tv and they have no legal responsibility to comply with it?"".",AskLawyers
I accidentally slept on the edge of someone's property under a bridge and they threatened to kill me in my sleep [Or] ,"I live in oregon and Honestly I'm just assuming it's his property but it was under a bridge which was a main road. I wasn't making noise, I wasn't throwing trash everywhere, I only had a backpack and a sleeping bag and as I was packing up to leave to a new spot a random guy told me to pack up and leave. As I was coming back with the things I had he told me if I slept under that bridge again I wouldn't wake up. Would he really be within his legal right to shoot me in my sleep ? ",AskLawyers
[NM] How do I find out if my mother in law stole my husband's inheritance? ,"My husband's grandma passed away about 10 years ago. My mother in law (who has narcissistic personality disorder but we didn't know it at the time) was the executor of the will. We were just out of college so we didn't question anything. 
We were told that grandma left her house and the proceeds from selling that house 100 percent to my mother in law but that everything else was to be spilt evenly between her 3 children with nothing going directly to any of her 4 grand children. 

Shortly after the house sold, my mother in law told us that her siblings were harassing her because they wanted their cut of the sale of the house. She told us they were saying horrible things to her like ""you aren't respecting grandmas wishes"", ""you're stealing from your own family"", and ""she's rolling over in her grave over this"", and they stopped speaking to her and us completely. According to her it happed via phone and email for months. We thought it was horrible (and perplexing they were doing that but we just chalked it up to ""grief makes people act out in strange ways."" My husband was never super close with his aunts, uncles, or cousins (because his mother always vilainized them to us) so we never intervened.

Now it's been about 10 years and my mother in law is starting to lose it. Her npd and alcoholism are worse and she's having a hard time keeping her lies straight. She let it slip to me that and I quote ""The money from Grandma's house was supposed to be for the grandkids."" She was kind of on a long rant and I don't think she remembers saying it. I know better than to call a narcissist out on something so I just pretended not to hear it and immediately told my husband. 

How can we see the terms of the will without my mother in law knowing? 

Sorry for all the unnecessary back story. Therapy is expensive.
",AskLawyers
[CA] How do you search for precedent (court cases) involving a specific law (Leonard’s law)?,"With the events in California I have been made aware of a CA law called Leonard’s law, which allows for 1st amendment protections on private university campuses.

I tried searching google scholar for case law involving the law, but only found two results among the many cases which simply involved a person named “Leonard.”

Is there any way to search for court cases involving a specific law?",AskLawyers
"[CA] I'm about to retain an attorney on a contingency-fee basis. He says no win, no fee. If I pay for fees and expenses, he takes 33.3%. If he pays for all fees and expenses, he takes 40%. But the wording in the contract says otherwise? Can someone help me understand?","I posted this in r/legaladvice asking for basic legal advice but it was removed by the mods without reason.

Attorney emailed me the retainer. I'm reading it over. In his email, he says, ""no win, no fee. If I pay for fees and expenses, he takes 33.3%. If he pays for all fees and expenses, he takes 40%.""

https://imgur.com/a/NKqu8DH

But his retainer says otherwise. Can someone clarify this for me?",AskLawyers
[IL] I have an appointment with a custody lawyer but have no idea what to ask. What should I ask?,I have an appointment for a consultation for a custody lawyer. Other than how much it is going to cost me I have no idea what other questions I should be asking and his secretary told me to make sure I bring a list of questions . I don’t want to question their abilities so what do I even ask?,AskLawyers
[OH] Why delay sentencing hearing if defendant is not out on bail?,"I’ve been following a federal case for four years where the defendant is accused of sex crimes against children and has been held without bail since his arrest.  He plead guilty and has delayed the sentencing hearing at least 5 times.

What is the point of delaying the sentencing?",AskLawyers
[OH] overtime pay ,"Hello, I work for a private company in Ohio. It is a private, non-profit fire department. Currently our overtime pay starts at 106hrs for two weeks. Shouldn’t our overtime start at 40hrs over each week? It is a part time department, no full time benefits are offered. Just curious if they exempt from the 40hr rule or not ",AskLawyers
[CT] How would self defense work if I was defending someone else?,"Long story short, my nephew was making rude comments to a another little girl, (they're both under 13 is that's relevant), and her father when it came time to pick her up, slapped him. I was picking him up, and we fought, he gave me a black eye, I dislocated his shoulder and something happened to his back? (I threw him on the concrete).

My brother/father are more than happy to fund my defense and a civil case against him, the cops also filed an assult case against him, though I doubt that one will go anywhere. 

The father contacted the cops who filed an assault case against me. 

Now I'm lawyering up, but we're trying to find the best so it might take a few days. Money isn't really an issue regardless of how long this goes on, we have more than enough. But I'm nervous bc idk if self defense will apply? 

Plus we want to make sure the father gets as much pain as possible, we don't care how much of the money we get (the lawyers commission is ridiculous anyways, I heard 45% plus some insane upfront fee?) we just want him to pay as much as we can get him for. ",AskLawyers
[MI] Is it legal for my place of work to not give me a break even though I work over 8 hours a day?,"I work at dominos and work 8-12 hour days without a break, I don't even a break for food, I have to eat whenever there's a break in the rush, I work over 40 hours a week and am on my feet all day, there isn't even any time to go to the bathroom during the rush? Is this legal for there to be no breaks given at all?",AskLawyers
[OK] Joint Custody with Misdemeanor.,[OK] I currently filed for joint custody for my child and I currently have a misdemeanor for a property damage. Me and the mother of my child got into a argument when she tried to  move my kid into another mans house and I ended up breaking her phone. Cops showed up and I was charged with property damage. I had to take a anger class and had to do 6 month probation. Will this affect me getting awarded joint custody? I haven’t seen my child in almost 2 years. Shes also not financially stable and is constantly getting kicked out of peoples homes,AskLawyers
[OH] Is there a self-defense argument for defending yourself against an unknown man pointing a rifle at you like this?,[OH] Is there a self-defense argument for defending yourself against an unknown man pointing a rifle at you like this?,AskLawyers
"[NY] Attempting to buy house we've rented for over a decade, owner's son and lawyer have taken over and are attempting to bully us. Request advice, please.","A little back story: My husband and I have lived in this house for about 12 years, renting from an older couple who live on the property as well. We began discussing us buying the property - including our house and theirs - after the male landlord became too ill to do all the work that was needed and we stepped in.  This was about 4 years ago. We began to take over many duties as far as lawn care, repairs, etc. We had long since abandoned a lease and just kept paying our rent and doing what was needed for property upkeep. Our initial plan was to pay off their reverse mortgage ($80,000) plus a lump sum to replace our rent so they had money to live on as they were both retired. This in exchange for sale of the property and us taking over insurance and taxes as expected. They would also have it in writing that they could live here until their deaths. The male half of the couple became very ill so focus shifted to doctors appointments, caring for him (I am a nurse) and hospital stays, etc. He died two years ago. 

Current situation: Their estranged son who previously only came once a year because he had a difficult relationship with his father, became more visible. He started talking to his mom again, which she was thrilled about. He offered to pay for a lawyer so we can get the sale completed. We agreed. He had previously not wanted anything to do with the keepsakes or even the house and told his parents that many times. 

His lawyer, in July of last year, promptly came up with a life evaluation, life estate, and had a property appraiser come to value the houses and land. He also convinced our female landlord to give her son Power of Attorney (of which type I'm not sure). They also wrote up a ""life lease"" which requires us to be beholden to the female landlord and their party for maintaining the property and providing her an adequate place to live. She will be deeded into the property so would be able to maintain residence here - FOR FREE.  The property all tolled was valued at $550k. They then deducted her life valuation at $164k reducing the overall price of the sale to $390k. We said that was too much and they dropped it to $330k. The female landlord, aside from sitting in on a few zoom calls initially is not involved. We have avoided discussing with her as she is in her upper 80s and has not dealt well with her husband's passing.  She is of sound mind and gets around well on her own aside from needed a ride for groceries every once in a while. 

Their attorney has become harassing and inappropriate, constantly accusing us of taking advantage of the mother, maliciously dragging things out, threatening to put the house on the open market, and similar.  We have attempted in the past 10 months to increase our revenue, decrease deductions, and shore up our investments to afford $3k a month between mortgage and escrow for taxes.  No matter what update we provide through our own attorney the response is aggressive and dismissive and threatening. 

Our own attorney has been less than helpful. We want to reflect the original agreement between the original parties and move toward that end where we're own it all, she can live here until she dies, and we are able to afford the added burden of financial responsibility. He has not acted on this request. I believe the attorneys are talking and working on getting the highest payout for themselves. Our attorney fails to respond to them, has not addressed the harassment bordering on extortion, and never asked us to sign a retainer. He says he's just helping us out. I do not believe that for a minute.

What would be the logical next steps for us? New attorney for us? Talking to our landlady (who we continue to pay rent to and maintain her property and make repairs as we've always done) or call someone else to look over the situation altogether because we feel none of this is ethical or legal? We spoke with landlady about it a week ago and she reiterated that she has no timeline and is not concerned, she wants us to be comfortable in paying for all of it. 

We really feel alone and underrepresented here. Any advice would be appreciated. Thanks in advance, or just for reading.",AskLawyers
[TX] Can some help me understand what these papers are saying before a sign them tomorrow,[TX] Can some help me understand what these papers are saying before a sign them tomorrow,AskLawyers
[TX] what should I do?,"I work at a big retail chain. We've been having problems with an older man creeping on employees and customers. Me and other coworkers have made a bunch of complaints about him with the store manager and personnel. Also documents an instant where he tried to side swipe me by walking so close to me on purpose. Maybe a month or two ago he got banned for creeping on a minor the dad made a report. Recently he has been coming into the store with a new ""look"" he shaved his beard and changed his clothes and wears a hat now. I tried telling my teamleads/coaches but they said they can't keep him out the store only store managers and personnel can. But if he bothers anyone to report him and then they could kick him out. But this guy is a creep I know he's getting off thinking he got away with it. It's only a matter of time till it happens again what should I do?",AskLawyers
[CO] Exes lawyer submitted illegally obtained information for a divorce hearing. ,"Won't go into specifics about what is submitted for obvious reasons but my exes attorney submitted a private conversation back in 2014 that she some how has involving me talking to another male (A guy I used to game with). From my understanding, she gained access to one of my social media accounts and took screenshots of the entire conversation. I wouldn't say it's anything damaging, really just me venting about some stuff. I only became aware of this conversation after I served her papers, I don't remember it and vaguely remember the person I was talking to. 

I'm obviously not a lawyer but from my understanding my ex is admitting to a felony by illegally accessing my account and not only stealing it but now sharing it with the court. Her attorney from my understanding should know better than to submit it as evidence without knowing how it was obtained. This would be the second time she has done this, the last time was during temp orders where she submitted a COBRA letter from my last employer trying to make a case that I was unemployed even though I changed jobs to help with custody as advised by my attorney. The letter was dated after I moved out and she opened it and submitted it as evidence and the judge threw it out.

I'm confused why her attorney would be using this as evidence since he then becomes liable for essentially aiding in a crime. Am I wrong in my understanding of the laws? From my understanding, they are both liable to be sued for doing this yet here we are. I wasn't sure they were going to actually submit it as evidence since I didn't think they'd be that stupid but just found out it was submitted as an exhibit and they are referencing it in their position statement.",AskLawyers
[AL] i may have said something bad,so my soon to be ex started argument with me she threw blech in my face i told her i would kill her. shes threaten go to the police for in fear of her life she has a car and can leve has been told several times to get her stuff and leave.. and she keeps walking around throwing her phone up in my face recording me how bad have i messed up..?    state alabama,AskLawyers
[Non-US] About Assylum and Humanitarian Parole,"Hello there, I'm 19 years old from Bangladesh. My father is an American citizen but he refuses to sponsor me for the visa, He married another woman there after marrying my mother, apparently he married another woman through phone call before officially marrying my mother. I face problems in my ""home country"" due to me leaving my previous religion and for my sexual orientation as well. I was wondering how much is the possibility of my humanitarian parole getting accepted or if I can get any help on this issue.",AskLawyers
[Tx] title for vehicle questions for a vehicle that was stolen off the dealership lot,"I’m not sure where to even ask about Title questions for a vehicle, but I’ll explain the story anyways just in case someone could help. I ordered raptor R over two years ago. It finally came in on Wednesday. I wasn’t able to take it for a test drive because according to the dealership they had to change a few fluids the next day when I was going over to do the paperwork I found out they had stolen the truck right off the lot. They left the truck outside the keys on some hook outside and the gates open they ended up finding the truck out six hours later hidden in some barn. My question whether a vehicle have a stolen/recover title Shouldn’t automatically lower the price plus most the time dealers tell you they take $10,000 off as soon as you take it off the lot. They also tried to convince the police to investigate me. They told them I might be involved somehow I don’t know if I should fight the dealership give my deposit back and I’m not even sure if I want the truck anymore",AskLawyers
EEOC Rights to Sue [TX],"So I have two investigations with the eeoc because other things happened after my initial complaint. The eeoc asked me to file the second one because they couldn't investigate anything that happened after the initial complaint. 
My question, if they issue the right to sue in the first complaint, but the other investigation is ongoing still, can I file suit in federal court still about the entirety of events and not just the things that happened in the first investigation if I wait on the rights to sue from the second investigation?",AskLawyers
[MD] How to get an affidavit (explanation inside)  ,"Hi there.  Teach English abroad for a living. I have a new job in Vietnam in a few months. My new employer has asked me to get an affidavit. See, I have to submit three documents for my visa. One has my middle name included, another has my middle, initial, and one does not show my middle name at all. My employer has asked that I get an affidavit stating basically that Those three documents are the same person… Me. A couple people have told me I can ask any lawyer for this. Do I just call up a lawyer? Is that all I need to do? Thanks in advance.  ",AskLawyers
[WA] Contempt ,"If the respondent doesn't file an answer to my contempt motion, does rule 55 apply? Can I ask for a default judgement or does appearing in court qualify as ""answering""?",AskLawyers
[CO] Spectrum TOS,"Spectrum TOS

I cancelled spectrum a few days ago.  My bill came today at full rate, so I called to get the final bill.  The lady on the other end says our terms say we bill monthly only and don’t do any partial credits for cancelled service; it’s in our terms on your bill.  This means I have to pay them for a service for 3/4 of a month that I am not receiving.

Do I have any recourse?

At a minimum, can I require them to restore the service and return the included equipment until the last day of the paid for service if I can’t fight the full bill?",AskLawyers
Question for real estate Lawyer ,"My landlord has to be wronging me right now but I’m really not fully sure. Can someone please give me their insight ? 
Currently hiding in my bathroom in my apartment with my cat because a contradictor is drilling a hole into my wall that I was not told about. 

Last weekend, my landlord and a group of contractors showed up to my apartment. She claims she told me but I looked everywhere and did not receive a notification. I was half asleep and she knocked and then just opened my door so I held it shut and was like “who?!?” 

Tuesday, she texts me saying she’s doing extensive work on the unit and that I don’t have an option to renew my lease and that I need to be out by July 31st. She also told me if I could end it sooner that would be great. 

Thursday she tells me contractors are coming to install AC units and do work but they will only be in my apartment to install an AC. I thought they were putting it in the window not drilling a hole in my wall for 30 minutes. 


Like this just doesn’t seem right. Any insight ? I’d appreciate it. ",AskLawyers
[TX] Can You Freely Use Government Organizations in Fighting Games?,"I've been wondering on this topic for a while and can you use the names and logos of government agencies like NASA, FBI, Interpol, and local police departments like NYPD or LAPD for a fighting game like a location for the background of a stage or as part of a character's backstory in said game like Cammy and Sonya has in both Street Fighter and Mortal Kombat?

TL;DR: Can people freely use government agencies under the Creative Commons License or do you need to make a legal agreement with said company in order to even say their names and logos?",AskLawyers
[MN]  flooding in my apartment,"MINNESOTA.

Tldr at bottom


Well we got the first good bit of rain since I moved in and imagine my surprise when I walked into my computer room flooded with rain.  Damn near standing water.  Once you step on it is standing water.   

I'm paying 950 for my 2 bedroom apartment and now it's been effectively reduced to a 1 bedroom

This was not made aware to me when I moved in.  I'd noticed the carpet getting damp when it rained lightly and I would just put a fan on it.  All better the next day.  This time I let my landlord know and she came with a shopvac to help me clean it up.   That was it.  No ""we'll be back when it's dry to see if it can be fixed""  no offer yo compensate for my inconvenience.  Nothing until I informed my landlord I would be looking for a new place to stay and I'm the meantime I will be paying 2/3s of my rent until then

She thinks it's a one time occurance and is not wanting to work with me much.  I was offered a 1bd in the adjacent building for 800 and I'm tempted to take it but if I have legal grounds to break this lease I'd rather gtfo.

So what are my options here?  I'm looking to buy a house soon I can bite the bullet and pay 800 until September but that is more than I want yo spend on a 1 bedroom apartment

Thanks!


Tldr
My apartment is flooding when it rains and it has not been addressed or looked into for a week now.  Do I have legal grounds to break my lease without penalty?",AskLawyers
[TX] Should I get a contract or make my own contract to sell my merch at a local shop?,"I have a website and I have some merch to sell (USB drives with podcasts pre installed) and stickers. I talked to the owners of a local restaurant and they are open to allowing me to sell my product at their stores. Do I need a legal contract of sorts to start this? Right now I have no idea how much money this will bring in. I don't expect over $100 a month. I really don't know.

I'm not in a situation to really get a lawyer and pay thousands of dollars for a visit and do paperwork but I also don't want to get screwed in the long run if this does become profitable. The website rarely makes any money (less than $20 on Patreon and I might make $100 every once in a while via google ads) so I don't even report it as income with the IRS since it's so minor and inconsistent. Regarding the costs of the website I am not making any profits. I made a make shift contract which is below.

**Merchandise Contract**

I \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_(please print - name 1)

and \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_(please print - name 2) agree on date \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_ to go into a collaboration with \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_(please print-name 3) to sell \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_merchandise in store. Specifically, the merchandise is: stickers and USB drives. The stickers will be sold at $2.99 plus sales tax. The USB drives will be sold at $9.99 plus sales tax. The \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_ will keep 15% of the sales of each item ($0.45 for each sticker and $1.50 for each USB drive) as their cut of the revenue. A double-sided plastic display and card holder will be provided by \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_and this is to be clearly visible near the cash register. This display is to be used to educate potential customers. \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_ is responsible for any merchandise that is stolen or misplaced and \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_ will reimburse \_\_\_\_\_\_ for any loses. Invoices will be created by \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_ monthly (or when all product is sold - whatever happens first). These invoices (digital or physical) will include details of the sales including: the amount of sales, dates the items sold, the total amount of sales tax collected, and the total amount of revenues collected. \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_will provide new product monthly (or when product is sold out – whatever happens first). This contract is signed willingly and without distress.

\_\_\_\_signature 1\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_

Name 1 printed

\_\_\_\_\_\_signature 2\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_

Name 2 printed

\_\_\_\_\_\_\_signature 3\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_

Name 3 printed

On \_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_ 2024.

Would this contract me sufficient? Do I need a contract from a lawyer? We only had an oral agreement to sell merch but I didn't provide any specifics. I want to protect myself but I'm not rich. I already have the stickers, usb drives and the stuff ready to go. I just need to know what I'm doing is ok.

Plese help",AskLawyers
[TX]  Derivative Trader wanting to open personal trading account.,"Hello,

Let’s say, hypothetically, I were an Execution Derivative Trader for a very large Oil &amp; Gas company.  My core responsibility is to buy or sell futures at the settle price to hedge the company’s change in market price exposure. I only trade on behalf of the company, for the company. I do not receive any cut of the book, nor is it part of my job description to trade proprietarily to generate a PnL. I am not incentivized to take on speculative positions. 

I am aware that it would be against the company’s code of conduct that I trade in a personal account. However, I am more-so asking of the legality around it and how would the company even find out, essentially.

A couple of points that I think might add context:
A) I am not a registered broker-dealer. I am not acting as a fiduciary to anyone except the company I work for. I am not required any professional licensing or examination to fulfill my job duties.

B) Front-running violations with the CFTC will not happen as I execute large blocks and accept the settlement price on that day professionally. In my personal account would be intraday screen prices.
I believe this also rules out principal-agent (conflict of interest) issues as well.

C) the instruments I execute professionally are any NYMEX/ICE energy futures. The instruments I would  trade in my personal account are the same.

D) each year I’m only asked to disclose if I or a family member own a &gt;5% interest in EQUITY of a company within the industry via code of conduct agreement/signoff.

E) if I were to trade in my personal account, it would be strictly through personal devices that would have no connection to my work devices.

In summary, my questions are two-fold:

1) Are there additional laws preventing me from trading the same instruments that I do as an execution trader outside of front-running and conflict of interest?

2) What means would my company have to learn about my personal trading if all activity is done outside of the intranet of the company and through a separate broker?

Thanks for reading my hypothetical thought experiment.

Thanks,
G
",AskLawyers
"Can a minor buy a lighter? [Non-US] [Canada, BC]","Is it legal for a minor to buy or own a lighter in Canada, BC? ",AskLawyers
[TX] Cancellation purchase car order and down payment haven't been refunded for almost a month,"Hi, I canceled the purchase order from Carvana on 04/06/24 and have waited too long to get my down payment refunded. I have followed up with them several times but on 04/26/24 just know that what I communicated with them in the past wasn't processed yet and they just processed it.

&amp;#x200B;

There's no compensation from them but I who waiting to spend that money am in trouble because I want to use that for my expenses or put more down payment on a car from another dealer.

&amp;#x200B;

I want to know if there's any way to sue them for compensation.",AskLawyers
[GA] Am I being discriminated against? ,"I am in the process of applying to apartments. I found a spot to commit to and paid $100 admin fee (refundable) $300 holding fee (non-refundable). 

After running a credit report that showed no default payments for 5+ years and a 793 score, and having decently over 3x the rent in gross income, I received a rejection letter stating “supporting documentation could not be verified.” I’ve called and emailed and have not been given an answer beyond “please refer to the rejection letter for the reasoning behind your rejection. I’ve asked them to elaborate on why/how it couldn’t be verified, with no answer. 

The only reason I can think of not accepting me is because I have an ESA animal and wouldn’t have to pay pet deposit/rent. I asked if they had any special process for ESAs and where I should upload my letter and that’s the only thing I can think that would be ‘wrong’ with my application. Would it be worth my time to write a Notice of Intent to File Suit and deliver it to their registered agent via USPS certified? Am I being over dramatic? I was just gonna let it go but all my friends are saying it’s bullshit and have me riled up lol &amp;&amp; if I am being discriminated against then I certainly don’t want it to happen to future applicants.  ",AskLawyers
[AL] How often does someone make a bad trial lawyer but a great trial judge? Is it possible for a non-trial lawyer to make it to the bench?,I’m pretty sure that running a court requires different skills than arguing a case in one. How often do judges do better on the bench than they did as trial lawyers?,AskLawyers
"[NJ] is it extortion when someone says they have family that works for Immigration, state and federal government to intimidate you","Title says it. Neighbor from Hell I’ve been suffering dealing with and had disputes these past months. Now this neighbor who casually just said the above knowing we where immigrants. Is it extortion?

This neighbor did encroachment on my property now implied she can take portion of my land easily because she is family of a lawyer, a federal and state employees, and that she knows employees in the township government. 

Im weighing to submit this to the town police for a formal record. 

She did complained about trivial stuff like wild Japanese shrub on her lawn I need to remove, and water from rainfall going into her front lawn that if I don’t put a berm on my driveway she’ll go the authorities and report me. Mind you, my property is higher and hers are on the lower end of the hill we live in on top of the valley mountain/ ridge. 

Isn’t that coercion?

No laws in NJ nor Township indicates I control the act of God and nature. 
This State has Common Enemy doctrine and Reasonable use where it comes to water runoff. Wife just wanted this over with and we installed berm on our driveway as it’s the right thing to do in this scenario. Civility. 
But I wanted all these harassment and coercion on record with police since we are planning a lawsuit. 

But filling extortion such as long reach?

Thank you. ",AskLawyers
[OH] Underaged drinking ticket but I never had a field sobriety test,"So me (19) and a few buddies (also 19) got pulled over because the driver was drunk and didn't have his headlights on for a little trip down the road. The driver was drunk and he was put in the cop car and me and my other buddy were asked to step out of the car, the officer didn't ask us if we drank or even give us a sobriety test he just gave us tickets and we left, is there anyway i can get out of this ticket?
",AskLawyers
[WA] What does any of this mean?,"My son’s wife that he hasn't seen in over a year recently gave birth to her boyfriend's baby. My son received Denial Of Parentage papers through USPS today but they weren't filled out, the only thing filled out was the child's name, mother name, DOB, place of birth, and a witness name. Does my son have to do anything? Do these papers mean anything since they aren't filled out properly and he biologically isn’t the father?",AskLawyers
[Tx] I have a warrant but never got a ticket,"
For context I was stop about 2 years ago for ""street racing"" but I was never presented the ticket or even informed I was getting one all they did was take down my name and phone number well tonight I was stopped for not having my lights on (they worked but I didn't notice they had been off because I have running lights and didn't realize weren't the regular lights) and when I got stopped they informed me I had a warrant out for my arrest (the cop was a nice guy and let me go home as long as I went first thing Monday to fix it) but how can I have a failure to appear in court if I was never issued the citation I didn't even know I was supposed to appear in court",AskLawyers
[CA] Signed a severance agreement and now realized that the amount on it is about half what it should be.,"Was laid off a couple months ago and just got my lump sum severance payment. I expected it to be ~$25,000 (the company said we'd get 16 weeks + 1 week for every year of service which would wind up being 18 weeks for me). So based on that and my pay rate, the gross amount should have been ~$48,000. The severance agreement amount said the gross was $26,000 but when first reading it, I assumed that kinda meant the amount I would get in the payment since that's exactly what I expected to get based on the amount I was paid per paycheck and doing the rough calculation. The payment just came through and I only ended up getting ~$11k after taxes. 

This was clearly a miscalculation on the company's end but I'm wondering if I have any recourse if they decide to be shitty about it since I did sign the agreement. And yes you can hold all your comments about me being stupid to sign it before making sure I understood it fully. I am well aware.",AskLawyers
[WA] Am I owed the money for the hours I was promised in my contract?,"on a call with my manager to just invoice for the full 20 hours each week even if I didn’t work, since the client pays for the 20 even if I don’t work it. It has been all good since then and actually the work has been very consistent and I’ve been getting my full hours anyway. I recently asked my manager if I could invoice for the weeks that they didn’t pay me, since those weeks really screwed me over financially. They said no and the only way I can get that money is if I start working 40 hours each week until my contract is over. The problem is I only agreed to do 20 and don’t want to work more, and I can’t as I have another job. My other job is also more important as soon as my contract is up I will be transitioning to full time at that job. My question is am I owed for the weeks of pay? Keep in mind the client paid the full amount to my company each week even if they didn’t use me, so I feel like they are taking advantage of me by making more money off of me when I didn’t get hours.",AskLawyers
[MI] Would this be exempt from FOIA?,A letter to code enforcement regarding my property from my attorney. ,AskLawyers
"[DC] If the Supreme Court rules that the President has blanket immunity, could Biden use it as an Uno reverse card?","If the Supreme Court were to grant presidential blanket immunity before the election, could Biden use it to override the Congressional process and expand the seats within the Supreme Court to void it of its conservative supermajority, then force the new court to hear the case again, ultimately overturning it?

Would Biden be free from prosecution, since he did it while the absolute immunity was active? Would that then jump start Jack Smith’s case against Donald Trump?

I know this is a hypothetical, but I’d love to hear how Biden’s lawyers would possibly go about protecting him if he attempted it, as well as how opposing lawyers could argue against it. 

Edit: I‘ll challenge both sides of the argument, only because I think it could simulate actual legal arguments in the eventuality that the Biden White House decides to contest a ruling in favor of presidential immunity. ",AskLawyers
[VA] Getting our rental deposits back without lease agreements,"I started a healthcare travel contract last July and stayed in a house found through a housing website; there was also a traveling nurse staying in the same house, we are both from out of state.  Our contracts ended a few weeks apart, but we both moved out in January.  We still have not received our deposits back.

I did a little browsing online and saw that VA requires deposits be refunded within 45 days.  Neither of us received a copy of our lease agreement, but I have a record of my deposit through the housing website, and text messages from our landlord regarding the deposit refunds.

Do we have any right to receive our deposits back without a copy of our lease agreements?  If so, what would the first steps be for us to take?

",AskLawyers
[non-US] Copywrite Question! ,"This is a UK based query!

I used to work for a dog training company on a 0 hour contract. During the time I worked there, outside of my paid hours and with my own resources (that I either created myself or paid for the rights for) I created some educational graphics that were used on their social media. I am also trained as a photographer and graphic designer and at this time owned a separate graphic design and photography business, and some of the original stuff I made was posted on the social media for that business also.
When I left the business I said they could continue to use my graphics if they credited me for them. They said they would, but after I left they started sticking a new logo on them and not including credits for me. I messaged them several times asking them to include credits and they ignored me, until one time when they messaged saying they owned the rights to my work so they didn't need to credit me. There was nothing in my contract saying they would own any graphic work, and the work I did was outside of what I was contracted for. Who owns the rights to this work?",AskLawyers
[IL] Advice on best way to find a lawyer for veterinary malpractice?,"Hi all,

I’m hoping to find a lawyer to pursue litigation for veterinary malpractice. The dollar amount is probably around 15-25k in costs (not considering loss of companionship, etc). Does anyone know the best way to find someone? Are their law advocacy organizations for pets?

Thank you",AskLawyers
[WV] dealership ran a hard check without my consent,"Hello all, I'm currently trying to sell my car and a dealership asked me to bring it in to see about the trade in value to maybe get a different vehicle.

I brought it in and told them I just want to find out my trade in value.  Well they did their stuff and eventually came back and said they couldn't give me those numbers without me picking a car out essentially.  There was 1 car I was interested in so I told them I needed to leave and asked them to send me the numbers for that car.  Well they tell me they can't send that info over the phone (which is a lie I've had other dealerships do that) and a little bit later i get an alert that I've had a hard inquiry ran on my credit.

So did they break the law by not informing me they'd run a hard check? I didn't sign anything or consent to it verbally.  What are my options here?",AskLawyers
[FL] HELP! Toll late fee,"HELP! Toll late fees

I got pulled over the other day and the officer informed me that my license was suspended because in January I went through a toll road and went through 5 tolls for a total of $13 and it’s been so long that they suspended it, he said I can pay it and get my license and then in court he’ll waive everything like me driving on a suspended license. He also told me that I can call the clerk office and waive the late fees for the tolls. 

I would be cool with that but I go to my clerk office website and the total for those $13 is now over $1500, this is nearly a 100X increase in price and I am wondering if there is anything I can do or do I have to just pay the $1500. 

Any help would be greatly appreciated,
Please and thank you ",AskLawyers
[NY]," 

 want to appeal a school boards decision . While I'm appealing this  I  know I need to send in something called a  stay. Now is that a Motion   to Stay, is it something i just type up along  with my   appeal(petition)? Because some of the Motions to Stay examples  don't   relate to my issue. I want to ask if my kids can stay enrolled in  there   school to finish out the year, and my daughters been there for 10    years and their into the 4th quarter already. Thank u so much I have    till May 3rd,  then they said my kids will be EXCLUDED from their    district . any and all advice would be appreciated!   ",AskLawyers
[US],"Is my employer responsible for providing me PPE since I wear glasses in a tire shop? 
The people who don’t wear glasses are provided safety glasses and are required to wear them. Up to now, before OSHA has been checking in, I was told my normal glasses were fine. 
I’m told through the grapevine (non-officially, not by management) that side shields at least are required, and would feel better if I had a set of glasses/glasses with side shields that are impact rated for the shop, but I’m hard pressed to go buy some when afaik it is required by the employer to provide PPE that is required in the workplace. 
If I’m confronted about it I’m going to fight it, but some actual hard law (written; verbatim) would make it easier to stand my ground. I don’t know where to find any actual written law for things like this, and in general I don’t know where to look for official, non-hearsay law.",AskLawyers
[FL] life estate deed,What specific language is present in my life estate deed so I can tell if it is a standard Life Estate Deed or a Enhanced Life Estate Deed (lady bird deed as the internet tells me it is called)? I am looking at it and I dont know which type it is. Thank you,AskLawyers
"[NY] Has there ever been a case where the defence tried (or succeeded) to attack the plaintiff, and still won?","
I thought of this when remembering the Larry Nasser case. In that incident Larry Nasser was the defence, he'd already given up, and the attacker was a parent of an involved party member. I couldn't think of a case where a defendant attacked someone during the trial, and still won. Has thus ever happened? Does the person still receive a lesser charge? How does this work?",AskLawyers
[MN] Pay to play stock,"I was laid off from a startup last year. They gave me 90 days to buy my stock and I decided to go for it. About 5 months later they sent out an email to everyone saying that they must “pay to play” or the stock gets diluted by 1,000. Almost half the company was laid off and those of us that purchased stock are upset about this. We are suspicioius that the company knew about pay to play situation at the time of layoffs and didn’t warn us before giving us 90 days to make a purchasing decision. I am curious to know if:

1. Is this legal? It seems ethically wrong, but still could be legal.

2. Is there a time frame for pay to play after purchasing stock? Are they allowed to do this to us so soon?

3. If they knew about the pay to play during the layoff and when they have us 90 days to buy our shares, were they legally supposed to tell us?

4. Are there any other rights that I might have or anything I should know about?
",AskLawyers
[NY] Losing Jurors or Firing console - NY State Donald Trump Trial,"First, there were potential jurors who after being picked, dropped out of intimidation from people they know. If that continues now that the trial is selected, what happens if they get below 12 jurors (lose more than the number of backup jurors). Second, what happens if for some reason Trump fires his attorneys? Could he use that as a delay tactic or what?",AskLawyers
[MO] How should my partner go about breaking their lease for an inhabitable unit?,"EDIT: Title should say uninhabitable and typos have been fixed.

My partner signed a year-long lease in January under desperation. She was moving to a new city to begin at a new university and didn't want to be left homeless. We believe the unit to be uninhabitable. The building itself is falling apart with paneling coming off the walls, missing stair rails, holes in the floor, holes in the brick walls, etc. There is graffiti all over the inside of the building. The front doors don't secure all the time which means that there have been occasions when my partner has found non-residents doing drugs or passed out in the hallway. Her neighbors have a constant revolving door of rowdy guests (some of which mistake her apartment for theirs and bang on the door and yell). The fire escape is not up to fire code (literally a ladder hung up with pipes between a few balconies made of old 2x4s), the common areas are filthy (cigarette butts, rotten food, etc.). The constant weed and cigarette smoke from other residents seeps into her unit and the hallway (which is against the lease terms). My partner is asthmatic and this has greatly affected her health. When this was brought up to the leasing agent, she was told to put an air freshener in her furnace. When we went to the office to discuss these issues in person, we were told to text the leasing agent and that the conversation was turning into a ""snowball conversation"". All texts and emails regarding safety and habitability to the leasing office/agent have gone unanswered.  The lease itself is a mess- contradictory and doesn't include any tenant's rights. Overall, we both feel that her safety and the safety of any of her guests are not secure here and her health is also in jeopardy,

We have put in an application for a new better apartment in a better area of the city (I just recently moved back and got a job), but we aren't sure about how to go about her breaking the lease legally. The lease does say that if she breaks the lease early, she forfeits the security deposit and must pay the equivalent of 2 months rent. Is this her best option? Should she enact URLTA (landlords have 14 days to fix or this is a 30 day notice)? Should she expect to go to civil court? Any advice would be greatly appreciated. Once we get approved for this new apartment, she wants to set things in motion so she can move out ASAP.

  
UPDATE: Information I probably should have included earlier is that we aren't looking to take this to court in any way, shape or form. We just want to get her out in the easiest way possible.  With potential moving costs and other living expenses, neither of us have the ability to pay legal fees. The lease also states that if any of this gets taken to court and we lose, she's liable to be charged the landlord's legal fees as well. ",AskLawyers
[ME] can we do anything about neighbors cats marking on our property? ,"we have had multiple instances of neighbors cats marking on our property. the cats have pissed on cars, sheds, and bushes directly next to a bird feeder. we have caught them on camera and have pictures of the wet spot. we also have chickens (not sure if that changes anything). is there anything we can do? if not, any advice? thank you in advance. ",AskLawyers
[ID] Is there a way for a retail worker to report child abuse.,Sorry its a pic but i made the post in a hurry  and realized there was a format,AskLawyers
[MO] Cant get a birth certificate.,"I don’t have a birth certificate and I don’t have contact with my birth parents(my grandma, also legal guardian doesn’t want me in contact with them) and my legal guardian can’t obtain it. I am in a different state than what I was born in, how can I get my birth certificate? I am almost 17 and I really need to get a job and be able to do things with my life!",AskLawyers
 for wanting to stop supporting my parents financially?,"(F26) My dad made a reckless financial decision that lost us our house. We now live in a rental paid for by my older siblings who also support with bills and all other expenses. This happened a few years ago when I was still in uni (my siblings paid for that too). I didn’t realize how much it was a burden for my older siblings until I recently started working and have now been expected to contribute. My dad is semi disabled and has struggled to find work. My mom has left the country and is trying to save money from doing odd jobs so we can own a home again. I resent her for leaving because now the burden of taking care of my dad is all on me (my siblings live in another country).

I blame my dad for making the worst, most selfish decisions that have put my family through hell the past couple of years. I have a good job but I’m struggling to save or invest in myself because of the responsibilities I have looking after him. 

My siblings who have been supporting the whole family since the whole mess started have started getting fed up and contribute less and less money now, making my burden heavier and heavier. I want to move out and focus on my own life but my dad can barely walk or take care of himself so I feel guilty for wanting to leave him. My mom doesn’t want to consider coming back because she also resents my dad but won’t divorce him because she’s scared of what other people may think. So on top of financially supporting them they also expect me to keep this facade going that they’re still a happy couple. It’s driving me crazy. It’s hard to have empathy for my dad and keep helping till I can’t anymore because we have no relationship. He shows no gratitude for the things I do for him. He doesn’t show any interest in my life. I’m just a glorified maid and piggy bank. Anyone been in this situation before ? How do I get out of this without being the asshole. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my father to leave my sister alone?,"I'm (25f) am visiting my parents for a bit. My father has a long history of anger issues. Even the most minor things will anger him, so we have to tread very lightly when dealing with him.

I have an autistic sibling (15f) who has difficulty speaking at times. She started to feel overwhelmed and wanted some time to herself, but my dad started pestering her by constantly asking why she wants to be left alone which made her visibly uncomfortable that he wouldn't stop. I told him to leave her alone and he started yelling at me telling me ""she has a mouth, she can answer"" or something like that.

I kept telling him that he's making her uncomfortable (which she couldn't communicate), but then he started yelling at me to stay out of other people's business.

Was this wrong? My sister told me that I didn't overstep any boundaries and she knows that I have her back, but I feel oddly bad about it? I'm not even sure why. I was just trying to prevent my dad being unnecessarily angry with her when she couldn't handle it and trying to ease her comfort.",AmItheAsshole
 That my dad stop talking to me,"Hello, I’m 18 years old and is in college, Since I was little I was always tell about my weight and I understand yes I am overweight and I know, and I have tried everything, I have even starved myself for this. Anyways so my dad has always been the last straw of my situations (he is Mexican), he just yells for no reason if we ask a question, he gets mad if we do something wrong and call us stupid names,and likes to judge me for everything, my clothes,my way of eating, my music, my way of life, literally he judge everything. I have bad self-esteem and him telling me thing with my clothes made me so
Uncomfortable to go to college because everything he told me now I felt everyone was judging me for it and i couldn’t even go to class without panicking thinking of all this. Also he gets mad that I get hungry when I’m out of school..uhm I go to school from 9-2:20pm, is it like bad to be hungry? I was so pissed!! Another thing is that he did some blood tests and he got something bad and now everybody on the house has to eat healthy like salads and chicken etc, don’t get me wrong I love that food and whatever but when I was in that situation, he used to buy candy and unhealthy food and said “oh she is on a diet not me” and now look at him. Another thing is that made me feel like crying I guess I don’t know.. but the thing is my dad was going to give my brother 10 dollars I was like okay but what about me damm, don’t give me wrong again I’m not mad or jealous of my brother but you know broke college here wanted too 😭. And my dad told me “I’m already paying 50 dollars for your anxiety pills” like okay? That’s a need you know and I told him “maybe if people shut their mouth and make me have a peace life I would be fine” and that’s where I felt like is it my fault? Why is it my fault? If it’s other people were hurting me and it became worse. I was bully since elementary to high school and end up with depression and high anxiety that every morning I had to throw up. It would be fine if he would he said no but he said that and that made me so mad and I wanted to cry. Another thing that happened is that when I was helping my mom did a work he needed to be send to a email and I’m not really good at that, that I needed to ask my dad and just a simple task he just started to say to me “you don’t know how to do this,you don’t know college, you don’t know blah blah” and I was like what? And I got pissed and I told him “you don’t know how to be a good father” and he didn’t reply. So yeah is been like 5 or 4 day without us talking at all…so yeah I’m not sure how long this is gonna take or will forever is going to be like this so…AITA? (Btw I’m sorry is like everywhere there is a lot and there is more but I think this is enough)",AmItheAsshole
 for my stepping in and stopping a fight between a man and his ex-girlfriend that turned physical?,"I was sitting there minding my own business and just listening to my music and enjoying the sunshine. This man was talking to other friends when his ex showed up and started yelling at him.  I watched as she threw the first punch, followed by the man retaliating and punching her in the face,  the ex dropped like a sack of potatoes and he walked away. 

I didn't want to get involved since it wasn't my fight.  As the old saying goes "" Not my circus, not my monkey"".

Was I in the wrong?",AmItheAsshole
:  for not inviting my sister's girlfriend to my wedding,"Hello AITA, I'm in a tricky situation and could use some perspective.  
I (31M) am getting married in 5 months. My sister Jenna (26F) has been dating her girlfriend Lucy for about six months now. Jenna lives 3 hours away in another city and is bi, a fact that our family isn't aware of, except for my siblings and me. We've met Lucy a few times, but she hasn't met the rest of the family due to her FIFO work schedule.  
Jenna wants to bring Lucy to the wedding, but so far, Lucy hasn't been able to attend any family gatherings. Our parents' 30th wedding anniversary is next month, but Lucy can't make it due to work, and Jenna feels a cousin's baby shower isn't the right place to introduce her partner. I've told Jenna that Lucy won't be invited to the wedding unless she comes to a family event first or at least shows a photo of them together at such an event.  
Jenna argues that our wedding is the only time Lucy will be free to meet everyone and that it would be a perfect opportunity. However, I believe that the wedding day should be about celebration without the awkwardness of first-time introductions. This stance has led my siblings to accuse me of being homophobic and some are threatening to not attend the wedding if Lucy isn't invited.  


TL;DR I'm not inviting my sister's girlfriend to my wedding because she hasn't attended any prior family events due to her busy work schedule, and I want all guests to have met the family beforehand. My sister argues the wedding is the best time for introductions, but I disagree. Now, my siblings are accusing me of being homophobic and threatening to boycott the wedding. AITA for enforcing this rule?",AmItheAsshole
 for being too prideful about getting into a certain university?,"I don’t mean to brag, but I (F17) recently got admitted into my dream university. It’s a prestigious one in my country and my dad is specifically proud since he’s an alumnus of the said academic institution. 

I screamed and ran to my dad’s office downstairs when I got my acceptance email. The university’s admission process is highly selective and I couldn't help it. It was an instinct. My older sister (F25) told me I didn’t have to exaggerate my actions and make a scene since according to her, I only got in due to our family’s socioeconomic status. 

Afterward, I set the email screenshot (with blurred personal information) as my IG story and set my discord status with a prompt related to the admission. Yes, I’ll admit it, I was kinda proud. My sister told me I was acting tone-deaf and that I didn’t have to brag too much about it, knowing I also had friends and classmates who got rejected from the same uni and didn't have to rub more salt on the wound. 

Recently, my family decided to celebrate by checking into a nice hotel. Yesterday, we had dinner in a restaurant within the hotel and we all wore the color of the institution. My parents made the plans, and I let it happen since I thought it was cute. They also gave me a surprise cake with icing that reads ‘Congratulations getting into [insert uni]'. 

After the dinner, my sister lectured me that I didn’t have to go too far to celebrate and should have rejected the dinner proposal our dad offered. She told me wearing that color was already too much and that I was acting too prideful and arrogant about the whole ordeal. She told me I’m trying to rub it in her face (???)  because she didn’t get in years ago, but she and I have a close relationship and I’d never do that. My sister also told me I didn’t have to show the entire world I got in (referring the the IG/Discord thing), and looking back at it now, I kinda think I was bragging too much. I’m conflicted, to be honest.",AmItheAsshole
 for joking with my best friend till he believed i hated him?,"(throwaway account because i'm kind of embarrassed)

I (20M) am in a friendgroup with my best friend (22M) (lets call him M), we are both in the same college but have known each other way before that. It all started when one time our friendgroup got kind of bored by the typical drinking games,  card games etc so we decided to write assumptions of each other on paper, mix them up in a cap and then you either held up a circle (agree) or crossed your fingers (disagree) about each assumption that was read. Honestly it was a pretty funny game until one question was read out loud that threw me for a loop; Does \[me\] hate M?

Now I was thrown in a total loop, it felt like total whiplash, and in our friendgroup we use the term hate pretty loosely for comedic effect but the question still rubbed me the wrong way. Even as I kept protesting and saying i dont almost everyone held up a circle, including M. It kinda hurt a lot, and I got very embarrassed that even one of my best friends (m, that is) was agreeing with the dumbass assumption that I kind of exploded on him right then and there. 

I didn't yell or cuss or anything, but I was very distraught over it because seriously? Why would you think that? M laughed it off awkwardly and kinda got away saying he needed to go the bathroom because he's the kind to never do good with confrontation 

I was still obviously upset by it, and some were starting to feel awkward over the tension and just migrated in different parts of the apartment (lol). But then another best friend of mine kinda jokingly snapped at me and said ""what did you think M would think?"" and then listed all the...jokes I've been playing on him since we've known each other, and how I used to act. Basically I always joke about his height (hes shorter than me lol), and would pick him last in games, and tease him because he's very fun and cute to tease, and just typical teasing between two guys yk. He's also a very affectionate guy, he's the type to kiss you on the cheek as a greeting and casually cuddle up to somebody, so combine that with me who doesn't know what to do with that kind of affection...well, I don't know. Every time he would get close or jokingly try and kiss me I would push him away or run off because I would feel too flustered (i'm a very shy guy, but M never made me uncomfortable). 

I'm not saying i'm the most mature person on earth, I know that but I didn't think he would (even just a little bit) start thinking i *hate* him, or find him annoying. Our other best friend said how I should've known since M is a very sensitive guy (he had an intense period where he struggled with an ED, it still kinda lingers). It makes me think of how i've noticed he's pulled back a bit recently, not being as clingy as he used to with me and I wonder if its bcs of me.

Despite the awkward tension, we bounced back pretty quick because M is just like that, forgiving and extremely nice, and thats exactly why it's still on my mind and why i feel so guilty.   


  
",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my roommate that she is a codependent copycat and needs to leave me alone?,"My roommate (23F) and me (21F) have been living together for four months now and she keeps copying me and is very dependent on me for everything. She came at the end of January from Spain (we live in Ireland) and as it was her first time in the country I took it upon myself to help her settle in, as I wish someone would have done for me when I moved here (I’m French) for my studies. At the time I was really into running and fitness, but she said she wasn’t very sporty and had never ran before. Until, she suddenly, a week after her arrival, started going for little runs. Asking me about my shoes and what times I do, what frequency etc…After two months, I had to pause my runs to do my exams at uni and she immediately stopped as well. Then two weeks ago I decided to go to a conference in Belfast and asked her if she wanted to come. She doesn’t have any friends here because she is working a lot so I thought it would be nice for her. She let me handle all of the travel details and insisted that we should book and pay together, which I refused. During the entire trip she was being very dependent on me. I had to be the one to speak to the hostel staff, look at the map, decide what we were doing etc… She wanted to go to Giant’s Causeway which is about 2h from Belfast and when I told her I wouldn’t she said she would go alone except she didn’t look at anything before and she was asking me to look at it for her. During our stay, some girls showed up in the hostel dorm at 1:30am and woke her up. She was complaining about it but never said anything until I stood up to them for her (I have insomnia so I was awake when they came in). When getting off the return train I decided to test out my theory. I told her I was taking the bus home, the train was quicker, and that I would walk for the way. She followed behind me the entire time without asking why I wasn’t taking the bus or when I would stop walking. My biggest pet peeve is indecisive and codependent people. At dinner she asked me if I was angry at her and I tried to be nice and say that I wasn’t but I blew up after and told her that she needed to give me space and stop being so dependent on me. She kept denying everything and telling me she was choosing to do the same thing as me because it made sense. I ended up telling her that I didn’t sign up to be her mother and that she needed to become more independent.  There were other instances like the time our fire alarm was beeping for weeks and she couldn’t sleep but I could because my room is further away from it. But she waited until I called our landlady to fix it, or the time that our shower water was cut off for two weeks and she waited for me to check the water government website to tell her if she could shower. Anyways, I haven’t spoken to her since, it’s been two days now. Honestly I don’t feel guilty but I wonder if I could have handled it better or if I just imagined everything and she never was a codependent copycat. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" for being really upset and ""overreacting"" when my friend didn't take me home","intro: I (17f) usually have my parents take me home from school because we only had one car (we are poor). Today my mom told me she had to use our car to go to the doctor, so I had to ask my friend (17f) to take me home with her ebike/electric bicycle. 

I texted my friend the day before and she agreed. We are pretty close and I usually take her home every other week because she's always too lazy to bike to school. I also buy her a lot of stuff like food and way more stuff, so she owes me. It was the first time she has ever done anything for me like taking me home. When it was time for us to exit school, she told me to wait outside for her to receive her bike. I waited there for 10 minutes and texted her continuously asking her what was taking her so long. She didn't reply to me. Then I saw her riding past me quickly not even glancing at me. I was sooo confused and ran toward her while screaming her name, but no response. She glanced at me a little when she biked past me without a thought! My house is really REALLY far away from the school and I had to walk home (took longer than 10 minutes bc it takes 10 minutes to drive to my house). I had practice after school and forgot that my teammates had to take me. When I finally got home, she finally texted me. Her text said, ""OMG I'm sooo sorry I forgot about you!! You took too long to get out of class and a lot of people were yelling at me for waiting."" I was so confused because we already met outside and she clearly told me to wait for her at the corner of the street. Then she kept making other excuses and I blew up. I told her that I saw her going past me and seeing me. I also had to go to very important practice, but she kept denying and said it wasn't her fault! We were fighting text and I called her a bitch and other stuff. She said I was overreacting and also said I have done NOTHING for her before so we were even???

&amp;#x200B;

sooo AITA??? PLEASE TELL ME NOW!!! im so mad. 

(SOOO SORRY FOR IT BEING SOO LONG!!!) 

i got proof if ppl don't believe me",AmItheAsshole
 for getting angry with my controlling mother,"I am financially dependent on my mother and preparing for a very important exam that'll need to pass to qualify for a job. I've already failed this exam once and I absolutely have to get it done this time because I don't want to depend on others forever. The problem is my mother thinks that I'm being lazy around the house. We have two people who keep our house and own two dogs. She is frequently saying stuff like how I'm not supposed to avail the services of the househelps because I don't pay for them. I've always tried being the person who listens to whatever she says like ""go buy this and that"" ""go buy dog food"" ""clean this and clean that"" but I also have to focus on this exam. She wants me to study 10 hours a day which is very reasonable duration but that would mean I'd have little time for anything else. She can't expect me to constantly keep getting out of my study table to do things. My exam is in 2 months. And she thinks I'm the ungrateful and unloving child who has destroyed her life (yes verbatim) and destroyed her piece of mind. I'm so tired of this drama because she is always so mean to me. She has mean things to say even when I cook myself a meal to eat. She never requests me to do things but orders me, because acc to her, she has the right because she pays for everything. Since I contribute nothing to the household and nothing of meaning to the world, she thinks it's okay to be mean to me with every single thing coming out of her mouth. I wanted to get therapy but she decided that I'm pretending and I just need an excuse to waste money. I have a sibling and they aren't treated like that. I want to get away from this as soon as possible. Am I the asshole for telling her that I'll not do housework from now on?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to invite my ex’s family to our wedding?,"My ex and I dated seriously for 3 years before breaking up. We have a good relationship now, friendly but no romantic feelings left at all. It was a mutual decision and we both knew that it wasn't working out. So far so good. 

I met my actual soulmate recently (a year after the breakup) and we are getting married next summer. We have been living together for 6 months now, so we know this is right.

Here’s the issue: I am in touch with my ex and his family. He doesn't talk to his parents or siblings much (his choice), but he always keeps in contact with me. His parents were very involved during our relationship and I am still friends with them on social media, even though we rarely interact.

The question is: Do I have to invite my ex’s family to the wedding? 

My fiancé (the actual soulmate) says that we don't need them there, but at the same time it feels a bit rude. We will probably be inviting 50-70 people in total. My family and friends know about my ex and his family, so they might find it odd if they aren’t invited.

What do you think? AITA for not wanting to invite them?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom that I don’t want her to brag about me? (Very short and simple),"*Note this is my first ever AITA post. I never felt compelled enough to bring my issues to the internet but after years of this happening I just needed to talk about something small.

I (15, NB) may be young but I really need to talk about this. My mother (49, F) has treated me in a certain way all my life, sometimes when she does change she doesn’t do it forever. 

Just a few minutes ago my mom was very affiliated with what I was drawing because it’s about the recent TikTok debate of “Would you rather be stuck in the woods with a bear or a man?” I was just doing art to make my statement and I know if Ms.”Mommygottaknow!” Sees it she would accuse me of seeing disgusting things and take things away from me. 

All I said was that I was drawing a bear and she kept insisting that she should see it like she does with a lot of things I make. She just asked if she could have a copy of the art and for once I said that I do not want it shared with other people. She said directly to me “So I’m not allowed to brag and show my own daughter?” 

(My mom has also brought an undercover transphobia around me, ever since I’ve came out she still refuses to use my preferred pronouns or name and because “Oh I’m your mother I don’t HAVE TO! But your friends can call you that and I’ll still love you” but I guess it’s her right.)  

I told her “well I don’t want you to brag about me. I like it if you can keep it to yourself sometimes.” This is the first time in 4 years I’ve said something like that and first thing she said to me was “There are kids who beg for their parents to be proud and brag about them.” And walked away. I’ve been slightly upset the rest of the night and start to think I’m the dick here. Am I actually the asshole here?

Edit 1 (besides the note from earlier)
thank you everyone said something about it. I feel like next time finally I can say something to her.
",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my husband to stop pointing out that I say a place name in an apparently silly way?,"I (31 female) have been watching a lot of hockey recently and since I cheer for the Oilers, have been talking a lot about the LA Kings since the Kings are our opponent in the first round of the playoffs. My husband (43 male) has pointed out intermittently over the years that I pronounce LA in a funny way - apparently when I say the city name it sounds like I’m saying ‘allay.’ I’ve been saying the name more recently because of watching the playoffs and almost every time I do, my husband smiles/smirks and then repeats the name back to me the way it’s apparently supposed to be said. 

I’ve explained to him that I cannot hear the difference between the way he says it and the way I do and though I try to play the whole thing off, it’s been starting to really get to me because it just makes me feel really self-conscious and like I’m going crazy trying to hear the difference between something I’m not able to. 

Tonight he did it again and I once again asked him to stop but he just said that it’s not a big deal and I really shouldn’t take it so seriously. And that if it bothers me so much that he corrects me, I should learn to hear the difference and say it properly. We sat apart for a bit after that because I had responded to him with some attitude and after a while I went downstairs to apologize to him for said attitude and once again ask him to just cool it with correcting me for a bit. The entire time I was talking to him, he was just sitting back in his desk chair and had a smirk on his face. I didn’t think he was taking me seriously and told him so, and he once again repeated that this just me saying something in a silly way and I shouldn’t take it so seriously. I said again that he’s hurting my feelings and asked that maybe he could just learn to live with me saying it a little funny but he responded by saying that now I’m the one asking him to have to listen to my funny pronunciation forever and that I’m “setting him up for failure” because he wouldn’t be able to keep a straight face or stop himself from pointing it out. I finally started crying and it was only then that he apologized for hurting my feelings and I responded that I don’t believe he’s actually sorry and that the only reason he said that was because I started crying. He responded by saying “yeah, that’s how tears work.” 

So, AITA for wanting my husband to stop pointing out that I say LA in a silly way? ",AmItheAsshole
 For Wanting To Change My Name?,"I (19 TM) figured out a few years ago that I'm transgender and I wish to go by a new name, I'll say Rico for anonymity. My mom (42 F) and dad (41 M) are not happy about this because my mom named me after her dead best friend, let's call her Alice. 

My family refuses to call me by my preferred name or pronouns and as I've kind of gotten desensitized to it, though it does still hurt, they insist that I'm not actually trans and will regret any transitioning I do. I don’t really care, I'm not planning on transitioning medically, only socially. So if I decide I want to be female again, I can just say so. But my parents don't see it that way.

My mom even insists that I'm betraying her for introducing myself as Rico instead of Alice. I understand that the name is special to her, but it's way too feminine for me. AITA for wanting to change my name, even though it was the name of my mom's dead best friend?",AmItheAsshole
 for paying for my (33F) husband's birthday (36M)?,"My husband and I have been married for 5 years, together for 7. He has struggled with his birthday the entire time I've known him, although he's never able to articulate why. The only reason he has ever really given is that they make him feel unloved. He doesn't know where this stems from.

As a result, I made it a mission to make all of his birthdays special. I wanted him to always feel loved, and while I have definitely gone a little over the top on occasion, they're usually well with the range of a normal birthday (gifts, decorations, cake, and taking him out somewhere). He hates when I spend money on him, but he can't articulate why that is, either. We both work.

This year, we're doing the usual gifts &amp; cake, but he asked if we and some friends of ours could go golf together. I checked with our friends and they're free, so I was going to book tee times. When my husband found out I intended to pay for our friends, though,  he came unraveled.

It became a fight. He doesn't want me to pay for their fee and was extremely emotional about it. I strongly feel like I should pay for them. They can definitely afford it, but as the inviter I feel like it's only appropriate to cover their fee. Also, I already told them I was paying when I invited them and to top it off, the additional fee to cover them is only $50. I kept trying to reason with him (I'm his wife, I l WANT to do nice things for him, it's his birthday, etc.) but he just got increasingly more upset that I wasn't listening to him. I tried to ask to talk about it tomorrow but he said he didn't want to talk about it.

It's not a finance issue. We aren't rich but we are comfortable and the money being spent is my ""play"" money. He said I've stressed him out so much that he doesn't even want to go and, well, ditto. It's draining to try so hard every year only to be met with a ""meh"" at best, but not trying would make him feel unloved so that's not an option.

I eventually gave up and told him we would do whatever he wanted but, honestly, I'm not happy with his reaction. AITA for trying to reason with him?",AmItheAsshole
" for “fleeing the scene” after hitting my sister’s parked car, knowing our dad is going to pay for the damage?","It’s been a very long week and I am so stressed and I am posting this as sort of a steam valve.

Basically I have finals this week and I have a class that I thought my advisor signed me up for as a blow off class so I hasn’t even gone in months and then I found out I actually need this course as pre-rec for next year. So I have been trying to learn a semester worth of material in three days and have not slept.

 Today was the final and I accidentally smashed into the side of my sister’s car on the way out of the drive way (it didn’t help that she parked like an idiot) it did a lot of damage to both our cars but I was running really late so I just drove on. 

When I turned my phone back on after the test my family group text was going crazy trying to figure out who had hit Eva’s car. By some crazy coincidence our ring cams had stopped working so even the police had come out. 

I chimed in and said that I was sorry I was the one who hit the car. I tried to explain about my final but no one cared. They are so mad at me. When I got home I tried to explain it’s not a big deal because our dad pays our insurance so since it’s the same insurance it’s a write off and it won’t cost us anything.

My sister was crying/screaming at me that she loved that car and had taken such good care of it. I said it would only be a matter of weeks before it was covered in smelly pink drink cups like her old car. She said “you are such a fucking asshole” and stormed off to her room. My dad won’t see it my way either and was even more pissed when he saw all the damage to my car. 

He said he didn’t want to hear another word about my final and he has never been more disappointed in  one of his kids in his entire life and needs a “break” from me.


I keep trying to explain it’s not a big deal but no one will listen to me. I am still happy I passed my test so I’m not going to let them rain on my parade so AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I file a police report for stolen phones?,"So I (26f) had a 20 year friendship with my friend Sam (25m), I am also friends with his wife Jo (24f). 

Recently I have learned how to set and hold boundaries for the first time in my life. I actually went to therapy and learned how to do it correctly. Sam and Jo did not take kindly to that, and for reasons too long and deep we ended our friendship. Everything said between the 3 of us occurred over text, so I have proof of it. 

In August of 2023 I put them on my phone bill. Huge mistake I know, but I just learned boundaries. They both got new phones totaling almost $1300 (now, after paying on them) for the phones and they owe me $420 (lol) for the actual bill.

When Sam and I decided to end the friendship, he told me he would pay me what he owed on the phone bill, then we would get them off my plan tomorrow. Well, 5 tomorrows have gone by and I reached out to Jo after discussing our options with my phone company.

I explained our options to Jo, Sam didn’t want to speak with me. They could pay the late bill, I would remove them from the plan and they would assume the responsibility of paying their own bill. They didn’t like that option. They told me they would pay it when they can, with no indication as to when.  

Then I told them my other option was to take them to small claims court. Over text they told me “you can get behind all the other creditors” then they both proceeded to berate me.

I cannot afford to cover over $1700. Would it be awful to report the phone stolen to the police? I know that won’t help me get the money back, but my phone company said they can claim them stolen under my insurance plan with them if I have a police report. Then I get my money back. I did explain the full situation to my phone company. 

I already suspended their service, and black listed the phones so they can’t be sold or used by other providers.

I think I may be the AH because Sam and Jo   do not know what the legal consequences of stealing is. He doesn’t know that you can’t just give the stuff back, or that it can carry jail time and a fine. My family and friends say I should, but I hate doing it to someone who was my friend.
 It’s horrible that our relationship has come down to this. Before this we had ended it pretty civilly. 

Edit: I have text messages from Sam refusing to return them, and they are both in my name. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not going to my friend's birthday because I feel like she's taking over my life,"I (22f) have a friend named Brittany (21f). I've noticed some patterns in her behaviour and I wanna know if I'm being overly sensitive or not. I find that she involves herself in everything I do and I can't really have a friendship to myself. I have a really close separate friend group, and every time her and I would make plans to hang out she'd invite everyone in my friend group even though they aren't close at all. Sometimes they would even ask me why Brittany is messaging them. Here are a few examples of why I feel her actions are overbearing:  


  
\- Brittany and I had plans to hang out, and once she found one of my friend was dropping me off at her house, she invited him inside also.  


  
\- Her and I were texting, it'd been a while since we last talked. The first thing she says to me is ""Do any of your friends listen to this \[music artist\]? I want to go to the concert"" I didn't really acknowledge that because she was annoying me with the constant friend thing, so she messaged my friends individually (they told me this).  


  
\- For new years her and I had no plans, she said she'd be out of town. Last minute she was back in town and forced herself onto my plans.  


  
\- She ranted to my mom??? about her ex boyfriend, then said ""Let me get your number, we should hang out when Grace (me) isn't here!""  


  
\- One night I bought Brittany around this guy I had a crush on. They'd never hung out before. Him and I were friends but there was obviously something more between us, we were extremely close. She knew all of this including that I had a crush on him. All of a sudden they started hanging out every weekend, and she went on a overnight road trip with him and never told me about it. It's interesting because the night I brought her about him I felt a little hesitant.  


  
\- I have this feeling she's insecure when it comes to boys. When I told her that a different guy from my past messaged me and we started seeing each other again, she had the weirdest reaction when I told her him and I reconnected and tried to downplay everything. She knew how much I really liked this guy and I thought she'd be happy for me.  


  
Lastly, her bday party was this past weekend. I decided not to go because of the way she's been making me feel. She wanted to do something big for her birthday and expected me to plan the entire thing (I never said I would). My guess is because I have lots of friends that I could invite. I wished her happy bday but I can tell in her response she isn't happy with me for not going. But this girl has genuinely made me feel like, is she upset I didn't go or upset that I didn't bring 5 other people (my friend group) with me? I just question how much she values ME. I'm looking at our texts and everything is just can your friends come. I want your friends at my birthday. I want your friends to join us. I don't mind if all my friends hang out but sometimes she makes me feel like I am not enough, it feels suffocating.

  
AITA for not going to her birthday?",AmItheAsshole
 for nagging my roommate to be cleaner?,"Hey there everyone! I'm a university student (m20) living in Germany with another student (f20) who's from outside of the country. We moved in together about 8 months ago on a convenience basis. We were mild acquaintances before but no friendship that needs/needed salvaging.

This is where my question starts. Since we moved in together, I've had to be the proactive person in getting furniture, setting up systems, and reaching out to various organizations (we had a pest problem a while back, unrelated to any of our doing), because she wouldn't ever do stuff, even if she offered to (I learnt that the hard way). Since then, with all the large organizational stuff out of the way, its been a lot easier to live with her in general.

But I've also been nagging her a lot about being clean. Mainly, my irritation stemmed from an unclean kitchen and living room. It's worth noting here that I have high standards for cleanliness, especially for a uni student, as the opposite reminds me of a dark depression cycle I had a few years back. Since then, this has gotten significantly better. I am still the person that cleans the floors in the apartment and the finer details (stovetop for example), but I'm fine with that (even if she has expressed multiple times that she does so too, which I know not to be the case).

Recently, I asked her to move some of her stuff off of our communal balcony and put it on hers (she has her own balcony, I don't), and to clean up cigarettes and dirt on the floor from her using it over winter (I don't smoke). I don't intend to stop her from doing so on the communal balcony, but rather to not make it front and center for my use of it. She reacted negatively to this, saying that she always tries to see things from my point of view, but that it always feels like she's getting none of that in return.

I can understand why she feels like this, especially with how many times I have asked about certain stuff. However, this has mainly been because she hasn't followed through on doing what she said she would. I get that everyone has their off days, I do too. But its when things stay for a week or more that I get rather annoyed. The balcony is a place I haven't touched over winter, so its state has only been influenced by her use over the last months.

I also am planning on living here with her for the next 2-3 years. Generally, I'm quite happy with the situation now, and I don't want to move; in case anyone was going to throw that out there. I pick my battles, but it just seems that I am the only one asking anyone to clean.

Final point: she's from a different cultural background than me, with a different standard of cleanliness. Thats fine, and compromise is warranted on both sides. But am I asking for too much? Thanks for your input, any advice is welcome!",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my mom if I could start cooking dinner more often?,"Some quick context My (15 Female Parents) both work full-time jobs. My mom does not enjoy cooking. I enjoy cooking and baking so I have offered to start cooking dinner most nights. My mom is thrilled not to have this responsibility and can't wait until school is over so I can start. We have even talked about grocery budgets and different recipes. 

My dad, however, insists that this is my way of disrespecting my mother and that I don't appreciate what she does around the house. Keep in mind my dad does nothing around the house. He only cooks dinner when we grill. He never does the dishes ( me and my sister alternate doing them. ) The only house chore he does is taking care of the lawn. My dad operates under the opinion that because he is the primary breadwinner, he does not have to participate in household chores. On the rare occasion that he does chores, he expects a parade to be thrown in his honor.

My intention was not at all to disrespect my mom. My goal was to help my mom as she hates cooking dinner and because I enjoy cooking it would be a way to show her love. So Reddit am I the Asshole",AmItheAsshole
 for not going with my girlfriend on a trip out of the country?,"She (24F) got upset with me (25M) because I kept mentioning that I will try to think about going on that trip with her and a few people. I do understand that it’ll mean a lot to her if I do come, but I really don’t have much in my bank account for a trip at the moment. She said she’ll be the one shouldering other expenses and I could just pay for my flight and other main things, but I really don’t want her to spend any money on me. We talked about me skipping this in the mean time and I promised I’ll come along on the next trip she’ll plan once I get to save up enough money, to which she agreed. Then recently she got upset because she asked me again if I could go.

I love her so much and I think she’s a one in a billion gal and i kinda don’t wanna screw this relationship up. WIBTAH for not coming with her because of my reasons?",AmItheAsshole
 if I ask my friend to double check her boyfriend?,"Apologies for poor formatting, on phone. 

I (19F) have a friend (21F) from college who is currently in a serious relationship with her boyfriend (25F) for the past couple of years. They started off pretty normally, with him having a crush on her, asking around about her and finally sliding into her DMs to ask her out after around a month of flirting with each other. They have been together for almost two years now, and they seem to be so much in love with each other that they will get married anytime now.

Recently, a lot of allegations that her boyfriend is a serial       m * lester and bully have come up, and even though a lot of these issues have been buried under the rug, they are verified to be true and he's known among a lot of people as a s * x offender in the college. I am not sure if she knows about him being one, but I know some people who have been affected due to his actions. He has bullied some of my best friends while being drunk and even sent threats to a friend of mine.

I also have my suspicions about him abusing her, as she has drastically lost weight after starting to date him and her entire behaviour has changed. She has no friends of her own, and her entire life revolves around him. Her only friends are her boyfriend's friends, and since he is in his last year of college they will graduate in a few days. They spend around 16-18 hours a day together even during exam weeks and she never sleeps or eats in order to spend those extra few minutes with him. I am getting worried for her since her academics are falling and her health is failing too.

Will I be the a**hole if I give her a subtle warning about her boyfriend or just ask her to maintain a distance with him?",AmItheAsshole
 or is my bf a bad person,"i don’t really know how to do these this is my first time but i hope this reaches the right people. i am 20 yr old f and my bf is also 20. but yet him and his friends are very immature. i have begged him to start changing and grow up with me since we were 16. nothing has changed. still sits at home all day playing his xbox with his friends and completely ignoring me. like i want to get my life together and move away and have a family. become normal people. when his friends came over i literally asked him and his twin to keep everyone out of the room while i’m sleeping as it makes me uncomfortable. this morning i log onto his snapchat account and found that his friend has sent him a photo of me sleeping. i was fuming. i woke up my bf and asked what the deal was and why there was a photo of me and his reply genuinely makes me angry.

“oh yeah haha. forgot to tell everyone to stay out sorry”. now you see in that situation i have to keep myself calm because if i get mad he turns around and blows up in my face and makes everything my fault and i’m the b**ch for getting angry first. it happens all the time. i get the slightest bit mad. to the point where ik dam well u can hardly tell i’m angry but he sits there and screams and yells at me like no tomorrow and then when i go and uh play fruit ninja it’s “ur such a manipulative person are you serious?” i don’t know what to do anymore. i’m tired of this. his family sits there and says that i’m too mature and that i wear the pants in the relationship but they go and say that i’m a needy b**ch and that i’m too sensitive and that i need to eat more or i need to eat less, like just typical stuff old people would say to you. but the main thing is my bf and his friends. his friends have sat there and called me a whale over and over till i cried when i’m 5 ft and literally shaped like an hourglass. i don’t know what to do about it. i feel so unheard and like i can’t talk to anyone. i have tried sorting it out with my bf but he either goes off at me or tells me he’s going to change but he never does. be honest am i just being sensitive or aita or is there actually something wrong here?

  
edit: i saw this one particular comment that really did make me question why i am with him and too be honest it’s because i am attached. we had a child together when we were fifteen but i had a miscarriage and when i turned 16 i moved in with him thinking it was the right decision. then he broke up with me and kicked me out but a day later he asked for me back and i decided to say yes. 4 years later this is happening. you guys have really made me realise that maybe i shouldn’t be with him. but i’m not sure if the next person i meet will do the same thing. i understand that staying with him is just going to hurt me more but i just need to find reason to leave him so instead of being lost in a world of memories i can find things to make me hate him instead and want nothing to do with him. if i do work up the courage i will update underneath.",AmItheAsshole
 for not eating food I don’t like?,"Me and my family have been running low on food these days, I (F16) haven’t really eaten anything except small stuff, because what we have left I usually don’t like, I also want to make sure everyone else has something to eat, I always do that when we run low on food. My sister (F21) asked why I wasn’t eating properly and I told her that was why. 

She called me spoiled and told me how that wasn’t gonna work when I’m older. How I can’t just not eat just because I don’t like something.

It’s making me feel a bit guilty, am I really an AH just because I do that? 
",AmItheAsshole
 or is he gaslighting me?,"So my husband and I have been together for 9 yrs. 

We are in Vegas and we went to the Sphere. Thought it would be fun but quickly got overwhelmed with the steep stairs etc. Of note, I’m not someone who typically experiences anxiety. Like 2% day to day. 

So the group we are with notices and tried to support me as best as you can in the given situation. My hubby, sitting beside me, makes fun of me taking mindfulness breaths and goes on to vocally enjoy the show, meanwhile I’m bordering on a panic attack which is only the 2nd time in my life I’ve ever felt like this. I felt like he was totally dialed out and almost annoyed at me- to be fair I am sensitive and can misinterpret situations like this. 

We got back to our room and got upset about it and he blamed me for not reading up about the experience before we went. Totally can take it if AITA- I’m unsure how to feel but felt a bit of gaslighting behaviour was happening.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to hear about gf's vacation.,"She went to Spain for 10 days with family and I am jealous that I could not go (just started job no PTO) as traveling to me is a big deal.

Idk I feel like getting it shoved in my face just makes me feel worse (kinda like seeing people on social media traveling which is why I flag those accounts), I'm happy shes happy but I do plan on traveling the world someday and id rather see all those things myself.  I don't have an issue with her experiencing things without me, I'm just trying to get over not wanting to hear or see anything related to her trip.

And sometimes I do ask about how things were on the trip, I never explicitly state ""Stop showing me"" because thats rude. She knows how it makes me feel so she tries to not send me much photo wise of whats going on.",AmItheAsshole
 For Getting Mad at My Autistic Friend?,"I (24M), recently got into it with my friend who is diagnosed with anxiety and self-diagnosed mild autism. It happened over them canceling plans last second due to an episode. This is the 3rd time they have canceled on our plans to hang out for “mental health issues” and I literally dont know what to do. Im frustrated because I feel like i’m putting in more effort than them when it comes to planning- even weeks in advance to accommodate their schedule. Cleaning my entire house and getting myself dressed/ready for their company is also time consuming. They are mad because they dont think i take their health seriously enough to count it as an actual reason to bail on plans. They also hate i use the word “excuse” when i confront this behavior as they dont see their actions as an excuse- more of a valid reason. Im torn because I really love this person but I dont enjoy that they’re not meeting their promises. I dont feel like they are putting in the same amount of effort.

What would you say/do in this situation?

  
edit: thx for the advice!! i should of mentioned that this person is actually self-diagnosed (I just found out lol)",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband he can’t buy a truck?,"My husband (30M) and I (29F) have been married for two and a half years. He sometimes gets fixated on things, mostly cars, and wishes all the time to purchase one (expensive ones). We can’t afford expensive cars. Recently, he’s gotten on a Ford Raptor kick for the last month or so. He has been searching to buy and one popped up online that he really liked. It’s a 2011 Ford Raptor with 156,000 miles on it. It’s also located at one of those family owned car dealerships that buys cars, tunes them up, and flips them for a profit. I have explained multiple times that we can’t really swing an extra payment of any kind right now with our financial goals and current debts. 

However, I wanted to indulge him over the weekend so we went and test drove it. That’s when I realized the nature of the dealership - I didn’t have any advance info, only that we were going to look at this truck. Suddenly, I’m putting in a credit application with him. The payment came to $550 a month for two years. The total cost of the truck with interest like that would be $26,400. I looked up the KBB value and it’s worth $16,885. They were asking $19,995. The dealership is firm on price but I truly believe it’s not a valuable buy. I don’t think he’ll get the use and mileage out of it that he believes, and we’ll be stuck with this car payment for longer than we even have the car. 

I am trying to compromise and say when I finish my master’s program we can buy him a nicer truck that’s newer with less mileage. In essence I’ve explained that I’m not saying “no” just “not right now.” He is making this about so much more than just the truck. He’s saying that I am stepping in his way, he is a man, and he deserves to buy the things he wants. He said he’s never said no to me about anything that I want, but I countered that I’ve never made an executive decision on large purchases without his input. And ultimately, any time it’s come up and he wasn’t enthusiastic, I have forgone the purchase. He’s also said nasty things when we argue and it’s making me wonder if I even know him at all. 

We have been arguing about this for weeks and in retrospect, I definitely shouldn’t have participated in the test drive. This is a serious point of contention for us and it’s interfering with all aspects of our marriage. My stance is no, his is yes, he wants to buy this right now, and I don’t think there’s really any compromise where both parties would be happy. I am trying to be forward thinking, plan for our future, retirement, and buy a second house in the near future. I feel that impulsive big buys like this will hinder that completely, because if we do this, what the next thing that will come up? This is causing me so much stress, my family is noticing, my colleagues, and I don’t know what to do or how to get through to him. 

Am I being too stubborn and should I just give in? Or AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not listening to my parents' telling me that I can't change my name.,"I (15f) was ""named by God"" according to my very religious parents. During my mom's pregnancy, they were struggling with names and the name Hannah with her prayer appeared on a cross gifted to them, so that is what they named me.

I hate my name, so I go by a shortened version of my middle name and have been for a while without telling my parents for fear of their reaction. Even though my chosen name is still a feminine name, it would still be too ""transgender"" for them. I'm just afraid of disappointing them. 

Now, a few months back, I told my friends that I was going by Alice instead of my first name, and they have been really supportive and are trying their best with the switch in names. After I had told my friends, I worked up the courage to tell my parents.

They didn't react well, but they said that they might consider going by my full middle name. A few weeks later and I've been going by Alice for a while now, with all my close friends using it. I genuinely do not like my name, and I haven't liked it for a long time.

This was the first move I had made on changing it and they told me that they wouldn't allow it.

I didn't accept that and have still been going by Alice at school and with friends. My parents don't know. So, would I be the asshole for not telling them about it?

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to get a puppy?,"Hey Reddit,

I (24m) find myself in a bit of a predicament and I need some unbiased opinions. I lost my job in January, my mum passed away this February and currently, I live in a small apartment with no garden and I am taking a bootcamp course to learn skills for a new job. My girlfriend (22) works, and I'm grateful for her support, especially considering we both struggle with depression and are in therapy. We've volunteered for dog walking at the RSPCA and planned to discuss fostering or adopting a dog after some time.

However, my girlfriend's friend recently had a litter of puppies, two of which are left. They're Patterdale Terriers, and while my girlfriend is eager to adopt one, I have reservations. The dogs are inbred, have never had vet checks or vaccinations, and come from a family living on a tight budget due to disability. Despite their financial struggles, they're giving us the dog for free along with supplies.

My girlfriend is adamant about getting a puppy, but I'm worried about our ability to care for it properly. We're both dealing with depression, financial uncertainty, and I'm grieving for my mum. I've always said we should wait until we have a house with a garden, but now my girlfriend wants to surprise everyone with the dog and doesn't want to tell our families.

Whenever I raise a point, she instantly gets upset and doesn't want to talk anymore, making everything more stressful for me. She also deals with health problems that cause her immense pain, and we have regular trips to A&amp;E as we are worried about the medical problems she has.

While I understand her desire for a dog, I feel it's too soon and not the right time for us. AITA for refusing to adopt a puppy despite my girlfriend's pleas?

Thanks for your input.",AmItheAsshole
H if I never spoke to my friend after what they did?,"This has been on my mind for a little while now. I (25F) have a friend that I had an argument with not too long ago. I’m trying to be a little more vague in case they find out it’s them so let’s call them Sam. Sam and I have been friends for years. I’ve had their back and they’ve had mine through thick and thin. More recently though, things have been sort of tense between Sam and I. 

When we would hang out or talk, it became about only what they wanted to do or what they wanted to talk about. I couldn’t really talk about my interests or about my day to day without Sam becoming completely uninterested to the point of being straight up silent on me. When Sam had a bad day, they were extra pushy about only talking about and doing what they wanted to do. 

Because of this, I started feeling the need to avoid Sam some days. If I tried talking to them about these concerns, Sam would just claim they weren’t forcing me to do anything I didn’t wanna do, or that they weren’t asking for much. But Sam almost seemed to expect me to use every moment I had free time to talk to them or hang out with them. But I have a spouse, a job and a household to take care of. I didn’t always have time for them. This made Sam upset. I give all this to give the context that things were already tense between us. 

Now for the incident. I recently found out I am expecting. When I found out, I wanted to tell all my close family and friends, Sam included. When I told them, however, I was met with anger instead of happiness. Sam said this was going to be bad, that my spouse and I should have been more safe (because that was appropriate) and that I could lose my job. It hurt when Sam said that. I told Sam that the rant wasn’t necessary and they just replied with “I’m sorry that’s just how I feel. I can’t be happy for you right now.” They said they needed time to take it in. We didn’t talk for a little while after that, then the big argument came. 

We had just started talking again when I started getting good news about the baby. By this point Sam had apologized and gave their congrats. When I told them about it. I was met with a short, annoyed response. When I pressed about it, Sam went on this rant about how I already barely pay attention to them, but when I have my baby, I’ll have no time for them at all. And that even if we do hang out, I’ll have my kid with me and they won’t feel comfortable with that because they don’t really care for kids. And even if I don’t push my kid on them (which I would never do), they wouldn’t be comfortable with it. 

Sam just makes it seem like because I’m moving into this new phase of life, we can’t be friends anymore. Sam said his final point that things won’t be all sunshine and rainbows with this. And I know there are going to be parts of parenthood that suck. I just don’t understand why Sam wants to end our friendship over my child. WIBTAH if I just never contact Sam again for this?",AmItheAsshole
 for not paying hospital bills after my friend tripped over my dog?,"Yesterday my friends and I were hanging out in the park: me + my dog, my friend Cathy + her dog, and another friend Jenny. 

Jenny was walking Cathy’s dog, and they were walking ahead of us. Cathy was walking a bit behind me and my dog. Cathy decided that she wanted to catch up with Jenny, so she started running from behind me. 

As Cathy ran past me and my dog, she fell and tripped. We thought it was a minor injury but it turns out she dislocated her shoulder and needs surgery. Cathy says that while she was running past us, my dog suddenly ran toward her and she tripped over my dog. Honestly I didn’t see clearly how exactly she tripped. I couldn’t tell if my dog actually ran into her or if she tripped over my dog on her own. My dog didn’t make a sound and didn’t seem bothered. Jenny also said she couldn’t tell. 

Cathy wants me to pay her hospital bills because she says it’s my dog’s fault that she tripped. But I feel like it’s unfair of her to ask this. If my dog had bit her or attacked her, obviously that’d be a different story and I would 100% pay all the medical bills. But in this instance, Jenny and I are both unsure of whether my dog ran into Cathy, whether Cathy tripped over my dog, or whether Cathy tripped by herself near my dog. Cathy started running from behind me so I didn’t have a clear view of what happened. 

The money isn’t a big deal, but out of principle, I don’t want to pay the bills because I feel like this isn’t my fault. AITA? 

EDIT: Btw my dog is a corgi, so pretty small. Not big enough to knock anyone over, but you could definitely trip if he ran into you while you were running. 

EDIT #2: Cathy is my coworker. We’ve been hanging out more so I started to think of her as my friend. But we are coworkers, we work together in the same small-ish office, which also makes things a little more awkward. ",AmItheAsshole
" My sister has more money than the rest of the family, but doesn’t think she should pay rent on time","My (NB23) sister (F21) has been saving for a car for quite a while now. She doesn’t have a driver’s license yet. She has almost 10k in savings, and gets approximately $900 every two weeks as a paycheck. Rent is $300 every month as we still live with our parents. She is very good about making sure that once money goes in, it doesn’t come out. Our Mothers birthday is coming up, as well as Mother’s Day, and so I wanted to get her an umbrella for her patio. I ran the idea by both her and our dad, and they both agreed to pitch in. It’ll be $65 from each of us. Because she doesn’t have enough in her checking account to pitch in and take Ubers to work, she told our parents that they won’t get rent until the next paycheck. Sometimes this is fine, but there are a few extra bills due this coming month that means they need the extra money (her rent and mine) by the 2nd. She is now saying that either she doesn’t have to pay rent until her next check, or she’s not buying anything for our mom. 
Her saying that she’s is ‘broke’ or has ‘no money’ has caused arguments before, because the rest of us don’t have even close to what she has in savings. My parents and I both have our own bills to pay(I pay for my car and insurance-which eats up a lot bc I can’t work full time due to a disability), so it’s so much harder for us to save 75% of every paycheck. 
And I’m not saying that she shouldn’t save, or that she needs to give others her money, all I’m saying is that taking $65 out of her savings won’t make her unable to purchase a car. She had already agreed to pitch in, but now because of the extra bills this month, my dad and I don’t know if we’ll be able to get the umbrella for my mom.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to go on vacation even though my boyfriend can’t?,"Alt account because some friends follow my main and I don’t want them to know about this issue yet.

I’ve been with my bf, I’ll call him Joe, for nearly a near. 

Joe and I have different financial situations (I have more money than him) but it’s never been an issue between us. We always do things he can comfortably afford and split costs. I’m totally fine with this because his company is more important to me than what we do together. 

However, every year since finishing school, my friend group takes a trip to a specific area. It started as an “end of exams” celebration but is now a sort of “kick off of summer” trip. Joe has always known about this trip because I met him right when I got back from it last year. 

I extended the invite to Joe to come along, but explained that there were absolutely no hard feelings about him not coming, since the trip would be far outside his budget (I gave him a rough estimate of how much it would be). Joe got annoyed and said if I really wanted him to come I should try and find a compromise that would allow him to come, such as finding a cheaper hotel that he and I/the whole group could stay in, and planning activities that are suitable for him. I said I’m not going to demand everyone downsize their vacation for him. Joe then said that it will hurt him if I go without him. 

I don’t want to miss this vacation. Apart from the fact that it’s the only time our whole group gets together, I admit I do just want to do something I enjoy, without having to accommodate Joe. I don’t think that’s too much to ask. Yes, we’re a couple but I don’t think that means I can’t go anywhere without him. 

Am I being a jerk? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend that I don't want to listen to her talk about her boyfriend?,"My (15F) friend and I (15M) were having a conversation about something completely unrelated  when she randomly went off about how amazing her long distance boyfriend is and how I should try to get a boyfriend like him. For context I am openly gay. I was growing a bit tired of her seemingly randomly talking about her boyfriend and I tried to explain it as nicely as I could have. She got upset and stormed off and has since blocked me on all socials and refuses to talk it out with me. I wasn't trying to be rude but I have since been wondering if I was in the wrong.

Edit: I said something along the lines of ""Hey, (Insert name here), I know you're in love and your boyfriend seems amazing, truly, but it seems like every conversation revolves around him, you know. I don't really feel like I need to know the details of every conversation you have with him."" She was mentioning how she was sexting him and details I didn't want to know.",AmItheAsshole
 if i quit via text with no additional notice? ,"

I work A dumb fast food job but I'm the assistant GM. I started mid February. I also have a small child at home. this is all context. below will be annoying things I've had to go through: 

      I am scheduled 50 hours a week (5 ten hour days), as is the GM, however,  we close when my schedule is supposed to end and I have to stay 30-45 minutes to clean and close the system. so really I'm there almost 11 hours. the gm is NEVER there till the end of their shift. they say they're at different locations but I really think that's not always true. 
      on numerous occasions, I have had multiple call outs in one shift and my boss wouldn't even tell me. or make up something about car trouble but they're coming just to pacify me. 
      my boss has taken night shift people off their shift to work day time to help them out and just leaving me with one less body. 
      Last week there was an $80 shortage which my boss ultimately decided by counting what the actual safe showed was deposited, that the safe malfunctioned and the amount deposited and the total were not showing the same. well I guess my job said that's 100% not possible but they can easily justify a bank malfunction where one of my deposits was actually for the day before so yeah I'm still short, it's on me, and now I get a write up for the 80 bucks. AND when I walked in I overheard my boss's boss saying my job is on the line. 
     not allowed to turn lobby lights off to slow business down at night to actually get out close to my scheduled time but I am told that they do the same thing
     ive been outwardly disrespected and asked to not work with people and I've been totally disregarded. (the person was a rehire who was fired for physically assaulting someone)
      yesterday I wasn't even given a late night cashier so on top of already having to do everything closing wise, I was stuck in drive thru till the last second taking orders. I messaged the group chat that this was getting old and I'm tired of having no one on my shift. my boss called me and their resolution was to list everyone who was scheduled, which I already knew. they also told me Sundays aren't busy even though myself and others have been telling them how busy Sundays have been for like the past month. 
      today I called out to just take a beat but I messaged the group chat which everyone else has been doing too. well all of a sudden since it's me there's an issue and my other coworker messaged me saying my boss is straight up pissed. 

I don't know if I even want to go back. I've only been here since February and this is what I'm going through. I don't have another job. but I have a little money to float me into finding one. should I quit? probably not. but I want to. I'm miserable. and I miss my kid. but I also feel so guilty for potentially leaving my boss without a manager as they've had issues keeping one up until me and need validation if I'm in the right.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to help my younger sister with her college expenses when she graduates next year?,"My family fell on some hardtimes like many other families did during covid. Our father passed away, and he was the sole source of income, and our mother is on disability. My mom will be 51 in June, and my sister will be graduating next year. My mom just does not have the money to pay for her college and my mom asked if I would be willing to cover my sister's college expenses. I told my mom I can offer a little help but I have to prioritize my wife and kids first and foremost. 

My mom tried to guilt trip me in saying this is what our dad would want, and they paid for my education which is true.  I tried to explain that back when I went to college it was much cheaper, I also scholarships and grants lined up so their out of pocket expense was minimal on their end. 

My mom told me I am being extremely selfish to ignore how things are just much harder for kids now. Which I also accept, but I have my own families needs to focus on. After a lengthy back and forth she asked me to leave, I told her i loved her and left. She said nothing in return. 

I got home and started to think about the situation. My family is well cared and provided for her, we have minimal debt outside of our home and my wife's car. Our expenses are manageable both my wife and I make good money.

I looked over the numbers I could reduce what I contribute to my retirement and investment accounts, currently I max out my 401k and keep a small percentage as discretionary income. If I don't contribute to my own retirement, investments, and throw in my discretionary income I can afford to pay for her to attend her dream school. 

Like my dad use to say you can always make money back, but idk. At the core I know I should not feel bad but I do. 

",AmItheAsshole
 for letting my husband’s family name die out by insisting our daughter takes mine?,"So I (F31) have been with my husband (M30) for 10 years, married for 3. I kept my last name when we got married, and he has no plans to change his. We have a baby girl due in August, but we’ve recently run into a problem with his parents about the naming of our child. 

Now my husband’s family name is quite unfortunate. I won’t say what it is for privacy reasons, but it’s a very slightly different spelling of a sexual word. You also should know it’s a sexual word that mostly be used for or relate to a female rather than a male. Because of this, we agreed together that our children will take my family name to prevent bullying in school and throughout their youth. I felt even stronger about this when I found out we were having a girl – growing up a girl is a pretty rough experience anyway, and myself and so many of my friends experienced harassment and sexual comments from young men growing up even without an unfortunate surname. It sucks but it’s reality, and I want to minimise my daughter’s experience of this as much as possible. 

We have recently broken this news to my husband’s parents and they are very upset about it. For context, he is their only child and they had to try for over 10 years to have him. They are a small family and his parents only have sisters who took their husbands’ names. This means that my husband is the only chance to carry on their family name and they’re upset that we’re taking that chance away and effectively ending the family name. Although it was a mutual decision between my husband and I, they are particularly upset with me because I have three younger brothers who could have kids and carry on my family name, and yet I “feel the need” to “take” theirs away.

We’ve tried explaining the reasons but they think I’m being overdramatic. They were insulted that I could compare their last name to a dirty word and they say my husband “never had any issues” when he was young. It’s true he didn’t experience that much harassment in school (aside from occasional mild bullying) but he is a male and like I said the word relates a lot more to a female, and also girls are so much more likely to be sexually harassed by boys than vice versa. 

I know that teenage boys can be cruel, so I just want to give my daughter and any future kids the best chance at minimising harassment. AITA?

Edit: A lot of people are very curious about the name so I’ve given some very heavy hints in the comments. Just preferably didn’t want to type it out with the exact spelling just for my own peace of mind.",AmItheAsshole
 for teaching my daughter at my wife's expense.,"I have a daughter (16F) who since the age of about 12 became quite interested in my line of work. I am a control systems engineer and currently work building autonomous robots.

Since the age of 12, my daughter would inquire about things to study and I would teach her different concepts in mathematics and physics and also programming. These days she self studies also. These are typically topics that are more advanced than what she learns at school and as a side effect it has made the school science and math seem trivial for her.

I recently a small assignment for her based on some 3D visualization tool where she can see a simulation and program the controller in C++ using a tool called Robot Operating System. I had her implement a [bang bang controller](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bang%E2%80%93bang_control) and [PID controller](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Proportional%E2%80%93integral%E2%80%93derivative_controller). Initially to learn on a simulated fan but then to drive a simulated car in a game like environment using simulated LIDAR sensors for the PID control.

While doing so and taking to her about the bang bang controller for driving based on collision detection, I made a joke about the bang bang controlled driving being like her mom's driving. My wife overheard us and got upset at me and called me a jerk. She had just scratched her car by backing into a low concrete ledge the other day and has scraped her car a couple of times before (maybe like 5 or 6). It was just a light hearted joke and I don't think she is a bad driver or anything just had some bad luck. 

She gave me a lecture and took it way too deep saying I am training our daughter to be sexist (which is ridiculous since she is a woman too) and that she will lose respect for her mom or myself.

AITA here?",AmItheAsshole
 for not visiting my dying grandfather,"I (19f) have never been close to my grandfather (91m). All my other siblings have stories of him baby sitting or sleepovers but I never experienced any of that growing up. 

When i was 7 I started to become extremely thin and when i was 10 I got diagnosed with partial acquired lipodystrophy. To save you the research it essentially means that my fat cells don’t work properly, therefore making me extremely thin. I don’t have any memories of him other than him telling me to eat and that I need to gain weight, despite my mother reassuring him that I was perfectly healthy. 

He also doesn’t know who I am. Ever since I was 8 or 9 he’s had trouble remembering me or who’s kid I am, at this point I don’t think he even knows i’m his granddaughter. Last time I visited him was a little over 4 years ago, yet he still had something to say about my weight. 

My whole family are trying to get me to go visit him (TOMORROW) because he recons he hasn’t got long left, with him even telling my mother to start arranging his funeral. His “dying” wish is for everyone to go visit him. This includes all of his grandchildren. I don’t want to see him as even the thought of it brings me so much anxiety. Quite frankly I don’t think he’d even notice my absence.",AmItheAsshole
 for selling an item instead of giving it to my sibling?,"Several years ago my mother was getting rid of a really nice motorized garden tool that she had for years and had used a lot but no longer needed. She asked if I wanted it. I was living in the country and had a large garden and it would be really useful so if course I accepted it. About a year later, my mother passed away suddenly and we were left to deal with her large estate. All the siblings amicably split up all the belongings we wanted to keep and the rest was donated. About 6 months later, I found myself in the middle of a long, nasty divorce and caring for my 4 children on my own. Money was tight and I had moved from my 20 acre property (in preparation for it to be sold and split by me and my ex) and moved into a small rental in town. I no longer had a need for the gardening tool and I really didn't have room for it. On top of that, I really needed money and this tool could be sold for around $1k. When my sister found out I planned to sell the item, she was shocked and said that she and her kids had a lot of good memories with our mom using that tool and she didn't want to see it sold. She asked if she could have it. I told her I needed the money and offered to sell it to her. She refused and became angry. She accused me of being insensitive and only caring about money. I reminded her that I was trying to support 4 children - on my own - with no help from my STBX and I needed every penny I could get my hands on. I also reminded her that this had been given TO ME - from our mom - years ago, because she no longer needed or wanted it. Obviously this item did not hold sentimental value to our mother. It wasn't one of those kinds ofnthhings. I tried multiple times to explain this to my sister and help her see my point of view, but she wouldn't hear it. Nothing I said mattered. She felt that her sentimental value of the object was more important than anything else and that I was robbing her of something that was very important to her. And how could I possibly do this when our mother had passed away. I, again, explained my side and said that if it was that important to her I would happy to sell it to her but she refused. 

(Please know that financially she was more than capable of buying the item. Money was not an issue for her. I know for a fact she had more than $20k in savings at this time.) 

I continued to offer to sell it to her but she refused and insisted it should be given to her for free. I disagreed and gave her a final opportunity to buy it from me but she wouldn't. So I sold it. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for snatching my sick friends placard because I was first in line ,"My college has a highly sought after bus shuttle trip NYC that my friend group really wanted to go to. Since tix are only 5$, super in demand and ppl line up early, I volunteered to stand in line and hold everyone’s places. The ticket booth opened at 3:30pm and I got there at 8:00am. I was the first in line. Most of my friend group one by one got there a few hours later and this one mutual friend Danny shows up at starts talking to us.

 It is currently 2:30 and the line is wrapping around the building. The staff starts passing out numbered placards to prevent anyone else from cutting the line. Danny is standing right at the front and gets the #1 placard and I get #3. Danny starts laughing in my face that he showed up 5 min ago, didn’t even want to go on the trip and gets the first placard. I’m super pissed off bc I took one for the team waiting 6.5 hours. 

He ended up giving his #1 to my other friend, Ashley who showed up too late and got #50. Ashley was super sick at this time and wanted to go home. I took Ashley’s placard and switched it with mine so that I could buy my ticket and leave first. Danny starts verbally berating me saying “you’re the crappiest person I’ve ever met”, “you’re a horrible person”, “she’s sick” , “you better give it back rn” and more curses. Out of shock and pity I gave hers back and apologized. 

I was feeling super guilty the rest of the day but also mad at Danny for insulting me like that because I sacrificed 7+ hours waiting so that they ALL could get tix. AITA for taking Ashley’s placard?",AmItheAsshole
 to ask my son's father to relinquish his parental rights,"Long time reddit reader, first time poster so please be kind. I'm on an anonymous account as I'd prefer my ex not see this just in case he's still on Reddit.
To cut an incredibly painful, toxic and long story short my ex and I splitting up did us both a favour, it was not a good environment for our son. We split up before our son turned one and he returned to his hometown which is a while away from where I still live.. think minimum of a 3 hour journey by car. 
For the duration of this time my ex hasn't been very present in our son's life and only paid child maintenance when I made that happen about 2 months after he left. I tried to set up an informal and written contract after he left to ensure he still got to see our son regularly even if it was just over the phone on FaceTime. He denyed this request and said it wasn't a legal contract and I couldn't enforce it. Fine, you're right it's not. I then didn't hear from him until a month before Christmas in 2022 saying he wanted to come and see our son as he's missing him and he's brought presents. Okay fine, I set up a date where my son would be with my mother, my ex came, he saw our son and then left and I didn't hear from him again until the March 2023, between then and Christmas last year once again his calls became very few with odd times where he'd be consistent but then he'd fall off the face of the Earth again. It's worth mentioning that he is a single parent to his child so I fully understand that being a parent has its challenges and there's not always enough time in the day. Last week we spoke and I once again asked for a consistent line of communication between us because I had been quite angry towards him about a missed child support payment but then afterwards realized I'm just angry that the one thing he uses to show his love with isn't there. The money he paid every month half of that went is the pot for our son's birthday/Christmas presents and half on essential needs for our son.. that was the only constant. He says it's for travel to come and see our son in the next couple of months but skip to today (the agreed upon day to call) and I hear nothing from him, no text, nothing. 
It's stressing me out because I know how much he let me down when we were together, he was not the person he claimed to be and I don't want him to buy our son's affection as he gets older but isn't there for him if he needs him. I want my ex to agree to give up his parental rights under the reason he himself stated, that 'he is struggling to support two children' when in reality it's because I don't want him to break my son's heart. 
So I ask.. am I seriously overreacting and being the asshole and what the heck do I do here if I am...

",AmItheAsshole
 for not getting rid of my cat?,"My 5yr old is allergic to cats, got him tested at like 2, and I think the allergy causes a consistent cough. Recently, like past Friday, he had a blood draw because his dad thought he might have lead poisoning (boy has been throwing up at school and complaining about feeling weak in the legs). We got the test results but no explanation on Friday evening. And it's a CBC, which isn't for lead testing. Ex/ kiddos dad immediately blames my cat for some the abnormal test results and says I need to get rid of her. I've had said cat for 10 yrs. It's death do us part. Kiddos dad starts saying I'm killing our son and he threatens to take full custody. Cause this is apparently the last straw.

But like AITA for refusing to get rid of or make my 10 yr old cat live outside??

edit, because more info: kiddo does have the cough outside of my house, at his dad's as well, who doesn't own any animals. kiddos paternal grandma does own several animals and kiddo stays at her house like 50% of the time, from what I hear.  apparently she does have a air purifier. 

I do clean my house regularly. and the cat isn't allowed in the bedrooms. cat is honestly avoidant of children, but I know how dander gets every where.

kiddo understands what he is allergic to, and I do give him medicine for the allergy. Kiddos cough isn't a coughing fit, it's like one or two coughs a couple times throughout the day. I have the special filters for my ac but not an air purifier. 

and this morning I found out they did test for Lead, the results just aren't back yet.​",AmItheAsshole
 if I didn't put my father in the dedication of my book?,"Throwaway account because my sibling knows my main.

Basically, a year ago I managed to write and publish a book. It isn't The Book (TM) or anything, but I'm proud of it! It's been a longtime wish of mine.

While I was writing it, one time I was in the car with my mom (who didn't know at that time that I was writing it) and a song played. Said song is dedicated to the mother of the singer, so I said so to my mom. She jokingly said: ""well, let's see when you publish a book and dedicate it to me!"". We both laughed, but I \*knew\* I could do the funniest thing ever. So I did!

When my book got published, my family read the dedication. It was for my grandpa, who died shortly before, and to my mom, referrencing that conversation. I don't know if she remembered it, but she was very happy. My father... well...

In that moment, he didn't say anything about it, but a couple of weeks later, my mom told me that my father said that he didn't understand why he wasn't included and that he was hurt. I was a bit surprised because if he had asked me directly, I'd have told him this same story. It's really not that deep. However, my mom told me that, now I need to write and publish another one so I can put my father on it. I do have another manuscript ready to send around to publishing houses, but it's a darker story that I feel should be dedicated to no one.

I'm afraid that if this second manuscript ever gets published and it is not dedicated to my father, it will stir shit. At the same time, I think that dedications are very personal and I should be able to choose whether to add one and, if I do so, who to dedicate the story to.

So... WIBTA if I don't dedicate the next manuscript to my father?

Edit 1: I've seen it in several comments so I wanna clarify two things. The first one is that the dedicatory to my mom isn't a joke! It was more of a ""haha, got ya, you really got that dedicatory"" situation. She has always supported me in my writing hobby so regardless of the car anecdote, she would have gotten it anyways. The car anecdote was just an excuse and something I referenced in the dedicatory itself.

The second thing I wanna clarify is that, no, my father had no active part in this. He never made me stop writing or said a bad word about me writing. He also never actively supported me (for instance, I know he almost never read my short stories, whenever I send them to him. It's not his thing, I get that!). I'm also almost certain that he did not react the manuscript for my first book prior to it being published (I send it to my family so that they would beta read it).

Edit2: while not in the dedication, he is in the acknowledgments section!

Hope this clears things up and apologies for not including it before!",AmItheAsshole
H to disagree that my Brother thinks he owns stuff just because it’s been in his room for a long time even though he doesn’t.,"This is prolly a dumb arguement but I need opinions. So there’s this workout bench that has adjustable height. I wanted to use it to work my lower abs. So I went to ask my brother could I use it. He asked why and already that was a stupid question. It’s a workout bench do you need anymore answers? I told him I needed it and then he told me no because he’s using it. Mind you this dude is always on his phone 24/7. If he did use it it was prolly for like a good 10 minutes because that’s prolly his limit from his phone. His reason was I use it to squat. I told him there were weights with a bar outside and he told me no. So I told him the reason why he even has it is because I told my dad to bring it here when we moved. See, the bench used to belong to the owner of the house we used to rent. When we moved I told my dad to bring it here when my dad originally didn’t want to bring it. He got all bitchy and so I went to my mom. So finally my mom said we had to use it two days and switch. I told him that. He was like no mom said you can only use it for twos days and it’s mine again. So I told him you don’t have the right to give permission or not because it’s not yours. He goes well it’s not yours either. I’m literally the reason why it’s here!!!!! He continues saying you don’t have a right to go in my room and take my “stuff”. Now that really erked me because again if it wasn’t for me it wouldn’t even be in his room! He said it’s been in his room since December and so now it was his. Wtf? That’s call stealing?? I told him no matter how long it’s been in your room if it doesn’t belong to you it’s not yours it’s stealing!! I know I sound like a hypocrite cuz we originally took it from the owner house but still I think I have claim to it. He thinks just because it’s been in his room for 5 months it’s suddenly belongs to him. He decided to use my example of “if it weren’t for me it wouldn’t be here.” He told me dad threw my animal plushie into the trash can when we were moving. That time me and my dad were in a arguement. So that idiot prolly throw my stuff out of anger. My brother told me he saw it and took it out of the trash and brought it here. He said it now belong to him now since “he brought it here” Now that doesn’t even make sense just because he picked MY stuff out of the trash it suddenly becomes his. And he accuses me of being bratty for not taking no for an answer but literally he has no right to be giving me permission cuz it doesn’t belong to him! I think I have a valid claim to it since I’m the reason it’s here. So am I wrong or is he right?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting our apartment at 85 degrees Fahrenheit ,"I'll keep it short. My apartment mate (21F) and I (21F) go to college and live a a two-bedroom apartment on the third floor in a 200-year-old house where our rent is less than $500 a month. Our electricity bill tends to be around $40 each a month; however, our highest bill was in February when we paid $60 each because we had the heat turned on. In March and most of April, we have been fine with turning on the A/C or heat occasionally because the weather was in the 60s/70s. HOWEVER, this week there was a heat wave coming through making the average temperature in the high 80s. I asked my roommate if we could leave the A/C on because I have been feeling sick and waking up sweaty (TMI IK). She was apprehensive but agreed. I noticed it bothered her so I turn off the A/C at night from midnight to 8 am (when it's in the 60s/70s). CUT TO TODAY. This morning I woke up at 8 am, turned on the A/C, got ready, and left. I got home at 4:30 pm and the house was 85 degrees. I kindly asked her if we could leave the A/C on during the day (not even at a cold temperature, but just for circulation). I expressed to her that within an hour of being at the apartment (even after turning on the A/C (our A/C is very old and takes a while to kick in)), I was feeling dizzy and threw up because of the heat. She told me it was a waste of money to turn on the A/C, accused me of having a faulty A/C in my room, and called me crazy. She has not come home. I have checked the A/C for the past 4 hours and it only now has become semi-decent (76 degrees). AITA for wanting the A/C on when its hot and causing me to feel sick?",AmItheAsshole
 Asking ex to pay rent,"My ex and I have been living together for two years along with her two kids. I have paid for rent (1800) for the entirety of our time together and she pays for groceries and utilities. Utilities come up to (on summer months) $500 (on cooler months) $300, my phone bill $50, and groceries. 
We are no longer together and cohabitating for the next 4 months. I don’t eat ANY food in the house so she no longer pays for that. 
I also gave her the master with the bathroom and I share the bathroom with the kids. 
Can I also mention she asked to dog sit her boyfriend’s dog without telling me whose it was and now it’s living here? 
I understand she has to find a place to go in the next 4 months but so do I. 
I feel guilty asking her to pay more. 
How can I go about this without feeling like an asshole? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to get rid of my tattoo that my ex did on me?,"I am using a throw away and fake names. I (24F) am in a new relationship with my girlfriend Alice (22F). She’s great, lovely and perfect in many ways. We have been going steady for 9 months now. 

We have talked about our past relationships. We are getting to know each other more and more everyday. Had met each others friends and family. Sure we did have a few arguments, here and there. What we argue about mostly is, she doesn’t really like are my tattoos and piercings. 

I had a two facial piercings. My dahlia piercing and smiley piercing. They were done by one of my friends. But I took them off for Alice. Now I only have two tattoos. One with a dead unicorn on my hip, and a zebra with red eyes with cosmo flowers around.

The one with the zebra was done by an ex girlfriend of mine, who is a tattoo artist. Who I dated few years ago. When I told Alice about it, she got uncomfortable and asked me to remove it. I told her no repeatedly. Even for weeks it went on and on. The same argument. It’s just so pricey to remove a tattoo and a waste. I love my tattoos, I plan on getting more tattoos anyways. But I already got rid of my piercings for her. She just keeps demanding more and more. I don’t tell her to not color her hair. I have been nothing but supportive. 

I feel like she should love me for who I am. Just as I do for her. She just won’t stop. Alice argues in front of my friends. When we hang out with them. It’s embarrassing. It got to the point my best friend Livia (25F) told Alice off, and to leave me alone about it. They both got into a big argument. In front of my friend group. I never felt more embarrassed. 

Now Alice wants me to stop being friends with Livia. Who I have known since I was 4. I did of course tell her no. None of my friends want anything to do with her. After they saw her treatment with Livia and I. But she keeps continuing about it. 

It is so draining to me. That its getting to the point, I am covering myself up with baggy clothes, to cover my tattoo. Just so I don’t trigger her into an argument. She’s also bringing her family into this. They did tell her to stop it. But Alice just doesn’t want to.

Her friends texted me to think about it at least. I ignored it. I am just not sure what else to do. I don’t want to do anything drastic. Alice means a lot to me. It will be heart breaking for me. AITA for not getting rid of my tattoo, done by my ex? ",AmItheAsshole
 for seeing my old dentist?,"So… Last September I moved to a new town as part of my current job. My hometown is about a two hour drive away and I kept most of my professional contacts there (doctors, accountants, etc.) This week I needed to go to the dentist because I’m a year overdue for a checkup. I tried to schedule an appointment with the dentist here, but they couldn’t get me in till October. Without many options nearby, I called my old dentist and quickly got an appointment set up the following Monday at 10:30 because it was the only time slot available.

Because my workday starts at 9, I spoke to my boss about coming in late on Monday. I explained that I was overdue, and I had to go back home for the appointment. I would have just taken the day off, but my paid time off is very limited due to being a recent hire. My boss agreed to let me come in late and - after confirming the appointment was at 10:30 in the morning - I assumed that was the end of it.

Cut to earlier today. I left my apartment early because it’s a 2 hour drive home, got my checkup, and left hometown at 11:30. So I arrive at work at one. My boss won’t speak to me and later on during my shift he practically walks up to me and accuses me of “taking advantage of his kindness” because he didn’t know I was going to be gone till 1. I tried to explain that I never attempted to lie or take advantage since I’d laid it out early on that Id be driving home for the appointment which was a four hour round trip. He wasn’t having it and then asked why I didn’t set up an appointment locally to which I explained that I’d TRIED to do this, but time wasn’t working out. 

So now he’s claiming I should have mentioned this when confirming I could come in late and that he could have gotten me a local checkup. Like, how was I supposed to know he was friends with the local dentist?! It’s not like I don’t come from a small town either, I was driving back to a city for this appointment so he would have known what my travel times would be. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to tell my parents who I'm dating until after I graduate?,"So, my (17M) boyfriend (18M) used to bully me ALOT during elementary school and half of middle school. My parents transferred me to another school for the middle of my 7th grade - my 8th grade year. But I went to the same Highschool with them but by that time I guess they matured. 

My boyfriend had apologized to me for how he treated me tho and we kinda started talking but more like acquaintances during my freshman year and over time I can say that we became friends. We started dating in August of last year and I have not told my family at all. They absolutely hate him. They still talk about him to this day. I already told him they hate him and he understood. He told me that he just wants to talk to my family (specifically my parents) because he wants them to know he's sorry for his actions.

 I told him that I don't think it's gonna work and I just wanna wait until we graduate. Its in a few days and I don't see why he can't wait. He's mad because yesterday I saw him in the store and I didn't wave at him when he waved at me. He told me I pissed him off because I looked at him and just ignored him. I told him that my dad was there and I got nervous. 

He told me that I embarrassed him because I made him look like he was crazy and he wants me to tell my parents that we're dating but I want to wait until we graduate. When I said that he got sad and told me that I was prolonging the inevitable because they were gonna be disappointed in me either way but I don't see why they have to be disappointed in me now.  Am I being unreasonable?",AmItheAsshole
" for ""one upping"" my dad by getting my sister another birthday cake?","I (17f) have an older sister (21f) who had a birthday recently. She’s not big on celebrating it due to an event that occurred when she was a kid on that same day, and it’s kind of been tainted for her ever since i think. 

Last year was the first time I can remember her asking for anything for her birthday in years, and literally all she said she wanted was a small heart shaped chocolate cake with lavender colored frosting and purple flowers on it.

Our dad got her an ice cream cake instead and ended up forgetting to bring it into the house so it melted into a pile of mush. He was apologetic about it, and she said it was fine, but I could tell that she was disappointed and I felt bad that she didn’t get the one thing she asked for.

She didn't ask again for anything this year, but I decided that I wanted her to have the cake she asked for last year but didn’t get. I talked to our dad about getting her a cake again, specifically the one she’d wanted, and he agreed to order it so I figured it was a done deal. 

Well on the night before her birthday my dad pulled out a plain white sheet cake (the discounted undecorated kind) he bought from the grocery store. Which obviously it wasn’t my birthday, and she said that she was fine with the sheet cake, but I’m kind of irritated since my dad agreed with me when I said we should get her the cake she had wanted before. I mentioned it to him but he said it was just a cake, and she was fine with the one he got her.

I snooped through her social media and there’s this local bakery she follows that makes cakes similar to the one she was asking for. I called and got a quote for a cake, and they said they could have it ready within a few days.

I don’t want to like one up my dad by getting my sister this cake, and I know that she said she was happy with the cake she got, but I just want her to have the thing she asked for and I feel like he dropped the ball with this.

I also feel like I’m kind of overthinking this but I don’t want my dad to feel like I’m slighting him or something either. Idk i just wanna know if it would be a jerk move to get a cake for my sister.

ETA:

The cake has been ordered :)",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to keep my money,"I'm currently in the second semester of engineering and it's incredibly difficult, I spend all my time on exams and assignments everyday. I live at home with my mom and brother (9) because it's cheaper for both of us (she receives some money from the government while I live with her and couldn't afford rent without it).
Today I told her I might want to ""try"" working because I don't know if I even CAN do it while studying. Shen then told me that I would have to give her half of my earnings (by law I'm not allowed to make more than ~600€ while enrolled) and then I had second thoughts. Because I would be risking my degree for 300€. Again, engineering is INCREDIBLY demanding. 
My mom got so mad over me having second thoughts now and DEMANDS that I start working and give her half of it or else she'll kick me out and then I can kiss my degree goodbye for good. 

(As a side note, last year, before university I was working full time and supported her financially a lot, she went on vacation in greece and spain (without me because I didn't want to) and my father judges her for that because he thinks she exploiting me)",AmItheAsshole
 for taking care of a stray cat?,"I, (20f) was taking care of some strays that live in our backyard. For context, I don't usually mess with them too much, and usually try to stay out of their way. My mom usually takes care of them but has felt unwell the past few days hence why I was feeding them.

How they got here is that we had one cat who had five kittens and they've just hung around since then so they are very aware of us but will still let us feed them and get super close.

 Well, one of our strays had kittens inside a kennel outside and ever since then, ive been spoon feeding her wet cat food to give her more nutrients than regular kibble, and so that she doesn't teach her kittens to be afraid of humans. 

Yesterday, we had a huge thunderstorm and she was unable to come out due to the rain. I didn't want her to starve so I spoon fed her some wet cat food from the box with her kittens and she seemed ok with some pets too.

I accidentally touched one of the kittens because my hand slipped a bit but it was only slightly and i quickly changed my position so I wouldn't make the same mistake again. 

There was no sign of aggressive behaivor and i sat to the side so if she wanted to leave she could at any time. I was only around long enough to feed her. 

When i went to feed her again the next day, she didnt really show any signs of distance or weird behaivor out of the ordinary. But now, my mom told me that she moved the kittens and is now blaming me and telling me that she doesnt have much to look forward to other than the cats, and it really sucks how I couldn't just understand and leave them alone. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to name our son Kazuma? (from an anime),"My wife wanted to give our upcoming son a unique name. She kept suggesting things like tysepherous and raprelta. I suggested the name Kazuma after Kazuma Sato the main protagonist of the anime konosuba. I picked that name because I think the character is someone I want my son to be like when he grows up. My wife not knowing where the name came from fell in love with it and told all of our family we were naming our baby Kazuma. 

All was well until I was watching some konosuba in the living room and one of the characters (megumin) said ""Kazuma! Kazuma!"". She had a look of horror after hearing that and immediantly googled Kazuma and found out he's from an anime. She was furious and said ""how could you not tell me!?!""

I told her that konosuba was a light novel before it was an anime and many famous names have come from books like Alice. Therefore it's not at all strange to name our son after a character from a book. After that she seems to have calmed down but is still upset that I didn't tell her that before she told all our family and now wants to pick a different name. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not attending a friend’s mom’s visitation?,My friend’s mom recently passed and I really don’t want to attend the visitation. I only met his mom a few times and I am so uncomfortable with funerals and grieving in general. I would rather spend time with my friend one on one if they want to talk about their loss.,AmItheAsshole
 for not keeping my kid quiet at all times?,"Edit:* just want to thank for all the posts. It's clearly a very split subject. I just want to address some things. 
We did enquire about a carpet, but since we are renting and our landlord is not happy about carpeting near the kitchen which is where the loud section is. Our apartment is thin and long and therefore the kitchen and living area is shared. 
I can try slippers. It's a possibility. He actually does stop running when we say stop, but can forget again as he is 4 and is caught up in his game. Noice cancellation is hard to figure out since it seems to travel along the floor. *


So we live in a big a fairly moden apartment complex in a big city. 
We have a (now this may)4 year old who is like all 4 year olds... Well lively and lovely. 

We got new neighbours nextdoor to us. We share a wall made of concrete. No other neighbours have ever complained, not upstairs or downstairs or on the other side of us. Just the one next door on the left. 
They can't hear anything except for my son's footsteps when he runs across the floor. No other sounds. 

I heard it like a mild set of drums from their side. I get it, that it must be annoying sometimes and when they moved in and complained the first time I said sorry and would tell my son to walk across the particular floor area in our house as quietly as possible. 
We had the neighbours come to our door angry as hell a Sunday afternoon at 12. Because the running was terrible. They treathend to write the administration. 
And now we have the administration telling us they have received complaints about our kid running at all hours of the day. 
Now first of all. My kid is in kindergarten from 8-9 in the morning to 4 late afternoon. Then if the weather is good we are staying out till dinner time. Otherwise we come home and yes we might play a bit and then he goes to bed at 7 with books and sleeps. So even if we go directly home it's maximum an hour's worth of potential running. We also have told him multiple times to try and walk slowly across the floor. But sometimes he yells: "" I have to pee/poop"" 
So he runs out to the bathroom. (No one wants to stop a popping kid) 

Sometimes he gets scared in the middle of the night and runs into our bed. Which might be disturbing, but I'm sleeping so I don't know what to do.

We are also out every 2 Sunday for family dinner til bedtime. We try to be out every Saturday for family fun or playdates but it's not every weekend, because we also just want to be home and relax. 

I told the neighbours and administration this and that I refuse to live my life in fear of my neighbours. And it feels like they are breathing down our necks.
We live in an apartment complex, we get to hear each other. We hear drilling, people, party music. We accept that others live here. Telling my kid every 5 minutes to walk slower also seems like trying the impossible. 
Here is where I might be the idiot. I told my neighbour the last time she came up complaining, that she was welcome to invest and go Half's on a massive carpet for our apartment and other soundproofing. She huffed and threatened the administration once more.

Am I the asshole neighbour? ",AmItheAsshole
 Couple’s finance split disagreement,"Recently, my SO (26f) of 7 years and I (26m) have had a disagreement on how to manage our finances.
Two years ago, when we both started a 3 year full-time studies program at the same time, she made the decision that she did not want to work to completely focus on her school and I decided to work full time at the same time as my studies. The difference being that she was okay with being in debt from school and paying it off later, while I wanted to finish school debt-free. 

Since that decision, our arrangement was that everytime she was not able to contribute her half to our joint account for expenses, I would lend that half and add it to a tab that she would pay in full as soon as she finished her studies (she would borrow the amount from the bank only then and reimburse it whenever she wanted). The point of me lending the money to her with no interest was to spare her from paying the 8% rate on her student credit line.

Yesterday, she came to me asking me to remind her what the arrangement was and when I reminded her, she said she disagreed with this view on couple’s finance. Her point was that after 7 years together, we should be sharing everything and she expected me to clear off the 20k of debt she owes me at this point and keep helping her without adding to a debt.

What bothers me is that even though I agree with the reasoning on sharing everything in a relationship, I feel like I should not have to be in a situation where I’m sacrificing so much while she doesn’t. Her point of view is that she is genuinely trying her best to do the most and that she simply does not have the capacity to do both as I am doing. The empathy in me makes me want to understand and contribute more if I truly am more lucky with my capacity to do so. But I also feel like I am getting completely taken advantage of. I feel very conflicted. I feel like I am in no position to truly know if she actually is trying her best or being complacent/lazy but I also dont feel like I can just believe her that easily.

What I liked about our arrangement was that it allowed me to be okay with her spending lots of time on relaxing and leisure since she was the one that was going to have to deal with the consequences later.

I was thinking on reducing the debt in recalculating it with a 60/40 split instead of 50/50 and to keep that split moving forward. It wont make a huge difference but I feel like any more than that might make me resent her in an unhealthy way.

I would love to hear your perspective.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to learn Korean?,"I've never used reddit but an online friend suggested I post here, so please bear with me. :(

I (14f) started to get interested in K-pop/K-dramas around last year. I'm not super obsessed in a weird koreaboo way (think the cringe ""oppa I saranghae you"" way) but more of the ""I just like the music"" way.

My family has a tradition that when you turn 15 years old, you're required to learn a new language, completely on your own. Like, completely. They won't help you with any learning, no advice, no resources, nothing at all. You're required to find your own resources, study on your own, buy your own materials, pay for your certification exam, and if you want a tutor, you have to find and pay for one yourself. The most they'll do is drive you to buy the stuff/get to your tutor and that's only until you get your own license and can drive yourself.

I'm not sure when this tradition started, but I do know it's gone on for a while. My mom, Grandpa, and Uncle learned Spanish, my Grandma learned French, my Aunt learned Dutch, a few cousins learned Arabic, and I don't remember a lot more. But it's a lot of languages. It's like a test of maturity, I guess? It's basically saying that if you can learn an entire language by yourself and speak it fluently, you're mature and intelligent enough to make it on your own. The longest it's ever taken someone to master a language was 12 years, and he was learning Thai.

Anyways, because I started really enjoying K-pop and such, I was thinking I should start to learn Korean on my 15th. I already consume so much media in the language, so I think learning it could fulfill my language requirement, and allow me to understand what I'm listening to without translating. I'm really not trying to be a  koreaboo or fetishize it, I just think it would make sense for me to learn the language that I enjoy.

I was talking to 2 of my friends about this (we'll call them Janice and Sky), and I mentioned that I was already putting money aside for Korean workbooks and my TOPIK exam fee, along with creating a learning plan. They both began to call me a koreaboo (they both listen to Kpop but more casually, not buying albums and stuff) and asked me why I would learn it. Sky (who is caucasian, for reference) said I'm fetishizing it and I probably want to be Asian. Janice (who is Japanese-American) didn't take it quite that far but said it was weird and that I ""probably won't be an Idol anyways"", and there was no point in me learning it for a ""Korean boy who doesn't even know you"". (They both know about the tradition within my family.) Sky asked me why I would learn Korean when I could learn languages of ""my culture"" like Yoruba, Igbo, etc. instead. I'm African American.

It'll be my 15th birthday in a few months and I really need to make a decision. I don't want to be seen as a koreaboo, or do anything even closely related to cultural appropriation. AITA for wanting to learn Korean?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friend not to invite my ex to his party,"My best friend throws a party once a month and invites as many people as he can. Me and my ex had a terrible breakup and I now realize our relationship was very toxic as well. We use to live together, but I decided to break the lease. When we moved out, she probably took thousands of dollars worth of my stuff. It was terrible.

My friend had been friends with me for not that long, only about a year. He met both me and my ex when we were together, but he never really became friends with my ex. He has always only hung out with me. He doesn’t even talk to my ex at all. Saying they are friends is quite the stretch. After what happened, he has made remarks that he doesn’t agree with what my ex has done.

The issue is that his friends are friends with my ex. I am also friends with those people too but I’m not close after what happened as they have become distant to me. However I believe they are still quite close with my ex. My friend that is throwing the party is saying he wants to invite her because if he doesn’t, things will be awkward and it would cause issues. I told him that if she goes, I will not be attending as being around her causes me too much distress. He is saying I’m being selfish and unreasonable and that I should still come. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to reach out to my half sister?,"Hi everyone, so I (19F) was told years ago by my mum that I had a sister that lived a street over from us at the time. She told me we had the same dad however, my half sisters mum had told her that her younger sisters dad is also hers. For months I’d try to find her mum on Facebook but had no luck, it popped into my head again tonight as I was talking about my dad (who I have never had a relationship with) to my partner and told him about this sister. He thinks that I’d be an AH for reaching out to her as she’s had her while 19 years thinking her dad was someone else, but what if she knows now that he isn’t? I’d love to have a relationship with her and let her know I’m there, but I also don’t want to be this awful person.. I’ve asked my mum to try find my sisters mum on Facebook, if she does do I message the mum? Or do I just message my sister? Or do I do nothing? So.. WIBTA if I reach out? 
",AmItheAsshole
/Breaking trust,"WIBTA?

I 26f have a cousin 16m who talks to me regularly. I'm someone he can trust and feels comfortable talking to, as I don't do anything to break his trust. This time, I feel it might have to be different because I'm honestly concerned. His dad (my uncle - who has also been my biggest confidant for years) has custody, his mom is so flaky that she might as well not be in the picture, and she's never really cared about what he does - even when she had custody. 

So the kid has some issues he wants to work through, but he's going about it in a reckless way.

He has come to me before and talked, but he has never mentioned these things. When playing outside with the little kids at a family cookout yesterday, I noticed he had carved something into his arm - at this point it was a pretty gnarly scar. I quietly asked him about it, and he said he would talk to me about it later. He said his dad knows about that cut, but not all of the others that he has inflicted upon himself and continues to do once in a bluemoon. 

He also mentioned that he's using a vape, that he has a couple and is getting a new one from a friend at school with higher nicotine content.

Now, I know kids experiment - I was a teenager too. I did behaviors similar because I was confused and needed some professional help. Call it a cry for help if you will, I didn't see it that way when I was a teenager. But as an adult and a parent to a 4yo boy myself, I would want to know if my child was mentally suffering so bad that he was feeling self-destructive and needed help. 

So, with that being said, would it make me an asshole for breaking his trust and going to his dad? I don't really think so, maybe I see it as being protective. He might be mad at me and not confide in me anymore, but I care more about his safety and well-being. Can anyone lend me some advice on how to approach this? That might be the bigger question here.

Thanks in advance.

UPDATE:
I talked long and hard with my cousin about this today. It came down to that he isn't ready to tell his dad everything, but he did ask him about counseling options. He goes in for his first appointment next week to work on getting some help ❤️ he did say that when he is ready to talk to his dad, he would like for me to be there.

Thank you, everyone, for your advice. I think this is a big step in the right direction for him",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my boyfriends not to post pictures of organs from his hunts?,"I was not exposed much to the hunting community prior to meeting my boyfriend so I’m not sure if this is an unreasonable ask. I have no issue with him hunting because he does it ethically, and for the purpose of eating. I personally won’t join him in hunting, because I’m a huge animal lover and feel uncomfortable with the idea of killing the animal myself. But I will eat what he catches.   The only thing that I am not a fan of when it comes to hunting is seeing the insides of the animals he hunts. He likes to post pictures to his social media of the animal and sometimes mid harvesting. It makes me really uncomfortable seeing the blood and organs of a dead animal. I’ve asked him either remove the organ pictures or make a separate instagram specifically for hunting. He says that he doesn’t want to hide who he is and that’s what my ask feels like. There’s one picture that particularly gets to me, and I really would prefer him not to have on his page. Two years ago, on Valentines Day, he posted a picture holding a mountain goat heart. It makes me feel weird to see that on a day that love is suppose to be celebrated, he posted a picture of a heart from a kill. He explained that it was just a dark humor joke, and didn’t think too deeply into it. I get that, but the reasoning does make me think differently about feeling uneasy by the post. Idk maybe it scares me a little bit? Please, I’d love to hear other perspectives and opinions. Is asking him to not post any organ pictures overstepping and hiding who he is? I feel like the separate instagram is a reasonable ask. Thoughts on the heart picture? Am I’m overreacting to this all?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to share my college acceptance news?,"
I recently got accepted into my dream university, but I’ve chosen to keep the news quiet and not share it with extended family and most of my friends. My parents are upset because they’re proud and want to celebrate with everyone. They argue that our family and friends would want to celebrate this achievement with me. However, I feel overwhelmed by the attention and would prefer to celebrate in a more low-key manner with just my immediate family. AITA for wanting to keep my college acceptance private?",AmItheAsshole
 if I gave my sister a reality check about our horses,"Premise: my and my sister have the same mother but different fathers

Me (19f) and my sister (36) have been keeping horses for about a year with the help of my family and her husband.
Currently my sister owns a 20-ish year old horse (Cloud) while I recently bought a green 5 year old horse(Frida) that is currently being trained after having a few mishaps with previous horses (mostly behavior problems that could not be resolved within our possibilities), however I noticed that my sister really dislikes my trainer and according to her judgment: she is going to ruin my horse but so far my horse is getting significantly better. Still doesn't want my trainer to get anywhere near her horse, but has given me permission to use it after asking permission her or her husband's permission and so far they always said yes even if not completely happy so whenever my trainer wants to go for a hack I just use my bike while she rides my horse and so far everything was quiet.
Yesterday my cousin (whom my sister also hates) wanted to tag along for a hack, and I gave her my bike which, forced me to ask my sister if I could take her horse (I specified I wouldn't let it gallop and let it take a breaks) and she said yes so me, my cousin and my trainer went on with our thing, however while I was away my sister came alongside her husband to the stables and according to my parents they were pretty pissed off and they had an argument, and their conclusions were: everyone is forbidden from riding their horse, Frida is not a suitable horse for me and the only time we can get neat Cloud is to feed, clean and saddle it for my niece. I'd like to remind that during this argument I was not present and if it wasn't for my parents telling me I wouldn't have known about any of this.

So, I wrote a text for my sister reminding her that since she wants to be so possessive about things, it would be good to remind her that my and my parents own the stables and the property, we pay for the water and electricity, we own the equipment they use to ride and, even if we split the costs, I am the ones always making the car ride for hay and feed every two weeks in addition to being the one trying to give my niece the chance to get close to her horse since her mom is terrified. But I think I would be the asshole because again, I was not there during the argument and I don't know her perspective so for now I'll just wait and cool down before sending the message and ultimately ""ruining"" the relationship with my sister

UPDATE: I didn't send the text and opted to wait until my sister will eventually reach out for me, for now everything has been quiet ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to stay away from my friend of 10 years,"It's a really long story but I will try to explain this very briefly.

So this dates to a few years back when my friend of 10 years \[Chris\] started to become obsessive, he started expecting me to hang out with him too often, with no respect for my boundaries. I didn't know how to speak up back then, so I tried to say it nicely rather than firmly. My other friend \[Ann\] advised me to set my boundaries early on but I didn't know how to, However, \[Bri\] told me that we were overreacting. And Chris started to say that Ann is just sabotaging our friendship.

After some thought, I decided to talk to Chris to stop spamming my DMs or Inviting me to hangouts so often, since I was busy irl and ADHD doesn't help, By the end of the day I was out of energy. *(By spamming I meant that they even had set exact times I wake up and they send messages the moment I open my eyes till I close em)*

But he didn't take it well and the situation escalated badly for several months, and i ended up cutting him off.

After a few months when things settled down, we decided to reconnect and clear up misunderstandings. It went well, Bri helped us reconnect. We went back to being friends, but I wasn't as close as before and I had set my boundaries. However, Chris started becoming overly clingy again, and started to be nosy, I had gone through a hard time and had some changes in my life. If he didn't find an answer from me, he would try to ask other friends, even though I always say ""It's personal"". He started to ask too much from me and would complain about my late replies. He also mentioned an old wound when he couldn't get me to talk about my personal issue, which made me feel horrible. *\[ I had entrusted this friend with really private matters previously.\]*

After some time he confessed. I couldn't help but feel betrayed and vulnerable, I told Bri since she was neutral to both of us. She told me that they were aware of this, but couldn't tell me, However Bri had advised Chris to stop the weird act and not be forceful about his feelings, he had done creepy acts a few weeks prior *(ex: Looking at my personal belongings) \[I can't mention them all because of the character limit\].*

Anyways, I respectfully rejected him, it went well until I asked for some time away, I just couldn't feel comfortable. I saw through Bri that Chris had told her he had been using any chance to get closer. That made me feel like our friendship always had an ulterior motive. Chris proceeded to say and do stuff that made me extremely uncomfortable. So I just decided to stop talking to him because he kept arguing when I asked over 5 times to have some distance **for now.**

I have been told that what I did was too much by Bri, and that I'm overthinking it. And that Chris told her that he will move on and I didn't have to cut him off. I keep saying I didn't cut him off for no reason, I wasn't planning to. I did it because when I asked for some distance nicely I couldn't get any!

Did I overreact?

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for accidentally sleeping with my situationships roommate,"Alright basically I have been involved with this girl for a few months now, we talk a lot and hook up just as much. I sleepover at her dorm on campus probably 3 times a week so I also know her roommate pretty well. Her roommate is also my coworker so we are all friends, I actually met the roommate before my situationship, Me and this girl have a good dynamic however we tend to argue a lot which usually is more playful in nature. Sometimes however when I actually do piss her off we can get kinda loud and she gets pretty worked up cause I like to mess with her lmao. 

Anyway last night she was doing homework and I was bugging her cause I was bored. She flipped out a little and told me to go to the living room so she could work and that I was overstimulating her. Not a big deal it's a semi-regular thing as I have ADHD and can be annoying not gonna lie. Anyway her roommate was in the living room with her friend taking shots while watching a TV show. They asked if I wanted to join and I agreed because I had nothing to do today and was staying over and wasn't driving. My situationship (let's call her Vanessa) walked out a few times over the next two hours to get food and drinks, and each time she came and talked to me and even kissed me on one pass by. She wasn't bothered and was just glad I was leaving her alone to work but would be there in the morning to gym. 

We got pretty slammed and I honestly passed out cause we also hit a wax pen. I woke up on the couch shirtless and her roommate was wearing my shirt laying on me. As soon as I realized she was on me I jumped up which woke her up and we started arguing. I asked ""Why the fuck are you on top of me what the hell Where is Vanessa?"". The roommate replied ""it's fine I just got cold Vanessa knows I'm not like that."". Well Vanessa wasn't in her room and that means she walked right by us and must've left. I knew I was FUCKED vanessa is LATINA. I knew Vanessa had class so I couldn't call, so I went and got her favorite matcha and a chocolate croissant then waited outside her class. As soon as she walked out I got up and walked up but she ignored me and was crying. I tried to explain but she blew up on me which drew a lot of attention then she walked away and I followed her trying to explain until we got to her dorm. We took the argument to her living room and eventually her roommate joined in and vouched that I passed out before she did and I did nothing wrong. Vanessa then told me to leave so she could talk to her roommate alone and that's where I am now I am in the campus library writing this. For extra context I have NOTHING for the roommate and I am 100% sure that even blackout drunk I'd never do anything with her. So did I do something wrong here?",AmItheAsshole
? I texted my best friends ex boyfriend for answers,"I sit next to my best friend’s, we’ll call her Shelby’s, ex, let’s call him Dan, in a class, and so I saw he did the work that I didn’t do. I text Dan on snap after school asking for the answers and he gave it to me. The conversation ended there. After that, I told my friend exactly what happened, because I thought she deserved to know since that’s her ex and I care about her. She got really upset, and hasn’t been responding to my messages. I just wanna know what I did wrong, or what she’s feeling bc I don’t think I did anything bad?",AmItheAsshole
 if I called my friend out on their time management?,"I'm a college student, living in the same building but on different floors than one of my friends. They have pretty significant ADHD symptoms that are diagnosed, but they no longer receive treatment for it. It's kind of a joke among our other friends how bad this friend's time management is, especially when they say they'll be somewhere or do something in a certain number of minutes or on a certain day.

Nearly every day, my friend and I make plans to spend time or do tasks together, but they rarely end up making it to the plan on time if at all. We are both leaving for the summer in a few weeks, and I have been getting quite upset by the amount of times we have attempted to make plans but it has fallen through because they got distracted on their phone or doing something else.

My friend feels very bad and apologizes profusely whenever they realize they have forgotten and makes more plans to spend time together the next day. However, we are running out of days as we're leaving soon. I know for a fact they do not have bad intentions here and genuinely feel badly when they miss out on planned time together, which is why I am wondering if I should try to communicate how upsetting it is for me that we barely get to spend time together anymore because they get distracted doing other things.

I don't want to upset my friend because I know they feel badly but am frustrated that we never get to spend real time together anymore as they spend hours in their room, playing on TikTok or other social media apps, and lose track of time. I know they cannot control it because of their ADHD but it is a real inconvenience to me as I set aside time to spend with them every day and that time goes to waste when they don't show. WIBTA if I tried to have a conversation about it that I know would make them upset because I already know they feel badly?",AmItheAsshole
 for not participating an initiation ceremony?,"I (33F) am a photographer. I've just come back from a week living with an indigenous tribe in Papua as part of a project. It was an amazing experience amongst a warm and welcoming people. I didn't want to simply be some voyeuristic outsider, so I joined in with their daily routines and ended up forming bonds, particularly with the tribeswomen.

However, because we'd bonded so well, towards the end of my time there they wanted me to take part in an initiation ceremony. I refused because I didn't like the idea of dancing around topless in front of a whole village. They seemed offended and when I left there was still awkwardness in the air- an unfortunate end to this otherwise great trip.

I've since talked about this with a friend. She thinks I should have reciprocated the tribe's acceptance of me by fully embracing their traditions, even if it meant going outside my comfort zone. Is she right? I mean, they were willing to take me as one of their own and my American inhibitions got in the way. Does that make me the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my ex husband to buy me gifts I don't think he can afford?,"It's my (29F) birthday soon and my ex husband (34M) keeps trying to buy me expensive gifts. It started with a festival ticket, and then two so that I could pick someone to go with me, he hoped I would want to bring him. I had a panic attack and begged him not to buy the tickets. He reluctantly agreed and we had a several day argument over it and how i make him feel. 

For context we broke up in October, and still live together he is very much still in love with me and trying to 'win me back' the ex has not worked in around 4 years so has no money of his own I recently made him sign on so he has his own money for the first time in a long time - despite me always saying he can spend whatever just check with me if it's over £40 (sometimes im skint or need to wait til payday) and attempting several times to get his own bank account so he could have his own he never did and felt guilty for spending even on essentials. 

For the first month of him getting benefits I told him to not pay rent so that he could treat himself and gain a bit of a buffer. He has been very insistent that he gets me a birthday present - I have never enjoyed my birthday and I really don't need him to buy me gifts when he doesn't have a lot, and we are not together! 

A few days after the ticket buying incident he says he has found something else he wants to get me. Looks small and quite nice, some simple gloves. I said sure and told him my size, I did not see the price only the image. But now he's sent me the link to them to check it's a pair and not just one glove. But they are pricey 
Some more context - I am a seamstress so when I see things like that I think how I could make them very quickly.. my yearly clothes budget is less than £100. I know this is an issue I have about people buying me things that I don't seem worth and that I struggle to see my own value. 

Ex keeps saying that he wants to spoil me and I deserve it, this is the first time he has money and if he can't be generous to his friends what's the point in having money? 
I can't shake the feeling that this is transactional and that it means I have to be equally 'generous' or that if I accept he will get his hopes up that I'll go back to him. - I keep reiterating that he will not be able to win me back and i feel like i am being clear with where our relationships stands 

Basically I think I could be the asshole because he is just trying to be nice, I never let him buy me nice things, I hate my birthday and take it out on him and I am probably just over reacting. 
These are all things he has said to me in the past. ",AmItheAsshole
 for breaking a broken sofa?,"I visited a coworker on Friday night with a couple of work friends for drinks. My coworker has recently hurt his leg and is on crutches. After a couple of beers, we decided to try and balance on his crutches. I ended up slipping and falling on their sofa, which just snapped in half. (I’m not a big guy, weighing about 82 kg.)

Later that night, his girlfriend, and she was very angry. However, we agreed we would figure it out sober in the morning. The day after, I went over to talk to him. He and his girlfriend proposed a solution: I would pay them around $1200 so they could buy a new sofa like their original one. They had owned the original sofa for 6 months, having bought it second hand for around $935. 

I'm currently in school, so money is tight. I told him I wanted to call my insurance company on Monday before they bought the new one, to see if they could cover any of the cost. On Sunday, he sent me a long, passive-aggressive text, saying that he and his girlfriend just wanted it over with, and that I should pay him the $1200 because he wanted it fixed immediately. 

He also thinks it’s very rude of me for trying to find a solution that only benefits me (insurance, fixing it etc.). I then considered hiring a carpenter, as it seemed he didn’t want to go through insurance. The carpenter said they could fix it in about two weeks for about $300. However, they rejected this option, saying it was too much of a hassle. 

It's worth noting that the sofa is still usable; only the lounge part is broken, and it can be disconnected from the rest. Additionally, there's a big red flag indicating that the sofa was already partially broken where it snapped since there is a big piece of wood holding the couch together where the crack has occurred. On the lounge part, the fabric has been visibly cut off. At the breaking point of the sofa, it seems that it may have cracked before and has been patched/reinforced with a separate piece of wood on the side. 

I felt like I was being scammed into buying them a new sofa. I brought this up to them (in an indirect kind of way), but they claimed they had nothing to do with it and that it didn’t matter. They also didn’t want the original fixed because they didn’t want to be in the same situation in the future. It should be noted their sofas original new price of is $2600, but they bought it for $935. 

It's now Monday, and they want me to pay the $935 they paid for the original 6 months ago, plus more towards the new one, totaling $1200, before we report the damage to insurance. However, I only feel comfortable reporting the damage and seeing how much they can cover, and then figuring it out from there before sending them the money. I asked for their information this morning so I could report it, but so far, they won’t give me their information without me sending $935 first.  
  
Tldr, my coworker wants me to give them money before talking to insurance after breaking their partially fixed sofa while drunk.  
",AmItheAsshole
 if I send my mother to jail for stealing my identity while my father is on his deathbed?,"I recently decided that i wanted to try and sign up for a credit card. I had hoped it would be different than past attempts.

I (23F) had always had issues with credit in the past and I had assumed it had to do with having zero credit, until i checked my credit score for the first time. Everytime I applied for an apartment, a car loan, a student loan, even the most basic credit card, I was denied.

I prepared for my search for the perfect starter card for folks with no credit. I joined a credit union and their app features a credit report and I was shocked to see that I did indeed have credit, and it was not good, sitting in the lowest of the 400's with debt collections. I had always assumed my problem was having no credit.

I brazenly researched ways to dispute the collections. I noticed something familiar. One of the credit lines sent to collections  was from a  catalog called Fingerhut.

There was no way i had accessed this credit, and So I was certain this was fraud. I reread the facts laid to me by the credit score for about 15 minutes before it had dawned on me.

My estranged mother had always openly struggled with her credit. She would often engage in lowball tactics to elevate her credit or establish a line of credit to fuel spending. She would often patron Rent-A-Centers and catalogs such as Fingerhut(her fav) which brag basic credit that can be spent within their catalog.

Seeing Fingerhut in my debt collections on the report made me consider that the identity theft was someone i knew, the only person i knew who used Fingerhut and knows my social security. My mom.

I called their support line yesterday to try to figure out if this was malicious. I had to try the support line for another debt because i wanted answers and I didnt want to wait until the following monday, when other call centers would open

Speaking to the agent i could sense she was concerned i was fishing for someone elses information so I told her I had moved around many times since the debt and changed phone numbers/address so i needed to see which information matched the file. Thiankfully this convinced her. I was worried I wouldnt be able to get the answers i needed and the data would kept behind a wall of fraudulent Authentication protection.

The representative reluctantly revealed the phone number, two addresses and a teachers employee email, all of which matched my estranged mother

I havent spoken to my parents in 4 years but i understand my father is terminally ill with cancer. They are still married and very close, and she has been doing her best to take care of him from what i hear.

As Iook forward to my financial future I am concerned that if I dont handle this now it will prolongue getting apartments, my first car payment or even going back to school.

WIBTA if I report my mothers theft of my identity and a few thousand in debt? Would she face jailtime while my father is dying? I have read that turning her in is one of the only ways to clear my credit of her stupidity.",AmItheAsshole
 for being bothered by my mom’s life long depression?,"I totally understand being there for people who need it, but when is it enough? My whole childhood revolved around my mom’s feelings. She told me everything about her depression from a young age. Every single situation is skewed to make her a victim. However, she never addressed my nervous ticks, anxiety, and insomnia. I’m still working through these at 34. As an adult, I cringe hearing about her feelings and don’t want anything to do with them. I get angry when she tries to pull me back into her depressive world. She’s always had a negative outlook on life so I don’t think she’ll change. Am I a jerk for thinking like this?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my partner to get a professional haircut for our (maybe) wedding?,"My partner (early thirties M) and I (late twenties F) have been together for almost a decade. We have a house and dog together and share all financials. 

Neither of us is big on the whole getting engaged and big wedding thing and are both of the mind that a marriage/wedding/marrying someone is first and foremost a financial contract. We are obviously big romantics. Different reasons at different points throughout our relationship have made it a bad financial decision to sign the papers (which was more or less the general plan at some point).

Our 10 year anniversary is coming up and the date of the anniversary is on the tenth of an upcoming month. It’s on a weekday so the courthouse is open. I had the idea that it could be cute to get married on our anniversary and invite our parents and siblings to a small garden celebration. Get a bit dressed up and make a day of it. This is all still very much a general idea that is being workshopped between my partner and I.

We are now stuck on the topic of my partners hair for the “big” day. I asked if he could get it professionally cut. He wears it short and for most of his life his mom gave him a buzzcut (which he preferred). His family is very frugal and saw it as a cost saving measure while my partner preferred the style. It was fast and kept it short. I then took over cutting it and taught myself to do a simple men’s cut that kept the top a bit longer and the sides shorter than his usual. At the time this was a big change for him and took a while for him to agree to. I think the “new” cut looks better and allows for longer between cuts. As of today he says he prefers the new cut.

He doesn’t want his hair too long on the day and would either want me to cut it or for him or his mom to do a buzz cut. I said that I would rather he get it professionally done. I have a friend who cuts hair and is willing to give a free haircut. He has met this friend and likes her just fine (even had his hair cut once by her when she was a student). I said that I don’t care how he cuts it, it can be a buzz cut for all I care, I just want him to feel his best on the day.

He said that he won’t do it. I said that if we go with that date then the amount of work that needs to be done is quite a bit and that that is not another thing I want on my list. I also don’t want uneven strands sticking out (as usually happens with the buzzcut route).

I am unsure of who gave the ultimatum first. If he said that he wouldn’t do the party/formal ceremony if he has to get his hair professionally cut or if I said that if he wouldn’t get it professionally cut we just skip the party/formal ceremony. The end result then being the original plan of signing the papers in jeans on a lunch break sometime. 

He is mad that I gave him an ultimatum. I am sad that this has spiralled into a whole thing. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for being upset about my boyfriend's trip with coworkers?,"Me (21F) and bf (26M) have been together for a little over a year. I'm a student worker whereas he's employed as a police officer. I recently just changed jobs, getting a convenient position with a decent salary, starting in May. We've planned a vacation together for July for 3 days in the country where we both live, a popular spot for cosplayers in summer, under my suggestion. My salary wasn't enough to cover the full cost for it so we split all the payments.
Now he just mentioned to me how he's organising a trip with his coworkers to Thailand (he's Thai), date TBD, telling me not to worry about it and mentioning how I couldn't afford to cover everything and he'd have to pay for me, and he'd rather go with me alone. Now, I could afford a trip to Thailand with my new job, not right right now of course but surely in a couple months. I'm mostly upset right now as he never mentioned doing something like this, just his grandma did. So, AITA for feeling this way?",AmItheAsshole
 for changing gas pumps after I pulled up to one?,"Today I went to get gas and it was busy. The way this gas station is set up is essentially 3 lanes. Middle was full, left lane has the pump on the right (my trucks gas cap is on the left) so I pulled to the far right one. There was another truck not fully pulled up so i had to go around and reverse into said pump. I attempted to reverse but my truck was too big and the person behind me was too close. Once i realized it was best to not attempt to inch as close as possible to the guy behind me (my truck has a hitch with a cooler on it, adds about 2 feet) I simply drove forward and around to the far left lane.

 I rolled my window down and heard a guy yelling. To my surprise, the gas attendant was yelling at me to leave. I thought he was just trying to be funny so i smiled and said whats the problem? At this point a random woman came and started holding this guy back! I said seriously what’s going on? He said “you whip around this place like that? I’m a human being! You’re not getting gas here! You can take it up with my manager tomorrow!” 

I shook my head and left because the guy clearly has a few screws loose but looking back I’m genuinely curious if I did something wrong. Note I did not exceed 5mph to go around to the new pump it’s a very tight area. Curious to hear your guys’ thoughts. ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to hangout with my girlfriend?,"I should preface by saying we have a relatively healthy (but new) relationship, with a few arguments ements recently, but nothing crazy or foundation shaking. My girlfriend has pink eye. She knows I’m a little freaked out by transmissible diseases, being a healthcare worker. I don’t go crazy, but I always try to minimize contact. She was at work when she figured out she got it from her kids. I said, half-jokingly “that’s irresponsible”. She said “it’d be irresponsible of me not to go to work silly” (to provide for her kids.) she’s a waitress. I was more just thinking about food and drink handling. She said it’s fine if nobody knows she has it. Near the end of her shift she asked if I wanted to come to pick up her boys from daycare. I said yes as we had recently expressed missing each other. I get in the car, and I just ask her if she has hand sanitizer. She got some out, used it for herself, I held out my hand, expecting her to squeeze a little on my hand, if not right away (she’s driving), then when she has straight road and is able. She held it over my hand, literally tipped it upside-down, then righted it before any came out, got flustered and lost it on me because I asked her to pour it on my hand. I didn’t exactly want to do it myself, but I would have if she nicely, or even annoyedly said she couldn’t focus on both. Instead she yells and says I’m being overly-anal. I try to explain that I simply was trying to minimize exposure risk, and she yells that she understands exposure risk because she has kids and that I should have stayed home if I was so worried. I’m raising my voice a little by this point. I said there are steps between staying home, and rubbing my eyes against hers. She yells again that I should have stayed home. She said this is insane I quietly, but audibly said yeah this is. She screamed can you stop speaking, like this is insane. I said again this is. She said you’re making me so mad I just wanna drop you off on the side of the road (in the middle of nowhere by now). I said yeah me too (I meant mad, not side of the road. I see now how this could be ambiguous but it seemed pretty obvious to me) and she came screeching to a stop and is literally screaming louder than I’ve heard anyone scream in a while at this point “okay get the fuck out”. And I said “I meant you’re making me mad too, not that I want to get out” and she yells a couple more things and pulls out saying “I’m gonna be late picking up the kids, I’m just gonna grin and bear it and I’m dropping you off after we pick them up”. She seemed so convinced I was in the wrong for wanting to do what I felt was best practice. Is the risk of transmission just something I’ll understand when I have messy kids of my own? I’m not like agoraphobic, I’m in college, I’m not avoiding them with a ten foot pole. I just figured if she’s pouring it into her hands she could pour it into mine, and we wouldn’t have devolved into such a shitty evening. ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my husband to give input on new job opportunity? ,"For the last 5 years I have been a stay at home mom for my and my husbands two young children. Recently I was offered a part time job that pays well. It was offered through a mutual aqaintance of myself and the employer so I didn’t really have any details like what the hours would be other than it was part time. 

Today I wanted to get my husband’s input on on how manageable me working would be and taking care of the kids. He didn’t want to have this talk until after I called the employer. He thinks I was being unreasonable because I got upset when he wouldn’t talk hypothetical situations with me. I feel like he wasn’t participating on helping me make a major decisions that would effect our whole family. Full disclosure, I have pretty bad anxiety and he thinks I was mad at him because I was feeling anxious. 

Honestly I don’t know of I am the ahole Was I unreasonable for wanting to discuss what would be possible for me to do before contacting a potential employer? My husband told me I was acting bipolar. I don’t think I was but honestly I feel so confused after our fight. He said I was yelling and mad, but when I look back I just remember feeling frustrated with him that he wasn’t contributing to our conversation. I never once felt mad as he says I was acting. This turned into an enormous fight. 

Usually I apologize, but I honestly don’t think I did anything wrong….. when we were fighting my husband was mocking me and saying I was crazy. Now he is saying I am twisting what happened so he is the bad guy.  I know that without actually hearing our fight it’s hard to know. But I walk away from our fights confused a lot about whether I am a jerk or not. 

 So reddit AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my sister her wedding idea is tacky? ,"My sister and her fiancé are getting married in sept and they just sent out wedding invites. On it they basically said they have everything they need so if anyone wants to contribute they can give a cash contribution towards their honeymoon. 

They are moving shortly after the wedding so I get they don’t want gifts. However I found it really tacky and this weekend when they came over I told them that. Not in an accusatory way just when they asked how we liked the invite (my sister designed it) I said I liked the card but the asking for money was tacky. 

I think gifts are different than money and they shouldn’t ask for money if they didn’t want gifts. My sister got really upset and said it said it was voluntary and I said so are gifts. She stormed off and my parents have been angry at me for being an “asshole”. ",AmItheAsshole
 for only visiting my in laws for a week this year?,"My MIL is only 60 but has a lot of health issues and hasn't traveled since June 2018. So the only time my kids see that set of grandparents is in the summer. We're taking our first family vacation in five years this summer, so we're only flying for a week to my in laws and then a week to my parents. I understand that this is disappointing for everybody, but especially my in laws because they don't get to visit us during the school year due to not traveling. They asked my husband if he could leave the kids with them longer, but he said no and said they could visit him. I feel very guilty.",AmItheAsshole
 for excluding my twin sister and potentially ruining her prom,"To preface, me and my twin sister are in 2 different friend groups. For prom tables, we both agreed either she would sit with me (she doesn’t have a date and I do) and the friends she doesn’t know too well, or her friends. So, she went to get food tonight with her “friends” and I asked if I could go, (she said no because she didn’t want me there), and THEN she figured out that her friends actually excluded her from prom plans. Keep in mind, I have a backup plan for her for before AND after prom because I was fearful this would happen. My friend group welcomes her with open arms. Anyways, I already found a prom table that is now full (I wouldn’t say prior to this happening, but RIGHT as she called me telling me what happened with her friend group), and everyone else has kind of figured it all out. Im reaching out to people FOR MY SISTER asking if they have an extra spot, but my sister insists that she isn’t going to prom anymore (not gonna happen under my watch). My mom says I should make a whole new table because of this, but my boyfriend doesn’t go to my school and that would put him (and me) in an awkward situation. I’m doing everything I can to find her a spot and I feel AWFUL she’s excluded from my table. What should I do?? AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to invite my mom's boyfriend to her mother's day dinner?,"Myself (19F) and my 4 siblings have a difference of opinion about inviting our mom's boyfriend to her mother's day dinner.

Yesterday, my mom messaged on our family group chat to ask if we would invite her boyfriend to her mother's day dinner. Every year for about the last 5 years we've taken her out for a meal on mother's day. She separated from our dad in 2015 and she raised us on her own since then.

She's been with her boyfriend for a little over 3 years but they still don't live together full-time. He stays at our house on the days he doesn't have his 3 kids. Obviously, on mother's day his kids will be with their mom and his own mother has passed away. My mom thinks it would be nice to invite him this year as we haven't in the past. 

3 of my siblings (20M, 17F, &amp; 15M) agree about wanting to invite him. Myself and my oldest brother (22M) don't want him to come. Our argument is that it's supposed to be a special evening for us to celebrate our amazing mother. I like our mom's boyfriend and have nothing against him, but is it wrong for me to think it'll be nice to have some 5 on 1 time to celebrate our mom.

My 20M brother feels quite strongly about inviting him. His argument is that he's basically apart of our family now and it feels right to invite him. He'll probably bet at our mom's all weekend so we would just be leaving him at home alone to go out for dinner. He also tried to guilt trip me into agreeing to the invite by bringing up that our mom's boyfriend's mom died when he was 12. He feels it's wrong to leave him alone on mother's day for this reason.

Another point I've brought up is that on father's day last year none of my siblings were included in the boyfriend's outing with his kids, despite the fact our dad's not involved in our lives. I didn't care about it then and I only bring it up now to compare the similar circumstances.

I think my siblings and I's differing opinions comes down to closeness. My 2 brothers (20M and 14M) are particularly close with the boyfriend whereas the rest of us are still less so.

Am I being the asshole? Or should I change my mind? ",AmItheAsshole
 For ghosting my best friend after he prioritized his gf over me?,"I (16M) recently stopped responding to my best friend after he told me he was going out with his girlfriend rather than me. 

I have a tradition in my life where the people most important to me get to create a unique tradition we do every year together, on our “friendiversary“ (anniversary month of when we first started talking). It usually only spans the course of an evening, sometimes multiple days a week if we have time. This is incredibly important to me, more important than holidays and my own birthday.

  
I have done this for every major relationship in my life since my early tween years, even if im incredibly busy I clear my schedule and always make time as I take my relationships seriously and im very sentimental.

  
My best friend, let’s call him Zack (19M) I met a year ago (April) at his graduating school performance. Ever since then we just were really good friends and began talking every single day consistently. We are very close.

  
In the middle of April he went on an overseas vacation for 8 days. One where he was 7+ hours ahead of my timezone. I set time aside out of my day just to talk to him through that.

  
Before his vacation I tried to set up a time where we could get together and it just kept not working out. So then he goes on his vacation. Comes back and he still has a whole week of vacation time he’s spending back in our state.

  
I once again begin asking him when’s a good time to meet up, mentioning again how “we cant miss our friendiversary :(“ and he says he doesn’t know. No initiative to pick a day he's available.

  
Eventually I make plans with another friend and this last Friday I asked him. “Sunday is the last day we can all make it, the last day this month I can do, are you free?”

His response was short “Aw no I can’t, I have some errands in the morning and then Im spending the day over at gf’s house”

I was heartbroken, not only had I spent time getting him gifts and setting up times to go but I worked extra hard to complete all of my work and homework so my weekend would be clear for him. (I had offered several days that week)

  
I very sourly responded “Just forget it” late friday and ghosted him. Come sunday and I go out with my other friend and we have fun, still not talking to him. 

My reasoning for this being that I was incredibly upset and needed time to myself with people who actually would set time aside for me.

  
Every day he texted me things like “Are you okay bro?” “Im sorry” “Please tell me if I did something wrong I love you bro” “Im sorry” and I havent responded. He also began texting my friends asking for help and if I was okay. I have plans to text him Tue/Wed after I’ve slept it off.

(Additional context. Im lucky if I see my friends more than 16 times a year. I do all my schooling from home and online and rarely ever get to see my friends, we mainly talk online and play video games)

  
AITA for ghosting him and telling my friends not to say anything about me?",AmItheAsshole
 for getting mad and telling my (now ex) boyfriend he’s an alcoholic?,"Me (F25) and my now ex (M27) had been together for almost 5 years. We got together in our early 20s and drank a lot, what most people do in their younger twenties. He has a really close relationship with a lot of guy friends from highschool and has always made it kinda obvious he’d prefer being with them. Now half of the guys are in commited relationships, but there are still a few that encourage him to get really drunk because they think it’s funny. I’m at the point I want to grow up and NOT drink to excess every weekend. 

Me and my boyfriend broke up a few months ago because he had a responsibility to watch our dogs while I was out of town but he blew them off to go out town with his friends and wasn’t going to tell me or find another dog sitter. We also broke up and I kicked him out two years ago because he stood me up on date night without telling me and finally showed up drunk around midnight (after yelling at me and ignoring my calls) after I told him not to drink and drive. (This wasn’t the only problem, I had been dealing with his drinking and choosing his friends for many times prior) We got back together because he claimed he realized he wants to grow up. I thought the past year he was finally getting there. He had only peed the couch once in a few months! Progress, right?

Last I saw him was a month ago because he drank too much (and drove) so I went to talk to him to make sure he was okay mentally. He was blacked out and upset that we had broken up, then told me it was my fault for giving him an ultimatum to either be responsible and stay with the dogs or breakup and go out (for the 3rd night in a row). Then he starts talking about the people in his life that have died and nothing matters. I texted him a few days after and he said he was embarrassed and is going to try and figure it out.  

Well he went out last weekend and ended up drinking so much that his friend refused to take him home, so he had to stay at my friends. He ended up pissing the couch. Keep in mind, he has peed my bed or couch probably around 15 times. And several other friends or hotels beds. Probably around 30 times total. 

He lives with his parents (I never let him move back in when we got together because he didn’t treat the house well, nor did he contribute anything besides occasional groceries) and they don’t think his drinking is a problem. His best friend thinks his problem is that he needs to pee before going to bed (not that he passes out from drinking too much). My ex thinks he has a bladder problem and needs to go to a urologist because of course his problem isn’t the drinking! And I finally said you have a problem with alcohol. They all think I’m being dramatic and I’m just sensitive because my family member is a recovering alcoholic. No one thinks it’s a big deal. Am I the asshole? ",AmItheAsshole
H for not accompanying my mom to visit her family?,"(TLDR): My mom’s family was toxic when I was young, so I refuse to spend time with any of them. Now my mom wants me to accompany her to see the family and I really don’t want to.

Posted on r/advice but mom and brother don’t like my stance on the family and im feeling like I might just be a jerk (I’m a 24m)

My mom (50yo) has a big family, some 10 siblings and a fuck ton of cousins. Growing up going to family events I was surrounded by drama, violence, alcohol abuse, etc. My grandmother (80) is loved by her children despite being an abusive person who would literally beat her kids till they bled all while yelling how much she hated them.

I hold no love for my grandmother and most of my aunts and uncles. I have no fond memories with them and I don’t feel bad for my lack of interest in their lives. When I was a teen I would take every chance to hang out with friends on holidays like Thanksgiving and New Years instead of going to see the family with my mom.

I understand why my mom wants to see her family, she’s a very loving woman and is nothing like the family. They have done her so much wrong but she chose to be the bigger person and forgave them. 

Fast forward to April 2024, I’m visiting mom for her birthday, and grandmother is also in town (for unrelated reasons, didn’t know mom’s birthday was near, sheer coincidence). Mom and my brother want to visit grandmother and they insisted I join them.

I don’t want to. I don’t feel like I owe it to the family to give them any of my time. If I go I won’t talk to anyone and they don’t talk to me. The family doesn’t act as crazy and shitty as they used to, but that doesn’t matter to me. I have my mom, my brother, and that’s all the family I need. 

My mom has made a point to let me know that it’s unhealthy to hold on to resentment or hate. 
I just want to stay home and skip the family gathering all together. I’m here to see my mom for her birthday and that’s it. Even my brother is saying I shouldn’t be so cold, that maybe I can be the one to change my current dynamic with the family.

Am I being unreasonable for not accompanying my mother to visit her family? Should I give them another chance even though I’d rather never see them again?? Thanks for taking the time to read this :)",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for my stuff back after telling my friend’s friend she can use them?,"I was visiting my friend Amy’s house last weekend and a brought a ton of face masks, lotions, scrubs, etc for us to do a self care night. Her friend Susie (who I’ve met a few times but don’t know that well), visited the next night and we all hung out, and I showed her the stuff I brought and said she could use whatever she wanted because I brought plenty. We were drinking and I was very talkative and excited explaining all the stuff to her. 

The next day Susie travels back home across the country, and I find out she took almost all my stuff back with her. Not just like little single use masks but entire bottles and jars of lotions and creams, totaling probably over $100. Amy texted her asking if she’s seen any of it and she said she hasn’t. I showed her the stuff and left it in the bathroom right before I went to bed, and she left before Amy and I woke up, and all but a couple items were gone, so there’s not other explanation other than she took them.

I’m always happy to share but I don’t know if I ever said she could just take whatever she wanted with her. Amy and I don’t remember me saying she could take them, but we were drinking so who knows what I actually said or how Susie interpreted it. 

I don’t want to accuse her of stealing or cause any tension in their friendship, and there’s not much we can do since she’s back across the country at this point. I just wasn’t expecting to lose all my stuff this weekend lol. I could ask for the money back but I’d feel like an asshole because maybe she did just misinterpret it or I misspoke. 

TLDR: my friend’s friend took my stuff after I drunkenly offered to let her use it for the night, but I don’t remember if I actually said she could take it. ",AmItheAsshole
" for going to my SIL about a medical emergencywith my MIL, when I was not sure BIL would speak to me?","To start me (37 m) and my wife (36 f) have a complicated history with her family. Her father can be disrespectful to her and her brother is often simply not there. Due to a recent conflict with her father, BIL has not been in contact much and is often very cold to us. My MIL (divorced from FIL) recently flew in from Mexico due to a medical emergency with her back. We were not kept in the loop very much, but we decided to go see her yesterday. We had a lovely chat, but my wife asked MIL if BIL had visited. She threw her hands up and said not yet. This upset my wife and today she was worried her brother had not visited MIL yet. As BIL had been cold to us and I wasn'tsure he would respond, I offered to contact his wife, SIL, with which I still had a good relationship. I sent her a message on Facebook giving her the relevant information for a visit and asking if they knew anything. SIL messaged back thanking me for checking in and saying they were the ones who drove her from the airport and that I should contact BIL for further info. I said ok, and that MIL had told us they had not visited and I was checking in. SIL said they were with her from 1 AM when she got in and maybe MIL had forgotten. I messaged back saying I was sorry, but wife and I were not in the loop on Info and was just checking in with them to share what little info we had. The following messages changed tone drastically, saying that I had overstepped boundaries, that I should contact BIL directly, she was not MIL's child and that she was not a messenger. She said to never contact her  to pass a message to BIL, that it was not my place, but wife's place instead to message BIL directly. I replied with ok message received. This was very surprising to me, as we had always been very friendly was just asking if they knew anything. I havent told my wife as I do not want to strain her relationship with her family any more or cause ger to stress out more in this stressful time. It is common in my family to contact other members about information about emergencies to make sure everyone is in the loop. Did I overstep boundaries? If so, was there a better way for her to tell me? AITA for going to my SIL about a medical emergency, when I was not sure BIL would speak to me?",AmItheAsshole
 for getting a puppy even after my roommate expressed discomfort,"I’ll extend on the title a bit while trying to make the post short. I am currently at university and filled out a roommate finder specifically noting that I’m looking for someone who is comfortable with a pet. I found two amazing girls who I now hang out with nearly two times a week. 

The problem is, we’re now two months away from moving in (we signed the lease three months ago) and suddenly the one roommate is changing her mind about me getting a puppy (she’s ok with an adult) I told her I want a Swiss doodle which can be a very calm and highly intelligent and well trained breed. 

I should note as well that I very much want a rescue and an older dog however my mom is severely allergenic and I need a breed that accommodates (Swiss doodles are hypoallergenic), which my roommate is aware of. Importantly, my third roommate is getting a kitten. 

She gradually made comments that told me she wasn’t ok with a puppy but I specifically noted I would like a roommate who is ok with there being an dog of any kind. She’s gone as far as telling me which breed I need to get, how old is must be, and how calm it needs to be. 

I told her I’d be willing to pay extra for training (I haven’t purchased the puppy yet) and be willing to get an older puppy so it won’t teeth but she just texted me this morning that her mom now won’t cover her college funds if I don’t get an adult dog because it won’t be well trained. I would like to still purchase the puppy given this is what I requested and what she agreed to prior to signing the lease.

Edit: one last note is I speculated that she must have just not liked puppies so after asking her she admitted to just not liking puppies (our third roommate is getting a cat and she’s completely on board with that)

AITA if I go through with purchasing the older trained puppy despite her discomfort?",AmItheAsshole
H for setting a boundary?,"Back story. My ex and I have a child together. We broke up a few months ago after 15 years in a relationship. 

I really do not like it when someone who knows me well uses my name in a text message. It feels really patronising. My ex keeps doing it despite me saying it bothers me. So I said if he continues I will not respond to his messages. (He can still call me.) Now his response is that I am controlling him and I've said I want him out of my life.

So am I in the wrong? I really need some perspective as I have always struggled with setting boundaries. I appreciate any advice and I'm happy to answer questions.",AmItheAsshole
? For Telling my teacher about some rude students and having them get called out in front of everyone? ,"Hi, first post here so forgive me for bad spelling.

I will try to be as short as possible.

If anyone needs more details I can explain some more.

AITA? I (18) had students talking about me from the beginning of this year. Now sometimes it's a group of people that just whisper things behind my back or even throw things in my face as well (such as make fun of my work or just talk about how they do not want to work with me). It's gotten to the point where I've been falling behind in some things (homework, tests, etc) and I have not said anything because those students are favorites among the teachers and other classmates as well. Now I have not spoken to them, I barely even talk with these people (don't sit near them, converse, or even try to get to know them) so I have no clue why they just won't be kind. But onto the question, I finally spoke up three days ago and told one of my teachers, he's my favorite and is super sweet and kind. But it did not go the way I expected it (AT ALL), during my last class of the day he came in and spoke to them in front of everyone. He did not mention my name, but I knew what it was about. I knew they knew I was the one that said something, and I felt terrible, they were mad, upset, and even had their favorite teachers upset too. (One teacher even came up to me the next day because she was so mad, another teacher had to drag her away and talk privately with her) I feel so bad and now I think I may be TA because they got in trouble and embarrassed because of me. I feel like maybe I should have just sucked it up and took it. And now I have no clue what to do.

So AITA for talking to a teacher about them?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to get my own apartment?,"For context, I’m 19F, my boyfriend is 19M.

We have been dating for 3 years, and we live separately with each of our parents. I don’t have a good relationship with my mom, hence the reason for me wanting to move out of her house. I’ve spoken with one of my coworkers, and they currently live in a studio apartment, all bills paid, around $800 a month directly across from our place of work. I make around $2000 a month, so I feel like this would definitely be doable. I work fast food, so I usually eat at work. I make decent tips (lots of change) which would make it easy for me to pay to do my laundry with the tips I make. 

My boyfriend is completely against this. He says I’ll go bankrupt trying to pay for an apartment by myself, and that we were supposed to move in together. He wants me to move in with him and his mom instead. 

I’d rather not. I would like to have my own space, and live in my own space on my own terms. I feel that I’d feel more comfortable living by myself rather than my parent or his parent. 

He doesn’t want to move into an apartment with me, because he said he wants to save his money for a down payment on a house. He said the timeframe for him moving out of his mom’s would be when he’s about 25 or so, and when I brought that up to him when we were arguing about me moving into my own apartment, he said I need to ask his mom about moving in with them. 

Remember y’all, it’s all bills paid, 800 a month!! Directly across from my workplace!! I usually spend about 600 a month on Ubers to work and back, so I’d realistically have no other bills besides my phone bill and WiFi. I have a decent amount of money saved up too ($1500) which a portion could be used for the security deposit and application fee. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for continuing to talk to my girlfriend even if it can affect both of us because of my parents,"i(16m) live in a religious household where parents are super strict about stuff. half a year ago they found out I had a girlfriend(16f) and told me to break up with her and not talk to her again. decided to start talking to her again and now they've found out when they went to school to meet with some teachers and saw me and gf sitting together. their main problem was our way of chatting each other like we were already married, and our occasional dirty jokes. now they threaten to remove us from our class to separate us and tell her parents which can both severely affect our academics (were both in a prestigious section in our school for students who perform well, I've always been top of my class and that hasn't changed even when she became my gf) if we don't stop the relationship, so far I still talk to her in school, but not in public

i know in a way I betrayed their trust, but this girl is one of the most caring, sweetest, and kindest people I've ever met, shes helped me heal through one of the most painful times of my life 3 months ago when my grandmother passed away. I've talked to my gf about the situation, and I'm considering just being best friends with her and she does agree if it comes to that, ill talk to my parents about it in a few weeks when they arent mad at me anymore

I'm just, thinking if I'm the one whos wrong for keeping contact with her, knowing that if my parents found out, can harm both of us. i love her and it hurts, but I feel like I'm endangering her by continuing to talk to her, and I wouldn't be able to live with myself if she, or her future gets affected because of our relationship.

edit: when they first found out about my gf, we had been together for 3 months.",AmItheAsshole
 if i dont go to my bestfriend's wedding?,"I am best man at my friend's wedding in a few days and I knew that his soon-to-be wife invited my ex-fiancè who broke up with me a couple of years ago. It was a tough relationship and almost everyone except me was happy it was over as they say it was an abusive relationship and I was being used in the worst ways possible.

 She moved on and dated someone else weeks after she broke up with me and now she asked my friend's wife if she can bring him as her +1 to the wedding, knowing full-well I will be there. My friend told his wife to do what she wanted and she allowed my ex to bring him. 

Now this guy is a nobody, he has no interest or relation to anyone invited. The sole reason he is coming is because he is dating my ex. Im not trashing the guy Im sure he's great, Im just pissed off that my bestfriend was okay with making his bestman as uncomfortable as it can get especially that he knows the fuck-ton of trauma Ive been through and that I am struggling with therapy to this day. 

I know its their wedding and they get to invite whomever but would it have been too hard to politely say, ""This will make things uncomfortable and would prefer if you dont bring him"". Did i mention that I found out by sheer accident when my friend sent me a copy of the guestlist and his name was there? Was i supposed to just figure out on the day?

I cant help but feel betrayed from everyone, my ex, my friend's wife, my friend himself who couldnt care less and when confronted said ""what was i supposed to do?""

WIBTA if I dont go to the wedding? Am I even allowed to feel betrayed for such a thing?

Clarification: I just found out today about him coming over. Yes seeing my ex pisses me off but what upsets me is not seeing her partner. Its that my bestfriend didnt give a rats ass about what I would feel like when I know he is gonna make an awkward situation 10x worse

Verdict: thankfully noone knows my reddit handle so what happens on reddit stays on reddit. Im still drunk AF but I decided I will just act in the way a Bestman should and let this day be just another day. Its not about me its about the newly weds",AmItheAsshole
" for refusing housing for my sister after she told my dad, that he's the reason why our mom isn't alive?","First of all i'm  sorry for my bad english. 
All names are fake for obvious reasons.
Some background:
In march of 2019 my(26m) mother(48f) di*d from heart attack in sleep. That was huge blow for my family... especialy for my father(55m) after 30y together
  
after 2 years my dad started develop drinking habbits, so my sisters agreed to make my dad tinder account and help him found someone.
  
after few months of searching for a good women, my dad got matched with Kate(50f) i wasn't happy at first that my dad found someone after my mom, but wasn't telling anything.
  
some months passed and i could say, that my dad(55m now) changed he stopped drinking so frequently and started drinking only on special occasions like birthdays, new year etc.
  
now, let's go forward another few months (it was december 2022). 
  
wee got asked by Kate to spend first christmas toghether with her family(her dughter Julia(20f), Mom-Anna(76f)) but my sisters(Martha(31f),Angie(29f)) weren't so happy about that.
  
They were thinking that our dad is spending too much time with Kate, so they told my dad that he should leave Kate. My dad pointed that both of them persuaded him to look for someone else, and after he found Kate they want him to be alone again,
  
there was huge fight between them, Angie told my dad, that this is his fault that our Mom is de\*d. After that they completly stopped talking, Martha took Angie side and i took my dad side(i was living with my parents when my mom died, i was in room above theirs when this happend)
  
i told her that i don't consider her my sister from now on, that she knows how much our parents loved each. after that i stayed in contact with Martha(this will be important later).

fast forward to january 2024:

now i leave alone in my dads house, he moved with Katy to their new house. Kate sold her house in another city, moved her Anna and Julia with them.

Next to the point where i ask this important question...

after 2years my Angie contacted me through Martha, 

She asked me to let her and her boyfriend move in with me ""just for few months"" (mind you, that after 3 months she can claim tenants right and i couldn't kick her out without court order)

because she needs to move out from her current apartment and don't have enough mony to rent another

i declined, saying, that she's no longer is considered family, and i won't let strangers to leave with me.

Angie said that this house is hers too.
  
I snaped and told her that everything is baiting her back right now and she's on her own and she should be thankful that i still paying her phone plan, that i could just kick her out from the package and she couldn't contact enyone because of blocked number.
Next day i called my dad and told him everything, dad said that i did right thing and she's not welcome in his house.
So AITA?
Im Sorry if this is hard to read im still in the heat and don't think straight",AmItheAsshole
" for not wanting my boyfriend to day drink, and getting upset when he does?","I don’t make these posts often so please excuse me if the format is bad.

I (20M) have asked my boyfriend, “Mark”(20) on numerous occasions not to day drink (like vodka at 9AM) because I have childhood trauma involving alcoholics, and we both have struggled with addiction in the past. Each time I explain to him that I care about his health and I don’t want him to be drinking like that. I’ve also told him why it makes me uncomfortable. Each time, we get in a disagreement where he says he doesn’t think it’s “alcoholic behavior”.

This evening, me, Mark and my sister, “Lena”(30) were all hanging out in her house when the topic of what he did today came up. While talking, he said while he was out with his mom he ended up taking shots of tequila at 10:00 this morning. When he said this, I looked at him kind of disappointed and asked, “Tequila? That early?”. He just replied “Yeah?” And went on talking to my sister about his day.

At this point I just went quiet, because I didn’t want to say anything about it in front of Lena. I just sat there and scrolled through my phone for a while, until Mark looked at me and asked, “So do we need to have a talk later?” In a somewhat irritated tone. I was kind of surprised since I didn’t say anything else about it to him, but after a second of silence I said “I mean yeah, I guess we do.” And I shrugged. He then went on a tangent, in front of my sister, telling me that I need to “Just get over it” because he “doesn’t think that it’s bad or alcoholic.” And that he “shouldn’t have to change what he does.”

Lena eventually cut him off and stood up for me, telling him how she didn’t like how he was disrespecting me, and telling him how I never disrespect him the way he just did to me. At this point my heart was racing, I felt like I couldn’t breathe and could tell I was on the verge of having a panic attack. So I stood up, looked at both of them and told Mark that I was going out. I ended up getting in my car and leaving, just driving around for a while to calm down. The entire time he was texting me, saying he “didn’t know how he disrespected me” and that he didn’t like that I “just got upset and left like that” when we could have “had a quick talk” about it. 

Now that I’m back home with him, I feel like I’m in the wrong. I still have talked to him or even let him know that I’m back home yet. 

EDIT;

We finally sat down and talked. Both came to the conclusion that this is just not something we’ll both be able to agree on. He doesn’t drink too often so I think I can just deal with it. He promised we wouldn’t get drunk in the mornings, just one drink for fun. 
We aren’t (and were not) going to break up. ",AmItheAsshole
 for no longer wanting to eat dinner with friends for fear of being lectured? ,"To start, my friend Meg (40F) has a 4YO daughter, Dani, who has recently decided to stop eating meat (beef, pork, lamb mainly) because she is concerned about the animal's lives. Meg has decided to stop eating meat as well, to respect her daughter's decision - to which I have no problem with, you do you, boo, and all that jazz. 

My issue is, we normally catch up once a month for dinner (normally some sort of pasta/spag bol or taco mix - something minced meat based) but this has turned into Dani lecturing everyone on why they should stop eating meat, and that they concerned for the animals. 

AITA for no longer wanting to attend these dinners, as I'm constantly being lectured by a 4YO? 

Also to note that Meg is big on gentle parenting, to the point where her daughter can become very demanding and quite rude at times. I'm all for kids having body autonomy and being allowed opinions, but there are times where the adult should have the last word, so I'm not sure if this is clouding my judgement. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to pay for my mom's vacation?,"My brother invited my mom to go on a vacation with him and his kids, and now he is asking me to pay for half. I told him no, he said  "" but it's not even that much you are such an a-hole"" I chose to not reply and left it at that. 
I have two other brothers and he didn't ask those two for a cent. It's a long story with this particular brother, he does this type of thing all the time to me, he's very abusive towards me and for a long time I allowed it but I have made the decision to stand my ground. 

I feel bad because mother's day is coming and maybe I should pay for half. But I also support my mom financially (alone, none of my brothers give any money to her) and I am helping her start her own business. I feel like I already do a lot and he could do this .... But again. Guilt ... Aita?",AmItheAsshole
 - Would I be the asshole if i go back to just being a loving grand daughter and leave all the extra work to my mother?,"Hi Reddit,  

I need advice. Ill try my best to make as simple/short as possible. 

**Background:**

i grew up in a household in which my dad beat us kids and my mum used to stand around and watch.

my dad got help and came around to actually be an decent father, but my mum has always been super selfish and seems to always be pitted against me. between her and my sister they made fun of me at my 16th birthday, and didn't celebrate my 18th at all, come to my 21st birthday and my mum decides this is the perfect time to renew their vows and uses all available funds ( including my money ) to fund this without a single thanks. its basically a long history of me sacrificing things for her and not even getting a thank you. which also includes saving her from getting fired 3 times. 

My parents have also been terrible with money - always. I have bailed them out more times then i can count, There first house, they borrowed money from my granddad and had to sell the house later as they accrued to much debt to sustain it, and recently they have only been able to buy a property due to my dads parents passing away and leaving him significant inheritance. 

**Current situation:**  
I currently manage a team of care workers for my grandmother, I ensure they are there morning and night. Pay for her food/internet / outings etc.. 

My Grandmother has always been a source a light, growing up her house was warm and homey and filled with so much love. 

When my grandmother passes ( hopefully not for like another 15-20 years , i know I'm dreaming ) her house will be left to my uncle and mum. No issues , I'm not doing any of this expecting anything or any type of compensation. 

Recently i got talking with my Grandmother about her house and realized how much i love it , with this in mind I spoke to mum to discuss the IDEA of me purchasing the house from them when the time arise. 

I am aware that my uncle wants to sell the property as is, ( so no issues there ). When i spoke to my mum though she didn't take a single second to process my request to buy the property (prior to renovations) before saying "" you can buy it at full market rates after renovations""   
What hurts most is that she didn't take a single minute to process or think about my request, as always its all about how much money she can get. 

I wouldn't mind if she had said no, she has he right to deny my request but i hoped with all the effort and energy i put into helping my grandmother/ her she would at least take a second to THINK about it.

Now, I feel hurt and honestly spiteful, I want to make her deal with all the nonsense that comes with handling a team of care workers and finances and having to drop everything cause a care worker is sick and unable to go.   
**Would I be the asshole if i go back to just being a loving grand daughter and leave all the extra work to my mother?**",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my nephew to not unplug the ps5 ?,"My partners sister Bell (37F) and her son Ant (3M) came over to the house where my partner and I (21F) live with his parents. I'm currently coughing so I made it a point to stay separated since I don't want to get anyone sick.  
When I first woke up Ant &amp; Bell had just gotten to the house and Bell asked if mom had told me to do any chores and I said no. I also didn't do laundry b/c it looked like it would rain and we hang laundry outside since we don't have a dryer.  
Throughout the day mom comes home and Bell continues to ask me to do chores to which I obliged after I was finished doing what I was initially doing when she asked me. Ant is repeatedly screaming at the top of his lungs at me because I am not paying attention to him. I leave the kitchen and immediately am asked if I cleaned up after myself by Bell. I always clean up after myself and sometimes others b/c I don't mind.  
As I'm sitting in my room Ant comes in multiple times even after Bell tells him not to. He is turning off my fan even when I asked him not to, telling me to not be on my phone, telling me not to watch TV and screaming at the top of his lungs when I don't do what he wants. I don't pay any of this mind and go on with my day off since I don't have work or school that I have to worry about.  
I start to play games and Ant comes in and unplugs the ps5 which I'm sad about because I was doing good in the game. Mom tells him not to do that and he proceeds to mess with moms computer and almost breaks it. He comes back into my room and unplugs the ps while I'm playing game and I say ""no, stop"" in a firm voice.

Bell comes and asks what I told him and what Ant was doing to which I told her. she said I was yelling at her kid and that it's not my responsibility to discipline him. I told her it was the second time its happened and that I wasn't yelling just telling him to not do it. She had to have heard even the mom telling him to stop since the house is not that big. I wasn't just going to wait until he unplugs it while I'm in the middle of a game again.  
She says I should have gotten her instead of ""yelling"" at him and was being disrespectful to her in her parents house and she won't take it. For context she does not spank her kid or give him time outs or any form of discipline other than telling him no.  
Bell proceeds to yell at me and say that there's a bunch of other things that she's let go and not said anything about to which I ask her what she's talking about since I've never heard anything from her even when I asked. She tries to say the chores she asked me to do and the laundry but I did all of them. She goes off and said she can't talk to me because she's pissed. I told her that we need to talk about this later.",AmItheAsshole
 for suggesting my aunt put down her dog?,"My aunt (49F) has a dog who is 17 years old (let’s call her Bubble). I love this dog, she’s been around my entire life (I’m 18). She does not belong to me, so I have no actual say in what happens to her.

Bubble is very skinny, she looks like she’s on deaths door. She barely eats and struggles to walk around the house. At the same time, she struggles to breathe. Each time I see her, Bubble looks worse.

My aunt is keeping her alive, just like her last dog, Bubble will probably die at home. My aunt goes on a lot of vacations, leaving the dog at home. She’s even gone now, while Bubble seems to be on her last leg. I know that my aunt loves the dog than I do, but I feel like she’s suffering. I don’t like seeing her struggle, 

It doesn’t feel like my business, but I want to suggest putting the dog down. I think she should be able to go peacefully. At the same time, it feels like an asshole move. WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to look after my mate's dogs anymore?,"TL;DR - have looked after my mate's 4 dogs for nearly 6 months and I'm over it.

High level story is my friend got himself in a spot of bother. His australian visa expired, he went on holiday and then wasnt allowed back in the country. This was September 2023. He had someone looking after his dogs for a bit but that fell through. Despite me having 2 big dogs of my own along with a thankfully understanding wife and 2 toddlers I offered to collect his dogs and look after them 'til he came home. That was November.

His situation sucks, it's a real shame and he's super unlucky.

Not as unlucky as his dogs though! 3 girls 1 boy. Not spayed. Yes, our man's a backyard breeder/puppy farm. It's shit, I hate it but it's not the dogs fault and they were basically going to be abandoned so like the soft touch I am I fetched his dogs. Pretty much brought them back from the fucking mange and have given them a loving family home for 6months for less than the cost he would have incurred had he put them in a kennel for a fortnight.

Kennel cost is $50 per dog per day. $200 a day for his 4. The deal was he pays me $300 every 4 weeks for food and tick/flea/worming tabs. He was late with the pament over christmas, fucking LOL, and hasn't paid the latest installment either. Anyway... the math is a kennel would cost, what, $2800 for a fortnight? He has so-far paid me $1500 and owes $300 to get him up to date (and his next installment due is May 9th).

I mentioned his dogs aren't spayed. I feel I must add that he misled me regarding their vax status and that they're hardly fucking trained either. I've done all I can but I still can't get them to shit on grass (he lived in a small 1 bedder in a city with no garden just a little patio, I'm lucky enough to live more rural and have big gardens). Even on the bush walks they shit on the path ... it's infuriating and no amount of treats and praise will sway them it seems. I have at least managed to stop them shitting in the house whenever they please and they have learned the basics.

Anyway, our man has had no luck breeding them. Typically, within 2 months of being in my care 2 of the 3 girls got pregnant. Fucking 11 puppies. There are 17 dogs in my house and I am over it. So. Fucking. Over it.

AITA? I'm not going to give him a single penny when I sell his pups as I'll be using those funds to fix the floors, decks and garden that his dogs have stained with their almost constant pissing and shitting (floors and decks) and digging (gardens). I also refuse to manage another round of pregnancy... what should I do with his dogs?

To finish ... if you want a dog please, please please PLEASE adopt/rescue. My two big dogs were 'rescues' and they are the best dogs a bloke could ask for. I understand some situations call for a puppy if you have young or old or need a working dog or whatever but  please, wherever possible, please rescue.",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving a gap at the squat rack ,"This is definitely not as heavy as some of the stuff on here but I've been agonising over it so here goes...

I went to the gym today, I saw a guy there that I usually stand and chat with when we see each other. 
There are 5 squat racks at my gym. The first 2 were taken and he was in the middle one. The last 2 were vacant.
Now to preface this, I hate having people either side of me when I am working out and unless i have no choice, I always use a rack at either end, it's just me.
We had our usual conversation and I went over to the end rack.
He looked almost sad that I hadn't used the rack next to him. 
All I could blurt out is that for me it's like urinals, I'll always default to an end one before being in between people!

Was I an asshole here or am I overthinking something yet again?
",AmItheAsshole
 for not supporting my husband ,"I don't feel like I am being inconsiderate here but my husband makes me feel guilty about this. 
Recently I got married and one month after our wedding my husband's uncle passed away. I had to move to other country where my husband lives. His said uncle and aunt also live this country. Before we got married they helped him out alot, he used to hangout at their house and he is really close with them. Now when I arrived in this country after marriage, this uncle had passed away and my husband emotionally took on responsibility of his aunt and kids. 

In the beginning I was also okay with it since he is really close to them, she needed help with kids and other stuff to manage and grief as well. But now it's been few months and my husband has been visiting them to stay over every week. Every single week he expects me to tag along with him to go to their place and live there few days to help her out. Now I am not downplaying her grief. It was really sad incident in her life but I am newly married, I naturally want to spend time with my husband. And I am tired of living in somebody else's house half the month. 

My husband's family somehow is pressuring me over phone calls to spend more time with his aunt because she is not doing well and only us two here are close ones to aunt in this country. Mind you, she is living in this country since few decades and she has very tightly knit friend circle to help her out.

Seems like that other family is my husband's priority instinctively. And these days we end up having huge fight whenever he mentions going to their house for stay over. It's every freaking week. How do I support him when I am clearly not his priority. I can't believe my marriage is falling apart within few months and at the end I feel like a-hole for not supporting him and his grieving aunt.",AmItheAsshole
 for not allowing my step kid on me or my children’s electronics? ,"My boyfriend (27) and I (25) have 6 children together combined. 3 are his 2 are mine and we have a 4 mo old together. We have blended our families and it has been anything but easy. Regardless of that, we are trying to make it work. One of the big issues we have come across is his son 4 years old breaking/ destroying things. He has put a hole in our wall during a tantrum, throws and breaks toys and so forth. In January I had splurged and bought all our kids Nintendo switches. Our other kids take great care of there’s with no problem but when it came to his son, he was always throwing it and getting mad at the games on it. Two weeks after I bought he, he completely destroyed it and broke the screen. His dad gave him no consequences and only asked why he did it to which his reply was “it wouldn’t work”. I was very upset that I had spent over $200 on it just for him to break it and destroy it. Fast forward he was watching YouTube on my laptop (without my knowledge) I walked into the living room and he had completely drenched my laptop in water. Again I was mad but controlled my anger and got his dad, to which his dad did NOTHING again. I told him I do not want him on my stuff anymore if that’s how he’s going to treat it. Today I come home and find him on my sons switch. I am FURIOUS. AITA for not wanting him on any of me or my children’s electronics?? 


EDIT: our kids ages are 3 (x2), 4 , 5 (x2) 

He was in the back seat of the car when he destroyed his nintendo switch- we never allow them on them unsupervised. 

Yes the switches have screen protectors and cases. He broke through that. 

I was unaware my boyfriend allowed him on my laptop it was put up. 

",AmItheAsshole
 for not getting help,"i (23 now) struggled with alcohol in my college years as many do and have since reduced my drinking significantly after having a talk with my sister while i lived with her post-college. she's my closest family at the moment as my parents and i haven't been close in years.  
  
bit of background, in college i met my best friends whom i lived with in an apartment for 2 years, and we would regularly go out for drinks or have cozy nights in with a few shots. during this time, i'll admit that i struggled with my alcohol intake and knowing when to stop myself as i was very inexperienced with alcohol, blacking out a few timesbefore getting my act together and knowing my limits.  
  
my sister graciously allowed me to move in with her after college due to my tenuous relationship with my parents and after some rough patches, we talked about my drinking and i limited myself in it.  
  
my parents never really talked to me about this, only mentioning it in passing.  
  
my sister ended up not renewing her lease and i moved back in with my parents while i got back into schooling (extra classes to bump up my resume). all they asked was that i watch my alcohol intake and not eat in my room. i accepted.  
  
turns out that while we were moving my stuff in, they went through all my drawers and packed boxes, awkwardness ensued as many of the items were personal and my diary lock combo was messed with.  
  
so i limited my drinking to twice a week (my days off of work) and only having one to two drinks on those days. my tolerance had dropped significantly since college so i never felt the need to get ""plastered"", i just liked to sleep in later.  
  
i left the containers for my drinks in my room (not hidden or a secret) and would let my parents know when i purchased alcohol and when i consumed it, planning to recycle the containers later.  
  
i went out for a weekend to visit one of my friends recently and when i came back, my room was practically cleaned out and the empty containers were sitting on the kitchen counter. then my father comes from around the corner, points at them and says, ""we need to talk. you have a problem.""  
  
i asked what he meant and he motioned to the containers and said, ""either you go to rehab or you're out of the house.""  
  
i asked if it mattered how long it took me to drink them or how often i drank and he said no, any amount was bad. he also said that i wasn't allowed to finish my schooling or get new work until i went. none of the rehab centers have agreed to take me yet, as i pass their breathalyzer and piss tests easily and my drinking habits aren't ""excessive"".  
  
i'm perfectly willing to get counselling but my folks insist that rehab is the only choice.  
  
my friends are on my side and some are asking if i want to crash with them for a bit. i'm a bit cut off from the world as my folks don't let me go out much so i'm asking you all.  
  
WIBTA if i didn't go to rehab or just left?  
  
TLDR- twice a week drinks, forced rehab",AmItheAsshole
 for not going to my cousins wedding?,"I (17F) along with my family was invited to a wedding for my cousin (i’ll refer to him as cousin for privacy reasons) and his fiancé. They live a state away, and we would be gone for 4 days. My boyfriend (very recent, we’ve been talking for 2 ish months, but been really good friends for a little over a year) is turning 18 the day I’m supposed to leave for the wedding. This is on a Friday, and he wanted to plan stuff all weekend for his birthday. 

My parents don’t know we’re together for a few reasons we agreed upon, but they do know we hang out pretty much every day and have for the last ~6 months. I told my parents that it was his birthday that day and asked if I could miss the wedding to stay for his birthday. They told me that they won’t force me to go but that this would be (hopefully) his only wedding and that my boyfriend will have many more birthdays.

 My opinion on it is, I’m not even very close with this cousin in the first place. He lives in another state and we only see each other once every few years. He’s also significantly older than me and he’s pretty cool but I wouldn’t consider us to be “close” at all. I have him added on facebook but we’ve never talked outside of the times my family visits. It’s also my boyfriends 18th birthday which in my opinion is a special birthday and I really wanted to be there with him. He said he wants me to stay for his birthday but he’s not gonna try and convince me not to go and that we could plan more stuff to do when I get back. I considered this but that would mean I’d still miss the party my friends will throw for him and probably other stuff too.

My problem is, both my older siblings have been telling me I’m selfish for not wanting to go, and that a wedding is more important than my friends birthday (they also don’t know about our relationship.) I’m torn on what to do. My boyfriend is telling me I should go so I don’t upset my family, but I can tell he wants me here. I much rather would be here for his birthday than the wedding. Not only because of the stuff I mentioned before, but I also have pretty bad social anxiety and I’m not too fond of big social events. In general, I don’t even like traveling too much. We have to drive down which means 10 hours there and back in a car with my parents and my brother, my sister is driving herself. I don’t mind car rides but 10 hours isn’t ideal. I’m also very disorganized and struggle with packing and unpacking my stuff. All around I’d just prefer to be here but I feel like it’s considered rude if I don’t go and my whole family would probably think the same. WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
 For cleaning my room and moving my unwanted items around the house?,"Recently I (17M) decided to clean up my room during the spring break. It was a filthy and disorganized mess in my room. Trash on my desk, unused items in the corner of my room, clothes that haven't fit me for years just sitting in my closet. Eventually though, I decided I was tired of living in a trash heap and decided to actually clean my room.

Overall, I was very proud of myself for doing this, I don't usually do something like this unless I'm explicitly told to by my parents. I thought my parents would be happy that I cleaned my room and did something without explicitly being told so.

However, when they did get home, they were proud, but also mildly infuriated. This was because during the clean up process, I left somethings I didn't want lying around, but also just couldn't throw away. An example would be some toys I left lying around, like a staff that had a skull with a plague doctors mask on it in our bonus room, where we usually keep toys to share. Another example would be a pile of empty boxes I left in the living room, because our recycling bin was full and I had no where else to put them, I needed them out of the way while I was cleaning the rest of my room. Stuff like that, it also wasn't a lot.

I didn't think these were big deals, I didn't care what my younger brothers did with my old toys. I didn't want them anyway. But my parents made a small fuss about it anyway. They eventually put the things they didn't want lying around the house somewhere else, and they also took care of the boxes for me.

We laughed about it and how my mess spread around the house. But I feel bad for making another mess for them to clean up. So what do you think? AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 by sharing my girlfriend is being stubborn?,"Throwaway account just in case.

Me (30m) and some other male friends, have been trying to plan a surprise girls trip for our significant others. During planning, I let my gf know that I would be busy that weekend with the boys so that she didn’t sign us up for any other activity.

She has been trying for a long time to plan a girls trip but the girls have not agreed or committed to anything. My gf had huge expectations of that girls trip and had imagined it in a specific way. 

My gf saw this as an opportunity to try to get her trip planned so I had to come up clean about the surprise getaway we had made for them. My gf straight up told me she didn’t wanted that and that she would prefer if I let her and the girls plan the whole thing.

I was ok with that - sort of. Later I learned that all the other girls were actually happy about the surprise and wanted us to plan it. None of them felt strongly about the getaway plans my gf was trying to make and were really happy to find out that the guys had take the initiative to plan something even though it was different than what they had discussed about.

I am torn. I’ve tried to nudge my gf to feel the same. They can always plan another trip later. I have asked her point blank if she wants to go and she tells me she needs to think about it. She is fixated by the idea that the guys took control and that they are not allowing the girls to have a longer getaway. I, standing in the middle, feel that she’s being stubborn and has a “my way or the highway attitude”. 

I have so far not shared this with the guys. I think if they hear it probably would cause a lot of bad blood from them to her and that would also hurt the girls feelings as she is preferring her own opinion to sharing time with them.

WIBTA if I just tell everybody what is really happening or should I let her “think about it” and hope that she at some point in the next couple of days come to her senses and accept the gift as it is?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my bf to put away his shoes into the front closet by the door? ,"We live in a 1 bedroom apartment. Next to the entrance of the door when you walk in is a closet, a pretty large one. I made one side for coats and the other side I put  shelves for shoes. My plan was to use those shelves for our everyday shoes. You come into the apartment, you put away your shoes on the shelf, then you go wash your hands like a normal person. He refused to do this. 

So I dumbed it down for him. I asked him to put his shoes away onto the floor of the closet. All he has to do is push the shoes with his feet onto the floor of the closet. I will take the responsibility of putting them away when I clean up. That was a no also.

The closet doors are like the bifold doors, so I dumbed it down for him even more and told him I will leave one side of the doors open so all he has to do is push the shoes in. This is a zero effort request. Also no.

Even if he thinks it’s stupid, the point that I am asking him to do something that makes me feel better and he’s saying no to it. Something so simple and no effort. I already accommodated him in all the ways I could think of. He thinks its normal to just leave the shoes outside of the closet. I don’t want them on the floor in the hallway because things that come in and out of the apartment go in that area and having shoes there is inconvenient and in general I like the clean look. 

I know this is a silly problem but it is so frustrating am I the asshole here? Isn’t it a normal thing to want to put away shoes and have it look clean. He says its not normal and shoes in the hallway is normal. 

Edit: I realize the wording in this post wasn’t the nicest way to explain it but initially I did start it with a normal conversation. And every time he said no I thought ok I get his side let me make it easier for him, and adjusted the solution. This post was written after trying to have a normal convo and getting no compromise from him, which escalated to frustration. So I told him I am going to post it because I feel like it’s not an unusual or difficult request. It’s not the biggest problem in the world, I could live with it, just feel like if roles were reversed I would work around his solution even if I didn’t see it as a problem. Also the hallway area is used for things coming in and out of the apartment such as packages, groceries, water deliveries, laundry, etc",AmItheAsshole
H for saying no to my mother in law's visit?,"Update: Thank you to everyone who took the time to comment or share their own experiences with visiting parents or in laws. My wife and I read over all the replies together and she agrees with those who mentioned that her mom needs new hobbies or a social group of her own. Being a mom and grandmother was her whole identity since her husband was always busy with his work and business before he retired. Now that they're both retired and complete empty nesters, my wife and her sibling will have that conversation with her to see if maybe she's suffering from depression or any other issues, and if she's willing to see a professional to help navigate this new new normal for her. Thank you all for your helpful advice and feedback!  


For background, I get along really well with my wife's parents. We live very far from them so when they do visit, I genuinely enjoy spending time with them, and encourage the bonds they have with our kids. However, over the past year, my MIL has been asking to visit us by herself within a month or two after her and my FIL just stayed with us. Their visits are typically 6-8 weeks and when they leave, we're sad for a few days, but quickly adapt to being a nuclear family in our own space again.

I'm not sure if it's because it's just the two of them in their home, boredom, jealousy of the time my parents have with the grandkids (who also live very far from us), or a combination of all three, but my MIL has been spending at least half the past year with us and pushing for more frequent visits alone.

I thought it was just me overthinking things but my wife brought it up recently and asked me if I was okay with her mom being around more frequently. She knows I love her parents but she also gets tired out from the visits because she's the one who has to plan out things for her mom to do while she's here, as she's WFH and is with her mom most of the time. I was honest and told her that it was great to see her mom, but it was getting to be exhausting since it felt like we were more limited with the time we could go on our own vacations or do other things as a family. My wife said she understood and would try and discourage her mom from visiting again so soon.

I thought this was all settled until my brother in law called my wife this weekend and said their mom was upset because my wife said to hold off purchasing airfare because we had other plans coming up and wouldn't be able to accommodate her so soon. My wife asked why mom couldn't go to visit him instead (BIL also lives out of state from their parents) and he replied that he didn't have the PTO to entertain her.

Now I feel bad because it seems like my MIL is going through an emotional time and feeling like none of her kids want to spend time with her. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for uninviting my friend’s boyfriend from my birthday party?,"AITA for uninviting my friend’s BF from my birthday party? 
There’s actually a chance she will see this so please be respectful if you comment. I 22F had my actual birthday pass this past weekend, though I spent my birthday out of town for a formal event unrelated to my birthday. Obviously, people still wished me happy birthday and stuff, but I decided to plan my bday party for next weekend so that I could actually have plans unrelated to the event. This is important context, because my friends bday is the week after my party. 
Our birthdays are almost exactly 2 weeks apart. I tried to plan my party for the weekend before, but because of issues with the party bus, I have to have it a week later than my bday. 
My friend 21F did not want to attend the trip and event that happened on my actual bday (it involved a weekend of partying and she’s not super into clubbing and such) but decided to come for the one day, my bday, and drove up with her bf and his 2 friends to join us at the club. 
For some background on her bf, they get in fights a lot. She rants to us and asks for advice, but then gets mad if we say our opinion on him. Anyways, unsurprisingly to our friend group, they got into a terrible fight the night of my bday that ended in tears and an argument between me and her bf.
He says extremely cruel things to her when he’s mad at her, and especially when he’s drinking. I went home upset because I wanted to have a good time and enjoy my bday but had to comfort my friend and fight with her bf. 
Last night, me and my friend had a long conversation about her bf and how she’s sick of how he treats her, the constant fighting, etc. and I told her I don’t want him at my bday party next weekend. She understood and agreed. 
Today, however, her opinion changed. She now is saying that it is unfair that he is uninvited because she was partially to blame for the fight (they fought bc he made her upset for a valid reason and he blew it up after she voiced how she felt). 
His friend is seeing my other friend, and I’m allowing the friend to come because he was very mature the night of the fight and treats the other friend right. She’s upset about this, and that my party is a week before hers, as she feels no one cares about her birthday now. 
For context, I planned and paid for my bday party myself and with the girl I’m having the party with (another friend who i’ve been talking about having a joint bday party with since the beginning of college because our bdays are almost the same day). I told her that all of our friend group is looking forward to her bday whatever she decides to do. She’s now saying she’s not having a party or doing anything because of this and she doesn’t want to come to my party. 
She said this is the most hateful thing I could have ever done to her. I realize that there might be a lot of missing context here, but long story short, I want zero drama at my party and I have lost all respect for her bf and I don’t want him there.",AmItheAsshole
 for forcing my niece to use a booster seat?,"I have been my 12 year old niece's legal guardian for a couple months. 

My niece is a tiny kid. She's about 4 feet tall and maybe 40 pounds (we're trying to get her to gain some weight but she has an autoimmune condition that is making it difficult. She's currently in 4th grade and she's still one of the shortest in her class. 

She has a high backed booster seat in my car. She's never cared until a couple days ago. I took family medical leave and used almost all of my PTO when I took her in but now I have to go back to work. I was debating between getting her a babysitter or having her go to the after school daycare but I heard that a teacher's daughter nannies for a girl in my niece's class and she gave me a great price so we're trying this out. 

I explained the booster seat to the nanny and she told me that the other girl also has a booster seat, just a backless one. I thought about it but I'm really not comfortable with my niece being in a backless booster. She barely meets the weight requirement for a booster seat and we've already had so many health issues since she's moved in with me that I need her to be as safe as possible right now.

I took her with me to get her booster seat and to drop it off with her babysitter and when she saw that we were getting a high back seat, she lost it. She said all of the other kids are going to be mean to her and I'm treating her like a baby and she doesn't want a babysitter if she needs a booster seat. 

I tried reassuring her that nobody in her class is going to know, except for the other girl the babysitter will be watching (and I've volunteered in this class enough to know that this girl is the sweetest thing and won't say anything). Still nothing I say is making her feel better and she's threatening to refuse to get in the car with the babysitter tomorrow. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not remembering it was my husbands birthday.  MORE,"My husband blew up on me for not remembering it was his birthday.  Here’s the thing though.  It was thirty minutes past midnight. Not past his birthday.  No. It had only been his birthday for thirty minutes.  Would it have been sweet and cute to be first to wish him happy birthday.  Sure. It definitely would.   

 For some context I struggle with time blindness.  I set alarms for anything important.  I had set an alarm a few days before for noon the day of his birthday.  He usually doesn’t wake up till about 4pm.  We talk on the phone evenings and nights when he works out of town. He is nightshift. 

He said because I was awake at midnight and didn’t remember then it just shows how I don’t care about him.  I think he is looking for an excuse to end our marriage.  He threatens ending it often.    I apologized and told him that I did not remember what the date was at that moment.  But he wasn’t letting it go with that. I didn’t really know what to do. Was pretty much shocked.  Ended up a very heated argument.  It just seems like a pretty extreme reaction but maybe I’m just too in it to see his perspective clearly. 
",AmItheAsshole
" for raising my voice at my mum when I found out my cousin put on my wedding dress without my knowledge?
","My (29F) wedding was a week ago, my aunty (61F) and cousin (22F) are staying at my mum's (67F) house while here as they live in a different country. My wedding dress has been at my mum's house before and after the wedding day.

A few days after the wedding, I visited them as I wanted to catch them one last time before my honeymoon. 

While I was there, my aunty was showing me some photos she had taken that week &amp; while swiping I saw a picture of someone in my wedding dress. 

My aunty got really flustered and started swiping quickly so I couldn't see the picture properly. I asked to look at her phone, she gave it to me and I swiped straight to the suss picture - it was my cousin in my dress. 

I have no idea whether this photo was taken before or after the wedding, either way I was completely shocked to see someone else in my dress! 

This dress extremely special to me, my mum and I designed it together, something completely unique to anything we have seen elsewhere. 

I didn't say anything at the time, but I slept on it and decided to text my mum to ask if she was aware what my aunty and cousin did. 

I didn't receive anything back from my mum, but my aunty tried to call immediately. I didn't feel ready to talk to her, so I sent her a text instead. 

I explained that I wasn't upset with my cousin (she's young), I was more upset with my aunty, as a mother I'd think she'd understand the significance, and the fact she encouraged it, taking photo's, not thinking of asking me &amp; then trying to hide it really hurt. 

I honestly think I would have been okay with my cousin trying on my dress, she's like my little sister, but I would have wanted to be there for it, definitely not behind my back. 

My aunty apologised and sounded remorseful in her response, so I was happy to move on. 

A few days later my mum was driving my husband and I to the airport for our honeymoon &amp; I asked my mum if she knew at the time what my aunty did, I didn't think for a second that she would have known - I assumed she'd understand how disrespectful it'd be to do this behind my back.

Turns out my mum knew the whole time - instead of just apologising &amp; moving on, she started crying and getting really defensive. She said ""it's (Aunty's) fault for taking those photo's"" and accused me of being a AH for making them feel so bad about it. 

I snapped a little at this point and raised my voice, I asked her to take accountability instead of deflecting the blame. 

I'm really shocked that my mum of all people reacted like this &amp; had total lack of accountability. AITA for being upset about this? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to charge a classmate for asking me to study with them?,"Im currently in university and as you suspect, very close to the end of my spring semester. Because I need a language credit this year I decided to just take an easy A and enroll in a spanish 101 class. As a fluent spanish speaker i thought this would be a good gpa booster and at least fulfill my full time enrollment with this course. 
I took AP spanish in high school as well so it’s not my first time taking spanish as a fluent speaker. 
We are in the last few weeks of the semester so it’s just projects and papers and exams thus far. I, knowing I won’t be stressed out, have put my spanish class in the rear view, since it’s my easiest class. After almost completing this semester my class mate (lets call them Jan) decided to approach me asking for study help. I have been going to class every day with Jan and I can tell they have a pretty good grasp of the material and have a fair understanding of what we’re learning. I help Jan in class as well if they have any questions. 

After talking to me in class about study help, Jan emailed me letting me know days and times they are available.

However, I find it kind of ignorant on Jan’s part to want to ask for study help, right before we have a project due in this class, that I also need to complete, along with multiple project and exams in my other 3 classes. 
If Jan wanted help, don’t you think they would ask me earlier on? Especially since i’ve been helping Jan in class throughout the semester and they never mentioned study help at any other point. 
I haven’t responded to the email yet because i genuinely have no idea what to do…
My friends all say that i should charge Jan because it is quite an inconvenient time of the semester to be taking time out of my own busy schedule to help someone else. 
I’m not against helping others at all, I’m even planning on starting a tutoring business for spanish next semester… in the fall.

I just feel that a couple weeks before the semester ends, is kind of crazy. 

I have my own things going on as well. My days always start between 6:15-6:30am, when i go to the gym, walk my dog, make breakfast, go to class, homework/study time, work, along with any other engagements i have going on. 

My days don’t end around 10 or 11 when I can finally decompress and either do homework or finally get to sleep, before repeating the cycle over again the next day.

I don’t want to be rude and decline but If i were to accept i strongly believe i would charge them. ",AmItheAsshole
 for hosting a weekly gathering with my friends?,"I have been hosting a playing cards night (magic the gathering) with my friends for over 10 years. It’s kept my friends together and given us all time to just unwind relax and forget about the daily stress.. I used to have nights like these several times per week up until I got married…

I got married about 4.5 years ago, since then my wife has constantly injected herself into my friends night.. she constantly stresses over the conditions of our house (I help clean and set up everything), cooking (I usually cook something in a crockpot for everyone) I even work from home on Mondays to help make sure everything is up to her standards.. 

She asked me to cut down my friends nights, knowing she was overwhelmed I obliged and cut it to once a week, then She asked me to cut the time down from 6 hours, again I obliged, and now we only get together for about 4 hours which makes for 2-4 games of magic which is good because we can swap up the pods.

 I have 7 friends and they don’t all come every week.. since then she’s asked me to cut it to 4 people per night, I told her no and I explain that 2 pods of 4 or 3 are the best way to play and I don’t want to exclude anyone so we can switch up who plays with who. She asked me to cut it to once a month I told her no because I don’t really have any other hobbies. Now she asks for me to cut it down to every other week… 

 I spend EVERY minute of my at-home life with her, all I ask for is one night a week. Flash forward 2 years and we still have this argument almost on a weekly basis… the stress from it all makes me not want to even play anymore… 

My house isn’t the biggest but it’s the most central location where everyone can get to, and the only space big enough to accommodate all of us, otherwise we have to drive a significant distance and we don’t all get to play together. 

We now have foster children who are with us temporarily, this adds to the stress for her and I help out from the moment I get home to the moment I go to bed.. 

My wife has been unable to maintain jobs due to her disability causing us to rely on my income alone.. This causes us to have severe financial stress… 

Edit: ( to be clear this is mostly the past, I make enough money to get by just fine alone but when emergencies happen we get financially strained) and I’ve had to sell significant portions of my collection to just pay bills month to month… I’ve had to cut down to one card of each and sell my most expensive and prized items in my collection in attempts to keep us afloat.. 

I’ve tried to start other hobbies but everytime I want to invite anyone over it’s an argument and there is always an excuse for why I can’t… every time I want to go out and do something else alone, again argument and more stress.. 

So AITA for trying to hold onto the one night per week I can actually do something I enjoy with other people I care about? 
 ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to pay my friend back for concert tickets now that she can’t attend,"I F(17) have a really close friend F (17) who offered to pay for and bought concert tickets, but now that she can’t attend wants me to still go but pay her for the tickets. For context, i have known this girl since freshman year and she has been there for me through some really difficult times and i have done the same for her. We have done lots of things together throughout high school like going to the mall and as i will touch on later a concert. We have never been the type to “keep score” of who pays for who until last year when i got my license and she offered to pay me if i gave her rides to school in the morning. I didn’t want to take her money but gas is expensive and i’m unemployed (plus she insisted) so she was paying me every few weeks. Well fast forward to a few weeks ago when one of our favorite artists announced they were going on tour and they would be playing about 4 hours away from where we live. We were so excited and she immediately jumped on offering to pay for VIP tickets when i had told her she didn’t have to do that, she insisted and bought them without asking for permission from her guardians. I was extremely grateful and i knew my mom would say yes so i was super excited. Until that night when she called me crying saying that they told her it’s too far and that she can’t go. i offered many solutions but she kept saying that she most likely can’t go anymore. I was bummed but i understood. Then she brings up the fact that she still wants me to attend because she knows how much i like the artist, but she says she wants me to pay her for the tickets. I was taken aback because last year i payed a good amount of money for concert tickets and i never expected her to pay anything. I didn’t expect her to just give me the tickets, i honestly thought she would sell them online , but not to me. Idk how to go about this and i feel like the asshole for even writing this. i’ve asked other people in my life and they think i’m not the asshole so lmk your opinions and thank you for taking time out of your day to  read this. ",AmItheAsshole
 for re-folding my laundry when my wife's not watching?,"Fair warning, this probably comes across as very petty. Nevertheless, I look forward to your verdicts.

My wife and I both do the laundry, depending on who's at home and what needs washing.

I have a particular way I would like my laundry to be folded, and explained to her how I want it folded. However, she keeps folding it differently, stating that thinking about folding laundry is not something she wants to spend energy on, she does it on auto pilot.

I try to fold her laundry the way she always folds hers, but she won't do the same for me. Since this is important to me, I will occasionally take my folded clothes, and re-fold them the way I like it. However, this upsets her because it invalidates her efforts of folding the laundry.

As a compromise I told her she does not need to fold my laundry, just leave it somewhere so I can do it myself. She did not think this was a good compromise, as she is already spending time on doing the laundry, she wants to have the satisfaction of finishing the task.

This has been going on for a very long time, and I have come to accept that she optimizes for minimizing energy spent on folding laundry, while I optimize for maximizing ease of access to clean items in my wardrobe. So I stopped bringing this topic up with her, however, I can't stop myself from occasionally reorganizing the clothes in my wardrobe after she folded another batch 'her way'. I just do it when she's not watching.",AmItheAsshole
 for buying Persona 4 Golden for my son?,"I (M39) bought my son (15) Persona 4 Golden. To begin with, my son is very bright. He's on the autism spectrum, and excels in school. Over the last year. we've heard nothing but greatness from his district. He's gotten honor roll every single quarter (except the last, but we could probably bet on that) and has great attendance. Now, my son is a big fan of video games. Not to say he's a hermit or anything, in fact, he often goes out to hang out with his friends, but when he's not outside, he's playing video games. Additionally, he hasn't had any kind of outburst all year, at least not one big enough to warrant a call.

To reward this, I'd figure I'd buy him a video game. Here's where the issue comes in. My wife (36) was okay with this, and it came out of my money. The problem with that, is that I never stated what game I wanted to buy him. I remember playing Persona 4 when I was younger around my college days. It was a great game, as any Persona or Shin Megami Tensei game is, and I loved the Golden remake when I played it. So, to reward him, I decided to buy him Persona 4 Golden for his Nintendo Switch.

My wife was slightly peeved about this. After all, I know there is a little bit of content that can be disturbing, like murder and two sexual dungeons. I don't think Rise and Kanji's dungeon are that much of a deep cut though, and there are murder mystery shows for teens all of the time. My son isn't going to go on a murder spree because he saw Adachi do it. Still my wife disagrees. She says I should have consulted her, but why would I consult her about a video game? It's not like there are actual sex things. Hell, the closest thing to nudity would be Kanji in a speedo, which is mostly normal in non-American countries

Admittedly, I could have bought him a different game. I know he's played the Harvest Moon games on our Wii, and he enjoyed them too. I didn't buy Persona 3 Reload or Persona 5 Royal because Reload is very expensive right now, and well... there's a bit too much fanservice in Persona 5 Royal, not to mention Kamoshida's entire dungeon. Despite Persona 4 being dark, it plays it off with a smiling face. I should have bought Animal Crossing or Stardew Valley. He's having a lot of fun with Persona 4 Golden, as he beat Yukiko's dungeon recently. Should I have bought him Persona 4 Golden, or am I in the wrong?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to listen to my friend vent?,"I’ve been friends with this girl, let’s call her Bella. Bella is an extremely sweet person that been friends with for a few years. Despite the fact that we see each other irl constantly, most of our closeness comes from texting and sending reels to each other. We grew even closer recently as she has been venting about the many struggles she had and continues to have in her life. 

I come from a culture that doesn’t encourage speaking to people, even your closest friends, about such personal things. These secrets should only stay at home, and revealing them to anyone can cause others to take advantage of you of your vulnerability or ruin your reputation. This built-in belief I have causes me to not disclose everything and anything about my personal life, and sustain boundaries between my friends and I, and generally, my very close friends that come from my same culture behave the same way. However, Bella’s struggles mostly come from her parents and their abusive nature, so venting to them isn’t exactly the brightest idea, making me her only vessel. 

Because I’ve never had a friendship like this, it’s difficult for me to feel comfortable listening to a person getting so vulnerable around me. It’s definitely a sign that she trusts me, and whenever she needs advice I try my best to give her just that, but the way I go about my problems and issues are simply not suitable for her. She is suffering, and her vents always devastate me as I feel like I am of no use to her. Although I’ve been told I’m a good listener and she constantly seeks my advice, I just always feel uncomfortable and upset whenever she vents. I am a people pleaser and I can’t get myself to express how I feel about this to her, and I feel like it will hurt her if I admit this to her. Whenever she asks whether she can vent to me or not, I immediately agree to it, and even ask whether she wants advice or wants me to listen, but she never knows how to respond. I feel like a terrible friend and I don’t know how to deal with this. ",AmItheAsshole
 For using power tools during the day when I have a neighbour who works nightshift? ,"I'm a self employed, sole trader who has taken time off work to renovate my own house. 
I try to do all my large power tool usage (drop saws, grinders, routers, circular saw, etc) outside where the workbench is in large blocks, reason for this is that there is a bit of setup with running power/clean up/using large material that can't fit inside. This is done for efficiency, not only practicality. 

Unfortunately I have new neighbours who today experienced a ""big cutting day"" for the first time and they work nightshift all week, every week. 
I started work at 9am - two hours after the allowed 7am power tool usage in my area and finished at 4pm.

They were... Not very happy with me and used rather colourful language, I responded calmly, understanding that they are tired however the world cannot stop for them, this is quite literally my job. 
In addition, there is rain predicted for the rest of the week which would bring the project to a standstill if these cuts aren't done.

For clarity, the there is no space available to do this job anywhere else. 
They did the classic threat of being noisy with loud music at 3am when my family is sleeping, to which I reminded them that is actually illegal, where I could be paying a tradesman to do the work and it'd be no different (opposed to starting at 7am). 

They aggressively suggested I do it on weekends, however that is when my family are not at work/school and I'd like to spend time with them. 
In addition, I believe this would negatively impact the most amount of people, with power tools being used when majority are at home. 

Bonus, I don't actually want to annoy my new neighbours but I (clearly) do feel strongly that I wasn't doing anything wrong and need reddit's view on the matter. I'll update with any clarifying questions as I can.
",AmItheAsshole
 for only wanting to pay for 1 room,My brother and sister in law have a child and  when we move from this apartment complex they want me and my boyfriend  to pay half rent for a 3 bedroom 2 baths apartment instead of just the one room me and my boyfriend would be using they want me to pay half of my nephews room plus half of the bills (bills I do not mind) and they would get the master bedroom …  I’m 19 and me and my  boyfriend want to get our own place but rent is very high and we don’t have much renting history but we plan to move out officially after another year  so we’ll have good history with renting  they said it would be fair for everyone if we just pay half of rent and not split rent into 3 bedrooms AITA for not wanting to pay for another room and just pay for our room and side of the bills ? ,AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to delete a video that had my ex in it? ,"Throwaway account. 

Five years ago, my best friend threw me a huge 25th birthday party. We invited our close family and friends. At that time, I was dating John. The next day I asked everyone who recorded to send me videos, photos etc. I edit it and made a videoclip with music in it. I then posted it on Facebook for memories, and tagged John and my close friends. Thanking everyone for a wonderful night. 

Fast forward to this year. It popped up on my newsfeed and I reshared it. I put, this night is definitely one for the books. Such great memories. Well, I am no longer dating John. We had broken up four years ago. The next day John messaged me, asking if I can take down the video. His girlfriend feels uncomfortable that I still have videos of us together in in that video. I told him no. I no longer have any of the original videos and photos, because this was five years ago. Plus, this is my only memories of my close family and friends, and some who I no longer see anymore. I also told him, if his girlfriend felt uncomfortable, I'll untag him so they both don't have to see anymore.

 I guess that wasn't enough for her, because apparently we had mutual friends who sees the videos still. She then messages me the next day and ask me to delete the video. She doesn't like that fact I still have videos of her man. I explained to her again of what I told John. She then accused me that I still miss him and want him back. That's why I reshared it in the first place, and won't delete it. I just told her she's crazy and blocked them both. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling people that my dad is dead even though he’s not,"I (13M) haven’t seen or spoken to my dad since he left when I was 10. I moved to a different school a year ago so know one knew my dad left and when people asked I just told them that he was dead because I want people to think that I had a dad that cared about me and didn’t want to leave me. It’s not really a lie anyway because my dad might be dead I don’t know if he is and anyway it’s not like i’m ever gonna see him again so it is like he’s sorta dead. Lying about my dad was working out though because I didn’t speak to too many people so I didn’t have to lie about my dad much anyway and nobody who thinks my dad is dead will ever meet my mom because we’re not friends so it’s not like my mom would ever be able to tell them the truth.

But like this guy I share a few classes with is obsessed with becoming my friends it’s so annoying, I ignore him most of the time but he just follows me everywhere and talks to me anyway. He forced me into letting him come home with me and he met my mom. He told my mom that it’s really admirable how great of a mom she is even though my dad is gone and then he told her that he was sorry for her loss, he’s so weird I don’t know why he said any of this honestly. She was really confused and he told her that I told him that my dad’s dead. My mom told him that I lied and got really annoyed at me, she yelled at me and told me I need to stop lying to people who want to be my friend otherwise I won’t have any or something. My mom has been really upset with me since, she told me that she’s worried about me (?). My kind of friend hasn’t spoken to me since but I don’t really care about him I just care  my mom like I feel kinda bad for making her worry and whatever like I didn’t mean to, I didn’t think this would be such a big deal? AITA?

sorry for the really long post I think most of this is probably pointless info but i’ve never done one of these before I don’t know how much info I have to give.",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my partner effectively have my car after call was totaled in an accident?,"My partner—who is 26 and does not live with me but rather their parents and brothers—was involved in a car accident in January 2024, and their car was totaled as a result. My partner did not purchase another car until April 2024, mainly just due to trying to find the best offer/a nice car that they want - not due to an inability to afford a new car. 

For background, I make about 4-5x more than my partner, and I pay for virtually all dates/outings/vacations without splitting the cost. I gladly do this and do not mind doing so whatsoever. Also, we go out basically every week, and I not only pay for but arrange everything we do together. We have been together for about 9 months, and in that time they've only arranged and/or paid for 2 dates - out of the perhaps 60-80 we've been on by now. I have never brought this up as being an issue of any kind. 

Now, last week, after my partner finally purchased their new car, they said I was ""selfish"" for not letting them effectively have my car given that they drive to work everyday while I work for home and my car effectively collects dust in my garage. My partner never asked to use my car for work during the 4 months they went without a car, but they said if I weren't ""selfish"" I would have volunteered to let them use my car all throughout the 4 month period. 

For further background, in around October, my partner's brother had their car broken into right outside their house, where my car would have been stored had I given my partner my car during that four month period. This was a factor in me not volunteering my car to my partner during the four month period when they did not have a car. ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my best friend for gay porn?,"I’ve been bffs with my best friend since we were babies, and I love him like a brother.

I found out recently that he was bi because he started seeing a mutual friend. I should have seen it coming because he was constantly asking about this mutual friend and they would disappear together for hours at a time when we were hanging out with our friends.

I didn’t think I was homophobic in the slightest, but it definitely threw me off. Neither of them seemed gay at all, and I always thought I’d know if my best friend was gay. We have known each other for 20 years.

But he came out to me specifically and I should have been more encouraging, but I was just shocked. I kept accidentally calling him gay and asking how that’s possible when he’s slept with women and he kept correcting me and saying he was bi.

It was a really uncomfortable conversation, but it ended with him saying that I don’t need to stress because he won’t be “shoving it in my face” and “I’ll hardly know they’re together”. He said he knows it’s a lot and it’s okay if I need time to process. 

And he was right. I did need time to process. Because not only did I find out he was gay, but I also found out he was dating a mutual friend of ours. A male friend.

I have gay friends, but I always knew they were gay, so maybe that’s why it’s different?

My best friends new bf also has a best friend that I’m friends with. I asked how he was taking the news of them dating and he said he had known he was gay for years and he went out of his way to be supportive. He said he has heard all the sex stories, seen him make out with men, and he hypes him on.

I just kind of felt bad because I want to be that supportive friend and I haven’t been that. I talked to my bff and said that I still love him and I’m sorry about the awkwardness. I said I wanted to learn more and be a better advocate for gay people and I think he could help me with that.

He said absolutely. I asked if he would send me gay porn. I said if I was going to have a gay bff, I should know the ins-and-outs of gay sex. We have talked about sex before, and we can still do it. I just need to desensitize myself to gay sex and gay people. I said it would be a good learning opportunity for me.

I was trying to be supportive, but instead he just looked… uncomfortable? He said he doesn’t watch much gay porn, and he’s confused on how that’s going to help me understand gay people.

I was horrified I asked. I tried to explain I thought it would normalize gay people and I didn’t want him to feel like he couldn’t be open with me about sex. He said porn isn’t going to teach you about gay people, a lot of porn is unrealistic, and being gay is about a lot more than just sex.

I was honestly kind of humiliated at this point so I said we needed to focus on finals and we would talk about it later. He said he appreciates the effort, but I can’t help but think I messed things up. Was it offensive what I said? AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for adding cinnamon and fruit jam on top of a rice pudding without asking my bf,"It sounds stupid to me (39 f) but my bf (37 m) got mad because I did that. He said he wanted to eat it without me adding anything to it. I told him it’s only on top and not a lot - even showed him that I can push it to the side and that it’s only on the surface. After snapping at me and telling me how disappointed he was - he told me that I was the one getting upset. He does this often when he gets angry about something random and I try to difuze/fix the situation &amp; I’m told that I am the one being upset. I probably get agitated after he gets angry. 
This time he told me that I’m turning it around and that he reacted to me. I don’t even know what’s going on anymore. Family is aware that he has anger issues but he acts like it’s people’s fault for being shitty and triggering him. It’s tiring and I tell him that it is his anger issues but he almost doesn’t want to believe it. He thinks he’s being gaslit or something. He left the house slamming the door “because of me”. I don’t know how to handle his anger issues and how to not be blamed all the time for it. Am I really an asshole because I didn’t ask if it’s ok to add things to a rice pudding? It was a premade one too. 

Edit: more info — we have 2 containers of rice pudding and I opened one for myself but offered him some. Maybe he didn’t know we had two but still. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling a friend I didn’t appreciate something she said?,"Hello, fellow Redditors, before we discuss about this current situation, I’d like to say that the “Josh” person I was talking about from last post and I have reconciled and became friends again. Ok, on to this.

Yesterday, I (21 Fem) got a choppy and slightly uneven bob done by myself because I was in the mood for a haircut. I took a picture of it and sent it to my friend, who I’ll refer to as ”Jessica” (19 Fem). Jessica is a fervent fan of the adult show “Hazbin Hotel”, so she made a reference to it by comparing my haircut to one of the characters in aforementioned show. This is the reference: “😂😂😂 You’re rocking the Lute haircut. Don’t worry about your lost arm, I have a prosthetic one for you. Here it is 🦾.” At first, I didn’t get the joke. I searched it up and found that this “Lute” character is an angel that lost her arm in a fight between heaven and hell.   
So I replied, “I don’t appreciate you making jokes that are related to my health, namely, me losing an arm.” I don’t know what in blazes I’ve said in my text that was aggravating, but Jessica started saying tons of stuff I didn’t understand, like, “HEY, THAT’S ABLEIST!!!” Or, “WHAT’S WRONG WITH THAT, YOU’RE BEING TOO SENSITIVE!”   
When she said, “You’re a sensitive motherf\*\*er (she typed the actual word) and you’ll never be more than that! What’s wrong with Lute getting her arm ripped off?!”, I got enraged and typed: 

“Oh, please, you’re not going to be a jerk over me saying that I didn’t appreciate your joke, aren’t you?” No response. 

Now, whenever I see her, she seemed gloomy and depressed with her shoulders slumped, very much contrasting her usual bubbly and cheerful behavior and good posture.   
Although all I said was that I didn’t appreciate what Jessica said, I feel like that I was being a blame-shifter and that I was the villainess who provoked this second version of Jessica.

Reddit, am I really the asshole? I don’t want Jessica to be stuck like this forever.

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for talking too loud during a class,"In a recent class I was talking with our teacher just about anything under the sun. This teacher is known for being chatty as well and it is common to talk across the room. He is the one who commonly initiates conversation too. We were given an assignment and it was due at 3:00 and our class is in the morning. 

In this class, I was talking with him for parts of the class but the majority I was quiet. Just to clarify, I was speaking at a normal level. There was also another friend who was talking to the teacher too. However during this class I noticed two close friends acting really passive aggressive and unlike themselves. 

It wasn’t just this class though. In our next class they were being petty about it as well bringing it up too saying that they couldn’t get any work done and wanted their AirPods because I was being so loud. However this was not our final assignment and we had done it already although it was graded. They however had the option to wear headphones and they were not involved in the conversation either. Am I the asshole for talking too loud and for too long or should I have been quiet.",AmItheAsshole
 for accepting money from my parents for my wedding then eloping.,"My parents gave each of my brothers $50,000 when they graduated from university as a downpayment on their home. When I graduated they did not do the same for me. I asked about it and they said my husband should provide. I wasn't married. I still lived at home. 

Three years later I met my husband. We dated for a year and then we got engaged. My parents were overjoyed. When we set a date they gave me a check for $50,000 to pay for the wedding. WTF?  

I took the check and we eloped. We then used the check for a downpayment on a house. My husband had a similar amount saved up so we are in a good spot with equity. 

My parents bare furious that they didn't get a big wedding for all their friends and family to attend. 

They said that they gave me the money for a wedding. My argument is that I got married and had leftover money. Accurate in my books. 

My brothers are on their side so I am here to ask if I'm in the wrong. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my cousin that her 1 year old toddler shouldn't use smartphones?,"I recently visited my cousin. She has a small 1 year old kid whom she lets use smartphone to watch Tiktok and YoutubeKids. I don't like such small kids be given smartphones, and frankly, think it is harmful. I understand parents getting from work tired but still, the child's brain is at risk

Then my mother called out to the kid, she wanted to talk or play with him. But the kid didn't even budge, constantly looking at the screen as if he couldn't even register the presence. After few minutes he eventually closed the smartphone and went to play with her

I was still alarmed and told my cousin that young kids using smartphones will just ""ruin"" them and that it is obviously not good for the brain. She went defensive and basically told me that one day I too will be a parent and she will wait to see how I deal with my kid. I just replied that I will be responsible and not let my toddler use phones ever.

Sure it's not my child but I just wanted to give an advice. Majority of parents let their very young kids and even younger than that use smartphones, watch tiktok or YouTubeKids on their TV screens, and frankly it's infuriating considering all the research and studies done on the negative effects of the screens. 

EDIT: For the the people who say that I don't know how frequently the child uses it, that mother is tired or etc. She frequently visits us with her child, and she always lets him use it when in our home

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not referring my bf a job to my former company?,"BF (28M) and I (25F) have been together for 7 years, we were college couples. After graduation we had our own separate paths, he works in a different company with different focus (engineering/QA) and I work in another company in a different industry (management/sales).  I left my first company after 3 years (it’s a fairly small company) and had a huge salary bump but less stable job. Recently my former company owner (CEO) was asking me to come back but I demanded a really high salary so the talk has been halted. With all these happening with me, my BF is not doing good with his current company, since it is an agency there are times where there is no work no pay for weeks. He is asking me to send his resume instead to my former company but I feel somewhat uncomfortable doing that. First is because his experience is different from my current company requirement, second is I don’t feel comfortable asking the owner for job for someone else, third is I don’t think he will like working there since I left for a reason, fourth is I can’t imagine him working with my former colleagues and essentially mixing our networks. Now he is asking me if I sent his resume already, I haven’t. 

Tldr: Bf asking me to send his resume to my former job, I feel uncomfortable . AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I asked my friend to talk less about sex when we hang out?,"I (22F) have a really close friend (23F) who ended a pretty long relationship (for our age at least) about half a year ago. After she broke it off, she talked to me about how she was excited to try out new things, experiment and do one-night stands and stuff like that, since she's only ever been with one person whose preferences didn't really line up with hers all the time when it came to intimacy.

It didn't take too long before she joined a BDSM club, something she talked to me about for some time before going. It was a success and she's been going there a lot ever since, even meeting and beginning to date a new guy from there who is a total sweetheart – I was incredibly happy for her and also very proud of her for experimenting.

Since she started going, she's become much more open about her preferences and her sex life when we're together, both when it's just the two of us alone and when there are other people from our pretty big friend-group present.

At first, I didn't really think about it and actually thought it was nice. It's been really great being able to talk about fantasies and kinks without fear of being judged.

However, recently I've begun noticing that we pretty much only talk about her sex life when we're together. It's always ""I did x with y"" and ""I have this kind of sex toy, want to see"" and ""I had z punishment for doing v"" and ""here's a picture of me being tied up"" and so on. I don't always want to talk about sex so I often try to change the subject, like ""have you been going on any dates with your new boyfriend"", but she immediately turns it back to sex with stuff like ""yeah, I've been to his place and watched a movie and then he gave me 10 orgasms in a row"". I can barely make a joke or say anything without it immediately being turned into something sexual.

I think I'm hesitant to ask if we can talk about it less when we hang out because she's talked to me about how she was a bit scared that people would judge her for being into the things she is, and I really don't want her to think that I'm judging her or don't want to talk about her sex-life – there's definitely space for that in a friendship, I just don't want it to take up everything in the friendship.

She talks a lot about her sex life an when our friend group hangs out too. I really don't want to talk about sex in larger groups so I usually just kind of sit those conversations out, but our friend group is pretty open about these things and seem to have no problem whatsoever, and it only makes me feel like even more of an asshole for sometimes thinking that I don't necessarily want to talk about that stuff. 

WIBTA if I asked my friend if we could talk less about sex?",AmItheAsshole
 for choosing not to sleep in the room with my wife tonignt,"Friday night, my son went to bed at his normal time and threw up in bed. Begrudgingly, I got up and took care of things and the rest of the night was uneventful.  In the morning we found up he threw up again over night.  I had already washed the sheets so I put them back on the bed and threw his 2nd set of sheets in the wash.  

That night, Saturday night, my younger daughter threw up in bed.  Once again I was the one that went and cleaned everything up.  I went and found a bowl for her to use in case she threw up anymore.  I think I emptied the bowl 4x throughout the night.  At about 1:30am my wife said she didn't feel well so I found an old mop bucket for her and, just in case, I found a couple buckets for my son and other daughter.  Needless to say I didn't get much sleep Saturday night.  

All day Sunday the 3 girls complain about how terrible they felt and I did everything for them all day.  Made specific meals for them depending on what they had an appetite for, ran to the store (30 mins away) an bought Nyquil, Dayquil, Pepto, pepto tablets, ginger ale and 7up.  Younger daughter continued to throw up periodically until I got the pepto in her.  

Sunday night rolls in.  Gave both my daughters Nyquil and tried to offer some to her.  She said no because she doesn't want to throw it up.  I offered pepto she said no to that because it tastes like chalk.  I told her I had pepto pills and she declined those as well.  So I'm upset already because she won't stop whining but won't take anything to help either.  Then she invites the younger daughter to sleep at the foot of our bed.  I'm annoyed but I decide it's fine.  I decide to cover all my bases.  I make sure everyone has a bowl/bucket and a towel so that I can try and get some sleep.

I get up at about 11:30 to fill my water bottle before I go to bed and I see a light in the hallway.  My oldest looks at me and says ""I feel like I'm going to throw up"" and proceeds to throw up all over the hallway. Now I'm pissed ""Why didn't you throw up in the bucket?! I gave you that bucket,showed you were it was and told you to throw up in that if you felt like you needed to puke!  You literally had to step over the bucket to get here!  Why didn't you grab the bucket?!"" She said ""sorry"" and I said ""it's fine.  Just grab the bucket next time"" and went to bed.  

My wife got up and went to my daughter's room and said something I didn't understand and when she came back in my older daughter was with her. 

W- ""I told her she could sleep in here"" 

Me- ""WTF? Why?! We don't have anymore.room in our bed."" 

W- ""she can sleep on the edge on your side in case she needs to throw up""

M- ""nope.  Eff this.  I'm not sleeping in a room, surrounded by sick people.  I'm sleeping on the couch""

W- ""the F***?!""

I grab my phone charger, CPAP, a pillow and a blanket and leave the room.

Am I the Asshole for not wanting to sleep in a room surrounded by sick people?",AmItheAsshole
 for having my best friend's dad walk me down the aisle instead of my brother?,"I don't have a great bio dad and my ex- stepdad is even worse. The one father figure I really had was my grandfather, but he passed away almost ten years ago. Over that time my best friend's dad we will call Mark, really connected with me and stood up for me in rough times. He has known me since I was in High school, college, and present for my wedding. 

So, I asked Mark to walk me down the aisle and he was ecstatic to do so! I love him very much and I am so excited to have him do this. However, my mother and brother are upset me over this. During my mother's wedding she had my brother walk her down the aisle. So I guess they assumed that I would do the same. We three have survived together in a lot of things, but I was not as close to my mother as much as my brother is. My mother feels very slighted by me, and states she feels I am pushing her and my brother out of the picture. Like I am picking Mark and his family over them. 

Some people are actually surprised that I am picking Mark to walk me down. However, they have been super supportive except my mother and brother. No matter what I say to my mom, or have her do in my wedding. It feels like its never enough for her. Am I the asshole in this scenario? did I make the wrong choice? ",AmItheAsshole
 for calling the cops on my 17yo son?,"""UPDATE""  well i confronted my son he said that there was 131k in the roof counted and there is more money she admited to every thing its was surreal he said there was easily 200k plus more that was legal money. he said the cops wouldnt be able to do anything because there is no proof of where the bikes are and the bikes that are at our house are all vin swiched and cant be traced back.

 he took the money and got in his truck and left i have called the police i doubt there is much they can do but i will have to see, i couldnt look him in the eye he has all his legal documents and he said that he was done and he can provied for him self he wouldnt even call me mom.





im going to be frank i was cleaning my sons room yesterday and there is drop down ceilings in our house i saw a tile in his closet that looked not seated properly i went to fix it and i saw something though i couldnt really tell what it was so i grabbed it, i was shocked what i found, it was bags of $50 and $100 bills and i dont mean a few thousand i mean easily 100k in cash.

a year ago i caught him with a stolen dirt bike and he said that he had stolen a few dirt bikes and would put on a different frame to change the numbers and then would sell them for 6 to 8k im almost positive this is what hes doing. im freaking out about this and have yet to confront him so WIBTA for calling the cops on him?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend he should contribute more,"Me and my best friend (both 18M) have been good friends for 3 years. We often go out, and on almost every occasion I end up being the one paying. Whether it be gas, food, tickets to something, anything really, I am the one swiping my card 90% of the time. He also does not have a license or a car, necessitating that I drive every time, exacerbating the feeling. 
Recently I told him that he should pay more, especially when he's invited me out himself. He responded very poorly, telling me that I have no idea what his life is like. Keep in mind we have been around each other probably 3 times a week for a very long time, and I know certain things about his financial situation, being that he holds a job that pays several dollars an hour more than mine, has no bills save for his phone bill, and never has to contribute to family finances. I also observe that he buys things for himself very often, showing that he does indeed have a disposable income.  
He went on to tell me that I don’t know what it’s like to be poor— me and him, by all accounts have both grown up solidly middle class: i’ve been to his house in the suburbs, I’m aware of what his parents do for work, and I sustain that it would be foolish to say he is poor. 
When I tried to explain this to him with a degree of hesitation and understanding, he immediately told me I was the same as every other white person, and I would never understand what it was like to be him. I knew he experienced different things than me, but I was looking at basic financial ability, it wasn’t about how hard one’s life was, it was about contributing equally when you have equal means. 

He told me I was entitled and ended our friendship there. 
AITA for telling him he should contribute more?",AmItheAsshole
 for not changing plans 20 min before an event?,I live in a different state than my family. Particularly my 3 younger sisters. I have 2 children. We recently visited the state they live in. I sent a text to each of them 3 months before said trip and let them know. This trip was happening over my youngest birthday. He chose to go to the aquarium in said state. We knew it was a little more expensive but we were going with about 30 people and all our friends were fine with the activity. I told my sisters a month and a half before said activity to give them enough time to save money. We were in the state specifically for a non relation wedding. The only reason was for the wedding. With that we had very limited time to do things. Which is why we planned the aquarium trip. 20 minutes before said aquarium trip all 3 siblings gained up on me stating that I chose too expensive of a place and they would not be going and we needed to come to one of their houses for dinner. However the wedding was only a few hours after the aquarium and we were involved all night. I got told I am a horrible parent for not allowing my sisters to see my kids. Not once did they offer a free activity or even anything sooner. We left the day after this incident. We drove 17 hours to them. AITA,AmItheAsshole
 for not giving away my shirt to my uncle?,"Honestly, I think this is extremely stupid, but here goes. Also, English isn't my native language, and I am typing from the phone.

I (23F) and my mother have a close relationship, but with rough edges, like anyone else.  As is normal where we live, we generally give things that we do not use or need to other family members who need them, and unfortunately it is very common to force children to give their toys to cousins ​​or siblings younger than them.  She and I have fought a lot about it in the past, and it's gotten a lot better, but recently another issue of that nature came up.

 My boyfriend has (or well, had, because I wear it) a fairly thick dress shirt with a very nice print, it is really of very good quality, but unfortunately it is at least three or four sizes larger than it should be ( long story as to how he got it, is irrelevant), and logically he never uses it, because it looks like a waste.  Since he doesn't use it, he gave it to me so I could wear it as pajamas, and I honestly adore it.  It's like a huge warm and soft nightgown.

 A few days ago, my mother saw the shirt and commented (somewhat insistently) that it would be good for me to give it to my uncle F, because it is his size, and it would fit him very well, since it is practically a high quality shirt. new.  I, who have some problems saying no, told her I would think about it and thought she would forget about it, until yesterday, when we went to visit some relatives and she saw the shirt again (I took it with me in my pajamas, because we spent the night there), and he offered it and practically gave it directly to my uncle who was there, and even showed it to him so he could measure it.  Unfortunately, it was her exact size, and she quite liked the print and fabric.

 Then I spoke privately with her, told her directly that I would not give away my pajamas, and that she had no right to offer or give away my things, no exceptions.  She understood, but she said she wasn't giving away my things.  We didn't argue, but it was pretty awkward, and we basically agreed to disagree.

 Am I the bad one for not giving away my shirt to my uncle?",AmItheAsshole
 for not watching my sister's kids?,"Background: I (18f) have been helping out my (37f) SAHM sister with her 3kids, now aged 12m, 9m, &amp; 2f nearly 4/5 days a week for over a year. During that time I've mostly helped with my 2f niece. Recently my sister has had another baby (5 month old at the time of this post), and I've ended up watching her as well as my 2f niece. I have a bond with all the kids, especially my 2y niece as we've been together for long hours of the day since she's been born. 

I have identified &amp; came out to our mother as bisexual when I was 11, ( recently realized that I am lesbian). For some reason I've come out 3 times since 11, each time as bisexual, &amp; each time I've been met with extreme hostility from our mom. The first time at 11, my sister asked me about it. For brevity, I gave an excuse and was never asked about it again.

Over the last few years my sister has made a few homophobic remarks, which she never used to make growing up. Recently these remarks have ramped up &amp; taken over. Being that I am constantly at her home and spending time with her&amp; her family, I hear it much more often. My sister constantly talks about ""gay agenda"" and is starting to instill in her children this rhetoric. 37f sister has started to suspect that 12m is gay (she went through his phone and saw messages of him saying he is bisexual to his friend). 

I live with our mother, and we live &lt;15 minutes away from 37f so I've basically been an on call babysitter for ages. But with this uptick in negativity oozing from my sister (not even kidding. it's ALWAYS a topic when I come around) I've been wanting to come around less,&amp; distance myself. I feel terrible about even considering distancing myself from my nieces and nephews especially with 12m struggling mentally from the disparaging remarks of his mother. But these kids will grow up however they will with how their mother is raising them. Going from 5 days a week to 0-2 will be jarring for everyone.

She is stuck in her mindset, and debating the protections of any community with someone who has no intentions on seeing another pov is not an interest of mine. my heart hurts and I suffer a bit each time I'm around family. I need a bit of advice redditors ... WIBTA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for taking our cat to the crematorium before my daughter could get home to say goodbye?,"Our 18 year old family cat died earlier this week. My kids are in their 20s and live on their own, and they all grew up with him. Calling them to tell news was heartbreaking. 

By the time I got a hold of my youngest daughter, several hours had passed. She was at work and said she would come over afterwards to see the cat one last time. But she had 4 hours left in her shift, the animal crematorium was closing in 2 hours, and the cat had already been gone for about 8 hours. 

Rigor mortis had set in and his body had leaked fluids. It wasn't a pretty scene and I didn't want to have the body at home overnight. I told my daughter this, and said she should leave work now. She works in a small medical office and they were stacked with patients so couldn't leave. I took the cat to the crematorium after speaking with her. 

When her shift ended she called me and was furious that I had taken him. She said the body wouldn't have decomposed overnight and I could have put it in the garage until morning. She hung up on me and hasn't responded to my texts or calls for two days. 

AITA for taking the dead cat to the crematorium before she could say goodbye?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling out my friend’s inconsiderate behavior and repeated failures to communicate?,"Throwaway as my friend uses Reddit, let’s call him “Sam.”

Last weekend while home for a concert I introduced my girlfriend to my family. Sam said he was carpooling with a coworker on Saturday for the show (we got in Friday). Sam gets to my parents’ house and texts me “we dropped off our stuff and are out walking.” Initially, I was confused because never once did we discuss this person ever staying with us. I don’t know this coworker well, we’ve talked maybe twice. They arrived to my very surprised mom. I pick up the pieces over text with Sam/my mother. Over text: “Omg I am so sorry, I thought it was implied, that is completely my bad.” followed by “100%, my bad, let’s talk about this later.” We get dinner and try to get to know this person. It’s clear that Sam doesn’t know our coworker well either.

My mom is a bit old-fashioned regarding sleeping arrangements etc. I’m sleeping on the couch while Sam and our coworker are in the same room, and my girlfriend in another. On Sunday we walk around and go thrifting before Sam departs for an art exho. Our coworker does not want to go and stays back as we kill time before the show. Sam meets us there and we have a great time. Later I ask Sam if we can chat and I ask at what point he thought it was okay for our coworker to stay with people she doesn’t know when he doesn’t even know her. Sam is defensive but ultimately asserts he’s sorry and too tired to get into the thoughts behind his actions. I appreciated it but it’s my mom who deserves an apology. He agrees, we table it. Then he realizes his phone’s in the car of our ride home from the concert, so we go retrieve his phone. We’re exhausted but we have at least time to discuss it further. His take: “Well why is it my responsibility to figure out where she’s sleeping?” I’m irked because he’s refusing to take accountability and won’t “talk in circles.” I realize he isn’t willing to consider intent vs. impact. We get the phone and I say I don’t want to have this fight or talk in circles but I need to make sure I’m fully heard. He sarcastically says “Oh you’ve been fully heard.” We abandon the conversation and say goodnight at 1AM, we’re leaving at 5 AM. Sam’s planning on leaving at 5:30 with our coworker. At 4 AM I get this text from Sam:

“Hey man, again I'm sorry, but this was bothering me and woke me up so I went through all my messages and I'm pretty sure there was a text to you that never sent asking if you were cool with _ being on the trip. It's still not the explicit asking for permission for her to stay with you that you're looking for, but that's partially what I was trying to ask. I'm not trying to justify myself, because I'm still in the wrong here, but I think that partially explains the origin of the miscommunication”

I’m jolted, and respond back with: “I appreciate the follow-up. Thank you for looking into it. Do you mean never sent as in not delivered or a message you thought you sent out?”

He hasn’t clarified what he meant.

AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 if I say I don’t want to pay my friend back?,"Me and my friend were meant to be going to London this weekend. She booked tickets for an experience. I booked the hotel and my train tickets. 

She’s now texted me and said she can’t go because of the train strikes. I understand but im annoyed because I am £310 down. I’m working on getting refunds. 

She’s now saying I need to send her £40 to cover the tickets she bought, even though she’s the one who’s cancelled. 

I’ve been texting her for weeks to try and get things sorted and she’s avoided me, I have the feeling she’s made other plans. AITA if I don’t pay her back?",AmItheAsshole
 for not attending my friends bachelorette party?,"AITA?

One of my friends I've known for almost 10 years is getting married in September.  She got engaged late last year, and in January, asked me to be apart of her bridal party, and of course I said yes. I'm so happy for her and I want to be there for her big day. 

Our invitations came in the mail to find out they are getting married out of the country. It was a shock to me since all of her family and friends are in America. I'm not in the best financial situation right now, I just moved states and so I'm working still on building my savings back up. The wedding is towards the end of the year, so I started saving all my cash tips.

Fast forward to March; The MOH started planning the bachelorette party, which I was very excited for. A couple weeks later, she sent the itinerary, with the dates being in May. It was 3 days in a pretty expensive city, I figured since it was 12 of us that the air bnb couldn't possibly be that much. (Side note, for context, there were 3 restaurants on the itinerary with an entree being around $50-$60, a private at home brunch with a chef, and a few more pricey activities) After totaling everything up, the bachelorette party would cost around $1100 per person for 3 days including the restaurants, airbnb, and activities. (not including travel costs, groceries for the airbnb, outfits we were told to buy, etc.)  

The bachelorette party is next month. I told my friend last month after finding out the costs that there was absolutely no way I'd be able to come. I feel terrible for not being able to attend.

With the cost of the bachelorette party, getting my passport, paying for a place to stay in this country, food, and plane tickets.. I chose to attend the wedding obviously, because I can't go to both. 

AITA for not attending my friends bachelorette party?",AmItheAsshole
 if I complain about my neighbour’s new fence?,"I share a boundary fence with a neighbour. The neighbour is adding a second fence for more privacy. It will be supported by the existing fence.

They are also raising the height of the fence above the 2m limit for planning permission. They have added a low deck that means they will look over our fence without the extra height.

Although I appreciate the extra privacy on some level, I am not happy with my neighbours plans - I’m worried the weight of the extra wood will impact the existing fence and I don’t like the breach of planning. I worry it will cause me issues when I sell my home.

The existing fence is jointly owned. I worry I could be the arsehole here because we have a hanging basket on one post adding weight and I added a few wires to shape a rose. My husband also thinks I am being a Karen…

Am I being unreasonable to push back on my neighbours plans?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my GF's brother come to poker?,"My (22m) GF's brother (17m) sometimes comes to the poker games me and some friends have and we like hanging, but this time we're meeting outside on my friend's porch so we can smoke cigars, so i told him it wasn't cool if he came cuz everyone going to be smoking.

He is pissed AF and says he could go but not smoke with everyone, but he still breathes it ya know.  I dunno if he be around tobacco smoke other times or not, but i dont feel right putting him in that position and having him consume tobacco when he underage.",AmItheAsshole
", skipping friends birthday","For context, my friends birthday is at the end of May. I am one of her bridesmaids in her upcoming wedding this June. 

We had all just gotten back from the bachelorette which costed me 2k and time off work last week. The bridal shower is this coming weekend which I had to take time off work for again and I'll be paying for a portion of the shower. She's also doing a birthday dinner/lunch 2 weeks after the bridal shower which again requires time off work and obviously paying for my bill and a portion of hers. Then 2 weeks after her birthday is her wedding which again I will be taking time off work for.

I love her dearly as a friend but me being the only single person in the group, I'm finding this month very stressful financially. I dont have another person to help out financially whereas everyone else in the group has a partner. 

AITA if I bow out of her birthday celebration? I'm attending all the wedding celebrations.",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my grandma if she can release some of the rooms she booked for my wedding weekend?,"AITA for asking my grandma to release some of the rooms she booked for my wedding weekend?This is my first time posting anything on Reddit so please ignore any mistakes I am also using mobile. I just needed to get this out there because I’m being bombarded with messages from my mom about how awful I am. 
So my fiancé and I are getting married in September of this year (2024). We have been planning this for over a year now and everything has been booked. The venue is a small place in the woods with some cabins to rent for either the wedding weekends or just camping in general. The issue is that there aren’t very many cabins/ rooms available. 
My grandma has some minor health issues that require her to use the restroom more frequently than most people. So she asked that when we get the code to book the cabins/rooms that we also give her the code so she can book herself a room. I made sure we booked the suites for our wedding party first before giving her the code. 
When I gave her the code to book I specifically said “I have the code for you to book your room. Please only book a room for yourself because Fiancé’s family is all out of state and will need to also book some of the rooms/cabins.” The venue is only 20 minutes from my family that I have invited. 
She booked 4 rooms. 
We didn’t bring anything up straight away because we were honestly just flabbergasted that she would do that when we specifically asked her to book just one room. 
Well we talked to her today to ask because the officiant tried to book and all the rooms are already sold out. So we called my grandma. Explained the situation how it is. We can’t get married without the officiant. Can you please release some of the rooms? Her response was “well we can just not go to the wedding at all then.” We explained to her that’s not what we wanted, but we need a room for the officiant. (The other 3 rooms were for my adult cousins who also live just 20 minutes away from the venue.) she said she didn’t want my cousins to drive in the dark. (They are adults and can make that decision themselves. All of them are in their early- late 20s.) 
The conversation ended with us saying if she feels like she doesn’t want to come anymore because of us asking for her to release some of the rooms then we won’t beg her to come. 
Now she has told all of her kids that I was super mean, rude, and an asshole for asking her to give up the rooms. Making it seem like we don’t want her or the cousins there. 
We never said she couldn’t keep HER room. We also never demanded she give up the rooms either. We were literally asking and trying to get her to see our dilemma of the officiant not being able to get a room. 
Ever since the call earlier, my mom has been calling me every name in the book for “yelling” At her mom. Even though my fiancé and I never once raised our voices and just calmly talked about everything with her. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend I don't like their gf?,"I have a best friend Clara. Since I started dating my gf Sam 3 years ago, whenever I wanna meet Clara, we hang out mostly with Sam, as she usually stays at mine. Clara never expressed any bad feelings about it and they even hang out without me.

When Clara's ldr gf Alex came to our city, we decided to meet her in my apartment. Clara warned Alex is shy, I said no problem. Sam had to come 2 hours later. The first 2 hours were extremely long. I was the one making the small talk, which is hard for me, so I was desperately waiting for Sam to come and take my place as the conversation-pusher.

When Sam came, she made Alex all the compliments, Alex replied ""I know"". The evening became a disaster. After another round of small talk, Sam started asking Alex general questions about her, Alex said she needs more specific questions. Sam specified the questions, Alex replied ""Why do you need this info?"". She never asked anything back, then said ""I don't want to answer any questions"". Girl, the whole meeting is about us getting to know you, but ok.

Sam started talking about something else, like languages, cultures and history. Clara and I were laughing, having fun. We paid attention not to make Alex participate in the conversation unless she wanted to say something. Alex interrupted mid-sentence saying she's bored in a very rude voice. Sam smiled uncomfortably and asked her to suggest any topic she'd like to discuss. Alex said she has nothing to suggest. The room went silent. Sam suggested games and activities that don't require us talking to each other, to which Alex said she has no desire to play. I am all for sitting silently and relaxing, but with friends, not with a rude stranger at my place who I'm supposed to meet and know. She didn't look shy in the slightest, just plain arrogant.

At this point I was praying they leave already, because we just sat in awkward silence, occasionally Alex saying something about Genshin to Clara. Sam made an excuse and made them leave.

The next day, Clara texted me asking what do I think about Alex and the nice evening we had. I replied honestly, pretty much saying everything I wrote here, telling her I have no idea how to interact with her girlfriend and would like some sort of instruction in case we meet again. She just replied she had no idea I was uncomfortable, and been distant ever since.

I miss Clara and feel I might be TA for outright telling the truth, but realistically I think it's Alex who's supposed to apologize to me and Sam. AITA for telling the truth? AITA for not wanting to hang out with Alex despite us often hanging out with Sam?

Edit: About not wanting to hang out: in direct translation I said ""I don't understand what to do and say, and if I ever have to meet her again, I would like to somehow fix this, probably some instruction""",AmItheAsshole
 homeless people ,"So I recently moved into a new apartment and there's a homeless girl that sits on my porch 24/7 due to this being her boyfriend's former apartment and she feels safe on the porch. 

So I told her she's more than welcome to sit there if she needs a place to decompress as long as she keeps the porch clean doesn't do Do drugs and is taking her medication but she trashes my porch every single day isn't a consistent state of talking to herself due to her schizophrenia and thinking she can change colors of cars and screaming about paw patrol.

 So I've asked her to leave almost every single day for the past 3 weeks and she is refusing to listen. So I called the mental health crisis unit They came out and they told me there's nothing they can do because she has a psychiatrist due to her schizophrenia. She is just not taking her medication but she doesn't want her hurt herself So I ended up calling the cops on her get her off the property aita",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to move out of my boyfriends house?,"My boyfriend (20m) and i (19f) have been together for almost a year now and living together for a little over 6 months.

Here's the problem. My boyfriend has a very controlling family. It's one of those situations where everyone lives within 30 minutes of each other. We currently live 10 minutes from his parents house, are renting from his brother, and we can see his sisters house from ours, which is.... interesting. They're always up in our business and saying stuff they shouldn't. It's been suffocating to say the least. 

I recently dyed my hair red because it's something I've wanted to do for a bit. I have some of his family on Facebook so made sure not to post so that they wouldn't see it and cause problems. I kind of forgot that sister lives next door and I guess she saw me outside with my new hair and went gossiping to the rest of the family. A few days after that my boyfriends dad (we'll call him David) came by the house for some things and made a joke about me dipping myself in a vat of dye. It was funny enough, so I laughed and kept minding my business

A few minutes later David calls me over and says he needs to talk to me. The first thing he said was ""You know I'm always straightforward about things..."" He then went on to say that he didn't know what was going on with me, but that whatever it was, this color didn't look good on me. he said that natural hair always looks better on women and that I don't look as attractive anymore with red hair. I said ""Well I like it, and that's all that matters"" and started walking away while he yelled ""oh come on, don't say that! They told me you were sensible!!"" I literally just went inside the house and slammed the door.

Similar things have happened before. At easter dinner David was hinting at what our sexual life was like and asking me if I was making sure my boyfriend was out early and in late so we couldn't get up to anything ""bad"". I replied that we both work early and what happens when we were in OUR OWN HOME shouldn't matter. He then turned to my boyfriend and went ""oh good you're making your woman work!! That's really good."" 

My boyfriend hasn't spoken up for me any of these times and I've talked to him about it and his excuse was that if he yells at his dad, we lose everything. 

This is when I find out that the property he ""owns"" isn't in his name yet and he only has his job because of his dad. In addition we rent from his brother, which I already knew, but putting everything together made it feel worse. 

I told him if things got any worse I would have to move out because I feel trapped and I didn't fight for independence from my own abusive and controlling parents just to end up in another similar situation as an adult. I told him he was welcome to leave with me but that I would eventually need to leave regardless. I am seriously considering moving away from everything so I can breathe and live life without someone looking over my shoulder. AITA for wanting to do this? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for how I reacted after my BF cancelled our date?,"Me and my BF have being going through a difficult time in our relationship, which culminated on me finding some unfaithful messages on his phone.
We broke up and got back together recently.
I have never felt like a priority in our relationship, as I was always the one planning, rescheduling to fit his needs, doing acts of service and bending over backwards to make it work.
Now that we got back together, to make an effort, he invited me to see an exposition of a movie franchise we are big fans of and that we bonded over in the beggining of our relationship. I was really excited, because we have not done anything like that in a long time, and it was something that showed that he still cared.
His mom will be getting a very simple surgical procedure in a month, and they haven't had some alone time between the two of them in a while. So today he texted me asking if he could take his mom, I thought he meant the 3 of us would go and I would be totally OK with it, but he was actually cancelling our plans to go with her alone.
I was upset because it was the first time in a long time he was going to take me to do something different, and now I will have to go by myself to the expo. It is important to clarify that this is basically a one time thing, as it is the first time it will ever be held where we live and I don't know if I'll ever have the opportunity to go again.
I told him I would be totally ok with him taking her out to dinner, taking her to see a movie she likes, go literally anywhere else by themselves and cancelling on anything else with me. But that this specific thing meant a lot to me and that I didn't feel good about him cancelling.
He told me to f*ing grow up, and that I should understand.
So, AITA for being upset over my BF cancelling on me?",AmItheAsshole
" for being truthful with my friends, when telling them I won’t go on a weekend away because I don’t want to talk about marriage / babies for three days?","I (27F), have a group of female friends (8 of us), we have been friends for over a decade, since school. Now we don’t live in the same place, we meet up a couple of times a year for a weekend in an Airbnb. This use to be a weekend of good food, drinks, hot tub etc.

I am content with my life at the moment, I am single, dating and I don’t know if I would like children - but in the event I did I know I wouldn’t want one soon.

Around 5 of my friends are either married or in very long term relationships, of these 5 two either have a baby or are pregnant. I will be seeing all of my friends this year for various wedding / friend / baby events.

I have been invited on this years girls trip, I have said I can’t come. I didn’t originally provide a reason.

When queried, in person by my friend, who is pregnant - I told her the truth. I am not going because it’s a massive financial expense, for three days where we only talk about people’s upcoming engagements / weddings / babies. I have a lot going on, but I feel a lot of my friends do not show an interest unless I talk about some one I’m dating. I also last time, listened to one of my friends talk about her breastfeeding plans, with vengeance, for over an hour. She is not pregnant or trying. Truthfully it’s boring, and it feels dismissive.

It’s also a really expensive way to feel bad about myself.

I made clear when telling my friend this, that I am thrilled for them all living the lives they want, but maybe it’s not the weekend for me at the moment. Meaning it feels like the group has two distinct life stages, I’m in the minority and it focuses on one stage.

My friend has since told me, she’s really hurt I am not excited for her, or our other friends. I responded saying, I evidently was (from other actions), but I just didn’t think the trip was for me. I do have numerous other things on, and to fit this in both in the calendar and financially is a struggle. I just want to add for this friend specifically I have gone on three weekends away for her wedding, and I am flying to go her baby shower - all the in the last two years. I have not asked her, nor has she wanted to fly to see me for anything in the last two years.

So my query is AITA for being truthful with the reason why I can’t go?

  
**UPDATE**, thank you all for your responses and comments. Just a few things to note in response to some of the general themes of response.   
1. I DO show an interest in their weddings, engagements, babies and baby plans. I am excited for them, I text about it, I ask for updates, I go to AND help plan events for these things. My issue is, three days of talking about this like it’s the only topic of substance is not fun, especially when I don’t feel an interest is reciprocated to me on my life.   
2. I have spoken to one of my other friends invite on the trip (who is also not at the baby stage of life), she is also not going on the trip, and said she is not attending for the same reason.   
3. The friend I expressed this too has apologised for her initial reaction, and is still trying to convince me to come. I am not going to go, but I am hoping she at least considers what I have shared.   
4. I do have other friends, in the city I live in, and they are a joy to be in the company of. Maybe this is because we became friends as adults, and have more similar lifestyles, who knows. 

Finally - some comments about me being jealous, hating myself / my life etc. To confirm dear strangers on the internet, I am content - thank you for the concern though. ",AmItheAsshole
 for getting into an argument with my friend over the movie Moana,"I was in my 5th period class when Moana’s powers were brought up. I was under the impression that the ocean was a completely different entity, one that Moana hod no power over. But my friend said that she read an article written by “Disney employees” that talked about how she and the water was connected, therefore Moana could actually control the water at her whim. I immediately started trying to prove this wrong by offering up both Google and clips from the actual movie. 
Google says that the water spirit acts as a friend, and that Moana cannot actually control it. She has the ability to talk to the water and ask it to do things, but the water doesn’t need to comply. My friend said that Google could be changed by anyone so the fact that it said that didn’t mean anything. I decided to just let that one go. 
When I showed her the clips I used the ones where she was about to drown, where she asked the water for help with finding Maui, and when she asked the water to part to allow Te Ka to come to her. If she was able to control the water, why not create an air bubble to keep herself from drowning as she tried to break her foot out from under the coral? Why would she need to ask the ocean to help her if she could just do it herself and why would she knock herself out? Why not part the water herself? 
The movie makes it extremely clear from the very beginning that the ocean is a separate entity that has its own thoughts and can make its own decisions. Wouldn’t she just be high fiveing herself after Maui was stabbed with the blow dart? 
Despite all the proof I gave her, she still refused to believe that that it wasn’t Moana controlling the water. Moana’s power is to talk with the ocean, not to control it. Three of my other friends also agreed with me that Moana had no power over the ocean but she still didn’t believe us. 
By this point, we had been arguing so long that we were at lunch and we were both yelling at each other. This continued until she snapped and told me that, that was what she believed and I should mind my own business, and to keep my mouth shut if I didn’t agree with it. That basically ended the argument but me being petty, I couldn’t leave well enough alone and had to have the stupid last word. I said, “Fine, believe what you want to believe, I know what’s fact. Sorry, but it’s like arguing with a flat earther.” 
Neither of use talked for the rest of lunch. I feel bad about saying that last line, but it was kind of true. All I was trying to do was tell her what has been cannonly confirmed but no matter the proof, she didn’t believe me. Am I the Asshole?",AmItheAsshole
H For telling my boyfriend to stop being a mama's boy,"Sorry for my broken English, it's not my primary language but I know basic grammar and spelling. 

For some context, I(23F) am with my boyfriend (24M) James, for a little over 3 years now. Started dating during the pandemic when I was in my 1st year in college and he was in his 2nd year. Now, I'm still in my third year and he graduated a year ago. I currently don't have a job or any source of income at the moment, so does he. I do some freelance on the side to get by for my wants, and sometimes his. Oh, and by the way, we don't live together. I still live with my grandma and he lives with his parents. 

The thing is, a few months back, James was supposed to start a job that his mom and his mom's friend offered him to do. I don't know what exactly the job is, but he was telling me how good the pay is. Of course, I was excited for him as he was to start earning for himself. Time to time I kept asking James about his job , and he would always tell me that he only needed to finish this task and he would start working. Well, a few months went by and still nothing. James now would keep on complaining about how he doesn't have money and is to broke to give me anything. I told him that maybe he should start working for a part-time job. James said that he would just get his engineering license (which is on December) as it would be easier for him to get work offered again by his mom's friends. I told him that I am skeptical and he shouldn't be relying on his mom too much, especially for his jobseeking. He got irritated and said ""At this age, it's harder to get a job if you don't have any connections"" I get his point but I'm so tired of him clinging himself too much to his mom. Now he's always dismissing me whenever I ask him about job hunting and would rather not talk to me. AITAH?",AmItheAsshole
H for wanting to keep my divorced parents in contact?,"AITAH for wanting to keep my divorced parents in contact? 

For starters Me (19) has Epilepsy &amp; i can have a seizure at any moment. My dad (43) &amp; my mom (41) got divorced in 2021. The divorce was super ugly &amp; my parents had each other blocked, no contact. my mom cheated on my dad which caused the divorce. i was living in the same town as my dad then so i wasn’t worried about me having a seizure &amp; worrying something would go wrong everyone was close. fast forward to last year. My mom &amp; dad finally unblocked each other &amp; are on good terms. no flirting nothing inappropriate (i’ve read the text messages). my dads new wife (26) doesn’t like the fact my mom &amp; dad are in contact. his new wife freaked &amp; made my dad block my mom. I know love 2 hrs 30 mins away from my dad &amp; my mom is w/ me on the weekends. i asked my dads new wife POLITELY if he could unblock my mom for my safety &amp; i felt more comfortable they were in contact for the sake of my health issues. she did not like what i had to say. i tried to say my side &amp; all she was doing was bashing on my mom &amp; wouldn’t listen to me. i didn’t say very nice things i know i shouldn’t of said the things i did but i was furious. she flipped out on me &amp; told the whole town my mom was trying to get back w/ my dad when in reality the whole thing is about my safety she is taking this whole thing way too far. i called my dad to see what he had to say &amp; he’s taking her side… when he knows the texts he told my how good my mom has been lately. but he just sides w/ his wife no matter what. he said he didn’t believe that it was me wanting this not my mom. later that day i come across a Tiktok that his wife had made saying how personal boundaries are so hard to set &amp; just went off on what had happened. the whole thing is wrong she started a whole big fight when in reality i was just worried about my own safety.. &amp; on top of that she’s 26. she’s a child &amp; sure acts like it.

Am i the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 - For resigning as coach over a friend request,"First off, I am very fortunate, I have a great job that provides me a ton of time off. I also have a couple kids who I really enjoy doing things with. This has led me to volunteer alot, like 6+ hrs a week, this includes coaching multiple teams, chairing 2 school PTAs, and some charity work.

This post is around coaching, as eveyone who has kids in sports knows there is always a challenge on getting coaches. To coach a house league sport at my childs age it's usually about 4hrs a week commitment. 

Recently, a league was having challenges getting coaches (I was looking at taking the summer off of coaching so i didnt volunteer), then I started seeing emails looking for coaches, and in chatting with some parents ""in the know"" they stated the league was looking at turning kids away if they didn't get more coaches, or making the teams carry ridiculously large rosters, I suckered it up  messages the league and said i would volunteer.

My comment to the league was, I have no problem coaching, but im hoping they can help me out by putting a couple of my childs friends on the team as well, for reference the two friends are not good at this sport, one has never played before and the other was ranked 1 (out of 5) in skills, so them on the team wouldn't have made us a power house or anything like that.

The league didn't commit just responded with a ""we will do out best"", the league policy is they will try to accommodate 1 friend request, so I knew there was no garentee here.

We got the league rosters over the weekend and none of the three kids were on the same team, so ok that sucks, I send out the typical coaches first contact email and I get a response:

Thank you so much we are excited that the league was able to put child 1, child 2 and  child 3 all together they will have so much fun this year!

It was a typical, I got your email response, but it kind of rubbed me the wrong way with the league. I did message the league to see if there was anything I could do, there response was, ""we apologize, but the rosters are already set, we do try to accommodate friend request, unfortunately, in this case we were unable to do so"". 

Now to today, a friend (who is commissioner of another sports league intown) reached out and says he needs coaches, and asked would I be intrested. He went on to say he thought of me because 4 of my childs friends registered and he could put them all on the same team!

There is no way I could coach both sports, if I register my child with the second sport he would miss about half the first sports games. 

Also, my child is showing alot less intrest in the first sport now the he has no friends on the team.

Both leagues have 150 to 200 children registered for them.

So WIBTA if I decided to resign from coaching the first sport 2 weeks before the season starts, and coach the second sport because they are willing to put more friends on my childs team, even though I never got a garentee the first sport they could meet the friend request.",AmItheAsshole
 for not promoting my sister's business?,"Hi, I'm not an active user of Reddit, but I've heard about this subreddit and wanted to ask if I'm truly the bad guy here. You can read below why I don't want to ask anyone from my family. Also, please excuse me for any grammar/wording errors; it's not my first language.  
  
I (26, F) am an influencer in my country (I'd say I'm in the top 15-30). The most of my target audience are teen girls, and I do a lot of fashion/makeup/lifestyle content. My younger sister (25, F) - let's call her Hannah - is a great cook. Cooking has been her passion since we were both kids, and our family really enjoyed her dishes, so it's obvious that we were all excited when two months ago she announced that she's opening her own restaurant (she kept it as a secret for a few months). I immediately offered that I can use my social media to help her promote it.  
  
A disclaimer: Even though I get a lot of deal offers now, I only choose the ones that truly appeal to me (like only products that I could use); I'm trying to avoid all the scams, products, places, events that are doubtful, etc. I just know that my audience is really young, and I know that I have sometimes too much influence over them.  
  
Four days ago, Hannah finally opened her restaurant. I wasn't able to make it to the opening, which already caused some family drama because I was on vacation then (I'd booked and paid for it before Hannah announced that she's opening her restaurant). Yesterday, I finally made it to the restaurant. When I opened the menu, the first thing I saw was that the dishes were a bit overpriced for a newly opened business, especially since there are a few well-known restaurants nearby in our city. I decided to talk to Hannah later and advise her to lower prices to encourage people to come here and then change them later when the restaurant is better known. I ordered a basic dish (that Hannah made a lot of times at our home) from the menu and was a bit disappointed that I had to wait for it an hour and a half, even though I was the only client there, but at least I knew it would taste great. Except that it didn't. When Hannah came to my table, I asked her if she changed the recipe, and she excitedly told me that she managed to find really cheap ingredients so she would earn more. Then she asked me what pictures I will post. At this point, I was done. I said to her that I can't promote it now and she needs to upgrade the service and quality of food before I can sincerely recommend it. She started yelling at me that I'm ruining her business and I have no idea what I'm talking about since I don't have a real job. Since then, our parents and her have bombarded me with text messages saying that I'm narcissistic, lost a sense of reality, and if I don't help her now, they don't want to talk to me ever again. So, would I be an asshole if I stand my ground?  
  
",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my baby’s father out of the hospital room?,"I (19F) just had a baby 1 day ago. His father (21M) and I have not been together since November due to him cheating. He’s had a couple other girlfriends since then and is still with one of them currently, but he still did go to most of my appointments with me. 

2 days ago when I went into labor I called him, he came to pick me up to bring me to the hospital and he had his entire TV and playstation in the backseat, with no car seat for the baby. I told him he is not bringing that to the hospital and he told me if I want him to be there for our son’s birth he needs something to do to pass the time. We argued about it almost the entire ride to the hospital, but he ended up not bringing it in. 

I was only in labor for about 2 hours before I gave birth, he was there the entire time. A couple hours after I gave birth, my dad and sister came to visit and he left as the hospital has a 2 visitor only rule. I told him while they’re here visiting for him to go bring his TV back home and install the car seat so when they discharge us we will be all set. After a few hours my family leaves, and I text him to tell him he is welcome to come back if he would like. 

Around 20 minutes later he’s walking back into my room, carrying his TV. We start arguing about how I already told him he is not having that in my room and he starts yelling at me saying that I don’t make the rules and that I should be grateful that he wants to be there for our son but instead I’m trying to make him miserable. I told him he can either bring the TV back to his car or he can leave, he said he has a right to spend time with his son. 

I called my nurse into the room and told her I want him to leave, so they ended up kicking him out. He yelled at me the entire time he was leaving saying that I’m kicking him out of his son’s life and that he will be going to court for custody. He has texted me since saying that I’m taking his rights away from him and there is no rules that he couldn’t bring his own TV and game system while he spends time at the hospital. 

AITA for making him choose between the TV or leaving?",AmItheAsshole
 For bugging my SO to get a different job?,"My (31M) SO (32F) works at a vet.  On paper she's in charge of boarding but actually does basically everything else too, and is now up front doing reception.  It's a very stressful work environment, she works longer hours than I do, but gets paid 25% less than me with no benefits.  Our insurance is through my work, along with pension, IRA, and all the other goodies.  I take care of the mortgage, utilities, insurance, and phone bill.  She (mostly) handles groceries and pet food/vet bills.  She has a LOT of pets.  I don't mind taking care of the majority of the bills, but she's also talking about wanting a new car.  Between the stress, the low pay, and barely being able to afford to drive to her current workplace, I've been suggesting she look at a different job if she wants a new car.  I've told her I have no problem if she wants to get one, but I'm not going to help her pay for it.  Now, whenever she brings it up, I ask her if she has a plan to afford it, and sometimes look up jobs that are more in her field/degree.  While I don't think she's upset I won't pay for the car, she clams up any time I suggest a different occupation as a potential solution.  AITA for bringing it up?  Will answer any clarifying questions as allowed.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to offer a weekend to my mum side family?,"Hi all

I need to vent and catch other points of view.
So I'm going back to my country to visit my family (from my mother side) never came back since I was 8y old (31y now) but we kept contact all this year's.
I'm taking my son and husband to meet all of them, and we are planning to rent a house and have a weekend there with all the family together in once.
My husband first though it was a good ideia, and suggested we could pay the rest of the stay. I thought it was a good idea as well, I never went back, really want to pay the rest, to show love and appreciation for my aunt's and because as a tradition once we married we didn't accomplish with the mandatory steps.
But it's not a obligation is just something that is important to me, but at this point my husband changed his mind and refuses to do it.
Now I Don't know what to say to him, but I'm a bit mad.

TIA",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my camera on zoom when I’m studying with a friend?,"I planned a study sess with a friend on zoom mainly to be able to use the whiteboard feature to help him with working out problems for calculus. He had his camera on and kept telling me to put my camera on because he didnt want to talk to a blackscreen. I looked like a hot fried cheeto, and I felt self concious about myself on camera, so I told him that I didnt feel comfortable turning my camera on because of that reason. But then it turned into an over an hour conversation of him getting frustrated at me for not turning my camera on. All I wanted to do was study. Now I feel like an asshole. AITA",AmItheAsshole
 if I told my friend to leave their partner?,"AITA if I tell my friend to end their engagement ? 

My friend who I have not known very long asked me to be in the wedding. I am absolutely gutted but I don’t know how to tell them their partner is dodgy. If I say anything, I don’t want them to think I do not support their lgbtq lifestyle, but it is not about that at all, their partner simply is terrible. 

The wedding is coming, and one of the other friends in the wedding party and I have had a chat. we are not sure if it is our place to say anything considering how little time we have known our friend, but it is apparent that they need to end it with their partner and are blind to the problems or maybe ignoring them, but we can see from the outside that it’s toxic and rough to watch. We think that as friends it would be best to try to stop our friend from having to get divorced in the future, but we fear that we will alienate them and cause more unforeseeable problems.

My friends family is not approving according to their brother and just getting along with it, and the partners family is just chuffed to see their child supported by their partner

It is clear that their partner is extremely immature whiny and infantile for being much older than my friend, does not pay for any part of their share of anything, and has seemed to wiggle out of all responsibility (like quitting work and letting my friend pay for everything) as soon as they noticed that my friend would take the lead on every aspect of their lives from every small detail you can imagine- from meals to paying bills to appointments to going to the market doing their school getting general things done and I see my friend running in circles, their light has left, they have lost themselves taking care of their fully able partner. And when I say my friend does everything for them... bloody hell…  

We have seen many times My friend’s partner wont do the simplest thing for them, and we watched our friend laugh it off after having their messages read and calls ignored by the lazy bones partner... I am trying to be vague on examples but the specifics of how little the partner does for the friend would astonish any old bloke 

We recently met some of our friend's old friends from uni who are also in the wedding party at their shower, and even more red flags came out. Our friend is an outstanding human being and deserves a better life than this

I really don't think our friend would cancel the wedding this close for many reasons, but it is hard to watch them make the biggest mistake of their life and not try to warn them. My family advised me to not say anything as people must make their own choices, but I don't think they understand the depth of it

Should we tell our friend and risk losing them? What if they feel betrayed by us discussing the matter? especially when we are almost certain they won't cancel this soon?  they always avoid our prying questions and Insist things are fine when we hint. do we chat or let them make their own choices?",AmItheAsshole
 for not going to my father’s funeral?,"Recently my father died because of a car crash, but I have not spoke to him in over 2 years since he got a new girlfriend after my mother died. Both of my brothers continued to speak with him. He constantly tried to reach out to reconnect with me and my two children, but I told him I am not willing to be around him if he’s going to continue to disrespect my dead mother. Despite me and my father not talking, I was still close to my brothers and the rest of my family.

His funeral was last Thursday, and me nor my husband or children went. I have absolutely no reason to honor someone who could disrespect my mother the way he has. Now neither of my brothers will speak to me, and say that they can’t believe I could be so selfish, but I can’t believe they can hate our mother so much to show up to that funeral. I told them I don’t want any part of their fucked up ideas of family no more and we have not spoke since. Both of my brothers have children as well, and my children were close with them but now I’m not sure if they’ll ever see their cousins again. My husband says that I’m doing what I have to do to keep our family safe, but I can’t help to think I might be an asshole for ruining my children’s relationships with their cousin.

EDIT:
Since a lot of people are asking, my mother got diagnosed with leukemia in July of 2020 and died January 2022. Around October of 2021 her health was getting worse and she was now staying in the hospital. During this time, my father started hanging out with his now girlfriend, but said that they were just friends and she was helping him cope with his sick wife. After my mom died in January 2022, he made it official with her on Valentine’s day 2022, exactly one month after my mother died.",AmItheAsshole
 because I refuse to invite my friend back on vacation?,"Okay, so I haven't seen my friend in years, as we both moved out of state from where we formed our friendship. So I invited her to join me on a stateside vacation at a fairly local beach resort town for two weeks. 

Usually, my days at the beach are mostly chill and relaxing, and I just walk the beach picking up shells, hang out on my towel and read, etc. Well my friend joins me and practically ruins my vacation because she brought her laptop and worked the entire time. 

So, setting the scene, we're in a smallish condo and when she was on her laptop working, making phone calls and video calls, I'm having to tiptoe around the space I paid for. Further, she brought her Roku streaming stick, and hogged the remote for the entire two weeks. 

Further still, she's triggered by damn near everything. I'm talking general themes of movies, colors of coffee cups, etc. It was ridiculous! If I even hear the word triggered again, then I'll be triggered. 

My vacations are everything to me. I don't have a husband or kids, and I look forward to them all year. I hate to lose her friendship but I didn't really relax on my vacation and I don't want to invite her back even though she expects another invitation.",AmItheAsshole
 if I tell my best friend what I honestly think of his girlfriend?,"I (26M) have a friend who is also my co-worker and former roommate. We both work at a mechanic shop as technicians, when he first started there he was living with his parents still and really wanted to experience some form of independence. We became great friends quickly, and he inquired about renting me and my wife’s furnished basement out and being our roommate, as well as helping him learn independence and living on his own. It was a good arrangement and we charged him almost nothing so that he could save.

He dated a girl during his residence here that was not the most well intentioned partner one could ask for, I never spoke on it as it wasn’t my place. But one day they argued heavy enough that they separated, during a conversation after the fact he asked me to tell him what I really thought of her, and I did. He seemed upset that I gave a different answer than how I had respectfully treated her and their relationship, and asked me to give my honest opinion up front about any other girl he dates.

Enter new GF (25F? I don’t even remember how old she is. Just that she’s older than him and younger than me) that he meets on a dating app. From the get go, I could tell something was off. In the first week he would leave to see her regularly after we got off work, often spending the night at her place so I had never even met her. The first time he brings her over, she avoids any interaction with me and my wife at any chance she could. She wasn’t in our home for more than a few hours before they both left for her place. After two weeks of dating her, he informs me that he is planning to move in with her. I dig into it a bit more and learn he also agreed to start paying half her bills (more than he pays us by a long shot) and get concerned. Without stating directly how stupid that sounded, he was already showing signs of being upset with my reaction so I didn’t press. He moves in with her, and then it gets much worse.

At first it seemed fine, then I hear they argue a lot from him at work, then after a month they are engaged and talking about having a baby together. Then he starts missing work much more frequently, and to now, the heavy part. He informs me that he stopped taking his bi-polar medication, because his girlfriend (who is a CNA) has convinced him he is fine without it. He is not, he switches moods erratically and for no given reasons, and is a dark place to see him in. I want to tell him that his relationship sounds super unhealthy and downright dangerous at this point, but I fear it will cost us our friendship and achieve nothing.

WIBTA for telling him how I really feel?",AmItheAsshole
 if I told my professor how much my teammates actually contributed?,"I am a senior in a mechanical engineering program. Our largest project is 2 semesters long. This group project is for design and the group consists of 4 people. Me, Lauren, Rachel, and Jack. Rachel and Jack got married last semester and Lauren also got married. Additionally, I am partners with Rachel in another class, which I will refer to as the small project. 

With the situation I am in now, either 2 students who do not deserve their degrees get their degrees as planned, or I potentially ruin the next 6 months of their lives by delaying their graduation a semester. I am having a hard time finding the line between being fair and being an asshole. 

For the design project last semester, when Rachel and Jack severely under-contributed, I blamed it on the fact that a wedding is stressful to plan and have. I thought this semester would be different; otherwise, I would have asked them not to be in my group anymore. 

For the design project I have done the vast majority of the work. Lauren has also contributed heavily. Throughout this semester Jack has gotten increasingly condescending and rude. If you do not love his idea he will not only raise his voice and be demeaning, if he is upset enough he throws a tantrum like a child, including stomping his feet and other immature actions. 

For the design project, many schedules and project divisions were created. Though at the beginning of the semester, they were equal, as Rachel and Jack did not make their contributions, their original larger assignments were broken up, and parts were re-allocated. Eventually, Lauren and I completed the majority of the project. 

By the end of the project, I asked Rachel and Jack for their contributions (for the 50th time), and they barely had anything. I  then did their contributions for the design that night. 

During this night, however, I did not respond to Rachel's text messages for 4 hours, as she and I had been rude. She then decided to go to our professor who is over our small project, and say that she could not work with me since I do not communicate. 

Not only is this bad for my academic reputation, but that professor is also my boss at work. 

The final straw is that when writing the last portions of the paper I saw Rachel's ""contribution"" list. It included many tasks that she simply did not contribute to, or that she barely contributed to and Lauren I completed. 

The issue is that all 4 of us are about to graduate. Either the teacher only takes Lauren and me a little seriously and drops Rachel and Jack's grades down, or he understands the gravity of the situation and fails them, delaying their graduation. Though I would love the satisfaction of their actions having real consequences, I would feel terribly guilty for delaying someone's graduation. They have already paid for their cap and gowns, made graduation plans, and begun their job search. Additionally being a snitch is kind of an asshole move in the first place. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not buying my sisters makeup even though I replaced it?,"My sister (18F) had a lipstick product I really like using. So I did as sister do and borrowed it a lot. However I took it out one night and misplaced it and when she noticed it was gone I owned up to it and said I may have lost it. Her birthday was coming up so I decided to get her a new one as an apology/birthday gift. I didn’t buy the lipstick directly, my uncle paid for it but I picked out the same brand and shade. She got it for her birthday and she was happy that she had it back and we went back to sharing it as usual. 

She recently found the lipstick broken in our bathroom and she got really upset as anyone would. However she got upset at me which I think is not fair. She’s now saying that I owe her another lipstick since I lost her first once but when I tell her that I got her another one and replaced it then she’s says it doesn’t count since I did not pay for it and I owed her a new lipstick or the money it costs. I feel as though she is trying to get me to replace it again when I had nothing to do with the situation this time? Am I in the wrong? What should I do or say to resolve the situation as it is getting heated.",AmItheAsshole
 if i don’t invite a close friend to my birthday party,"im celebrating my birthday soon (a pretty important one) and i don’t want to invite one of my close friends. “jess” has always been very nice and sweet and loving. she sends me texts on every holiday and calls me her best friend and says she misses me and gives me gifts. however i don’t want to invite her to my birthday party. i haven’t hung out with jess for over a year and my current party guest list is full of people she doesn’t know/isn’t close with. i don’t want her to be feeling alone or neglected at the party but i also don’t want to spend my birthday following her around and making sure she’s having fun. 

my friend suggested inviting jess and one of jess’ friends but i…just don’t want to. i don’t like her friends that much and i don’t want to spend my birthday around people who will tire me out. i love jess but she can be a bit much sometimes (i feel really bad for saying that but she’s quite insecure and constantly says things like “oh im probably annoying you ill stop texting” or “you probably don’t even want to be my friend” and i reassure her a lot). 

i just want my birthday to be a lighthearted event and i don’t want jess there. but i also don’t want to hurt her feelings too bad if i make a birthday post or she sees an acquaintance of hers who attended. WIBTA if i don’t invite her?",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling my Mother everything happening in my life,"I (22F) live at home with both my parents (46F and 50M) and younger brother (21M). In the past I have shared in quite a bit of detail how my days were and the general happenings of my life. 

However, in the past few years she has been forcing her opinions on both my brother and I more. Continuously telling us that we have no reason to be depressed or have anxiety as we grew up very comfortable unlike both of our parents childhoods. She also has to know where/who we are going out with when we leave the house. 

This all came to a head last night when she questioned why I didn't inform her I was going on a date a few days prior (she was away so I didn't want to explain to her, and I had told other people where I was going). 

I told her that I don't want her to know everything about my life, and that it would be good to have some privacy for once. 

She has now decided that I am a bitch after spending the night crying, that she is done with me and is refusing to acknowledge my existence.

AITA for wanting to keep this to myself for a little while? I told her about the date a few days later when she was home and it had gone well.",AmItheAsshole
 for not visiting gf on 10th night after going for 9 nights of prayers for her departed grandpa?,"Her grandpa passed. I show up 9 out of 9 nights for evening prayers after a full day of work. I stay there late, go home, start work early, drive 30-40 minutes, and do it all over again. On the 9th and last night of prayers she says don't worry about showing up next night. I call her on my way home the next evening and she asks me to show up because she's feeling sad. I say I won't make it because need to rest. The next day she is upset that I didn't show up. And she implies that I didn't do a good enough job supporting her in her grief because she needed my personal presence. I'm resentful of her reaction after going out of my way to be there.",AmItheAsshole
 for having my bf's cat cremated?,"I'm writing this still in shock and with a broken heart. Today, while my MIL, housekeeper, and grandma were inside my BF's apartment, my FIL was at work, and my BF was just arriving, the apartment exploded and burned down due to a gas leak (apparently). Most of it is unrecognizable. Sadly, his cat, whom we all loved dearly, passed away in the fire.

As the firefighters and police were trying to contain the fire, they managed to rescue the cat. The paramedics attempted to revive him, but to no avail. They handed the cat to me since my MIL and BF were experiencing severe panic attacks. I had my mother come to pick him up and take him to the vet. After they confirmed that there was nothing to do for him, my mother made the decision to have him cremated.

My FIL called later saying he wanted to see the cat, but they had already taken him to the crematorium and don’t disclose information on where that is, this is the first time I let them know. I helped them move all I could from the house after the fire receded and explained to MIL that there was nothing I could do about them seeing the cat (this was a couple of hours after he passed) and left with my BF to help him calm down. Later, FIL arrived at the house some four hours later, expressing his desire to see the cat. I told them again how things happened and helped all I could to move some other things that were left in the apartment. However, MIL and FIL started going on about how that wasn’t my choice to make and how they wanted to see him, berating me for doing my best to help them. Despite my efforts to explain the situation, my in-laws insisted on seeing the cat, becoming increasingly upset. I repeatedly apologized and explained the circumstances, but tensions escalated. I tried to extract myself from the situation several times only to be called back. My BF, in an attempt to defuse the situation, was met with hostility from his parents, who berated him.

The argument escalated to the point where my MIL was screaming and waving a finger close to my face, and my FIL was on the verge of physical violence. MIL's sister, instead of diffusing the situation, added fuel to the fire by insisting on knowing the cat's whereabouts and supporting my in-laws' accusations against me.

Despite my repeated assurances that I didn't have the information they sought, the situation continued to deteriorate. Feeling overwhelmed and threatened, I reached a breaking point. In response to my MIL's aggressive behavior, I confronted her away using my chest and chaos ensued.

Ultimately, my BF and I were asked to leave, and my MIL and sis made repeated threats against me. It's clear they hate me now, and I can't help but feel terrible about the situation. I understand that they were distraught and suffering from their loss, but I did my best to offer support and empathy. It's worth noting that I was especially helpful to MIL since she wasn’t left alone to pick her stuff up. 
 I don’t know it I did right, Reddit, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not paying my sister's tuition anymore??,"
I(24) have siblings (4f, 13f, and 19f), and they have lived with me for 5 years. And our mother is not mentally there. I didn’t even know of my youngest sister's existence until she was 2, and a family member expressed concern for her. That is just to give you an idea of how unstable my mom is.


My 19-year-old sister (let's call her Emmy) went to college in the fall. Financial aid had covered a really heavy fee, and it was left to me to cover about $6,000 after it, which didn’t seem too bad considering how much uni is without it, and I also agreed to give her $50  a month to sustain herself. I agreed to pay that money for my sister because, at the time, I really didn’t want her taking out any loans. I didn’t get the opportunity to go to college. I have been working since I was pretty young, and I had my siblings, so there was no way I could juggle a job that would sustain us and college.


Now my sister called me a few days ago and asked for a $100  to go out with her friend. I said I don’t have it. She got upset and said that the money I gave her was only enough for her sanitary supplies and she could barely eat out (she has a meal plan and a dorm). I told her for the fifth time to get a job. Guess what she told me after that...
She told me I wanted to ruin her college experience because I am uneducated and didn’t get the chance to go to college, so I am placing my anger on her because I am jealous of her.
We even argued for a hot minute, She Even asked me what I was spending my money on, and I asked her if she knew how much she knew it was to maintain our youngest sister. She said she was in school half the day. My younger sister is in daycare; public school is free, daycare is not. I need to work, and in order for me to work, I have to pay an outrageous amount to leave her in a daycare. Now Emmy is somehow unaware of this and is acting like taking care of three of them is a financially easy task. (Mind you, this is not the first time she is being selfish. I asked her to apply to be an RA so she could get free housing, but she didn’t even attempt to apply. (If she got rejected, I wouldn’t be upset, but she did not even turn in an application!!)


After arguing with her that what she said was selfish, I gave in and agreed with her. I told her I was so jealous that I was not going to pay for tuition ever again, and when she comes home, she can get a summer job to maintain herself or take out a loan. I don’t know why I am working myself thin and exhausting myself for someone who doesn’t even appreciate it. I told her I wasn’t joking and was dead serious and hung up. She sent me some apologies after.
Am I being an asshole and cutting her off (she will still always have a place in my home; I am not leaving her homeless), or is she just a teenager and am being childish?   


P.S I understand that me taking in my sibling was my choice but it wouldn’t hurt to receive some thanks for the amount of work I do for them. ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to kick out our room mate?,"My husband and I have a room mate at the moment, as he is a friend of his from a different country and wanted to experience a year in australia here. I always said I didn't want it as we have a 4 years old child and it's strange having someone living with us. Now I am also pregnant and super emotional and depressed about this situation. He is nice but super annoying and dumb sometimes and eats things from our son. And it feels like we have a cockroach creeping around in the kitchen every night after dinner as he scavenges through our food.. My husband constantly has a go at him for doing stupid things and hubby and I are fighting so much about the room mate. I just want him to move out and go. It is wrong to kick him out? My husband thinks I am too sensitive and I HAVE A PROBLEM. He could not just kick him out...
yeah? Is it too much to ask to be a normal family again?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my dad to stop asking questions he doesn't want the answers to even if we are in therapy?,"My dad has me (16m) going to therapy with him.

BG: My parents broke up when I was just a baby. They were never married. Dad wasn't in my life as much when I was really young. He had to work out of town a lot. So I would see him every other weekend and if he could take me for two weeks in the summer he would. Sometimes I went years without seeing him for Christmas too. He only quit the job when he met his wife Lisa when I was 9. I admit it stung a lot. They got married fast (8 months of dating). And I was 10 when Lisa was pregnant for the first time.

My mom ended up having a brain aneurism the day Lisa had their first kid. My dad was told and he said he couldn't make it because Lisa was showing signs of early labor. He wanted me to be brought to them but I refused to go and I told him mom was dying and I needed him. He told me he couldn't leave Lisa or miss seeing the baby be born. But he said he wanted me by his side so come to him. I ended up staying. He didn't come. My mom died the same day his first kid was born. Then he tried to take me to the hospital to see the baby like 12 hours after I lost my mom and he talked non stop about the baby. I told him I'd never forgive him.

And I haven't. Lisa told me I should understand and be happy for them and their daughter that she got to have dad watch her be born. I told her they weren't my problem. She said I had a bratty attitude. I didn't care.

I stopped being close to dad. I never developed a relationship with his daughter or his other son. I don't have a relationship with Lisa. Dad tried therapy a few times. He tried telling me to see the positive. To take joy in the fact I got to come home to a baby sibling. I told him I'd rather have my mom. I told him I wanted my dad with me in the worst moment of my life. But his wife and new kid were more important.

Over the years he told me he wanted things to get better but I didn't. A few months ago Lisa said I should live with my grandparents or my aunt out of state if I feel this way. I said I agreed. Dad thought I was joking and it took him 2 months to realize I was serious and he brought me to therapy.

The questions started. Don't I love them (him, Lisa and the kids), don't I want us to move past all this (no is the answer to both except for maybe loving dad but I'm also angry at him). Then he asked me if I really wanted to move out. Yes. Then it was imagine how Lisa and the kids feel. I don't care. The therapist lets him ask and lets me answer. They never really say much. He asked me if I cared about his other kids at all and I said no. He got so distressed and agitated and I told him to stop asking questions he doesn't want the answers to even if we are in therapy. He told me I'm not even trying. And I told him I had told him that already. He said therapy is about asking questions and working through things and I'm not behaving the way I should.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying my boyfriend is trying too hard to be like his best friend,"So me and my bf met in university and we’ve been dating for a few months now. Ever since, I’ve known he was super close with his one best friend since childhood (lets call him Mike), and originally, to me, they just looked like a bunch of best friends that liked doing everything together.

When I started to get closer to Mike and his girlfriend, I started to notice some… odd things, I guess. Like how Sam originally wanted to go to another uni but changed his mind to come to this one because Mike was here, started attending piano lessons because Mike was doing it, etc. 

He even started “picking up” on Mike’s interests, for example, at first, I was a mild anime fan and he would kind of make fun of me for it, but the moment Mike started watching it, my bf had put anime posters in his room and told me he was into it now. When we go shopping, he would buy stuff that I know for a FACT Mike has, but then when they would “coincidentally” run into each other wearing the same stuff, my boyfriend would act all surprised and be like “I didn’t know you had that” when he clearly did. He would also always play music that Mike recommended to him and said that he didn’t need to make Spotify playlists because he would just listen to Mike’s or whatever. 

I also found out that Mike had started dating his gf like, a month before my bf started dating me, and I think we’ve gone on more “double dates” with them than actual dates on our own. Or we would go somewhere and “coincidentally” Mike and his gf would be there. 

Anyway Mike’s gf also noticed the same thing when I was talking to her, but she says Mike doesn’t notice anything out of the ordinary and that he is used to my bf acting this way. However the final straw for me was when Mike said he planned to go to Mexico over Summer break with his gf, and now my bf is trying to convince me to go to Mexico so we can have a couples retreat or whatever with Mike and his gf. I told him to stop trying to be Mike so hard, and my bf got super angry and said I was being delusional.

So AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my SO that they are not entitled to my paychecks ,"I (25F) have been married to my SO (29M) for 2 years.Currently 8M pregnant.I work in IT whereas my SO work in pharmacy. We both earn decent amount to sustain ourselves. After our marriage we have been living with my in-laws. For context we both have 1 sister and 1 brother. His both siblings decided to settle abroad so we financial help them. I gave my entire paychecks to his family so that I can financial support them. Due to this we have zero savings in our name. Now both of my siblings have decided to stay in the country and pursue further education. I informed my husband that I will be using small amount (40%)of my payment to help my brother and sister out with their tution  fees.
 I also informed that he is not obligated to use his paychecks to help my siblings and he is free to do whatever he wants to do with his money. He suddenly became defensive saying that how will he manage the expense and I should not help my siblings financial. 

I calmly told him that I helped his siblings when they needed help so I should be able to help my siblings when they need help and again that he is not obligated to spend a single penny on them.

He called me and AHOLE for making him and his family feel that by helping them out I did a favour on them and by saying that he is not entitled to my paychecks.

AITA?

Edit : Let me make it clear his siblings moved to abroad last year. When I supported them financial and we had no Savings. Starting this year from January I started adding small amount in our join account for our baby which added upto 60k till date. Today I checked that account statement and it had zero balance. When asked he said he gave my savings to his father. Please keep in mind he did not contribute a single penny in that saving amount.

Update: Thank you for making me realise that I have been a doormat to everyone in my life. I have opened a separate savings account and all my paychecks will be directed towards it.I have also confronted my husband about my 60k savings and according to him he did a wrong thing by giving my money to his father without any discussion and he is expected to give me that money  within a week. I also had a long discussion with him that he needs to match up with me regarding savings for OUR baby and he needs to set boundaries with his family. 

Once again thank you for your kind support. I will also learn to say NO to people ",AmItheAsshole
H if I didn't give a gift to a coworker because she sounded ungrateful,"I work with three other women in an office. We often have potlucks and since I love to cook I will bring in other homemade treats to share with the group. I like my coworkers and I enjoy doing this, but there have been times when I feel like one coworker, ""Amy"" has started to expect it or feel entitled. She will always take an extra helping or be the one to finish the dish. She will never turn down if someone offers to treat and hers will always be the most expensive of the group. I know I can just stop doing this but the other two ladies are always gracious and grateful and I enjoy sharing. 

We have been talking about personal and physical wellness and I mentioned to the group that I had ordered a set of four lotions from a skincare line so we could practice some self-care. Amy instantly asked, ""Are they scented or unscented?"" I replied that they were each different and one of them was unscented. She said, ""I prefer scented."" I was taken aback that she seemed to be demanding which lotion she got when they hadn't even come in yet. I said something to the effect of ""I guess it will depend what mood I'm in when they get here."" 

The whole thing just completely put me off. It was such poor manners to question a proposed gift and seemed so entitled and ungrateful. I have considered not giving Amy one of the lotions and just sharing with the other two. But that seems like poor manners also to promise a gift and then not give it, and I don't want the other two ladies to feel bad that they got a gift and Amy didn't. WIBTAH if I excluded Amy from a group gift because she seemed ungrateful?",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling my friend what her partner was saying? I think I already know the answer ,"My best friend - A
Friends partner- B

I used to do OF...as you may or may not know, the people can be anon on there and you won't  know who it is. I had a sub on there for a few months. One day, he said something to me that was weird for him to know. I messaged A and told her how weird this is and I wonder who it could be? I was sending A screenshots of the convo and photos he had sent etc we were trying to figure out who it could be as it was obviously someone I knew. Then A sent a reply and said ""I think it's.."" her BOYFRIEND. I said no fking way as if. And she kept saying yes it is. By this point I felt sick to my stomach. 

We determined that it was in fact him. I felt so disgusted and violated as he shouldn't of been on there but was anonymously. I imagine A felt even worse. At that point A wasn't blaming me as it wasn't my fault because I didn't know it was him. 
Later she asked me to screenshot and send her the entire convo from OF and any of our messages together in general. I sent them all without a thought. 

I hardly know her partner never really spoke to him in person I thought he was shy and I was convinced that he was a good partner to my friend. I was obviously wrong. 
Before finding out it was him on OF about a couple of months prior B started messaging me and i thought it was innocent, because to me it was. There was a music festival coming up that A had mentioned she wanted to go with me. B messaged me about it saying he will pay for her and my tickets to go etc and then A  said she didn't want to go anymore and would rather the money be spent on something else. B asked if I still wanted to go and I said no only if S is. B said he was going to go and lie to A about going. I said to B he better tell her or I will. I know I should've just told A myself what he was saying but I didn't.

 
A few weeks after that B messaged me again saying there's a p!nk concert coming up and asked if I think A would like it I said I wasn't too sure and he should communicate with her but I wanted to go to her concert a while ago but wasn't gonna go as it was too expensive. B said he'd pay for me and A to go.
A ended up telling me she didn't want him paying for stuff like that.

 A few weeks later A birthday was coming up and I wanted to do something fun with her for her bday. I tried to organise something but it didn't end up happening. I was also telling B  he should take her somewhere nice for her bday etc and was trying to figure out dates with him for when he'd be home from work and able to look after their kids so me and A could go out.
Now maybe my priorities were wrong but all I wanted to do was go out and do something with my best friend. I never wanted her man but she thinks otherwise. 
This whole thing was stressing me out for weeks I couldn't eat or sleep properly knowing I hurt my friends feelings. Now she won't reply to me and I don't know what to do. Her partner lied and denied it for days. She is trying to fix their relationship. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting a replacement bracelet my boyfriend gave? ,"Friends and bf follow my main, you know how it is 

I had a bracelet that used to be my best friend’s but ended up being mine. It wasn’t super expensive, just a chord bracelet that had his initial on it. I lost it about a month ago, and I was upset about it because it was a piece of our childhood (we used to swap it back and forth and then eventually I just kept it). 

My boyfriend Jake knew I was upset about it, but also obviously didn’t feel the level of hurt that I did which is understandable. I have mentioned it a few times over the last month but not a lot by any means.

Anyway, yesterday he came home and said he had a present for me. I opened it and it was a near identical bracelet, but with his initial. I expressed that I really appreciated what he was doing, really a lot, but it felt a little weird to me to have the exact same bracelet. Jake got mad and called me ungrateful and said he was just trying to make me feel better. I said that was really sweet and the thought was adorable but the result was a bit of misstep and he should return it and we can put the money towards a really nice dinner or a weekend away. 

Jake is still mad I won’t take the bracelet. Am I in the wrong? ",AmItheAsshole
 if I donate/sell my ex's stuff even though I know he doesn't have space for his things at his new apt? ,"My ex 33M &amp; I 30F broke up 2 months ago, we lived together with my daughter for 8mos. Things didnt work out because we had a lot of financial problems and I found out a week after moving together that he had cheated on me with a coworker.

After learning that he cheated I was devastated but decided to forgive him. However, my mental health decided otherwise. I fell into a deep depression, with time and therapy I got better but the financial issues were still there he had been fired from his job by that time.

I did the best I could to support our home, but besides my daughter I also have two other sons that live with their father and I also need to send them money every month.
Things were tight but I was able to take care of eveything. Do something nice for my kids on their bday, celebrated christmas etc.

Even though we had no money he would go out most weekends with his friends, during the time we lived together he didn't invite me out once or accepted any invitations from me to go out together because he would argue that we needed the money for the house and I should save it. 

Sex was also not great, I was always the one to initiate it and even then sometimes it felt like he wasn't into it. So after a while I stopped initiating it too.

After new year I celebrated my 30th birthday, this was a huge thing for me so I had been saving for it. I invited all my friends and his friends, got a pool house and had a huge bbq party. I spent about US$500 of my money.

One night we were home and his friends showed up to pick him up at 1AM. He just received the call and stood up to change shirts and after I asked him were he was going he said ""Out with my friends"". I felt that 1AM was not the right time to go out so I asked him not to go. He got upset and ended up telling his friends to leave. After which he yells that he was tired of everything, that he didnt want to be in this situation anymore and that the blame for everything is my poor control of money, all the money that I spent on my bday and mostly my financial responsibilities towards my children, he said and i quote ""You have so much responsibilities and baggage with your kids that we will never be able to be financially stable"".

Maaan listening to him say all that felt like an ice cold bucket of water had been poured down my spine, I could not believe my ears after being the only income for 5 months. 

The next day I asked him to move out. He tried apologizing but it was too late for me. 

The apt where he lives with his dad is small, so he doesn't have space for most of his things, desk, playstation, monitor, 2 bedside tables, 2 chairs and clothes.

I asked him to come get his things but he never does. I've been waiting for 2.5 months, he's been here a few times to get some items of clothing but no intention of taking his things with him.

I just really want to make this space my own so I can start feeling better and I can't while his things are here.

So, WIBTA if I donate/sell the big stuff?",AmItheAsshole
 for keeping the necklace my grandma left to me in her will?,"My grandma passed away about 1 year ago unexpectedly during a heart surgery, and it was very hard on me (26F) since she was really the only grandparent I was ever close to and as I said, her death was quite unexpected. The surgery was a routine surgery with a 98% survival rate. My family history on my dad’s side has been very complicated, and it ended with my grandma and my aunt never speaking again until her death last year, for about 10-15 years. The reason they don’t speak is about money (another story).

I live out of the country and was unable to fly back to the US after her passing (finishing and defending my master thesis). I found out later that my aunt offered to help my dad clean out my grandma’s apartment and storage unit, since she had a lot of things. She was not a wealthy woman and did not own her home, so there wasn’t much money left and I never received any monetary amount. My aunt also invited her daughters to come and go through some of my grandmas clothes, pictures, and jewelry while they cleaned out the house. Her daughters would have met my grandma when they were less than 4 years old, but otherwise had no relationship with her since my aunt and her did not speak.

Honestly, this upset me a bit because they never called or consulted me asking about any of her things or if I wanted anything. My dad said that he tried to pick out some things he thought I would like, including several pieces of jewelry she specifically stated she wanted me to have in her will. The jewelry isn’t anything that worth as much as like a 17 carat diamond, but I think there are still some nice pieces there. I am going this week back to the US to see my dad and receive these things he saved for me, but my aunt called me a few months ago saying that there is a necklace in this collection that she gave my grandma that she would like back.

My aunt used to be a jeweler and said that she hand picked/made this necklace for my grandma a long time ago and it has sentimental value to her. However, as I said my grandma specifically asked for this necklace to go to me in her will. So would I be the asshole for keeping the necklace?",AmItheAsshole
 for using my friend's $20 after dinner?,"Yesterday, I went to Chili's (restaurant) with my friends. I paid for half of the meal, which was like $47. My friend gave me $20 to give to my parents because I used their card, so I went to give the $20 to my mom, and she said to keep it and use it for gas. Now, the other friend is saying I’m obligated to give the $20 back to her because my parents didn’t want it. It's her money, and she gave it to me under the impression it was going to my parents, but technically if I give it back, it'd mean she ate for free.",AmItheAsshole
 for saying No to my older sister?,"A little background I (19F) am in collage and live with my parents still. My sister (25F) recently got kicked out from my Grandparents and has been house hopping for the past few months. She had lost her driver's license two years ago and doesn't have a car. Currently she has been house hopping between my house (Thursday- Sunday) and my Godparents place (Monday- Wednesday)

My sister is struggling with mental health problems and has a hard time maintaining and making relationships, she's often put as the villain in most things related to our family.

Since she has been house hopping, she constantly asks our mother and I to give her rides to places. I obviously say no, but my mom says yes most of the time which isn't good for her health as my mother has stage four cancer and needs to rest. My sister is terrible at saving/ spending money and would often use non-existent money to bribe me into taking her. She'll also borrow money and rarely ever pay it back. Everytime we put our foot down to get her to take the bus, she purposely doesn't make it in time and gets us to take her instead. 

Yesterday she finally got a lease for an apartment near her job and college but because she spent all of her money she can't pay for the deposit before the due date. My parents couldn't get any money as they're already barley scraping by. I currently am well off in money and will soon have enough to get my own apartment, and because of this she asked me to pay her deposit and she'll pay me back when she gets the chance, that way she won't be house hopping anymore and won't have to ask us for anymore rides. I told her No.

I love my sister, I truly do. Am I an asshole for saying no? 
",AmItheAsshole
 if I asked my ex to replace an expensive collector's item in full for part of it,"My ex (32M) and I (25F) broke up after living together for 6 years, and problems arrose when we each took our stuff.

I'm a huge reader and a book afficionado, so I try to buy nice/limited editions when I can. I have a limited edition of the Witcher, it's two huge books and a map in a box with nice art on it. The map is specific to this edition, as in, it was made for this box set, it can't be found as a stand alone print, it's an exclusive. the set originally cost 94€

My ex likes maps a lot, and we already had the Skyrim and GOT map, so when he saw my box set had a map, he said he wanted me to put it up next to the others. I told him that if we did that, I'd like to get it in a frame so that it wouldn't get torn up when we'd get it down. He said if we did that' we'd have to put a hole in the wallpaper and he'd risk loosing his deposit. I told him fine then, I didn't need my map displayed yet, i'd put it up when the setup was right. He then insisted for half an hour that I was being ridiculous, pouted, and was overall unpleasant until I gave in and put up the map.

Now, I've taken my stuff out of the house and, lo and behold, when I took the map down, it torn in several places. Nothing that will be too noticeable when put in a proper frame, but still, it's damaged in every one of the ways I said it would be.

It made me cry when I took it down, and he told me to stop the drama and that he'd buy me a new one. I told him no he won't, because he needs to buy a 110€ box set to do so now, and he shut up. It's been approximately a month but I can't let go and am thinking of sending a message and saying I'll take him up onthat offer. Wibta?",AmItheAsshole
 for snapping at my friend because of her comments about my body?,"I’m F19 and my friend Jenna is F18. Jenna is obsessed with being “thicc.” She’s always taking about how “thicc” she is and how that’s a great trait of hers and it’s frequent enough that it’s annoying but I always just ignore it.

In the past few months she’s started commenting on my body too though. For context I’ve always been thin and have a medical condition that makes it harder for me to gain or retain weight. I feel that my body is proportional and I’m not flat anywhere. I’m happy with my body but I’ve also been working hard to try to build muscle which is more difficult for me than most people and Jenna knows this.

She keeps commenting on how I’m not “thicc” and has been steadily increasing how often she brings it up and how rude the comments are. If I mention the gym she’ll ask if I’m hitting lower body to “get thicc.” She's asked how my boyfriend even enjoys sex with me because I “have no butt” and she asked this in front of him.

Last Friday I made the mistake of going clothes shopping with her and I tried on a really cute pants/tank top set that I loved and had decided to treat myself and get. When I showed it to Jenna in the fitting room though, her immediate response was “it doesn’t make you look thicc.”

I told her I didn’t care about looking “thicc” and that I really liked the set but she doubled down and was like “well yeah but of course you’d rather look thicc though” and commented on the side profile of my butt in the pants. I repeated that I didn’t care and she doubled down and told me not to get the set because I could find something that made me look actually thicc. I got the set anyway and the rest of the evening, Jenna kept making incessant comments about my body. For what it’s worth Jenna tried on some super unflattering clothes and I didn’t say anything about it because she really liked them.

Eventually I snapped and told her I don’t give a shit about being “thicc” and not to talk to me at all if she can’t bring herself to shut up about the way I look. I told her that sometimes she wears stuff I don’t think is cute but I’ve never commented on it because it’s her choice of clothes.

Jenna got super upset and told our mutual friends I fatshamed her. I don’t think I did but now mutual friends are upset with me and I’m feeling at my wits end with this situation. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my gf to put some distance between herself and her autistic colleague?,"So my gf has this guy in her class. (This is relevant) He is visibly autistic BUT he is not intellectually disabled or anything. She used to talk about how she feels sorry for him because he is always on his own. She told me she’s thinking of letting him in her friend group, I said good, kudos to you. Few months ago he began to hang out with my gf and her friends. 

Fast forward to now, he constantly texts or snaps her. Like we be chilling out and gf’s phone gets bombarded with messages from him, sometimes I check when she leaves the room it’s not something inappropriate , just random stuff. He’s on her insta dms too, giving her bunch of compliments. He also compliments when I’m standing right there too , and idk, I know friends compliments each other but it annoys me because it’s just so obvious he has a crush on her, which she denies. 

I was already annoyed by all of this and yesterday I find out they sometimes hang out together alone, separate from rest of the group. She told me it’s cus he gets overwhelmed in groups. I asked so does he hang outs with everyone one on one, she said “idk probably not, he’s not close with others the way he’s with me” I said what do you mean, “the way” she said you know he’s not as close as with them. I asked what they do in these hangouts, she laughed and asked if I’m jealous , then said they usually go for a dinner, they saw a movie together once, went to picnic once, you know what friends they just do what normal friends to.

Long story in short I basically told her I don’t want them to be this close , i know it’s not it but these hangouts kinda sounds like they are going on dates, she said I’m being ridiculous. “You know what he’s like , I would never see him that way “ I said i know , but he sees you that way, the looks and compliments he’s giving you tells all. She said “no he’s just can’t read social cues that’s all” and even if he has feelings she can’t cut a friend off just like that. I said I’m not telling her to cut him off just don’t hang out one on one at the least for a while. She accused me with being selfing saying “I just told you he can’t do group hangouts!” I said well that’s his problem, wouldn’t you put some distance if he was a regular guy clearly having a crush on you? She said she would because then that would be inappropriate but I know he’s not a regular guy , and plus he’s sensitive. I clearly don’t think anyone but myself,  how he’s gonna feel if his only friend gets away from him because her boyfriend being an unreasonable jealous asshole. Am I y’all?",AmItheAsshole
 for not forgiving my dad for being a bad father?,"I’ve never wrote a Reddit post before I’ve only seen social media posts about it and I feel like I need advice because I can’t tell anyone else this. I’m about to turn 17 and my dad who’s in his 40’s has been in and out of jail my whole life. But about 3 years ago he got out of prison after being in there for around 8 years. When he came out he did good but he’s falled back into old habits now.

 He drinks almost every day again he always was an alcoholic. When I was younger he got my mom kicked out of all her houses because he would just destroy things when he was drunk and mad. The only reason we lived in our house for so long was because he was in prison. I was young but even then I remember how horrible he acted when drunk. I even remember him pushing my pregnant mother against a closet door and screaming in her face when I was about 6. 
 
When he was arrested me and my newborn sister were with him while my mother was at work. I remember crying so hard thinking I would never see him again that the officers were trying to comfort me and my sister while waiting for my mom. But that wasn’t even the first time I had been with my dad when he got caught almost all my early memories were with him handcuffed in the backseat of cop cars with me sitting right next to him. The other memories with him was when he took me to this house and sat me on a couch with a bunch of strangers while he went in a room. I don’t know what he did in there but he was in there for so long that the sun would be down by the time he came out.

Now with all the anger he has and all the harm he’s doing again I’ve grown resentful towards him. When I look at him all I feel sadness and disappointment. I know it’s wrong to think this but I’m tired of forgiving someone who keeps making false promises of change. I’m only 16 I don’t know everything he’s done and been through and I have a nice life thanks to my mother’s hard work and sacrifice but I’m starting to have unhealthy thoughts some times. I don’t think I’ll do anything because I have to take care of my sister but all the hurt he caused me and my family is stuck in the back of my mind. Everyone forgives him and he can charm strangers so easily I don’t get how can someone who acts like that can be liked so greatly. 

Maybe because they don’t see the pain e puts my mom through or the feeling of loneliness his kids feel because of a lack of a father. My older brother even started getting in trouble with the law just like my dad because he was never there for him. And he wasn’t there for the first part of my younger sister’s life. I think he knows I can’t forgive him anymore. I created a wall between us when we use to be so close. And I know it’s my fault we drifted apart but sometimes I lock myself in the bathroom or late at night when nobody’s awake I cry because I miss my daddy and I miss when I was his princess and he loved me. I don’t know what to do anymore.

",AmItheAsshole
 - I won’t let my Dad walk my dog,"Hard to believe it has come to the point where I’m taking this to Reddit, but I’d appreciate some unbiased points of view.

I have a 4 year old dog, whose mixed breeds are known as hunters who track prey and also herd. My dad enjoys taking my dog for a walk and often comes to my house with my permission and walks the dog - whether I’m there or not. Here’s the issue, he refuses to put her on a leash and instead lets her roam free - and he insists upon it. He is strict about her staying near him, and for the most part she listens fairly well. However, I am concerned that one of these days she’s going to take off and get hit by a car, or even encounter another dog and get hurt, scare someone, etc.

I have asked my dad repeatedly to use the leash which is easily accessible to him and he even usually brings it with him. I’m at the point where 1) I fear for my dogs safety and 2) on a deeper level am disappointed my dad won’t respect a simple and what I would consider a reasonable request of mine.

We have a good relationship, and he’s always been welcomed in my home. Our childhood dog growing up, a more much more chill dog, he would take on walks without a leash and there were no issues. However my current dog has a completely different demeanor, temperament, and tendencies. I’ve asked repeatedly for him to use the leash and have confirmed multiple times that he has not, he even jokes about it. Also I live in a subdivision.

So, AITA for at this point essentially telling my dad he can’t see the dog and/or take her for walks anymore?",AmItheAsshole
 for parking a motorized bike at a bike rack?,"It's probably best if I describe the bike and my parking first, because that's what this hinges off of.

Now motorized bike makes it sound large, but it's not really that big. It's a tiny 50cc scooter thing, that tops out at 30 mph. A little vespa thing. It's about the same size as a bike, just a little longer. including handlebar width, but the actual body of the bike is a few times wider than a normal bike. It's also substantially easier for me to use because of its seat. I can't ride bikes because of the seat, but I don't know if that's important.

Whenever I park it, since it's essentially just a motorized bike with a fancy storage seat and footrest, I have to park it locked to something. The bike is essentially in permanent neutral, no lock or anything on its wheels making it absurdly easy to steal by simply rolling it onto a trailer or truck bed. I'd know, ive had to steal my own bike twice because I've locked the keys in it. The best option usually is a bike rack, since I can't lock it around light poles and I can't park in handicap spots. I park it parallel to the building or even between the building and the rack, as opposed to straight on to the rack, and I chain it to the very last pole of the rack, as far out of the way as it can go, because I thought it'd give bicycle riders more space to deal with their bikes.

I went to the store for a gallon of milk yesterday, and I took it instead of my car because it gets good mpg, it was a nice day, and I only needed one thing. I parked it like I described, essentially wedged between the rack and the building, locked to the pole that connects with the ground. The rack wasnt full at all, with maybe one bike there on the other end. I come out, and this angry looking man is standing by the rack. When I went to the bike to put my milk and a bag of chips (look buddy we've all been there) away in it, he said:

""who the fuck do you think you are, parking that shit here?""

And I said ""excuse me? Is there an issue?""

To which he responded with ""yeah, your stupid fucking gas bike is in the normal bike rack. You're lucky someone didn't cut your brake lines, moron. Next time ride a bike, you lazy fucking asshole.""

He then walked into the store, I unchained the scooter, checked it for damage, especially the brakes, and left. I was shocked because I'd never been made aware there was a problem with that parking method in the year I've done it, until this guy told me rather aggressively there was.

So, am I actually an asshole? Is the parking that bad that it warranted that reaction, or is he going overboard? If i was bad, how would you all suggest I park it in the future so I both keep it secure and don't interfere with cyclists?

  
edit: cant lock it to a light pole because the lock isnt long enough to fit around the concrete pole base. also i fear a driver will hit it if its parked in a normal spot like that since they wont be able to see it.",AmItheAsshole
 for losing my mind on my mom and sending her to rehab,"This might be a triggering post for those of you who struggle with addiction or have loved ones that struggle.

I(20F) have a raging alcoholic mother(38F) , im terrified for her health but she’s neglected herself for too long and let the Alcohol turn her into such a terrible person and she is in no way, shape or form  aware that her actions are unacceptable because every time anyone has ever tried to tell her, she’s lost her mind on them. She’s done it to me aswell. You can’t give this woman any constructive criticism, I once asked her to stop interrupting me while I was telling a story and she lost her mind on me. 

My mom has a good heart, she’s caring and she sees the good in everyone but only until they see something other than good in her. She’s been an alcoholic since I was little, she drinks every night, mixes pills with her alcohol, stays up all night, calls friends and family and loudly speaks with them at 2-4am while everyone else in the home is sleeping, and she spends her days sleeping, and her evenings sitting on the couch with her husband. She has physical conditions that warrant extreme pain medication, she was given a bottle of 100 pills I can’t remember what it was but it was gone in a week. She was only supposed to take three a day.

 We’ve discussed rehab before when she was on worse things, but she fought us, and everyone gave up. I don’t have authority over her, so I was forced to give up aswell. She needs professional help, she needs therapy and recover routines, she needs to get sober, she needs to start taking care of herself, I am at a point where I no longer see a mother, I see a woman I just feel sorry for. I need advice, support, suggested next steps? Anything. I feel like I’m going crazy because every time I say anything about it she yells at me and goes as far as being emotionally manipulative and abusive. 

I just want to know I’m not alone.. I want to take her somewhere she would get help but if I did that no one would forgive me",AmItheAsshole
-family trip planning gone wrong,"My family and I are in the midst of planning a family trip with my two sisters and mom. My older sister is a family of 4, I have a family of 5, little sister is single and unmarried, and then there’s my mom who’s widowed. So whilst planning on where to go and what not, we agreed on Hawaii. My older sister and I have been in communication in a group chat with my little sister for weeks, and for weeks we did not get any type of response from my little sister on what she thought about the hotels we picked out and all of that. Mainly to accommodate everyone’s family and stuff like that.  Well we finally agreed on a hotel that is right off the beach; however, it did not accommodate my family of 5. 
My little sister suggested that she could have one of my kids stay in her room and that wouldn’t be an issue at all. So I agreed and also agreed to give her money for my daughter to stay in her hotel room so she wouldn’t just be mooching for a free room. All for the sake of us to stay in the same hotel being that it’s a “family vacation”. 
When it came time to book, my sister pushed me to book the same day we spoke about my daughter rooming with her and my mom and said “it wasn’t an issue at all, go ahead and book now to lock in the price.” So I did. As soon as I booked it (hotel and flight) and paid, she came to me and said “well now our room is going to be cramped and I don’t think she (my daughter) can stay in my room with mom.” 
Am I wrong for being upset? Fast forward to now (this was all back in March) I’m having to change my hotel to accommodate 5 people which is now going to cost me an additional $2500. Am I wrong for being this upset? Or is she the asshole? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my In-laws to my graduation?,"I am about to graduate from college with my bachelors degree and I want to know if I am the asshole for not inviting my in-laws to my graduation. During the time that my wife and I were dating they were very rude to myself and my wife. They would constantly degrade me at every turn and at least once my FIL brought another guy to their house to take out my then girlfriend because we weren't planning on getting married yet (6-8 months ish into dating) so in their eyes we weren't serious. Now that we are married they act like I should have a close relationship with them and go out and spend time with my FIL. IMO they have clearly shown what they think of me which is fine, everyone has a right to think what they want. I just don't like how now they try to act like we should be close.. seems fake to me and I've been having none of it. Would I be the asshole for only inviting my parents and not my in-laws even though they have talked about wanting to go?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my MIL that she needs to stop telling my 6 year old to be 'ladylike'?,"I am a dad of 3 (10F, 10M, and 6F). My 10 year old daughter is pretty girly but my 6 year old daughter follows my son around like his little shadow and is what people sometimes call a tomboy (Disclaimer: I have no idea if that is an offensive term now but apologize if it is). She loves sports and being outside with her big brother and they are pretty close. For the spring she just started playing lacrosse, which my 10 year old son has been playing for years, and they have been spending so much time together outside practicing. It's pretty cool to watch as a dad since I was worried about my singleton bonding with the twins when she was born. 

Anyway, my MIL was over the other day and the kids were outside playing while we were on the porch watching and my wife was making dinner. They were just playing catch and my son leaned over to spit so my 6 year old did the same. My MIL said nothing to my son about it but yelled, ""Rosa! You need to be more ladylike. Don't copy your brother when he does that!"" I told her it wasn't that big of a deal but she insisted that we need to get this under control because Rosa doesn't act like a lady should and is getting too old to think it's okay. I argued with her a bit and she ended up leaving. Now my wife is mad because she thinks I disrespected her mother and should have understood that it's cultural for my MIL and she will always think this way. If it matters I am a white guy from New England and my wife's mom is from Nigeria but my wife was born and raised in the US. My wife insist that I need to be more understanding of the cultural differences and understand where her mom is coming from.

Edit: Guys, this is not a spitting in public debate. I would have been fine if my MIL corrected both kids because spitting is gross. I am annoyed that she ONLY corrected my daughter because of her gender. Can we please stick to the issue at hand?",AmItheAsshole
 for inviting my friend out even though I know they struggle financially?,"I (30f) have this friend (30f) that we will call Abby. Abby is a lot of fun to be around but she makes a lot of poor decisions. She has a hard time prioritizing what is important. She would take impulsive trips and then ask people to help her pay for her rent a few weeks later. She was unemployed for awhile, but recently found a full time job and is starting to get her ducks in a row. Another thing about Abby is that has major fomo. She gets really upset when she isn't invited to things and she gets really sad if she can't make it to an event.

Abby and I are in a group chat with 6 other people, including my boyfriend, Mark (33m). In this group chat, we planned to hang out next weekend. We all live in different cities so finding a time that fits in everyone's schedule take some planning. We planned on renting a cabin and just hanging out. Abby is in the group chat but she gets overwhelmed so she does not check it often. I messaged her separately to let her know what are plans are and that she is welcome to join us, but we are splitting the cost of the cabin. Abby said that money is tight right now but she'll see if she can make it. That was the end of our conversation.

Mark told me that it's irresponsible of me to invite her because I know she's struggling financially and that she makes poor decisions. He said that my inviting her is opening the door to letting her make more poor decisions. I told Mark that I am not responsible for her finances and she can make her own decisions regarding what she wants to spend money on. I invited her to be kind because I would rather be invited and make my own decision not to go than someone else making that decision for me thinking they know what's best for me. I understand where Mark is coming from but I still don't think I did anything wrong. Aita?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my parents I would have preferred the original name they planned to give me instead of the one they actually gave me?,"My parents recently told me (22f) that they had considered another name for me when mom was pregnant with me. Actually, it was the name they had decided to give me really until mom changed her mind. The original name was Dove Emberly but my mom was worried it was too weird after a while and she wanted to change it. My dad never did. But eventually it was decided I would be named Emily Katherine. I don't think my dad really likes my name but maybe he wouldn't have liked anything other than the original.

The conversation about my original name came back up between my parents first when mom basically asked dad if he wasn't glad they changed their minds and dad said no. So they actually asked me and told me the two names. I told them I would have preferred the original and I was kinda sad I didn't get Dove as my name, which would be way better than Emily in my opinion and the middle name Emberly I prefer too lol. Mom mentioned Ocean or Océan had been a contender too and I said that would have been amazing.

Mom really wasn't happy. Dad told me if I wanted to use the original name he'd give me the money to change my name. Mom wasn't happy with him. But she really wasn't happy with me. She told me I didn't even hesitate to say I preferred the original name and she asked me why I liked it so much and told me how sad it made her that the name she felt would suit me better throughout my life instead of as a little girl was one I could discard so easily. Especially because I reacted positively to dad saying he'd pay for me to change my name.

AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my dad sleep on an overnight plane ride?,"My dad (60 m) and I (24 f) were flying on a 9 hour overnight flight to see my sister (26 f) who lives abroad. My dad snores very loudly, it’s gotten to the point where my mom and I slept on a different floor than him because he was so loud. When we lived in an apartment temporarily we got noise complaints. We have brought up surgery or having him go see a doctor multiple times but he refuses since he doesn’t see it as an issue. I was nervous ahead of this flight since I know people will be trying to sleep. 

During the flight whenever my dad would start to snore I’d nudge him. He was really angry with me when we landed since he felt very tired. 

Edit: My family is very concerned about his health due to this. We’ve tried to get him into sleep studies and tested for sleep apnea but he refuses.


TLDR: My dad snores loudly so I stopped him from sleeping on an overnight flight. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my baby shower hosted 1.5 hours away,"I’m pregnant and a close family member offered to host a baby shower for me.  She is very experienced at throwing showers and they’re always beautiful and special.  I’ve attended several, including the bridal shower and baby shower for another relative and my bridal shower.  The aforementioned showers were held at my mom’s house because that was closest to where most attendees and the guest of honor live. my close family member brought all her decorations and food there.  The only place my mom’s house can comfortably fit everyone is in her basement, which is used for storage the rest of the year so it does take time to get ready for hosting (putting away items and cleaning).  

My mom came down with a virus a couple months ago that impacted a preexisting condition and resulted in a couple hospital stays.  She’s feeling a little better but not 100% and still undergoing treatments.  She’s not contagious.  My close family member suggested not having the shower at my moms so we don’t put further stress on her which I agree with.  Instead, she suggested having the shower at her house which is 1.5 hours away from me and most attendees.  I’m not sure what to do.  Do I suggest having it at my house?  Do I find a room to rent that’s close by?  I’m grateful but I think it’s far for most to travel and I’m concerned about attendance.  My MIL also offered to help/be involved…she would probably have it at a nearby if she was hosting herself.",AmItheAsshole
[MD] Can someone give away cannabis seeds as a promotional giveaway with another purchase?,"This is a cross post from the above post. From what I’ve read selling cannabis seeds in Maryland without a license is a felony, but giving them away to adults over 21 is legal. So would it be legal to give the seeds as a free gift with purchase of some other item, such as a shirt? I think this is prevalent in DC, but I’ve never heard of it in Maryland so I wanted to be sure. Thank you in advance!",AskLawyers
[NC] Employer wouldn’t let me go home after bleeding thru pants,"While at work today (I dont know if this is useful information but I deliver packages to customers doorsteps), I bled thru my jeans quite a bit despite the fact of using sanitary products. With no way to change or cover up the stain, I asked my manager if I could go home. He told me to just go to the nearest store and buy what I needed and get back on the road. I then spoke to a female supervisor and explained to her why I didnt want to do that thinking she would understand. After explaining to her that I don’t want to embarrass myself by walking through a store with a giant blood stain on the back of my pants, she insisted I do so any ways. So I went into the only store in the area, a packed walmart supermarket. I used my delivery vest zipped up around my waist as a make shift way to cover it up but it was extremely obvious what was happening especially since I’m walking around with pants underwear and tampons to purchase. I’m crying at this point now too because I’m so extremely humiliated I’m even having to do this to begin with. People are staring at me and I have really bad anxiety and am a very introverted person so this whole ordeal was just very embarrassing. Is this allowed?",AskLawyers
[CA] Expungement hearing ,"I have a hearing tomorrow for motion to dismiss an embezzlement misdemeanor. No jail time. Did community service and informal probation for 3 years. All has been completed.

I just wanted to know what to expect the judge to say or ask. I have no idea what to expect. I filed everything myself. Representing myself as well.

Thanks ",AskLawyers
[GA] should I respond?,"

I have not smoked in the older brothers room with the younger brother present, nor is there any evidence that I have. I have only ever smoked with the parents, or older brothers permission. The older brother and parents both vape/smoke cigarettes in front of the younger brother.
Red is older brother
Blue is younger brother
Yellow is father
Purple is mother
And green is lawyer",AskLawyers
[NY] Is it illegal or unethical to change the rules of a giveaway after it has already started?,"There was a business that posted a giveaway of $4000 in services for attending a webinar hour long event. They advertised several times and made it clear you must attend the event to be able to enter the giveaway.
 The next day they posted on their page they are extending the winning date, and now allowing anyone to enter the giveaway because some people were not able to join the webinar due to technical error. In my opinion this severely decreased the chance of winning for those who did attend the online event and they changed the rules after the giveaway had already started. 
Is this illegal or unethical in any way? ",AskLawyers
[WA] Public Defender not providing discovery,"My friend has asked countless times to see their discovery. Has asked formally, over email, in court. The first time they asked was over a year ago, and its been months since asked in court. Isn't the attorney required to provide it when asked? This attorney also has pressured/forced this person to sign/waive things they thought they shouldn't but the attorney got actually frustrated and angry about it and made it  seem like he wouldn't put as much effort in this case. He also has refused to look into any leads/information/potential witnesses for the defense in the case that defendant put forth and claimed evidence that would seem to help the defendant prove their innocence, wasn't relevant or couldn't be used or didn't matter. How is any of this okay? Or what should this person do or what CAN they do? Might I add this area seems corrupt in some ways and it seems like no matter what they do things are always going against their favor. This is also a very serious case and just has no room for justice not to be served fairly. Any help or direction is greatly appreciated more than it can be expressed online. This person is innocent and it seems like its not being treated or taken as seriously as it should be. I understand public defenders are very busy and overworked but their has to be some kind of standards or rules that are set to ensure fairness? Right?  I mean its someone LIFE and FREEDOM potentially at stake.

Thank you to anyone listening or willing to read and give some insight or guidance or some hope even..",AskLawyers
[PA] HOA/Solar Panels,"My husband and I want to get solar panels on our new home. Our HOA isn't truly established yet so a property management company is handling HOA duties until one is established when all homes in this phase are finished being built. I called the woman at the property management company who said ""under no circumstances is solar allowed."" I asked her if this could change when our HOA is fully established and she said ""maybe."" The solar panels would only be on the back of our home as that is where the sunlight is coming from. We have had neighbors in this phase and other phases of this community, do things without HOA approval (a couple have done solar panels (in previous phases) and at least one has put up a fence without approval in our current phase). I should also mention that we live in Pennsylvania which is one of only seven states where there are no solar panel protections for people living in HOA communities, so HOA's apparently still have the say here. My question is, what kind of legal trouble could we be in if we went forward with solar panels without HOA approval? We of course don't want to get sued. It is just really frustrating to have an HOA tell us that basically we have to spend more money for electric at our own home. I appreciate any thoughts/advice you can provide. ",AskLawyers
[FL] Dog injury in small claims type,"In my small claims packet it’s asking what type of suit this is. I’m unsure what to put it as.  Would this be personal injury or property damage?  Assuming the my dog is my property?

Dog was injured and I am looking to recover vet bill.  ",AskLawyers
[CA] question about car crash settlement ,"Long story short - family member got a 100k settlement for a car accident, (someone rear ended him and now has back pains most likely for life).
Attorney took 40k. Leaving him with 60k. 
Medical expenses took about 30k. Which left him 30k for himself….

If i under correctly, shouldn’t the persons insurance who hit him cover my uncles medical expenses and not the settlement?
Genuinely confused. 

Does the at fault drivers insurance ever cover medical victim’s medical expenses?",AskLawyers
[NY] Scope of Weinstein ruling?,"What Is the reach of today's ruling overturning Weinstein's conviction? Did they overturn the prior bad acts statute altogether, or just limit its use?",AskLawyers
[NY] Who legally owns Ticketmaster tickets?,"Say person A has a Ticketmaster account. Person A lets person B use a presale they have access to to purchase tickets, and person B uses their credit card. 

The tickets therefore are issued to person B, but in person A’s account. 

Do the tickets technically belong to person A, the account holder, where the tickets are being held? Or to person B who purchased them and has their name on them?

**Edit:** I was trying to leave personal details out, but since someone was wondering if I was a ticket scammer…

I am person A. Person B is my ex who bought the tickets, then proceeded to cheat on me, and now wants the tickets back. Since I already bought travel arrangements, I want to Venmo him what he paid for all the tickets, and tell him to F— off. I just want to know if legally, the tickets being in my account, mean they are mine or not. 
",AskLawyers
Company Acquired - Is Parent company liable for acquired company debts? [US],"If I have a contract with the child company, is the obligation of debts still enforacble to the parent company that acquired them? Company owes me $10,000, however, they are claiming contract was never with with the parent company. What are my options?",AskLawyers
[AZ][TX] I am unable to get the title for a car that I purchased from a used car dealer,"I live in Arizona. I bought a 2021 Toyota Corolla Hatchback from Car Capitol in El Paso, Texas. The  date of sale is 2/26/2024. The temporary plates are going to expire in two days (4/26/2024). I am unable to register the car in Arizona and get new plates because I do not have the title. When I went to register the vehicle at an AZ DMV, the DMV stated that the title looked like it was in Arizona and held by a Toyota dealership. However, I called Car Capitol, and they say they have the title and are waiting on the Arizona Department of Revenue to tell them how much money they need to send. They have had 2 months to do this. I most likely will not receive the titles in 2 days, so I will be unable to drive my car. What legal actions are available to me?

Update: I just spoke to the bank through which I have the car loan with. They should be the lienholders, however, they informed me that they have received no paperwork from the dealership for the title/lien transfer",AskLawyers
[TX] Paying someone else’s mortgage,"I’ve got a family member that’s been living in a home since 2007, let’s call her Sue. When she came to America, her credit was not good enough to secure a home loan. Because of that, her brother applied for the loan on her behalf, signed the deed of trust, etc. but she paid the down payment, has paid all mortgage payments, taxes, upkeep, you name it, since 2007; the brother paid nothing and lived elsewhere with his wife. Now Sue wants to move, but her brother is refusing to sign the deed over and is claiming he’s owed half of any sale proceeds, even though he put no money towards the home.  Theres still $20k or so left on the mortgage. Is there any recourse for Sue? ",AskLawyers
[NY] Trump Hush Money Trial Ques,"I was talking online with someone about this trial and I've a couple questions I hope you guys can answer.

Where was the jury pool limited to? Was it just people from Manhattan? Or from the entire city? They said Manhattan voted 85% against Trump (not sure if this is true, but it's possible) and therefore an unbiased jury is not possible.

They seem to think the jury is very biased and the defense was treated unfairly in the jury selection. They said something about the prosecution getting 3 peremptory challenges, which means the defense didn't? What does this mean?

thx",AskLawyers
[Non-US]Need advice to get money back from a fraudulent company ( for a depressed friend),"Hi everyone. My friend is a junior doctor in India. He had paid some money to a UK based education company in 2022 to book an exam. That company hadn’t booked the exam and has been keeping the money ever since. Upon requesting for it back, they have repeatedly demeaned him and dodged around. He has sent legal notices from India, but to no avail. He has his student loans to repay. Lately, he has been talking about taking his life and I’m so helpless that I can’t help him. Please help me so I may save my friend. I don’t want to lose him 

PS. (he had told the company that he was feeling depressed and they have told him that the earth is too populated anyways and that he must take his life). I’m just wondering what sort of sickos they must be.",AskLawyers
[OH]i have unpaid court fees from a year ago that i forgot about ,I was pulled over for a suspended license. My license was suspended because i needed and sr-22. I had valid insurance that also filed my sr-22 with the cop understood that i was did everything i was supposed to but he still wouldn’t dnt let me drive away and gave me a court date. I go to court show them that i did everything i was supposed to had my sr-22 filed and had valid insurance. So they dismissed the case. I dont understand why i have to pay court fees when i didnt do anything wrong they where the ones who made a mistake but yet i have to pay them. This is legal robbery is it not. This was moreless a rant but if you know of anything i could do kinda stuck on money and need to renew my tags but they have a registration block on it.,AskLawyers
[AL] Should I take the deal?,"[AL]

I (26F) am currently suing the job I previously worked at for sexual harassment. The manager there constantly made remarks on the size of my chest,etc. I told someone I was gonna HR if he didn't stop so he called me on my off day talked about how he was sleeping with another girl that worked at a different store location and if I went to HR he'd have me moved to the worst store in the area. 

After 2 months of gathering evidence and testimonials from coworker I called HR and filed my complaint. HR sent the district manager who was friends with my manager out to conduct the interview.  My store manager began threatening the other employees like he did me so everyone went in and told the dm they never heard or saw anything. I showed the dm my proof and he just shrugged it off. 

I was then moved to the worst and most unsafe store in the area. I reached out to hr and even offered them the evidence.  The refused to even look at it. 

I filed lawsuit. Honestly I just wanted my old job back at a good store as I have moved from. AL to Washington now. This happened 3 years ago. 

Well the lawyer called me said they companies final offer is 7k with the ability to get hired on if a manager at any location will accept me or I can take 16k and never apply there again. 

This company is my dream company but when we first discussed my job back they agreed to help get me back on at a store in my local area. 

The contract was sent to me yesterday saying 7k plus my job back if any store would hire me. I'm worried because I noticed 3 days ago on the company site there were many openings in my field. Now all of them are gone. Should I ask that they make sure I am guaranteed a job before signing?",AskLawyers
[NY] Would the Trump-Cohen-Pecker conspiracy be illegal without falsified business records?,"If Alan Weisselberg had just written down ""reimbursement to Michael Cohen for the catch &amp; kill money"" (or whatever would make all 34 of these records not falsified) would that entail admitting to a crime?

What part of it is illegal? Is catch &amp; kill in general illegal? Is catch &amp; kill always illegal in the context of an election?

I'm having a little trouble wrapping my head around this case because I'm trying to figure out what the documents would have looked like if they weren't falsified (what was the Trump organization legally required to record in these documents), and I'm also unclear on what the prosecution has to prove in terms of falsifying documents in furtherance of an election interference crime.",AskLawyers
[US] What are the legal reasons that processes for immigration of asylum-seekers are apparently so different to those for international refugees admitted to the US?,"Preface: I recognize this touches on sensitive political issues.  This is a question of personal interest, I am not seeking to score political points, and I am not seeking legal advice.  Thanks to the mods for allowing the question.

Summary of my questions for lawyers:

* How did the apparent parallel system for overseas refugees vs. asylum seekers at US ports of entry come about? Or is it just some idiot (i.e., me) misunderstanding things?
* What's the legal structure behind people arriving in the US apparently being treated differently and managed differently than refugees referred to the State Department from abroad - in particular the way status can be denied to asylum-seekers despite meeting refugee criteria, and how refugees are disqualified if they do not stay and apply in the first safe country encountered and are heavily vetted before entry?

Longer explanation:

My understanding of US immigration law is that the US's refugee admissions program to the United States is administratively separate from the treatment of prospective immigrants that file asylum claims using form I-589.  Asylum claims are filed in the US and seekers are allowed to stay in the US pending determination of their claims, can be denied status even while meeting technical criteria for refugee status, and are adjudicated through DoJ.  On the other hand, people who are admitted to the US as refugees must register with UNHCR or a US embassy, pending their claim determination undergo heavy vetting and must remain in the first safe country they register in before admission to the US, and go through the State Department.

A plain reading of UNHCR's definition of a refugee suggests that the definition of asylum-seekers in government websites is a subset if not identical to the UNHCR's definition of a refugee, viz. that they are both categories of people who have fled across international borders for reasons of persecution or personal safety, and cannot return without risk to their safety or freedoms.

I get why an asylum application for people already in the US exists - not all refugees are served by the UN or US embassies, there has to be some way to handle refugees that travel directly to the US without going to any intermediate country.  But beyond that the procedural distinctions seem to be arbitrary.

Why are asylum seeking claims so widely applied and not, for example, reserved for special cases where no third country is involved? Why does the asylum-seekers' procedure go through CBP and immigration courts under DoJ while international refugees apparently go through the Department of State?  Why the apparent double standard for, say, Guatemalan asylum-seekers who cross multiple land borders to reach a US port of entry vs. Syrian refugees disqualified from US entry by not remaining in Turkey?

It just seems weird to me that we have these parallel systems.  Asylum-seeker policy seems both more generous but also more arbitrary than the policy applied to overseas refugees. I recognize that there are other motivations behind asylum-seeker policy, not least humanitarian ones.  I'm interested in learning more about legal mechanisms here.",AskLawyers
[MT] What’s the hiring process to become a lawyer/attorney (in any state)?,"
Just finished my CJ degree with a 3.73. Always had tentative plans to become a cop but I was always fascinated by law and what lawyers do. I don’t know much about the process to become one (other than going to law school); what’s the hiring process like? Do they have to go through lengthy background checks/hiring process like cops do? What are jobs prospects/growth like? I get free grad school tuition in my state so I’m considering going to law school. Any info helps me out a lot, thanks!",AskLawyers
[TX] Is It Stealing If They Put It In My Car?,"Hello friends,

I went to a large store today (similar to Home Depot or Lowe's) to buy a storage container for my  
backyard. I genuinely, wasn't familiar with the process of buying large items but all of the employees were so friendly and helpful throughout the process from start to finish. *So helpful,* in fact, that by the time I was driving away with my item, I realized that I didn't pay for the item. Should I go back and pay for it? It's not worth me getting in trouble with the law, the item was about $130. Can I get in trouble for confessing?

Ideally, I would like to not get in trouble. Should I go back or forget about it? Help!

Thank you in advance!

  
Edit: Thank you all (especially, lawyers) for your input, I didn't expect to receive so many comments! I should have mentioned this yesterday but, after the incident happened, I did go back to talk to customer service about paying for the item. Unfortunately, they gave me a hard time and I had to go back to work from my lunch break so I didn't have time to pay for it that day. I have decided that I am going to call customer service and try to pay for it over the phone (or order one online and not pick it up). Thank you again! ",AskLawyers
"[WI] Would it be illegal for me to sit on my porch with a Super Soaker full of vinegar, spraying drunken college kids who cut across my lawn?","I live on a busy street corner a few blocks from the bars, and drunk kids have zero respect. It would be impossible for me to tell every single drunk person in my town not to walk in my lawn, but if word got around town that you shouldn't walk on this guy's lawn or else you'll get sprayed with vinegar, I might have more success. This is more of a joking suggestion on my part, but if it does not constitute assault, I might actually do it.

  
EDIT: People are asking why I'd use vinegar, as it would damage the lawn. It's not my lawn, it's my slumlord's lawn. It was never about the lawn, this is purely about principle.",AskLawyers
[AR] Had a car for a year hasn’t been registered/taxes. Haven’t made payments in 8 months,"
Basically I messed up. I got my boyfriend (ex now) a car (48k$ car not knowing the full price) while I was in a different state. Paperwork was faxed to me but didn’t have everything on it. The car was supposed to be registered and taxes done in March 2023. I found out he was cheating a few months after I came back home. And requested the car back so I could return/surrender it. He refused so I had to “steal” it back (it’s 100% in my name). I made one payment on it when I got it back in July 2023. I couldn’t afford to pay 700$ a month on that car and pay my 500$ note on my car. So I called the bank and told them to come get it. They never did. I haven’t made a payment on it since…. It’s now considered a write-off on my credit. No one has tried to come repossess it in the 8months I haven’t paid on it. I’ve recently wrecked my car I had. And I’m wondering if I’d be able to register the car I got my ex and drive that around? Or if it would even be possible to register/ tax it since I don’t have the title to it. 

What is the best thing to do with the car? It’s a brand new 2022 dodge charger with only 4K miles on it. Nothing wrong with it. No damage anything

Do I sell it? Do I contact the bank trying to get them to refinance it and help me even though it’s been 8 months? Do I just leave it in my back yard like a lawn ornament like it has been the past 8 months? 😕😕 I could use some advice  

",AskLawyers
[TN] home insurance question,"Neglectful insurance agent 

Hello! I received a call from my grandparents yesterday evening with a very interesting situation, thought it would be good to ask for some advice here!

My grandmother inherited her family home at the time of her mother’s death (17 years ago). They contacted the insurance company to notify them of her death and that she would be the one taking over the property as she had durable power of attorney. The insurance agent supposedly said they would “take care of it” and my grandparents have been paying the insurance premium ever since. They are now intending to sell the home, but are being told by the insurance company that she is not listed on the policy. My grandparents don’t have any of that paperwork anymore because she’s been dead for almost 20 yrs and honestly never thought it would come up. The insurance company said they would compensate her for the past17 years worth of payments and they only provided her with a little less than $1,000. 

What can they do to hold the insurance company accountable if anything? Or even have them fully compensate her? Please be kind lol, this is pretty stressful stuff lol.",AskLawyers
[TX] What would happen to my son if I died? ,"I (mom) have sole legal and physical custody of my 5 year old. Bio dad has been mostly MIA and has supervised visitations at a county facility for 4 hrs every other Saturday (he hardly comes). He has supervised visitations due to “family violence” but is also an avid drug user with multiple criminal charges. Bio dad’s family/parents and bio dad are no contact (do not contact me regarding the wellbeing of child). My son doesn’t know who his paternal grandparents are (only met when he was newborn and not since then). My son also thinks bio dad is just a friend he goes and sees at the center sometimes (couple times a year- but he’s gone years without visit or support at some points). 

My son thinks of my husband as dad and knows no different. My husband has been in our lives since my son can remember. They are very close and have an amazing de-facto parent-child relationship. My husband supports and provides insurance and everything bio dad is supposed to do. My husband’s parents are “grandma and grandpa” and they treat him like a biological grandchild as my husband treats my son as a biological son. 

I often get overwhelmed by the fear of death. Only because idk what would happen to my son. He would be losing a mom and a dad? Or would the courts consider letting my husband assume custody if my family was in agreement with this? 

My husband and son’s relationship is so close and solid that I sometimes get anxious leaving the house (I have an anxiety disorder anyways)- because I fear death so much because  of this issue.  Ultimately, I fear my son would lose his mom and his almost perfect home life- and be ripped away from the only dad he’s ever known. And worst case scenario - the abusive, drug using bio dad would have a shot if I died. Or his crazy family…who haven’t even bothered to know about him/know him in these 5 years.",AskLawyers
[non-US] Spotify ToS - Derivative works clause doesn't seem so bad," I saw some social media shock post saying don't give any of your IP to Spotify they can create derivative works. Certainly for podcasts this doesn't seem to be the case.

I read the below from the ToS and it seems pretty clear that they are not saying derivative works in the sense of stealing your IP and creating derivative works in what most people would understand to be a derivative work e.g. taking a podcast name, using that, starting a new series with the same format.

""You retain ownership of your User Content when you post it to the Service. However, in order for us to make your User Content available on the Spotify Service, we do need a limited license from you to that User Content. Accordingly, you hereby grant Spotify a non-exclusive, transferable, sub-licensable, royalty-free, fully paid, worldwide license to: (a) download, digitally transcode, modify, make copies of, create derivative works from (including the right to transcribe, e.g. for the purpose of optimizing search functionalities, improving personalization, simplifying content review and/or displaying on the Spotify Platform, **but not including the development and production of derivative audio or video works or the exploitation of customary ancillary rights, e.g. merchandise, live events, etc.**) """,AskLawyers
[KS] Can you legally keep a doorstep baby?,[KS] Can you legally keep a doorstep baby?,AskLawyers
[non-US] Could you threaten legal action against Meta for implying predatory intentions simply for searching your name?,"Linked below is an article describing this problem for people with a certain surname. I'll leave the name out here, just in case.

It's in Norwegian, and I'm not sure I can archive a translated version?

https://www.nrk.no/mr/facebook-og-instagram-sperrer-etternamn-fra-orsta-fordi-det-blir-kopla-til-seksualisering-av-barn-1.16847353",AskLawyers
[AZ] Can I win a lawsuit against the Air Force,"In 2022 My fiancé and I were discharged from the Air Force as a Staff Sergeants with a general discharge for refusing the COVID vaccine and was curious what the chances would be to win a lawsuit if I filed one? Prior to discharge I had never been in trouble in the military, very clean record while in, deployed to Afghanistan etc. about 6-12 months later after the Supreme Court ruled forcing the vax as unlawful they sent each of us a letter (I don’t know what it said verbatim off the top of my head) basically saying they were wrong and that I can rejoin. I do not want to nor would I rejoin but I saw some navy seals won a lawsuit with a 1.8 million dollar settlement for trying to force the vax on them. This has been on my mind since my discharge but never really knew where to start and if it’s a real case?

Edit:

I am not a “sudden anti-vax” I recieved my first vaccine at 18 when I joined the military, never had any prior to that. I also got far more sick than ever after getting vaccines, as well after getting out I never got another one. I don’t need a vaccine, never have, I am healthy and don’t eat a bunch of junk. I’ve always been opposed to them. Yes I am aware I can upgrade my discharge but that’s not my question. I don’t care if you are liberal, conservative, straight, gay, whatever… I just want a real answer to my question from a legal standpoint without prejudice swaying the answer due to my “opposing” beliefs",AskLawyers
[TX] Civil Rights in Education ,"I have been having issues with my daughters school and them refusing to follow her 504 accommodations to help her remain in class. They also frequently deny her access to her grade level classroom and will either keep her with a counselor or a vice principal. 

Almost all of the incidents happen when her teacher is out sick.

However, there are other children that have been experiencing the same things. Some are my daughters friends.

I requested a special ed evaluation to see what other types of services my daughter may qualify for that may help her remain on task and in the classroom. 

For whatever reason, the evaluation staff did not do a complete evaluation and denied her eligibility. 

While I waited for the evaluation report to be made available to me for review, I looked at demographic data the district reports to the state each school year. 

It lists total enrollment and then a breakdown of how many students for each race(or is it ethnicity?) Economic status, 504 status, special education status and also has the percentage for each. 

I found that the elementary schools (only level I looked at) that had a predominantly African American population, had a lower percentage of both 504 and students classified as special education compared to elementary schools with a predominantly Hispanic or White population. 

I do have quite a bit of documentation to back what I see in numbers.

But my question, does an individual have the ability or right to bring forward a civil rights lawsuit in Federal Court on behalf of a specific group of people (children)? 

I have consulted with a few attorneys, but they wanted to focus on only my child and only the evaluation. 
 
From my current understanding, in Texas, I do believe that I am required to file a complaint with the U.S Department of Education Office of Civil Rights first. 

I just can't find information on if I am able to do the same for someone else's child. 

Tomorrow I am meeting with an education equality advocacy leader, just trying to get an idea of what I need to discuss. ",AskLawyers
[CA] Can I sue my University for False Imformation?,"I was offered a scholarship to study abroad with the condition that I need to have my graduation certificate with me when I enter the country. I asked the university if I would be graduating before my expected departure date and was told that I would. Now that it is close to the expected graduation time, I am told that I will only be graduating in December. I will have to forfeit the scholarship. Can I sue them for this?",AskLawyers
[MA] Can a 403b be used for divorce legal fees without penalty?,"My wife is divorcing me and I need to find a lawyer. 

She already used a bunch of money for her retainer. Now I need one but don’t have the assets.

We have lots of assets but I don’t know what my options are. Never planned on this 🎻",AskLawyers
[NH] Will I be qualified for overtime pay?,"Salary: $45,000
Job Title: Install Associate (Audiovisual Field)


I just started reading through [this article](https://www.dol.gov/newsroom/releases/whd/whd20240423-0) on the new compensation threshold for overtime exemptions for salaried employees, and I'm having a hard time deciphering it. 


The salary threshold is pretty straightforward, but I don't understand how / when to apply the ""executive/administrative/professional employee"" part of the law.  


Will everyone who makes less than $43,888/yr on July 1st be able to collect overtime pay? Or does your job also have to not be classified as executive/administrative/professional in addition to being below the salary threshold?


Also, once that threshold goes up again to $58,656, will I be able to claim overtime pay? 


Thanks in advance!",AskLawyers
[CA] can i sue my ex if he gave me herpes,sorry if this sounds unorganized but i just found out my ex has been dating a girl who has herpes. she informed him from the beginning that she has herpes and is taking medication for it. but we’ve slept together without protection post him meeting her. so if i do end up with herpes can i sue him for negligence or something since he knew he could have it?? he apparently even told her he thinks he has it and now im fucking terrified. i didn’t know he was going out with another girl till two days ago and when i reached out to her she told me all of this and it’s freaking me out.,AskLawyers
[MO] Can I sue a rental company for renting me an unsafe car without properly informing me on it's risks?," 

I recently had a car accident, and insurance covered the cost of a rental while my car is being repaired. The car had a donut on the front left wheel. I'm only 20, and not really experienced with cars, but today, my grandparents gave me a ride back from the rental place after I dropped it off, and they were both livid. I wasn't aware that you had to limit speed and avoid highway/interstate driving with a donut. This is especially egregious, because I had discussed the fact that I was coming to the rental place from out of town, and would be taking it on a \~30 minute drive on the interstate to bring it home/return it, so the company knowingly rented me a car unsafe for the purposes I would be using it, and did not inform me of this.

Normally, I wouldn't really care that much, I've already returned the car and I'm safe, but the rental company is trying to pursue me to pay for hail damage that was outside of my control, so now I feel obligated to pursue this as well. I got the rental from Enterprise.",AskLawyers
[CO] What are my options against an attorney making false accusations and/or lying on multiple occasions during a divorce?,"Basically my ex retained a nightmare attorney for our dissolution of marriage. I went Pro Se in December to save on attorney fees and every interaction with him has been extremely hostile. I tried to resolve my ex violating the temporary custody orders in January before I filed a Motion to Enforce in March. He responded saying I never conferred with him prior to filling and it should be dismissed. He also claimed he was unaware of any violations until March and said he asked me and I never responded. I replied and attached all email conversations dating back to January including the last response when asked how his client was violating the order which he never responded. 

I also filed a general motion to get my children's social security numbers in order for me to file my taxes since my ex took everything from the home after I filed for divorce. Her attorney responded saying I was trying to commit tax fraud and I should file single status on taxes instead of Filing Separate. He accused me of trying to claim my children even though I've never once stated anything. It was simply to file the taxes since we were filed jointly the prior year and they wanted the information for my children. 

He's made numerous other false accusations and outright refused to turn over any evidence in her possession stating it doesn't exist. The judge ordered him once to turn the stuff in and it magically appeared within days. 

I understand he's my exes attorney but his behavior seems totally unethical at this point. Making false statements to the court knowing it's a lie seems insane to me. Making false accusations with no basis seems like something an attorney shouldn't be doing. 

Is this something normal or do you think he's crossing an ethical line and if so what are my options at this point? It's bad enough I'm dealing with a hostile ex but now I'm battling a hostile attorney on top.

",AskLawyers
[MO] Judge held my attorney in contempt what will this mean for my case?,I had arraignment on Thursday and before they set the plea date the bailiff said something to the court clerk and then the judge had my lawyer come up to the bench and then he went in a room off to the left. They called another case before mine and recalled it and he said he was going to hold my attorney in contempt and order him held in custody for 48 hours because he was high and admitted to using a vape pen before coming in. I kind of want a new lawyer now but I don’t know what this will mean for my case going forward.,AskLawyers
[CA] my car got towed by mistake. Is there a way I can fight the charge? ,Got my answer. Thank you to everyone who responded with helpful information.  ,AskLawyers
"[CA] I worked for a business, I caught one of the owners stealing, now he’s suing me?","Hello,
I worked at a restaurant where there were two owners. One owner (owner 1) would come in all the time, while the other one (owner 2) didn’t. Well I kept noticing that owner 1 would steal Tips, would never give us our credit card tips, and would constantly go in to the cash register to take cash out. I was also given access to monitor the bank account from owner 2. I noticed many personal expenses like fast food, shopping, and a lot of miscellaneous expenses being used on the card. So I reported all of this to owner 2. Owner 2 then compiles evidence and kicks out owner 1. Well fast forward a few months and I’m being sued along with owner 2. Do I have anything to worry about? I really can’t afford getting a lawyer and all that. 
",AskLawyers
[AZ] Is money laundering still illegal if I made the money legally?,"Assuming I make a business to launder money, and didn’t lie on my taxes, is money laundering for fun legal?",AskLawyers
[LA] Lawsuit after marijuana-induced psychosis led to suicide attempt?,"a friend of mine was in the hospital after experiencing delusions that the FBI was after her. she had been taking delta 8/9 thc edibles and was diagnosed with ""marijuana-induced psychosis"". no prior history of real mental health issues, etc. was a professional gymnast.

she was released, then almost immediately tried to take her life in a very dramatic way. she jumped off a 100+ ft. cliff but somehow survived. was in the hospital recovering from that for about a week, then transferred to a psychiatric facility for about 2 months after.

thank god, she is now back to normal mentally and mostly physically. she has a leg injury that is still plaguing her professional gymnastics career.

where would one even begin when trying to sue for what happened to her? many of the labels of the thc edibles she consumed barely have warning labels. one of them literally only warns that taking the edibles may cause you to fail a drug test. it just feels so wrong considering how many smoke shops are now popping up and selling these things.

any advice about what to pursue, who to talk to, etc. would be incredibly helpful. thank you very much for your time.",AskLawyers
[KY] Can they take me to court?,"So tonight I got fired from my job because of “discussing policies” with my husband &amp; friend. It was about a phone policy &amp; a policy stating I had to leave my car on the property. 

My question is , can they come back &amp; try to take me to court for discussing such policies.",AskLawyers
[ca] ,my sister is 14 and she’s diabetic and has other medical issues and the school nurse told kids about what she had and her medical issues and is now being bullied constantly because of it to where she doesn’t even want to go to school and calls me and my mom crying almost each day begging to be picked up. no one at the school does anything about it they won’t even change her class from the kids that pick on her and i just don’t know what to do to help her anymore ,AskLawyers
[ND] - Exiting a Talent Contract,"I am looking to exit a talent contract that I have with a TV station located in North Dakota. There is a buyout clause, but I have been threatened that I will get sued if I look to break the contract. My mental health has declined rapidly while being here, and I need to get out. I'm also afraid of retaliation if I look to leave.

Do I have any options?

They want me to transfer to a different station under the same media company, but I'm wondering what they could legally do if I exercise the buyout clause. I'd like to know what rights I have.

Thank you.

Edit: would I need to hire a lawyer? I have a hard time believing that whatever they would try to sue me with would stick, or have any basis.",AskLawyers
[OK] Speeding citation issued incorrectly,"At the beginning of this month, I was issued a citation for speeding that’s been bugging me for a few reasons:

1. The speed posted where I was pulled over is 55, I was going 60

2. The citation says the posted speed is 45, when it really isn’t

3. This is my first offense and I never go faster than 5/mph hour

Do I have a good case against this or no? They’re fining me $172 that I really don’t want to afford right now, especially when I feel like I’ve got a good case against it.",AskLawyers
[CA] Out of town shop is requesting I bring my car back for repair under warranty.  What are my chances in small claims should it go there?,"Unfortunately I was recently in a wreck out of town, approximately 3.5 hours away from where I live.  After an extended repair period of several weeks I went back to pick up my car.  

After getting the car home, I have discovered multiple issues.  The headlights were not aimed properly as stated when they handed the car over to me.  I had my local shop handle this problem, and requested and received remuneration for this from the shop.

However, now I am realizing that my A/C is no longer working right as we are approaching summer.  The A/C condenser was replaced as part of the previous repair.  I notified the shop of this issue requesting authorization to have my local mechanic take care of this problem as well, however they stated that they want to have the car there in case they need to replace parts under warranty.  I think it's likely just a leak and they don't want to pay my mechanic to diagnose it.

Of course, I am hoping to negotiate this through with the shop, but if I had to go to small claims court, I am wondering what my chances of prevailing are in the following scenarios:

1) I have the repairs done here by my mechanic and try to recoup my expenses through the court (preferable solution to me) or

2) I travel to them and attempt to recoup my expenses for gas, food and lodging via small claims (not the best, but acceptable).

I realize this is small potatoes, but I'm hoping that someone here can enlighten me as to the legal issues.",AskLawyers
[GA] Is it wise tax-wise for me for my older sister to handle the distribution of her IRAs the way described below upon her death?,"
I have 4 sisters, all but 1 of them older. I will be 70 in July. My oldest sister is 80 and is down here in Florida with me. She has about $300K in IRAs (about $50K in a Roth) and owns a $500,000 house with a $160,000 mortgage. She has left it all to me in her Will (her decision) and I am also the sole beneficiary to her IRAs trusting me to distribute to my other living siblings upon her death depending on the situation at that time. However, the more I think about it, the more I worry that is not the ideal situation for me tax wise. Could I just distribute her IRAs amongst myself and my living siblings upon her death without exposing myself to a bad tax situation?",AskLawyers
[VT] Is misdiagnosis of a somewhat rare disease considered malpractice?,"Long story, but I'll try to make it short. So our 10 year old son has been having diarrhea for 3 years. First year, it was daily, and we brought him to his pediatrician 5 or 6 times. Pediatrician had us do food diaries, try fiber, prebiotic, then wanted us to start our then 7 year old on antidepressants - thinking it was anxiety related IBS. Second year, he began having diarrhea 6 - 10 times per day, and our pediatrician left. We saw a NP who did write up some labs, but they were basic ones, and the office/lab kept giving us the wrong tests. NP tried to send a referral to a New Hampshire Pediatric Gastroenterologist, but it never went through and we were told to wait for a call. Beginning of year 3, diarrhea became more frequent and bloody. We took him to the ER where they did some imaging. ER doc said everything looked normal. We followed up with the NP and really got on them to get the referral in for the New Hampshire GI doc. Appointment was made for 8 months out. Went to Pediatric GI doc appointment, GI doc seemed sure it was constipation. He sent us downstairs for an X-ray and ""confirmed"" constipation. GI doc ordered 3 colon cleanses spaced 6 weeks apart. No hard stool came out, and symptoms did not improve. 

A few months ago, we did the last cleanse. Our son was having bloody diarrhea 20-30 times per day. One day I heard him vomiting in the bathroom, and apparently he had been throwing up multiple times per day for the last 2 weeks. He was visibly skinny, 40 lbs at 10 years old. 

We decided to take him to a Massachusetts ER, and the ER doctor was able to look at the previous X-ray and MRI from New Hampshire and Vermont, and immediately noticed intestinal wall thickening. It was even written on the radiology report of one. Within hours, he was sent to a children's hospital in Springfield MA. 

He was there for 3 weeks, and was finally diagnosed with Ulcerative Colitis. I wasn't there, but my wife and her mom were. My wife kept talking about how dumbfounded the doctors were. Supposedly, they couldn't believe that the NH pediatric GI doctor ignored the intestinal wall thickening, and diagnosed constipation instead of IBD. It sounds like the colon cleanses prescribed were completely unnecessary, and likely harmful. I can attest to how painful they were. 

I personally can't get over the first 2 years of treatment at our pediatricians office. Or lack thereof. Both my wife and I didn't feel heard, and I'm thinking back and wondering if they didn't believe us. 

Also, I can't help but wonder what sort of life our son is going to have. He needs infusions now, and likely periods of prednisone use. I wonder if this were caught sooner, if he would've needed less treatment. What sort of damage was done? Would he have suffered for this long? We've had to continue homeschooling because of this, and I'm not sure if it's a good idea to send him to school. The infusions are immunosuppressive, and he's now at a higher risk of infection. 

Anyway. Just feeling kind of fucked over, and want him to have a decent life. Thanks for any insight. ",AskLawyers
[CA] family law question re lien filed by opposing council ,"My ex wife got awarded lawyer fees when we came to a stipulated judgement August of 2023 bc she didn’t really work during our marriage. We  negotiated opposing councils charge down to 5500 for a fairly long process. OC included language in the judgement stating that they were to be paid “forthwith”, against the advice of my council I refused to pay OC bc I fundamentally disagree with the concept of having to pay the general to fight against me. They filed a lien against my house which I had to sell. The lien amount to the scumbags is now 5380, does that include a filing fee, or did the scumbags charge me an hour to file the lien? OC also fired my ex 2 days after the judgement filed for what that’s worth. My questions are: if they charged me one hour to file the lien am I now a “client” and I can now speak to directly to both scumbags and their POS paralegal (my attorney would have my ass and fire me for that) and if the judgement is treated as an infallible document that must be followed, the scumbags are only permitted and entitled to the original 5500, and I could go and cuss an attorney in the courthouse hallway and demand my $350 back couldn’t I? I know that I got a screaming deal and OC obviously lowered the number down to incentivize me to agree and let them fire my ex. Any help is appreciated 
",AskLawyers
[MI] I don't understand the 100 mile rule ,Apparently asking to explain the law counts as legal advice so friend of the court wouldn't tell me anything. I initially established the custody case in 2015 but since then have changed it through mediation several times. I'm trying to figure out if I have to go 100 miles from the original location I was in 9 years ago or if I would have to go by the location I was in when we made a new custody agreement several years later. Also not sure if it's relevant but when the custody agreement was originally established in 2015 I was leaving the relationship with my kids dad because it was abusive and just wound up at my aunt and uncles house but it was never my legal residence.,AskLawyers
[TN] Signs on the back of transport vehicles?,"Ive always wondered if the ""stay back x feet"" sign on vehicles actually matter or make them less liable if something flies off and breaks a windshield. Hopefully it's not just me but I can't easily gauge 200 ft from something when I'm driving off the top of my head anyways. Shouldn't they still have full responsibility if whatever is being transported falls off and damages another vehicle regardless of their sign?",AskLawyers
[UT] Can my company force our landlord to fix bathroom exhausts?,"The company I work for rents space in a retail building. I noticed recently that the exhaust fans in the bathroom were non functional. I mentioned this to the admin team, and they said they emailed the building manager about it a year ago and were basically told that it wasn’t a priority. Isn’t functional bathroom exhaust a code requirement? Thanks in advance.",AskLawyers
"[MO] I'm having a code enforcement/interpretation issue with the city. The code states I am entitled to a ""Judicial Review"" Is a Judicial Review different from suing the city?","\[Deleted\] City code sec. 13-43 amends Section 109.1 of the 2018 International Fire Code to read as follows: ""Any owner, agent or other person shall have the right to seek judicial review of a decision of the code official refusing to grant a modification to the provisions of this code. The petition for judicial review shall be to the circuit court of \[Deleted\] county as established in Article 536 of the Revised Statutes of Missouri.""

I have had an ongoing situation with the Fire Marshall's inspection team regarding the applicable codes for fire extinguishers. I had several discussions (verbal and emails) with the inspecting agent, the inspector chief, and the chief of the entire department. When they finally had given me a definitive answer denying my requests, I reached out to the City Administrator about how to proceed. He essentially punted the question back to the fire chief and the chief punted on to a city attorney.

The questions I had asked the City Administrator were...

""I would like information about the process of having a judicial review for my situation. Specifically, if it is a formal court proceeding or a more casual discussion? Would I be submitting my arguments beforehand or addressing them in person? Are there any costs to me to initiate this process?""

The answer from the city attorney basically told me to get my own attorney.

If I were suing the city then I would expect to need to hire an attorney. I don't know exactly what I imagined a ""Judicial Review"" to be, but I wasn't expecting a Law and Order episode.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",AskLawyers
"[NY] Wife was tripped by an upturned metal bar in a sidewalk grate, what are my options?","My wife was walking and pushing our son in a stroller when her foot caught on a piece of metal that was bent up and she fell onto the grating. I'm concerned that she may be more injured than she realizes (high pain tolerance) and this thing needs to be fixed because more people are going to fall. But I'm not sure if it would be the city's responsibility or one of the owners of the two buildings the grate spans, or possibly even a utility company. Any advice would be helpful.",AskLawyers
[TX] I believe someone I hired on Rover to watch my dogs used my home to record pornography for their own financial gain,"Basically what the title says. Hired someone on Rover to watch our two dogs on a last minute trip (death in family). No issues of note while we were away, dogs were fine when we returned and we had daily contact with updates from her on how they were doing.

However, upon cleaning the guest room that was used while we were gone, we found a lube applicator and a piece of paper with two names written on either side with the date, a name, and the word ""Fansly"" written on it. The first side of that sheet of paper was her name and a date in Mid-March of this year, the second side was a male individuals name with the date April 8th, 2024 (which was while we were gone). This is a common identity verification method used by sites like Fansly and OnlyFans to help new users create profiles for posting content.

She'd asked if her ""boyfriend"" could bring her food because she was a picky eater, which we said was fine, but we never consented to anyone else staying at the house (this is all documented in text exchange).

When we found these items today, I looked on Rover and another user posted a review just this week about a similar situation (they caught her in their home with her ""husband"" who she'd supposedly not told them about at all)

I sent her a photo of the stuff we found and asked for an explanation, giving her a chance to own up to it, but she denied any knowledge of the lube applicator and basically just brushed off the identification intormation and apologized for leaving trash behind. I responded telling her that we're not dumb, and she needs to get rid of any content involving our personal property.

Didn't take much looking to find her Fansly profile, which conveniently started posting the day after the one which is written under her name on the sheet of paper.

I haven't actually seen any content involving our home, I don't want to take that step to actually create an account or pay for access to her content.

Any advice is much appreciated.",AskLawyers
[WA] New Cannabis Laws,"Hello! I was curious about the new cannabis laws surrounding employers testing applicants pre employment in Washington state. (RCW 49.44.240) These new laws were effective Jan 1st 2024.

1) ""Nothing in this section:
Prohibits an employer from basing initial hiring decisions on scientifically valid drug screening conducted through methods that do not screen for nonpsychoactive cannabis metabolites;""

I have read that this section can be understood to mean employers must use alternative methods of testing other than urine. ie. saliva and hair. How are these methods of testing valid compared to urine? They only test for THC while the others don't? Their point seems to be that urine testing isnt an accurate measure of using while on the job, are the other two tests? I'm confused how this makes sense because THC lingers in your system long after use, so how is this any better than testing for other cannabinoids? Are companies actually shelling out the costs to do hair testing now for pre employment? or saliva? Has anyone had any experiences in industry? For reference im a computer-based engineer.

2) Would these protections apply to companies outside of WA state? Ie. i live in WA and work remote at a company based in another state. I have read that the employee laws of the state they are working in tend to apply, but I wasn't sure with this one.

Thank you!!",AskLawyers
[DC] [US] Is jury selection outdated?,"^(\[DC\] \[VA\] \[MD\] \[ID\] \[AR\] \[AK\] \[WV\] \[KY\] \[USA\] \[US\] \[UK\] \[THE WEST\] \[EVERYWHERE\] {PLANET EARTH\])

Is Jury Duty / jury selection outdated? Should jurors be selected based on their understanding of the law? Maybe jurors should only be selected from JD's, those with Bachelor's degrees in relevent fields, or those who are in law school perhaps?",AskLawyers
[NY] is there actual evidence?,"The prosecutors have copies of the checks written to Michael Cohen as a reimbursement of his payment to Stormy. 

Does Cohen have a copy of the payments to Stormy? Does Stormy have evidence that she was paid exactly what Cohen’s reimbursement was?

If so, isn’t that game over?",AskLawyers
[IN] I believe my workplace has incorrectly labeled me as an exempt employee,"About two months ago, I was hired for my first office-type job. My job title is “Customer Service Associate,” and my duties are primarily clerical. I make calls, put appointments on calendars, print out and label paperwork for clients to sign, and man the front desk. It’s very entry level; I don’t manage anyone. It’s a good gig and valuable experience. I’d like to keep my job. 

However, I think there are some issues with the way they pay. I make $28,500 a year as an exempt employee and work from 7:30 to 5:00 with an hour lunch. Most weeks, I end up staying late a couple days to get work done before Friday. When I was hired, I thought this was okay and standard, but I recently stumbled across a Reddit thread about the legal requirements for an employee to be exempt, and I don’t think I meet them. I read part 541 of the FLSA, and I was a little shocked. 

I believe that the exemption requirements I am closest to meeting are the administrative exceptions, but I don’t make anywhere near the $684 a week to qualify, nor do I meet the “discretion and independent judgement” requirements. I work for a financial institution, but I am not an advisor, and I am not a personal assistant. I’m basically a secretary.

How do I bring this up to my boss without losing my job? I don’t want to sue. The overtime I would be owed is less than $1,000, and I like the job. I would just like to be compensated fairly and not be forced to stay late for no overtime. How would you move forward? Is it legal for me to record the confrontation? Am I actually correctly classified as exempt? Any advice is welcome! Thank you. ",AskLawyers
[Tx] Can I sue for false arrest or filing a false report?,"
On November 22, 2023, a guy stopped in front of me on the freeway in rush hour stop &amp; go traffic, jumped out with his phone, and started screaming’You hit me! You hit me! You are going to pay!’

First, I never felt a bump and I truly did not believe we touched. 

As I was driving home, a Williamson County Sheriff called me. (Where it ‘happened’ was in Austin, Texas but this little part is in Williamson County; not Travis like most of Austin. However, I live in Killeen in Bell County) He claimed that I had left the scene of an accident. I told him that we had never touched, sent him pictures of my front bumper with no smudges in the dirt on it, and gave him (the Sheriff) my information. He thanked me and hung up. 

In February 17, 2024, 5 Bell county Sheriffs showed up in my front yard and put me in handcuffs for ‘leaving the scene of an accident’. We talked for 15 minutes, then, they moved my  handcuffs to the front and we talked 5 minutes more. They then put me in the police car. I waited 20 minutes and they came and apologized saying it usually doesn’t take this long. 20 minutes later, they came back and apologized again saying “We’re sorry. It usually only takes about 5 minutes to confirm the warrant but they cannot find the warrant and are having to reissue it”. I sat there for 20 minutes more and they finally came and said they had the warrant and were taking me to jail. 

I spent 24 hours in bell County jail then saw a judge who set my bail. After that, Williamson County Sheriffs showed up to transport me. THEY took me to Travis County jail. I spent 12 hours there before bringing released with a court date without any reason. 

I have had to hire a lawyer because they would not grant a ‘court appointed lawyer’ because I have a job. They have NO evidence and NO witnesses. It is strictly my word vs his. In the Sheriff’s report, he says that the guy’s rear bumper had been previously wrecked. The guy came back with an estimate of $600. When asked for a written estimate, he came back with one for $4,000 saying the bumper needed to be replaced. He claimed (at the scene) that his back hurt a little. Five days later he claims he had to go to the hospital because he had a concussion (from a 5MPH accident that never happened). The Sheriff disputed these claims in his report. 

Travis County read his report then filed charges with no evidence or witnesses. Now I am told that if I pay the guy, do 10 hours community service, and take a drivers safety course, they will drop the charges. (But they have no evidence or witnesses)

I’m PISSED! I have done nothing but give the guy the finger and I have spent 38 hours in jail, paid a lawyer $4,000, and am told it will cost me MORE to not have the case go to trial. 

First, can I sue this guy for filing a false police report, for putting me in jail, and for the $4,000 I am out for my lawyer? 

Second, can I sue the Travis County Sheriff’s office and the DA for false arrest based on the fact that they have no evidence and no witnesses yet they arrested me and for the $4,000 I am out for my lawyer? 

Again, I am just pissed off. I did nothing, cooperated, there was no investigation, there is no evidence, there are no witnesses, and I am being charged. Why???? Why am I NOT ‘Guilty until proven innocent’? How can they arrest me based on his word and nothing else? 

PLEASE help me understand one way or the other. Thank you for any help or advice you can give. ",AskLawyers
[CA] How common is it to be asked to surrender your right to have a dispute decided in a court when signing an agreement with a law firm (and instead agreeing to arbitrate)?,"I'm about to sign a contract with a law firm, they will help my startup with anything legal/contract related. In the agreement it says basically that ""I agree to arbitrate, me and the firm acknowledge that in the event of a dispute between us we are both giving up the right to go to court and instead accept to resolve it using arbitration for resolution."" Is this common practice with law firms? I don't anticipate to run into any issues with them but I don't understand why we can't go to court if need be, not that I'd win the case against lawyers but still why is this a thing?",AskLawyers
[non-US] Canada injury claim? Aka is it even worth talking to a lawyer about,"I'm in BC if that affects anything.

So about 7-8 years ago, I was at a Taekwondo class and the instructor came up behind me and pushed on my knees as I was doing a ""butterfly stretch"". I heard my hip go ""CHA-CHUNK"" and my knee hit the floor, felt some pain, etc. Since I was 16, and naiive, I didn't think this was abnormal at all.

Flash forward a few years, I show my physiotherapist (unrelated back issue) I can pop my hip out (no pain, again just thought ""huh, wow, I'm so flexible""). She said stop that immediately, that will cause damage. So I listened and stopped.

A couple more years go by (Jan 2023), and I was doing some light stretching and heard my hip pop again. I again thought nothing of it. As the months passed, I found that walking for more than 5-10 minutes straight hurt my hip, and went back to physio to see what was up. I find out my hip didn't pop back in properly in January. Then in August, it pops again but WAY WORSE. I missed three weeks of work because I couldn't stand, sit, or walk. I started taking prescribed anti-inflammatories to control the pain. Its been eight months since then and my hip still hurts, I can't walk very far before it starts burning, and its so loose it pops unintentionally. My quality of life has definitely been affected.

Is it possible to sue the company or instructor that caused this? Do I have a legal leg to stand on?",AskLawyers
[NE] Somebody owes me money and states it will be paid but another person is threating action that can impede that payment.,"Hello!

I am in a situation where I am owed money and have been paid by them prior, but due to anger somebody is threating a report that will block an income stream that will be used to pay. Is there anything that cam be done legally to deter this or have the blocking o
person pay instead? Blocking person has been well warned about this issue at hand.

Consult an attorney Is one option, what are any other options that I may not know of?",AskLawyers
"[CA] I paid a lawyer to draft me an employment contract so I can hire a freelancer, it's been three weeks and he hasn't done it. After how long is it considered too long?!","Hi I hired a reputable (in my field) lawyer to draft a contract to hire my first freelancer. I paid him and all that and I'm still waiting for the contract. It's been almost three weeks, but I'm wondering is this supposed to be normal?  I'll call him tomorrow because I've sent him several emails asking for the contract",AskLawyers
[TX] What does the X mean?,[TX] What does the X mean?,AskLawyers
"[MD] stopped by LP at walmart for shoplifting, any advice?","i'm a year old female and got caught shoplifting at walmart with 2 others. they added up everything all 3 of us shoplifted together and it totaled around $260. im banned from walmart for life and will have to go to court. i was trying to leave when 2 of the security employees walked infront of me so i bumped into them a bit. this resulted in them saying i assaulted them and put my hands on them. 

i just wanna know how screwed i am and if it's possible to be charged with assault for bumping into the security people when trying to exit. i also wanna know if me having mental disorders(anxiety, bipolar 2, and adhd) might help my case.

i've definitely learned my lesson but idk what to do from here except wait for the court notice and get a lawyer. any advice is extremely appreciated. ",AskLawyers
[NC] what would the sentence/charge look like for shoplifting ~50$ worth of stuff?,[NC] what would the sentence/charge look like for shoplifting ~50$ worth of stuff?,AskLawyers
[non-US] work injury advice uk,"Work injury uk advice 

I work for a small carpentry company in uk. Whilst using a palm router, the cable was close to the cutting blade so I went to move it and my glove got caught and pulled my finger in and I’m having to get the finger amputated to the first knuckle ( it’s my ring finger so will end up same length as my pinky finger) on my dominant hand. I was wearing gloves supplied by work which were ill fitting.  There was no first aider on site (my work is all workshop based) and the manager wasn’t in.  I’m 18. When it happened I had to wait about 30 minuits for my mother to collect me and take me to a&amp;e. None of the 3 people who can drive who was with me took me to the hospital. I asked my boss to record the injury officially to which he called me and asked whether I was planning on sueing. I told him I’d like to keep it civil and discuss sick pay but if he can’t do that I’d have to take a legal route as I can’t afford to not be paid but my work can’t be done one handed. He says he can’t afford to pay me if I’m not working and if I sue, the company would collapse and I wouldn’t receive anything anyway.  

Question is how would this likely pan out in court, is what he is saying true and what alternative routes can be taken.  Preference would be friendly rout where the company doesn’t collapse as it’s my job too


Many thank in advance ",AskLawyers
[MS] plein air painting and trespassing laws,If I stay on the side of the road/ditch with my easel can  a landowner still ask me to leave? There is a no trespassing sign but I’m thinking this won’t apply since I’m on side of the road,AskLawyers
"[TX] Just got papers saying I’m being sued, need help ","So last year I had taken my dog to the vet for what I tought was constipation and paid to have x rays done. It took half a day for them to tell me that the x rays came back that he had a broken back, small dog possibly from jumping and falling incorrectly. They said they had a surgeon who could operate but that he wouldn’t be available for two days so they’d have to hold my dog. Once the surgeon came in he said that he couldn’t operate because there was nerve damage and needed a specialist which I had to pick up my buddy and drive to the place to get the surgery. Once I got there the surgeon looks at the x rays and asks if I’ve been talked to about the damages, which I told him I was just been told he needed surgery. He let me know that with the type of break on his spine there was a danger that he would pass from the surgery and less than a 15% chance he would even be ok and since he was young at about 7 months that he recommended putting him down and he would do the same if it was his dog. I decided to put him down and paid for the visit to the second place. Now at the first animal hospital I took him to when they said he needed surgery it would be up to 10k and I of course didn’t care I wanted my buddy to be ok so I took a loan trough a loan place that helps with stuff like that. Now since the surgery never happened they still tried to bill me close to 4K for the x rays and holding my dog for about 3 days. I was pissed and with the loss of my buddy I ignored the bill as I was going trough depression. Now a year later I just got served papers that a collections company is suing me. Can someone point me in the right direction as to who I need to talk to? What kind of lawyer or attorney? ",AskLawyers
[IL] How to find a hungry attorney or paralegal willing to file some paperwork for $$$.,No one wants my case because it is small... I desperately need help filing some motion paperwork in Will County tomorrow. Is there anything I can say upfront to help get someone to take a small case? I am willing to pay above regular fees. Is there somewhere to find new grads or paralegals who are need the $$$ and extra work? I am out of state which is further complicating everything. Any help / advice appreciated.,AskLawyers
"[PA] Mail theft, and what to do about it?","I moved in with my brother who lives in a house him and his estranged wife own. they have been separated for a few years now currently divorcing and she doesn’t live in this house. She does however have her father come by and pick up the mail unannounced but when he does he takes everyones mail including packages. she does drop off the mail few weeks later at a restaurant they jointly own, but never communicates that she does. this has caused me a few late fees with some bills I wasn’t aware of. I want to take action because asking her in a text message hasn’t worked. What crimes are we talking about and the consequences of these crimes?   


The mailbox is about 50 yards from the house with obstructed view from the house security cameras. so I’m looking into a battery or solar powered camera to get evidence, if you have any positive experience with a camera, please let me know. I also want to plant a fake package with a gps and glitter surprise, mainly for more evidence incase the cops want to know where they live. is that against any laws if it is addressed to me? ",AskLawyers
[CA] Under what circumstances if any can you legally answer your door naked?,"Does the property type possibly matter? The housing location? Are there exemptions if it is part of religious practices or something? I know some states use lewd intent so a secondary question is how do they prove that?

I know this is a strange question but it just popped in my head.",AskLawyers
"[FL] Hypothetical: If a truck driver for a corporation like Frito-Lay hit and killed someone, would the family be able to sue the company, or just the person?","This is for the plot of a novel I want to write. The dead person would be in the passenger side, both drivers are alive but the one that got hit is is traumatized and needs physical therapy to recover the ability to walk without a mobility aide. ",AskLawyers
[TX] can someone please help me understand my temporary custody orders?,"I am the custodial parent, I am having trouble understanding when the father is to see our child. He says he is supposed to get him this next Saturday on the 27th, and we just did our second supervised visit today. I am confused as to what the schedule would look like on a calendar. I don’t want to withhold my son from a visit accidentally but I also don’t want to do a visit if it’s not his time. Thank you for your time!",AskLawyers
[NY] Insolvent parent who is currently in a coma has debt in her credit report from debt collector for an eviction that was was settled and paid in 2023,"

Hi this is a throwaway account this relates to NYC.

My mother is currently in a coma due to various issues and collapsed organs. She may wake up or may not.  She also has dementia and can’t remember anything recently and I was told her dementia is progressing.  She is currently or was to be in a long term care facility but is in a coma at the hospital for the past almost 6 weeks. Once she hopefully wakes up and gets discharged she will be put into a long term care facility. 

Previous to that she was deemed unable to care for herself by her Dr (due to the dementia and physical impairments from working too much and her body basically giving up) and the landlord was notified and given official medical documents from the Dr as well as having her lease termed under the law.  

Landlord sued her for eviction for back rent and also lied to the city when the city(NYC)was attempting to pay the balance resulting in my moms case being denied since the amount she was sued for was wildly different than what they told the city. 
I represented my mom at a court hearing after filing all the responses and trying to settle before the hearing, which was ignored. 

 Landlord also refused to accept rent which I found out in court they could not do and their attorney denied telling them not to accept rent.  This landlord has a history of suing elderly tenants and losing as I found in court records so I guess that’s why they decided to give it to a debt collector. 

Case was settled the amount they sued for was paid along with an additional 4K.  Whatever balance there was, was under 6k. There was no judgment against her the case was discontinued and no longer shows up on the court website. 

They were told by the court if they weren’t satisfied with the settlement to end the eviction they must file civil. This was the end of 2023. My mother had not lived in the apartment since September and it was vacated of her belongings in early Dec 2023 right after the eviction hearing per court agreement. Her lease was due to end 12/31/23.  All the parties agreed and the case was discontinued after I paid the sued for amount plus an additional 4K. 

I Was checking her credit report today and saw as of April 14th a debt collector listed a debt of 11k from the landlord which my mom did not owe and it was more than the landlord would have been able to due for civilly after the settlement if they chose to sue.

As stated my mom is in a coma and is insolvent she has no money. She does have a bank account which is used to pay for her long term care, medical issues and anything else needed for her care with money from her pension, social and that I contribute to. My mother has no worked in 3 years and only gets social security and her meager pension. I have power of attorney so my account is linked to hers. I only recently obtained power of attorney. 

Neither me or my mother live in nys anymore we left in Jan 2024. She fell into a coma about a month ago came out of it then went back into it here visiting a relative and when she is cleared I will be taking her back to the new state once she is medically able I am making arrangements since she will need very specialized care. 

The debt collector never attempted to contact her.  I get all the mail and nothing was ever sent I also have her cellphone and no calls from them was ever made.  I was told before anything gets placed on a credit report the debt collector has to make attempts to contact. They did not. 

My concern is they will try to get a quick illegal judgment since they can’t serve her and take her social or pension and bank account which would derail her care. 

She is not on my bank account but due to the power of attorney our accounts are linked I am not sure I can unlink our accounts without losing the power of attorney to handle her bills which come out of her bank account. 

What can I do to protect my mom and by extension my bank account that is tied to hers?",AskLawyers
[PA] When is harassment a crime?,"Ive heard the term ""harassment"" in the context of a criminal offense  come up in the local news recently and wanted to understand what this actually is. I'm not talking about harassment in the workplace, or  anything related to employment law. I'm asking about situations when  people are not at work.   

I did some online research on this and found various explanations  but they mostly appear to be separate crimes such as assault,  terroristic threats, stalking, indecent exposure, and vandalism.   

   I have always understood harassment to be recurring instances of  intimidation after a person has made it clear that these actions are  unwanted, but it appears PA can define harassment as types of  communication that would be protected by the first amendment.   

When is harassment actually a crime?   ",AskLawyers
[Il] What are the statute of limitations for bringing goods into the US from Iran?,"Let's say if someone brought a rug into the US from Iran in the 90s would that still be enforceable? I've read the statute of limitations for bringing goods in from foreign nations is five years typically; but, there are some circumstances that increase that time frame. What are those?",AskLawyers
[PA] Am I in trouble because my lawyer told me not to go to court?,My lawyer texted me the night before I was scheduled to go for a pretrial conference in court and said I didn’t have to go. The next day his secretary tells me that my next date is in June. Today I see the judge denied the motion to continue my attorney filed on April 17 so I’m wondering if I’m in trouble for not going? I have the texts he sent telling me not to go but still worried. ,AskLawyers
[OK]: my child is up for adoption without my consent ,My kids mother broke up with me 3 days after my little sister was killed and I went to the hospital to sit with her on life support. She said it was because I was different now and she just didn’t need that. She told me she would reach out to me about my child and blocked me. This was about two weeks after our positive pregnancy test. I have court on the 3rd to let them hear my side of the story and try to keep my right to my child. What do I need and what do I need to do. I’m freaking out. I make pretty good money now but also just started back at this job so it’s taking a little for me to get back on my feet. But I will be more than good money wise by that date and it will only get better from here. Do I have a real fighting chance? And what do I need to do to beat secure this opportunity to fix this?? Please any help or experience would be greatly appreciated.🙏🏻 also she has relinquished all her rights,AskLawyers
"[NY] Has there ever been a criminal with a wild story, that turned out to be true?","I thought of this after remembering an episode of ""hey Arnold"". In that episode Arnold was accused of stealing money, after telling a wild story about a woman with green hair, and an eye patch. When I watched it so many years ago, I was frustrated about how stupid the moral was. As an adult i think ""it's new york, maybe that does happen?"" Has anything this wild ever occurred?",AskLawyers
[FL]: Can I sue this guy for Harrassment?,"This dude has been following me when I tried to access my community pool making sure I'm a local resident when I scan my card. I let it go as I didn't want to escalate it. He did it again and followed me another time. Same thing I let it go. Well, yesterday morning, I caught him taking pictures of my car outside the community pool and he was walking around my car.

I confronted him and he run away. A couple was walking by and asked me what was that about and why he was taking pictures of my car. I got their phone number as witness.

This guy as resident wants to police people around and hoa strongly advises against it. I called HOA and they asked me to call them when I see him and they will handle him.

Can I sue this guy? The other option I was thinking is to call the non emergency police and let them handle it and have then write a written report for documentation. Im in Florida. Any help is greatly appreciated.",AskLawyers
[TN] Do I have any legal recourse against this do I have any legal recourse against this physician? ,"Back in January, I was suffering from severe pain in the middle of my back and severe constipation. Being short-handed at work at the time did not allow me to take off to see my normal PCP, so I had to go to the local convenient Care after I got off of work at 6:00. I did this 2 Fridays in a row actually at the same place. The first diagnosis that I got was a back strain. I was given a steroid shot and some antibiotics. It worked for about a day. I tried to live with it for a while to see if it would get better to no resolve. The following Friday I went back to this same office and told them of the exact same symptom. They did an x-ray on me and took blood work. It was quite obvious that they were ready to get out of there as it was a Friday night and it was close to closing time. According to them, their X-rays showed no problems, but I had a low-grade fever and my liver enzymes were slightly elevated. 
    The nurse practitioner came back to me and said that my liver was failing and that I needed to get to the ER ASAP. This woman brought me to tears thinking that I was about to die. I asked her if it could be anything else. She said possibly, but she was pretty certain that I had some major liver problems going on. No mention of how to fix the constipation mind you. 
    Fast forward 2 hours, I am in the emergency room and telling the triage nurse about the symptoms and everything that the nurse practitioner had told to me. They run a CAT scan on me based upon the nurse practitioners findings and find that my constipation was so bad that it was what was contributing to my back pain. Their blood work showed no indications of any type of elevated liver enzymes or anything abnormal. I have a feeling the ER thought that I was there just for pain meds or something so they didn't spend much time with me other than to prescribe me some lenses which within 1 hour completely cured everything. 
     So now the bills are coming due from the ER. My insurance was charged $15,000 and I am going to be out of pocket about $3,000 all because I got a bum diagnosis from a nurse practitioner that I'm not even certain had a doctor review her findings. I went back to see the nurse practitioner as she was working the next morning, and all she could do was basically not even look me in the eye and just said I'm sorry. 
     Do I have any legal recourse against the clinic for giving me such a poor diagnosis that led to a lot of trauma emotionally for me and my family as well as putting me in a financial burden? If any of this doesn't make sense please let me know and I will clear it up. Thank you for your time. ",AskLawyers
"[CA] I want to put my house for sale, it’s currently listed for lease by a realtor. I want to end the agreement and put it on sale with a different realtor. Is it possible?","I was considering putting my house for rent but now I want to put it for sale instead. I don’t think I want to be going through the stress of being a landlord in California. My friend’s friend is a realtor, I signed a listing agreement with him and the office he works for to put the house for rent. The guy isn’t great he’s just talk no action, and he put a picture on the internet that we had discussed to not put it up (my work desk, it’s very personal). This, on top of the difficulty of finding a good tenant is giving me a lot of stress. I don’t want this and instead I’d rather sell the house and be done with it. I don’t want to use this guy or the office he works for, I want to use the agent that had helped me buy the house. I can’t find a way to break this agreement in the document, I’m considering telling him I decided to not sell it because of my work (he knows I’m considering leaving the company and exploring something in my own financially risky) and to stay here for another year. Or if we want to get serious to end the agreement because of the picture fiasco. I’m considering getting consultation by a lawyer, what lawyer would I need? Real estate lawyer? ",AskLawyers
[AL] Can I sue for an injury that happened at a school sponsored/run event?,"This is a throwaway account just to be safe.

I [17M] am in show choir at my high school, and we have had several performances over the last few days. At the end of the last number before our intermission, as I was exiting the stage down a set of 8-10 stairs, I tripped and fell down with my left foot ending up bending awkwardly under my body and and I could literally hear the sound of a bone snapping. I went to an emergency orthopedic the following morning when they opened, and they determined that the ankle had indeed been broken. 

This alone isn't reason enough to sue, but the stairs, which went up to a platform 5+ feet above floor level, did not have a railing on them. This isn't because the stairs don't have a railing, but because the choir directors neglected to re-attach them after transporting the stairs back from our last competition. The stairs are already incredibly shaky and unstable with the railing, but they are much worse when you don't have the railing to balance with. We definitely had the railings at the time because they were just sitting backstage and were in the way and tripping people until one of our crew members moved them out of the walkway (but still backstage). The stairs are also on wheels to move/transport them easier. Backstage is completely dark, and even though the stairs have glow tape on them at the edges of each step, they don't receive enough light to absorb during non-performance times to actually work when they're needed.

This happened in our school's performing arts center (auditorium and stage basically) during a series of events planned by, run by, and attended by members of the school faculty and staff. Is this an actual case that I could proceed with? If so, how would that work/what grounds could I actually sue on?",AskLawyers
[MA] Child Support Case “Disposed”,"I was looking at the child support case for my child and noticed that under case activity it says “Subsequent action 3 filed between 1/1/2008 and 12/31/2018 was automatically disposed on 03/27/2024 per request from AOPFC and DRAP.	“. I cannot figure out what this means. 

My son’s father owes about 30k in support and our son is only 15. He hasn’t paid since January. Does this mean they threw his case out? 

Thanks ",AskLawyers
[NY] Can police stop me from getting to my residence.,"Yesterday there was police intervention (with reported arrests and large number of officers) at a pro-Palestinian protest at Columbia University. The protest was inside Columbia University campus (not on the streets) and not blocking any pedestrian or car traffic (officers were though). The police buses (the ones for en-masse arrests) which were brought, were parked on an adjascent Manhattan street (114th). They were not used for arrests so they were probably meant for intimidation. *Police had put up fences and were prohibitting me from accessing my residence* on the blocked-off street (I asked, including asking whether I would be physically stopped if I tried). *There were no crimes ocurring on my street, and definitely not in my residence.* Can they legally do this? Do I have any way to sue them for this? As a side-note I needed to get home ASAP.  
If you need more context you can find relevant articles online from many sources.

https://preview.redd.it/ceonl30qdgvc1.jpg?width=1860&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=fb7024b48531beff64b673447ac36d8a01a49818",AskLawyers
[NJ] Can a lien be placed on the house even if the person lives there does not own it?,"Can a lien be placed on the house even if the person lives there does not own it?

The house in question is owned by me but it is also primarily residence for my husband.  His name is not on the deed. Can any type lien placed on the house because of him? e.g. for child support arrears,  business non payment etc...",AskLawyers
"[CA] I parked next to a UPS truck and heard a faint sound while pulling in and didn’t think anything of it. We into a shop and came out an hour and a half later and noticed that my car was scratched, but UPS truck had already left. How should I proceed? ","I am an oblivious idiot. :(

Edit: 

I scratched the UPS truck and didn’t realize it until after it had already left. ",AskLawyers
[FL] How do prosecutors decide to bring a criminal complaint to court?,"If someone reports a crime to the police, the police investigate and find overwhelming evidence of the crime, the crime is clearly defined in the state criminal code, etc., etc. -- is there anything that makes it a definite responsibility of the state prosecutor to bring the crime to criminal court in some way? Instead of just saying something like ""we have never enforced this statute in this jurisdiction, we don't have a procedure for it, so we are just going to drop the case because it would be too much work or too risky for us personally because we would not be following a well established procedure?""",AskLawyers
[PA]: My employer (a franchisee) removed me from our work group chat and took me off the schedule for no reason. Can I sue?,"The day last week's schedule was posted in the group chat, I sent a message asking if someone could cover one of my shifts that I could not come in for. Everyone (including shift leads, the manager and the owner) looks at this group chat.
Today, I opened my messaging app to see that I had been removed from this chat, and coworkers let me know I wasn't on the schedule for next week. Is it wrong to think that if they saw my message, they would know that I would not be coming in and was letting them know of this? And can I sue for wrongful termination?",AskLawyers
[NC] NFCU Discrimination lawsuit,Does anyone have a POC website email and number where I can get a claim number to submit my claim for the lawsuit? I can't find anything online about it.,AskLawyers
"[TN] Property management sent us letter that we owed them 3k for late payment, and will be sending us eviction letter if we are not paying it in 3 days.","But the thing is we never late on payment and we paid the rent online. We even have proof to significate it.

Turned out they have criminal activity from the last manager and 'wanted' to talk to the tenants to discuss the matter. I call it BS, they should have checked every payment history before sending that letter to tenants (Also, to phrase it nicely in the letter instead of 'late payment' and 'eviction'). They probably found this out after the tenants stormed back angrily at them. Oh, and for the cherry on top- aside from me (who is Asian) they appeared to only sent the letter to another immigrants. So this B stealing money from certain group of people.

I handed in my notice today because of this and cleared this out immediately. But the other tenant is not as lucky because she always paid with money order, sometimes cash (I remember that was an option). My question is, will she get f up with this property management for their incompetence of managing their own people? I feel sorry for her.
",AskLawyers
[NJ] no trespassing sign posted and neighbor injured in my property liability ,"Hypothetically If I have no trespassing signs clearly visible and neighbor injured in my property when they entered while mowing, what is my liability?

Neighbor clearly trespassed and has been warned in writing. ",AskLawyers
[WA] Reporting the protected party in my NCO case for an unrelated crime,"So, kind of a complicated situation. I allegedly reported the protected party in a no contact order in which I am the restrained person, for violating the no contact order HE is the restrained person in. I did not have any direct or indirect contact with the person. I merely reported that he was calling his victim from jail. They did charge him with 3 new felony counts, but haven't contacted me about anything to do with the case at all.

I will elaborate if this doesn't make a whole lot of sense Because I understand it is complicated lol.",AskLawyers
[TX] Probation early release,"I'm wondering if anybody has any recommendations on a good criminal defense attorney specifically in the Collin County area of Texas. I will be reaching my two year mark of probation and need to talk to a skilled attorney about filing a petition for early release. Any information or advice that anyone can give is greatly appreciated.
",AskLawyers
[TX] Probation early release,I'm wondering if anybody has any recommendations on a good criminal defense attorney specifically in the Collin County area of Texas. I will be reaching my two year mark of probation and need to talk to a skilled attorney about filing a petition for early release. Any information or advice that anyone can give is greatly appreciated.,AskLawyers
[AZ] can my sister 45F force my niece (18F) to live with her?,"My sister “Anne” has two biological children (27, 24) and custody of my OTHER sister’s two children (18 and 14)

18 niece “Sally” has hated living there for a while. She often gets the silent treatment for days at a time. Her aunt/uncle always tell her how her mom isn’t there for her, how she’ll end up like her mom, just overall some emotional/mental abuse. She’s rarely allowed to leave the house except for school and work, and when she is out of the house, her location is watched like a fugitive.

She enlisted into the navy and leaves in 8 weeks. She graduates in like 4 weeks. Because shit has gotten so bad at home, she decided to leave and move in with a friend and her single mom.

Ann is threatening to get the cops involved to bring Sally home?? I don’t know what ground this would be on.

*is this at all legal considering she is 18?*

I could give more info about some of the mistreatment but I just wanted my main question answered.",AskLawyers
[CA] Has Anyone Experience this LITIGATION DECLARATIONS OF DOCUMENTS SCAM !!? HELP!,"OK HERE'S A DOOZY - I am praying for HELP - Im a paralegal helping with a litigation case and the plaintiffs just submitted a boat load of files in formats that are all scrambled and not easily legible.....they came in 4 folders called DATA, IMAGES, NATIVES and TEXTS..

DATA - has really nothing

IMAGES - is like 10,000 images as .tif files

NATIVES - is powerpoint and .XLS files that seem normal

TEXT - 10000 pages of documents scrambled in .txt format that nobody uses...

I can't believe they submitted this!!?  Seems they used an extraction tool and then scrambled everything!!!? ... is there a tool to un-scamble this or correct it... hope someone has figured a solution to this so I don't have to read 20,000 .txt .tiff files... praying for help!! ",AskLawyers
[GA] car theft,"Talk about a shitty situation, any advice

Alright I'll try to include all relevant information in as few words as possible.


Hypothetically speaking:

You buy a car from an arms length friend who is adamant its working properly.


The original price is $2k, you put $1k down with an agreement to pay the rest later on, the seller is happy to let it go.


The car breaks down 30 mins after driving off with it, and then after getting it running again the headlights quit working at night while drive it home(this is just a small taste of the issues and money that went into make it an operable machine again, a lot of which happened the same day of purchase).


Due to these issues, you communicate that the car is far from operable and was actually dangerous to operate under such conditions, and you don't think it's fair to pay the remaining amount. The seller couldn't care less, and doesn't pursue the issue.


2 years later, the seller hits you up for the remaining balance. You say no and they use their own car dolly to come and tow the car from your house without permission.


What's your next step? 


More notes:

The title was never transfered(call it lack of time and cooperation from the seller)


It's a 40 year old car


Many personal belongings were in the car, items of both significant sentimental value and market value(a whole big ass safe with valueables, nothing illegal).


There wasn't any formal contract or receipts, just text messages that are saved and recorded.


Just curious what the best case scenario is here. Genuinely asking for a friend. 







",AskLawyers
[MA] Deposit deal changed ,"Hey yall, I'd appreciate some input. 

Usa - massachusetts, maine, north carolina

In February I signed a contact and put down a deposit on a metal barn. The contract did say no refunds. After that was done suddenly the sales person has some issue with their system, and I don't hear anything back until March. 

Early March, (new guy) says they didn't realize the Rent to own limit was not 20k, but 15k, and they would need an additional 750 for the deposit. I asked about some other options and wanted to see if I could go bigger now. After some back and forth i gave them my choice. I haven't signed anything new.  Now I'm being told the Rent to own limit is 12k without a credit check, 15k with, I was never told this on the original agreement and was also told there would be no interest or anything for a few months. The new building I was considering was a 2k difference, I already put down 3k, but am also being told if I go with the new one I will have to put down 7k instead of 2k+750. 

My question is since they asked for an additional deposit after I already agreed to a certain amount and sent it, and the finiancing/Rent to own options were inaccurate from what I was told, which was the reason I signed, is the contract void and the deposit now refundable due to their mistake and the change of the terms?

 I am in Massachusetts, they are in North Carolina, the barn was for Maine. I am having a hard time getting more than 1 response per week from them and that response in itself is incomplete to my questions. I want to know if I have any feet to stand on because of the contract technically changing. 


Thanks in advance for any help!",AskLawyers
[CA] can I take someone to small claims court if I only know their first and last name ? He stole 2k from me and refuses to give it back.,"Long story short I bought 2 vending machine with a location from a ""reputable seller"". I gave him a cashiers check for 12,000$. During the transfer process and onboarding of me taking over that machine for any online sales ( which took about 5 months) I was told by him and the company that the money was being withheld for me until the onboarding was done. Now over a year later I am realizing that I never received any of those funds during that time period. Ofcourse I called the company to figure this out and we were able to figure out that he actually never removed his bank account from the vending machine profile so therefore during those 5 months that I was already the owner a little over 2k was deposited into HIS bank account.

The company isn't able to help me much, they did email him the proof that he kept those 2k that belonged to me but they can't do much more. I have emailed him a dozen times, texted him, called him, requested the money thru cash all and Venmo which he now has me blocked. Can I take him to small claims court? I don't know his address and when I search up his LLC on the CA state board website nothing comes up which is weird because you can't even have a vending machine account without a legal LLC. I have his legal name, his business LLC. And his phone number which apparently I just found out is a google number but he has it registered for Venmo and cash app.

I have also found his business social media instagram. The company also told me that he has 7 other vending machines under his account currently so he is up and operating. I am 25 year old female and I would really love my money back I am not rich and worked hard to buy this small business and now I feel so horrible if any one could provide any insight!

I also have been stopping myself from going online and blasting him on vending machines face book groups as a buyer beware because I would hate for him to do this to someone else and those groups are very tight knit communities who always help each other . I have a small TikTok following as well and have went viral numerous times as well as lots of friends and family who are ready to basically harass him online into giving me my money or at the very least expose his fraudulent ways but I would much rather just get my 2k$$ back . If I can’t take him to small claims court I’ve been thinking of basically exposing him online or atleast “threatening” him to do so In hopes this makes him pay me back. I know most of us would pay it back because being exposed online could be very harmful to our business/personal life. ",AskLawyers
[MN] should I take the deal?,So I live in mn and refused a breathalyzer at the time I was on antibiotics that you cannot consume alcohol with because you will become violently ill I can prove this. The cop said he smelled alcohol on my breath that's why he needed to give me a breathalyzer but it was a lie I wasn't drinking explicitly being on the medication. My public defender says i should take the deal. 3 months on EHM that its a you say he say thing and l'd have to convince a jury and he doesn't think he can I think the prosecutor and him have something going on and are just screwing with me. any help with advice guys?,AskLawyers
[CO] what happens if a judge gives false information to defendant?,"CO what happens if a judge gives wrong information to defendant. 

What happens when a judge gives false information to a defendant?

Please be as DETAILED as ever as I am going to be helping my partner represent himself. 

Let me know if you need more information. 

STATE OF COLORADO 

We are currently are filing a transcript request form. 

He was in a OOP case. The events that was claimed that happened COULD have been fought in defense of my partner. He was not going to be criminally charged with anything, just a stay away order was requested by the plaintiff. 

Unfortunately my boyfriend didn’t care to fight it. “If she wants me to be away from her that’s fine with me I don’t care” attitude. 

He was told that he will not be criminally charged and it’s a civil order, and he specifically asked if he would still be able to have, carry, obtain and use firearms. He is an avid hunter, and it’s one of his passions. It was very important to him that he would still be able to have these rights. The judge told him that he in fact WOULD still have these rights, so, my partner did not fight the case. 

We have found out that the judge misinformed him, otherwise my partner would have used his rights and hired an attorney. 

We have tried appealing it and it got denied because he was told “he had a chance to fight the case” and chose not to. But ONLY under the circumstances that the judge told him, which was wrong. ",AskLawyers
[MD] Mentally ill ex,"So, question. It is not in our custody agreement. But can I refuse my kids seeing their other parent if the other parent is no longer getting treatment for their mental illness. They are a paranoid schizophrenic. The paper work states I am the kids legal representative. Yes I have documented proof, yes I am going back to court and filing this to make sure it is in the paper work. And I am going to make sure that their illness is documented with the court. ",AskLawyers
[non-US] What actually happens to trans people in Russia? ,"So, I’m trans, and it’s been a little dream of mine to travel to Russia. I’m in love with the food and many aspects of the culture, and I’m a massive fan of Dostoyevsky. In his novel Crime and Punishment, you can actually follow the route the protagonist takes to murder this old pawnbroker woman, and I think it’s the coolest thing that the number of steps and everything is accurate. But I digress.

My biggest issue is that I know Russia isn’t LGBTQ+ friendly, but what would actually happen to me if I were there? I was planning on waiting until I can change my gender marker on my license and get a passport with my correct gender and pass as cis. But would there be any way for them to “know”? I don’t plan on bottom surgery so I was kinda wondering if I should just wear a packer for possible bathroom issues or getting patted down? I know I’m probably overthinking but I feel like there are too many “worst case” stories and not like, an actual “This is what actually happens”. ",AskLawyers
[TX] Was the grandfather's will followed?," Background:

My husband's grandfather divorced his first wife (mother of his 4 children), and he kept the house. He re-married in the '80s, and his second wife (henceforth ""wife"") moved into his house. He died in 2012 while they were still married.

According to the Deed History for the home, several months after his death a ""Personal Representative's Deed"" was granted from him to his wife. Seven years later, a ""Gift Warranty Deed"" was granted from his wife to her son (from a prior marriage). She lived at the house until she died in 2023, and her son died shortly after that. We don't think that the deceased son had a will.

We have questions surrounding the meaning of part of the will concerning the ownership of the house.

1. According to the will excerpts below, is the wife \*given\* the house as a gift, and thus it is hers to do with whatever she wishes? Or is the wife allowed to stay in the house but not given ownership? If the latter option, who does the house go to after her death according to the will?
2. The bolded sentence (last sentence of Article 6, section K) is tripping us up; if the house is given to her in Article 2, Section D, then how is it that she can ""acquire"" the homestead by purchasing it from the Executor / Trustee? (Note that the Executor of his estate has since passed.)
3. Does it seem that the ""Deed History"" transactions described above were done in accordance with his will?
4. Since the wife's now-deceased son had no will, do the wife's other surviving children have legal standing to sell the home?

Below are the pertinent paragraphs from his will:

—

Article 2: Specific Gifts, Section D: First Additional Specific Bequest

I give all of my interest in the real property and the improvements therto which constitute my residential homestead at the time of my death to \[wife\]; provided if \[wife\] fails to survive me, this gift shall lapse.

—

Article 6: Administrative Provisions, Section K: Homestead.

My wife may direct my Executor or Trustee to retain our homestead or any replacement home. My wife may also direct my Executor or Trustee to sell our homestead or any replacement home and invest the proceeds of such sale in a replacement home. The proceeds of a sale shall be the gross sales price less all closing costs and other expenses of sale. My wife shall have the exclusive, rent-free use of our homestead or any replacement home; however, while using such property she shall be obligated to pay all property taxes and assessments thereon, maintain same in a good state of repair, maintain adequate fire and extended casualty insurance thereon and pay for any capital improvements which she desires to make to such property. **My wife may acquire our homestead or any replacement home by partition of our property or by purchase from my Executor or Trustee.**",AskLawyers
[TX] Can a non-compete prevent an employee from starting a business in the same field?,"I recently started a new job, I have always planned to start my own company in the current field I'm working in. (Currently saving to get it started) I have not mentioned my future plans to anyone of my current or past co-workers. The non-compete has a period of 2 years. Will singing this put a 2 year delay on my plans?",AskLawyers
[WY] Knife laws,"My Wyoming friend wants a great sword as an everyday carry. Is there anything she should know about restrictions on length, blade type or deployment? ",AskLawyers
"[TX] Divorced but ex owes 14k in back taxes
","
So I've been divorced almost two years now, I got a letter in the mail from the IRS saying that my tax refund was used to cover owed back taxes, I called them and figure out in 2021 when my ex did our taxes (filed jointly) he did not put in the information from stocks he had. I had no idea he even had any, they are saying we owe 14k even though all of it was found under his name, I'm not sure what to even do. Would it be smart to get a lawyer involved? I did contact my ex about everything but unsure if he will even contact them. I do have his number, I don't have his most updated address though. ",AskLawyers
[DC] If you sue someone does that give you access to their text messages?,Under what circumstances are the contents of things like someone's phone released?  Does this vary by state?,AskLawyers
[IL] using Creative Commons license plus fair use disclaimer?,"Can I use cc &amp; fair use at same time? 

Naive question: Can I use creative commons s AND fair use at same time ?

Im writing a technical blogpost in my GitHub pages and will be using memes (their o perfect for the points I wanna make &amp; messages I wanna convey). My question: can I use both Creative Commons copypasta license (give permission to remix my work) AND fair use copypasta? Please help. Thanks",AskLawyers
[non-US] Does ChatGPT lie?," I'm trying to do some research on public liability for voluntary emergency services in the UK. There's very little guidance availalbe, so I've asked ChatGPT for some case law that might have some relevance.

So far a lot of the case laws it's pointed me to don't seem to exist, despite searching [https://www.bailii.org/form/search\_cases.html](https://www.bailii.org/form/search_cases.html) and [https://caselaw.nationalarchives.gov.uk/](https://caselaw.nationalarchives.gov.uk/) and google.

Does ChatGPT generate false case studies frequently? Or am I looking in the wrong place. Some examples in the comments",AskLawyers
[Ut] Attorney ethics ,Financial declaration was given to husband's sister by his attorney.  Is this legal.  ,AskLawyers
[NC] Is a video will considered valid?,I have had reason recently to think about making my will. I honestly don't have a huge amount of money and not much in the way of real property or personal belongings. I basically want to have my will state that my assets are to be liquidated with two exceptions and divided between 4 family members equally (or their children in the event they have passed before I do). I am thinking a simple video would be best and easiest. I know my state allows holographic wills but are video wills valid?,AskLawyers
[non-US] What should I do to make myself a bright candidate for law degree apprenticeships?,"In year 12, currently taking maths, economics, german and an EPQ, and I'm looking to do a law degree apprenticeship after my a levels (UK).

Is there any advice you guys would mind sharing with me, including how to set myself apart from other candidates, what NOT to do, etc etc? And does it matter if my legal knowledge isn't really the best?",AskLawyers
"[KS] Maybe a dumb question, but would it be possible to avoid paying child support with a contract prior to having sex?","I know that it's pretty much impossible to avoid paying child support, and as a gay man I'll never have to face this dilemma, but I've been wondering this for a long time.

If, before having sex, having the woman sign something that says something along the lines of:

""I (woman's name), of sound mind, agree to sexual intercourse with (my name). I have not been coerced into this interaction, nor have I consumed any mind-altering substances. I understand that no method of contraceptive, or combination of contraceptive(s) (such as using birth control, a condom, and spermicide) is 100% effective and there is a possibility I become pregnant as a result of this sexual exchange. In the case that I, (woman's name), do get pregnant, I will not seek child support from (my name). I, (woman's name), have weighed the risks and knowingly and willingly choose to engage in sexual intercourse with (my name). This decision is final and I understand should I, (woman's name), become pregnant, I will not be able to reverse this decision. (My name) will never be expected to financially support me or our potential child, outside of the event of my (woman's name) death, incarceration, or similar scenario where it is impossible for me to provide for the potential child. I, (woman's name), have read these terms and agree to them.""

&amp;#x200B;

Would it make a difference if the woman was recorded on video reading these terms aloud? Granted, having her do this would probably be such a turn off we wouldn't have sex anyways, making this whole rigamarole pointless. But could it work? Would it need absolute clarity of language not present here? If so, how could I articulate that clarity?

&amp;#x200B;

I don't even know why this has been on my mind for so long considering I only have sex with men, but I need it answered. Thanks!

EDIT: Y’all this isn’t something i would ever actually do, I was just curious. I don’t know anything about how child support works so i wanted to ask. I started wondering about this when i watched The Office and saw the Dwight/Angela sex contact. This also wasn’t trans inclusive, sorry about that. There are men who can get pregnant",AskLawyers
"[TX] ex-landlord sent harassing messages about private information, is this legal? what can I do?","this is my first time ever posting. I posted earlier, but did not format the title correctly and it got removed, any advice helps!! thank you so much for reading!!",AskLawyers
[NJ] What discipline of law should I pursue for this situation? ,"I am thinking I should contact a lawyer, and I wonder what is the correct specialization to pursue.

My grandmother is 93, lives alone, and it is time for her to no longer live alone in her house. She had been contributing to a health policy under insurance company SHIP (Senior Health Insurance Company of Pennsylvania) which had money issues (premiums collected were not covering the cost of the care that was promised).  Some family members of mine are trying their best to do what’s best for my grandma and learn about her options, but I think it’s best to bring in professional help to understand the settlement (link to the SHIP bankruptcy below).  

Question 1: my grandma has an attorney for her estate, she has a will. Am I correct in thinking that this attorney is probably not the best candidate to advise on the finer details about SHIP and the insurance plan? 

Question 2: Which discipline of legal help would be best for me to pursue on behalf of my grandma as it relates to the SHIP situation? 

https://law.justia.com/cases/pennsylvania/supreme-court/2024/71-map-2021.html#:~:text=In%20a%20case%20concerning%20the,by%20the%20Pennsylvania%20Insurance%20Commissioner.

",AskLawyers
[MA] 100% disable veteran paying child support. ,I am a disable veteran who is 100% service connected on a fixed income. Can my disability check from the VA be considered as income for the child support calculation in a 50/50 shared agreement?? ,AskLawyers
[IA] Is It Possible To Contest A Medicaid Claim?,"Hi everyone,

I'm reaching out to this community in hopes of gaining some insight into a challenging situation I'm currently facing. My mother passed away last September, and I've recently learned about a substantial Medicaid claim against her estate. The claim is for $140,000 and it threatens to force me out of my home, which is the primary asset of the estate.

Here's a bit of background:

* My mother had a severe brain aneurysm in 2015 and required significant medical care, which Medicaid covered.
* I took care of her at home for over 8 years, significantly delaying the need for expensive nursing home care, which I believe saved Medicaid a substantial amount of money.
* I was living with her in the same house during this time, providing her daily care and support.
* The house was never transferred to my name, and now Medicaid's estate recovery program is seeking to recover costs

My main concern is trying to save the home. I know there are child-caregiver exemptions, but I don't know if that would apply here. 

Does anyone know if it's possible to convince them to let me keep the home? Given the extensive care I've provided for her over the past several years? 

\*Note I do have a lawyer I'm working with, and who is trying to help me I think. I'm just looking for other angles and advice.  

Thanks for your time, and I appreciate any help in advance. 

&amp;#x200B;",AskLawyers
[TX] Mold in my store,"I work for a well known specialty retail store. Last summer there were several panels of sheet rock removed in a corner and replaced due to black mold caused by a roof leak. Several employees including myself were pretty sick leading up to this removal. I continued to feel sick, including constant migraines, dizziness, nausea, neck pain. I still have these symptoms today. After extensive testing, several doctors/specialists have not found a cause for my symptoms. My next step is allergy testing in a couple of weeks.

When the mold was first discovered they just removed the sheet rock. But did not check other areas of the store.

Fast forward to yesterday. Some contractors came to make repairs to an adjacent wall near the original mold area. They sliced through the wallpaper only to find more mold completely covering the sheet rock. They then continued along the entire length of that wall, revealing all the sliced areas packed with mold. My immediate manager was horrified. (I took pics of all of it bc hell no)

My question is, if I am indeed highly allergic to black mold, what should my next steps be? Workers comp attorney? I would not want to return to work and continue to be sick as it's been almost a year since my symptoms started. But I also cannot afford to not work. I have missed many days of work and spent tons of money on co-pays, testing and all kinds of bs. Do I even have a case of any kind here?

Any advice is appreciated. Thanks.



",AskLawyers
[non-us] verbal contracts,"

How good are verbal contracts?

 I’m trying to quit my current job &amp; I was told I have to pay back my employer. More than is owed or I have to stay a year. 

 I’ve been there for 2 years now I’m not staying another year being treated like shit getting called names by my employer but besides the point they say it comes down to the verbal contract that I have to pay them back. 

I have absolutely no contract with this company at any point just “verbal contact”
Do they have the right to withhold more money than schooling. was they paid 770 as the invoice says but they want a 1000??? ",AskLawyers
[WA] Vehicle Sales Tax Exemption for Active Duty Military? (more below),"Can somebody explain this law to me like I'm a 5 year old? I'm confused by the grammar. I am active duty military stationed in California but I'm a resident of Washington. 

I'm interpreting this as the exemption is only applicable for AD military stationed within Washington State, not outside. What do you think? ",AskLawyers
[IA] can I please have help deciphering child support and custody paperwork received for my case?,"https://imgur.com/gallery/tncIvkv

I can tell that's it's got something to do with child support and custody against absent parent but I'm not understanding what exactly they're vacating or apparently what vacating in this sense means? 

Is custody and child support no longer valid? I plan to contact my lawyer but I really don't want to spend a grand to decipher a letter that's expensive for me right now. 

Thank you for your help",AskLawyers
[non-us] 🇨🇦sk Employer trying to withhold past employe stuff for sum of $,"




So few months ago one of my coworkers quit &amp; they took her stuff out of her locker &amp; kept it hostage for money she owed for schooling but she never agreed to having to pay them back there’s no contract even. 

So I went &amp; grabbed it for her like she asked me too because she never agreed having to paying anything &amp; retrieved it back now the boss man found that it's not there months later &amp; now gave me shit. 

 I have a video of them talking saying, “Don’t fucking go in the office and grab what’s not yours” “do you want me to grab something from you’re locker that’s not mine” 
When they did the same???

I grabbed something from the office cuz they grabbed her belongings from her locker (her personal tools clothing etc.)

 Isn't there something about that not right",AskLawyers
"[non-US] 🇨🇦AB I want to quit my job ASAP, but my employer has payed me in advanced.","My boss payed me today but I honestly want to quit because of a hostile work environment. The problem is that they payed me in advanced to work the next couple of days.

Can I be charge for stealing if I quit?

I just want to leave the job I don’t even care about the money honestly. I just want out. I just want to make sure I won’t get charged for stealing or something like that. 

It’s only for two days of work, not like a week or anything.",AskLawyers
[CA] Workplace Discrimination Lawyer Recs?,"Anybody know someone, ideally in Los Angeles. I’m employed in CA but the company resides in Chicago. ",AskLawyers
[OH] Toyota dealership ,"We ordered a new grand highlander last June/July. We recieved the car last August. We were only given 1 Fob. They said they would send us the 2nd one because they were having issues making them/keeping up with production. I’ve been to the dealership since asking about the fob and they said they still didn’t have it. I’ve recently started emailing the sales rep we worked with and he has not responded. Do I have any type of legal action we can take or threaten to get the second fob? This was a 50k car, and when we ordered it from the factory it was with 2 fobs.  Seems like a breech of contract? 

 Apparently there is an issue with the Fobs and the batteries dying quickly. I’ve already had this happen. As a mom of 3 this stresses me out. What is we lose the only fob we have.. what if I get stranded some place? Why should I be responsible for another bill if something happens and when we’ve already paid for a backup. 

The more look online a lot of people are having this issue of only getting 1 fob. Are we just at Toyotas mercy or are we able to take action? 

",AskLawyers
[IL] doctors office waiting 2 in a half years ,"So I got a bill from a doctors office I haven't been to in 2 years or more. I messaged them and asked them what's this about because I had paid everything before I left and I'm not even a patient there anymore. They messaged me saying they just now processed through insurance for that visit, Which was November of 2021. Here's the funny part to me. The last bill I paid them for was Dec of that same  year. 
I don't even have the same insurance anymore. 
Is this even legal? How can they even do that? 
",AskLawyers
[CA] animal right attorney. My dog attacked another dog. What now?,"My dog got loose and attacked a smaller dog. The injury was too severe and they had to put it down. I was told Animal Control would be notified because of euthanization procedure. I am afraid they will put my dog down. 

She’s a pit bull. Has aggression towards dogs. She is not aggressive toward people. Just dogs.

What can I do now?
What if they tell me I have to put her down?
Should I send her off far away?

Edit one: 

Here’s what happened.

It happened in seconds. She got out when my mom opened the door. We (me and the neighbor+ her kid) managed to calm her down. She was fine and I was going to bring her back inside. She then was playing with my neighbor’s kid and I took my eyes away to thank my neighbor. I hadn’t noticed because it was in a split second but she ran across the street. We ran after her. I didn’t realized it during the moment but it was because she sees a small dog in the fence. The rest is as I said. She made her way in through a crack and then attacked the small dog because it was barking at her. I separated them as fast as I can but I was too late.

I have settled all the vet bills up to where before the surgery happened. The vet didn’t have a payment plan system and both I and my neighbor couldn’t afford the lump sum of 12000 to do the surgery and they decide to let their dog go.

I blame only myself for not putting her back in after we got her under control. The only reason why she wasn’t immediately is because she loves my neighbor and was playing with them.

Edit 2: I read all of these comments and I very much appreciate those who gives me actionable step toward the resolution. I will take these constructive criticism to heart as I move forward with dealing with the outcome of this.

I appreciate all constructive and non constructive ones as well. I know how hard it is to lose a pet. I’ve lost a pet, in a violent situation before so I have complete sympathy for my friends from the other side. That’s why I have done all I could given my situation and circumstances. 

Again, thank you. We’re navigating this so that things can resolve the best possible way for both me and my friend who has a tragic loss. It was the least I can do for them and for my dogs. 

Please, if the community has other input about what gainful steps I should take moving forward, legally or personally, I’d appreciate it immensely!

Sorry for all the members who were upset at the news of my friend’s dog tragic passing at the hands of my own dog. I know it isn’t the best things to see but I am trying to do right and the best I can. 

Edit 3: 
what I’ve done so far.
-begin construction of secondary enclosure
-brought a muzzle

What im looking to do soon
- update home owner insurance to include my dog
-contacting animal behavior
-contacting various animal training facilities
",AskLawyers
[CA] How do jury consultants work?,"From what I understand, they can help a party to select jurors that will be more likely to side with their case. But aren't jurors also selected at random? How can both of these work simultaneously?

&amp;#x200B;",AskLawyers
[CA] Cop did not sign ticket,"So I got pulled over for driving on a suspended license. The cop did not sign the ticket and the DA is being a douche and prosecuting it as a misdemeanor and violation of probation. If i say I want to take it to trial, would they have to drop it because the cop who pulled me over did not sign the ticket? 
I have the right to confront my accuser and how can i do that if he didnt sign the ticket?
This is in California if this makes any difference.
I have no other probation violations, no other driving on a suspended license tickets.",AskLawyers
[IL] employer not paying health benefits,"Employer hasn’t paid medical benefits

I work at a small trucking company in [IL] (but reside in [IA] ) and have been paying my portion of medical benefits ( health, dental, vision and life insurance) from my weekly pay (w2 employee). My wife’s dental office just reached out to her yesterday and tike her that the claim they sent to insurance was sent back denied for no coverage. I’ve logged in to my BCBS portal and can see that my coverage has stopped since 2/1/24. I’ve brought this to my company’s attention but got told it’s being handled. 
 
Is there anything I can or any legal action I can take?",AskLawyers
[GA],So I was recently exposed to hsv1 and I was told nothing by nobody. I found out from going to the doctor and then when I went to tell the person I was having sexual relations with he freaked out. I told him to get tested and I asked to see his test results and he wouldn't. I told him to leave me alone because now he look guilty. I truly feel in my heart that I know it was him but I have no solid proof. I want to file a lawsuit because if it is him and he failed to mention I can feel better because I have to live with this for the rest of my life and I can get the truth,AskLawyers
[CA] Curious Elementary School Teacher,"I am a 40-year-old male working at an elementary public school as a tenured teacher. I love my subject, and I gross 100k/year.

We have fantastic union protection. Principals must think twice before asking us to do anything, have excellent pensions, and work 180 business days a year. Ten days of vacation in Thanksgiving, a month in winter, a week in SB, two months during the summer, and multiple three-day weekends here and there. We are fully paid while on vacation.

All that being said, after ten years of teaching, I do not feel challenged, and I wouldn't say I like the childish energy and interactions with many of my colleagues. “Ohhhhh! You look so cute today!” “Oh my Gosh! I can’t do this anymore!”

Here are some questions: 

1. Is it doable to become a lawyer doing the e LOSP program, knowing I finish work every day around 02:40 pm?

2. How much are law offices willing to take someone under their “wings” to log in the needed hours for the LOSP Program?

3. Is the financial reward worth it? 

4. Can I shut down my office’s operations when a break is needed? 

5. How much life quality will I gain or lose? 

6. Which law practice do you find exciting? So far, Criminal Law and Civil Rights Law are my top choices. 

I am a father of two young kids, and my wife will become a teacher in 2025/2026. 

Thank you, Justice Warriors! ",AskLawyers
[NV] How can a Las Vegas venue make men pay 50% more than women legally? ,"

I saw a post about how this skrillex concert charges men $20 more than women. Wouldn’t that be the easiest sexism lawsuit ever? Why can’t men sue for being charged more just because of their sex?

https://www.tixr.com/groups/ebc/events/wynn-las-vegas--skrillex-jyoty-kenny-beats-90480


Maybe it’s similar to how bars can charge men for covers but women get in free but idk how that’s allowed either 


Also legally can’t someone just “identify” as a woman and then of the venue says they’re not then they can sue? ",AskLawyers
[ok] when can the cops kick in a door?,"I’m asking because there was a situation in the town I live (Oklahoma) where a woman on the edge of town was burning trash in a burn barrel. This lady is a nut job and I don’t really care for her, but when the police came to tell her to knock it off she ran inside her house. The Cops kicked her front door in and took her to jail. This seems excessive to me. Why not just write a report and send it to the DA for review? I don’t like living in a small town where the police just do whatever they want. But maybe I’m just overreacting. ",AskLawyers
[MN] Divorce- How do I get my ex to pay for Orthodontic expenses for our child?,"Thanks for any advice in advance… My ex husband cancelled our joint children’s dental insurance. Our son needs non-cosmetic (medically necessary) orthodontic work. We have a court order that my ex pays 100% of uninsured medical expenses, including orthodontia. The court order says that he is to provide health insurance but it doesn’t specify dental insurance. He is refusing to sign the guarantor form for our son’s treatment plan or to reinstate dental insurance, claiming he can’t afford it. I obtained Medical Assistance (MA) with dental coverage for the kids, but it doesn’t cover ortho. I believe the treatment plan would be mostly covered by the insurance plan my ex canceled. 

Do I sign the guarantor form myself, pay for it without insurance, and rely on reimbursement through our state child support case? This is the best and fastest plan I can come up with, and I don’t want to put off my son’s treatment waiting for his dad to pay. ",AskLawyers
[AZ] Do I have a good case for SCRA violation?,"

I am Active duty military and separating May 22 and will be moving to Columbia, Maryland.  I am renting from prestige property management in Tucson Arizona. I submitted my intent to vacate from my commander and a copy of my orders February 28 and stated I would be vacating the premises April 22 due to my terminal leave start date per SCRA and JTR regulations. There is a military clause in my lease that incorrectly bars separating military from breaking there lease but the JTR and SCRA trump that because a separation move is considered a PCS.

Initially they stated they would not let me out of the lease but then changed their answer when they spoke to an attorney. Now they are telling me they will not let me out of my lease until my date of separation May 22 and they cite U.S.C. 50 3955 as the documentation in support of this. I have been to base legal counsel several times and have been notified this a violation of my rights and that the law does not state when I’m allowed to leave just that I am to submit documentation and intent to vacate within 30 days of my intended vacation date after I receive orders and then I am free to depart on that date.

I have filed a complaint to Department of Justice per SCRA but would like to know if the documentation they cite supports them on still being able to charge me rent for May or if I am legally allowed to leave on the date I intend and effectively break my lease? Additionally should I hire a lawyer if they take my security deposit over this? What might I be able to sue for monetary wise?


Documentation referenced in this situation includes:

My lease 

USC 50 3955 (SCRA on termination of leases)

Joint Travel Regulation Ch 5",AskLawyers
[IN] How could I legally acquire a *human skull cup?,"I mean you can kind of guess by the title, I just really need a human skull delivered to my house (Gary Indiana) and really really want to fashion it into a cup for wine. Anybody know the legality of this?",AskLawyers
[CA] Any trust and estate lawyers who can provide some feedback? ,"Currently have all my accounts set up as PoDs to my life partner, also named them beneficiary on my SEP and insurance. 

Want them to have zero chance of winding up in probate, prevent anything from being challenged by my adult children or ex-wife.  

Everyone advised that a living trust is the way to go so I'm halfway down that pathway. 

Met with a high end ( $600/hr ) trust and estate attorney today.  He told me that for only the third or fourth time in his 40 years of practice, he thinks I'm better off not doing a trust, and just sticking with the PoD, health care directive, durable  PoA etc,   

In his view, once my partner submits the death cert and any paperwork to the bank, those funds all go right to them and aren't part of any estate.  Ultimately, since there is no house involved or other intangible personal property, he said there would be no probate anyway.   

If my concern was challenges from the kids or the ex., he said it's a ctually much harder to challenge the PoDs since they aren't even part of the estate, and the only thing an intestate heir could really challenge would be ""the estate.""  

Once you put everything in a living trust, with my partner as the successor trustee and beneficiary, all the money in the trust becomes ""the estate.""  You're required to notify all intestate heirs and give them 120 days to challenge anything etc.  creditors can go after ""the estate,"" etc.   

He said it's pretty rare for him to suggest it, but in his view he said that in this rare case we're probably better off just having him re-write the will and PoAs for clarity and leave it at that.  

Also, he's very experienced but I thought his price was really high for preparing a will and other docs.  I already have a durable PoA, health care proxies, etc.  he didn't even want to look at them.  He said they're all insufficient and need to be redone. 

Should this be a $1400 job?  If it is then that's fine and I'm happy to pay it.  Just seemed really steep, especially considering he wants to redo the PoAs, health care proxies etc., which are just boilerplate things.    I understand he charges $600/hr.  Just didn't see this as being a 3 hour job.  


",AskLawyers
[KS] Title Insurance Question,"

If a title company failed to have a couple elect their form of  ownership (tenancy), and the title company decides that since they are  married, it should ""default"" to tenants-in-common, and then files a  warranty deed to that effect, but the error isn't discovered until eight  or ten years after one of the spouses dies, what are the likeliest  steps to take?   

&amp;#x200B;

1. If it's a quiet title suit: should it be paid for by the original  title company, by the title policy, or by the homeowner who suffered  monetary losses as a result? (Would the homeowner attach the title  company as a defendant or...?)     
 
2. If it's via probate: Is this possible after such a long period after a spouse's death?     
 
3. Through a recorder of deeds or real estate commission? (I don't see where these apply, but was told I should check on them.)     
 

BTW, this isn't for me and is only for educational purposes. I'm a  real estate broker and this happened to my client's sister. Just  discussion.   ",AskLawyers
[IL] Is discord legally considered a Social Media Platform?,[IL] Is discord legally considered a Social Media Platform?,AskLawyers
[CA] Administrative claim is in what? Not court but...,"Paralegal here. First time dealing with suing the U.S. (Med Mal claim)

Anyone familiar with admin claims when suing the U.S. in a tort action?

""We are having to avail in ______ l""

If it was a ""regular"" case I'd say we are in court or we are in state/federal court 

What do you say for an administrative claim ...we're in _____

I called it administrative court but my attorney said it's not court 

What is it the general term for it 
",AskLawyers
[PA] Can police do background checks for bo legal reason?,"So I live in MD, but my girlfriend lives in Pennsylvania, and her parents are crazy. Her parents want to have the police do background checks on my grandfather and I because we're coming to take her here to MD so she can move out. She is 18 years old, but they just don't want to let her go.",AskLawyers
[NJ] What should my friend do about his GF who he got in a fight with and she got him arrested for assault and now shes keeping their kid but my friend didnt assault her and hes being treated as guilty before even getting a trial or anything?,"Background - My friends GF use to constantly assault and hit him. He never called the cops on her but he has lots of vidoes of her going crazy, blocking him from leaving, telling him ""hes not a man"" if he says ""ill call the cops"" and even hitting him lots of times with him telling her to stop but she doesnt. Various video's at various dates for the past 2 years.

They had a baby together and when the baby was 6 weeks she went crazy crazy on him. He couldnt even video tape this time because she was going 11/10 nuts! Shes kinda crazy and im betting the post pardum had some impact in this. Either way, he left and went to his apartment. Cops came at 2 am and arrested him while he was sleeping, she said he assaulted her. She has some bruises on her but there not really anything in line with what shes saying. She has a bruise on her knee/leg because when she kicked him he blocked it. She has a bruise on the forearm because when she hit him he blocked her. Obviously there are no cameras so its ""he said vs she said"" but its not like the cops went there and she was a bloody mess with black eyes and obvious marks from direct assault. Yes she had marks, but who wouldnt have marks when you attack someone and they block it, its not that far fetched? Its not like he went down and punched her in the knee lol. It makes no sense. Either way he was arrested and locked up for 4 days because ""he was a threat"" even though he was sleeping. They acting like they found him at the bar at 2am taking his last few shots of whisky before he loads his gun to go back and kill her. He was sleeping, what was he gonna do, have a bad dream about her?

When he got out she had a restraining order on him and she has the baby. He couldnt see his kid for months and still hasnt. Finally he went to some type of court case over custody/seeing the child. They basically treated him as guilty before even hearing his side. They didnt allow him to show any video evidence he had of her assaulting him and acting crazy. They didn't bother to address anything when he said her bruises didnt match what she said. She said he strangled her and then ""proved it"" with a bruise on her arm? And he never went to any trial of had a hearing as to whether he was indeed guilty or not, as such everything should just be ""alleged"" but they are pretty much treating him likes hes 100% guilty and as if he came home one day, beat the crap outa her and then left. The female judge ruled in her favor and he has supervised visits. The supervised visit place is 3 months backed up. He still hasnt seen his kid once and the child is like 6-7 months now. He still hasnt been ""proven"" guilty of assault, yet hes treated as if he is. 7 months is ridiculous. His lawyer said not to press charges on her for her assaults because it will just look ""retaliatory"" but anytime he goes to court hes got this non-proven-alleged-but-still-treated-as-guilty charge/ official on record and she has nothing on record.

I believe the statute of limitations is 2 years for assault. I told him to record the dates and times of each one of those videos of assaults and file a SEPERATE CHARGE for EACH ONE of them (ie go to the police station with the evidence on a flash drive and say ""hi on 5/4/2023 she assaulted me here is the evidence"" and let them make a record. Go back the next day and say ""hi on 3/12/2023 i was assaulted here is the evidence"" and let them make a new record. Go again the next day ""hi on 10/25/2022"" i was assaulted here is the evidence"" and let them make a new record. Retaliatory or not, its his right to file charges against someone who assaults him if he indeed was assaulted, he doesnt ""lose his rights"". Also its impossible to win or fight a court case when anything bad that one party allegedly did is used but anything the other party alleged did is ignored. If thats the case anyone can win a court case, it would just be the one with the bad shit who loses every time, you wouldnt even need lawyers its so straight forward. Thats not how court cases work, a full picture should be available to the course so they can make an informed judgment decision.

What do you think he should do?",AskLawyers
[IN] Are attorneys super-resistant to taking over a case another attorney started?,"[IN] NOT asking for legal advice. Example to explain the title question: I had a criminal case (DUI) once where my attorney screwed up by doing what his reviews say he was known for, not paying attention. Heading in to a suppression hearing, he filed a proper timely brief. The State filed its brief late, and without notice. I lost on suppression because of this, so I fired him. I then contacted 6 largish law firms about taking my case, and nobody would even respond.  

Is this a thing, that attorneys shun ""relief pitching""? Does this have a name?",AskLawyers
"[WA] I ranaway from CPS, need to go to the dentist, am I getting set up? [WA]","Im 17, I ranaway away from CPS and really need to go to the dentist. So I made an appointment under my name, SSN, and insurance id number, well they scheduled me for 7am which is an HOUR before they open, is it possible that when I gave them my information it came up in there system that I'm a runaway and to get me there,&amp;  then call cops/CPS? I find it super weird that they told me my appointment is a whole hour before they even open. I need to go but am terrified of going back into the hands of CPS. Please help ! 

Added info: I'm from Washington State, and my insurance is Apple Health State Insurance. P.S thank you all for ur comments, I feel much better about going. 🩷",AskLawyers
[MN] How do I go about pressing charges against a person who was paid t my fix my car but didn't?,"This is my first post on Reddit, so I'll try my best to get to the point without making it too long!🤦🏻‍♀️😂 This story takes place from January 24th-February 30th.

A ""friend"", more like an acquaintance that we met through another friend, offered to fix our car (1-3 days tops) &amp; he would accept getting paid in weekly increments as long as we made a large(ish) payment when we picked the car.

**Now, I KNOW that this is where I royally F'ed up &amp; I KNOW how naive &amp; dumb I was about this whole situation! I have learned NOT to be so trusting of people. Please try not to make me feel any worse than I already do, and I still haven't heard the end of it from my husband.**

Within the first 48 hours, he was great at keeping us updated! Then, the 3rd day came &amp; went, but he had a ""legit"" reason for needing more time. For the next 30 DAYS it went on like this! Here's the kicker, he would say ""I'll have the car done tomorrow, but can you PLEASE pay $100 ASAP? I need to pay my electric bill TODAY"" or he would do a total 180 &amp; accuse US of taking advantage of HIM! For the record, we had NOTHING to hold him accountable &amp; make sure that he held up his end of the arrangement. He had our CAR, so we HAD TO pay him if we wanted our car back. We even sent him $100 just to prove to him that we can be trusted. This went on over &amp; over, until I threatened to report my car stolen unless he returned my car within 2 hours. He says ""I will have the car to your house but it'll be 3 hours instead of 2, AND I NEED $80. The car is all done &amp; I will FOR SURE be there, I PROMISE YOU!!"" At this point, I just wanted my dang car back! I didn't care what it took, and that was yet another big mistake because I paid him &amp; then he ghosted me for 13 days. We contacted the friend that introduced us, and he had no issues getting a hold of the dude. We also found out from that friend that the dude NEVER EVEN TOUCHED OUR CAR! In fact, he was DRIVING IT AROUND until it just died 2½ WEEKS prior. The car sat at his house for about another week to a week &amp; a half until I finally found someone to tow it. I showed up unannounced to pick up my car &amp; didn't even bother seeing if he was even home but thankfully, no one was at the time. I just wanted to be GONE &amp; DONE with him! Well, I could never be so lucky because that MF'er had the keys (I was told that they were in the car by someone else)! The guy who towed my car said we could work around it for now, so he starts hooking up my car &amp; notices almost immediately that the dude CUT OFF &amp; STOLE my catalytic converter!! Remember, he told me the car was DONE for sure!! Well, now I knew what he meant by being ""done""!🤦🏻‍♀️🙄 I never told him that I picked up my car or nothing like that. So for all he knew, someone could've ""stolen"" my car. He didn't text me for 4 flipping days and it was to ask me when I was going to pay him!! I went along with it for as long as I could, which was about 2 days. I asked him to send me proof of receipts purchasing the car parts he ""bought"" &amp; proof of the new parts after they were installed on the vehicle, but he was magically always too busy to do any of those. I finally told him the jig was up &amp; that I didn't enjoy being taken full advantage of, among some other not so nice things lol! He played dumb &amp; acted like I was trying to screw him over &amp; try to get out of paying him. So, when I sent him a picture of $500 cash &amp; told him that as soon as he provides the proof I requested, I will gladly give him every penny. Fortunately for him, he stopped responding after that.

Once the new mechanic finally had the chance to look at it, we found out a whole list of other problems! Not only did he cut off &amp; steal my catalytic converter, but he also flushed out the fuel I had in my tank, he took off the air box w/ the filter, and the mass air flow sensor. And to top it off, he stole and/or ""misplaced"" my only set of house keys. (Side note: we are renting a house, so I technically could get another cooy, but I don't feel comfortable knowing that he could get into my house and/or garage at any given time. Our outside sensor light has gone off at random times, but we don't see anything outside when we go to look. So, for all I know, he's been in my garage before. How do I explain to the landlord that we need/want to replace the locks on the property?)

Now, to my questions and the whole reason I posted this crazy story.
1) Can I press charges against him for swindling by theft and for paying him to ""fix"" our vehicle &amp; then getting it back in worse condition than what it was when he took it off of our property?
2) Being he stole the catalytic converter &amp; most likely sold it, would this be a criminal case or a civil case?
3) Do I need to hire a lawyer in order to press charges? We are not in a good spot financially at the moment partially due to this whole mess, so we can't afford one any time soon.
4) How do I go about pressing charges, through the Sheriff's Department or the Court House?

I apologize for not keeping the story on the shorter side, but I promise I left out a bunch of info lol! So don't hesitate to ask any questions! 
Thank you so much for reading this &amp; any advice you can offer !",AskLawyers
[AZ] I sent out a mass group chain message to a pedophiles family. Can I be charged? ,"For context, five years ago me and another girl, let’s call her Rebel, were communicating with a boy age 21 who we will call Trey online. Rebel and I were both 14 at the time. 

Rebel brought to my attention a few weeks after meeting Trey that they had begun an inappropriate relationship. It began with inappropriate comments/flirting, and then escalated to nude photographs being shared between them. Rebel sent Trey nude pictures of her body.

(EDIT: I must clarify because many people are posting comments assuming that I am taking my friend’s word as fact and she might have been lying. This went on for six months and I myself was witness to their inappropriate conversations and experienced the same comments towards me as well from him. There are also two other witnesses to the crime who have spoken to me recently that they will come forward if this goes to court.) 

To be clear, Trey was 100% aware of our ages. This went on for six months and he knew day one we were both in high school. At the time, I didn’t realize the severity of what happened. Once Rebel began asking Trey if they could hangout in real life, as she was quite smitten with him, he blocked her suddenly stating he didn’t want to risk getting in trouble with the cops for what he had been doing. He told me the same thing and that he ‘could get in a lot more trouble than we would,’ and that it was our fault for not keeping things more private and now he ‘had to block us.’ (EDIT: I am not debating with anyone if this man is or isn’t guilty. That is not the purpose of this post. What I am asking for is Legal Advice from a professional lawyer given my current situation.) 

Rebel at the time told me she wanted to let go of what happened and asked me to forget about it. I am ashamed to admit that I followed her directions and never told an adult about what had happened. We both thought we would be the ones to get in trouble and being victims of grooming, wanted to protect him. 

A couple years later, my friend Rebel took her life. For years, I was filled with regret and remorse that I did not help my friend when I should have reported the incident properly. At this point, I had no images or screenshots or even proof of what happened, and the girl who was victimized, is now dead. Besides me and the two other witnesses, I do not have direct evidence of this. 

The other week, I was doing a reverse google search on Trey hoping I could find who he is now and what he is doing. It took me many hours of research but I acquired the names of every single individual in his family, their numbers and addresses/previous addresses, as well as his current place of work. I constructed a mass message that I sent out, one message for each person, explaining what Trey did with Rebel and pleading with anyone that knew him to be careful of bringing Trey around their underaged girls. I also sent this message to his current employer. 

In my message, I did not threaten anyone physically or make any insinuations of violence to clarify. Trey himself, I have not contacted directly in many years. This morning, Trey contacted me directly and accused me of stalking and harassment. I did not message him back. For important reference, I live in the state of Oklahoma. Trey lives in Arizona as does most of his family. 

I would like to know, legally speaking, what possible charges I may face for what I did? I am aware that in order to charge someone for harassment there must be a record. Did what I do quality as a record for harassment or stalking? 

I do not regret my choices but I would like to know if I should prepare myself in any way, or what charges I may possiblely face if the police are contacted. 

In the end, these claims are alleged as I do not at this point have any proof of what happened beyond the word of three people. Because this, could I be charged with defamation? What would be the process of these charges if a file is made against me? 

(EDIT: Please to clarify, I am asking for legal advice from a trained lawyer given my current position. I am not asking for your opinion on the morality of my choices or to shame me for not coming forward sooner as some of you have tried to do. 

I am seeking legal council only. If you are not a lawyer, please do not give me false legal advice. That is the purpose of this forum.) 

Thank you so much. ",AskLawyers
[PA] 3rd Party Company Declined FMLA leave then terminated. ,"I have worked for my employer for 7 years and for almost 3 years I have worked a modified schedule for my disabled child.  My disabled child's condition worsened and I asked my HR department for 12 weeks off for FMLA leave to give him better care.   I gave them a 2 week notice before I would take off work.  The HR department told me I would have to submit an application to their 3rd party company to be approved for leave.   I filled out the paperwork and submitted it.   It was still pending when my notice date came.  I spoke to the HR department and said the application was still pending but I needed to still be off for the previous discussed date.  I asked them if it was still ok to be off and they said it was fine and it sometimes takes time for the 3rd party company to approve everything.  I stopped working on the date discussed.   2 and half weeks later I got a notification from the 3rd party company that the doctors needed to fill out a different part of the application.   I resubmitted the paperwork to the doctor and 10 days later I resubmitted the paperwork for a 2nd time.  3 weeks later the 3rd party company said they needed additional information from the doctor.   This happened several times over the 12 weeks I was off.  When it was time for me to start back at my job the application was still pending.  My employer told me I couldn't come back to work until it was approved.   I called the 3rd party company several times as did my HR department.  The day came when I was supposed to start working again and my HR department called me and said I couldn't come back and that they couldn't let me continue my modified schedule and ""it was best if we just went our separate ways"".   They terminated me that day.  

 Do I have a case for wrongful termination or for a violation of FMLA laws?   ",AskLawyers
[WI] Coworker reported me to the union for saying something racist about him that is completely untrue,"As my title says, I was recently brought into a meeting with a coworker(A) and a union representative to be talked to about comments I was believed to have said. 

The meeting started with the union rep saying he was there to mediate but sat next to A on the other side of the table. Already it felt like two against one. A went on to say that while I was talking with another coworker(B) at a different location, someone he knew was close by. 

The conversation with who I was talking to went along the lines of, 

Me(M) - “what’re you testing for?”

B- “I’m testing for a job at blank because they’re shutting blank down”

M- “oh, you don’t want to come to blank(my location)

B- laughed and said “no, I’ve heard some bad things about over there.”

M- “yeah, we’ve had a few accidents over the last few months, one guy(A) flipped a forklift, bent another one’s forks and blew the hydraulic lines and dumped some transformers. Another guy(C) pushed a pallet of a rack that hit another guy(D). He was fine though.”

We then went on to discuss our jobs and pay scales. We’re union so our pay is frequently discussed because everyone knows each other’s pay scales and about how much we all make. Then we took care of what we were doing. And went our separate ways.

The next morning I came to work and was accused of saying terrible things about A. The person he know wildly exaggerated and fabricated a lot of incorrect information. She said I said A was a colossal f-up, that he was terrible at his job, that everyone babied him and talked about him behind his back, and to top it all off, he was told that I said he only got his job because of his race. And that I was only applying for a different position in the company to be with more people “like me”. All of that was made up entirely. While I did discuss accidents he had caused, I never mentioned his name or alluded to his identity. I also talked about other incidents other than his but his source believed I was only talking about him the whole time.

All of his statements are on record and are incredibly damaging to my character as well as possibly hurting my future in the company. I have been mentally taxed by these accusations and have no way of discussing with the accuser as they refuse to meet.

So now I have his statements being added to my file and though they’re not proven and the union seems to be refusing to take out any information that can’t be proven. I have been told that the file will only be seen if there are any more incidents and will otherwise be unseen but I worry about another incident like this and me being punished for a second strike even though the first and very likely the second would be misunderstandings or mishearing a conversation.

I apologize for the long story but would appreciate any advice on what can be done about this. Thank you in advance!",AskLawyers
[OK] Can a teacher get a restraining order against a student?,"In special education there is a law that a student cannot be suspended more than ten days a year. If a teacher/staff is continuously getting assaulted by the same student, can they get a restraining order? I feel that most teachers fear that such a response would result in their contract not being renewed next year. I have seen many times students are allowed to return to class and keep hurting staff and even students. Sometimes sending them to the hospital. Many special education staff do not last long for this reason. What laws are there to protect them?",AskLawyers
[non-US]," am a underage girl, 17 and i am about to have a baby. I was living in England for school but that was disrupted. (Not really relevant to my question) Anyway, i am in the netherlands now. My mum lives here and i need her support to take care of the baby so naturally im staying here now and going to find an education here so i can be present for my baby.
The father of the child was unhappy with that, and so was his family apparently. He said majority of his family lives in the uk etc. And it’s illegal because we’re keeping the child away. I dont want to be away from mu mum, she would help me the most and i wouldn’t trust my baby with his family if im completely honest. Is it illegal what im doing because im not sure?? I havent banned his family from seeing the child when he’s born.. I think they wont really put in any effort when it comes down to it  but i don’t want any drama, Ive already been through enough. Do i technically have full custody anyway because we’re not married?",AskLawyers
"[CA] international student, Public intoxication should get a lawyer?",I got arrested for public intoxication and have to show in court in a month. Should I hire a lawyer what of I just show on my own?,AskLawyers
[FL] Son crashed onto a parked trailer of a truck,"My son (4th grade), on his way home from school, crashed onto a parked trailer of a truck that was entering a gated community. His bike breaks didn't work. He ended up under one of tires of the trailer. He suffered two fractured ribs and wounds on his hand and scratches on his face. Who is at fault? Is there a case for this? Thanks",AskLawyers
[WI] Is it illegal to not recycle in Wisconsin?,"I believe it is, because from what I’ve googled, it seems to be the case. My mom disagrees and thinks that it’s some kind of recommendation or something. If it’s the case that it is illegal, I want the exact law that says it, but I just might not know where to look, if someone could help me.",AskLawyers
[OH] wage theft,"Employment,  wage theft, and other nonsense 

[U.S.]
We work in developmental disabilities for a small agency.  
We earn 2 wages known as hpc (awake) and osoc ( on-site oncall, or asleep). 
Recently we received a raise, for awake hours. But they canceled overtime. Like, not the actual hours mind you, but the pay. 
For example, you could work Friday afternoon 3am  till Monday morning 9am. 
3 to 11pm would be considered awake at 17 an hour. Asleep would start at 11pm to 7am the following morning at min wage. At 7am to goes back to awake at 17/h. 
Wage was calculated with total hours worked so nearly 20plus hours at the end of the weekend would be overtime hours. 
Now, it has to be 40 awake , and 40 asleep before over time kicks in as neither counts towards the other. 
Is that legal? 
Say 1 works 50 hours and the check reads 40 hours straight time asleep and 10 awake straight time? Is this legal? 
There was also a promise of fully funded Healthcare,  vision dental and health. It was never given or provided in any way. Legal? 
What recourse do the employees have? ",AskLawyers
[ID] Is asking for my medical leave not to count against my full time status not covered by the ADA?,"I have been getting flack from HR for having monthly to bi-monthly doctor's appointments due to my disabilities. Since the doctor's is usually only open during my working hours and I also live 45 minutes away from my doctor's office, I have to take several hours out of my day to go. I tend to just try and stack as many doctor's appointments into one day as I can so that I am not cutting into two or more days. At my job we have to work 38 hours per week to be considered full time. I tried asking if time missed for medical appointments could be counted as unpaid hours so I am not losing my full time status and I was essentially told to fuck off in HR speak. They said I would have to use my paid time off to make up the hours but we only get 4 hours of PTO a month and usually I take off the six hour day I have during the week when I do go to the appointments. 

I have several disabilities that are used as by name examples in pretty much everything that lists some to define what falls under the ADA. I have been disciplined at work for passing out from a health issue (one that I didn't know existed until the passing out happened and that they were told was a health issue, though I don't think most people willingly pass out in the middle of work) as well as flat out asked what my disabilities are then mocked by HR for them not being ""good enough"". I've also been threatened with being moved to part time and stripped of benefits if I pursue accommodations. I would just take being part time if not for the fact that they said I would be last on the list to receive clients if I switched to part time, essentially meaning no hours (I think as a threat to keep me from moving off of full time since they are desperately understaffed and in my job there is no way to cut corners unless you want the state to shut you down so they need all the hours they can ream from us). I've been unable to find any sort of law expert anywhere in the region I am in to ask for advice and that is the only reason I have not pursued legal action. At this point I am just trying to survive this job until I have enough money to move. I just want to know if I can at least fight for the basic respect of not being threatened with demotion every time I have to go see a health care professional. Sorry for this becoming a bit of a rant. I am nearly ready to start throwing my lab results at these people to show that I will die if I don't routinely see my doctor just to get them to leave me alone (I know this is not a good idea and that I should not do this). I have a meeting tomorrow where I am going to be yelled at for missing hours and likely threatened some more so any ground I can stand on would be much appreciated. My disabilities don't otherwise stop me from doing my job duties given I've survived this long but I'd rather thrive than just survive. 

Thank you in advance for your time and knowledge.",AskLawyers
[non-US] legal advice about housing and death ,"Canada 
If someone’s parent passes away while they were living with them can the beneficiary change the locks on the house without notice and the persons belongings inside? ",AskLawyers
[CA] DV restraining order case,"My husband and I are getting a divorce and I ordered a no ham restraining order for him. We have a few days before our trial and at this point he only wants to be communicated with via his lawyer. Prior to this, he was only speaking to me through his mom and sister. We have a young baby that goes from house to house.

Will the court think anything of the fact that my husband has been so hard to get a hold of, has denied mediation, and has hounded me with his lawyers? He has two pending felony charges for hurting me while holding our baby.

Thanks.",AskLawyers
[CA] Enterprise Rent-A-Car Upsell &amp; Upcharge Due to Late Pick-up of a Reserved Rental Car,"I’m mulling a class action lawsuit against a California Enterprise Rent-A-Car Outlet for giving my reserved “Nissan Versa or a similar 2 or 4 door car”to allegedly walk-in client because the staff said I was late. They then proceeded to up sell and up charge me with a big Dodge Charger or Corolla because I was late. 

I,  for one never picked up a rental car at an airport on time &amp; never been up charged because the reserved car is not available until now.  

I suspect they didn’t have my Nissan Versa nor it was rented out to a walk-in customer. I suspect the staff who upsold and up charged me is incentivized by a sales commission or bonus. Between an available Dodge Charger and Corolla don’t you consider the Corolla a “similar car” when there’s no Nissan Versa?

Has anyone ever experienced this with Enterprise Rent-A-Car and want to join me in a class action lawsuit?

Is a lawyer available and willing to file a class action lawsuit in my behalf and similarly treated customer/s by Enterprise Rent-A-Car?",AskLawyers
[VA] Time Card Manipulation ,"I’m in a situation. I found out that our employer requires us to be at work at our in-time that “cell phones say” but the actual time punch machine is routinely 5-10 minutes slow. Boss will then adjust our in-time from, say, 3:55 to 4:00 (due to the time punch system being off, 3:55 is the time we’re expected in on our phones won’t be paid until our “in time” of 4:00 on the time punch). On-time staff are then out those few minutes of pay each shift. Company handbook says “you can punch in early but won’t be paid until til your official in-time” which is deceiving. We’re allowed to punch in, then when we do punch in, regardless of the time, we’re expected to work. The five minutes doesn’t get added back on at the end of the shift. We’re literally not being paid for work being done when we show up and clock in “on time.”

Should I visit an Employment Attorney? 

Further explanation:
I show up at 4:00 according to my phone but time card machine says 3:55
Clock in 3:55
Work from “3:55-9:55”
Clock out 9:55
Boss changes clock-in to 4:00
Boss leaves clock-out 9:55

And the time lunch machine gets further and further behind until someone pays tech support to reset it. ",AskLawyers
[MD] corporate lawyers- I need your help ,"Hello I am currently a Junior at the University of Maryland, Business School studying International Business. (GPA: 3.5 and I'm very confident that I can increase this)

I plan on going to law school with the goal of becoming a corporate lawyer working with contracts, merger &amp; acquisitions, negotiations. 

I am seeking advice on what I should be doing right now to accomplish this.

are there any books you would recommend that I read? 

any advice on how to get an internship

What were you doing at my level? 

I am really struggling to find internship opportunities related to this field and any form of advice would be really appreciated. ",AskLawyers
[NV] damage to shared brick wall,"Neighbors contractor drilled through a shared brick wall to install ""I Hooks"" to hang plants. Our side of the wall looks like it has about 20 bullet holes now. They said they will patch it, but I have doubts they can. If I am not satisfied with what they do, am I SOL or do I have options?",AskLawyers
[WA] Is this normal and enforceable? WAIVER OF LIABILITY AND HOLD HARMLESS AGREEMENT for Community Garden,[WA] Is this normal and enforceable? WAIVER OF LIABILITY AND HOLD HARMLESS AGREEMENT for Community Garden,AskLawyers
[Va] what states in the United states has the broadest stand your ground laws?,"What I meant mean by ""broadest"" I am referring to states that have castle doctrine, as well as stand your ground law that allows me to use deadly force against someone beyond my home, in a public place where I'm allowed to be in, and where there is a presumption of violence and presumption of fear. 

I want to know what states allows you to shoot and kill someone in self defense in a public place where youre allowed to be in, where you are presumed yo have reasonable fear of fear, violence or death and claim self defense and that the prosecution has the burden to disprove you self defense claim.",AskLawyers
[TX] Why do defendants plead not guilty when there is video evidence ?,"I live outside houston and a case where a middle aged couple has made the news.

To keep it short a man was found walking around a grocery store pleasuring himself while following underage children, and recording it. A bystander called police, and the police arrested him for exposing himself. Further viewing of his phone revealed child pornography and videos of his wife performing sexual acts with the great dane.

They are in our neighborhood and neighbors were quite shocked.

Anyway, they plead not guilty today- and I am just wondering as I am NAL, what is the strategy that could be played by the defending attorney here? Video evidence of the man pleasuring himself, child porn on his phone, and videos of his wife getting it off with the great dane - isn't it a closed case?",AskLawyers
[FL] Is it legal to form a PLLC with law group in the name prior to becoming licensed to practice law?,"Is it legal to form a PLLC with law group in the name prior to becoming licensed to practice law?  - Florida 

I am trying to find out if it is legal to form a P.L.L.C. in this format “last name law group PLLC” prior to becoming licensed to practice law. I am starting law school next year and want to claim this name in the state I will be operating in (eventually), which is Florida. My reasoning is I would like to claim it before someone else does. 

No services will be rendered or any practice until fully licensed of course. The main goal is to claim the name. ",AskLawyers
[NY] Installment sale of a primary residence,"A client of mine is looking to sell a home that they have lived in for over 10 years in a nice town. Combining the tax basis and the $500k exemption, we are estimating a $2.7M capital gain.

The plan is to sell it on an installment plan to help lighten their tax burden. My questions are:

1. Can the full amount be collected and held in escrow to lower the risk of the buyers defaulting? Payments would be disbursed in variable amounts depending on tax planning for each year.

2. If the amount must come directly from the buyer, what other methods might there be to lower default risk?

3. Could the seller collect the capital gain tax-exempt amount during closing plus an extra chunk for that tax year or is there a more rigid/formal structure for installment sales?

TIA!",AskLawyers
[OR],"I can’t get into a huge amount of detail as this is my job. But a client frequents a bar (he does not drink) he is mentally disabled and lives in a group home if that helps, but still very independent. He just loves connecting with people. 
This has never been a problem, in fact the bars owners and managers celebrate his birthday! 
Here’s where I started to get wierd, now that it’s getting all warm and nice out the owner let him know he doesn’t want him coming on weekends when there’s more regular people to make room for others. 
Now He knows he’s disabled, and I’m unsure why owner would not want him to not go anymore to make room for the non-disabled people. This just feels kinda wrong to me. He’s really upset, and feels like he did something wrong for the owner to not like him, or that the owner hates him because he’s not like everyone else. He’s been going there for years. (The bar changed ownership fall last year) ",AskLawyers
"[MD] CC&amp;Rs what constitutes approval or disapproval ""in writing""?","I submitted a request for a boundary fence to my neighbors via email and have not received a formal response. Our CC&amp;Rs state: ""If the Declarant, its successors or assigns, fails to approve or disapprove *in writing*, within forty-five (45) days after such plans and specifications have been submitted to it, approval shall conclusively presumed to have been give.""

In our last neighborhood meeting for the fake HOA (long story) we discussed my request for a fence and my direct neighbor pressured everyone into a vote to avoid the 45 day rule automatically approving it. When the discussion was looking like they were going to approve the request, he mentioned to everyone that there is a property dispute between us (there is) and litigation (there isn't) and he insinuated that if they approved the fence and the litigation went his way that they'd all be liable for approving the fence with the pending litigation.

Backstory with the property dispute: it's been 4-5 months since my property survey indicated that what he thought was his property was actually a sizeable chunk of my property. It's been over 4 months since his own survey AGREED with my survey and he's been saying ""I'm looking into my options because it's my land"". There still has not been a quiet title action filed/served to me so there's no current litigation and he's not called the cops to trespass me because the surveys agree that it's my land. 

Back to the fence request, as I said, I've not received formal approval or disapproval in writing and I want to know what is legally considered ""in writing"". Does email suffice? Does it have to be a letter in the mail/handed to me/certified mail?

They recently sent out the meeting minutes to the last 'fake' HOA meeting and it says in it under ""Committee Reports"" the following: 
&gt;Twotall Shared pictures of his fence, Kentucky style with a black mesh to keep the dog in. Discussion over the fence being in the front yard: convenances state fences can not be in the front yard and may be approved in the back yard. Can we override the convenance and allow a fence in the front of yard? To override you need a yes of 6 out of 8 houses. Table the fence discussion until the end of the meeting Twotall is going to redraw the fence to minimize the fence in the front yard 

&gt;Vote: No on changing the convenances allowing the fence, however once the new plans are written and the dispute over property line is settled Twotall can submit the new plan for to discussion.""

Does that being in the meeting minutes constitute ""disapproval *in writing*""?",AskLawyers
[CA] Question about tampering with evidence," In the O.J. Simpson case, he was accused of not taking his arthritis medication a month before he tried to wear the glove. Nothing was done to the glove itself, i.e. the evidence, just his hand, so that the glove wouldn't fit. Is that still tampering with evidence? If not, what is it? ",AskLawyers
[GA] Ex is threatening to flee country to avoid paying child support!,"Title says it all… I’m 6 months pregnant, and my ex is threatening to flee the country and go “off grid” to avoid paying child support. I have recordings of this admission, as well as screenshots of him bragging about his plans on social media.

Since the baby hasn’t been born yet, I’ve been told that I can’t file anything child support or custody related yet. However, if I can prove his intent to flee to avoid financial responsibility — can I take any action now? Or, is he simply able to leave and get off scot-free?  

This is super frustrating because early-on, he agreed to be an active father (even though we are separated), and even said he’d pay child support if necessary. Given what I know now, he was just telling me what I wanted to hear. I’m still excited to be a mom, but because of his threats, I feel at a loss. What are my next steps?",AskLawyers
[MT] Us Subcontractor is avoiding paying ,"Hispanic, decided to work for a subcontractor for a while (white person) he used to pay me under the table but after a while he just gave me a card and get me stuff instead for “payment” I was okay with that for a while bc I don’t have family or anyone under my care besides my cat. I kept asking for payment and it was always something new. 
Decided to quit working for him, then he came to my house,  took everything that he basically used as “Payment” and now I’m in a hole where I don’t know what to do to get my stuff back or a least some money. 
My legal Status is ASY, Waiting on I-765. 
I know this is very vague but my English is limited. 
Any advice is appreciated, thank you. ",AskLawyers
[IL] Should I be compensated for my rent and buyout?,"For the past week, my apartment’s sink and washer have been backed up with mud/sewage and have been refilling/draining all over my floor and I have been cleaning it myself. 
Yes, maintenance and my landlord have known about this and have also known about the flooding/pipe issues for months and months that have eventually led to this issue. The sewage has been present recently, though, and has been really really bad. My apartment stinks to high heaven, and everything is disgusting. My kitchen sink is conpletely caked with the stuff and cannot drain. My laundry room nearby is filled with standing water

I read somewhere that you can be conpensated for this because your apartment is no longer livable. I have put in for my termination because I can’t take this behavior anymore at treating me like the sewage covering my floor for the past three years. I was just curious if there is anything I can do to help me because I am taking a risk financially by moving out to another place. 

Note: My contract states I can terminate the lease early if I submit in writing 60 days prior to move-out, but I did 30 days.  It also states I must pay a fee equivalent to my rent but will not be obligated for the rest of my term after that. I would have 8 months left. 

Another note: I can prove negligence on maintenance’s part and can attest it has been happening since I moved in. Although I can’t prove the emotional damage it has caused nor the instances of feeling like I was being belittled or gaslighted (told there is no problem or “this shouldn’t be happening,” which I took as they’re blaming it on sonething I did)
",AskLawyers
[KY] Trying to seek full custody and don't know how ,I've never been to court or sought a lawyer. I have proof of drug use around our daughter and want to seek full custody but I can't afford a lawyer and don't know what my first steps should be. Any advice is appreciated. Thank you ,AskLawyers
[AZ] Am I breaking my lease if I move out but still pay the remaining 3 month's rent on time? See post for details.,"I might need to relocate for work in early May, about three months before my current lease ends. The only thing that I can see in my lease suggesting that I have actually LIVE there is this part:

&gt;1. USE. The premises shall be used only for residential purposes and only by those Residents and Occupants listed above.

Since no one will be using it, I had to ask if moving early but still paying the rent is in keeping with the agreement.

There is something else though: they will make more money off of me if I announce that I am breaking my lease. I don't have time to give the required 60 days of notice, and even if I did I am charged 2x rent for breaking the lease. If I don't give 60 days of notice and still break the lease, then I have to pay 60 days worth of rent and 2x rent for breaking the lease. I only have 3 more months of rent left on this lease so it is definitely better to just pay the monthly rent.

Do you think I'll be breaking my lease if I move out but continue to pay rent? This is the best option because it means I only spend 3x rent, not what is effectively 4x rent if I ""break my lease"".

Money is pretty tight so I definitely appreciate any help or advice you can give!",AskLawyers
Do I have a civil case? [MI],"\[MI\]

I'm at graduate student at Michigan state. Long-story short, last year I was having issues with my advisor along with some health problems, I went to the chair to find a solution, followed her advice, and was put on academic probation. (this was also just weeks and months following our traumatizing campus shooting, which I thought they understood the impact of)

I worked with the ombudsperson to cover my bases, but didn't pursue any action because I was just concerned about not getting kicked out of school. I ended up getting a new advisor, passing the probationary review, and bouncing back very well. However, as a result of this I had to borrow extra money from my parents because I had to complete a third of my thesis early before dissertation funds (about $2k from them), and I had very very difficult mental health issues including suicidal ideation.

I believe that overall, it was the university's fault, the chair's fault, and my ex-advisor's fault. However, I would like to remain on good terms with the chair if possible. Do I have any case against the ex-advisor? Other details are that she seems to live out-of-state now, leaving her other mentees high and dry. I think back to all the emotional and financial strife I went through and want some justice if possible. TIA.

Edit: Thank you all for the candid advice, especially if you were kind about it. Turning off notifications now. ",AskLawyers
[NJ] After 2 full years my ex began stalking me again. ,"I have proof of it all through emails, letters, proof of them breaking into my ig, school account, following me around, etc. 

What are my changes of getting approved for a restraining order ? 

Also can I sue for emotional abuse?",AskLawyers
[TX] Work Issue,"Hello, I need some advice on how to handle a situation at work. One of my co-workers recently came out as transgender and sent out an email asking us to use their preferred pronouns. I respect their decision, but I have some religious objections to using pronouns that do not match their biological sex. Is there a way I can avoid using these pronouns without getting fired? I live in Texas, if that makes any difference.",AskLawyers
[NJ] Water runoff from valley top hill towards screaming neighbor. ,"Water runoff from valley top hill towards screaming neighbor. 

Rain water from top of valley hill running through my backyard towards neighbor which is sloped lower. 

I live in a valley, 3 row houses 1 acres each. Facing the back is a hill topping an unused farm and my house is situated in the middle of the row. To my right facing back the level is higher, I’m in the midden, to the left is lower. So all the rain water that comes on top of the valley, are running towards the neighbor to the left. 

When we bought the house, the original driveway located to the left of the house facing backyard is graded to slightly run towards neighbor on left. Then I extended said driveway to run mid backyard with bern so water runoff would go down towards road, but some do runs towards neighbor on left front yard. 

Now this neighbor is not the most reasonable. Previous owner of my house had issues with them. We had issues with this neighbor as well since we moved in 4 years ago. Claiming the land by the driveway that came with this newly built house when previous owner built it is theirs without proof. 2 different survey companies (previous owner and ours) measured property and confirmed it is built on the line. Harassing us on what we can’t and can do within the confines of our property. Culminating last January where the widow neighbor was screaming like a wild elephant everything is hers. Trespassing into our property and trimming a bush where I reported to town police the 2 incidents. Screaming like a crazy person whenever she gets opportunity. Wife is very stressed about it. We’ve consulted our lawyer and advised us to build a tall fence. But I don’t have 3 feet offset from line in the original driveway, per town ordinance. Vegetation would suffice. 

Today I am planting rose hedge along the driveway she spoke to me in a calm manner and brought up about the water runoff towards her house and front yard. Also wanted to speak about the incidents that happened previously. I was calm and cordial and humored her polite conversation like a civilized person would do. I agreed I don’t wanted to go to court and tie down our properties in litigation. I heard she is moving to Florida from the police officer I spoke with when I filed the trespassing complaint, and we are planning on moving to California for higher pay. 

I’m new to this and would like advice here if I should install/ add bern on the original driveway to contain water runoff towards the road and not her property. 

I wanna be the bigger person and be neighborly. But do I have any responsibility in respect how the natural terrain is situated?

Thank you all!",AskLawyers
[Non-US] UK legal research,"Hi all, I'm a UK-based engineer who wants to look up case studies for things like 'is a sabotage a defence against negligence?' Is there a online legal resource I could use that would give me case studies and the like?  

Ideally there'd be some kind of search engine where you could type in ""sabotage"" and ""negligence"" to see what comes up. ",AskLawyers
[FL] can I sue the hospital ? ,"I’ve been dealing with some serious issues after having two kidney transplants. After my second transplant in 2017  I started experiencing uncomfortable pain three years later. I’ve been in and out of the ER with flank pain, but all scans and blood levels come back normal. It’s been a daily struggle living with this pain.

Last week, I started having trouble urinating. I had 880ml of urine in me, and even with pain meds, it was difficult to pee. I went back to the ER a few days later with the same issue, but once again, nothing abnormal showed up on the scans.

Today was especially rough. I couldn’t sleep because my whole body was hurting. I had to force myself to pee, and it was excruciatingly painful. To my surprise, I passed a piece of plastic while urinating. No doctors have been able to determine where it came from or why it’s causing me so much pain.

Initially, I thought it might be a fluke, but it was a 2-inch piece of plastic. I’m at a loss, and no one seems to know the right way forward. I was sent home from the ER still in massive pain.

Now I had a stent takened out in 2017 but now this is now coming to life and could be infecting me potentially with more Er visits . I’ve lost jobs due to my medical issues/my relationship cause I always have to go to er.My everyday life. Not to mention hospital bills. 
",AskLawyers
[CT] Is it legal for companies to void their warranty based on what reseller you buy from?,"Someone I know has a fitness tracking watch that is malfunctioning two months after she bought it. The manufacturer claims their 1 year warranty is voided because she bought it through a reseller that wasn't an ""authorized reseller."" 

To be specific, she bought it on Amazon who IS an authorized reseller, but the sale was apparently not made through Amazon but a third party selling on Amazon. 

Now, ignoring the annoying aspect of Amazon selling stuff that isn't being sold by Amazon... Is it legal for them to reject warranty claims based on reseller? In my mind, these things are serialized so the manufacturer knows when they built it and when they sold it to the reseller. Can they really just put it in their warranty terms that you have to buy from their preferred resellers?",AskLawyers
[CO] order of payment to creditors from an estate. ,"My father recently and suddenly passed away from pancreatic cancer. Everything was in his name only. He has several automobiles which, if sold, could generate $45,000. However, he and my mom jointly owe the IRS $35,000. According to C.R.S 15-12-805 I read that my mom can have exempt property of $30,000 before the IRS gets paid. Can an attorney in Colorado please verify if that is in fact, correct? If it is, we will open probate. If it is not, then we will not open probate we have asked to probate attorneys and neither of them were able to answer this question. I would greatly appreciate anyone who can help me. 
",AskLawyers
[WI] vehicle title,Purchased a vehicle in Wisconsin. Vehicle was purchased with a loan but I was sent title with my name on it and no lien holder listed on title. Do I own the vehicle outright or should I just make payments as expected.  ,AskLawyers
"[PA] If a company or large institution mistakenly sends you a large sum of money, what are your legal rights in such a situation?","I recently watched a video featuring an individual who received a substantial sum of money in error from an investment bank; the individual proceeded to use almost the entire amount and ultimately served a 10-year prison sentence. I'm curious about the legal rights involved in this situation. The mistake was indeed made by the investment bank, as they sent the funds to the wrong recipient. Let me be clear: returning the money is unquestionably the morally correct action. However, is there a legal basis for refusing to do so and retaining the funds?  
many of the comments from the video said that he should have gotten a good lawyer, so just wondering how a good layer would win this one.  
btw this was in the Pennsylvania USA ",AskLawyers
"[CA] husband passed 20 yrs ago. Is it possible to find out what his estate was, if anything?","[CA] husband passed 20 yrs ago. Is it possible to find out what his estate was, if anything?",AskLawyers
[IL] Need Guidance,"Need guidance

I 18m was on a dating site  and matched with a girl who we will call k. I and k exchanged numbers and started texting saying hi and giving each other photos to put on our contacts, she said i was cute so i told her she was beautiful. Then she sends me an explict picture (which i didn't save). She the ask me my age so i told her and i asked her age and she said she was 16. She then started to talk ""dirty"" and i told her i had to go to bed because i had work in the morning. She then asked one more question before i went to bed, she wanted to know the size of my manhood, i asked her why, she said she was just wondering, so i gave her a vague answer, and went to bed. 

The next day i get a text from an investigator, who we wiil call T, saying that i either pay 1800 dollars or i will be arrested and be put  on the sex offenders list. I look up this investigator and T'sand k's phone number are from south carolinaand i live in illinois, and his is not registered under the name he gave me. He told me to pay them through cashapp. I told them i can do payments and the guy i paid has a different last name that the supposed family.So what should i do, should i pay the ransom, or should i get a lawyer to fight the charges?",AskLawyers
[PA] Do I have any right to know where my son is?,"PA - Can I find my open to closed adopted son?

I had a son in 2014 during a rough time in my life and was incarcerated shortly after his birth. My then husband was also incarcerated and looking at a life sentence. I signed my father to be a foster family so he could get assistance caring for my son. My father abandoned him to the Foster Care system. My ex husbands family in North Carolina offered to care for him. I was told I needed to sign my rights over to them due to the interstate compact. I was assured after my release, he would be back in my care. At the court hearing I was told that I was signing an open adoption. It did not sit right with me and I put a slip into my public defender, within the 30 day time frame, that I wanted to withdraw my signature. I didn’t hear anything. When I was released 5 months later, I contacted my ex husbands family and was told that during one of the monthly trips to PA that they had to do for the interstate compact, they just left him with my county’s children and youth services. This, according to the public defender and children &amp; youth, meant the adoption turned to a closed adoption and I had no legal right to even know who he was in the care of.
I had to pay an attorney $15,000 to get my ex husbands rights removed with my oldest son (who is the full brother of my younger son) and am still paying on that with the interest. I’ve run into dead ends on my own trying to find any information. I don’t want to take him, obviously. However, I would like a chance for him to know his brother and just to know who is raising him. Just to know that he is OK. Any guidance at all would be greatly appreciated.
Just to add (because I sound like an awful, stupid person), I was never in any serious trouble and I’ve been living a quiet life with my other two children for the last 9 years. I think about my youngest son every day and regret ever believing anyone, let alone signing any paperwork. TYIA.

Edit to add: I think there may be some confusion. I do NOT want to show up and meet him, upset his life in anyway. I completely understand how traumatic that would be and unfair to him. I would like to be able to leave my contact information to his parents so they could reach out if they would like to. I know that I have no right to know where he is.
I’d also like to know if there is any recourse with the lawyer who did not do his job in withdrawing my signature. I’ve done a lot of research and I can’t find another similar case. It’s been traumatic for us but I take full responsibility for that and do not want to add any trauma to anyone.",AskLawyers
[non-US] Chances of being found guilty of DUI on antipsychotic?,"Located in Canada. A friend of mine who is only taking an antipsychotic (Pimozide) for Tics.  He walks with a shuffle and often repeats himself when he talks. He was stopped by an off duty cop while at work, he drives to a job site and provides security overnight. He failed a roadside sobriety test, got arrested and was brought in for a blood and urine drug test which only showed his prescribed medication. He doesn't abuse his medication and only takes it as prescribed. He also got a letter from his doctor stating that he is allowed to drive on that medication and that it does not impact his reaction time. He went to court today and they set a date for trial. 

I'm trying to help keep his hopes up that he won't lose his license and his job but the research I have found sounds like it doesn't matter if you are only taking your prescription, they can still charge you with DUI. 

What do you think his chances are of being found not guilty?

Thanks",AskLawyers
[non-US] How to get a video deleted from youtube?,"EU.

Nine years ago, when I was a student, I was very active at the university and helped promote it a lot at student trade fairs, etc. Officially, I have never worked for the university and have never signed any papers. They just paid for my flights and hotels.

Once, I was asked to talk in front of the camera about student life for the student recruitment agency. They used to make these videos and upload them on YouTube as promo material to recruit students.

It's been nine years, and when you Google my name, it's the second result you see. The video is weird and the content is outdated, and I look naive and, frankly, stupid (as I was back then).

I want to email the agency and ask them to remove the video. Once, I tried that, but they were quite hesitant and said that I was an alleged ambassador of the university, and sort of had a working relationship with the university. Well, I never replied and forgot about it. Now I want to email them with some references to the law articles. I am thinking about the EU GDPR ""right to be forgotten.""

What would you recommend?

The university and the agency are based in the European Union.",AskLawyers
[TX] Ok to record yelling neighbor for court?,"My mom has a nightmare neighbor in Texas. He may have a mental illness but if he does, it's likely not diagnosed.

Long story short is that the neighbor's cost my mom about $40,000 in damages from legal and illegal activity. She's now going through bankruptcy and having to pay for a lawyer she can't afford.

The neighbors sued my mom for trespassing (wildly bogus claim) and she counter suit for damages she's had to pay for on his behalf. Judge ruled in my mom's favor said a jury trial for amount to be paid (don't understand that).

Neighbor has called police on my mom over 140 times in the course of about two years police have had multiple meetings about having to deal with him. Example, he's called the police with my two year old son wondered on his property while I had hypoglycemia. He's called police with delivery drivers parked on his property asking if his address was my mom's address, etc.

He's been yelling at my mom on about a daily basis. He'll yell childish things, “you look like a frog!” Also, “you look like a man! Women shouldn't wear men's clothes!”

The jury trial is coming up. We'd like to record his yelling as evidence to the victim card or expecting him to play. We also found out his court appointed attorney filed a motion to withdraw at his representation yesterday.

Will it be OK to present recordings of his yelling as evidence in court?",AskLawyers
[GA] How should I go about trying for mental health disability?,"First off, if this is not the correct sub to ask, please point me in the direction of which would be better! Tagging NSFW just in case due to mentions of suicidal thoughts/mental breakdowns.

I (recently 25f if age matters) am looking into SSDI, however I'm having a pretty difficult time trying to figure it all out by myself. It seems like it's going to cost me a lot of money and time I don't have, but it genuinely feels like my only option at this point. I'm so embarrassed and I truly don't want to be seen as a lazy person trying to just live off of the government for the rest of my life. This nagging thought is making it harder for me to reach out for help in real life, so I thought I'd try here first.

 I am clinically diagnosed with Severe Generalized Anxiety Disorder, Social Anxiety, Major Depressive Disorder, Panic Disorder, ADHD, and unofficially diagnosed (by a therapist, not my doctor) with Agoraphobia(i doubt this will count in a case, but I wanted to put it out there). As you can imagine, these things make it extremely difficult for me to do... well much of anything. Though I'm sure it's common in this day and age, work and even just thinking about work/applying for jobs/interviewing honestly makes me suicidal. To the point of panic attacks and the thought of needing hospitalization again, which i cannot afford. While I'm able to be clear minded and try to think logically, I cannot control this constant ideation and it's wearing on me. I genuinely can't continue to live like this, I need some kind of break.

My issue is, I know these diagnoses are listed in the blue book and it is *possible* to get disability due to them. However, I know and understand it is hard to prove mental illnesses and I will most likely get denied after the first application and will have to try again. This is terrifying to me, it brings me almost to the same mental breaking point of thinking of work. I don't understand everything I need to have ready, and I'm scared to start the process without having a full, laid out idea of what I need to expect; I'm finding it difficult to find all my answers on google. 

I believe I need to contact old and current doctors, therapists, and maybe records of my last hospitalization, but what else? Do I need to currently be in treatment via therapy and medication for them to even glance at my application? Do I need to have an attorney ready to take my case, will they even believe I qualify? I read something stating I need to have worked at least 5 out of the last 10 years to qualify, is this true? I don't know if all of my work experience adds up to 5 years, I've been dealing with these thoughts and feelings before I could even work in the first place. Also, I still live with my parents if that matters. 

 If anyone can help me with a list of steps I need to take, preferably in a step by step order if that's at all possible, would be incredible. Also, I would appreciate honest opinions on if you think I could actually qualify or if this is all just a waste of time for everyone. I apologize for the length of this, but I hope maybe it will help me get some more detailed answers if it's possible. Thank you for your time🙏🏼 

EDIT: Thank you for all the replies and everyone being helpful 🫶🏼 We have come to the conclusion I will not be approved for either SSI or SSDI, I will probably no longer reply to comments. I appreciate everyone's help with this, thank you for your time and I hope y'all continue to do well❤️",AskLawyers
[CA] what is a policy limit demand and how much if any will I actually receive ? ,"US 

My attorney is sending out a policy limit demand for auto accident 

That kinda sums it up. Long story is this guy hit me on the left side when I just merged into a newly existing right turn only lane. My lawyer and insurance have decided he was completely at fault. 
I knew he would fight try to fight it, as he claimed he was filing , and when I tried opening a claim with his insurance they said the determined me at fault. 

My insurance covered me for 1,000 for medical  and my partner who was also in the crash and so I opted for chiropractic care. We did some scans and there’s something displaced in my neck area. I’ve had constant pain and trouble sleeping and even numbness in my right arm that hospital says is due to pinched nerve likely in the same area.  My chiropractor worked on me based on good faith for what I’m assuming to be about another 1000 worth and sent the bill to the attorney. That dr recommended physical therapy or surgery. I’m opting out of surgery as I’m scared to death from a family member having spinal surgery and passing during the procedure. 

Car repair was a little over 8,000 and my insurance also covered that. 

Anyways,
 
It’s been a year and a half and everything has persisted the same. 

Just got an email from my attorneys assistant stating they were doing a policy limit demand and to the insurance and I’m wondering what happens next, and if I actually get any of that money? 
I’ve spent very little time talking to the lawyer. Maybe an hour at most. And maybe 10 emails with his assistant. Plus they retrieved my records. And ya know whatever lawyers do ( no idea what’s involved but I assume a lot of talking to insurances and drs and such) 

The guys coverage was 
BI 25k/50 each accident
PD 25k
Med pay 5k each person

Edited to add: lost out on two or three months worth of work and wasn’t able to continue the same amount of yourself for a bit after as well

TLDR: I got into an accident and deemed not at fault by insurance and lawyer. Experiencing tough side affects still. Wondering what happens next and am I looking at a cash settlement in my pocket? Or does it go to lawyer dr and insurance ",AskLawyers
[CA] Can I sue a foster parent even though I’m an adult now,Is it possible to sue a former foster parent for abuse even though I am in my late 20s?,AskLawyers
"[DC] Received notice to quit lease, do I have any leverage in requesting an additional month to vacate?","I’ve rented a condo from my landlord for nearly 3 years. We have a great relationship and have never ran into any issues, I’ve consistently paid rent early throughout my tenancy. 

My current lease is up on May 31st, and I expected to either sign a new lease or continue month to month as we had previously. My landlord gave me notice to quit today (4/9) and has asked me to vacate the property on May 31st at the end of our lease agreement, her reason being that she would like to move into the apartment. This was very unexpected. 

I have prior travel plans from May 15th through June 8th, and requested that we extend the timeline until June 30th so I have ample time to accommodate my travel and make arrangements to find new housing. She declined and said she’s giving me more than 30 days notice. 

I’m posting a blurb from my lease agreement below, I feel that this could be interpreted as they need to give me a 30 day notice to quit after the lease expires, ie 1 additional month following lease agreement. This would give me more leverage in asking for an extension to June 30th. 

LEASE EXCERPT: 
“The term of this lease is for one year, beginning June 1, 2023 and ending May 31, 2024. After completion of the one-year lease, it will automatically turn into a periodic tenancy (month-to-month), subject to an adjustment in rental price, unless a new lease is completed. After the one-year contractual lease has expired, the Lessee or Lessor may terminate the resulting periodic tenancy upon providing the other with a 30-day notice to quit.” 

If I have to simply accept the May 31st deadline to vacate then I will, but I’m curious if there is any argument to be had here for the additional month. 

For context, I am in DC. Both of my landlord and her husband are successful practicing lawyers themselves. 

Thank you! ",AskLawyers
[OH] Do I have a case (med negligence)?,"Is this considered medical negligence?

So, I've been having medical issues ever since a trip to Peru, 2 years ago. My persistent symptoms have been stomach pain, upper abdominal pain, nocturia, inconsistent stool (blood, mucus), erectile dysfunction, and ejaculation problems. The part that made me suffer the most was waking up at 4am to go the restroom and try to go but physically couldn't and get a headache or nose bleed and then try to go back to sleep but can't until after an hour or more. After the first year of seeing my general physician, I had seen 1 GI and 1 urologist who both were convinced that it was IBS or pelvic floor dysfunction. Which confused me because I'm a M, 23 and very physically active and former collegiate athlete. I pushed back on both diagnosis'  but gave in to me being the small percentage of males who have both. I was given 3 rounds of antibiotics and 2 medications for my stomach and bladder. After 1 year went by, my physical health worsen (the symptoms started affecting my sexual life and I spent more time in the bathroom) and mental health more than anything was horrendous. I have a sleep tracker that records consistent days of not getting more than 4 hours of sleep. I then saw 2 other urologists and 1 more gi. I then got order to get a colonoscopy, a cystoscopy(which is on the worst things I've ever felt), blood tests, CT scans, pt pevlic floor therapy, and x rays but found nothing and had no improvement. I was then again told by gi and urologist pevlic floor and IBS. I pushed for stool tests but the GI said it wasn't necessary or would show nothing. It showed that I had mucus but the gi said its normal with IBS. I was frustrated because I had not answers but numerous tests. I then had a nurse who was checking me at an MRI recently, talk to me and was curious about what see saw on my chart. She then asked me symptoms and said that she had a family friend have those same symptoms and she got tested for H pylori to which she got positive for. She said it is odd how I haven't had this testing done yet and she think I should request one or urge the doctor to order one. I did and he said ""I'm 99% it's not going to show anything and you can save money because i think it is IBS but we can try."" I tested positive for H pylori. I don't know if this is the procedure for doing things but all I know is I had 2 years of awful pain that could've been resolved with apparently a breathe test. Was there negligence? 

",AskLawyers
[ME] ducking a subpoena as a victim of Felony Domestic Violence,"A year ago I reported my future ex-husband for domestic violence.  He had been abusing me for years; but the shame, stigma, and fear of how I would be able to support myself and our 5 kids kept me quiet about it.  I thought that if I could just keep him from getting angry, I could prevent the abuse, but it didn’t work.  It was also complicated by the fact that despite the fact that he was abusive to me, he is a devoted father and loves his kids.  To make it even more complicated, the home that he owns is owned outright by him and it was a gift given to him by his father, which means that I have no legal right to it in a divorce.  He owns his own business, also a gift from his father, and the business is attached to his house.  He didn’t want me to work outside of the home, so I was a SAHM.  

Unfortunately, he became increasingly violent and one day while the kids were at school he picked a fight with me and while I was crying and asking for a separation, he put his hand around my throat and pinned me against the wall.

3 days later I took my chance to leave with the kids.  I had a 2 year protection order, CPS was called when the truth about the abuse came out, and I was pressured to report it to the police.  I did, and he was arrested and charged with 3 felony counts.  Domestic violence assault, domestic violence terrorizing, and domestic violence aggravated assault.

9 months later, I dropped the PFA and essentially gave the kids back to him because I couldn’t afford to take care of them on my own.  He was required to pay child support, but because he is self-employed, he paid me when he felt like it and hides most of his income now by getting paid cash.  When I gave the kids back to him, I was able to work full-time, not pay for childcare, and not have to worry about having to pay for all of the things that the kids need.  He pays for all of it now.

So, for practical reasons, I really don’t want to see him end up in prison. 

He is refusing to plead guilty.  He wanted me to retract my statement to the police, but I refused to do that because first of all, he did it.  Second of all, I am not putting my neck on the line so that he can get off the hook completely.  I still don’t want to see him end up in prison because I can’t afford to support the kids on my own.  I have been sending him as much money as I can to help with the kids even though there is no child support order in place anymore and I make significantly less than him.  I also have the kids a few days a week, so they aren’t with him totally full time, but he provides childcare when they aren’t in school and he is buying everything they need, I guess unless you count the money I have been sending him via Venmo.

But anyway, the police are trying to find me to serve me a subpoena.  I have been avoiding it since I am staying at a new address and I never forwarded my mail.  I have instructed everyone close to me to not disclose my new location.  I am ignoring calls and texts from the police.  Can I get in trouble for that?  Also, if they do find me, can I plead the 5th even though I didn’t commit a crime?  

I hate that this is my situation, but I don’t see any way out of it for any of us.",AskLawyers
[VA] Some girl are trying to sue me for defamation?,"Long story short, we had a **college** SGA (student government) election and she cheated and won the election. While she was cheating and actually got suspension for cheating, she kept writing emails to the president threatening to sue, and also writing false statements that I cheated and should be disqualified.

During the campaign, me and several senators wrote an impeachment resolution with everything she's done wrong and got it approved by the senate. Some things were incorrect like ""the t-shirts weren't approved to print"" but they were. They were brought to our attention and we just dropped the case, I dropped out of SGA, and she won. She didn't even send it from her address. She doesn't know my address and barely knows my last name.

She wrote some little ""cease and desist"" letter to me (not from a laywer, from her) saying that I need to provide written confirmation that I understand. I wrote on the letter how she doesn't have grounds and how my statements are somewhat in truth as she got suspended for cheating, and slipped it under her dorm door (directly nextdoor to me)

She's telling her room mates that this is harassment for writing on the letter and she's gonna sue both for defamation and this evident harassment. I feel like a lawyer wouldn't even take the case. She hasn't been harmed, our statements were made in truth and when some were proven false we dropped the case and didn't even file it with the SGA. Like just the 8 people in SGA saw the draft document, and we told them it was a draft document and things will be removed or added. No one really even cares about this but she is known to cause drama and has threatened to sue the university for suspending her campaign for 24 hours for her actually cheating.

What are my options? What are her chances? Should I even be worried?

Thanks!",AskLawyers
[TX] [MO] Which state would i have to go through to terminate rights to a child?,The father lives in Texas and his child is in Missouri. I know Texas requires a court order but which state would the termination happen in? The mother’s state? The father is willing to sign away his rights with no fight but Im not sure which state courts to go through. I also dont have money for a good family lawyer so how would i get a public defender? Or do I need one?,AskLawyers
 Monthly Open Forum April 2024: Rule 10,"Continuing our deep dive into the rules of the sub, we’ll touch on one that covers a few topics. At first glance, it may appear to be a hodgepodge of just “yeah, put the shit anywhere” but all the components are related.First, we do not permit META posts. Anything you wish to discuss about the sub can be done right here in the Monthly Open Forum. META posts were allowed in the early days of the sub, but there’s not much need for them anymore. Quite honestly, most of the META attempts we see are either people trying to do (what they think is) a clever clapback after a removal/warning, or just observations about the sub. And those can be addressed in the comments below or via [modmail.](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAmItheAsshole&amp;subject=&amp;message=)

Perhaps the most-frequently used part of Rule 10 is regarding updates. As noted, all standalone updates require approval. We do that for a variety of reasons, but the main one is to ensure that the update still follows sub rules. There have been instances where a post was fairly innocuous, but then the update talks about how someone went to prison for murder after the post, or something. I’m being a bit hyperbolic here, but not as much as you may think! We also sometimes see updates that basically say “we haven’t spoken since the post and I’ve blocked them.” That’s not really an update. So we review all updates to ensure all sub rules are still met.

If I may offer a little peek behind the curtain…It’s been interesting being on this side of the sub. Some updates are just wild and violate all kinds of rules. Others are simply heartbreaking to read. And then there are the ones that make you smile. We review all updates as a team though. So if you wish to do an update post, please know that it can sometimes take up to 48 hours to review. If you happen to catch us when several mods are online, you may get a fast response though.

One of the more recent additions to Rule 10, but one that is being leaned into a bit more it seems, is the last sentence. We are not a sub for diary/saga/serial posting. And we have no interest in becoming one. We’re here for the *occasional* conflict you may have. Not to arbitrate every little encounter you may have. If you find yourself having so many issues that you need to post here frequently, you likely need a level of help that we cannot provide, but may be available elsewhere on Reddit. Excessive posting can result in a ban. We do give users a warning, so this isn’t something that earns an immediate ban, but we’ve seen some folk try to use the sub to just post about everything. This has increased in frequency so much as of late, we’ve actually updated our FAQ and are announcing this here - you may submit no more than one post every 3-4 months *at most.*

___

#As always, do not directly link to posts/comments or post uncensored screenshots here. Any comments with links will be removed.

___

We'd like to highlight the regional spinoffs we have linked on the sidebar! If you have any suggestions or additions to this, please let us know in the comments.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my dad and stepmom their home isn't my home?,"My parents had me and pretty soon after they divorced.  My parents divorce was not amicable. I (16f) don't know all the details obviously, but I know that bad blood exists on both sides. And if you want my suspicions. I think they divorced so badly because my dad wanted to set up his own business but my mom didn't want that to happen right after me. My dad owns his own business ,actually he owned two and the first one he had to close up. The first one he started right after the divorce which is why I suspect what I do. My dad also complained once or twice that mom never supported him.

So there are issues between my parents. When I'm with my mom you would never know it. She does not vent about dad, badmouth him, or try to hide the fact they were married and had me together. She has some photos of us before the divorce in our living room among the rest of the family photos. And while I have issues with my stepdad and he's not my favorite person ever, he has never complained or tried to erase the fact he married a woman who had a kid with someone else. He never got that part wrong despite our issues.

But my dad's house is so very different. It got worse after he married my stepmom. I'm not supposed to mention my mom at all, they don't let me have anything there that my mom bought, even my favorite plushy that mom bought me as an infant. I can't have a single photo of my mom or my half siblings on her side. I used to have a little pinboard of photos and my dad and stepmom went into my room in the past and removed all traces of mom. My stepmom even said she burned the photos of mom. They have told me in their house they do not want to see my mom and my room is not a compromise. So of course I don't like being here. I spend 50% of my time here, and no the courts won't let me stop coming and they would punish my mom if I stop and the judge told my mom if she does not force me to go, and stay, she would pay. After our last attempt a few months ago dad started telling me I don't treat my room like my room or I don't act like it's my home. He asked me why I wanted to leave ""our home"".

On Sunday my dad and stepmom told me I act like I'm a guest in their house instead of part of the family and that it's my home. I told them it's not my home, it's their home. I told them I can't mention my mom or keep a photo of her in my room. I can't do whatever I want with my room like they claim so no, all of that means this was never my home. I told them I am a guest here half my life and that's all I will ever be. They told me I was being melodramatic and my stepmom called me manipulative.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying my niece hit the jackpot with her husband?,"My niece has been married for 2 years and I’m honestly so happy for her because her husband is amazing. He’s kind, helpful, treats her like a princess and is both charming and funny. It’s clear that he loves my niece a lot and would do anything for her.

I told my niece she hit the jackpot with her husband a few days ago which has caused some issues between me, my other nieces and their partners. For some context my niece had their first child 4 months ago and because her friends have been telling her horror story after horror story about women who gave up their careers to raise children she’s been feeling scared and stressed. To alleviate her anxiety her husband has moved assets he owned prior to the marriage onto her name and made sure he legally wouldn’t be able to take them back if they were to divorce. I personally think it’s a wonderful gesture. On top of that he’s been leaving work early or working from home whenever she’s feeling overwhelmed or just wants him to stay with her. Obviously, not everyone is fortunate enough to be able to leave work whenever but I still find it sweet of him, especially as she refused to hire a nanny so she would have help while he’s working which he doesn’t get upset at her over.  

He’s my brother-in-law’s favourite son-in-law so my other two nieces and their partners, who were there at the time, are upset because they also think I’m favouring him. Even though he is objectively the better catch, I told them that all of their partners were amazing to soften the situation but I don’t think it helped. One of my other nieces is especially mad because I was praising him for things that ‘normal people’ just can’t do which is unfair to them.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for choosing to live with my grandparents instead of my siblings and stepmother?,"My dad died 5 months ago. It was really sudden. He wasn't sick. He just went to work one day and didn't make it back home. Dad had five kids. He had me (16m) Mia (11f) and Ky (10m) with our mom and she died 9 years ago. Dad got remarried 5 years ago and had two kids with his second wife. Dad had set it up where Mia, Ky and I would stay with his wife if something were to happen to him. He never brought this up. But when I found out I wasn't really happy and I expressed a wish to live with my maternal grandparents. Ky and Mia wanted to be with his wife. They call her mom and have a really close relationship with her and our half siblings. They wanted me to stay as well. They said they didn't want to lose me too and even though I assured them they would still see me, they were angry and sad. My dad's wife told me I should just stay. That I could give her a chance to be a second mom to me and could have her and my siblings for support. I told her I didn't want to live with her.

An emergency custody hearing was held and I spoke to the judge with my grandparents and my dad's wife in the room with us. He asked me why I wanted to go against my dad and if I would like to have some kind of shared custody set up for me. I said no. I wanted to live with my grandparents outright. That I loved and respected them and needed them but I did not love or respect or need my dad's second wife and that I love Mia and Ky so much and I had nothing against my half siblings, but I felt better being with my grandparents.

The judge agreed. He ordered I could live with my grandparents while Ky and Mia could stay with my dad's wife. He did order the three of us to have individual therapy to help them not hate me. And that helped. They ask a lot of questions when I see them, and they don't understand me not loving ""their mom"" but they do get now that she's not my mom like she is theirs. They know she's not their bio mom. She's the only mom they know.

My dad's wife is furious and she has made so many comments about my decision. She has also brought up what I said to the judge and the fact I don't love all four siblings is disgusting. But she said I turned my back on my family and I basically said I didn't care that she had done her best to be a good mother to three kids that weren't hers, it wasn't good enough for me. She said my decision was totally unfair to everyone and I was selfish.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for taking my toaster and other kitchen appliances home without telling my roommates?,"I (M21) am temporarily moving back home during a school break, leaving behind three roommates in our college house. Before leaving, I packed up some of my appliances, including a toaster, air fryer, toaster oven, and kettle, to bring with me.

The day after I left, two of my roommates sent me angry messages questioning why I took all my appliances, specifically singling out the toaster. They argued that since I already brought home the toaster oven, bringing the toaster seemed unnecessary, especially since my family already has these appliances. My response was simple: they're mine.

What followed was a heated exchange, with accusations of selfishness and even a hurtful comment about me having ""only child syndrome"" because I allegedly don't know how to share. This struck a nerve, considering my sister's passing when I was younger, a topic they're aware is sensitive to me.

I suggested they could easily purchase a toaster, as they're inexpensive. However, they insisted it was about the principle of me taking something I wouldn't even use, despite having a toaster at home. While it's true I have access to these appliances at home, they're still my property. I don't believe they have the right to be upset when it's clearly mine.

So, am I the asshole for taking my appliances home, or are they overreacting?",AmItheAsshole
 For telling my wife to never volunteer me to help her family again,"My wife (38F) and I (39M) have been married for 8 years and have a 4-year-old son.  My wife's younger brother (Joe) and his GF are moving into an apartment together at the beginning of June.  But GF's lease is up at the end of April so she needed to move out of her place.  But Joe currently lives in a studio apartment so he doesn't have room for all her stuff.  So they were going to move all of GF's stuff into a storage unit for a month until they get their new place together.

A little over a month ago Joe had asked my wife if we would be able to help them move GF's stuff and she agreed.  My MIL was supposed to watch our son so we could both help, but she fell ill and had to cancel.  My wife suggested trying to get a babysitter for that day but I didn't want to spend hundreds on a babysitter to help someone move, that's dumb.  And bringing a 4-year-old with us would not be helpful to anyone.  

This turned into an argument between us because she said I should help them move while she watches our son since I'm stronger than she is and I know how to drive our truck with a trailer.  I told her that she should help them and have them rent a U-Haul for the day.  We ""compromised"" by telling Joe that I would help them but they need to get a U-Haul instead of using our truck and trailer. 

Then, the morning of the move (this past Saturday), my wife told me that a friend of hers got suite tickets through work to a hockey game for that day and invited them.  Yes, suite tickets to a playoff hockey game.  She said she would be bringing our son since her friend was bringing her kids too.  

Great, so not only do I get stuck helping someone move, but my wife and son get to go have an amazing experience together that I miss out on.  And yes, this was my son's first major sporting event and I was missing it.  

And wouldn't you know it, Joe never got a U-Haul.  And his GF wasn't even close to packed up and ready when I got there.  I spent 7-8 hours and multiple trips back and forth helping them move.  All the while my wife is sending pictures to our family group chat of how much fun they're having at the hockey game.  

When everyone was home that night, my wife was surprised that I wasn't in a good mood.  She said that I acted like I barely cared when our son was telling us about the hockey game and how much fun it was.  I asked her if she was seriously confused about why I was upset and she told me to tell her.  

So, I started railing off all the reasons I had to be pissed off.  She volunteered me to help, she got to spend the day doing something very special with our son that I missed out on, her brother and his GF were not prepared, and I had spent the entire day doing manual labor.  I ended my little rant by telling her that she is never going to volunteer me to help her family ever again.  

She told me I was overreacting and I can't hold it against her that her friend invited them to the game. She also said I'm not being fair by blaming her for Joe and his GF.  ",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to give my coworker my homemade biscuits (cookies)?,"I (F27) have been working at my  company for a few years and a couple of months ago ""Mia"" (F46) started working here. I do not like her, no particular reason, we just don't mesh well.

Anyway, I bring in baked goods every now and then just as a treat for everyone in the office. I like baking and they are always gone in a few days, I always get lots of compliments and thank you's from around the office. Last week I brought in ANZAC biscuits (cookies specifically for ANZAC day, a WWI memorial day for non aus/nz people) and when Mia had some, she asked if she could take some home for all her family.

If she had 1-3 kids then sure, but she has seven kids, her mother and husband at home and she was planning to take a biscuit each for all 10 of them.

I said no, that I brought them in for our team to share. She has been pretty nasty/rude since and my boyfriend said I was probably the AH and should've just let her take them. He even suggested I apologise to keep the peace.

I don't know. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my dad and stepmom's parents I don't call my stepmom my mom,"My mom died when I (17m) was 6. My dad married my stepmom Britt when I was 8. A few weeks before they got married my dad and stepmom sat me down and asked me if I would like to call Britt mom or if I would like to say bonus mom instead of stepmom. I told them I wanted to call her Britt and they said that was okay. I was asked about the bonus mom thing and I said I'd rather use stepmom. They told me I could change that at any time but they wanted to know which made me more comfortable. So Britt was always Britt and I use Britt and stepmom interchangeably when talking about her. To her face she's Britt. To friends I'll normally say Britt but other people, if they don't know who Britt is, I'll typically say ""my stepmom"" instead of just Britt. And for people who know but I'm not that close to it depends.

Britt and I get along great and I love her. I never saw her as my mom or considered her to be like my second mom though. She's a motherly figure for sure but she's not the only one and I'm not even closest to her out of those motherly figures. My dad and Britt always accepted that though. I know she'd love if I did call her mom or one day told someone she was my mom. But she has never pushed it.

Last Friday we were at Britt's parents house and my dad's side of the family was there too. This doesn't ever really happen. My dad was talking about me making it into the school newsletter and how proud he was. For some reason this started my grandparents and Britt's parents off on calling her ""my mom"". Britt and my dad said told them it was a shame my mom wasn't here to see it. This led to confused faces. I told my grandparents and Britt's parents that I don't call Britt my mom. My grandparents were like you don't call her mom but when talking about her and I said no, she's my stepmom. My mom died when I was 6 and she's the only person I call my mom. Britt's parents said we get along so well though and I was like yeah. They were like she's done so much good and been in my life for so long and I agreed with them. They mentioned she's the mother of my half siblings and I agreed there too. They asked what I say when I'm talking about them both and I said my dad and Britt or my dad and stepmom.

Britt tried to move the conversation along but things got weird because her and dad's parents were so weird about it. They tried to keep on that conversation but it got shut down. But since then both Britt's parents and my grandparents have told me they feel I'm wrong and that I was gleeful in refusing to acknowledge Britt's role in my life.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for reporting my vehicle as stolen?,"Fake Names Used - Me 21NB: Me - Sister 22F: Paige - Nephew 1M: Luke - Sisters BF 23M: Rory

Currently I live at home, renting a room from my mom.  Paige, Rory, and Luke all live here as well. I was recently able to buy my first car and I haven't been able to drive it yet, because I have a broken ankle. I'm the only one on the registration and I pay for everything.

Paige is really irresponsible with her belongings and has previously stolen from me, she also doesn't have her license yet. Rory has crashed both his mom's car and his car. So when I got my car I told them that nobody but me was driving it. They also both smoke and refuse to wait until we've parked to smoke. They'll start smoking while we're still going, even with Luke present. I don't smoke and don't want anyone to smoke in my vehicle.

They keep asking to borrow it and I've been telling them no each time, which leads to them asking mom and me getting yelled at to let them borrow it. I've been sticking to my guns and not letting them borrow it, despite getting punished for it. I've also been keeping the key on me so they can't take it.

Luke has been sick recently, he had his vaccines and is having a mild reaction. Paige called the doctor and everything was normal. She still wanted to take him to the emergency room. I was out of my room at the time and had the key in my purse, in my room. She decided to grab my key and just go, without even asking me.

I went to take the trash out later and noticed my car missing. I called her and my mom and told them they had 30 minutes to have my vehicle home or I was reporting it stolen, hospital is 15 min away so they would have had time to get it back. I guess they didn't believe me because they didn't show back up with my car. I called the police and my insurance, let them know it was stolen. I told the police what hospital they should be at, and the police showed up. Rory and Paige both got taken into police custody. Luke was picked up by his dad, whose in the middle of a bad divorce with Paige.

I was able to get my car back, thankfully with no new damage. They had definitely smoked in it though, so I had to deep clean it. I decided to drop the charges, no need to make the living situation even worse. However from my understanding the police might still decide to prosecute. I didn't mean to make their life bad, I just wanted my car back. CPS showed up at the house and now it's looking like Paige might lose Luke.

I've been really beating myself up over this. AITA or did I do the right thing?

  
EDIT: Luke's only reaction was a little bit of redness and soreness from the shot.",AmItheAsshole
 for getting a tattoo of my former roommate's cat,"I (F22) lived with my former best friend ""Jake"" (M22) and his GF ""Victoria"" (F24) for 2 years. I moved out because Victoria wanted their own space and convinced Jake to ask me to move out. They didn't want to look for a new place because of the rental market in our city. I refused to move out but told them that they were free to look for their own place. But then they basically began acting like terrible roommates (loud, not doing chores, being purposefully rude etc) until I caved. Obviously, this ended my friendship with both of them and I never planned to see them again.

Victoria had a cat, Oreo, that I got very close to. I didn't grow up with pets, so Oreo was the first pet I ever had a connection with. I would catsit for free when they were away, change her litter, clean her puke etc for free because I really loved the cat.

However, \~4 months before they asked me to move out, Victoria started getting weird abt Oreo. Suddenly I wasn't allowed to be alone in a room with Oreo with the door shut, wasn't allowed to feed her, brush her, post photos of her (on a private story), or even pet her in front of Victoria. 

Victoria's argument was that Oreo's her cat not mine (which was never disputed). Idk if it was a jealousy thing (I WFH and got to spend more time with Oreo, and Oreo often chose to sleep in my room, even if I removed her) but Victoria even threw away the toys I got for Oreo when I first moved in. Though of course I was still expected to clean up after Oreo. This is all to show bad blood, particularly around the cat.

The tattoo: I have a few, and I recently got one on my arm of Oreo laying on an oreo. To be completely honest, tattoos are not that ""thinky"" for me, and it's the sort of thing I get on a whim, but I really missed Oreo. I ran into Victoria and Jake recently completely by accident at the grocery, and while we initially just ignored each other, they recognized my tattoo as Oreo and scolded me + yelled a bit . They found me again on social media after and dmed me calling it disrespectful and asked me to remove it.

I may be TA because I 100% knew that if Victoria found out, she would be livid, but again, I honestly didn't plan on ever seeing either of them again. I might also be TA because part of me thought that with the amount of times I scooped Oreo's poop and cleaned her vomit off my sheets even after I stopped being allowed to brush her, I deserved to have a little homage to the first pet I was ever connected to. Though I realize now ppl might find it weird/assholey to get a tat of someone else's animal.

AITA for getting a tattoo of the cat?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying I will move in with my friend’s family if my dad moved his partner and her kids in?,"My dad has been with his partner for 4 years. She has two kids. She recently got into some issues and lost her house (not as a result of her own decisions, it was a legal issue when her ex husband died). My dad had previously promised he wouldn’t move in with her until I had finished school and left home, but because of this, they decided she should move in. 

I don’t want to live with her and her kids. I don’t like her, I don’t like how my dad acts around her, and her kids are extremely irritating. One of her kids has learning delays and really poor impulse control and boundaries. The other one is just melodramatic. 

I can’t go and live with my mother because she lives two hours away and I want to finish school at the place I’m in since I only have one more year. I was over at my friend’s house discussing this and his dad said I could live with them. I know he’s 100% serious because he’s been like a second dad to me my whole life (his ex is my mother’s best friend) and he never says things lightly. He said as long as I can get myself to school (my friend is homeschooled so we wouldn’t go together) I can live there if my parents agree. 

I said to my dad that if he goes ahead with moving his girlfriend in, I’m out. He was furious, but eventually said he will backtrack on the offer but this is effectively ruining his relationship. I said if he wants the relationship so badly then let me live with my friend. 

He’s now fighting with his girlfriend about it. All day she’s been calling him at ten minute intervals and there’s been all sorts of shouting. From what I’ve overheard she doesn’t have anywhere to go on short notice and may not be able to stay in the area. 

I feel like I offered the only compromise I really could that’s going to keep me sane but I feel kind of shit that I’m ruining things for my dad. He hasn’t been any type of way with me about it but I can see he’s extremely stressed. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not picking a new color for my house even though  my son finds the one we have embarrassing?,"I bought my house 15 years ago. It was a fixer upper and needed a lot of work. The only thing I kept the house is it’s painted bright pink. The guy I bought it from said it was his deceased father’s house. He had painted it this way to piss off his neighbors. I decided I liked the color and kept it the way it was. When I married my wife a year later, she agreed. We now have 3 kids: a 13 year old boy, a 10 year old girl and a 8 year old girl.

We are doing some minor renovations to the house and have decided to touch up the paint as it’s been awhile. My son asked that we paint it a “normal color” because it’s “embarrassing” to live in a pink house. We declined and said we like the color. Ultimately, it’s our house and we’ll be living in it longer than him. When we die, he’s free to paint it what he wants. 

My MIL feels we’re being unfair and that we should take into account how it’s embarrassing for a teen boy to live in a “Barbie house”. We asked my son if he’s being teased and he said no. But he hates it. Our daughters like it. 

Are we wrong for not painting the house a “normal” color?",AmItheAsshole
 for not allowing my in laws over after they ignored boundaries we set for our newborn?,My mother in law and father in law came to visit. We had already told everyone NO KISSING and hand her back if she gets very fussy. Very simple rules if you ask me. She then proceeded to kiss her head and both of them gave snarky comments when again told not to do so. I talked with my husband and we went back over our boundaries over the phone with them which his mom cried the entire call saying she didn’t recall doing so. BS playing the victim tears if you ask me but still we said that we have these boundaries in place and expect them to be followed. I still haven’t brought up another visit as I just want a break from them now. ,AmItheAsshole
"Update:  for refusing to pay for half of my ex-girlfriend’s flight that she can’t use because we broke up, and now possibly not even mine?","Hey, thanks to everyone who commented on my last post. I got so much more advice than I was expecting, and I appreciate it. A lot of you were saying the airline could do something. I told that to my ex, and she actually bought the tickets from a discount agency online and there was no refund possibility. If you’re curious, I can tell you how it all ended.  

I eventually told my ex that I was not going to pay her more than the $800 for my ticket under any circumstances, and she could take it or leave it and I’d just get my own ticket. She later asked if I’d be willing to let her use the AirBnb if she paid me the entire $1600, basically letting me out of the whole trip all together. To be honest, the Canary Islands were her idea in the first place. It’s not like it’s my #1 destination. I could take the money and go somewhere that I am more interested in. 

I asked my friend who was going to go with me if he’d be interested in something cheaper and closer. He hadn’t bought his plane ticket yet because he was waiting for me to sort everything out with my ex. 

We looked at options and decided to accept her offer and go to Belize. I had my ex agree in writing to pay for any fees or damages incurred at the AirBnb. I really don’t think there will be any. She’s not the type of person to damage a hotel room or something, but I just want to be sure. 

I got Venmoed the money by a male coworker of hers. They have been work friends for a while now, and I have met him a couple of times. I don’t know if this is like a couple’s thing or what. I don’t really think she cheated on me with him. I could see maybe her being interested in him possibly being a factor for our breakup. But I don’t even know if they are together or going as friends. 

At the end of the day, I don’t really care what she does. I got my money back, she gets her vacation. I’m guessing her coworker also bought his own plane ticket, so at the end of the day he’s the one eating the $800 loss. So he can have fun with that. My ex and I are technically “amicable” again, but I don’t really plan on talking to her again. Thanks again for the advice.",AmItheAsshole
 for airing the mother of my grandchildren's dirty laundry in public?,"My son, Tommy, died suddenly 6 years ago. He was recently divorced with two kids with his ex wife. The kids were 5 and 6 years old at the time of their dad's death. The kids and Tommy lived with us for a year at one point. Tommy's ex, Marla, was serving time after she stole from Tommy, from a friend of Tommy's and from my husband and myself. It delayed the divorce so they had been separated for more than two years and the separation started when Tommy learned Marla had cheated. We found out about the stealing after (and she stole from us after the separation). All in all Marla stole close to 35k between us all. Marla had recently been released and started back with 50/50 custody of the kids when Tommy died.

After Tommy died Marla attempted to cut our family out of the lives of my grandchildren. My husband and I went to court and were awarded very generous grandparents visitation under grandparents rights of our state. Marla was furious. She tried to appeal but it was rejected twice. The relationship between us was not civil. So we kept it simply and only communicated times for pick up, dates were already specified. 

Marla remarried and now has additional children. Marla has asked a few times for us to include her other children. We ignore the requests. She has yelled at us when we pick up our grandchildren and does not care if they hear. We stay silent generally. My husband and myself have no wish to be a part of her other children's lives or to play any sort of role in her and her current husband's life. We have a relationship with our grandkids. They're close to us as we are them and they never ask to include their half siblings. So we keep things as they are.

Last week my grandson had a school talent show that they wanted us to attend, so we did. Marla and her husband were there with their kids but we sat apart. When the kids finished and went back to their classrooms and as we were leaving, Marla approached and asked us to please think of her other kids and start acting like grandparents to them. We stayed civil and refused. Marla called us monsters. She said we were hideous monsters for turning our backs on her and her other kids just because she moved on after Tommy. She accused us of cruelty to children. She was very loud. I lost my temper and told her if she had wanted us in her life she wouldn't have cheated on our son and stolen from him, his friend and us and ended up going to prison. I told her we owed her nothing and we owed her children nothing and she needed to accept that our grandkids would always be our grandkids but she was no longer part of our family. Marla reacted to others hearing this and told me I had no right to air her dirty laundry publicly. That I should have kept that out of ""our mutual dispute"". 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for backing my son for an internship but refusing to dot the same for my daughter,"My son went into business and I passed on his resume for him to get an internship. He did extremely well and it was a good reference for him. I only did this because he was a good match for the company. Also all I did was pass on his resume and he did all the work with interviews and whatnot.  

My daughter is also in business, she asked me to pass on her resume for the company. I told her no for one main reason. She will not get passed the first interview process due to her tattoos. The company is very strict on tattoos and doesn’t hire people with in visible area. They work with many high end clients so the employee have a strict dress-code. Her tattoos are very visible and aggressive art. I know the moment she shows up she will be out of the running. I also don’t want to put my name in that whole situation.

I explained my reasoning and she is calling me a jerk for not supporting her. I told her she can apply online if she really wants but I am not throwing my name in especially since I know she will be turned away.


Edit

This was asked a few times, it’s also in comment 

She has neck and hand tattoos",AmItheAsshole
 for not want to pay back the money from child support? ,"I (22F) am the child of the child support. Most mother refused to drop the charges on my dad so he still has to pay. 
This past February, my mom received a $6k check from child support and told me (I was out the state at the time). When she shared the news, I was a bit skeptical to accept the check. Last time we received the check from CSS, my mom had to pay it back because it came from a joint account from my dad. She told this time it's from my dad's refunds and that it's safer. She put the money in my account (because she forced me to get a joint account with her) and told me to use it however I want since its mine. Then she goes back and say that what if the strings are attached to this one and end up owing again. 

She gave me mixed signals but eventually I did use it because I was actually 3 weeks away from moving and didn't know how I was going to go from Florida to Maryland with only  less than 1k when I still had to pay the prorated month.  That check made the moving process easy and I paid a big amount off my credit card with money left over. 
Now, without my consent, my mother has also been using my money. Before the check, I noticed that the checks I get from work are always lower than expected until I found she's been using my fundings for herself to buy food, Uber and so forth. She makes 3x the amount I make and has a car so I was confused. 

Fast forward to last night, and I wasn't surprised. Child support demanded the money to be returned as apparently my dad does not owe anymore. My mom berated me over the money without explaining anything saying how I ""wasted the money"" and ""it's my fault because I called CPS and I have to pay!"" No, I didn't call and when I did call about Child support, I am not a 3rd party on my OWN case, so I have no say. I told her I legally cannot do anything about it and to call to see what's up. She refused , claiming I was influenced and did this to myself. I told her if I pay, she too has to pay but she refused again because her defense is she sent me money in the past and for that, we're even. I told I won't pay because she swore up and down that it's not really MY MONEY, it's HER MONEY because my father had back loans to pay to HER not me. I used that and she said but I AM the one responsible to pay child support back. 

I said no and she threatened me with legal actions. I called her bluff and said sure. 
AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 excluding a kid,"So, for background, I have a neice and 2 nephews I watch 3 days a week. I also have two kids of my own. At first I supplied meals and snacks, my sister was to supply her sons diapering stuff. Fast forward I told her I couldn't supply her kids meals and snacks because they eat everything in a day. So this one particular day my kids and I are at her house and her kids got a snack but said my daughter couldn't have any. She's 2. She doesn't understand. So I asked my neice why and she said her mom said they aren't allowed to share with my daughter. I was really taken back so we left. I told my sister this was the icing on the cake and I wouldn't be providing care for her kids anymore.

Strike 1 was she wasn't paying me. $150USD a week. 
Strike 2 was not bringing diapers for her kid several times. 
Strike 3 was the snack deal.

Now, im not going to let any of them go without but point being I can't financially afford snacks for all these kids and all I asked for was her to supply her kids snacks. Most of the time they'd eat a few bite and not want the rest so it was wasted. 

AITA for cutting my losses?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my girlfriend that her weight gain is her fault ,"She and I are both college freshman. We started dating in September. So, they way things more or less worked out was, she and I would date night on Friday, but then she and her friends would go out Saturday and Sunday and I began noticing that just around her dorm room was all of these sweets and just general junk food.

I did not want that argument, I didn’t say anything, my thinking was that it could only end poorly.

She texted me on Monday and asked if we could meet somewhere quiet. Luckily there’s a park near campus so we met there.

She tells me she’s put on nearly 40 pounds, that she weighed herself and has shot up to 196lb( keep in mind she’s 5’7). She tells me all about how she’s been having to lie to her folks about spending money on books and other school stuff when in reality it’s going toward food and new, bigger clothes.

From there, it became a blame-fest. Blaming me for not saying something, blaming her friends for not saying something and for continuing to invite her out.

I told her she wasn’t making sense and asked her if she really would’ve listened had I or her friends told her she was putting on weight.

She just rolled her eyes and said she’s not 100% to blame. I told her that the reality is that it is her fault and told her that her options are to buckle down and lose 40 pounds or keep getting heavier.

She said I was an insensitive AH

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" for telling my mom if they move back to Greece, I won’t follow?","So for context me and my family have been living in America for 10 years (which in my mom’s words is longer than they expected to be here). For the past 4 months my mom has been telling me how “dad is tired and I don’t think he will last here for another summer”. 
Anytime I talk to her this has been the topic, “you know dad is tired and he would like to move back, I can see it in his eyes” were her exact words. And because I only have one year left of school she keeps telling me to find colleges in Greece because “we will be moving”.

 I tried to not give her an answer and just smile and leave anytime she says that. I thought about it and I don’t want to move, I don’t want to leave this place. She doesn’t understand why I don’t want to move because she sees Greece as her home (which I understand, she grew up there) but I lived here for 10 years and have no memories (or good memories) of Greece anyways.
Yesterday we had a “talk” about it. She brought it up as soon as I came from school. “You know I found a good college for you in Greece it’s very close to home…” and gave me directions of how to get there (like I knew the streets). I didn’t say anything and tried to eat my food. 

“You know dad is tired and I don’t think he can do this no longer” and continued “look we can stay until you finish school and then you can go to college in Greece.” And continued “you need to think reasonable, plus it’s going to be an American college you don’t even need to know Greek.” I got tired and finally told her “I don’t want to go back, I would like to stay here instead”

 She got angry and started screaming “you understand that dad can’t keep working like this he is getting tired” I told her okay and that I still want to stay here. She told me I can’t support myself because I don’t have a job and I told her I am going to get a job this summer. 

She paused for a moment and started telling me how it’s not like I’m going to lose anything I don’t even have friends and don’t go outside so why would I want to stay here. I screamed back at her and told her “I’m not telling you to stay here, I’m not yelling at dad for being tired, I just don’t want to move!”

 She didn’t stop but got angrier and told me “and where are you going to live? You know we will sell this house right? You know how hard it is to get an apartment? You don’t even know how to cook your own food!” So at that point i just went back to eating and stoped talking, she still went on about the college and I said to her (while laughing) after that whole hour “mom can I just get some silence you have been talking for an hour. Please I’m trying to eat.” Then finally she just went on talking about the show on the tv. 

Not gonna lie that conversation exhausted me so back I immediately fell asleep at like 5pm until it was morning. But moving back to that place is not an option, i don’t hate it but i don’t love it either. I just hope she stops talking about it. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to move in with my future in-laws?,"My boyfriend (M27) and I (F26) have been in a relationship for over 7 years now. I still live with my parents and he also lives with his whole family. Although there is a slight language barrier, his parents treat me very kindly and welcome me to their home all the time. 

My boyfriend and I have had conversations in the past about marriage and our future together. We'd always talk about it like it'd be just us two, very intimately - at least that was my impression. Recently, I brought up the idea of what kind of house we'd have when we get married. He said that I'd be moving in with the whole family so we'd all be living at their new house that they're planning on getting next year. He's mentioned getting this new house and splitting the mortgage with his parents a few times in the past.

I asked him how the family dynamic is going to work with us potentially being newly-weds and then already with his parents, and not to mention his grandfather and younger sister, all whom he currently lives with. I also expressed how it would be difficult for us to be intimate if his whole family is going to be there. I don't want to make his family uncomfortable and vice versa I wouldn't want to be uncomfortable in our own home. His family and I also have very different tastes in food so cooking meals would be another hurdle - I enjoy his parent's cooking but I don't think they enjoy mine... Overall, I am just worried that the family dynamic would be thrown off and lack of intimacy/quality time with my partner.

My boyfriend expressed how he's going to be paying mortgage on the new home so he wouldn't be able to afford getting another home for just us two. I told him that I'd also be working and paying towards a home for us but he said he still wants to live with his family and take care of his younger sister. I asked if I were to move in, how long until we would get a separate house for just us two and even starting our own family? My boyfriend couldn't give a definite answer and was unsure when. 

I love his family and am very grateful for them. I just don't know if I'm comfortable enough to fully live with them all together and worried about quality time with my partner if we were to get married. Am I placing a boundary or am I just being selfish for not wanting to live with his whole family?",AmItheAsshole
 for agreeing to give a girl a ride and then refusing once she mentioned her dog?,"**Throwaway**

I (M18) had a decent relationship with this girl, Zoey (F18), who lives next door to me at my residence. She's next door to my roommate and we have a few classes together. While we get along most of the time, I’ll admit, that Zoey can at times be a bit annoying and many people have recognized that she especially does this with me lol.

After winter break, Zoey came back to school with this ugly little puppy named Chewy, which she claimed as her new “emotional support dog”. Zoey takes Chewy everywhere with her including classes and sometimes even dining area of our residence. This last part is pretty gross, but Zoey always insists that Chewy isn’t bothering anyone.

Ngl, Chewy is pretty annoying. For example, the second week he was here, he ran in front of my dorm room and took a shit. Another time, Zoey let Chewy shake himself all over me and another person in the elevator after He had come inside from playing in the rain. He also stole my roommate’s shoes several times. Not only that, Chewy always makes weird noises in the dead of night. Whenever my roommate or I mention it to Zoey, she repeats “But he’s a baby”. Pretty sure he hates me because he growls a lot around me and looks at me with suspicion from the moment he was here.

The worst thing about Chewy is that he loves to shit. I’m not joking when I say he literally poops at least 6 times every day. People often mention this to Zoey and she was concerned but apparently her vet says it’s normal so whatever.

On Friday, Zoey asked me if I could drop her off on my way home on Monday. I’d be done with my exams in the morning and she’d be done in the afternoon. She offered to split gas with me, so I agreed. I did so because earlier that week Zoey’s parents stopped by and took Chewy home with them so that Zoey could focus on her exams.

So imagine my shock on Sunday night when I see Zoey walking with Chewy. I honestly was so surprised to see him, I couldn’t even say anything. Zoey walked over to me and thanked me offering her a ride. She then looks at Chewy and goes “Say thank you, Chewy Uncle OP is giving us a ride”. I asked her how Chewy was here and she said that her parents brought him back on Saturday because she missed him.

At this stage, I point blankly told her that I couldn’t be giving her a ride because I didn’t want Chewy pooping in my car. Of course, Zoey wasn’t happy about that. She kept on saying things like how I promised and I wasn’t being fair to Chewy, etc. When I repeated that I couldn’t take the risk she said that I was being unbelievable and childish.

I ended up leaving on my own after my exam on yesterday and now a few people have been texting me saying I’m an asshole for abandoning Zoey on campus and that I should apologize.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my girlfriend’s kpop obsession unhealthy?,"This is so stupid and I honestly don’t think I’m in the wrong but my girlfriend is upset at me and it makes me feel like second guessing. 

My (M24) girlfriend (F24) is incredible. She’s insanely hot and probably the nicest person I know. We’ve been going out for just around a year and a half and get along great. 
My one gripe is that she is obsessed with K-Pop. Don’t get me wrong, I’m not shitting on it, I respect her music taste. I even let her drag me to a concert a while back. It’s definitely not my thing, but it makes her happy so I don’t really care. 

Recently though, she seems to have gotten way more obsessed with this group, particularly one guy called Bang Chan. I’m not an insecure man by any means but she has been taking it too far. She changed her lockscreen to a him, and she carries a picture of him around everywhere. She has like 10 of them and matches them to her outfits. She watches every live stream or video that has him in it too.It’s odd but mostly harmless so I haven’t said anything about it. 


I mean I’ve had celebrity crushes before like Sydney Sweeney so I know it’s normal to an extent but my girlfriend takes it too far. Recently she spent hundreds on several copies of the same album because apparently it enters you into a prize draw to video call the group? I’m not really sure how it works but she obviously didn’t win and was inconsolable. Not even about her reckless spending but because she cant talk to Bang Chan. She managed to resell them so that wasn’t a problem but I think her obsession with him is a little concerning. 


Just today, a picture of him she ordered arrived in the mail and she started cooing over how cute he looked. At this point I’d had enough and told her that her obsession was getting unhealthy and she needed to realise he doesn’t actually give a shit about her and that she’s falling for marketing. 

She got really huffy and said she knew that she was just having fun and I was being a dick for making fun of her interests. I honestly think I’ve been really patient with her and haven’t said anything out of line, so am I the asshole here?
",AmItheAsshole
 for shutting my ILs down when they brought up issues with photos of my children's mom in our home?,"I (46m) have two children; Fia (13f) and Cael (10m). Their mom died five years ago in a car crash. We had been married at the time but only legally. For the last three years of her life we were pretending to still be together and we stayed married, but it was all pretending for the kids. We did not want to divorce for our kids' sake. Both of us came from divorced families and what I consider broken homes because of how badly our parents handled the divorces. We didn't want that for the kids.  We feared we couldn't do better. The end result was us hating each other. It ran deep too. I regret that now. The last words we exchanged were not kind. Our kids deserved better than that. Better than having parents who hated each other because we were so afraid to divorce.

So after she died I was determined to let go of all that hate and I was determined to make sure the kids knew they were loved by both parents and were not burdened by the issues we'd had. Their mom and dad both love them. I truly believe their mom's love still exists for them in them. And they deserve to know that love. That was what I focused on. So I saved everything of hers for them. It's all stored safely for them one day. And a couple of years after she died, I did remove most of the photos of our married life. But I let the kids keep two photos of their choice out in the open in common areas of the house. The rest are either in their room or stored for them with the rest of her stuff. My kids love and miss their mom so much and it brings them comfort to have her photos out. I make sure they can always talk about her or ask questions. They also have a very close relationship with the three siblings she spoke to. This is my children's home above all and I make sure it always feels that way.

When I met my wife (I remarried last year) I told her about the photos and said a partner of mine needed to accept this. She did. We got married. Nobody has taken the photos of my kids and their mom down. But my ILs do have a problem (and maybe they're speaking on behalf of my wife and she's not open I'm still figuring that out). They were staying with us at the weekend and during a dinner they questioned my kids about keeping the photos out when my wife now lives with us. My kids said they like having photos of their mom they can see in the house. My ILs began to say that it was inconsiderate of my wife and they should not be in common areas when I stepped in and shut them down and I told them that this is still my children's home too and part of that is displaying photos of their mom in their home where they can be seen. I told them it did not need to be discussed more.

The following day my ILs said I had no reason to be so rude and I had an unhealthy attachment to keeping their mom present in their lives when she's dead. They told me they should be allowed to question things about their daughter's home and I overreacted.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 because I asked my parents for a lock because they assumed I was gay? ,"Almost two weeks ago my friend (16M) was over and we somehow ended up falling asleep. I (15M) don't even remember falling asleep but I do remember my brother (18M) waking us up and after my friend left he confronted me because he saw us in a weird position and assumed I was gay. This caught me off guard and it made me uncomfortable because he asked me in front of our entire family. Then my parents backed him up and told me that they ""caught us"" a couple of times as well and assumed we were dating. They caught us SLEEPING. 

I felt as if they shouldn't have even came in my room the first place. I told them that and let them know that I was  straight and to leave me alone. They told me that my brother just wanted to ask because they weren't sure. I didn't see how it was any of their business but okay. I told my parents that I'm not comfortable with them going in and out of my room when I'm sleeping anymore and I'd like if I could get a lock or just something that would prevent them from coming in unannounced. 

They got mad at me for saying that I wanted a lock on my door because they took that as me saying I don't trust them? They told me that I was over reacting and that my brother didn't mean any harm by it. But he has a lock on his door tho. They told me that I never seemed to care about my door not having a lock before and they weren't gonna waste money on getting me one
now. 

My dad told me that if I was truly straight I wouldn't need a lock? MY BROTHER HAS A LOCK. It's just that I don't like how they started coming in my room with out permission and making assumptions about me. I think me having a lock would fix that? And I do not like how my parents were having discussions about me behind my back. I told them that I could use my own money if it would be a problem but they still said no. My aunts husband been said that he would install it for me so I don't know why they are acting like it's wrong for me to want one.",AmItheAsshole
 For having my own secret honey stash?,"Me 31 (M) and my partner 29 (F) have been living together for two years now. I like honey in my oatmeal. More specifically raw honey. Something about the flavor I just adore. So I always bought it even if it cost a bit more than regular.

But it just so happens apparently she decided this is ""our"" honey at one point last year. The little jar that used to last me two months went out in two weeks of her waffles. I wouldn't mind if we bought it together but I have to order it on amazon because no stores nearby sell the stuff.

I didn't want to seem like a cheapskate telling her to pay me for it so in february the next bottle I got I hid it in my desk where I usually take my breakfast. Yesterday she happen to caught me pouring it into the oatmeal.

She got upset saying it was childish not to share it at that we are adults.

But is not sharing if she is taking 80% of it and paying nothing for it.

Today she came demanding honey for her waffles and I told her ""It is my honey"" and like out of the bloody meme she went ""OUR honey"".

That started the discussion again.

  
EDIT:

Behold! The honey!

[https://www.amazon.com/Really-Raw-Honey-16-oz/dp/B004P0IOOK](https://www.amazon.com/Really-Raw-Honey-16-oz/dp/B004P0IOOK)",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my money back instead of a present?,"I have been friends with this girl - let’s call her nicki for about 4 years and i would consider her as one of my best friends. I wholeheartedly trust her so this incident has left me quite upset. 
there is an event happening soon and nicki was in charge of buying all the tickets for our friends and we obviously all paid her prior to her buying the tickets. nicki was holding onto my ticket for me since i will be going with her anyways. unfortunately, something popped up so i will not be able to attend this event anymore and decided to sell my ticket. 

i found a buyer and he was going to pick my ticket up from nicki but he was paying in cash so i asked nicki to just transfer me the money after she receives the cash from the buyer. a couple days go by and nicki still hasn’t transferred me the money so i asked her about it only to be told that she has something else for me instead. I met up with her and she said she used the cash to buy me a birthday present because it was my birthday a couple weeks ago. 

i didn’t really know how to react because im grateful she got me a gift but at the same time that’s my money?? im genuinely so confused right now because she essentially made me use my own money to buy myself a present that i didn’t even ask for. the ticket was also a couple hundred dollars so i was planning to use the money to pay for my bills but now im just stuck with a random birthday present that i basically bought myself. 

i told a couple people about this and they all said i was being dramatic and ungrateful because nicki was just being nice. am i really the asshole here???

edit: i appreciate all of your responses and after reading them i’ve decided to send her a lengthy message. to sum it up i asked her to return my money or else i will consider taking further actions. 

i just wanted to clarify a few things too. i told her i wanted to return the gift and needed the receipt but when i asked her for it she said she lost it because she didn’t think i would need it. the gift she got me was also less than half of what the ticket is worth so i have no idea where the rest of my money went. she’s also always the “sweet” and “nice” friend of the group so the people i spoke to about this believe she had no ill intentions and that she would never try to purposefully take my money. we are also in our 20’s in case anyone is wondering so no she is not a child.",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving my job when my family needed money?,"Am I the asshole for quitting my job when my family needed the money? I (18F) have had two jobs for 3 years. My family has never been in the best financial situation but I have always supported my mum (50F) and sister (18F) as much as I could. As soon as I could, I started working, and then got a second job a year later. The second job was in a retail store and I didn't particularly enjoy it. Every morning I would walk in and my heart would pound and I would get incredibly anxious. I put up with it for 3 years, including through all my schooling and final exams. After I graduated I decided to quit that job, as it had caused me great stress and impacted my social life. I am still working 4 days a week at my other job, but was I wrong to quit?

My mum is a single woman with two kids the same age (we are twins) and she has never had a high salary. I have been contributing to the household since 16 and paid for all of my own belongings and food. I told her I quit my job this morning after breakfast and she went nuts. She started telling me I was irresponsible and stupid, disappointing our whole family. I don't believe I was in the wrong as that job had affected me heavily, but I need more opinions

EDIT: My sister works at the same place as me, but rarely gets work and passes every opportunity given to her to work more",AmItheAsshole
 for not sticking up for my wife to my mother?,"My (32M) mother lives out of state and comes twice a year to visit my wife (31F) and I, as well as my sister who lives nearby too. She usually spends like 4-5 nights here. While she’s here, she tends to make some off the cuff judgmental comments. My mom has always been a little nit-picky about things and I’ve handled it by ignoring her - it’s a few comments per trip and otherwise she’s ok and helpful to us. For example, I picked her up at the train station and she immediately said “oops, looks like someone needs a car wash.”

My wife feels that more comments are directed at her because she is the woman, especially about home decor and cleaning, despite my wife also working full time. For example, we have a junk drawer that has admittedly got overfull lately. My mom said “it’s too bad I’m not here longer, I would help you organize that. I noticed it hasn’t been done.” Or she will come in our house and immediately start cleaning something and say she saw it was horribly dirty. Or last visit, my wife’s suitcase was still out from a trip the month before, and she said “hm I see someone doesn’t like to unpack right away.”

My wife takes these things really personally and is hurt. I usually try to support her behind the scenes, tell her my mother is kind of an old crone (true) and that we all just ignore her and she should too, but she recently got upset with me for not saying anything back in the moment. I do want to stick up for her but my mind is kind of slow and my mother always slips these comments in when I’m not paying attention. I can’t respond well within a few seconds when I was expecting it. My wife is upset with me and says my mother can’t come anymore unless I’m planning to stick up for her. AITA for not saying something to my mother?

Edited to add: my wife has asked me not to confront my mother outside of these comments as she feels she’ll receive blowback for it, and it’ll look like it came from her. She wants me to respond when my mother says something in the moment. I guess I am slow because I have trouble doing that. Also, my family is very passive aggressive and we almost never confront things head on - I’ve tried to change that and it ends with them just refusing to speak to me for a few months. ",AmItheAsshole
 for laughing at my sister for losing a debate and saying she needed to be humbled?,"Have made this as a throwaway account because some of my family follows my Reddit.

My (F18) younger sister, Maddie (16), is both incredibly smart and incredibly confident. I do well at school myself, but Maddie has always excelled, and I'm admittedly a little envious of her ability at school. My parents praise her constantly, and I think it's given her the idea that she really is perfect. For example, whenever she gets 100% or close to it in a test, she comes home and says things like ""look who smashed it again, me"", ""it's just too easy for some"", ""I feel bad for anyone who isn't naturally gifted"". It's pretty corny and I roll my eyes over it, but my parents join in and agree with her, so I've learned to just ignore it.

Maddie has always been involved in debating at school, and she usually does very well. Again, I'd say there's an air of arrogance there, and when another student lost one time, I saw her give them a sarcastic little wave. No one else seems to pick up on it, and I feel there's a ""butter wouldn't melt in her mouth"" element to it. She's confident and does well, so I guess everyone overlooks her sort of negatives to her character.

Well, yesterday, Maddie had a debate. She'd prepared for it and in the morning over breakfast, she was doing her usual spiel about how she was going to ""crush it"", she ""wished they would give her someone good to debate against"" and all the rest. However, a new student ended up entering, and they beat Maddie. They were very impressive, and I could tell my parents and teachers were surprised.

When Maddie was in the car on the way home, she was upset and saying how ""unfair"" it was and how hard she worked. My parents were supporting her, saying she'd win next time and all the rest. I laughed, and she asked what she was so funny. I just replied that perhaps she was overconfident and it was good she lost because she needed humbling. Maddie and my parents both started shouting at me after this, telling me how unhelpful and unsupportive I was being.

When we got home, I thought that was that, but my parents told me to keep my opinions to myself and that was of no benefit to anyone. I told them that she wouldn't always win in life and learning to be gracious in defeat is a positive quality. Maddie overheard this and called me jealous, and I just exited the conversation.

AITA or am I right here? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my dying father I will not be cleaning up his mess? ,"On a throwaway because not a lot of people know about this ugly story. 

My dad had affairs, but one of the women got pregnant. He managed to keep this a secret for a couple of years but the AP told my mom and all hell broke loose. Parents split up, my dad was excommunicated from his own family. His life went to complete shit because as you can imagine he’s not the most emotionally stable individual. 

He tried to keep a relationship with me (I was 10 by the time my parents split and he moved in with AP) but I wasn’t stupid so I figured out what kind of person he was and wanted nothing to do with that whole household. He fought for joint custody and tried therapy for him and me, until I was 13 and I ran away from home to avoid going to his house on the weekend (made it to another country actually lol). That was when he gave up making me visit. 

We were extremely LC until about a year ago, when I found out via one of my aunts that he’s dying (liver disease). I got back in contact to have some closure. It’s been 4 months, and I honestly feel like a weight has been lifted. I’ve made my peace with everything as far as I’m concerned. I’ve been helping out with a lot of medical costs to keep him as comfortable as possible. I’ve never had any contact with AP or their kids (I’ve bumped into her once at the hospital and flat out ignored her). 

A few days ago I was visiting my dad at his palliative care facility and he brought up that he would like me to talk to the extended family about letting AP and the kids have contact. He said they would listen if it came from me because I was the one was affected by his poor choices and he just wanted the kids to have family (AP doesn’t have any). I said absolutely not, I will not clean up his mess for him, that just because I’ve accepted his mistakes that doesn’t mean I want to see them every year at Christmas, if the rest of the family want to reach out that’s up to them but I won’t pretend it’s what I want. He seemed hurt but hasn’t brought it up again. 

I know the kids will be left with nothing when he goes. His medical insurance is from his job but I’m covering a lot of the shortfall, and I’ve been handling a lot of his paperwork, I know he’s broke. They will lose their house when he goes. A family connection would help. But then again, I don’t think I owe it to him to lie to everyone and say I’m fine with them being part of things when I’m not. If they started going to events I’d stop. I want nothing to do with these people. 

I’m mulling it over while dissociating from the fact that I’m losing a dad I never really had in the first place so thought I’d get some outside opinions. Again, not too many I can talk to about this because generally I don’t tell people about the circumstances. ",AmItheAsshole
 for hiding food from my brothers?,"I (18F) have been hiding food in my closet from the household pantry for a little over 2 years now because of my ravenous teenage brothers (14 &amp; 16M). Every month when the groceries come in they go through a month of snacks and drinks in a week. My mom argues that since they're going through puberty, they're going to eat a lot more. But the amount of food they eat is atrocious. For example I've seen the youngest eat TWO frozen Digorno's pizzas, as if they were tacos, in one sitting.

It eventually came to the point where they leave a very small portion of food, if any, left for me when me or my mom cooks a meal and leaving empty containers and boxes in the pantry. Keep in mind my mom usually buys things in bulk to last us for the month.

Because of this I've started hiding packaged foods like ramen, water bottles, and chips for times when I don't get enough to eat or when the quick prep foods run out early. Sometimes if I have the money I'll by myself a treat or two. My mom eventually caught on that I was hiding food and reprimanded me for being selfish. She says that the food she buys isn't mine to take or hide, and if I buy food for myself I have to get the boys something too. Which I don't really understand since they can't seem to ever be considerate when *I'm* hungry. *I'm* always the one that has to make a sacrifice and make my portions smaller. I can understand taking food from the family pantry, but what's so selfish about buying my own food with my own money? AITA here?",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving without a word to my roommate after dealing with her for months?,"I (20F)  had concerns about my side of the room in our new dorms, so I planned my trip to the hostel early. Sarah(19F), my new roommate, wanted the left side, and I agreed, intending to switch later. I told her I'd rearrange my side to avoid the washroom smell.  

When she showed up two days later, she complained about the arrangement calling it 'unacceptable', but we managed to hash out a new room arrangement after some back and forth (although she wouldn't let me speak). She kept saying how anxious she felt about speaking up, and how she was a people-pleaser. 
 
For the next 10 days, she left her bags unpacked, blocking my cupboards, claiming she'd sort it soon while talking about changing rooms, leaving me unable to access my stuff, yet insisting we'd ""figure it out"", despite having space under her desk.  

After she asked to host a dance party shortly after we met, I expressed discomfort with strangers in our room; later, she unpacked and takes up most of the space so I asked for adjustments she got angry and stormed out after flinging her laundry bag in frustration, yelling “ this is wanted right? U didn’t like the laundry bag?” She finally listens after I tell her it's my room too.  

I adjusted my study habits when she asked, but when I asked for the same, she just got mad about it. I avoided the bathroom due to her lack of hygiene to prevent conflict.  
When I got back from being sick for three weeks, I let my roommate borrow my fairy lights, but when I mentioned her using my stuff too much, especially my extension cord, she took it as mean and hurtful, even though she has her own things.  

She calls me inconsiderate but then claims her own actions as consideration, despite my efforts to accommodate her.  

Next few days she passive-aggressively does things to piss me off, despite it inconveniencing her too.  

She tells me to silence my phone notifications because they annoy her, but she continues to talk loudly on calls till 3 am, won't let me open the blinds cuz the light hurts her, yet ironically stays up late on call and keeps her lights on.  

Fed up with her, I tried to switch rooms, but struggled to find someone willing to swap because of her reputation; when I learned she was going on a trip, I pushed harder and managed to move out the day after she left. Once she left, I moved out, turned in my keys, and never looked back; I still feel conflicted, I'm relieved to be out of that mess, wondering if I handled things wrong and was rude for leaving without a word.  
",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my boyfriend to drink with his friends in the apartment we share?,"My boyfriend (36M) and I (34F) have been living together for over 3 years in my apartment (I own it). He is a kind and considerate person and it’s been really easy. Except he is a binge drinker and so is his entire group of friends, so every three months or so he goes out and gets completely fucked up. I’m over that stage of my life but I am also a really independent person who needs a lot of me time so I don’t really care. 

But recently he came back from one of these binging episodes at 5 am and brought a friend with him, woke me up and meant to continue drinking with this guy at my place. I told them to get the fuck out, I don’t trust them to not trash my house because they were completely wasted. Also I just really don’t want that happening at my place, ever. I work and study full time and I have no time or will to be anyone’s maid.

He is extremely angry and claims that he would never do the same to me, and that they were doing nothing wrong. He even said he was considering breaking up with me. I’m honestly starting to wonder if I am being unreasonable, but I just don’t have it in me to be open minded about this situation. If they want to continue drinking, fine, but it has to be elsewhere and they don’t get to wake me up. AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 for quitting my dad’s company,"(Super long post)
I (M26) left my dad’s company.

Three years after high school, my dad hired me into his company due to needing to replace the last guy that left. He didn’t want to hire me, but he was desperate to have someone pick up the slack. I quit my job at the packaging plant and did my work well enough that he kept me on. HR offered me a full time position with the added caveat that I had to also continue to be enrolled in college (dad’s idea). Took the deal because the salary was just good enough to pay for my classes and rent.

It was weird working with my dad. It was fun at times and we got closer, but also more distant. It didn’t matter if it was during or after work hours, I was always his employee. If I ever got in any argument or disagreement with him, no matter how small, he’d threaten to fire me.

Taking vacations and sick days was next to impossible. If I ever called in sick or used a vacation, he would send my mother over to my house to check on me. I had to take my key back from her because she would like to walk in and check if I was really sick. Or she’d call and “warn” me that my dad was upset I took a vacation and my job wasn’t secure anymore.

My job revolved around providing overwatch to assignments in progress regardless of work hours and time zones. So if I got off at 7pm, and one of my assignments is kicking off at 11pm, I would have to stay up to provide instructions/answers/overwatch until the job is complete. There are quite literally only four employees (including myself) to handle these jobs.

Being in college was no excuse. If I had an exam or test after work hours, my dad would threaten to use my vacation time. Work assignments started affecting my sleep, forcing me to go multiple days in a row with only 2 hours under my belt and still expected to come into the office. I couldn’t pass my work to my coworkers because they had the same issues as me. When the company got popular, more work added on. It was a nightmare because they refused to hire more employees.

When time came to sign up for classes again, I simply didn’t. It was impossible for me to do this and school. Before I can talk to my dad about my decision, my brother (who my dad sent to my college) informed him that I haven’t signed up for classes. Got a very angry text that I have three weeks to leave, so I gave my two-weeks to my truly amazing manager and left.

Fiancé has been covering my side of the bills and she’s informed me that she got a pretty big raise to do so comfortably. As soon as we’re officially married, we’re going to try for kids and I’m going to be the stay at home dad.

Parents are disappointed in me. I’m told constantly that I could have had everything and that I’m giving my fiancé too much power. Mom tells me he’s hurt I went behind his back and left the company. Said I should have talked to him before making the decision to drop out.",AmItheAsshole
 for stranding a former friend at a restaurant?,"A few days ago, my (now former) friend Katie (22F), my girlfriend Asia (21F), and I (22M) were at a restaurant. (A few other friends were too, but they aren't important to the story). Asia is African-American and I'm white and we started dating a month ago but have been friends for over a year. Because it's important to the story, Katie is also white.

  
Anyway, we gave Katie a ride and while we were eating, the topic came up that Asia and I were dating. Katie gives us a weird look and said oh, she didn't expect that.

  
A bit puzzled, I said I told you I was dating Asia. To which she said she assumed I was dating a white girl named Asia.

  
This immediately pissed me off. Asia asked why she assumed that, which is when Katie dropped this, ""Well, because you're black.""

  
We were both confused because we didn't think she had a problem with interracial dating. Honestly, we probably should have left then. I commented that she's dating an Indian man, to which she said yes, but he has darker skin than her, so it's okay. She went on to explain how it's okay and socially acceptable for women to date men with darker skin but not okay for men to date women with darker skin.

  
Asia and I both said that was racist and colorist. Katie further put her foot down on the point and said she didn't mind we were dating, but it was just odd. She kept reiterating that she wasn't racist because her boyfriend was from India and had darker skin than her.

  
Asia and I left, but not before I told Katie that I feel sorry for her boyfriend.

  
Anyway, later that night Katie texted Asia saying we were cruel for what we said and for abandoning her at the restaurant, and she felt uncomfortable riding getting an Uber and riding with a stranger. (We both paid for our meals and left. She kept saying she wasn't done, but we didn't care). 

  
I received a similar text. I asked her to apologize which she refused to do and reiterated that she didn't nothing wrong and it should be me and Asia who apologized. I just laughed at her and blocked her. 

  
Though I feel bad for abandoning her at the restaurant, especially since I do know that she gets anxious and even had a panic attack when in a car with someone she doesn't know or doesn't know well. (As for why she didn't get a ride from others we knew there, I don't know).

&amp;#x200B;

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 For wanting to Kick My Wife’s Friend Out For Her Veiws,"My wife reconnected with a friend from high school last year. A week ago she asked if we can help Jane because she’s splitting up with her husband and is going to be homeless. I said yes.

So we made a plan Jane would move into a old trailer i own we had been useing for storage and she would stay with us while she finds a job in the area of the trailer and gets the lights and water turned on. The trailer is in a park where i pay rent on the lot each month. We told Jane we would pay for it this month and starting in June she would be responsible for the Lot Rent and keeping the yard kept up but we wouldn’t charge her any rent for the trailer itself. This trailer had been just getting used as storage and I have an older VW bug in the driveway that needs some repairs. I thought about it and decided i was never really going to have time to do it and so I told Jane if she wanted to get that car fixed up she could have it too. 

So Far:

Jane brought a guy into our house we didn’t know and F*cked him so loudly that the neighbors complained(The wife did  aperently tell her she could have a friend over) 

Jane came over with $100 to her name and spent it on non-essentials 

Jane boks are doing any housework ussaly saying she doesn’t know how to

She doesn’t want to fill out job applications and when she does she does it half drunk

There have been other things she’s done I can get into in the comments if people need.

At this point I was getting annoyed with Jane and told my wife I don’t know if this is going to work long term but then today the following happened that made me want to kick her out. But then today I took Jane to see that trailer. Once we were there she acted very grateful and started talking about how she was going to fix it up but then she springs on us that her 1st ex husband was going to move in with her. This weirded me out because she didn’t talk to us about anyone else living there but i figured it’s not my place to say who she can live with. Then she starts talking about selling the furniture in the trailer I didn’t like this and reminded her that its still my trailer were just let her use it she said ok. But then she started talking about selling the VW bug. (I may be the asshole for not likening that because I did say she can have it if she wants but IDK I don’t like the ideal of giving it to her just to sell) On they way back to the apartment she starts talking about the issue with black people and the gays. Me and my wife are very liberal and i did not like this at all. I told her keep talking like that and I’m pulling the car over and dropping you off. This was the straw that made me really want to kick her out. My wife reminded me that the trailer is a bigger head ache for us empty because we have to deal with the lawn and lot rent  and so even though I don’t like Jane its better to have her in there because it means more time and money for us. So let me have it Reddit i kept hitting the character limit so I’ll answer any follow up or context questions as i see them.
",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to go on a diet?,"I (15F) have a twin sister (also 15F, let's call her Annie) who is what one might refer to as overweight. Our parents have been very concerned about her weight and have decided to put BOTH of us on a diet. The problem is, it's just the two of us, neither my parents nor my younger siblings are participating. Our parents idea of a diet is no breakfast, a salad for lunch, and then a healthy smaller end of normal sized dinner (think a bit of grilled chicken with a small side salad). 

I try to be active and go on walks and I have plans to join color guard, which leads to me practicing almost an hour everyday. Annie, on the other hand, prefers to stay inside and draw (she's a talented artist). I tried this diet for about a week, but it's just not enough food for me considering my level of activity. In addition, I get migraines when I don't eat enough or when my blood sugar is low, and this new diet has been giving me massive migraines every day. Last night, I refused to eat what my sister was having and I ended up eating some leftover chicken Alfredo in secret. However, my parents caught me and became infuriated. They said that I needed to set a good example for Annie, because losing weight will be a hard journey for her, and that I needed to not be so selfish and that ""it wasn't like they were starving me"" and that ""I could stand to lose a few pounds too."" This argument went on for awhile longer, until I eventually had enough and said that ""just because Annie need to lose weight doesnt mean I have to go on a diet too""

Unfortunately, Annie was in the next room and overheard. She started crying and calling me an ""apathetic bitch"" and saying that I should know how hard it is for her and that we look exactly the same anyways (she's in denial about her weight). I sympathize with her and I really do want to help her in her weight loss journey, but the diet she is being put on by my parents just isn't healthy for me. Anyways am I the asshole for refusing to go on a diet?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying that my sister's boyfriend is a bum and either he goes or I go?,"Hi. So I (F22) have always had a rocky relationship with my sister ""Alex"" (F34) for multiple reasons. As you can see, we have a fairly large age gap so we haven't been very close growing up.

I live with our parents. I work full-time, contribute towards electric and water and I pay the internet bill. My parents are both immigrants and come from a culture where your kids don't move out until they are married.

Around 3 months ago, Alex moved back into our parents' home with her boyfriend ""Tom"" (M32) and she announced that she was pregnant. They've been together for just under a year. Previously they were staying with Tom's parents but chose to move out as they are having marriage problems and will likely get divorced. 

I (and my parents were too) was under the impression this would be a very temporary thing but they are still here.

Alex was working part-time and had a pretty active social life so she was most often out of the house, although last month has been prescribed bedrest by her doctor.

Tom on the other hand, is unemployed and has been since Christmas. He does the occasional odd job that's cash-based but spends most of his day loudly playing video games or scrolling on his phone. He insists that he is applying for lots of jobs but never hears anything back.

Tom is really bothering me for many reasons but I'll only list the main ones. He never cleans up his own messes or helps out with the housework, in fact I've been doing a lot of his laundry just so it will stop stinking up the house. He's always up late and sometimes wakes the whole house up by screaming at his video games. He has bad personal hygiene, he rarely showers and he stinks. I can never use the living room or fully relax because he's always occupying it to play video games.

I had a serious conversation with my parents and said that I cannot stand living with Tom and I think he's a bum. They told me that although he can be annoying I should be trying to get along with him and he is our family now. The conversation derailed and I basically said either Tom changes his behaviour or goes, or I go.

My mom told Alex and Tom what I said and now they are both furious and this situation is a huge mess. They are both insisting that Tom's behavior is not that bad and I am overreacting, since it's not like he has been mean to me. Alex said she was horrified I'd give our parents an ultimatum about this and said that I am being childish. She said that if I'm going to move out just because of Tom then she doesn't want me in her child's life. Am I really being the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
: Anonymous passive aggressive letter from neighbor,"So I am a brand new homeowner, and have been in my house in a new construction single family subdivision for approximately 2 months. All of our driveways have a pretty aggressive 2 inch lip on them because they plan to repave the roads once all the construction is done and the neighborhood is complete. My boyfriend has a low to the ground car and we haven't trusted that his car had the clearance to get on my driveway without scraping so he has been parking on the curb right in front of my house. The other day, I received an anonymous letter from neighbors who did not leave a return address or names and actually mailed the letter in the mail. The letter said ""will you please park your car in your driveway, we did not spend this kind of money to drive around your car, the next letter will be to the builder's office."" 

&amp;#x200B;

For context, my boyfriend is parked at my house most of the day on Sundays and at most 1-2 weeknights for approximately 4-5 hours in the evening... so less than 50% of the time. I also confirmed with the builders and the HOA that street parking is NOT a violation of any HOA restrictions and is perfectly permitted as long as you are not restricting traffic or blocking a driveway. My boyfriend was able to get his car on my driveway very carefully the other day, barely avoiding scraping so we discovered that it is possible, but part of me really wants to keep having him park on the street just to be petty considering the way the letter was written. I considered posting a picture of the letter with a mature response on my neighborhood facebook page, but not sure that wouldn't just add fuel to the fire or not. Does anyone have any advice on handling anonymous passive aggressive letters complaining about minor inconveniences that are completely legal/permissible? Thanks in advance!",AmItheAsshole
 for being upset at a friend’s newfound business?,"I am an established photographer with somewhat of a decent clientele. Over the past few years, haven’t had the most business due to having to work a full time job to make ends meet. A really close friend had asked me for some pointers on using a professional camera for fun. The next thing I know, this friend has started up a photography business and now markets to all of my clients, and had even gone as far as marketing to my own family, KNOWING I have a business in this also.

I wish them the best and hope as a friend that their business flourishes, but cannot help but to feel betrayed that they would go behind my back and become my main competitor, knowing this is something that I’ve invested money and time into, I even had a legal business license. Please, if I’m overreacting, put me out of my misery. I feel like a crazy person and a bad friend and feel guilty at times for feeling some type of way, like a code was broken, since I’d never do that to them.",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to do chores as long as my brother doesn't contribute,"I (19F) am currently staying at my parents while studying for my finals as well as entrance exams. I am currently waking up at 7am and immediately start studying with only a one-hour break until 9pm, which is when I get to call my boyfriend. It's 13 hours of straight studying, and it's definitely exhausting, but I will get a one-week break in 2 months right before starting my summer job. 

My (17M) brother does not study, does not have a job, and just plays video games from the moment he gets home at 3pm until the moment he goes to bed. He also has his own weekends. My brother is very talented at doing this thing commonly known as “weaponized incompetence”. He will purposefully fuck up very simple tasks in order to not have to do them next time, and I even suspect he's  punishing our parents for daring to give him chores. The most egregious example we've seen recently is when he poured bleach in the washing machine and pretended he didn't know the difference between bleach and laundry detergent. 

&amp;#x200B;

So, when it comes to chores, my parents rely on me. It goes from cooking and grocery shopping to laundry and deep cleaning the house on weekends. I don't mind doing a few chores, but it's taking me a few hours every day. Since I'm already on a tight schedule and my studies are the priority, I have to compensate by taking time off of the few moments I have with my boyfriend or sleeping. I'm not overexaggerating, I am expected to cook full meals from scratch three times a day, grocery shop (we live in a rural area and I don't have my licence, so that's an hour and a half walk every time we need something) then to tidy, clean, and hoover a three-bedroom house. Almost every day.  

I have deadlines coming in, and already don't have time to see friends or for any of my hobbies. My entire day is just chores → studying → chores → studying → 5 hours of sleep. I'm exhausted, while my brother just sits on his ass gaming. I feel like I barely get recognition for my help, whereas he gets congratulated for showering twice a week. 

&amp;#x200B;

Therefore, I confronted my parents a week ago. They explained that firstly, my brother was a minor, so he does not owe them as much, whereas I should feel grateful that they pay my rent at almost the age of 20. And, most importantly, that he is so incompetent that “explaining a task to him just takes more time than just doing it yourself, not to mention having to clean up the aftermath, why bother?”.

I'm convinced my brother is being dense on purpose. There is no way a 17-year-old does not know how to cook pasta or that you have to put frozen food away in the freezer because if you leave it out in the open it's just going to melt. And so I just told my parents that I would stop helping them out as long as he did not pull his weight in. I think I was almost immediately called ungrateful and childish. There's a ton of tension in the house right now, and things have not really moved on. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting time to accommodate to a mentally delayed adult at a child's party,"UPDATE IN COMMENTS

I want to preface this with 2 things

1. I have dealing with a medical condition that  will need surgery and has kept me from a regular qualitative life for several months. I went a little over board with making my child's birthday party special.  I have spent several hundred dollars 

2. My husband's relative is a middle aged person with significant mental delays. They have the understanding of roughly a 4 yearold.  They say incredibly inappropriate things on a regular basis ( including those of a sexual nature), do not understand physical boundaries and frequently touch people even when asked to stop, has put people in compromising positions because any time a new person is introduced to them they hound them until they add them on social media and then call them over and over all day and night, and all around need many accommodations and conversations when participating in public activities 

Now here is where things got tricky.  

My child's birthday has been planned for 3 months and is in less than a week. We have hired both a photographer and one of those princess companies.  I have a Facebook group with all of this so my child's friends parents ( these are 3-5 yearolds) were aware of everything that was going on. YESTERDAY I was informed that my mother in law was planning to bring my husband's ADULT mentally under developed family member to my child's party and intended for this adult to participate in the children's activities. 

I told them this was an incredibly difficult position to put me as I had not set up anything with the actor I hired to confirm they could accommodate to this and I was unable to explain the situation with the other children's parents .  In this specific situation knowing the types of behaviors this person often presents both my husband and myself feel it would have been more appropriate to do so. I offered that instead they come to my child's recital in a few weeks as that is a public space that is accommodating to persons of different abilities while my home and this party are not as I was not given adequate time to make those accommodations. 

His family are now all upset with me because "" this is a tiny wrench in your perfect plans and you are making it all about you"" calling me unkind and saying we are being discriminating against a person with disabilities. I continued to state this is an adult at a child's event. A disabled child at a child's event would have not been an issue but this is an adult they intend to have participating with children at a childs event. 


Am I being unreasonable for saying I should have been given adequate time for making the proper plans and accommodations as well as bare minimum making sure this is something a child's entertainer was able to accommodate to this ?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to put my future on hold to watch my sister's kids?,"

""I'm an 18-year-old female with an older sister, Sarah, 29, who has two children, ages 8 and 4. Most of my childhood was spent taking care of her kids while she went out partying. Now that I'm starting a practical nursing course to boost my university resume, Sarah is asking me to put my future on pause and watch her kids so she can enjoy herself before I leave for university.

Our mom warned me when I was young not to babysit for Sarah's kids because of her attitude. She also said this might be Sarah being jealous because she used to study nursing but dropped out due to bad company and not passing her final exam.

Everything came to a head yesterday when applications for the course opened, and I was talking to our mom about it. Sarah overheard that I applied and got mad, shouting about how selfish I am and how this is the only thing she's ever asked me to do. I told her to stop being childish and that it isn't my fault she had children, and I'm not their mother. The kids have called me ""mom"" for about two years, even when corrected. Apparently, I shouldn't have said that, as she started yelling at our mom, saying I'm her favorite because if I wasn't, she would tell me to put my future aside and help her with her children.

Our mom told her point-blank that she would never tell any of us to put our future on hold. She said she gave us all the same opportunity, and it's not anyone's fault that Sarah didn't use hers wisely. Now she has children, and I'm going to take my life more seriously. She needs to take responsibility for her children because no one told her to have them, and she can't look after them.

Sarah started crying and left, then our mom started on me, saying she warned me from the very beginning, and I didn't listen. She said I need to stop being a pushover because I lost all my childhood when I was supposed to be outside playing with friends, going out, and just being a kid. I was babysitting like I gave birth. Our mom said it's my fault Sarah became so entitled because when she made plans for me to go out, I would cancel to watch the children. She's not wrong; I would always feel sorry for Sarah because she knew how to manipulate me, just because I don't like to see people suffer or be sad.

Sorry for the long post; I just want to know if I'm the asshole for not putting my future on hold. I do know I'm not putting my future on hold.""

 ",AmItheAsshole
H for not making plans on my time off?,"I live in the UK so this weekend is a long weekend for me so I get 3 days off. I decided to use a day of annual leave to extend it further so I have Friday-Monday off. My girlfriend and I live together and on Saturday we are out for the day going to an event my gf wanted to go to. I decided I'd spend the rest of the days off relaxing since I haven't had much time to relax lately.

I planned to just chill out at home on Friday and watch Netflix, read, play video games etc. I thought I'd do the same thing on Monday and then on Sunday I'd go to the gym, go for a walk and then spend half of the day at home. Normally we have plans both days on a weekend so it's nice to have a weekend that not full with plans.

I mentioned this to my gf and she said she thought we could go on another 2 days out and had pretty much planned them. I told her no and that if she wants to make plans she has to actually discuss them with me and not just expect me to go along with them.

She said since we don't have anything else planned she doesn't see the issue but I told her I'm planning to relax like I've just told her. She said I can always do that another weekend but I just pointed out we could also do the days out she wants on another weekend.

She said I shouldn't be wasting our weekend and should be making plans with her. I told her she's more than welcome to spend the time relaxing with me but she just said I should want to go out and actually do something. I told her I'm happy to go on days out next weekend but I'm spending this weekend relaxing.

She called me inconsiderate and said I'm wasting the weekend. AITAH for spending the weekend relaxing?",AmItheAsshole
 for directly disobeying what my neighbors said,"My mother lives in a housing complex, which means limited parking. She has a garage for her everyday car and a summer car, and a small driveway. across the street in front of some other houses is a small (extremely cramped and can only fit a few cars) but free to use parking area. So naturally when my boyfriend comes over, or my friend and her boyfriend are house sitting for us, the boys park up there. 

The first instance we had with this women was when my friends boyfriend backed into her driveway so he could park in the parking spaces (there are two driveways there and it’s impossible to park without quickly backing into one and then pulling into a space). This lady came out of her house to yell at him to go back to his own country, he is of Mexican heritage. 

The second instance was when my boyfriend started his new job. Meaning he now drives around a company vehicle with a logo on the side. Our complex has a rule of “no company vehicles on the premises” so naturally he was mass reported by these two ladies in the house. (we asked the other neighbors and they said it was no issue for them, and actually told us the ladies have cameras they use to watch everything that happens when they aren’t there). So now when he comes over, which is every day, my mother moves out of the garage and parks up top so he can take the garage and remain unseen. 

With my mother parking up top, she parks closest to the house and is near the calmer neighbors driveway. Which means in order to park i have to either pull in and then back out into a driveway when i have to leave, or back in which also requires me to pull into a driveway. This morning work was an hour later than usual, meaning this lady had to wait out there for me for up to an hour. She was standing in her doorway when I walked out of the house and proceeded to yell at me to never pull into her driveway and that she has it all on camera. I am not damaging anything by pulling into her driveway for three seconds so I can back in. With my mother on the other side I have no choice but to use her driveway briefly like this or i wouldn’t be able to park. 

AITA for continuing to do it when i have no other choice if i want to park? To my knowledge, unless i am actually parking in her driveway this is not illegal. The whole complex is super crammed and people walk their dogs on other people’s lawns, so what i’m doing is not a crazy violation of privacy. It’s a driveway and i don’t get what the big deal is, or why she has to be racist and rude to everyone.",AmItheAsshole
 for potentially ruining my mother's birthday treat?,"I (16F) am soon going to be moving out of my mother's home to go and live with my dad on the other side of the country. as a result of this, I have told my mother that I want to spend more time with her during what little time I have left with her.

 Now, my mother (43F) has her birthday coming up in a few days. She wants to have a family day out that everyone is going to enjoy. Yesterday, she suggested going to look at monster trucks. Since my little brother (12M) was the only one enthused about the idea, she instead booked tickets for a blues concert. Because I don't like blues music, I said that I didn't want to go, instead choosing to stay here and help my grandma look after my other little brother (2M) because I love them both to death and would rather spend that time with them than go to a concert I wouldn't enjoy. She immediately became furious with me, calling me an ungrateful little shit and a cow, and begging me not to ruin her birthday treat, and saying that she thought she'd give me a nice night out and that she was only trying to fulfil my wishes of spending more time with her before I move. This struck me as slightly hypocritical, because the night before she offered to play a game of Scrabble with me. I told her I'd be with her in half an hour after I finished the game I was playing with my brother- the 12 yr old one. Then when I went down, excited to play, she replied in an offhand, don't care tone 'I don't want to now.' ??? Do you want to spend time with me or not?

  
However, I can see how I might have come across as ungrateful. I shot her down pretty quickly- after she'd already booked the tickets, too. And I kept on saying that in terms of spending time with her it wasn't what I'd had in mind- therefore making it seem like I was trying to make her birthday treat about me. And I wasn't totally calm, I was aggressive too. Partly because she wasn't listening to me, partly because I get angry very easily. And it's very true that I may be ruining her birthday treat. She said she wants me there, with her on her birthday, and I'm being a little ungrateful bitch about it. I just don't know. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for being irritated at my gay friend's presumption of men's sexualities?,"I'd like to preface this by saying that I am in no way homophobic. Anyway, I (F22) am currently dating a man (24M) who is so gentle, sweet, and comfortable in his masculinity. So when I first started hanging out with this partcicular gay friend (25M) I knew that a joke like that would be on the table, so it didn't bother me, it was funny. It started bothering me after about a month, when every single time we would hang out he would say something like ""How's your gay little boyfriend?"" or ""You should check guys on his phone"" and things like that. I laughed it off every single time. During those hangouts, I noticed that he started to do this thing with basically every man around us who had a girlfriend. He said my ex was ""100% gay, I mean look at him"", random men walking by with their gfs were ""no way in hell straight"", and some guy friends in our group were victims to those jokes too (not to their faces). I tolerated it for a few months, after all, he's gay so he's bound  to think that those people are attractive. One night, though, I was having a particularly difficult day and honestly all the resentment from these jokes had started to gather up, because it seemed to me that he was being disrespectful and sexist to women as well, because he could not ""fathom"" how men are attracted to them. So when he jokingly said ""Yo do you know that your boyfriend is gay?"", I replied ""Only if you're aware that yours is very much straight"". After that he told me in an ironic tone to chill out and relax, no need to be insecure over men. I found that odd since I replied with the same exact thing he's been saying for months, just a bit of an angrier tone than him. That night my friends told me I was unneccesarily aggressive and I was thinking I was in the right until they told me that I overreacted so I'd like to hear some other perspective on this. Thank you!",AmItheAsshole
 for not getting upset or convince the bride after I was uninvited to my friend’s wedding?,"This happened over the weekend but there’s still so much tension. 

One of my good friends, Matthew (26M) is getting married next month to Jennifer (26F). I (25F) have known Matthew since high school. We’ve both connected when it came to video games, especially Minecraft. Matthew has had his fair share of girlfriends over the years but when he met Jennifer 3 years ago, he said that he knew she was the one and they are madly in love with each other and I am so happy for them both. 

Last year, Matthew popped the question to Jennifer and she said yes. Jennifer’s demeanor towards me drastically changed after the engagement. She was distant towards me, she wouldn’t look at me and she would hardly speak to me which was weird since Jennifer was always so sweet and nice towards me. 

I’d still talk to Matthew and meet with him and our group of friends, sometimes with Jennifer and she would still act cold and not speak to me much. I kept my distance from Jennifer. Three months ago, we all received a save the date invitation and their wedding is going to take place at Matthew’s cabin 2 hours away and they were going to keep it small due to the size of the cabin so we were only allowed to bring one guest. That was when Jennifer acted extremely harsh and hostile towards me and said “bet you don’t have a plus one since you are so into my man.” I was taken aback. I asked her what the fuck she was talking about and she smirked and said I knew and to not act stupid. I ignored her remark and told her my boyfriend was coming. She looked surprised and left. I of course told Matthew about what Jennifer said to me and he was not happy, so he made her apologize to me. 

Then, last weekend, I was invited by matthew’s sister to go dress shopping with her and Jennifer. I declined at first because I wanted to keep my distance from Jennifer but Matthew’s sister assured me that she will deal with Jennifer and that our other friends will be there with us. So we go dress shopping and I found a beautiful dress that I thought would be perfect and I took a picture to send to my boyfriend since he planned on matching (I.e with a bow tie) with me. I tried the dress on and it was a perfect fit so I guess I got lucky. Jennifer was angry, called me names such as a whore, a boyfriend stealing bitch, and that I was officially uninvited to the wedding. She caused such a commotion, the employee of the store asked us to leave. 

I told Jennifer I didn’t want to come to the wedding anyway but I was going to because MY FRIEND was getting married. I told her if she didn’t want me at the wedding, fine. I don’t give a fuck since I won’t go to a wedding if the bride is going to be so rude to a guest. 

Matthew and our friends found out and I was getting texts left and right begging me to just come to the wedding. I told them I was happy to get uninvited and I’ll just spend the day with my boyfriend on the day of the wedding instead. They’re all mad at me for not fighting hard enough. 

AITA?

Edit: so my decision is final. I will not be going to the wedding and there’s no changing my mind about it. I will be sending a wedding gift to Matthew the day prior to the wedding instead. I told Matthew and all my friends that I won’t be going and they can’t convince me otherwise. Matthew also called me and asked if we can talk somewhere. I agreed but it’s to tell him in person that I won’t go so that way he knows I’m serious about that. 

Update: I met up with Matthew and brought my boyfriend along. Of course, he begged me to come to the wedding and he said he would beg Jennifer to let me attend. I told him it’s best if I wasn’t there. I told Matthew that Jennifer has a problem with me. Period. He said he doesn’t understand and he did ask her many times but Jennifer would continue to say she was just “stressed”. I got angry and said that’s bullshit and he knows that. My boyfriend also intervened and said to Matthew that he needs to wake up and realize Jennifer is crazy and he can’t keep defending her. Matthew said he loves her too much and doesn’t want to lose her. My boyfriend and I got up and told Matthew to let us know when he has a backbone. In the meantime, it’s best we don’t talk. I messaged all of our friends in the group to let them know I’m keeping a distance from Matthew because of Jennifer. He’s still my friend but at an arms length. I will still be sending him a gift regardless but I’m keeping my distance from Matthew. It seems like he is in denial and can’t comprehend what’s going on at all. He usually is in denial, ever since high school he would have a sense of denial. 

Another thing to mention is that Jennifer is nice to all of Matthew’s female friends. Just not with me. I’ve also gotten a message from two of our friends saying they have dropped out of attending the wedding because of Jennifer and that they are on my side. 

Edit 2: Jennifer already bought her wedding dress a while ago. When I went dress shopping with Matthew’s sister, she invited Jennifer as a way to resolve this animosity she had towards me. So it was Matthew’s sister who wanted to buy a dress and I found a dress that I loved and Jennifer went crazy. Hope that clears things up since so many were confused.  ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for help with chores,"Im working and my boyfriend is off this week. We argue about chores incessantly and I do most of the cleaning and all of the laundry (save a handful of times over the last 2.5 years). This morning I offered to do the laundry as he was doing the dishes. Then, got a call from work and had to work late. I asked him, would he be OK to do the laundry as I have to work late. He said no and was angry I'd gone back on my offer. We then argued. He has nothing on for the next five days and I only asked him to do one load of laundry. We are supposed to split chores 50/50 but it is a long way from that and has been since we decided to halve it evenly. I think he should help and he thinks I should apologise for ""fucking up"". During the argument he's calling me an asshole and telling me he doesn't care, has no feelings for me and I'm a horrible person. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not apologizing for making fun of my brothers chest? ,"Well. I can’t believe I’m asking strangers on the internet this, but I feel like I’m going nuts. 



I(25F) am not a small woman. Or at least my thighs and butt aren’t. Everything else? Very slight. I’ve had two separate women try to give me the nickname ‘baby tits’. One VERY ex boyfriend told me that I was ‘lucky he had an avocado fetish’. It’s just the way I am, whether I’m actively playing sports or shut up indoors in winter, I am, to quote shitty fashion magazines, a pear. 



Which doesn’t bother me, I think I look fine, but for some reason invites the fucking opinions of everyone else. Especially my little brother. 



For the last eleven years he (24M) has been taking every shot he can at me. From the most juvenile ‘what’s up? Besides your butt’ to playing that one line from the heathers musical soundtrack whenever I walked into the room, he’s been making fun of my butt for over a decade. Everytime I tried yo get our parents to make him stop I would get scolded for not being more mature, for ‘letting him’ hurt my feelings, for not just ignoring him, etc etc.



Here’s the thing. My brother is a trans man. Female to male. Which is great! He’s much happier as ‘Alex’ than he was as \*redacted\*. I’m very happy for him. 



Now. Because god thinks he’s fucking funny Where as all of my fat gathered squarely in my butt and thighs, he got incredibly big breasts. Even if he hadn’t started transitioning, he would have had to get reduction surgery for the sake of his back. 



I was in town visiting our parents a couple weeks ago and his fiancé was there. The three of us were in the kitchen and wouldn’t you know it, but he called me ‘big booty Judy’ right in front of his fiancé. 



I finally snapped and said, ‘oh yeah, too bad I couldn’t have boobs half as big as my baby brothers.’ 



He shut up and didn’t talk to me for the rest of the day. 



My mom was furious for risking triggering his dysphoria and for making fun of him in front of his girlfriend. She tried to get me to write him a letter apologizing and I refused. Now every conversation I have with her somehow turns into her trying to weasel a promise out of my that I’ll never say it again and that I’ll say I’m sorry. 



Funny enough, my brother hasn’t said shit about my butt since then. 



But I'm getting worn down and I don’t know if one hour of feeling victorious over an asshole 24 year old is worth all the drama going on. I know he’s more sensitive about his body than I am.  Am the ass hole here? ",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my ex a chimp?,"Me and my ex were casually talking about our week when they mentioned they had consumed 2 bunches of bananas (about 15) in a day because they were gonna go bad soon. I replied to this hilarious act by going “godamn, someone is absolutely chimpmaxxing, just going totally monkey mode” they immediately replied that I was being racist. And that calling her a ‘chimp’ was me using a racial slur with the same intensity of the ‘N word’. Im aware that comparing people of color to monkeys is offensive and racist, but my ex is a pale white ginger. And I myself am Caucasian. They insist that calling ANYONE a chimp is an attack on black people and that I’m being racist. I thought I was just poking fun at a friends monkeylike eating habit, but was I actually being offensive? Help me out ",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to cut down how much I talk to my mum?,"I don't think I'm doing anything wrong here but my girlfriend thinks I am. In the last 7 years I have lost my father, 2 brothers, a sister and 2 uncles. I am now the only living child my mum has and she has no living siblings so we're close. We live in different cities so don't get to see each other too often, maybe once every 2 months for a day.

This means I'll call her each day to check in and see how she is since she cannot text. I'll give quick 5 min calls on my way to and from work and when I'm on my own for example if I'm home alone or if I'm walking to the shops. My girlfriend knows I do this and it does not interfere with our time together.

She sat me down last night to say she finds it weird how much I talk to my mum and thinks I should heavily cut down. I asked why she thought that and she just said it was far too excessive and I shouldn't be talking to her that much.

I disagreed with her and refused to cut down how much I talk to her. She said I was disregarding her feelings and not listening to her. I just said that listening to her does not mean doing whatever she asks. I pointed out me talking to my mum does not affect her in the slightest and she just repeated that it was weird and excessive and I should listen to her.

AITA for talking to my mum?",AmItheAsshole
 - my husband &amp; I are expecting our first kid and I no longer want to let my in-laws leave stuff every time they visit,"So my in-laws and I have a seemingly great relationship, however they are the overbearingly helpful type. For context: my FIL is obsessed with doing laundry (I’ve truly began to think it’s an OCD thing) and I had to tell my husband I was uncomfortable with him not only washing my underwear, but also folding my panties…. 

Anyways, they live out of the country and our guest room is mainly used by them. They always pack an excessive amount of items and leave with even more, therefore, leaving clothing items/toiletries and a bunch of other stuff in the guest room and guest bath. 

Since we are expecting, the guest bath will be the baby’s bathroom and all of my in-laws things (toiletries, medicines, hair tools, shavers, etc) are all taking up storage under the sink. The guest room closet is essentially half full with their clothes &amp; shoes. 

AITA for wanting to tell them to get rid of this stuff and to stop leaving stuff behind for us to store every time they come visit? Do I put their things in storage bins to get the point across? they will be back in town in the next few months, SOS 


Update for clarification: we have 3 bedrooms. The baby’s nursery will be another room (now functioning as an office/extra closet - most things we’ll get rid of, but some things will be moved into the guest bedroom. So now the guest room my in-laws stay in will also have less storage space. ",AmItheAsshole
 For Wanting Help Cleaning Up Dog Shit?,"My dog has been unwell for the past two nights, and two nights ago, I was up at 1:00Am and 5:00AM to let her outside to use the washroom. Last night, I was up again at various times to let her out to use the washroom; however, this time, she had also messed in the house twice, which I also cleaned up.

Now the issue lies with my husband and his lack of assistance. We do not sleep in the same room as I snore, and he is a light sleeper. The first night, he said he had heard me, but did not get up. I was very tired the next day (yesterday) after this first night, and then got even less sleep last night. This morning, I asked him if he heard me cleaning up the messes, and he said yes, and I asked him why he did not get up to help me. He said he had 'lost track of time-' whatever that means. I understand not getting up to help the first night, but after another night, for him to not get up and help, that really pissed me off, especially when I was already tired from the previous night.

This morning, he was up a bit before me, and there was a mess on the floor again, which he had started cleaning up, and I began to help him as well once I was awake.

My husband is able to work from home, and is staying home with the dog today, which I know is inconvenient for him to do last minute, and so I do appreciate that. Though, It is a lot easier for him to work from home than for me to completely miss a day of work (I go into work everyday).

Am I the asshole for expecting him to get up and help me clean in the middle of the night or if that is a one person job? And is this something that I need to have a conversation with him about, or just let it go?

And yes, we are going to be taking her to the vet.",AmItheAsshole
 for not apologizing for calling my aunt a b?,"Context: Just about 12 years ago, my grandmother had a series of small strokes, and her health took a serious hit. During this time, my mother and I lived in Arizona, on the other side of the country. Now, one would think that my mother's siblings would have the courtesy to keep her updated as to her mother's health, but my mother is the black sheep. She was what the psychologists of Reddit would call the family scapegoat, my aunt and uncles were the golden children. 

As a person who loves my mother very much, I reacted, emailed the family, and let them know that I thought they were being incredibly unfair. When I was responded to, I was told, like a child and not the 30+yo decorated military veteran that I was, that it was none of my business and they would tell Mom what she needed to know.  (The only reason I mention being a decorated military veteran is that I come from a military family, which is huge. One of my uncles even did West Point. So, you'd think that it would have counted for something. Otherwise, my ""status"" isn't a thing)

Yeah, this didn't go well. I had choice words and called my aunt, left a message, signing off with, ""You are an utter bitch."" (paraphrased)  The deep burning thing here is when no one else was available to take care of my grandmother, my mother stepped up, left her two minor children with me, and spent over six months up north taking Grandma to and from appointments, cooking, and cleaning for her. No one else stepped up—just her.

Fast forward 12 years, I'm reaching out to ask some family-related questions, and my aunt relays to me that ""it would be nice if I apologized for being a bitch.""

I don't feel I owe her a damned thing. Her behavior towards my mother was atrocious. It always has been. Also, I don't need her input, so it's not harming me. I've not thought about it in 12 years and haven't cared. 

So, am I the asshole if I walk away and not apologize? ",AmItheAsshole
 for offering to pay my fiancé to be a SAHM &amp; student?,"My (29M) fiancé (24F) &amp; I recently became engaged. My fiancé has had custody of her youngest two siblings (10M &amp; 7F) for the last 3 years and it's looking like we will be officially adopting them after we are married. 

We've obviously been talking about our future together a lot and we've specifically discussed her going back to school at some point. She currently works 30 hours a week at a job she doesn't really like that is only paying her slightly above minimum wage. I recently started a new job and will be making slightly above 110K a year after taxes. I also have a lot of savings and bought my first home a year ago. I am currently very comfortable financially. 

I told my fiancé if she didn't want to continue working I would happily be the main breadwinner. This would give her time to finish her degree and spend more time with her siblings. We also both agree on trying for a baby within the next couple of years. 

Fiancé is interested in the idea but is fearful on becoming financially dependent on me. To offset these fears we've been further discussing how to organize our finances post-wedding. 

Obviously we are going to open a joint bank account with the majority of my salary going into it and I'm going to add her to the house title. I'd be the sole person paying into the joint bank account but it would be used for all shared expenses. However, I also wanted to pay part of my salary into her own account for her own spending. She recently also opened a savings account (after months of me begging her too) and I'd want to pay a monthly amount of money into that as well. I've also been looking into a spousal IRA and opening savings accounts for fiancés siblings.  

My fiancé doesn't like how I laid this out for her and feels like I'd be paying her to be a housewife. I don't really know how other single income couples organize their finances. To me, this plan should placate some of her fears as the majority of the money would be shared, she'd have her own seperate funds for her own things, and she'd have savings of her own if we ever divorced. 

A couple of her friends have even said that me paying money into her account equals me trying to own her. These friends are really making her question my motives and now she's accusing this strategy as being controlling when I was trying to do the opposite.

Am I missing something here? Am I being the asshole or is this just a confusing space to navigate these days?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to be her friend? ,"I met this girl when we were in kindergarten. We were the best of friends. As we got older, she grew apart from me and started wanting to fit in and hangout with the “cool kids”. In high school, she got together with the “cool kids” and literally made fun of me with them. She was only my friend when it was convenient for her meaning most of the time she text me to hangout when none of her other “cool friends” could hangout or she needed a ride (she had a person problem that made her not be able to get her drivers license). Fast forward to now, she is getting married and she didn’t think to have me be her bridesmaid. I checked her Facebook and saw that she had her bachelorette party… and I wasn’t invited. We were supposed to be best friends.. basically sisters since we’ve known each other for 20+ years. That’s what made me block her. She tried texting my dad and saying she wants me to text her and that she still cares about me, but I never text her because I’m done with her and never want to be her friend again. I moved on. We were friends in the past but now we’re adults and I chose to move on and not talk to her anymore. AITA for not texting her after she text my dad? ",AmItheAsshole
 For not considering the baby part of the family,"AITA For refusing to give up the baby items?

Ex and I were married for 20 years.  We had 2 kids together.  Our son was the 6th grand child 💙 born on his side, and our daughter was the 7th grand child and first Grand daughter 🩷 on that side. There were 5 more kids born after her.
On my side, our kids were the first grandchildren.

I have always been into vintage/ handmade items.  MIL would make blankets / sweaters / booties / mittens for all the babies.  When our daughter was born she also made rompers and dresses for her.  The other 'daughters' never appreciates what she did. In addition to what SHE made, she also gave us the sweaters that were given to her son (my husband) by his Nannies (grandmothers).  My mother, (first grandchildren) would shop at $$$ boutiques for out fits for my kids 🙄 She finally came to reality and started shopping cheaper.

My kids also wore the Christening gown that MY grandmother had worn. (Yeah, it was old).

In addition to the clothing, there were toys.  Toys from their grandparents when they were babies.  Toys from  their father's side that none of his siblings wanted for their babies.   Toys from my side I wanted them to have. Toys they got as gifts. And yes, I had all the toys tested for safety before I allowed the kids to have them.


The kids grew up and out these things.  I packed these items up in boxes so that when our children have children of their own, these things will be available for them if they want them.


Our marriage didn't last.  He walked our on us, and left all boxes (baby items) with me.  He quickly remarried. 


His wife has a daughter that was out of the house when they married. The daughter, recently had a baby.  Now, his wife had seen photos of our children wearing some of the items I had saved up, and SHE feels that since HER daughter had 'the first grandchild' 🙄 that SHE (her daughter) is entitled to all the baby items I had saved for future grandchildren.

AITA ... He walked away and left all the baby items with me. I saved the items so that OUR children will have them (if they desire) for THEIR children (OUR grandchildren).  They (him &amp; wife) feel that since his wife's daughter gave birth, she is just as entitled to the saved baby items as our children are.

And yes, I could ask ex-MIL what she would like me to do with the items, but I really don't want to get her involved if I don't have to.

I MIGHT be TA for not allowing my ex to give baby items from OUR kids that I saved for their future children to his wife so she could present them to her own (already existing) grand babies.
",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to make a cookie table for my sons wedding,"My son is marrying Wendy and the wedding is this summer. She is not close to her own mother for multiple reason and is pushing hard to have me fill in the gap. I am not comfortable with it at all especially with how hard she is pushing. She has multiple times overstepped boundaries such as inviting herself along, discussing very personal issues, very touchy etc…. 

Due to these issues we are not close and my own daughters are not a huge fan of her. She asked me this week if I would make the cookie table for the wedding. It is something the brides own mother would do with other female relatives. This is the first time hearing about this tradition and I did some research. I would have to make over a thousand cookies from scratch to feed the wedding guest. I asked my daughters if they wanted to do it and it was a strong no.


I informed her that I can not do it, it is way to much work and I don’t have the time. She told me okay and I thought that was it.

My son called me up and told me I am a huge jerk. That Wendy has been crying about it and I should step up. I am still refusing to do it.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my (24F) boyfriend (24M) off for his view on work culture? ,"Last night I (24F) and my boyfriend (24M) were trying to talk about our future together. We’ve been together 3 years and want to come up with a budgeting plan to buy a house. 

While talking I asked if he had considered getting a job. Currently he works Doordash and just finished a year of grad school. He’s an aspiring jazz musician - where we live doesn’t have many gigs so he hasn’t been paid for performing all school year. 

He immediately shut down because he was “caught off guard.” In his mind he had planned to work Doordash all summer to get money. He told me he couldn’t stand the idea of working for someone else and that getting a “real job” just wasn’t who he is. 

Context. I’ve worked since I was 16. I have been working the entire time while he was in school splitting our expenses 70-30. I have begged him to work in the past to take some of the load off but instead he has been using student loans to cover rent for the semester. 

Honestly if he genuinely follows through, I wouldn’t even be mad that he was working Doordash. He makes decent money when he does it, but the thing is every time he’s promised me that he’ll work he ends up not following through.  

I felt upset that he was bashing “real job culture” when I have had to work so much in my life to keep us where we are. We got into an argument and ultimately I ended up saying that if he refuses to acknowledge his toxic view of work culture then I can’t be with him. He couldn’t believe that I said that so easily after 3 years together so he drove off for a few hours. We’re now at this point where neither of us is willing to budge. 

I will admit that I have an anxious attachment style where I push too hard in arguments and I don’t give things time to settle. Sometimes I need to be told that I’m right because I seek validation in arguments and it makes people upset with me - which is valid. I pushed last night and I want to hear that I’m right. I can’t tell if I was right or wrong for pushing this particular issue. 

AITA for telling my (24F) boyfriend (24M) off for his view on work culture? ",AmItheAsshole
 for hating my step-sibling for not letting me have a relationship with my half brother?,"This happened within the last hour and I'll admit I'm a little emotional atm. so I 20f have a half-brother well call him Alex 6m related by the same dad. idk my family. I'm pretty sure my dad and step mom love me and I want to form a relationship with my brother Alex cause Ik he's gonna remember for the rest of his life and I want him to know that even if we're cities apart I still love and think abt him.

So recently I've started calling him when I can to talk and learn about him or just hang out while he does other things. I scheduled a phone call with my stepmom to hang with him on Facetime about an hour ago and halfway through my step-sibling Kevin (10m?) joined the table for dinner sitting in view with Alex. I had no problem with this and listened to Alex ramble while I filed my nails when Kevin started giggling at me cause he thought it looked like I was doing an inappropriate hand movement if you catch my drift. I brush it off and say nothing cause I don't care and in the past he's made it clear he hates me and doesn't consider me a sibling, which is fine I feel the same minus the hate part until tonight when he just hung up the call interrupting Alex. of course, Alex calls me back right away and something else is said by Kevin when Alex speaks up being an innocent 6 year old ""but she's my sister"" Kevin replies with sarcasm ""shes not my sister I don't even know her"" I calmly say ""Why don't you mind your business, Alex and I were talking that was rude of you"" ik I come off blunt often, I don't mean to it's just how I talk. now I'm not upset at his next actions but he called over my stepmom and told her I was ""being a b\*tch"" and yelling at him. It's funny how she was sitting right across from them at the table but told him to but out and Alex will call me when I was ""in a better mood.

ik hes young but why has he not been taught that this isn't ok behavior? cursing, throwing rude gestures, screaming he hates me. I feel like nothing is being done. I cherish these calls with my brother and he feels he has the right to determine if I can talk to him for whatever reason. idk Ik I'm an adult and I am a very emotional person but my little brothers gonna be all I have when my grandparents pass and I don't want to miss making this connection with him cause this kid doesnt like me. I'm ready to give up as this has been repeated for years and I feel like an asshole but I am starting to resent Kevin for hindering my connection to my little brother. idk what to do and idk who to talk to be honest. I'm happy to provide more context. I am SO over this and nothing ever changes. Ik he's a kid but I cannot force myself to like him and he has no reason to interact with me other than to start crap. Aita?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to share my gym equipment?,"My partner and I have recently set up a home gym. It’s nothing fancy but it definitely gets the job done. We purchased a smith machine and a cable machine, both secondhand. We also have some free weights and a small elliptical. 

We bought the equipment mainly for me, as my partner isn’t big into working out. In addition, the home gym is in the basement right next to my home office (I work from home often).

Since we put it together, my partner’s cousin has been bothering him about starting a workout program together. My partner isn’t really interested as he is very busy with work (physical job) and doesn’t want to commit, but was toying with the idea. When he told me this, I quickly reacted by saying absolutely not. 

I’ve been struggling with articulating this to my partner so I will do my best to describe my feelings here:

1. I have no interest in seeing this cousin on a regular basis, which would need to be the case if they were to have a dedicated program. 
2. I don’t want him to use our set up and wear out our equipment. 
3. I want the space free for when I want to use it as I have a busy schedule and I have no interest in sharing it with anyone other than my partner. 

I guess my question is, does this sound reasonable or selfish on my end? 

My big concern is that my partner is kind of a people pleaser and because of that, he will let his cousin push him. And then this would cause an argument between him and I about it being his equipment too and he can let whoever use it if he wants.",AmItheAsshole
 for confronting my friend about copying me?,"  
I write online as a hobby posting a serialized story free online. My story isn't super popular but it's still got a decent amount of readers. Writing means a lot to me and this story does too. I've made a lot of friends through fans of my story and have become close to quite a few of them.

One of these friends (8 years younger than me) I've gotten to know a personal basis. They also write but mainly focus on poetry. I encourage their writing and am enthusiastic about it. No doubt they'll be more successful than me if they stick to writing. We sort of have a mentor / mentee relationship going.

A big life event of theirs is coming up and I wanted to make a special gift for them for the event. I decided to make a print compilation of all of their published works and asked them for a couple ones in addition to the ones I've known about already. As I was coming through their work (they're very good), I noticed some similarities in themes and words between their writing and mine. I jokingly asked them if they were inspired by my story. They denied it and I embarrassingly moved on.

And then I came across a very specific piece that was one-for-one thematically the same as mine. They even used specific key words that were specific to my story.

I understand that all works take a bit from the outside world (mine included), but I felt slightly betrayed that they denied it since this piece is officially publicized (online). Then in my angst, I gave them the cold shoulder for a while and began to reflect on our past relationship in terms of writing. They once said that my story would sadly probably never be traditionally published and at another time said they hoped not a lot of people would find my story (to keep crazy people away I guess). 

After a while, I decided to tell them how I felt and that I was hurt not by the fact that they derived some ideas from my story into their writing (I think inspiration is normal) but by the fact they had denied it and this was publicized work. I also mentioned the things in the previous paragraph.

They haven't responded yet but I'm wondering if I'm blowing things out of proportion and being a sensitive a-hole about it. ",AmItheAsshole
 If i yell at my roommate insisting on not using the toilet anymore,"My roommate has been really invested in watching a bunch of climate change documentaries and reading articles everyday on the matter it seems. He's been doing the groceries with the reusable bags before it was  the thing. He is big on animal protection and especially bees. He bikes everywhere. He's been showing once every week for 5 minutes and using bare minimum soap, due to cruelty potentiality and harshness on the environment apparently. He stopped smoking because like what's bad for the lungs is like bad for the earth dude. He sold our gas stove so we have an awkward empty space in our kitchen now, because gas isn't good for the environment either.  I get irritated, but I give it the pass because he is saving the planet sorta. At least that's what the intentions are. But the last straw for me has been the fact that he stopped using the toilet because of flushing concerns being a waste of water or whatever. So he's just been pooping globs of shit on the floor of our shower and wiping it with a dry cloth towel. He says we can just get the residue off when we shower. It's disgusting and I wanna move out, but can't afford it. WIBTA if I told him fuck you with middle fingers up and say hey, im gonna start shitting in your room On The floor, if you don't start to act like a human and shit in the toilet instead of the shower where I step on your caked on shit and track it throughout the house because I like to be barefoot. This is the weirdest situation I've ever been in and when I brought it up to my mom she said at least his heart is pure and he's trying to do the right thing. I was like wts??? Then she doubled down and told me she use to also poop in the shower, but for conviency sake, which I guess I understand, but my mom would clean it up right then and there so it didn't get caked on. I kinda feel like maybe I am the asshole because I'm not addressing or trying to aide in the fight against climate change. But stepping in shit. Seeing chunks in the shower where you're supposed to get clean and then sometimes the drain getting clogged so I have to call a plumber because even draino can't flush it. And then finding out your mom used to also be a fucking weirdo and pooped in the shower too. It's all overwhelming. So I came here to find what you guys think is the best way to approach my roommate without blowing up. I might fuck around and address my mom for telling me the most haunting tale about herself that is molded to my mind for eternity. ",AmItheAsshole
 For Refusing To monitor My Kids' Eating Habits? ,"I (42f) have two kids (14f and 13m) and a niece (15f) who all live with me along with my mom (70f). As all three kids are in the midst of puberty, they have been packing down food like crazy. But it doesn't matter to me, I just buy and make more food since I really enjoy cooking. The food in question isn't like brownies and cake and mostly unhealthy stuff, but stuff that we normally eat. They always come back for seconds and thirds and stuff. 

  
Yesterday, I made chicken wings, Suya, and rice (weird combo I know). I made about 25 chicken wings, 15 suya sticks, and a lot of rice. After everyone had eaten, there was basically nothing left over, and I guess my mom picked up on the fact, since during cleanup, she told me she felt like these kids were eating ""too much"" and I should stay consistent on certain food portions, and after that no more. I don't know about you guys, but I felt that was a terrible idea since I feel like every teenagers eats like crazy. 

  
My mom could see I was firm on my stance, but today after school (they love to eat after school) my mom didn't let them get anything from the fridge. At least until I asked her to please open it for them. 

  
AITA? I can see both points on how impulse control for food can be handled but i dont think its the way to go about. So im asking here for judgement. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband he poops too much?,"My husband poops several times a day. He makes 2-3 trips to the bathroom in the morning (right after waking up + right after breakfast), then at least three more times throughout the day. Each of these sessions is at least 20 minutes, and I know he is actually pooping, although he takes his phone with him (that's not the point of this post, I don't care about the phone). When I asked him why he poops so often, he told me he feels like he's bloated and needs to poop after each large meal. Recently, I lost my patience and told him that his pooping was affecting my life and that he needs to go to a doctor because this is completely abnormal. We have a kid and I find it annoying to have to accommodate my husband's pooping schedule among everything else we need to get done each day. He was offended by this and said it's normal to poop this much for the amount of food he eats. I continue to insist that he must have some type of disease such as IBS or something, that is causing his constant need to poop. AITA for upsetting my husband and insisting that he goes to a doctor for his excessive pooping?",AmItheAsshole
 for being unwilling to play Santa? ,"My wife is responsible for events at her job, and one of these events is ""Christmas in July."" This event has been going on for years and is generally well attended. I have helped in years past with serving refreshments and never had any issue doing so. This year she finds herself in a pickle because the person who historically plays Santa at these events unfortunately passed away since least year's event.


I was informed that I would be playing Santa this year (not asked if I would be willing). I had an instant internal reaction to this and was not on board. This led to a bit of a fight where she finally relented with, ""fine, I'll figure something else out"" and I thought that was the end of it. A few weeks later she brought it up again as if I had agreed. I mentioned I thought it was decided she would figure something else out and she said, ""yeah, the something else was I wad going to wait and you would warm up to the idea."" I told her I wasn't happy about that but told her if she had no other options I would do it, but I wasn't thrilled about it. She brought it up again today and told me we need to get a suit from somewhere. 


I am quite large, to the point that rental Santa suits likely would not fit. I'm also concerned about being dressed in velvet and fur for an outdoor event in July. I'm also not the usual demographic, I'm younger than Santas are traditionally. The idea of being in my 30s having random children sit on my lap while I sweat profusely sounds awful. I know there are plenty of people that like the idea of playing Santa. I do not. I explained all this to her and told her I legitimately do not feel comfortable doing this.


For context, this very well may be her last year working in this position, meaning it will be her last time hosting this event. We also have an infant son, for whom this would be his first of these events. 


In response to my explanation of why I don't feel comfortable, both of these facts were brought up as supporting reasons why I should play Santa anyway. She then proceeded to tell me she was hurt that I was unwilling to help her. I told her I'm more than willing to help, and I have volunteered for multiple years at that exact event, but playing Santa wasn't something I wanted to do.


I'm feeling guilty about this, because I hate disappointing her and I know it can't be fun or easy to find someone willing to volunteer to be Santa. I also feel like my issues with doing it are reasonable and defensible.


AITA?


TL;DR: Wife wants me to volunteer to be Santa at an event she is hosting for her job. I do not feel comfortable playing Santa. She is unhappy with this decision.",AmItheAsshole
 for keeping all my prize money even tho it would helped my dad and stepmom,"my phones on 7% I’ll fix the grammar later 


I (16f) entered our yearly towns raffle not thinking I’d win I just bought tickets because I supported the charity, they’re always good prizes the top one being a gift card for 1000 in a gift cards

My stepmom won a fancy wine/food basket which she told us she’d enjoy to all to herself as it was her prize and with the pregnancy/money troubles she said she deserved something just for her. About two days  later while at my moms  I got a text saying I won 

After collecting my prize my mom said I should spend it all on things I always wanted but we couldn’t afford, so I did I get nice shoes,perfumes,makeup etc

Here’s were I made a mistake I posted to social media about winning and what I got. Within 30 minutes dad called me and told me I was selfish and cruel to buy myself unnecessary crap while I knew they were struggling. Stepmom than got on the phone and asked how much I had left so I said 280 

She than asked would I return my stuff or at the very least give them the gift card so they could get stuff for the baby because I knew how bad they were struggling. I said no just like her gift basket it was Mine to keep. She started crying calling me names I couldn’t understand and dad took the phone saying he was disappointed in me and I’ve changed the way he views me.  

I just hung up afterwards dad told my mom that it’s best I don’t come over for a few weeks due till everyone claims down, my step sister texted me saying “fuck them they shouldn’t be having more kids they can’t afford” but my stepmom had been sending me messages begging to help them out for the innocent baby sake now I feel extremely guilty",AmItheAsshole
 For not doing my partner's dishes,"Note: My partner has ADHD but didn't get an official diagnosis until we've already been living together for 2 years. They don't take medication or see a therapist

&amp;#x200B;

We live in a small apartment with a tiny kitchen. There's no dishwasher. Naturally we've had arguments about the cleanliness of the kitchen and the chore of doing dishes. When we moved in together the deal was who ever cooked dinner, doesn't need to clean. This dynamic didn't end up working because I would do all the cooking and she wouldn't clean. This wouldn't be as much a of a problem if we had space, but since the kitchen is so small if the kitchen/dishes doesn't get cleaned daily then there is no room for cooking dinner later in the day.  
  
Since I cook daily and since she's not cleaning daily, I've taken it upon myself to both cook and clean. I spend the first 30-45 minutes of my day Mon-Fri cleaning from last night. She started a new job and now brings lunches for herself. She comes home and leaves her dirty work containers on the counter because she knows that I do dishes every morning, so she assumes I'm also going to clean her containers.  
  
The other day I didn't clean her containers. She saw them and accused me of being petty by cleaning everything else except her containers. In my mind I'm feeling disrespected because she's like ""oh i don't have to clean up after myself because he'll do it anyways"". These are her containers with her food for her lunches (that i don't touch) but she still expects me to clean them on top of all the dishes I already do daily.  
  
In her mind, she thinks im being purposefully petty because I don't want to clean her dishes since im doing the dishes anyway.",AmItheAsshole
" for asking newer lake friends who don't understand boundaries respect them, because it feels like they're stalking us?","My husband and I have a lake home. We've been there almost 4 years. In that time, we've become good friends with a few other households on our corner of the lake. Some of our group is quite outgoing... always meeting new people in our lake community and being welcoming, us included. Everyone's awesome, but one couple has become problematic.  

Last year we met Roger and Helene, who have a seasonal cottage on a different part of the lake. They're around weekends. They check-in with us/our friend group when in town, or stop by unannounced. This is fine. What's hard is they want to get together all of the time, and don't seem to accept it when we tell them we're busy. They get in their boat, drive over to our area, and anchor straight in front of our properties. It makes everyone uncomfortable. They'll stay there for an hour +. If we're working in the yard, they'll repeatedly go by, telling us to quit working to join them. Other times, when at the campfire, they'll dock their boat at one of our docks, then join us at the fire - without the invitation. They'll also drive or walk over from their place to check up on us, even after being told we're not available.

When we're in our boat they'll drive theirs over and say ""Let's tie up the boats"" - so we can hangout on the water together. Normally, it's fine, except for when we're hosting guests. We've struggled with how to say no. My husband and I would never say ""Let's tie up"" to other boaters. We would swing by, say hello, then see if we're invited. If not, we move along. That's protocol, but it's lost on Roger and Helene. 

Recently, out-of-town friends who have been to the lake a few times declined our invitation to visit, citing that they don't like the visits being interrupted by the neighbors, specifically Roger and Helene. Our core friend group is very respectful about visitors, so we knew who was the issue. Our corner of the lake complains about these two all the time and has struggled with how to handle their constant orbiting. Having a visit invitation turned down because of them made me extra annoyed.  

Soooo, 2 weeks ago we were on our pontoon with friends, when Roger and Helene showed up and said, ""Let's tie up!"" We'd already told them we were busy via text when they checked in. But apparently, they just couldn't resist coming out when they saw us. Being extra annoyed, I finally spoke up, ""Sorry, we're good. We're entertaining. We'll have to get together another time."" 

Later, I got an angry text from Helene. She said I was rude and embarrassed them. I texted back saying I was sorry they felt that way, but they needed to respect when we're busy, and that at times my husband and I felt stalked. Haven't heard from them since. A couple of our core friends say I shouldn't have said anything; that their stalking isn't a big deal, they're nice... This is surprising and upsetting me. I thought they'd understand why I spoke up, plus I didn't drag any of them into it. Am I wrong? AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 ending a 10 year friendship over a work issue,"I (25F) have been working in an industry where workers are essentially self-employed, but still somewhat managed- rosters etc by a third party. The money is fairly good and the job is flexible allowing me to work 3 days a week with a cognitive disability and afford to make ends meet without other sources of income. Being self employed and earning my income from commissions means sometimes money is great and other times it’s terrible but on average it is a very well paying job.

I reconnected with a close friend (also 25f) from when I was younger and this past year we have become good friends again.
She is on a disability pension and has two casual cash jobs, and she studies part time.

A few months ago she was struggling to make ends meet and I pulled some strings and offered her a job in my industry, she took it and all was well for the first few months- in fact I quite enjoy getting to work with her on the occasions I do.

Our financial situations are now quite different as I make my money solely from my job, and she has the problem of needing to spend money and go on overseas holidays so her pension doesn’t get cut for having too much in her bank.

Here’s the main problem- my shifts are now getting given to her (I’m losing days of work so she has work opportunities).
Basically management is treating us as a sole entity instead of two and that is not her fault but she is benefiting from it.
I spoke to her when it started happening a few weeks ago as I’ve been low on cash, and asked her if I could have my regular shifts back as she has all of these extra sources of income and my job is my only income.
She got offended by the fact I brought up her pension and said it has nothing to do with the matter. I disagreed but we came to the agreement that if it were to happen again she would give me priority to my own shifts since I got her the job.

Fast forward to recently and it’s happened again except this time she put her foot down and told me she’s taking the shift, which would be fine if it wasn’t one of my two shifts this week. (Due to her wanting me to take a day off to go to a concert with her- and lied to me about the price knowing I can’t afford it)

Her lack of awareness to others situations and her lack of thankfulness for getting her a job has really irritated me.
The big reality check for me has been realising the only thing people care about is money.

I’ve never had an issue with her being on a pension as I understand the supports it allows access to are necessary for her functioning, like free psych support, occupational therapist etc but it also grants access to things she does not need, like a minimum wage without working, and disabled parking to say the least.

I have the same disabilities as this woman but I understand I would need to lie about my severity to access a pension- and that doesn’t sit right with me.

Her selfishness and entitlement has really given me the ick and I don’t think it’s worth keeping her as a friend, AITA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for keep talking about my financial struggles?,"I’m a student who lives in a w@r zone that is very hard to go to uni and return because of the expenses and it’s really hard to afford paying for books and such, i still need three books to buy and finals are in just ten days, because it’s a really frustrating problem I keep thinking about it and everytime I talk with my friend who lives in the USA I bring it up once in every while , yesterday he said he doesn’t care about it and I should stop complaining , I wasn’t asking him for anything I thought I was just telling him what is on my mind and bothering me. Am I wrong for sounding out my concerns? He told me to ju get a job but he can’t understand how hard it is to just find a job , there’s not even side jobs to work for! Cafes can’t even afford paying their old employees what about hiring new ones! Idk you tell me.
",AmItheAsshole
" for ""flirting"" with my friends?","I (28M) and my GF (29F) generally have a pretty normal/stable relationship.

I have this group chat of friends (all guys) whom I play games with once in a while. We used to do that more, but life kind of took over.

Anyway, even though we don't do stuff together as much any more, we still talk a lot and share memes. Recently, we've been doing this thing where one person will share sexual content, and everyone will re-share it in the group. Not porn, but stuff like ""I just jerked off to someone in this groupchat"", ""it's not an orgy if none of the streams touch"", and other such content that basically alludes to the group chat being a gay sex den (if it matters, we're all straight).

One day my GF picked up my phone to do something (we have an open phone policy) and it happened to unlock on the group chat, and I guess she got curious and scrolled. She got quite unhappy, and we had a minor fight. Her position is that the content matters more than the intentions, and I shouldn't be sending such things to anyone. Mine is that it's a joke (admittedly not that funny to outsiders, but we think it's hilarious).",AmItheAsshole
 for going behind my sisters back and talking to her bfs mom? ,"My sister is pregnant. And she’s the youngest in our family. (She’s over 20). I called up her bfs mom the other day to address my concern for my sisters safety of her and the child because she’s living with my older sister.

My older sister is malicious and wants kids badly doesn’t matter how she gets them. She tried to take mine from me went as far as calling cps the day my son was born. Told the whole side of her family she was right and convinced them to all hit me up begging me to give her my child. She also went as far as calling cps everyday for 4 months and even attempted to kidnap my child. 

So in fear my sister would try this out on the youngest sister I call ed her bfs mom to make sure she keeps an eye out on her and the baby and make sure my older sister doesn’t try to the pull anything on them. 

I told my sister what I did and she got mad at me saying it wasn’t my place and that my older sister wouldn’t do that to her. I told her I wasn’t doing it to be mean I just wanted to make sure she had support and protection.. So AITA? Did I over step? ",AmItheAsshole
 (20f) for telling my sister (16f) that our mom (42f) was going through her personal stuff?,"Today while my sister was away at school my mom grabbed one of her old notebooks, knowing it was the one my sister used as a diary, and read it again (she’d apparently already read it once before, not sure why she decided to pick it up today right in front of me) and proceeded to tell me the graphic contents and emotional turmoil inside of it. My sister had previously told me she suspects our mom goes through her stuff, and it upsets her. So I sent a text telling her what our mom was doing. My sister got upset and called our mom, telling her to stop. Over the phone my mom denied ever having looked in the notebook, claiming to have “moved it” because it was laying around, but didn’t read it. As soon as she was off the phone her voice changed and she began to yell at me, asking why I would do that and telling me how emotionally fragile my sister is. Which is true, she is in a rough spot, but if I were her I would want to be notified of the snooping. Was it wrong of me to tell her what my mom was doing?",AmItheAsshole
 for raising rent on a friend or telling him to move out,"About 1 year ago a friend of mine asked to move in to my house that I was working on since his rent was going to expire. So we came to agreement I would finish up a room and the shared living spaces like bathroom kitchen living room etc… before he moved in. I was to move in a couple months later after finishing the other bedroom and the extra room for my game room. The agreed price was he would pay half the mortgage and half utilities and move in with his cat. 3 months down the line I am close to finishing up the extra rooms when I start noticing a severe cat allergy had been born. And no medications I’ve tried work long enough for me to actually move in.

A month after that his girlfriend moved in with him( I was never informed or even asked if this was fine). I informed him whenever I want to work on the house I’d appreciate it if his gf wasn’t there because I wasn’t comfortable being alone in the house with a friends gf that I don’t even know. At this point he knows I’m allergic to his cat and not comfortable around his gf so I believe it’s clear I have no intentions of moving in. I figured I would be kind enough to let him stay there until a year from his move in date. 

1 year after he moved in informed him that I’d like him to look for a new place as I can’t really live there with the whole situation. I gave him a two month notice, but he informed me he is gonna need more time due to school and finals coming up. I agreed with the mutual understanding that rent would increase in two months. 

Yesterday I gave him a notice that rent would be increasing starting a month from now the increase was only him paying full utilities instead of half since I don’t live there. And he told me I’m being unfair and unreasonable to raise rent when the terms of him renting never changed.For reference he was paying roughly $530 a month the increase would bring it to roughly $700 a AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for asking my friend for the money she owes me,"AITA for asking my friend for the money she’s owed me for months? Posting anonymously bc idk who may know me. So my friend and I both work decent jobs, but I make significantly more than her. Over the past year or so of our friendship I’ve given her a good sum of money for gas, food, etc. and never asked for anything in return. In January of this year she asked for money so I gave it and told her to pay me back. It came to a point where I had to beg her for $10 just so I could afford my bills (I’m a waitress and tips were awful that week). Later she takes more money out of my wallet bc she needed cash and couldn’t use her card. I was promised she would pay me back. It’s been almost 5 months.  So anyways, I had been bringing it up every now and again, while still buying her breakfast some mornings just bc it seemed nice and I wasn’t too mad at her yet. She then pays me $10 in cash so I could “calm down”. After bugging her a few more times she tells me she’s going to send me a certain amount, then she never does. Keep in mind she’s always posting about her “shopping hauls” and constantly tells me abt all the purchases she makes. The other day I was talking to two girls about it, and one of them went a told her, which is what I expected. She sent me the $20 and then yelled at me for “taking her last dollar.” I apologized, and said thank you. She then went on about how her family is in a tight spot (even though her family goes on lavish vacations like 4 times a year) and how she only gets $300 bi weekly, yet makes $14/hour and works 20-30 hours a week. I’m not sure, she may have a lot of taxes taken out. Anyways she goes on about how she has to pay for school (me too girl) she has car payments (me too) and she has 40 miles till empty and now she has nothing to pay for it. Im sorry she’s going through this but i have helped her so many times, and she’s had plenty of opportunities to pay me back while she was on her TJ Maxx trips. One of my friends actually helps her with budgeting and told me there’s no reason she can’t pay me back. I’m not really concerned with losing the friendship bc she’s never really treated me like a friend and just ditched me unless she needs me. I just want to know if I’m in the wrong here, or if there’s any advice on how to go abt it ",AmItheAsshole
 for selling my friend my project car,"A few months ago I sold my 1998 mustang cobra to a friend of mine for realistically about double its value at the time. He understood the market but decided it was a fair price and I am not one to turn down money. But he wanted to pay half up front then the rest in installments. I took 500 off the price and didn’t charge him interest. 

He waited for many months for me to get the car running and driving before buying it and when it did he had me take it to an inspection that I paid for. I learned the car had a bunch of issues I didn’t even know about but he just graduated mechanic school and wanted a project car he could put his skills to the test with and this definitely tested those skills.

I told him the general run down of what the inspector found and he was cool with it and paid me. A few months of payments go by and I told him I found the inspection report tucked away and if he wanted it. I sent him a picture and I guess he never checked up with his own inspector because most of the needed repairs were a shock to him.

Now he has called me saying he wants to discuss the price again now that he knows about these issues. I am not okay with this. What he is paying for the car is now what the car is worth and I’m not looking to get fucked out of a deal. I was only willing to take partial payments because he is a good friend. The car is still in my name until payments are complete as where I have it registered doesn’t require emissions and until I’m paid in full it’s only fair.

How can I handle this? He is a really nice guy and I’m not trying to start beef with anyone but I will not be taken advantage of.",AmItheAsshole
 for not washing my mom's dishes anymore on my days off,"I already know the answer to this question, I'm the asshole for not washing my mom's dishes for her, but hear me out, and you'll probably have the same answer, but whatever. 

I (19F) still live (only until July at this point, thank fuck) with my mom (45F) and I can't stand it. I used to clean the house all the time, like the ENTIRE house, but this past year, I've given up even washing the dishes. Every time I clean something, spend almost an entire day doing it, it's right back to the way it was the next day because of my mom. She never cleans up after herself, she leaves messes and trash EVERYWHERE. And the kitchen especially is so god awful, I can't even stand being in it at all. The only way to cook is to teeter things on the edge of the sink or on top of other shit and it's so annoying, but everytime I used to clean it, it was right back to the way it was by the nights end anyway. 

And ever since October of last year, I've RESENTED my mom. She and my brother went on a lovely month long trip to Albania, and I got to stay at the house alone for an entire month. I was so insanely excited cause that meant I got to clean the entire house, and it'd STAY clean for a month. And it did. It was literally my heaven. 

An ENTIRELY clean house, that smelled nice and not like... disgustingness, I don't know, and it took minimal effort to keep it that way for an entire month. Like five dishes would be in the sink by the end of the night, I'd wash them, go to bed. The floor was very clean, no trash anywhere, the table wasn't covered in food crumbs, every surface was spotless.

Then. My mom comes home, and it's RIGHT back to the way it was within three days. To say I was angry was an understatement, and I've never talked to her about it cause she usually just plays dumb or blames me for it.

 And now at this point, I hide in my room, the only clean room in the house, and don't do anything helpful on my days off cause I just can't even stand it anymore. The house smells disgusting, there's trash everywhere, the dining table is constantly covered in food, the kitchen is so cluttered it makes me want to scream just looking at it, and there's not a single clean surface anywhere to be seen. 

And this woman spills milk, won't clean it up. She could break something, leave it there for me to find. Leaves soaking wet dish cloths all over the kitchen, it's so gross. I get I'm an asshole for not even doing her millions of dishes on my days off, but I just can't stand even being in the kitchen for longer than it takes for me to cook a fried egg and toast and go back in my room to eat. But I just want to know your thoughts, how much of an asshole am I?",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my ex out of our rented home,"I ( currently 28) moved in with my then-partner (currently 32) a couple of years ago. When we agreed to move in together, we agreed to split the cost of living 50/50 since we reportedly made about the same amount of money.

On the week we were to sign the lease, suddenly he didn't have his half of the deposit. I agreed to make up the difference if he agreed to pay me back, he agreed.

As soon as we moved in, he suddenly claimed he didn't agree to pay half of the moving company cost and that he'd only pay 30% because he had less stuff than me. I backed down quickly because my memory can be unreliable sometimes and it wasn't worth the fight. 

Then the first full month's rent came due and he was short a couple hundred bucks and couldn't help with the power bill. He didn't tell me this until rent was already due. It kept happening like that over and over - me telling him that I needed more warning and him not doing it. He eventually claimed that he thought I was paying the whole power and internet bills since he was paying the garbage bill. The garbage bill is less than just the internet alone and that isn't what we agreed to.

I then brought out the booklet where we wrote down all of the things we agreed to upon moving in together. I showed him where we broke down EVERYTHING down to which streaming service each person agreed to pay separately. He apologized and agreed with me, then a couple of times over the course of 1 year he gave me a few hundred bucks for the power bill (which Was 300 Per month).

Eventually I did the math on how much I spent on groceries and I came to him and said I'm paying 1000 on household shopping and we need to get the budget under control. He said it's fine and nothing needs to change.

Then the breakup happened. I won't get into why. When we broke up I told him that I wouldn't help him anymore.

He got a 2nd job and things were fine for like 2 months. Then he got fired from that 2nd job. Then he got into a head-on collision and couldn't work ANY job. I agreed to pay the full power bill and all of the groceries on the basis that he would pay his full half of rent for the 2 months he couldn't work and that he'd be back to paying for himself by the 3rd month. 

It is month 2 of this arrangement and he will be late on rent (last minute notice). I have someone moving in next month who was GOING to be our 3rd roommate but she can afford to live here just the two of us. And she wants it to be just us.

I know he has nowhere to go - not even a car to sleep in. We have been broken up for 6 months.

And he isn't even respectful of my money. Asking for things he doesn't need like for me to keep 3 kinds of juice, soda, and tea. I spend every morning/night, and most of my breaks/lunches with him since he isnt working. He'll do my laundry for me, make breakfast or lunch or dinner. Rubs my feet to help me get to sleep. Every nice thing he does makes me feel more trapped. I just want out. ",AmItheAsshole
? And is sitting in the back seat rude when someone gives you a ride? ,I asked my mom to pick me up from school today and when she came I opened the door and sat in the back. I didn't think anything of it at the time but she made a little comment about it. Later I ask my mom to drop me off to school late tomorrow and she said no and I asked if it was because I sat in the back. She said no but said it was a little rude and I asked how. Then my stepdad pitched in and we had a conversation and they said it was rude and it would still be rude even if my mom knew it just liked the back better because i like to put my feet up on the seat. Am I in the wrong or are they over exaggerating?,AmItheAsshole
 for saying no to dog sitting,"So background, I am now pregnant with our second child, after giving birth 6 months ago. 

A couple months back my husband (joe) agreed to dog sitting his friend dog for 2 months in April. Prior to us knowing I’m pregnant. Well plans got changed and he didn’t end up going. 

Fast forward to today (last day of April) joes friend finally said he got a date and would leave in July. My husband agreed to watching the dog. We have 3 dogs, which are a handful. I would have been all for adding another for a few months if I wasn’t going to be 6 months pregnant by the time the puppy comes and potentially giving birth while the puppy is still here (coming home with a newborn) 

I also had an issue last time I was pregnant where I had to break up a dog fight at 6 months pregnant and ended up falling and going to the emergency room (everyone was fine). 

I work part time and take care of the baby, my husband works full time so I’m usually the one home. Taking care of 4 dogs and a baby while being 6 months pregnant all the way to giving birth (3 months) isn’t something I want to do. Not to mention our dogs have a good routine at this point and adding another dog into it whose still super young, having accidents just seems like a lot of work for being that pregnant with a 8 month old. 

So AITA for getting upset he said yes still and wanting him to say no ? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not taking one of my girlfriends in my Bachelorette trip?,"I have a friend group counting besides me, two other girls and two guys. One girl and guy are dating and the other guy, let's call him Sam, is dating another girl, Kate.

Me, Sam and the others met in college and went through a lot together while Kate was just an addition on the road. I have absolutely nothing against her, she's an unproblematic person, but for me it only represents Sam's girlfriend. We couldn't bond too much and we don't have many things in common except things somehow related to Sam. Me and the girls hung out with her (without Sam) a couple times and we just didn't click. We don't complain because Sam is the one who has to like her, not us.

Anyways I'm getting married to my fiancé and I've always dreamed of this Bachelorette trip. I managed to plan a fully paid 7 days vacation to a nice location for 6 people, me included. Out of these girls, two are the aforementioned from the group and the others are my cousin and two very close friends of mine. I really want to feel surrounded by my closest and dearest girls, that's why I made this stretch. Now, if Sam and the other dude were women, I'd have invited them too, because they're dear friends of mine, but I wanted this to be an all girls trip.

Upon hearing she's the ""only one"" not invited, Sam's girlfriend lost it and instead of maturing up and talk to me, she threw a fit to Sam and sent him to scold me for not inviting her. I explained to Sam the intimacy of the trip and kindly suggested that, even though his girlfriend is often acquainted with us, for me she's not exactly a close friend at the moment. (I'm talking more than 5 years of friendship with the two girls and more than 10 with the other girls invited. Kate has been in the picture much later).

  
",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to reconcile with my friends after drinking irresponsibly,"2 weeks ago, my school had this sort of prom thing to celebrate the year ending, and I (16M) wanted it to be a memorable experience. This other friend group had told me about their plans to go drinking after the event ended, and I became interested and wanted to go along. During the event, I made the stupid decision to leave my actual friends and hung out with the other friend group; this is the first mistake I made. I noticed that my friends were acting distant already, due to them being disinterested in what was going on elsewhere and I continued to have fun by myself with the others. Once the event ended, I then told my actual friends that I decided to go with the other guys, and they warned me and tried telling me not to go, knowing that something bad would happen and being my stubborn self I still decided to go, letting them down again.

After leaving my friends to go with the others, they invited me to stay overnight at a hotel and I accepted, then we bought drinks and started, well, drinking. I told myself that I wouldn't have too much and that I would be responsible, but I wouldn't be writing this here if that's what really happened. From that point on it was really just a blur, but I remember my friends seeing me holding a bottle of alcohol, and I remember that look of them just being disgusted by me, then I remember getting in a taxi, next thing I remember is waking up at the hotel, the next morning. Turns out that night, I almost got alcohol poisoning, threw up on myself 4 times and had to have a group of girls take care of me; and to no ones surprise someone took pictures and sent them around. That was probably the most embarrassing night of my life, and I don't even remember what happened.

I immediately tried talking to my friends after the incident, but they already found out and had seen the pictures of me, and none of them would talk to me. We eventually agreed to have a conversation at my friends birthday party 3 days later, and when we actually gathered to talk, none of them were taking me seriously, and just said that time would fix things. We've barely talked since and I'm afraid that I'm gonna lose the people who mean the most to me, I apologised to all of them individually and tried being a better person whenever I saw them, but it seems they really just don't want anything to do with me, excluding me from conversations and stuff. However, I spoke to them today through text and they told me that we'd never be the same again, and it would take time for them to feel comfortable around me, but at the same time they don't want me to act like nothing happened, which I don't really understand how to do. I'm kind of writing this for advice as well, I don't really have anyone to talk to right now.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for making my husband do everything for his parents?,"I (31F) decided not to do any of the usual stuff that wives do for their in-laws after they tried to be an authority in my marriage. 

Mils birthday...hope that DH bought and sent a present. 

Mother's/Father's day..... Well dh gets to plan the whole thing.

They want to visit... Well it's on DH to coordinate. 

They've definitely seen a drop in quality and amount of communication. And, I am gleefully happy to not be doing so much unpaid labor. 

Of course, they now think that I'm a complete ah for not doing these tasks. What does reddit think?",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving my friend’s bag in the middle of the road?,"I left my friends bag in the middle of the road after feeling almost betrayed. I’m not entirely sure how I feel about everything tbh. There’s a few things that have led up to this moment and I recognise I did a shitty thing.

(all are fake names for privacy)
From September to early December I had an exclusive talking stage with Freddie. We got pretty close and into the talking stage but he cheated on me and lied to me for weeks. He tried to keep me around because he told me he struggled with relationships, but this was a lie - He had a gf. This completely destroyed me and all my friends were aware. I was so infatuated with this guy and the betrayal was just so intense. I struggled with my mental health for months over this and only recently have I felt better. 

My college friend group consists of 3 boys. I’ve always just struggled with maintaining friendships and hate arguments. I often pushed my own feelings aside to keep my friends close. I had two close girl friends that I fell out with and they chose to be friends with Freddie out of spite which really upset me but also kind of ruined my trust even more.

Me, George, Harry and Kevin are all pretty close but everything just seems to be closing in on me. George and I went clubbing and some things happened which resulted in me being nearly abandoned by him. He owes me 45 quid which he regards as unimportant and has consistently in the past failed to pay me as well. Each time he promises to pay me but never does or pays me 5 pounds every couple of months. I drive all my friends pretty much everyday and rarely receive petrol money or compensation. George has a job but chooses not to accept shifts which has resulted in him having no money. 

I always make sure I emotionally support my friends and helped both Harry and George with their relationship break ups. I rarely feel that I receive the same comfort and I just feel ignored and left out. Today George was sat in the college smoking area as I think he finds it too awkward to come to my car. He was sat with Freddie and Kevin went over to him as well. A lot of my friends were in the college smoking area so I pushed my pride aside and went to say hello with Harry. When I got there they were all sat on the floor and talking and I just sat quietly on the edge due to awkwardness and sadness really. Then Kevin asked everyone but me if they wanted to go out and eat. I gave this kind of shocked expression and Kevin was just like “Oh you can come too I guess”. I left really upset and betrayed and told Harry to take his bag out the car as I was going home. Harry didn’t come get the bag so I drove to him and everyone else and put it on the floor.  He has habit of getting annoyed when he leaves his bag in my car and I’m not in college. I just feel so overwhelmed and betrayed, especially as they weren’t friends with Freddie before and also with all the stuff with George. I just feel like I’m being taken advantage of. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my housemates friend outside of our house?,"We are 5 in the house, all are between 20-24. We are okay with each other, however I’ve had an issue with one of them and spoke up about it in September. 
[Story Here](https://www.reddit.com/r/LegalAdviceUK/s/VoPgjeF2Lh)

In December he got his mates dog to take care of him for a few weeks without taking our permission and even though we are not allowed to have pets. We enjoyed having him but has caused loads of damage in the house.

10 days ago we started seeing this random guy in our house the whole time and told us he is staying here for a couple of weeks. He is staying rent free, without our permission, keeps using our stuff and our utilities, and sleeping in my housemates room. He even has PlayStation set up in the living room with his TV. This isn’t the first time his friends stay over, he had a friend staying here a couples days every week for two months, and there was three here for a week.

The dog came over again last week. Both the first and second time he used to keep the dog in the hallway the whole day, never took him out for walks, never brushed him, always forgets to feed him, all we hear is crying, poo everywhere for the whole day until he finally decides to clean it up, and even attacked us a few times. When my housemates would be busy the dog could’ve stayed over 18 hours with no water food or attention.

My housemate went to Manchester for a couple of days while the dog was still here and paid his friend that’s staying over to take care of him. Same story as my housemate, even worse, hardly ever cleaned his poo until it literally stunk the whole house, ran out of food two days before he left and he couldn’t be asked to go and get some. The dog pissed him off once so he locked it outside in the backyard. The dog left yesterday.

Today I came to shower, When I entered the whole shower was full of pubes, when I looked at my razor set I leave in the shower it’d been used with soap. My house mate uses soap for shaving and their hair type matched the one in the shower exactly. They had both showered yesterday as-well. I asked my house mate about it he calmly said it wasn’t him. So I went and asked his friend and he started kicking off calling me disrespectful and how easy it is for him to go get a razor if he needed one.

We started arguing with each other and my housemate had to hold him back because he began to get aggressive. I have voice recorded both interactions secretly for my safety. Now I’m furious and I don’t want him in the house anymore. I am already very annoyed from my house mate due to the incident in the September and now would be good time to get him out.

We are all on separate contracts and pay rent and bills separately. I am a Lebanese international student so I feel like they would have more superiority in this case because they are British. I am considering going to the letting company and report him for both his mates staying over and the dog. Where would that get me? How can I go about this situation?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to sit on my ass instead of helping with chores?,"I work a busy full time job with crazy hours. I work some nights, some weekends, sometimes 24 hours in a row. My schedule is all over the place. I am the only income earner in our household while my wife stays home and takes care of our two kids. Granted, she keeps busy taking care of the house and the kids on top her her volunteering efforts, but somehow when I am at home she still gets mad at me if I want to sit my ass on the couch and not do shit. She always has little chores she wants me to do, unload the dishes, take the trash out, clean up dog poop in the yard, go grocery shopping, etc. And if I tell her I don't want to do anything she just gets mad at me. 

I understand that in a marriage you have to make compromises and both adults have to contribute to the household, but I feel like providing all the income for our family is pretty fair. I also take the dog for walks regularly, and I try to spend time with my kids when I can (bike rides, going to the park, taking them swimming, etc). For context, I brought home about $700,000 last year. We have a landscaper that does all of our yardwork. I told her she can get a maid but she doesn't want strangers in our house. She also never cooks. Most nights I make dinner, or we eat leftovers, or we get takeout. Am I the asshole for expecting her to basically take care of all the housework and let me sit on my ass when I'm at home?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to trick my great granny aka lie to her for my dad?,"My maternal great granny loves to make blankets and baby clothes. She did it for all her kids and then for her grandkids and she continued the tradition for her great grandkids. When my parents had me (17f) and then my brother (14m) she made us a really cute baby blanket each. All my maternal cousins have them as well.

When my mom was alive my dad was close to my maternal family. They had a really good relationship. But when my mom died 6 years ago and dad moved in a new woman, who is now his wife, 10 months later (they had been dating for 2/3 months) it fractured their relationship beyond repair. My grandparents and great granny asked dad to slow down for the sake of my brother and me. We had already told him it was too fast for us and we told our maternal family. Dad accused them of only doing it because he was moving on and that they wouldn't have responded so strongly to mom moving on so fast. They told him they would if we had struggled. That more than anything they believed kids needed to be considered in this time. That he could date but to slow down with moving forward. My great granny especially took it hard because she saw how miserable we were during that time.

The relationship came to a final close when 6 months later none of our maternal family attended his wedding.

My dad and his wife are now expecting a baby together. Dad asked if he could take one of our baby blankets and use it for the new baby. We both said no. Our grandparents have them stored at their house and we told them we didn't want them shared.

Dad asked grandma if she'd make a blanket for his new baby, because she has started up what great granny does, and grandma said no. They hardly ever talk and only when my grandparents take us to their house or want to take us places. He hasn't spoken to great granny since the wedding. He did write her a letter asking and she ignored it which upset dad a lot. He went to my grandparents again and grandma told him the new baby was not her family so she wasn't going to make a blanket for them.

Dad then asked me to trick great granny into making one. He said I could pretend I want a second blanket that fits me better at the age I'm at now. And that I could give it to the baby. I told him he was asking me to lie to great granny and that was wrong. I also told him he needed to accept the baby wasn't part of their family and they didn't want to make the blanket. His wife found out that I had refused and she told me the baby might not be their family but I was also making it clear I don't see the baby as part of mine and that my brother was acting the same way. She said it made us terrible people to reject a baby that was part of us, part of our family.

Then a few days after my dad told me he didn't ask me for favors ever and this was something I could/should do for him. I refused. He told me I was making this harder. He also accused me of punishing the baby for him moving on faster than I would have liked.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" for telling my dad I was not interested in his ""theory"" and walked out?","Throwaway, just to be sure. My (31, M) dad (64) started talking about his new theory on inflation, as I was talking about prices on food with my mom (62). It came completely out of the blue, and frankly it was bonkers.

He started talking about how Fed's rate hike isn't working, and there are ""economists"" (he didn't name any) looking into possible other solutions. His reasoning was higher rate is anti-corporate policy, leading to more expensive products, thus higher cost of living, and that's more inflation in his idea.

I told him the rate hike is an established practice, at which point he said ""you don't know how high the current rate is"". Then I try to tell him there are at least two competing schools of economics, then he said ""I'm not interested in any schools of economics"". So I told him current Fed Chair isn't exactly part of either one, and as I was explaining why, he huffed, cut me off again, and said ""then what is he"". So I was making my point, 'Fed Chair's indecision on policy is the culprit, and we have done 20% interest before, that's the level of willingness we need'. Then he kinda blew up, saying ""do you have any idea how high the 20% is"".

My mom, at this point, had already left the room. I got tired of him, so I just grabbed my breakfast and left the room as well. As I passed by my mom, I could hear my mom asking my dad 'why is the boy angry', which he replied, 'he's googling stuffs in his room, no doubt'.

My dad just barged in after few minutes and kept talking about how rate hike isn't going to fix inflation. I told him ""I'm not having this discussion anymore, you aren't listening, you don't even have any sources"" and walked out. He yelled, ""where are your manners"".

I don't know what discussions my parents had, but my mom asked me later why I acted that way. I told her the it was going nowhere, he had no sources, and kept interrupting any point I was trying to raise by attacking the messenger. I gave her my opinion on the matter as well. I guess she decided to give him benefit of the doubt, and asked if I could have made things smoother, so I told her he kept cutting me off and wanted me to listen like an old man asking for attention. She smirked and said he is getting old, and he is acting like his own father.

Later that evening, my dad asked my mom if I was given a stern talking. I told him mom told me to treat you like an old man you are. I don't know why he thought this was a sign of vindication, and went on about how ""this is no way to talk to an elderly"" and ""you'll lose all your friends if you are like this"". 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" for ""being rude"" at a family get together?","My girlfriends family tend to meet up twice a year for a catch up. They'll book out a part of a pub nearby and we'll go for a drink and a meal and catch up and mingle. It's quite an informal event. Earlier in the year I was in hospital for just under a month. I'm okay now and still receiving treatment but I'm otherwise healthy and well.



My girlfriend and her parents know what was wrong with me and visited me but the rest of the family didn't know what was wrong. They asked if I was okay when I was in hospital and said they hope I'm better soon etc which I found nice.



Last weekend was her family's get together and since I was feeling up for it, I went with my gf. Once there a few of her family members said it was good to see me and that they're glad I was well etc, a couple of them bought me a drink and things were going well. My gfs uncle then comes over and asks how things are. He then asks what I was in hospital for and I tell him I'd rather not talk about it but that I'm alright now.



We start talking about something else and then he asks again what was wrong. I remind him I don't want to talk about it. I ask him about his work and he talk about that for a while then says that it must have been serious since I was in for a while. I just told him if he mentions my time in the hospital again then the conversation is over since I've told him repeatedly I'm not talking about it.



He keeps going so I tell him I'm done and walk off and get a drink at the bar and re-join my gf. After the evening my gfs mum mentions that my gfs uncle wants an apology and said I was rude to him. I explained what happened but my gf said it would just be easier to apologise to him. I refused and pointed out he was the one being rude and he's the one who should be apologising to me.



My gf said I was being awkward for no reason and should just apologise but I refused.



AITAH for ""being rude"" to my partners family?",AmItheAsshole
 for giving my [35M] wife [32F] an ultimatum about dental visits?,"
My wife and I have been marriage for 8 years and she is my best friend, but her dental health is causing me intense anxiety. A few years ago, after begging for her to finally see a dentist for the first time since we got married, she saw a dentist who recommended some serious dental work, including extractions and a root canal. 

She hasn’t gone back since. It’s been 2 years.

I've tried all the gentle nudges—offering to book appointments, suggesting we go together, looking for less intimidating dentists or those who specialize in dental anxiety, but nothing has worked and now she either gets defensive if I bring it up during the weekdays she’s too busy with work (alternatively, that “it’s finally the weekend I just want to relax”). 

She’s not in any pain and never complains, but obviously if she continues to ignore the teeth that need to be pulled it could lead to some serious dental complications such as infection and sepsis and early death. She knows the risks of not following up—she's even talked about how it can be dangerous to ignore issues. We make a combined 280k so money is obviously not the issue here. 

I’m extremely concerned about her ignoring dental health. So I’m thinking of setting a kind of deadline/ultimatum. If she doesn’t have a dental visit scheduled by the next time we see her family, we will need to go to couples counseling or it’s over between us. I want to spend my life with her, but I feel like a terrible life partner if I can’t help her address this elephant in the room.

It kills me because she’s my best friend and she was there for me when my dad passed, but it feels like I’m failing for not being able to be here for her and support her in protecting her health. I just actually have no idea what to do. I just want us to grow old and healthy together, but it’s inevitable that she will have serious health complications from neglecting her teeth.

WIBTA for bringing this up as an ultimatum? I just want to make sure she takes care of herself, and I’m running out of ideas.",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to do chores if my mom doesn't let me actually do anything?,"I, 18F, live with my parents. My mom has always wanted me to do everything in a way she thinks is ""right"". I think there's some undiagnosed OCD at play (there are other signs) but she is morally against going to a therapist. Any time she asks me to do a chore and I do it when she's around, she starts by trying to ""command"" me to do it right and ends up snatching whatever I'm doing from my hands and doing it herself.   
This seems like a good thing but it starts to get frustrating when it follows you everywhere. She does this when I cook, garden, vacuum, iron clothes, everything. She says it's because I ""don't do it right"" and that she's ""just trying to teach me"", and that was fine when I was younger, but at this point I should probably know how to do these things since she's been teaching me for years, no?  
So lately I've been refusing to do chores or activities that require her to ""teach"" me or ""show me how to do it first"" because I know she will do it herself anyways. This makes her really mad, but if I cave in and do it she repeats the pattern and refuses to notice it when I point it out. The best I can do right now is try to do everything while she's not around, but I can't always manage that.  
It makes me feel completely useless to have what I'm doing snatched away and I waste a lot of time doing nothing because she always insists on me watching her do it and ""learning"". It's also physically straining as I can't stand up still for long periods of time due to medical history but she wants me to ""pay attention"", and sitting down apparently is not that. I'm talking an hour of just watching her do the chore.  
So, AITA for refusing? Should I just deal with it at this point, or is there maybe a better way to go about avoiding this? Does she just want company and not know how to ask for it?",AmItheAsshole
 for not really respecting my fiancée being sad about death of her ex?,"I need a little reality check. I’m certain I’ll be bashed to reddit account death. I understand that the person she knew died. I understand that once it was her close person. It’s sad and one needs to cope with it somehow. 

But what happens if I take into account my cynical selfish me? If somebody told me that my ex passed away, my reaction would be: “Damn! Really? That’s horrible, what happened?” and that would be … it.
I wouldn’t mourn, cry. Nothing like that at all.

So here I am, stuck, thinking about whether I’m total toxic sicko. I know she had some crying phase and some sad day or two. She told me that this really depends what have you experienced with the person. So I assume he was somehow special for her. It was she who ended that relationship. She is going to the funeral next week. I cannot really imagine herself crying her eyes out on the funeral of her ex. What would I love to do right now is to separate us for a week and let myself get over it. But I don’t want it to be “punishment” for her. I just need to stay at my fucked up mind all by myself. I guess that I should shut the fuck up, lift some weights and stop overthinking it. Right?

Thanks for reality check.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to borrow my boyfriend car for a month?,"
I(26,f) will start in a new job in a new city next month, I can drive but I rarely got the chance to do so (i dont own a car). So last week I just got my driving license. My new job required me to use car because the distance from my housing to the job is quite far. My boyfriend (32M) own a car and usually leave it parked because the maintenance is expensive and he got company car to use. Back story, when he first got the car he always say that this is our car because i do pay for it as well. Last year i gave him money for insurance and tax, this year too. Even my salary would go couple hundred to help him with his commitment. I even pay for his phone installement. Because of that I dont have any money to buy a car let alone license. So this month because of the job i finished my driving license and start to submit loan to bank.


The thing is the loan will takes 2 weeks atleast. When im supposed to start next week. He keep saying to ask around if i can hike with someone to work (like ive been doing for years) but i said i dont want to because i dont want to give that first impression again. He said its normal for someone to not have car on her first job (mind u im in upper executive level). He even asked if i can postpone my start date until i get a car. He simply refused to let me borrow the “our car” because my driving license is too new and his car is a pickup and i wont be able to drive it because its too big. 


I feel like im being treated unfair. Or is he correct to not lend me or is he being selfish? Please enlightened me",AmItheAsshole
 if I told my mom to stop vaping indoors/around me and my younger sibling?,"Throwaway because I don't want the drama

I've recently quit smoking and vaping, it's been a couple months and I've been doing very well but my mom has been making it rather difficult

She vapes in the living room all day, she has stopped doing it when I'm directly in the room with her but if I step into the connected kitchen she starts again and I have to open the windows or go outside so I don't breath it in. She'll ask me to come down and do something and I'll walk through a cloud of vapir and can taste and smell it and I don't want to babe any second hand nicotine. It makes me want to not be around her

I have a younger sibling too who is 9 years old. I don't know how much of it is because they're a kid or how much might be because of inhaling second hand vapour every day, but they constantly have a cough. My little sibling frequently coughs up a large amount of phlegm every day and has done for a long time now, our mom doesn't think it has anything to do with the vaping. My mom will vape when she's about 10 feet away from them indoors without much ventilation and will keep vaping up the moment they enter the room, I'm worried this might cause health problems for my siblings

Now my reasons for being reluctant to say anything; I'm an adult, I used to vape with her and didnt realise how bad it was until i quit, life hasn't been that good the past few years so I've been staying with my family again so I feel like it wouldn't go well asking her to not do something in her own house, and her boyfriend already doesn't like me and gets angered easily. Only my mother uses nicotine in the house. I also don't have any proof that second hand vape can be harmful, she knows smoking inside is bad but thinks vaping isn't harmful at all. She's also disabled and has tested positive for a terminal illness that luckily hasn't started showing symptoms yet. So I feel like I don't have any right to say anything, but I worry about my sibling and I don't want to be anywhere near my mother right now because she won't stop vaping in front of me. She also said that she never wants to quit

Would I be a bitch or out of line to ask her to stop vaping inside? Or to at least not vape in the same area that me or my sibling are in/near?
",AmItheAsshole
 Neighbor Sat On My Porch,"I work from home. I look out the window and notice someone sitting on my porch on their phone at 9:30AM. I recognize this is a next door neighbor who rents a room in the house next door (the owner of the house has rented it out for a long time, so I'm familiar with him and not really familiar with this person). I go outside and say whatsup, and he turns and says ""whatsup"", then turns back to his phone. I say ""no disrespect, but can you not sit right here"". He gets up, walks back towards the house he's staying in and says ""I'm just locked out"" or something like that....I say again ""no disrespect, it's just I looked out the window and saw someone just sitting here"" and leave it that.

Part of me felt bad for him, because there really was nowhere to sit other than the grass or sidewalk lol and it made me feel like damn am I an ass? I just feel like off of principle, you could've knocked on the door first and asked to sit on the porch and it wouldn't have been a problem....but just sitting on someone else's property like it's yours...that didn't sit right with me, especially not to start my day lol. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not putting my Exs coffee creamer back in the refrigerator?,"I (41f) live with my now Ex (39m). We have lived as Exes for going on 2 years together because we have children together and at this time it is financially impossible for either of us to live alone. We are strictly co-parents/roomated, no funny business after hours. My Ex (let's call him Frank) likes to make his coffee in the morning and leave out the whole bottle next to the coffee machine so he can make the 2nd cup hastily. However, several times over many years he forgets to put it back in the fridge when he leaves for work. I have put it away many times because I don't like wasting the creamer &amp; I also don't like spending unnecessary money to replace it.  However, it seems to be happening more &amp; more frequently so I told him several months ago I was no longer going to put away his creamer if he leaves it out &amp; that's a lesson he's going to have to learn. Since then, Frank has left the creamer on the counter at least 10 times. I have broken down &amp; put it away &amp; shunned him about it. The last few times I let it sit, pretending like I didn't even see it. Frank is now upset he has to go to the store &amp; buy a new creamer. He believes I should just put it away for him, I believe Frank should grow up &amp; start taking care of his own things as I am not his Mother, Maid or Partner. So today, there's a whole new bottle of creamer sitting next to the coffee pot, getting warm. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my cat’s ashes?,"My (23m) family (55m, 53f, 22m) cat died last week. She wasn’t doing well Thursday and my parents decided to bring her to the vet Friday without telling me or my brother. Friday morning she got worse, and they rushed her to the vet. I was home but still asleep and they didn’t wake me up to say goodbye. The vet basically said she’s probably already dead but if she isn’t, we have to give her the shot to relieve her of her pain (she was still twitching so it’s possible there was a heartbeat, but if there was, it was really faint and the vet couldn’t find it). My parents opted for the “simple cremation,” which means that our cat was put in a bunch with several other dead animals to be cremated in a group, and we wouldn’t get the ashes. They offered my brother her collar and me a toy that we bought her but never used because she got sick right after we bought it.  
I was really upset, both about our cat dying and the fact that my parents didn’t include me in any part of the process. I worked all weekend (literally all weekend - noon Friday to about 9pm Sunday with no break except driving). Monday afternoon I called the vet and asked if there was any way we could get the ashes. They had me call the crematorium, who said that they hadn’t cremated her yet and they could change it to a private cremation (just her and we would get the ashes) if the vet called them to authorize it. So I called the vet back, asked them to change it, and paid the difference between the simple and private cremation ($275). I got home Monday night and told them what I did and that I paid the difference so that we could have the cat’s ashes as a keepsake. I did it because I was really torn up about her dying and didn’t really get a chance to process it before I had to run to work, and quite frankly, I’ve been working nonstop since I found out she died, except for when I’ve been sleeping.

My parents were mad that I went behind their back and decided to get the ashes after they chose the simple cremation. I think that it was the right decision, it was something that I needed to start moving through my grief and I paid my own money. I probably should’ve talked to them before I committed to anything, but they knew I was calling the vet to ask if there was anything we can do, and frankly, they didn’t ask me or my brother before making decisions, so I feel like they can’t expect me to have done for them what they didn’t do for me. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my sister to my kid’s birthday when I haven’t met her for 4.5 years?,"AITA for cutting ties with my sister and not invite her to my daughter’s birthday as I am tired of her attitude?
I (38f) have been very close to her sister (35f) while growing up. I would always help her study, Go out my way to be available for her, do anything and everything to make her happy. She was also very nice and supportive younger sister to me. She has a short temper and is bold while I am more calm and timid so we balanced each other. Everything was great until she met her now husband 6 years ago.
It seems like since she has met him, she somehow forgot about me or kind of lost interest in our relationship and that hurts/bothers me.
She knew I was pregnant when he proposed to her but she decided to get married at a destination wedding just a few days before my delivery which of course I couldn’t attend. She got a new job and decided to move but didn’t tell me up until a week before moving. After her move, I went to visit her on my birthday that was the last time I met her 4.5 years ago. Somehow she always “forgets” to tell me anything good or exciting about her life, new job/promotion, new house, pregnancy etc. but always used to reached out when she lost her job/had any legal issues/house trouble. When I once confronted her about planning her wedding when I couldn’t actually come, she blamed me for being jealous of her and somehow cursed her. (She lost her new job a years later.) My parents, especially my mom always support her and make excuses on her behalf, which is even more frustrating. 
After she moved away, we used to talk 4-5times a week but unfortunately due to work I couldn’t attend her baby shower which was across the country and since then she has stopped calling me. We didn’t fight or argued, she just stopped calling. I called myself for a month but we hardly talked. 
We all went to see her when she delivered her baby but she refused to meet us (the child was in NICU at the time so I don’t blame her) but we have never met them since. I have seen her kid on video chat a few times and she has seen my kids on video calls. My mom tells me if I want to talk, I can call. I do here and there but she never calls back. Even during video calls, only kids talk/see each other we never talk. There is no fight just a lack of willingness to continue a relationship. 
All her celebrations are done with her in-laws and my parents. I get to know about it through mom, few days later. Sometimes I get an invite a couple of days before the event which is impossible to attend.
My mom blames me for not attending her baby shower and cascading the situation but it’s been 2years since she has even talked with me properly. I invite her to my house for any celebration, kids birthday, Christmas, etc. and she always refuses but my mom still insists on inviting her next time.
I am frustrated now and don’t want to invite her again and get yet another rejection. My husband supports me as always but my mom thinks I am losing this relationship. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom to grow up and stop being petty when it comes to her family?,"i (17F) live with my mom (38F) and my brother (4M). my mom is a single parent and i love her very much, in despite of all our many disagreements. i care a lot about her and my brother so its very crushing to see her upset, especially by people she loves

unfortunately, my immediate family and my extended family have never gotten along, and lots of arguments have caused extremely high tensions between everyone. as a kid, i spent a lot of time with my cousins, as we were only 2-3 years apart, and i also spent a lot of time with all my aunts. we would all do basically everything together.

despite all of this, when i turned 12, i noticed i wasn't hanging out or contacting them as much anymore. slowly it went from once every few weeks, to once every few months, until contact had been cut down to a ""happy birthday"" message once a birthday rolled around, usually very late.

the older i got, the more i started realising how destructive our family really was. the more they allowed me to witness, the more i realised the rift between us was caused not by general issues, but the individual family members and the way they let their emotions control their lives. i've watched my mom and her sisters have some of the pettiest arguments i have ever seen, but i always feel obliged to keep to myself as my whole family viewed me as the quiet, respectable young woman.

on a particularly bad day last week, my mom got on the phone with my aunt and i could hear the yelling floating from her room to mine, and i can tell you that it might have been one of the most ridiculous arguments i have heard between two people over the age of 35. i won't go into too much detail but my mom was convinced that she was right and wouldn't reason with her sister, so i stepped in right after she got off the phone and more or less told her that she was a grown woman screaming down the phone (at 2 in the morning) over something that could be resolved extremely easily, and that she needed to grow up.

that same night, i got in contact with my two cousins (18M &amp; 19M) and asked them if they could speak to their mom, the sister my mom was arguing with. she happens to be more unreasonable than my own, so i made sure i was clear that if they didn't want to speak to her about such a touchy subject, that was completely fine. they still insisted they would talk to her and that they would get back to me.

i haven't received a response back and i've been anxious out of my mind thinking about what effect this might have on our family. please help!",AmItheAsshole
 for confronting my father-in-law after unknowingly paying part of his taxes for 8 years?,"After getting married 9 years ago, my father-in-law gave me a document from his accountant. He said it was for my wife's taxes, and that I would need to include it in our tax filing.

The document was a K-1 form, and listed about $3,000 of dividends and interest income attributable to my wife. The document also listed my wife's balance (about $130,000). I assumed that the $130,000 was money held for my wife in a trust, and that the dividends and interest income would be held for her as well. Under this assumption, I gladly paid the taxes ever year.

Earlier this year I learned that my father-in-law plans to use all the funds for a family cabin, and to give joint ownership of the cabin to each of his six kids. My wife and I want nothing to do with joint ownership. We would rarely use the cabin and don't want to owe thousands a year for utilities, maintenance, property taxes, etc. Furthermore, we don't want to deal with the inevitable disputes that would arise between her siblings regarding use of the cabin, who owes what, etc.

At this point my wife and I had paid $6,031 in taxes for the income to be used for the cabin, and I was upset that we were never told the income would be used that way. As I saw it, the cabin was my father-in-law's dream, not ours. I believed he should have paid the taxes on that income, not us.

My wife called my father-in-law to discuss the issue. He told her the funds were not held in a trust, but a Family Limited Partnership (FLP). An FLP is more difficult to get out of than a trust, but he offered to buy her out for $100. Furthermore, he offered to pay us the $6,031 we had paid in taxes. (My wife said he didn't have to.)

Later, I called my father-in-law. I spoke calmly. I told him my wife and I had been hurt by the way the FLP was operated, but that I wanted to be at peace with the situation and move forward with a positive relationship. I asked that he buy my wife out as he offered. I then said that as the one who manages our family's finances, I thought it would be appropriate for him to pay us the $6,031, even though my wife said he didn't have to. Finally, I suggested that he pay cash distributions each year to each of the other five siblings to offset their tax liability. I said that was the expectation of FLP legal experts, per research I had done online.

When we visited my in-laws a few weeks later, he bought my wife out for $100 and wrote her a check for the additional $6,031 in taxes. I didn't discuss the matter at all with them during our visit. We had a great time together. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not talking to my friend after things he did?,"Me and my friend were playing a game after I had took a short 2 day break from the game. It was my first time on the game all day and I played pretty bad. He is better than me at the game and I’m not the best at it either. He kept telling me who to play and to do this and do that when I just wanted to play who I wanted to and have fun. He called me bad at the game and sad I was the reason we were losing despite our other teammate being bad and as his role is important we couldn’t do much and I was doing better than him but still got blammed. this continued after a couple more matches and he would always try and make me seem bad, saying stuff like “why can’t you do this” “why do i have more ___ than you” “can you not get a kill” and more. eventually i just stopped talking as id get made fun of for every little thing. he asked me why i wasn’t talking but i just didn’t respond to him and didn’t text him at all. the next day and i still don’t even feel like texting him as i couldn’t tell if he was joking and what he said kind of hurt. I feel like i’m overreacting a bit and it’s a game and i should just get over it but what he said is like constantly repeating in my mind. ",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to help clean up a store's stock?,"I (21M) work for a relatively large auto retail store. Recently, two management jobs opened up a store in a neighboring city that can help me move up, and obviously, I applied. I spoke with the district manager, and he set me up there as a guest for the store. The ""but"" is I can move things around and help out the store if need be.

When I got there, the back stock was a mess and most of everything there needed to be reset because you could hardly find anything there. None of the planograms in the back were set correctly, so I decided to do some with permission from the district manager and the possible general manager. I also did a couple of other things unrelated to the stock, but the inventory was the majority.

A couple of days ago, one of the employees there had told me that what I did to inventory pissed off a lot of people despite no one saying a word and saying the exact opposite. I had called up the district manager about it and there was only two people who got mad- the one who told me (20sM), and a completely other guy (70sM).

As it turned out, (70sM) was the one who set those planograms despite it not being their job, and (20sM) was mad because I was a ""guest"" in their store and therefore shouldn't have moved the things that I moved. He continued by telling me it's the equivalent of someone going into your house and rearranging the furniture which I totally get. I decided not to argue with him because the position I'm applying for is supposed to oversee all of that anyways.

Here's where I may be the asshole. Today, I was helping another worker fix a planogram that needed fixing and (70sM) walked up to me aggressively and basically demanded that I don't deal with the stock anymore because I'm not supposed to. I told him that I was doing what I was allowed to and I would continue to do so which he walked away angrily. I didn't think much of it and brought it up with a different worker who told me that (70sM) was about to walk out and quit because of what I did.

Because of all that, I was placed on just the register which is making me think that maybe I was wrong, or maybe I shouldn't have helped at all. AITA?

Edit: I was given permission to make changes to the store to help. There's no store manager, but I was given permission by the district manager, and it was the guy applying for store manager who placed me on register.",AmItheAsshole
 for going on vacation and yelling at my father while he was in the ICU?,"I (28F) and my father (48M) have never had the best relationship. I have 3 other siblings that have cut contact, while I have thought about it, I have a sibling that just turned 13 and I have stuck around to be there for them. In December of 2023 I started to plan a cross country vacation for April of 2024.

The Friday before I was supposed to leave (6 days before departure), I got a call on my way to work that my father was in the ICU due to a stroke. I called work let them know I wouldn't be in and drove the 4 hrs to the hospital. I stayed the night and visited 3 more times over the weekend and before I left. I got continuous updates when I wasn't and always called my stepmom and nurses to check in on him when I was not there. He had several complications throughout his stay; another stroke, 2 blood clots, put on a vent and sedated, ect. I had already spent so much money and knew there was nothing I could do sitting there so I decided to go and made a plan to get back early if things took a turn for the worse while I was gone. While on my trip I got a text in the group chat that had been started with other family members to give updates on my father to limit the amount of calls/text for updates when something happens, calling me out for being a terrible daughter for going on vacation while he was still in the ICU. Eventually I called my stepmom to find out what was going on, she proceeds to yell at me even more for not being at the hospital with my father while he is dying. I then hear my father in the background agreeing with her and telling her that I'm a disappointment. I had no idea that he was even off the vent and awake until that phone call. I tried to explain my side, I heard my father say that I am a B\*tch and worthless just like my mother. 

I calmly asked if I was on speaker phone, I was. I then proceeded to explain that I am the only sibling minus the youngest that is still around and that's because she lives with him. I drove 4 hrs multiple times to be there and was still getting updates on his condition the whole time and that after years of mental and physical a\*use when I was younger, he is lucky that I talk to him. If he really wanted to push it, I would take him to court for custody of my little sister and it wouldn't be hard to do since he lost custody of his other 4 kids before she was ever born and she has told me on multiple occasions that she would rather live with me anyways, before handing up the phone. I have been dropped from the group and told that until I apologize, I would not be able speak/see my little sister. Everyone else has continued to blow up my phone telling me that I'm a horrible person to say any of that while he was still in the ICU and demanding that I say sorry, or they are cutting me off as well. Am I the Asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to celebrate my kids birthdays individually?,"My wife and I have three kids, and both have very well paying careers. $300K between the both of us. Both cars are paid off, no crazy bills, and money is set aside for the future.

My wife does not want to celebrate their individual birthdays for three of the kids because they all happen to be within a month of each other. I'm kind of ok with having one big birthday, but I told her we should still take them out to eat on their actual birthday, do a fun dessert and gifts. She rolls her eyes at me, says I'm over the top and gets real shitty.

Keep in mind, she gets super spoiled for her birthday, Christmas and mother’s day. 

I did grow up super poor, never got to celebrate birthdays or special holidays because the money was never there. I've worked super hard to have what I consider a pretty awesome life and I want to make all of my kids feel super special on their birthdays.

Am I wrong for wanting to take them out to eat on their actual birthday?",AmItheAsshole
 For Ghosting My Parents After 6-7 Years of My Partner's Mum Nagging At Me?,"So, to make a summary, I, a 20 year old at the time, moved into my partner's (his mum's) place about 8 years ago due to my father threatening to kick me out over being unable to finish yard work that requires the help of multiple people (and I am not a fit person, pretty sickly) and my parents tracked me down and lied to my partner's mum about me, telling her that I'm ""a thief, a liar, a drug addict and an abuser"" which she almost fell for but gave me a chance. My father has a tendency to jump to ridiculous conclusions about me to the point where he confused my depression for drug abuse when I was 13 and locked away my asthma medication and the many times he accused me of stealing his medication or money and would also interrogate me on a daily basis if I was doing drugs. My mum is more or less just neglectful, kinda never really was around much in my life.   
  
My partner's mum, despite knowing all of this would nag at me and get really pissed off that I refuse to contact my parents so I would resort to lying to her about it just so she'd get off my back. I don't understand why she's so adamant about me keeping in contact with my family and I just have this weird... guilt for not wanting to. My partner's been trying, for years, to convince her to stop nagging at me about it and to let me be free from my family but she just refuses. My partner says I'm not an asshole for wanting to cut contact with my family but I still feel like I am for it.",AmItheAsshole
 for keeping my name change a secret for five years?,"So, my (26F) parents decided to name my sister and I after American states. I have permission to share her name (Arizona) and I was called Pennsylvania at birth. Yea, my parents are weird. I guess they thought geographical names were cool but I think there’s a huge difference between calling your child Arizona or Dakota or Paris Vs Pennsylvania. They’re massive republicans and America lovers so maybe they wanted to be patriotic. 

For as long as I can remember, everyone has called me Penn or Penny. My parents insisted that everyone was to call me by my full name but most people could see how ridiculous my parents are. 

My sister (28F) didn’t struggle as much with her name since Arizona just sounds better than Pennsylvania, and the Greys anatomy character Arizona Robbins made the name seem quite cool as we got older. I was mocked and teased as a child in elementary school because of my parents insistence on my full name. They would literally berate my teachers for letting me write ‘Penny’ on my work/books.

When I was 21, I got my name legally changed to Penelope. Most people I had met in college had assumed that I went by Penny as a nickname for Penelope, even my boyfriend’s mother called me Penelope because I was too embarrassed to tell her that Penny was short for Pennsylvania. I kept it a secret from my parents and close family because I knew my parents would go mental and accuse me of disrespecting their choice.

I’m getting married this summer to my lovely boyfriend Tom (31M) and as you all know, you have to say your full name in your wedding ceremony when doing your vows. I knew I had to fess up about the name change because the alternative would be hoping they kept quiet when they heard me say ‘I, Penelope’ instead of ‘I, Pennsylvania’.

I invited them over to my home and I tried to tell them in a really calm way that I had changed my name but they freaked out. They said that I was disrespectful, I was calling their choice dumb etc. They are refusing to attend the wedding now.


I know i’m not the AH for changing my name, but my parents are particularly pissed about how I kept it hidden for five years before telling them. Most people I know agree with them. They think that I should’ve had the courage to be honest with them years ago so they would’ve had time to get used to it instead of me dropping the news on them two months before my wedding and causing all this drama. A few other family members have dropped out and my poor sister (who is maid of honor) is having a nightmare with this. My parents believe they had the right to know much earlier.

Tldr, parents think I am the AH for keeping this a secret. AITA?

Edit: I know I could ask the officiant/priest to say Penny instead of Penelope but I don’t want to hide my real name on my wedding day.",AmItheAsshole
H for not wanting to pay him back ,"AITAH for not wanting to pay him back?

This all took places 2 days ago and were both freshman in highschool.

So it was the end of class and I was sitting on my phone scrolling. I have an, let's call acquaintance, named Gavin(not real name). He came up next to me and we started talking, but then he kept trying to take pictures of me up close and take videos. I kept swatting his phone away and grabbing it to stop him from taking pictures of me. At one point he retracted his phone back and after a second or two I thought he was going to take another one so I swatted the phone down again, but this time the phone fell (3 feet at most) and hit the floor. He picked it up and a large majority of the screen was black and fuzzy. 

Now I see how I could be the asshole since I am the one who smacked the phone down but still. 
More context to help my points as well.
Next day he told me he wants me to pay him 200$ as a way to repay him. 
My issue is
 1. I feel like this is fuck around and find out territory
2. He isn't going to be the one paying for the new phone (he told me this), it will be his grandma (implied he'd use money to repay her)
3. His phone was by itself 200 dollars (iPhone SE gen3) and he's getting a brand new iPhone
4. Being honest I'd probably have given him the money by now if he wasn't being a total asshole about it saying I'm ""indebted"" to him now until I pay him and saying if I ""dont pay him by the 5th, I dont want to know whar will happen"" (joke but still)
5. He said ""I may not even use it for the phone"" which I quickly saw him go ""oh f**k"" in his mind and try to pretend like he didn't say it out loud 
6. Threatening that if I don't his grandma will call the school and I'll get in trouble (i have a clean record and I'm pretty sure this is mostly not my fault)

So in summary am I the asshole for not wanting to pay him $200?
",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to Attend a wedding without husband.,"Myself and my husband have been invited to my friends wedding but no children allowed we have 2 kids but have got childcare options available.

 My husband works while I work from home while looking after children so I don't need annual leave but husband does. 

I spoke to my husband when invite arrived and asked him to try and book the day off and day after off work and we started to look at hotels nearby. 

Husband said getting time off might be a problem as it is in August so holiday might not be available I asked him to try and he said he would.

For several weeks I have been reminding and asking home to try as I need to let my friend know if we are attending.

Today husband tells me he hasn't asked and isn't going to because he doesn't want to ask because August is a busy holiday month I was upset as we have been looking at hotels and wedding clothes for the event.

I said I wouldn't go without him when the invite arrived however husband said maybe I should think about going on my own. When I suggested only going for 2 hours then driving home l
 
Husband became upset saying he didn't want to come home from work when I and the kids were not there. I got upset and said he tricked me into thinking and planing a way to go without him. 

I then hung up on him telling him that he doesn't want to go or even try to go but doesn't want me to go either which is unfair. 

So am I the asshole for feeling hurt and manipulated 
",AmItheAsshole
 for hesitating/taking too long to give my mom my phone?,"Welp, I (19M) just spent 50 minutes in the kitchen just frozen after being yelled at by my mom (57F). All because I took too long/hesitated to give her my phone as she wanted to call her friend from my phone as I think he wasn't answering calls from hers?

She asked me if she could use my phone because her friend wasn't answering her calls (I think?) and I was going to give her my phone, but I hesitated because while I have let her use my phone to call people before I just don't feel comfortable everytime she does or asks me after something she did almost 4 years ago where my mom went through my phone and other personal belongings while I was showering and read text messages I sent to my older half-sister venting about mom and saw that I told her that I was venting to other people about my mom as well, which she saw as ""shit-talking"" and took away my electronics (which are my only way to contact to outside world) and my current sketchbook (at the time) which I cried about when I was alone because it was personal to me.

She got mad at me for hesitating and taking too long to give my phone to her. Thinking I don't trust her and called me ""selfish"" and ""ungrateful"" for not giving her my phone and told me to never use her phone again if I wasn't going to let her use mine and said she was going to change her phone's PIN but funny thing is that she ***came*** to me to help her how to change the PIN on her phone right after. (Which I refused since she doesn't want me to use her phone)

So afterwards I spent about 50 minutes in the kitchen frozen from being yelled at by her and in the dark because she turned off the light in the kitchen and once again called me ungrateful/selfish (not sure which one she said despite it happening just a few hours ago) for wasting electricity and not using the kitchen if I was standing still and not moving.

I'm aware that I'm a hypocrite for hesitating because I've used her phone before, even without her knowing on rare instances, so I'm not innocent at this.

So AITAH?

Also, for the freezing part, I have bad social anxiety IRL along with having autism and it happens every time I get yelled at by my mom or certain relatives.",AmItheAsshole
 for moving in with my boyfriend without parental permission.,"  
I (16f) and my boyfriend (17m) have been together for around a year. We are both close with each other's families and have been planning on moving in together after both of our birthdays have passed. I will be turning 17 and he will be turning 18 in June. We are planning on moving into his dad's basement which has been renovated as our apartment.  
Both of my parents have known about this plan since December of this year and have only said that we would work out the details once the time comes. My dad was okay with it after I had explained to him the plan for the future. My boyfriend works 2 jobs and I am going to work as well while I do online trade school. I started to pack up a few non-essentials recently which caused an outburst from my mom.  
My parents have now changed their minds on the whole situation. My mom says that if I leave I will have to pay for the pills that I am prescribed for my anxiety and ADHD, which I am fine with. Now she is saying that if I move out I will be ruining the family bond.  
I took that concern to heart and told her that once a week I would come over for a family dinner and game night as well as an additional night for a girl's movie night. The girl's movie night will include me sleeping over so she will still have me around when I can be there but she is not happy about it.  
I am trying to start a new chapter in my life and if it ends up being a mistake then it will be mine to fix. I just want my mom's support in this new journey but she doesn't support it.  
Am I the asshole for wanting to move out at 17 with my boyfriend even though my mom doesn't approve of it?  
",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to go on vacation without my husband?,"Disclaimer: I’m new to Reddit and on mobile. 

I (39F) have been wanting to go to Paris and the Louvre since I was in high school because I love art. My husband (47M) has finally made some plans for us to go next year for our 20 year anniversary. Nothing concrete like booked flights or hotels, but he is really serious about it this time. We have traveled internationally before (we live in the US), and while Paris was always at the top of my list of destinations, we just haven’t had the chance to go. I’m excited to go with him next year. 

However, about a week ago, my mom told me that my younger brother couldn’t go on their planned trip to Paris this June, so she asked me if I wanted to go. I got super excited about the idea of going two years in a row, especially since I’ve been waiting so long. When I went home to tell my husband about my opportunity, he was devastated. He said I should not have even considered it since we are going next year. I said I wanted to go both times, but he said that if I go to Paris with my mom this June, then he would be so heartbroken that we won’t go for our anniversary next year, or ever. 

Now I’m the one who’s heartbroken because I had to turn down my mom’s offer. I tried to bring it up again with him, but he said that he wants to see my reaction the first time I see the art in the Louvre. He said he cares about seeing that kind of stuff more than me because he is more romantic than I am (which is true, I’m not very sentimental or romantic).  

I understand where he’s coming from, but I still want to go with my mom AND with him. I’m tired of waiting. Now I’m mad because I am once again putting what I want aside to keep him happy. 

So AITA for still wanting to go to Paris with my mom, knowing that it would break my husband’s heart if I did?",AmItheAsshole
 If I told my mom I don’t want to take care of my Grandma anymore ,"I F22 am currently taking care of my grandma F72 who cannot walk because she sprained her knee. I have been here for almost 2 weeks now. She could possibly be like this for 6-10 more weeks. 

She wakes me up multiple times a night to use the restroom and wakes up crazy early (I wake up at 9am she wakes up at 4am). I  not mad at my grandma and I would do anything for her. However I have chronic pain and severe scoliosis, and I am currently in excruciating pain. I lay up at night trying not to cry because I am in so much pain.  I am also exhausted because I am not getting good rest. 

I am not sure what to do because I am the only one readily available to take care of her. My mom lives over 4 hours away. My older sisters all have kids and full time jobs and they can’t uproot and stop to help her. I am currently in college, not working, and I do not have children. I am engaged but that’s it. 

I feel terrible for not wanting to be at my grandmas anymore but I also know that if I don’t get a break I am going to get seriously hurt. 

Would I be the AH if I told my mom that she needs to figure something out so I can get a break? 
What would you do if you were in my situation? ",AmItheAsshole
 for giving my brothers cat to his ex?,"My fiancé (32M) and I (31F) live in a two family home with his brother (Adam) and new wife (Martha) as our neighbors.   
  
Before Adam met Martha, he was in a 3 year relationship with Vicky. Together they owned two cats. They ended up breaking up, and Adam kept both cats. A few months later, Adam met Martha and quickly married. They then got a kitten and since then, one of the original cats (Luc) started pooping outside of the litter box. Adam and Martha started leaving Luc outside to “teach him a lesson”.   
  
Whenever I saw this happen, I’d bring Luc into my home until Adam is there to take him back in. The neighbors on our block have also made comments that they’ve seen Luc meowing by their door to be let in at night.  
  
Last week, after I found Luc again, my fiancé asked Adam and Martha in person if they still want the cat since they keep leaving him outside. Verbatim, Martha says “I don’t want that f\*ing cat. He is disgusting”. My fiancé then tells them both that we will give the cat a home. Both Adam and Martha don’t contest.  
  
My fiancé and I then buy all the necessary cat supplies. We decide to house him with intentions of finding him a permanent loving home. After a week, Adam tells me that everything is going well now that Luc is gone. That day, we decide to message Adam’s ex, Vikki, to see if she would like to keep the cat.   
  
We thought that asking Vikki first would be the right thing to do since Luc knows her, and since he was her cat for a period of time. We also know that Vikki is a responsible and loving pet owner. Vikki was a former vet tech. She was so appreciative that we took Luc in, and was thrilled to keep him.  
  
Adam and Martha are upset that we gave the cat to his ex. They dislike our rationale and asked “You couldn’t find anyone else to give the cat to?”

Reddit, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for staying up late and my sister getting fired for not waking up,"I stayed up till 1am last night playing games and my sister got fired this morning for being late she told my mom it’s because I kept her up all night she works at 7am

We don’t live in the same room fyi 

I didn’t even stay up that late I may have been a bit loud but I went to bed fairly early compared to my regular time

I feel really bad but I don’t think it’s my fault and I’m getting flamed for it by my mom 

What do you guys think am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for not spending time with my family?,"Okay quick thing I am not a parent, I’m a 17 year old girl. Today my mom expressed some feelings she’s been having with me and I admit my reaction was kinda bitchy. She was driving me home from an orthodontist appointment and I had been slightly annoyed so she asked me why I was mad at her and I lied and told her I wasn’t she then pressured me to tell her what was wrong so I told her that I was just getting frustrated with my dental health since I got rubber bands put back on a month after jaw surgery. She told me it wasn’t a big deal and I shouldn’t be upset about it so she started prompting again for me to tell her what was wrong so I just accepted one of the options she gave me and said I was tired. she also told me that I need to communicate my feelings better or else my relationship with my boyfriend wouldn’t last long, I told her that I do communicate with him and she got visibly annoyed. She then asked if I went straight up to my room to recharge after school everyday instead of interacting with family because I’m autistic so I said probably. (She doesn’t fully understand autism or ADHD and that’s been a bit difficult) she told me that she was sad that she didn’t see me often and that it felt like I was pushing my family away. She claimed that both my brother and sister were asking why I wasn’t in the hot tub the day before and that they missed me and were sad that I was never around (my brother didn’t say that, we don’t get along at all, my sister idk) then she told me that family is forever and that my best friend was going to leave me behind eventually but that they were always going to be a part of my life and that if I kept pushing people away I was going to end up alone. I didn’t respond so she started saying that I needed to get my priorities in order because friends are temporary. I just said okay and left the car as soon as we got home so I could blast music in my ears and make a salad before scadaddling up to my room to decompress. Now that you’ve heard her side of the story, here’s mine.

All my life I’ve been told that I have such good parents, by my parents. They were fucking wrong! Every time they were angry they’d take it out on me or my siblings by yelling at us and they would force me to talk about my feelings just to invalidate them or make everything worse, at every opportunity I have been called a selfish disgusting lazy brat, and my mom always points out my imperfections ESPECIALLY if I’m happy! Smiling at your phone? “Your hair is filthy!” Going to homecoming? “Suck in your stomach for the pictures” literals just standing there? “Your teeth look yellow” I fucking hated myself for so long because of them! So naturally I stopped going downstairs as much, I started making online friends and it was a rocky road at first but now I have the best boyfriend in the world and a super cool best friend! And they care about me, and so I prefer hanging out with them over my family. So am I the asshole for pushing them away?",AmItheAsshole
 for warning my father's new girlfriend about his racist behavior?,"Hey. I (15F) have been noticing things about my father (50M) recently.

He's a white man, and since divorcing my mom, he's only ever dated women of color. Which is fine with me. We live in an area where most people are poc, even, so his dating habits aren't too weird on their own.

The problem is the 'jokes' he makes about his girlfriends when they aren't looking. When he had a hispanic girlfriend, he mocked her accent and food. When he had an asian girlfriend, he mocked her 'traditional asian parenting' and her celebrating traditional holidays. When he had a black girlfriend, he mocked her natural hair. When he had a native american girlfriend, he made 'pocahontas' and 'indian princess' jokes relentlessly.

Some of them got angry about these jokes while others would uncomfortably laugh them off, but I could tell none of them were really comfortable with the jokes he made. Sometimes it seems like he dates them just to put them down and then dump them. I hate it. 

Well, yesterday he brought home a girl from India who he apparently met last week. When he was out of the room, I pulled her aside and gently warned her about how he treated his previous girlfriends who weren't white because I didn't want her to date him not knowing how he is until he starts belittling her too. She got really quiet and made up an excuse to leave a few minutes later.

Apparently she hasn't talked to him since yesterday, and my brother felt bad for him and decided to tell my dad what I said to her. So now my dad is angry at me for thinking so little of him and interfering in his love life. 

I was pretty confident that I did the right thing, but my mom and brother both think I should have just kept my mouth shut, and my dad is really angry, so now I'm double guessing myself and whether it was my place to step in. 

Am I the asshole here?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling a woman she looks well despite just giving birth?,"This was a brief exchange between a woman (late 20s/early 30s) and I (late 20s M). We both work in different departments within a multi-storey office and have only ever smiled, said good morning or had a very quick how are you to each other up until now.

After nearly bumping into me on the stairs this conversation happened, but was very quick and mostly took place whilst we continued to walk in opposite directions.  
  
Woman: (giggles) Opp, sorry, baby brain! I've only just given birth and have only popped in to get something.  
  
Me: No worries! How's it going? You're looking well, my sister looked exhausted for months! (laughs)

Woman: (pulls her face inwards) Uh, we shouldn't have to look well after giving--

Me: Oh, no, sorry, I didn't mean it like--

Woman (We were further apart so it wasn't clear, but something along the lines of): Mmm, it can come across as a little sexist.

  
Was I in the wrong here? She did took totally well in terms of hair, make-up and clothes and she seemed bubbly before I complimented her so it was surprising to hear she'd just given birth and I assume still on maternity. It was just a quick comment from me so maybe I could have worded it better or not said it at all? I'm getting mixed responses from both male and female friends on whether it was appropriate or not.

Thanks

",AmItheAsshole
Update:  for kicking out of my house for not complying to my house rules?,"Update: AITA for kicking out of my house for not complying to my house rules?

[Original link](https://www.reddit.com/r/AmItheAsshole/s/WFshhvSUZE)

Hello everyone. I thought I might make an update regarding the post I made about kicking my sister out of my house. First, I like to thank everyone who commented and assured me that I was not doing anything wrong by kicking my sister out. 

Here’s the update: the first thing I did, despite everyone’s warnings, I went over to my parents house to talk with my aunt and my sister to come up with a solution as my aunt did say my sister couldn’t stay long term as there isn’t any room. 

We talked and surprisingly my sister followed my aunts house rules. She cleaned up after herself and she even bought groceries when my aunt said she didn’t need to do that. My sister apologized to me for giving me a hard time and not keeping my apartment clean when I’m gone at work. She admitted she was just too lazy and didn’t think I’d be that angry to the point where I’d kick her out. I accepted her apology and that’s when my aunt asked my parents if they’d be comfortable letting her move back in with them as my sister is no longer welcome to stay with me. My parents said they did some thinking and they are willing to let her stay under one condition: she needs to contribute and not just with household chores. She needs to start paying rent and after she gets a job, she needs to start looking for places of her own. 

My sister has a part time job at the university so she agreed to my parents conditions. That was a couple weeks ago. Now, I was over at my parents house an hour ago for lunch and my sister had improved! She doesn’t leave her clothes in the living room and cleans up after herself. I asked my parents about that and they said another part of the condition is if she made a mess or didn’t clean up after herself, she will have to pay a fine (which is $5). Since my sister wasn’t willing to spend so much money knowing she would be charged with fines if she didn’t help keep the house clean, that was when she started being a bit more responsible. I guess the only way to get her to clean is if you charge her with a fine lol. 

That’s the update. I’m just relieved that there was no drama or problems. Now, one thing I do need to mention is that my sister wasn’t really happy at first about having to pay rent or financially contribute, but she agreed nonetheless and that’s what matters. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not booking tickets for my gf to come on holiday with me and my daughter ,"I (38M) just booked a holiday for me and my daughter (16F). We have done this every year since she was born, we’ve carried on the tradition since her mother died as a way to remember her (we go to the same place during the same two weeks). 

Last year when we planned to go I’d talked to my gf (35F) about it and she was completely fine and said how she had no issue with it just being me and my daughter and it would be fine in the future. So when I booked it this year I assumed she would be fine with it again as she had said she would be. However, when I told her that I’d booked it she completely freaked out saying that I was entitled and selfish for not taking her as well. 

I’ve tried to explain to her that this is a very personal event for me and my daughter but she doesn’t seem to listen and keeps on telling me to book her tickets as well, I’ve talked to my daughter about it and she’s said she would rather it be just us two.

Was I wrong for not booking tickets for my gf? Should I book her tickets as well?

Edit: To clarify, I have already taken them both on holiday this year and I’m not just using all my pto on my daughter.",AmItheAsshole
-Friend bought $200 dollar tickets with out asking me and send me a apple pay request.,"So my friend loves this one artist who released concert dates, I like the artist but am not in love with their music. Friend decided to send me an apple pay request for 200 dollars and they didn’t even tell me they were buying tickets, it’s so expensive because it includes the meet and greet too. I told them to resell it because I don’t wanna drop that much on a meet and greet when I really don’t care for that part. Am I the asshole? Lol",AmItheAsshole
 for slowly not supporting my friend with the guy she likes and for being upset at her that she's meeting him today? ,"
Im f16, and my friend, Shelle f17 has this person. Let's name him J. In our place we call her relationship with this person MU or when u have mutual understanding of each other's feelings, but you're not ready to put a label on it, which i was okay with the first time. We have this other friend, Yuri f17, she was not so supportive. 

Yuri isn't so supportive of Shelle and J because J is from a school where she knows red flags come from. I don't generalize with her because that's not very nice. I kind of support the idea of Shelle with J because J seems nice, by the way he texts her (Shelle shows me) 

Btw Shelle met J, through valorant, and has been talking to for more or less 2 months. 

But lately Shelle has been acting weird because she seems to be moving too fast into this relationship. They barely know each other and they're already throwing i love yous at each other. Weird but not my business. (again, she shows me her chats) 

The problem is, Shelle isn't allowed to have a boyfriend yet, her mom doesn't know anything about this. her chance at having a boyfriend happens when she's 18, and this is just in 4 months. Last week she invited J to our school, he stayed for a few but Shelle made him go home since we had volleyball training at the time. Okay, nice, she's meeting him at places that is safe.

But today is May 1st in the country we live in, we don't have classes since it's Labor Day. Shelle decides to meet up with J at the place he lives. Without her mother knowing. She asked for permission by using her other friends as an excuse. Yuri and I thought this was getting out of hand and we flooded Shelle with messages as to why we thought this was wrong on so many levels.

In the place we live its not safe to go out by you're especially if you're a young girl. I just think it's not nice that she had to draw her other friends into her situation, because if something bad happens to her or if her mom looks for her, she's gonna look for Shelle at her friends' place. If Shelle's mom finds out she's not at any of her friends' places, who knows what could happen. It's not safe either. They could be blamed if something happens to Shelle. 

I'm just trying to look out for my friend because she tends to give her all when she loves someone, this is very unhealthy and I've tried talking to her about it. Yuri and I have been talking to her about all of this and yet she never listens to us and I'm starting to lose my support for her, I'm very upset at her too, so is Yuri. Am I the asshole? Are we the assholes?

",AmItheAsshole
" for ""grounding"" my adult sister?","I (25F) live in a three bedroom apartment with my fiancé (27M). We have a six month old son.

My younger sister Mia (fake name; 20F) recently started attending a university that's closer to where I live than both my parents' places. Because she needs to get to class early in the morning, my fiancé and I allowed her to move into our spare bedroom. She's been living with us since January.

There's a set of rules I've been having Mia follow since she moved in, mostly to make sure everyone can live peacefully. One of the most important rules concerns arriving after my son's bedtime (usually between 19h and 20h). Mia is allowed to come home however late she wants, as long as she doesn't make too much noise.

The door to the apartment has an electronic keypad lock, and the one we use also has a normal lock under it. Everyone has a copy of the key, but we all prefer typing in the password. However, the keypad is very noisy, and my son's nursery isn't far from the door. Every time the keypad is used after I've put the baby to sleep, he wakes up.

So naturally, the rule about getting home late includes not using the keypad. Everyone, including Mia, has known about this since day one.

At first, we had no problems. But now that Mia has gotten used to college life, she's been going out at night frequently. This past month, she has arrived home after midnight every Friday and Saturday night. She always forgets the ""don't make too much noise"" rule, and she has, on multiple occasions, used the keypad. My son wakes up crying every. Damn. Time.

I'd sit her down and remind her of the rule whenever this happened, but she'd continue to do it. My fiancé and I got tired of putting our baby back to sleep because of that, so I changed the password and told Mia she was no longer allowed to use the keypad. She agreed, and promised to try to make less noise.

On Friday night this week, Mia went out with her friends. She came home very drunk at 4AM, and forgot that I'd changed the password. Not only did she use the keypad, she also got the password wrong so many times that she triggered an alarm.

I was furious. Not only did my baby wake up crying, but I also got complaints from my neighbors.

The next morning, I told Mia that I'm establishing a curfew: while living with me, she needs to be home by 20h. She won't be allowed to go out at night for the rest of the semester.

Mia put up a fight, saying I have no right to ""ground"" her **(EDIT: I never used that word)** like this or dictate what she does with her free time, but I held my ground. I told her she'll be free to do as she pleases when she has her own place and raises her own family. While living with mine, she has to do as I say.

She told our parents about this. Our mother and stepfather are both on my side; our father is on Mia's. He's saying I'm not her mother, and I have no right to treat her like a child. He also thinks it's unfair to do this to her over a drunken mistake.

AITA?

&amp;#x200B;

EDIT: No, I can't mute the keypad.",AmItheAsshole
 for complaining about my teachers' behavior and expectations towards my class,"I (M19) am a student of a preparatory class. A few days ago, I learned that one of my teachers openly blamed me for ruining the teacher/student relationships of this year's promo.

With 2 other colleagues they taught 3 of the most important classes in the whole preparatory process, the ones that are detrimental to accessing the higher level education almost everybody in the group sought when entering the structure.

I have had school issues in the past, I went to a psychiatric hospital for dangerous behavior and was put on antidepressants. I spent a year recovering and this was my first year studying post-graduation.

In the first weeks of classes, I began viewing  some of these teachers' behaviors in class as innapropriate for an educational structure. They'd express their desire to spend time with students beyond school time, citing past year's groups' practices (parties being thrown with them) as examples, blaming us for an apparent ""lack of cooperation and social skills""

They also started to take very personally any absence, bad grade, question someone had in class, while consistently comparing us to the class that came before, to the point where every class started with the mandatory 15 minutes of throwbacks to a more ""social time"".

As I was concerned with this, and knew the whole class was pretty distraught by these expectations being thrown at us every time, I started complaining publicly during class, regularly and sometimes extensively about their practices and the content of their lessons (which was a mistake and probably reassured them into the belief I was being a smart-ass). I was not the only one of our little group (16 students) to do this but I was the most frequent.

Eventually, they all started making remarks about my own behavior. In front of the class AND after. One teacher told me he thought I was a ""narcissistic asshole"", another one said that every teacher in the school thought I was a jackass, in front of the whole class. A little portion of the class (2 people) started to be annoyed by my bickering even though we shared those opinions and feelings.

One of the teachers is a local celebrity in this rural town, we learned thru old students and other people that he was dumped by his wife for having a relationship with a student (18F, possibly less). We even met the previous class and saw how they treated the teachers, basically worshipping them and being on a first name basis.

The mood went downhill from there, as the teachers refused to help students that struggled in their classes and even threatened to sabotage our applications to the promised following studies if we continued this ""lack of respect"". At the end of the year, attendance rates dropped, the teachers' rants went longer and longer.

Now it's been a few weeks and I can't help but think that if I did not start that complaining streak, the mood and the general attitude of the teachers may have just stagnated or dissipated into acceptable behaviors.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to be alone with my dog the day she is put to sleep?,"Hi. My (25F) dog (18F) is as you can tell, very old. The doctor believes she may have another tumor, but in her brain this time, as she's lost a lot of cognitive fiction. She's always sleeping and very confused and just isn't..happy anymore.
Well, I decided it was most likely time, and I've made the gut wrenching decision to have her put to sleep. I hate watching her fall over and hit her head multiple times a day.

Where I may be ta is because my uncle, I'll call him Gav, previously said he would be happy to help pay for costs. The total for the full service will come to $700, so I reached out to ask if he was still willing to help. I told him that I chose an at home service where my dog can be at home with me, and that I would like to go through the process alone. (I plan to have a see you later party, beforehand.) And explained that if he couldn't, that was completely okay.

Gav proceeded to say the following;
""That is selfish. And death is as hard as we make it. What you need to keep in mind regardless of your emotions that initially she was brought in as a family member not as yours. And if you can't see past that then that is your issue. Everyone else has just as much right as you.""

It hurt to be called selfish for my decision, but I admit that maybe it is. However, being surrounded by people while my baby girl dies in my arms would no doubt give me a meltdown.

To clarify on some things, my dog was given to ME as a gift when I was 7 years old by my late grandmother. She did become to be known as the family dog, but ultimately she is mine. Gav, even on multiple occasions told me that she was not his dog, that he would not take care of her and that she was my responsibility not his, after my grandmother's passed away. Which I understood and after my great grandmother passed away in 2017, I became her soul caretaker. (She used to feed her in the morning and I would feed her at night ect. Gav lived with us and i continued to live with him after until i moved out with my dog). I was okay with this because she's my baby girl.

Is she only the family dog to him when she's dying and not when it came to feeding her? Letting her outside? I don't know. Maybe I'm too absorbed in my own grief. So Aita?
",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to have my friend  as my bridesmaid when my partner hates them?,"For context, I 22ftm, am getting married to my partner, let's call them Denis, 22ftm, 2026. I am really close to this friend, for story sake let's just call her Yvenne. Now I am extremely close to this friend for the following reasons.

I moved to this place from across the country to live with my partner. I literally knew no one here besides my partner. I met Yvennes Boyfriend at this job and we hit it off. I met Yvennes shortly after. Me and Yvenne became very close friends. I'm talking, we call every day, and we hang out almost every week. We talk about everything and anything together. She also understands me more than most because we both share a disability.

So within this past year, Denis and Yvenne have not been getting along. Yvenne has been trying to wedge themself into me and Denis' relationship and has made me insecure about wether or not my partner is cheating on me. My partner does have mental illness, and has split on her a few times.

I have had multiple conversations with Yvenne at this point about how she treets my fiancee. And how is like for her to communicate with my partner. However both sides just seem disinterested.

I only have three friends here. Yvenne, her boyfriend, and then another friend from a different work place.

Now. I want Yvenne to be my bridesmaid. I also want her to be involved in the wedding planning, however... I feel like a jerk, because my partner doesn't even want to talk to Yvenne or text them. They have also told me that they don't want her over at our house. 

I truly don't know what to do at this point, and I'm left asking myself. Am I the asshole for inviting my friend to our wedding as a bridesmaid, if my fiancee doesn't like them?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my parents they can't make me invite friends over?,"I (16m) don't invite my friends over to my house anymore. It's been just over a year and my parents are only really noticing that I just outright stopped. The reason for me stopping is my younger sister (12f). She's on the spectrum and talks a lot. You can't have a conversation with her, she doesn't do well with that and her social skills are really bad, you just have to listen. But she can talk for hours without stopping and her special interests are always her topic. It's too much to listen to non-stop but stopping her makes her upset. She would come into my room or into the game room when I had friends over and talk. It meant we couldn't talk to each other without talking over her and it bored them and made them uncomfortable because they witnessed how upset she'd get when I asked her gently to stop talking or tried changing the subject and told her we needed to talk about other stuff.

My parents typically pawn my sister off on me when they grow tired of listening to her talk. They expect me to deal with it. But the older I get the less patience I have to listen like that for so long. So they liked when I had friends over because it was more people to listen to my sister. Now that my friends no longer come over they're annoyed that she talks more to them because I don't spend as much time at home.

On Saturday my parents asked why I never bring my friends over anymore and I told them we do other stuff now that we can't do at home. They said it was odd that it happened so abruptly and I shrugged. They told me I should invite my friends over some more. I told them I didn't want to and they pressed why. I told them it didn't matter and they said it did because it was more people for my sister to socialize with, sorta. I told them it wasn't up to my friends to listen to my sister for hours at a time so they (my parents) could get a break. My parents told me I will invite them over. I said they can't make me invite friends over. My parents told me of course they can and I should be less rude to them. They also told me it's cruel to deny my sister this.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to wear my sister's (29) clothes?,"I (18F) was about to clean my room yesterday with the vacuum cleaner, so when I went to search where it were at, I ended up finding 2 whole sacks full of old clothing to donate that weren't touched since 1-2y ago. There were some recent, but 3 to 4 pieces only. I went to give a look, since I saw a cute white tank top and, assuming my mom wouldn't ever use a piece like that, I thought it was once my sister's. I looked at myself in the mirror and I really liked it, and I usually don't think light colors fit me.

I went to tell my mom about it and she said I could give a look into the whole sack, since they were very old and my sister didn't  miss it, so I began to wear some of the ""old"" clothes I liked. I took some to my room and me and my mom had a fear in common: last time my sister gave me her clothings in hand, were clothing with holes that would be perfect for me to wear at home, perfectly fine with it. Whoever, the time before that, when she saw me using her clothes that she gave me in hand aswell, she shouted to my mom that I had stolen her clothes and made me take everything out of my body that ""was hers"" in the corridor of my home. Even though my mom knew she had gave me the clothes, I had retrieved everything that was hers that day. My mother told me she even have threw her clothes in the trash recently, not considering to donate, so I couldn't have it, but since the second time it turned out differently, I thought she wouldn't mind.

My sister came home after work and my mom told her, and she is now pissed off. She said I'm going to rob her style from her and that I need new clothes (even though her clothes aren't old), that will not fit her style, when I actually wouldn't like to wear her style at all. Idk how I could describe, but I like to wear ""cute"" clothes covering most of my body, with no skirt or dresses whatsoever, while hers is more like dresses and tight clothes.

She begin to fight (verbally, but quiet) with my mom and went to her room, mad at me. My mother said that she mentioned something about me being skinnier than her and that ""people will compare our bodies"". My mother asked ""who will?"" and she got even angrier. She is the only one that begin conversations about my body ever, though. So, I'm confused, because not some years ago she was trying to pick some of my jackets because ""you don't use it, so I will, it's mine"". My mother said that it is better to give up on my clothes and that we will buy more, but I want the same style as the clothes my sister got rid of, since is, in fact, my style, but she doesn't want to see me ever with clothes looking even like that no

(btw sorry if my grammar sucks)",AmItheAsshole
 for not showing interest when my girl shows me success of her guy friends,I (25M) and my girlfriend (25F) are in a relationship for 5 years. We both were in college and are now working in corporate in different companies. My girl is pretty obsessed with her job and she always keeps talking about how someone else has got a higher package or is earning well in some other field. We both are doing pretty well with our career but she is always obsessed of doing something big. Whenever her colleagues or any male friend ( she mostly has male friends from work only) gets a better job or does something better she always act like it affected her a lot. She is also trying to change jobs but isn't getting much opportunities. She will always try to discuss this with me and to me she sounds somewhat jealous. I try to avoid this conversation because I don't want to be in any kind of pressure. I am slowly working on my career and I don't want to be distracted with what other are doing in their life specially her male friends. But whenever I try to avoid this conversation she becomes mad and starts a fight with me. She will blame me because she wants to discuss how her male friends are earning so well and I don't want to discuss this. ( It's not like I am not earning well but I have pretty stable boring job). AITA for avoiding this discussion and telling her that she should not overhype this.,AmItheAsshole
 for prioritising sleep?,"I (23) am in a group project for a capstone university course. i have 3 other groupmates, ill call them kate, brian, and james (all around my age).

We have our final presentation for the semester tomorrow, and we are set to practice tonight over voice call. Kate has just asked about an hour ago if we can begin practicing at 8:00pm (it is almost 7pm now). 

I said that that was fine, but I need to get off at 9-9:30 so i can get enough sleep.  I want to be well rested for the presentation and I also have an 8am class tomorrow. kate and james did not like that… and said that they also have 8ams to attend, and insinuated that i should be staying up like they do. 
brian hasnt said anything yet.

very important info: i have two sleep disorders: sleep apnea and another that is either hypersomnia or narcolepsy (my dr hasnt decided which of those it is yet.) having good sleep hygiene is PARAMOUNT to my functioning. I also use mobility aids because of my fatigue and muscle weakness. 

over the last semester, ive been sacrificing sleep for schoolwork. this has made me go from using my cane about 5-6 days per week to using a rollator (a walker with wheels) every single day. ive had more episodes of collapse too. 

BUT i feel like i may be TA because this is a REALLY IMPORTANT presentation. also, ive been sacrificing sleep throughout this whole semester, so they are used to me staying up later with them (till 11-12). so its probably frustrating that im switching up on them right at the end of the semester. also i may be TA because ive had to miss about 4-5 meetings this semester due to disability related things. (we meet about 2-3x/wk)

am i the asshole? how do i navigate this situation??

EDIT: spelling
EDIT: more relevant info i forgot to add: 
I will be working with this same group for another year, so Its important to keep a good working relationship.",AmItheAsshole
", when my mother (and sometimes my father)still try and control what i (23M) buy and what i do for work which always results in my mother threatening to make me homeless and arguing with me. Who is in the wrong?","Now this is complicated but let me explain. I am a 23 year old Male from Canada and I live with my mother cause of the housing crisis. For context what i buy is not anything illegal obviously i cant even drink and I've never done drugs or anything of the sort, but for some reason every single time i mention my job (i do have one and i am paying my bills perfectly fine), or the things I'm exited that I'm buying, or really anything about my life, it results in my parents screaming at me (particularly my mother) about how i need to change my job, or i need to not like the things i like cause i need to be ""an adult"". It has gotten so bad that my parents once almost stranded me halfway across the country with no way home because i had enough money and told them i was going to see my boyfriend who lived 6 hours away at the time(i was 21). They use the excuse that ""i need to act like an adult and help around the house"" WHICH I COMPLETELY UNDERSTAND and I would totally help out around the house, however there is one issue, they never tell me what they want done and they never ASK me to do anything, they just assume i know what to do and when the time comes they yell at me for not doing something I never even agreed to or never even knew i was going to do. To me it seems like they are treating me like a child and i want to be able to live my time here in peace and be able to mind my business for one day without being yelled at. Am i in the wrong for assuming this behavior from them is somewhat abusive and manipulative? I do not believe they deserve immunity because they are my parents, however I would love advice because i dont know what to say to them anymore without sounding mean.",AmItheAsshole
 for confronting my neighbors about their dog repeatedly urinating on my property?,"I live in an apartment complex, and my neighbors upstairs have a dog that has been a consistent problem (they have never cleaned the urine up, and the stars are cement I believe, so it would stay there for a whole day and now the stairs are all stained). This dog frequently urinates in our shared stairwell and has even urinated on packages left at my doorstep. Recently, an Amazon package of mine was damaged due to this.

Fed up, I confronted my neighbors. I was surprised to learn that the dog's owner is a dog trainer at a company with stellar reviews, which seems ironic given the situation. During our conversation, they got upset, accusing me of exaggerating by saying it happens ""all the time"" (though it does). I even told them I had videos of their dog doing it in front of my door. They even sarcastically apologized for the package incident. I ended up telling them to at least clean up after their dog and to notify me if an accident happens so I don't step in a puddle of urine right outside my door.  I carry a lot of groceries up the stairs and have had to maneuver around the tiny stairwell to not slip on it. I kept reiterating that ""it is really, really gross and it's a biohazard"". My dog has almost stepped on it, and since I have a camera, I saw my other neighbor next to me have to clean it up with water. The neighbor with the dog kept trying to gaslight me, by saying ""he never does that with me"", which was true because I noticed in our ring camera that it's usually with his girlfriend that the dog constantly urinates next to our door and stairwell.

AITA for how confronting them about their dog's behavior? I tried letting the office of our APT know but they just send generic emails reminding residents to clean up after their dogs.",AmItheAsshole
 for not following the feeding schedule for the baby?,"My husband (M29) and I (F29) had a baby three months ago, and she has been very happy and bouncy up until this point. She was doing so well and sleeping through the night, and so her doctor recommended that we put her on a schedule for her naps and meals.

The schedule was that she would nap, eat as soon as she woke up, and the have two hours of play before going back down. Unfortunately our previously very happy baby absolutely hated this, but we persevered thinking a) this was following advice from the doctor, and b) it would help to have the baby on a routine for when I go back to work.

Unfortunately, the baby was right. The schedule has screwed up my milk supply and she has started losing weight. Now I have had to go on medication to increase supply and we are needing to supplement with formula. To say I was upset with the doctor is an understatement. I only did all this on his advice! 

Yesterday was the first day since learning of her weight loss, and I was feeding the baby on demand and topping up with formula. However, the argument comes in that my husband believes we should still be sticking to the same routine but now just supplementing. He is saying that her going off the routine will screw up our lives and we will go back to ""having the baby in charge.""

I said that I would rather feed the baby when she shows hunger cues instead of keeping her on something we know has been doing her harm. My husband says that he will leave me alone with this decision but I shouldn't come running to him when I can't get anything done. He also said if I choose to do this, he will not help me at all when I return to work as the schedule was put in place to assist in that transition.

I feel like an AH, I don't want to be fighting with my husband but I also don't want the weight problem to continue. He says he will go back to helping me if I feed on a schedule and just add to her feeds with formula to make sure she is full.",AmItheAsshole
 if I don’t invite my grandparents to my wedding,"I’m having a small, 40 person wedding and I’m inviting my parents, select aunts/uncles, siblings and their kids, some friends and my grandparents.. minus 1. 

This grandparent would be the only “close” family not invited but I don’t talk to him. This is my mom’s dad and his wife. My step grandma is rude and nobody likes her. And my grandpa is awkward and barely speaks. Neither have made an effort to be in my life since I was like 10. We are friends on Facebook and that’s as far as it goes really. 

The relationships with everyone else invited are genuine and enjoyable people I’d want at my wedding. I don’t think it’s fair that I’m being asked to pay $100+ on their meals when I don’t want them to be there, not to mention I have a very small and tight budget. 

My mom says my grandpa will be heartbroken and will never get over this and how devastated he will be if he’s not invited. My mom is also making me feel guilty for not reaching out to HIM to maintain a relationship either. 

AITA for not wanting to invite my grandpa to my wedding? ",AmItheAsshole
", Am I the asshole? Puppy Edition-Roommates ","This past weekend I went on a trip and my housemates stayed watching my puppy. They know that he is somewhat notorious for chewing things, well being a puppy and all, but that being said, apparently they left a collectible hat on top of the couch unattended. How it happened, I come back home to find a hat on my stairs and ask “hey what’s *inserts name* hat doing on my stairs?” With the reply “oh, look at the back of it” and my immediate response was “oh no, why is it on my stairs though? Am I supposed to pay for it?” And they replied “Well it was your dog, and it was only on the couch for 3 seconds”. Now in my mind, I’m just thinking a bunch of things like for example, why didn’t they text me when it happened, or how could it have only been 3 seconds with the whole back end chewed off, and lastly, I wasn’t even here to watch him! I feel like ultimately, it was their responsibility, as they were the people at home, to keep an eye on their things. Why should I have to pay for it? That’s like me watching their dog, and leaving all of my kids toys and my things out and about, and then demanding they pay for damages for my negligence. I don’t know, maybe I would’ve offered to buy him a new hat, if he hadn’t just left it on my stairs (imo that was pretty passive aggressive, or non-communicative) and told me at the time of it happening. I don’t know, maybe I’m just an ass, but if it was the other way around, I’d just be like fuck, my hat! And moved on, cause I’m the one responsible for the dog when they’re not home. Wdyt? 


EDIT UPDATE: I’m the asshole, must’ve been raised by wolves lol ",AmItheAsshole
 if I got my neighbors car towed?,"I’m about to make a decision that I know will piss someone off but frankly I can’t help but think they’ve done it to themselves. 

I live in a townhome/apartment complex. I’m in the townhome side and we have assigned parking. They had implemented towing just a few months ago im assuming because we have (at least I personally think and this just a thought) obnoxious neighbors. They would take other peoples parking spaces and two of the neighbors on the otherside of them resorted to spray painting their apartment letters on the their spaces. 

It wasnt explicitly enforced at first but that’s cause everyone I lived next to had the common courtesy to only use the 2 spaces given to them so no one’s ever had a problem but some of these new neighbors getting on peoples nerves so much so that i think enough peopled called to complain and they had no choice but to renforce assigned parking 


.. i was gonna be “nice” and leave a note but they fucking know. They can read, I hope so at least. they’re completely aware of assigned parking. there have been several days the parking lot would be dead, completely empty and I get a ring notification and they still find a way to park in front of my door. 

There have been times we’d pull in on opposite directions and they’d race me to my front door nearly fucked up their car on the speed bumps trying to park before me, the worst part is im giving them my extra space because i dont need it but they keep parking in front of my door even if they have space in front of their place and its annoying the hell out of me. 

They’ve also received an email and letter just like everyone else in the neighborhood that towing is enforced and if they have visitors to direct them to overflow parking across the street.

 Other people have caught on but for some reason they have not. My wife and I have stepped out to get food and they’re parked in front of our door. My wife said give ‘em an hour if they don’t move we’ll call. I’ve given them an extra thirty minutes and they have not moved. Not only have they not moved. 

It’s already frustrating that they blast music so loud that it makes our walls shake at least let us park in front of our fucking door. I like having easy access to my home and my ring camera is pointed directly towards that parking space for a reason. This also causes me to park in someone else’s spot and then they park in someone else’s spot and it just becomes a thing. 

So now I’m bout to call the tow company  because they have signs plastered everywhere telling everyone who drives in that overnight towing it enforced they’ve sent emails telling you about the towing so don’t act surprised when you come out and your car is gone.

what I don’t understand is why put yourself in this position we’re you could get your car towed? Does that make any sense? But I’m prepared to be the ass if needed because why tf do y’all keep doing this.",AmItheAsshole
 for arguing with my friend and making him mad?,Basically the other day me and my best friend got into a discussion on what classified as an afro (I’m black he’s white). Basically he was saying that it had to cover the whole head in a circular shape to be classified as an afro but I was saying that while that’s true theres different ways it can be trimmed and stuff- it doesn’t need to be in that exact way or lengh to be considered an afro lol. I know it’s a silly discussion and that’s what I thought at the time but he genuinely got extremely upset and very heated with me saying that I wasn’t listening to his perspective whatsoever and that I just kept repeating the same thing-but he just kept yelling “i’m right and your wrong” and I wasn’t even entirely disagreeing with him I was just stating my point. This all stemmed from me saying that it’s weird how Bob Ross’s hair is considered an “afro” just because of the shape- because he’s white lol and I wasn’t saying that white people can’t have afro hair I just thought it was weird but it turned into a whole heated argument where I made my friend upset because I couldn’t explain in detail why I thought it was strange and I didn’t think I needed to because I didn’t think this is discussion would make him angry because we were genuinely laughing about it at first- and that’s what I feel awful about. Even when he was visibly pissed off I started jokingly asking him “why are you getting mad” rather than just ending the discussion right there.,AmItheAsshole
 for not selling my friend a piece of machinery?,"# WIBTA for not selling something I said I would?

Hi all - want to gather some thoughts since I am on the fence about it.

My friend and I both share a specific hobby that the machinery required is expensive. My friend who has a small business like me currently does not have this piece of machinery. I have one, but it is older and is starting to act up.

While browsing facebook, I came across a brand new machine for about half off. A whopping deal. I sent it to my friend and we geeked out for it and he went on about how he wished he could afford it. I offered to let him pay me back for it, and I went ahead and picked it up in his truck. I learned after the fact that it would take him about a year/24 months to pay this off.

Well, ever since I picked this up my life has went sideways. I have unexpected equine vet bills, I blew a head gasket on my car, and finances tightened up real quick. I wasn't in a position to rush before, but now I am needing to buy another car (or fix mine) and I owe multiple thousands to the equine vet.

I was just going to silently struggle since i do like to uphold my word, until he became super cynical one day about my work when I was grieving about my friends death that morning. I also asked if i could use a accessory on my machine and he got an attitude with me. This irked me to the point where now I am wanting to consider selling the new machine for market value (i already have a offer) and flipping a profit on it so i don't have to take out a personal loan. I also want to add that I wasnt going to charge him interest on the loan, or above what i paid for it. There is no contract yet.

WIBTA if I sold the machine for market value to recoup my costs?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom it’s creepy to take pictures of strangers?,"(Throwaway because my main has identifying info on it.)

The other day, my (28F) mom (62F) told me that while she was at the park near our local library, she took pictures and videos of two men playing basketball with a little boy. I got upset with her invading their privacy, and told her how inappropriate and creepy it was to do that, especially to the boy, without their knowledge or consent. She also told me there were girls at the park who yelled at her not to film them, but she swore to me that she wasn’t filming the girls, but rather the sun through the trees at that time. (I trust her on that part.)

She argued that since they were in public, she could do what she wanted, and since cameras are everywhere, people should just expect to be filmed in public. I told her that it’s not okay to think that being in public is consent to being on some stranger’s camera roll, even IF intentions are pure. (Impact &gt; intent.) Also, security cameras are there for protection (and have their OWN harmful surveillance issues), whereas actively filming specific people (especially a minor) in public is NOT for safety.

We both yelled at each other in the argument, and I ended it by saying that we would HAVE to discuss it when we both had time to cool down.

Unfortunately, we never got to have the calm discussion, because today, she told me she had filmed the people who were working on our next door neighbor’s roof (but “don’t worry, because they didn’t film (HER)”).

Once again, I was livid with her thinking it’s okay to film strangers doing a JOB on PRIVATE property. She and I are also both white women, and the workers on the roof were not white, which makes me feel another layer of discomfort at her filming them.

I asked her how she’d feel if strangers did that to me at work, but she insisted it was “different because (I’m) a woman”. I told her that gender doesn’t matter in this situation at all, because everyone has a right to privacy, and it’s our moral obligation to not invade it just because someone dared to be in our line of sight.

After a while of yelling back and forth, I could tell she still had no regrets, and saw me as wrong/overreacting. Knowing I was getting nowhere, I told her to give me her phone. She, of course, said no, so I tried to grab her phone from on her bed, to delete the videos and pictures she took of the strangers. She laughed AT me as I grabbed for it, but then ended up getting a leg cramp in the process of trying to keep me away from her phone.

I backed off immediately bc I did NOT want to hurt her, stood there as her pain subsided, and then told her none of this was funny, and that she’s ruining our (close) relationship dying on this hill, as we almost never fight, so she needed to know I was deadly serious. Then I left her room, slamming the door behind me.

AITA for telling her how creepy, violating, and inappropriate her actions are? And AITA for trying to get those pictures and videos off of her phone?

Thanks.",AmItheAsshole
 For Saying No To My Dad,"Ok so I'm a 17m living with my 36F Mom my dad only joined the picture recently and hasn't really been there anyways. I'm going to star farther back so bare with me. About 2 years ago I got Facebook and my dad texted me it was hard to belive honestly. 
The drama really started when we took a trip to Denver to just get out of town and I wanted to see my dad and other side of the family so I did but my mom told me only to 5. At the time my grandma had a health condition so for I know it could've been the last time I saw her. We were at a restraunt when my mom told me it was time to go. They hadn't even brought out the food yet but eventually I had to go. We got into a fight I, I admit she was right about a few things. She said that she gave me the time limit and that they had extended it 2 hours and that the trip wasn't about them. My mom was using my cousins car so she said something about that to. 
About a year later I get my license and the need for me to get a car is there. We tried to just get a normal car and my mom and dad couldent come to an agreement. Eventually my dad wanted to just give me the money. but the only bank I had was with my mom and my dad dosnt trust my mom with the money. So I made I single account with just me on it after that he wanted me to take a picture of a check to send to him but for some reason wells fargo won't let you do that. So then he asked for my routing account and bank number which my mom denied saying he could be trying to scam me or identity theft. And they started fighting over this. So I sent my dad this: 
I'm sorry ill be straight with you my mom is concerned that with my routing and acc that you could be trying to scam or something. Man I don't want to have to do this where there is a fight so I'm just going to find a diffrent way. The 3k isn't worth all that. Do let's just not to avoid possible conflict in the future. Sorry it didn't work 
He got mad about that and my mom is mad at me for apologizing so AITA
Is there a person reading this if you don't like it tell me rq so ik where to fix",AmItheAsshole
 for finally telling my parents the way they've been treating me lately isn't okay?,"Me (23M) live with my siblings (23F and 20M) and my parents (55M and 53F). My dad is very old-fashioned and set in his ways and my mum is obsessed with dogs, especially agility training as part of a business she runs.

&amp;#x200B;

I recently found out that I was quite severely ill with a bowel condition that's made me anaemic and in constant pain and discomfort. You would think my mum and dad would show me some sympathy, and in fairness my mother has, but my dad is continuing to treat me less like his son and more like his servant.

&amp;#x200B;

If my dad (55M) wants coffee, I (23M) have to make it for him. Not because he's incapable of it, but the fact that he's too lazy to get up out of his chair and away from FBI: International to do it himself. He also regularly borrows money from me, usually to give to my brother (20M) for his insurance or legal fees due to an ongoing dispute. Dad always promises to pay me back, but he never actually does and continues making empty promises.

&amp;#x200B;

Meanwhile, my mother (53F) spends way more time with the dogs or some game on her tablet than she does with me. If I ever try to talk to her about anything remotely important, she shuts me down immediately and tells me to stop talking so she can focus on her game. I feel like they're pushing me away ever since this issue first appeared, not wanting to bother with it and not taking it seriously at all. by prioritising trivial matters over their own son's wellbeing.

&amp;#x200B;

It all came to a head this morning when I (23M) finally told them that the way they are treating me is not okay and that Dad (55M) needs to stop being so demanding and reliant on me to do every menial task for him when he's more than capable of it himself. I also told my mother (53F) that I feel like I'm losing her because she's prioritising her animals and the games on her tablet over her own son and constantly fighting with Dad (55M) over anything and everything.   


They didn't really have a lot to say in response, but am I the asshole for finally telling them to treat me with a little bit more respect? Whenever I speak to Dad (55M) about treating me like I'm his son and not his servant, he simply responds with ""Earn it"" despite me doing everything he asks me to do every single day!  


So, am I the asshole here for finally telling them I've had enough of the way they've treated me these last few months?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my long term partner that she should have asked me before inviting her family on a trip I planned for my family?,"AITA for telling my partner she should have asked me before inviting family on a trip I planned for my family?

In 2022, I began planning a trip for my immediate family to go to the 2025 Expo in Osaka. I intended to pay for my whole family. The purpose of the trip was to show my family how I travel and live and bring them a bit more into my life. Previously, my family largely stuck to Disney so my travel style and destinations of choice are just very different to what they’re used to. 

Fast forward to yesterday, my partner (invited of course) mentions her aunt and cousin want to go and invited them. I waited to today and told her that I would have appreciated if she talked to me about it first. 

She said she did not understand why it would be family only. Said she is not family so she doesn’t want to go. Said “I’ll be sure to ask you for permission in the future.”

I’ve been trying to express to her that this not a slight on her but this was always immediate family and partners only. It was a _____[insert my last name] family trip. 

I think she might think I’m an asshole for excluding her family and being controlling. But I don’t see it that way. It’s been in the works for years and never have we discussed inviting anyone. My family has never met her family and I don’t think the first time meeting overseas is appropriate. I also don’t want to have her time torn between two groups of people. That’s not at all the kind of time I was hoping for and it’s been an issue in the past. (Inviting her friend group to an outing with my friend group and led to two very different groups trying to merge but failing).

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for planning to spend my birthday with friends?,"It's my birthday next month and for the last 2 years since I have been with my partner, we have gone away for the day for my birthday. It has never been on the actual birthday since we've been at work but it's been the weekend after.

  
This time my birthday is the Friday and me and my gf have been looking at a nearby city to go to for the day on the Saturday but nothing has actually been planned yet.

  
This morning a friend from university that I have not seen in a while made a group chat with a group of 5 of us from university who haven't had a chance to catch up in over a year and a half. They were talking about meeting up for the weekend next month and the only weekend that everyone was free was my birthday weekend.

  
Every other weekend of the month at least 3 of us couldn't make it. I mentioned to my girlfriend the possibility of us going away for the day either the weekend before or the weekend after the original weekend we looked at since both of us were also free on those weekends and I explained why.

  
She said I was being unfair and that I'd rather spend my birthday with friends. I pointed out that wasn't the case and it was the only weekend we could all meet up and I didn't know when I'd get the chance to see them again. I mentioned that we weren't doing anything on my actual birthday anyway so it should be fine doing a different weekend.

  
She just said I was prioritising seeing friends over spending my birthday with her but I just see it as, the plans I have with my gf we can do another weekend whereas the plans with my friends can only be done on this weekend.

  
AITA for planning to spend my birthday weekend with friends?",AmItheAsshole
 for me (M 33) not wanting to pay for my partner (F 31) in the trip we plan?,"Me and my girlfriend met about 8 months ago, been exclusive since 5 months, and are in a relationship since 2,5 months. I told her about my vision to go travelling, but she was upset for not being included in those plans. I didn't include her in my plans because she has been living of wellfare money and only has enough to pay for her rent, so she wouldnt have enough to pay for anything at all. She got hurt for me not including her in the plans, and I understand that.  
We've been together for a couple of months now and I pay 90% of the time I'd say. But it doesn't feel healthy to me. She is currently unemployed for over a year, but has been in a senior role before. She doesn't take on a lower paid role, because she is also in debt because of het current financial status and for filing a lawsuit against her previous employer that she lost.  
I feel like I'm in such a dilemma, because I would love her to join on this trip, but honestly I want to travel for at least 6 months and I only have enough to pay for myself. Also I feel like its just weird to financially carry someone right away when starting a relationship, that just doesn't sit well with me.  
I asked her to take on a temporary job to save for our trip, but she is afraid of not getting wellfare money after the trip. Her pov seems to be that I should carry her financially, but I feel so uncomfortable with it now. I told her that the moment we move in together, that changes the situation, but right now I view my money as mine and hers as hers, but I am willing to give/share (as I am doing for the last couple of months, 90% on me).

WIBTA for telling her that I will not pay for her trip?



  
REACTION: Thanks for the replies everyone! I see mostly NTA, but its hard, cause I love her and I want to go on this trip, but also being away for at least 6 months sucks for the other person in a relationship. I think I have to make some sacrifices.",AmItheAsshole
 if I skipped my cousin's wedding to go to a friend's?,"Love listening to reddit stories. Thought I'd try posting for the first time. I'm nervous but looking forward to honest opinions. 
My cousin is getting married on a Friday and a friend who I'm a bridesmaid for is getting married the Saturday after. The locations are 2 hours apart. I have kids and a husband. We were all invited to my friend's wedding and all festivities but only my husband and I were invited to my cousin's wedding. Not only were only my husband and I invited but we were only invited to the reception/party but not the actual wedding ceremony. In order to go to my cousin's wedding party I'd have to skip my friend's rehearsal dinner (usually a bridal party obligation) which is the Friday (cousin's wedding day). I'd also have to rush in the morning or that night doing a 2hr drive to my friend's wedding and I'd need to get a babysitter. I am BFing my baby and the cousins party has no cell service. I'd have assume the BFing baby didn't get hungry in order to attend or pump at the party or leave when I think he might be hungry. I'm feeling guilty because the family of this cousin paid for my wedding venue as my wedding gift (it was where everyone also stayed overnight). I love my cousin very much and I'm not upset we are only invited to the party. I'd love to see her get married because I care about her very much but it is her wedding, her choice. Would I be the AH if I got her a gift but didn't go to her wedding and instead spent the weekend attending my friend's wedding festivities as a bridesmaid with my whole family?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to give my stepdad the role he wants in my wedding in front of his and my mom's families?,"I'll (27f) be getting married in the next year to 18 months (no date finalized yet). Originally I had planned to have my stepdad and my paternal grandpa share the father of the bride duties because my dad has been dead since I was 6 years old and my stepdad has been there for me almost as long but my grandpa is hugely important and has played the role as most important man in my life after my dad. My stepdad did not want to share the role and he wanted the walk down the aisle and the father/daughter dance to be just us. He told me he was not okay with my grandpa doing either alone or both with him. He told me when it comes down to it he was the real dad in my life since I was 7 years old and while he might not be biologically my dad he has been married to my mom and taking care of me for 20 years and he is also the father to all my siblings and his place in my life should be honored and not shared with a grandparent just because I lost my dad. So I told him I would have just grandpa then.

This was not the end of the conversation and it came back up during my mom's birthday dinner. He mentioned it in front of his family, aka his parents and siblings, as well as my mom and my mom's family. He told me he wanted to be father of the bride, he wanted to walk me down the aisle, he wanted a father/daughter dance, he wanted a toast, he wanted everything that comes traditionally with this. Because he brought it up in front of them and because I was slightly annoyed by him bringing it up again without clarifying he was okay with sharing the role, I told him no again. I also told him I had already asked grandpa. This was in front of both families and it did start a debate over this. Once I realized I was hated for saying no, by his family, and some of my mom's family including my mom disliked that I couldn't let him do it (but some were on my side) I decided to leave.

My stepdad told me I had humiliated him and made the dinner all about me. I said he brought it up first and he told me kindness and decency would suggest I not turn him down in front of everyone. I also got a very angry message from one of his siblings and another from the same sibling on behalf of his parents. They told me I had no business treating him this way. When I didn't reply to this person either time my stepdad told me I was going out of my way to behave inappropriately and to hurt him.

The importance of my paternal family in my life has always been an issue for my stepdad and his family, but especially the importance of grandpa. For many years my stepdad has been jealous and his family has commented that I shouldn't need my grandpa because I have my stepdad. His family have expressed their dislike for me several times because I have the relationship with grandpa that they feel I should have with their son.

My stepdad expected an apology and when he didn't get one. He told me yet again that he didn't like my behavior at the dinner.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
H for inviting my friends friend to go shopping with me?,"I (20f) live with my best friend (20f) named Eliza. Recently Eliza’s other friend (21f) Kennedy started asking to hang out with us and do some school work/studying at cafes or the library.  Eliza doesn’t really like Kennedy that much, she always seems kind of annoyed when we’re with her and, I can definitely understand why, Kennedys personality is very different from Eliza’s and I think Kennedy just kind of drains her social battery really fast. Kennedy and I have never hung out on our own though. 

Well I recently broke up with my long term boyfriend and wanted to spend extra time with friends to help and I just think it would be good for me. I asked Eliza if she’d care if I asked Kennedy to go shopping with me sometime (as I really don’t have that many friends that are available to hang out with often, one of my friends moved out of state and another one has a baby so she is busy all the time). Eliza said she didn’t care so I sent her a text. 

Well apparently Eliza DOES care and she seemed to get upset when she found out we actually made plans to hang out. She said she “didn’t even get an invite”, was kidding when she said it was ok for me to ask Kennedy and canceled OUR plans to go to the mall today and told me to just go with Kennedy instead. I tried to remedy the situation by telling her that of course I still wanted to go with her! She’s super fun to hang out with and I even told her it would make hanging out with Kennedy even more fun if she came too! But she said no, she didn’t want to go, and she doesn’t want to go with just me anymore either.

This is all pretty distressing for me, I just lost my boyfriend of 2.5 years and now I feel like my best friend is mad at me and doesn’t want to hang out with me either. I feel so lonely but I also feel like I can’t even hang out with Kennedy either or Eliza will be upset. I also feel guilt for potentially making Eliza feel left out but Eliza doesn’t even like Kennedy that much, I really didn’t think she’d care. 
AITAH?
",AmItheAsshole
 for not cleaning every day?,"I'm a recent college grad living with my family at home. I've been taking a community college class online to work towards getting an associate's in a field unrelated to my major, but aside from that, I've been job searching and volunteering throughout the week. On weekends I sometimes babysit for a family to make some income, but aside from that, I'm not working or making much of an income.

I help my mom out with anything she asks me to. Getting groceries, picking up/dropping off my little sisters, will drive her for drives as long as 4-5 hour roundtrips as needed. I proofread her work assignments, I've also been helping her with filling out her divorce paperwork, which is time-consuming. This is all to say that I quite literally help her with anything else she asks at the drop of a hat, no matter what it is. My mom is happy to have me home and has always expressed to me that she doesn't want me to move out and needs my help at home.

I however cannot stand how messy my family is. In particular, the kitchen gets extremely messy everyday. I can clean the entirety of the kitchen; the dishes, the dining table, the floor, taking out the trash, wiping down the stovetop, the counters, and I kid you not, it will revert back to being extremely messy in 1-2 days.

After about a month of cleaning the kitchen for 1-2 hours each day, I've just been really exhausted from it. In college, I lived with roommates who along with myself kept our place clean all of the time. I've tried explaining to my family that they need to stop creating so much mess everyday and clean after themselves more in the moment, and that I'm demotivated from cleaning, because I don't see the point in doing it if the place will just revert back to being messy the next day anyways. I truly don't contribute to this mess; most days I'm just on my laptop applying to positions, and if I eat something for myself I wash my dish afterwards. The only mess I contribute to is the trash/recycling filling up.

My mom is upset with me because she says it's not fair that everyone goes to school and work all day and I'm home and not cleaning. I understand where she's coming from, but I've tried explaining that I wouldn't be so opposed to cleaning if the mess were just more manageable on a daily basis. The sink is completely full with dishes each day, the stovetop, counters, table and floor always have spices and food spilled all over them, I'm tired of it all. People are creating mess left and right and acting as if I should be the one cleaning it all, and it's not right even if I'm unemployed. I love my family but it's hard for me to live in a messy state and it makes me wish I could get a position sooner so I could go back to living with roommates, but I just can't afford to for now. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for making my husband take on all of the household chores?,"I (wife, 52) and my husband (56) have been married for 28 years.  We’ve both always worked full time, and raised three kids together.  Anything to do with the kids was always my responsibility, as well as all indoor chores.  He handled outdoor chores.

4 years ago, he was laid off.  I gave him a year to get over it and find something else.  He never found anything else.  He hasn’t even tried.  He hasn’t applied to anything at all.  He does have some health problems but they wouldn’t prevent him from working.  I would even be happy with a part time job at this point but he has no interest and acts like he just retired early (which we can’t really afford).  

He still handles outdoor chores, while I still work full time and took on an extra part time consulting job to make ends meet.  A year ago I told him he would now be 100% responsible for dinners, and over the last few months, I’ve also told him I won’t be doing dishes or laundry and that now falls to him.  I still dust, vacuum, etc.  

He’s acting like I’m so awful for not helping him in the kitchen at all, and constantly complains (or looks for a pat on the back) when he does dishes or laundry.

So, AITA for making him pick up more idiot chores?  He says I’m being lazy.",AmItheAsshole
 For Not Wanting to Deal With My Mom's Anxiety?,"I (21f) live with my mom and grandparents, and have for the past few years. My mom has a pretty big anxiety disorder, specifically related to noise. Unfortunalty, our neighborhood is a pretty loud one; there are food trucks and neighbors that play loud music pretty late at night - the exact stuff that sets her off.

Usually we just call the police on them, and that's that; but recently, my mom has been getting more extreme with how she reacts to it. Normally, she'll just yell inside the house for a while and we'll stay out of the way until she cools off, and stuff calms down. For the past couple of weeks, though, she's started going outside and standing on our porch, staring at the people making the noise; and sometimes even yelling at them. This is super embarassing for me and my grandparents, and we also worried that she might escalate things into something physical. In the past, me or my grandmother have sometimes been able to talk her down; but now if we try to get her to go inside she'll yell at us, and sometimes even push us. Now that my younger brother is off at college, we don't have the manpower to pull her inside (me and my grandmother are pretty small, and my mom works out and surfs, so we can't make her move).

Last night, she went out to the curb, and had a full-on scream fight with our neighbors, who had a super loud food truck parked in front of their house for around two hours, at about 8 at night. I wasn't a fan of it either, but I don't want her making a huge scene and possibly putting herself in danger, or getting arrested. I was trying to get her to go inside, but she ignored me. Finally, I gave up and called my boyfreind, who came over to help. For context, my boyfreind (19) is a pretty punk looking guy; he's intimidating enough that he was able to get everyone to sort of calm down and go inside.

I could tell she was upset, but I was basically just humiliated, so I went with my boyfreind back to his place; even though she didn't want me too. Ever since, she's been blowing up my phone with texts about how she knew that me and my brother would get sick of her and leave, and how sorry she is, and how she wouldn't blame me if I never talked to her again.

I really love my mom, and we're very close - when she isn't doing this, we're really good freinds; so I don't want to abandon her. But I hate being stressed out everytime the sun starts going down, because I'm afraid that this stuff will start. I've noticed that, even when she's out of the house, or I'm out in public alone, I get tense if I hear loud noises/music.

AITA for not wanting to put up with this anymore?

  
Update: I forgot to add that she has tried therapy, but left because she felt like it wasn't doing anything. We have all encouraged her to try a medication, but she refuses, because she is terrified of anything that messes with your brain chemistry.",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to get a haircut?,"I know the title may sound silly but it's something that's been bugging me for a while.

So I'm a 30 year old trans woman. I'm three years into my transition. My friends have all been supportive, my work has been supportive, and my mother is doing her best to learn. The people who seem to be having issues are my dad and brother.

So as part of my transition, I've been growing my hair out and it's gotten quite long. I'm still getting used to things like straightening it and getting rid of knots, but I'm trying my best. My dad tends to come visit me every two weeks, and every time he visits, he will make a comment about how I need to get a haircut.

It started off pretty innocently, but then eventually he'd go on to say things like, ""Long hair doesn't suit you"", ""People in the office would be so happy if you got it cut"" (funny because they're the people who helped give me the courage to transition), ""You look like you're homeless"", and ""I know you think you look like a girl, but you don't.

I'm happy to get it slightly shortened or straightened, I'm not just going to let it continuously grow, but he wants me to remove almost all of my hair.

Cut to last week, I was telling him about a pay rise I'd just received. And then after the typical congratulations, he decided to add, ""Imagine how much more of a pay rise you'd get if you just cut your hair!"" He then tried to tell me to promise him I'll get it cut before he next visited, and wouldn't take no for an answer (he's tried this before, and it makes me feel so disrespected).

Thing is, I can't deny sometimes the comments get to me. I know he has my best interests at heart, and it has been over a year since I got it cut. But I dunno, AITA for refusing to listen to his advice to get a haircut?",AmItheAsshole
 for being short with someone who kept butting in while I was cooking?,"Ages aren't really necessary here, only the knowledge that I am just under half the age of the other person involved, if it really matters to anybody.

Pretty self-explanatory. I'm cooking dinner, and some of the preparation is being frustrating- needing to clear off the stovetop, stuff falling out of place when I open a cupboard to put the stuff that's on the stovetop *away,* trying to get something from ""was just in the freezer"" to ""cooked and ready to dice up for combination with the rest of the ingredients.""

Enter the other person. They've been asked to do a bit of quick prep with one of the other ingredients, and they've already finished and left the prepped ingredient in my reach. They've been thanked, the whole deal.

Except that is the full extent of what they were asked to do, *and they did not leave me alone afterwards for more than half a minute at a time.* Eventually, they stepped in and said in an ""educational"" tone that I should just let the frozen ingredient I'm trying to thaw cook a while on low. To be fair, this is true. However, I didn't *ask* for their input, and I was already in the process of *doing that.*

So I just let the frozen food *thunk* into the pan and said ""Okay"" kinda tersely.

I pretty much immediately felt bad about it, so I started apologizing with a ""Sorry, I just-""

(Quick edit: To people telling me I need to just use my words, *this is where I was about to do that.* Carry on.)

And this person. This *fully-grown adult* with more than *double* my life experience. They just cut me off and snap, ""No, don't even bother! *I'm* sorry! *GEEZ!*"" before stomping away. They can do this thing with their voice, too, sort of a growly undertone that's basically channeling their inner drill sergeant and has *always* left me shaky, and they did that when they snapped at me.

I'm still kinda jittery, and as I was typing this they came back to calmly *keep explaining the bit about cooking the food low and slow to thaw it,* and I just had to sit there and listen silently bc I don't want to risk them blowing up again, even though *I'm* the cook for tonight *and I still never asked.*",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to invite my family to graduation?,"Just to give you a backstory this all happened because of me and my dad's relationship. I'm 17 and I'm graduating highschool in May. My parents are separated due to my dad cheating on my mom, and since then it's always been back and forth between parents. Me and my dad bumped heads a lot and most of my dads side of the family treated me weird due to me being ""Too Proper"". Anyways it was all good until I was 14. He started bringing multiple females around me and my sisters and I distanced myself. One day I ended up at his house due to my uncle inviting me to the water park and I accepted not knowing he was going to go, and when he found out he was not happy. He started talking bad about me to my family on his side and I was hurt. The next day we wanted to go somewhere again, so I stayed the night with no words said to him throughout the time. The next day I was washing dishes and playing video games with friends and he says my dish was not washed, but it was. I washed it again and he claimed they were ""still dirty"", so when I tried to come to show him he started abusing me. He did awful things I can’t say but I got brusies. while i'm just 14 not even in highschool and he's 6'3 220 just beating me, it wasn’t fair. He then runs to his car and get his “tool” and aims it at me. I was lost at words and he told me to get out. Since then I removed him out my life. He's got married, a new family, barely talks to my sisters, and just obsessed with my life. This brings me to the present. I'm close to my mom's side, which has my aunt and grandma. They understand the story but still tries to push him back into my life saying I should forgive and forget. I have but they don't listen. They continue to talk to him and invite him and tell him about all my events, awards, and life in general. I told them I don't appreciate that multiple times and they don't listen.
Recently I had prom and I took photos of cours check on facebook to see I got tagged in a comment to a post of my dad's of my prom photos. I was pissed and told my mother and she told me to calm down and just manipulate me, ie and play victim. She told me my aunt and grandma wanted to send him pictures but she stopped them but she sent them and gave permission for him to post them. I called her out on her mistake and she says that she's sorry but doesn't plan on fixing it and asking him to take it down. I said I would keep it short and simple to ask him and she tried to stop me claiming she didn't want ""drama"" so i sent it anyway because I felt disrespected. I texted him and he didn't respond and he ended up texting my mother and my mother got mad at me. She told me to not say anything to her and I just said ""ok"" and that was it. That was two days ago and nobody has said a word to me since. I'm thinking about not inviting nobody to my graduation because I feel disrespected. Why should I trust people who can't respect my life, and share all my successes to people not in my life for their own gain?",AmItheAsshole
 if I got a new dog?,"Ps. Sorry for my grammar, its 2 am and English isn't my first language.

For background: I already have a dog who's around 6 years old. I got him when he  was 2 months old, and We were inseparable. Until, he started getting skin allergies when he was around two years old. He was suffering, losing his fur, scratching until he bled, so I spend hundreds on skin care, medicine, and vet visits for him. 

I guess all the baths, and meds ended up in him not loving me anymore. He was just scared. No matter what treat I had he would just instantly run the opposite way, he hid under furniture and refused to come out for me, ignored me daily when I tried playing with him, refused to eat when I was the one to fill his bowl so I always had to ask my sister or parents to take the bowl and act as if its they were the ones doing it. 

I thought he would settle down once he was healed so I kept trying to show him that my hands were always empty, and bought him toys and treats. But years went by and he still remained the same way. he basically only looks for me when I'm the only one home family during fireworks or thunder season. It hurts me to see him become a different dog when he's with my family qnd I'm not around.

The problem: After waiting for so long, I want to adopt a new puppy who I can pour all my love to, who won't ignore me or treat me like I'm nuisance or watch me like a hawk thinking that I'm some sort of threat whenever I go into the same room he's in. But, my sister thinks I'm an asshole because I'm 'replacing my dog'.

But, I don't think I'm an asshole because I wouldn't throw him away. I will still buy his food, pay for any future vet visits, and get him new toys and treats once every few weeks. I'll just stop trying to give him unwanted attention, or focing him to be with me when he clearly doesn't want to. I will leave him to my family's love and affection like he wants, and focus on the new little one.

So, WIBTA if I got a new dog?
 ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for a refund on an art commission?,"My cousin is an artist, a really good one at that. They opened commissions last June to help pay for some personal things because they lost their job, so I hit them up. We discussed things for a few days and set the price, deadline ect. I gave them 3 months, which is a generous amount of time, because they had alot going on and we agreed it'd be best if they didn't feel rushed.
 I sent them $100 upfront, I trusted them because we are very close, weve borrowed money from eachother before ect, there was no reason to not trust them and like I said they really needed the money because they lost their job. 

So it's almost been a year, and I still haven't received the art. Not even a sketch. When I ask them, they just act like it's not a big deal. ""I'm so behind on art for alot of people"" is what I get the most. They are still hurting for money apparently, so I've been nice about things, but at this point I really just want my money back. Their rules for commissions do include refunds, but it's a bigger issue since we are family, I'm scared it will feel like betrayal. I'm going to do it, I just wanna know if that makes me the bad guy. 
",AmItheAsshole
" for taking my friend's response seriously because she didn't specify she was ""joking""?","  Recently I hung out with my guy best friend, and as I always do, I post a story on Instagram about our hangout at the end of the day. 


  After 5 minutes my friend texts me, saying everyone will think we're dating(me and my guy best friend). I replied with ""Okay well what do you want me to do about it"" and she went in all defensive mode or something and responds with ""I was just saying, you don't need to be barking at me jesus"". 

  So I said I wasn't barking, i was just asking what she wants me to do about it, since there's nothing, really. She then proceeds to tell me that I'm talking back to her, and I'm throwing a tantrum, and that I'm always taking things seriously. 

  I was getting annoyed by that, so i just told her that she never told me she was joking and that sorry for having a mouth and being able to talk. 

  She then proceeds to tell me that I started arguing with her, and I told her nah not really, which she replied with okay and I thought that was it. It wasn't.

  She started to call me out in notes in Instagram, saying the same things over and over again, and it got boring, so I just stopped replying. 
  So, am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for swearing at a classmate?,"Throwaway because I don’t know how many of my classmates use Reddit. And on mobile and first time posting, please bear with me.

I (15f) have a class with my best friend. We’re not what you’d call ‘popular’ my any means, but we do have a friend group of our own (who aren’t in this class with us). The problem is, sometimes my friend gets picked on for the things she likes, or for whatever other reason I can’t fathom. Point is, she gets picked on in this class by one of the ‘popular’ kids and her friends. I’m talking making faces, jeering, the whole lot of funny business in high school. My friend usually either tries to defend herself, or flips them off right back (which isn’t the best option, I know, but it hasn’t stopped even after telling the teacher and asking her to keep an eye out).

So today, one such event happened. These girls were across the room, teacher wasn’t stepping in, making comments such as ‘can we get a woof, [friend]? Can we get a meow?’ My friend flipped them off (which, I know, probably spurred them on, but it’s hard for both of us to ignore this kind of thing when it happens. 

Here’s when I might be the A-hole.

After all of this, I was now standing next to my friend and talking to her (we had some time to catch up on work and were free to talk), when the girl who’s been causing the most problems walked by, looked right over at us, and said ‘me-yooow!’. This ticked me off, and after days and days of witnessing it, I spoke up and snapped at her (entire class present, including the teacher at her desk)

“You’re a bitch”

After that, most of the class went silent and then started laughing. The girl was also laughing, but at that point I had no shits left to give. I don’t know if the class was laughing because I was being stupid, or if it was a nervous laugh (I don’t tend to speak up a ton in class unless I’m talking to my friend).

Afterwards, my friend thanked me profusely and explained to the teacher what had been happening after she looked up from her computer. The girl got called over, and I don’t know the whole exchange of what happened. All I know is that the girl and her friends left laughing and making fun of my words, but I didn’t care.

But now, I know I coulda handled it differently. I know I shouldn’t have said that, but I honestly feel like she deserved it in that moment. My friend still thinks it was awesome and told me I’m amazing.

But it’s been eating away at me, and I feel like a jerk. Reddit, AITA for swearing at that classmate??",AmItheAsshole
 for having joked around with my friend?,"Long story short I (26f) have a friend (28m) we’ve been friends for so long like 12+ years at this point. We go back and forth with little fun jabs quite frequently, name calling etc and always have laughed about it. Or so I thought? 
I guess we had a conversation the other day that started with him making a fun profane joke to which I responded go fuck yourself. A few days go by and we don’t talk so I message and ask what’s wrong to which they responded with a big paragraph “don’t fucking disrespect me again blah blah”. I had no idea what they were talking about it so they said “see you’re such a piece of shit you don’t even notice it” and then it came up they were offended I told them to go fuck themselves the other day. I apologized for having offended them and stated that not to justify my words but i genuinely had thought we were making fun jabs how we always do. 
Hours later, I don’t want to seem like I’m not taking accountability for my actions or avoiding the person for being called out,  but I’m really thinking maybe I just need to remove this person from my life. 
I feel we may be at a point it’s best to just part ways. Adult friendships suck sometimes.  What do you think on the situation?",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling my parents about proposing to my gf?,"I (f25) have been dating my gf (f27) for about 5 years now. When I came out to my parents they were devastated. They didn't shun me but they were hurt. They are still in denial however my gf and I go over and hang out, but we both know she isn't really welcomed. I can see how differently they treat my brothers gf and it hurts to watch because I want that. 

My parents like my gf as a person but hate our relationship.

I've talked to my sister and she wants me to tell them because she says I should give them the opportunity to react. I know their reaction will be negative but I still hope for the best. I am not a confrontational person I don't need their feelings to make me feel like a piece of shit. 

My gf says I shouldn't tell them because they don't respect our relationship, which I agree with but I feel like a terrible person hiding something else from them.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my Dad to divorce my Mom and that she doesn’t love/care for him,"I’m (18F) the eldest daughter of two. Ever since I was 13 I knew my mom’s behaviour was not okay. She pretty much ticks all the boxes for a covert narcissist however she has never been diagnosed officially (since she refuses to see anyone) and I know how hard it is to diagnose NPD in any case but I truly believe she has covert NPD. 

My Dad and I have become closer emotionally over how she is and we would talk a lot about it and things she does. My dad would confide in me a lot and still does. We have each other is what I mean.

Now I’m 18 and realise she will never ever change. About 7 months ago my view of my mom completely changed just naturally and I am done with her behaviour and how she treats people.

Today, I said to my Dad that he should leave her and that she doesn’t care and never will. I was definitely harsh and agressive I think (because I’m so angry myself with how my mom has treated me as well). He looked like he was going to cry and left for the gym.  I feel horrible now and I’m not sure if it was the right thing to do at all. He said we’ll talk more about it when he gets back. I know he still loves her so much. 

AITA?? Should I be encouraging a divorce? How do I go about this? Is it out of my hands? I want to protect my Dad I don’t know how. 

Update* he came home a while ago and i took everyone’s advice from this post and I apologised for being so harsh with him and told him i’ll always be there for him and support him. He fully accepted the apology and didn’t really want to talk about it any further which i respected so we’ve just hung out watching tv and chatting about other stuff. 

I appreciate everyone’s help it’s helped me so so much in navigating this so thank you to everyone who responded. 

I will support him whether he chooses to leave or not and I will learn to accept that as I know now it’s not my decision to make. Thanks again to everyone for the help ❤️",AmItheAsshole
 for not apologizing to my father?,"So I (20F) had to do an exam to obtain a title (it was a title that can prove I talk fluent english). The thing is the professor told me the wrong dates and I missed the opportunity because of that, and I knew about it last Thursday (24). Three days later(27), I was walking down the street and talking to my dad, when he suddenly asked me about the test. I explained the situation to him, and he started to blame me for that professor's mistake. I tried to explain to him that it wasn't my fault, but he started yelling and insulting me. Yes, he started to yell and insult me in the street. I tried to control myself but he kept on screaming and I yelled at him too, but I didn't insult him nor I wasn't telling him bad things, I just told him to stop screaming at me and that I didn't have fault.

When we both came home, he told my mom, and the argue continued. It was a 2vs1, where they both were screaming, insulting and denigrating me. They even told me that if I didn't shut up, they would kick me or break my mouth, also calling me b*t*h, disrespectful, bad daughter... 

Hours later, my mom came to my room asking me if I would go and apologize to my dad, since I'm younger and also since he's older than me, and he's my father that I should respect him and apologize to him.

I said no, because he was the one who started the argument and my mom told me that if a war started at my home it was my fault for not apologizing.

She came 3 hours later asking me the same. And I, again, told her that I would only apologize when he comes at me first, because imo that wasn't the way to talk about that issue.

My dad didn't talk to me in 3 days, he didn't even apologize or salute me, so I did the same respecting my line and my values (why should I pay respect for someone who didn't respect me in the first place?). 

And now I want to know, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I didn’t thank my brother for a gift?,"I (34f) posted a while ago about my brother (36m) who constantly gives me passive aggressive bday gifts.

Long story short: my brother acts like he’s better than everyone because he’s religious and the only one of us siblings who had children of his own. For the past several years he refuses to talk to me but has given me passive aggressive bday gifts including discounted Easter candy in a Walmart bag with the receipt showing 70% off and last year got me a fountain pen with no ink where he admitted he didn’t even buy it. Someone gave it to him and he didn’t want it. Him and his wife have ignored me for years while I’ve constantly reached out in attempt to have a relationship with him before finally just going no contact for my own mental health.

I decided this year if he messaged me that he was bringing a gift I was going to tell him not to bother. I didn’t want anymore “gifts” from him. So my brother didn’t call or text or anything. Just showed up at my apartment unannounced, left a generic card on my doorstep, didn’t knock or ring the doorbell or anything. My ring camera caught it. And then he just left. This was at around noon.

So he texted me 6 hours later to let me know that “the mail delivered my bday card”. While I’d love to be just as petty as him, I’m trying to just take the high road. I don’t necessarily want to thank him for doing the absolute bare minimum (if not less).

WIBTA if I just ignore his text completely and not even mention it?",AmItheAsshole
" for refusing to give ""my car"" to my brother","I(19F) don't know how to explain this adequately but before I turned 18 my parents applied for a type of financing/loan common in my country in order to buy me a car. I didn't particularly want a car but it was a nice gesture and I figured if nothing else I could just give it to my parents or something. Usually, the process of being granted it takes years, but by some inexplicable luck I was drawn some months ago. 

My oldest brother (32M) has recently married and had a baby, and moved to a farm to start a business of caring for horses. To be clear I love my brother and support his new life endeavors. However, I have watched all my life him being irresponsible with money and he is actually currently in quite some financial trouble, and it has been disclosed to me that he has about 70% of his income (he's a cop) compromised by multiple loans and the expenses of renting and renovating the farm. I also consider him a really reckless driver and he often gets tickets and fines. Since he needs an additional car, he has also applied for the same type of financing/loan that I did but it hasn't been picked yet.

Now, with all the recent change in his life, my parents are trying to help him and his situation as much as possible, so my mom (50F) talked to me about giving him my financing/loan. I had no problem with this, since I don't plan on using it. However, my mom informed me that the plan was that the car would be bought on my name and that while he would use it, the car would still technically be mine. 

Now. I love my brother, but I don't think it's smart for my name to be on something that is used by someone that I consider to be reckless/unreliable. So I told my mom that I would only do it if the car was transferred to his name. My mom informed me however that transferring it to him would cost a whole lot of money that they weren't willing to pay. Today, she sent me a contract for me to sign for the acquisition of the car in question, and I told her I don't feel comfortable signing it. 

My mom is mad at me for this one and is saying I am not being a good sister. She also brings up that it is her money that is on the line so it should be her decision. I think that even if it is her name, it is my name on it so I should have a say. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friend to get off her phone?,"Backstory : I invited  a close friend on a girls trip that I was doing I part for my birthday. the girls we were going with were a close friend of mine and two of her bridesmaids who I instantly connected with at her Bach party and wedding. I don’t know the other girls super well so felt like it would be a pretty equal experience.  When I invited my friend it was because I felt like she would be a good fit.  when we had a previous trip the two of us we had a lot in common and it was super fun. She liked all of my friends but did a lot of self centered thing the entire trip. She  spent hours on her phone FaceTiming with other people, delayed our trip up to the mountains by over an hour because she needed to charge her phone, and left multiple times to get food or something of that nature without talking to the group before so everyone was left wondering where she went and then waiting for her. I am introverted so I can understand to an extent the need to talk with people when you don’t quite feel comfortable however I assumed that was the reason since she hadn’t done this on our other trip. Today we were alone at a breakfast place and she had her boyfriend on face time for 30 minutes. By this time I felt annoyed because I was sitting there awkwardly on my phone so I asked her nicely if she could hang up the call so that we could spend some quality time together and she flipped. She told me that she could hang out with me while on the phone and that it was so rude for me to ask her that after I accidentally laughed and spit on her food (which I offered to pay for). She then proceeded to stand up and yell at me in this restaurant about how I get hurt too much and I’m such a burden. I am 35 and she is 28 so I can understand that this might be a generation thing or that people may have different needs so am I the asshole for asking her to get off her phone? ",AmItheAsshole
 for reporting my friend to his GF?,"M - friend (lets also call him M)
F - me

so for context, we were doing a project.
our group finished early, so i decided i wanted to help another group (because my best friend is the leader there, and M is in that group).
M dm'd me asking for help because he was struggling with his assigned task.
fast forward, they needed to send a selfie for credits (which is required for the project), 
and M said he was having a hard time choosing a picture. 
as i was explaining to him what he could send, he suddenly sent a shirtless picture and *even* asked if that was okay. 
it made me super uncomfortable even if he wasn't flirting with me. for me, we're strictly just friends. after that, M posted a IG story with his new girlfriend just hanging out, and he even tagged her. 
so woman to woman - i took it upon myself to report what he sent because i felt like she needed to know. 
i asked my friend and they said he wasn't that serious since we werent even flirting and it seemed like i was just trying to ruin their relationship. AITA??????",AmItheAsshole
 for bringing up my feelings about a coat my mum (67F) bought for me (29F)?,"
For context, my mum was a teacher (now retired). We were sorting through items and the coat she bought me years ago appeared. I mentioned that I remembered the circumstances around that coat. She had bought one for a student for hers and then decided to buy the same coat from me. Not overly expensive at $40, but not a piece of clothing she had or would otherwise have ever bought for me up until then.

For context, the student had a poor homelife, had a disability, and as far as the school knew her parents struggled to care of her. Teachers buying items was quite normal and in fact usual tasks at the school involved doing the shopping for students who needed help.

I was a teen, about 14-15yo. My mum had up intil this point never bought me anything of the sort - I was always clothed in basics, never had the ""luxury"" of owning a jacket/coat, and knowing that my mum didnt spend on such things, even if I had asked the answer would have been no (I did ask for things as a child, and soon gave up after I realised the answer would 95% if the time be a it's not necessary, a no). And no not even for birthday gifts. A coat/jacket was what I considered a luxury. Yet, here she buys me this 'second in mind' to the student. It's petty but I have stomached a lifetime of this, her dismissing anything i have said.

As I grew up in a very frugal household, I wore hand me down clothing and hardly ever wore anything new. When we did go clothes shopping, it was to buy underwear. Extremely ocasionally, a new t-shirt. But certainly not a nice looking coat.

So seeing that my mum had bought this for a student was hurtful to me at the time, despite knowing that the student would obviously have loved the gift.

Anyway, when I alluded to that at the time my mum had a total freak out talking about how I'm ungrateful, she had meant well, she thought it was a nice coat, put no further thought into it, I blame her for everything, etc. etc., she can do no right. I decided to drop it.

This time merely mentioning it and thinking my mother would react differently was a mistake. I don't blame her and I just wanted to talk about feelings from when I was a child. The response that I think would have been fine would've been 'yes i know how that could have come off, i didn't know you felt that' acknowledging that I could feel hurt is all i naively hoped for after all these years. I should've known better than that, she has reacted the exact same way as then. I clarified that I was just talking about my perspective as a child, at the time, I said nothing about blame. She is now stone-walling me.

I'm not even angry, I'm disappointed. She doesn't have the emotional capacity to hear my thoughts without going full defensive and taking it as blaming her as a parent.

AITA for bringing this up? My sister says I shouldn't have brought it up as she's sensitive about her parenting. So all this does is make her feel like a sht parent. I don't think I've done anything wrong.",AmItheAsshole
 for turning my kids mom in?,"If I turn in my kids mom for taking nude selfies in front of my son? I found pictures from a trip they took out of state. They were in a hotel. My son can be seen in background on the bed facing his mother. She took a few, some with hair up and down. From time stamps of pictures was about six minutes. The night before one was taken but more up close and can't see background. Just boobs. I brought up this to her. She thinks it's no big deal. Said it was just a few pictures. 
",AmItheAsshole
: Live-in landlord not talking to me,"So I had been living in a foreign country due to an internship thing I was carrying out. This country’s climate and geography proved to be incredibly detrimental to my health and I started getting severe sinus infections. I was put on weeks of antibiotics at a time. 
My live-in landlord seemed understanding at the time.

I trudged on for another few months but after getting yet another two infections, I decided to quit this internship and go back home earlier than intended. I gave the landlord 2 weeks notice. Since that point he seemed to be avoiding me and saying very little. When I went to say goodbye to him and gave him a review of the wear and tear in my room, he listened but by his body language I could tell he didn’t want to talk to me at all.

The thing is, we never had a contract. So there was no real stipulation on when you’re expected to give notice that you’re leaving. I know, not the smartest idea to get involved in such an arrangement, but I’ve learned my lesson. 

AITA? I know I could’ve given him earlier notice and that’s standard when it comes to renting. But I just found the way he handled our last conversation incredibly dehumanising. I technically have a chronic disease, which is very unpredictable, I had to visit several different doctors, the public hospital and eventually paid for a private hospital before I got X-rays and my condition was finally taken seriously. 

In my opinion, this situation is just all about money. If I’m not giving money to people, nobody cares about how I’m doing. Doesn’t feel good when you’re living abroad away from family and friends. 

To what extent AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for making my surgery his problem?,"I (21f) have been dating my boyfriend (21m) for about 2.5 years. We are both in school at the same university.

 In January, I took a learn-to-ski course, and decided to go up the chair lift despite it probably being way ahead of my skill level. Surprise! It was, and I tore my ACL in the process of getting down. It was a really light fall but next thing you know my body was down hill and my leg was uphill with my ski still on my foot. 

I have been dealing with the pain and the physical therapy since January, and am finally getting my reconstruction surgery within the next two weeks!! Yippee!! I asked my boyfriend if he was going to come visit me at all (my guess is that I’ll be lonely and struggle with mobility) and he said no, not until I can come visit him. 

For context, he believed this whole ordeal is my fault (which I guess it is) and that I deserve all of the consequences for choosing to put myself in that position. Anytime I complain about pain, physical therapy, am anxious of the surgery or the recovery process afterward, or get sad because I can’t take part in my physical activities I get the same response - I need to stop complaining because I did this to myself and I don’t deserve sympathy. 

Reddit, is he right? I know I burdened my loved ones by injuring myself but it really wasn’t my intent and now I’m struggling on this journey alone and without his support. 


EDIT: 
I know I just made this post but I want to add some extra context. 

He’s been somewhat supportive - babysitting my activities since he knows I’m in a hurry to get back to them and wants to make sure I don’t make myself worse by going too hard. He also has a professional certification exam on the 29th of May that he needs to and wants to focus on which is why he also won’t come visit (we live 45 mins away from each other and he’s been studying for about 8 hours each day). ",AmItheAsshole
 if I confronted my friend over 2 yr old stuff I just found out about?,"I (21F) have this friend we'll call Rosie (21F) and we're both part of a college group with Jasmine (21F) and Annie (22F). Rosie dated a guy from our class named Joe (21M) in late 2022, which is the year this whole thing starts

Around April-May 2022 I had my first kiss and since Rosie was my friend and I was very happy about it I excitedly told her thinking nothing of it. Unfortunately for me the kiss began a situationship that ended around the same time she started dating Joe (Important fact)

Rosie and Joe only dated for like 3 months and ended in pretty bad terms, making Jasmine, Annie and I completely despise the man for his weird behavior towards her. This hatred lasted until about a month ago when I ended up being partnered with Joe for two semester-long projects and realizing he at least puts in the work

Flash forward to last Saturday, I was working on one of these projects with Joe and our two other teammates and since they're all friends and I'm on good terms with them we got distracted and started talking. We entered the topic of relationships and that's when the bomb exploded: After asking me if I had ever dated anyone, Joe proceeded to say he heard about my first kiss

I exploded (pretty disproportionately, I'll admit that). I yelled up and down in disbelief that Rosie had actually told him about it. Joe and I had never spoken at that point and she knew the kiss had become a sensitive topic for me after things ended with that guy, so imo she had no business telling him

Eventually I calmed down, him and I agreed to talk it out later and we continued with the project. And when we did talk it out later he apologized for bringing it up and dropped another bomb on me

Around the first half of that spring semester (Southern Hemisphere, spring semester is Aug-Dec) I figured out Rosie, Jasmine and Annie had a gc without me. They always seemed to be in tune with things I had no idea about, and more than once they slipped a ""I sent it to the gc"" in front of me and my notif-less phone.

After a few months of me keeping quiet about it I was randomly added in a gc with them and was pretty excited about it. Well, a year and a half later Joe told me they only made that new gc bc he saw a comment I made online about feeling excluded and brought it up to Rosie saying how wrong it was. It took HIM, a guy I did not know even knew my name, intervening in the situation for them to make the stupid gc

Again, this is all pretty old info that I found out abt last Saturday, and istg I feel like I have the angel and the devil on my shoulder. On one hand it would feel kinda stupid to make a big deal out of such old stuff (Which is what my parents think) but on the other hand I genuinely think I have a right to be mad at them  and let them know (Which is what one of our teammates think). No, I really have no opinion of my own here bc nothing ever happens to me so I've never been in a situation like this before

So, folks, WIBTA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to invite all my fiance's groomsmens girlfriends to my Bachelorette party?,"My fiancé and I are planning our separate bridal parties for our wedding. We will have the parties the same weekend but at separate locations at least 2 nights as of right now. I have 3 bridesmaids and 1 maid of honor. He has the same,  3 groomsman and 1 best man

 One of his groomsmen (Matt) is coming from quite a few states away from us, so him and his long term girlfriend (Hanna) will be flying here together a few weeks before the wedding and staying with us until the wedding day. With that being said, ONE of his groomsmen's (Matt) girlfriend Hanna is invited to my Bachelorette party because we don't want her staying at our house alone while they visit as we will be gone for multiple days and I feel it's the right thing to do as she is both of our friends as well. 

I had one of the other groomsmen (Eric) confront me out of the blue in person asking me to invite his fairly new girlfriend to my Bachelorette party. I have nothing against Eric's girlfriend I just feel if I included her as well the rest of the guys would expect me to bring their s/o which I really don't want to do. I am not asking my financé to invite any of my girls s/o. I feel a little jaded in the fact my fiancé agreeing with his groomsmen and just telling them to ask me which puts me on the spot, but I do appreciate him not telling them yes on my behalf.

A few things to note:
 Our parties are still months away and it's all in a rough draft stage, with general ideas for each party.
 We trying our best to be ""budget friendly"" so less people means less hotel rooms/ needing a bigger air bnb and a more intimate and personal connection at each of our parties.
 I'm a very antisocial person and the girl friends I do have are all very close friends of mine and I'm not an open person upfront to newer people and I don't want it to strain against Eric's girlfriend if she were to come. I would just feel awkward and out of place at my own party, especially if it was all the guys girlfriends that I don't really know that well. 
 I may have a little bit of bias towards Eric's girlfriend because I've seen and heard some things that shows she has some kind of interest in my fiancé (more than friends) even her boyfriend has seen it and we have discussed it but everything is civil as a whole. I'm not as worried about anything happening in that sense but more of I don't want to be around it if I don't feel obligated to be. 

Would I be the asshole saying no to Eric's girlfriend but allowing matt's girlfriend from out of state to join our bachelorette while shes staying in town? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for not caring bout this Situation ,"AITA for not caring about this situation?
So my fiancé used to be married and we’re still currently waiting for the divorce papers to be sent for some reason, even though it’s been over 2 months. So with that being said of course they still communicate. However I don’t like that they’re not usually talking about the divorce papers . I’ve voiced to him many times how I didn’t like it especially after she sent a “special video” of her work performance, and how he discusses our private situations with her like they’re best friends when he’s told me some foul stories about her.

So, someone had hurt himself and ended up dying, BUT he told me it was HIS brother . Now I only know of the one so I was a bit confused . Come to find out the next day it was actually HER brother . Now, I love him and care about how he feels so of course I’m heartbroken that he’s so upset and hurt that his friend died. But I do not care about the fact that it’s her brother. I understand I may seem like a bitch about it but personally I’m not understanding why he’s still having any contact with her (divorce topic exempt) or her family to begin with.

Secondly I don’t like that fact that she feels comfortable enough to CONSISTENTLY call and text him about everything else but the divorce papers and why they haven’t shown up when everything has been paid for and signed, and the only thing they were waiting for , was for it to be sent .

Now back to topic. So we’re going to drive 9hrs to go to his ex wife’s, brother’s funeral and honestly I don’t know how to feel about it and I don’t want to act out of character at what’s supposed to be a very emotional event. However I feel that it’s an event that we shouldn’t and/or don’t need to be going to. But he wants to so we will.

I just feel like I’m being really insensitive and selfish about it but at the same time I feel like I have every right to be upset and not want to go. I need some outside help so please lmk AITA🤦‍♀️",AmItheAsshole
: Don’t want flatmate to renew lease,"I live in a reasonably priced 3-bed in London, coming up to the end of our 3rd year-long tenancy in July.

All rooms are nice. There are 2 smaller (almost identical) rooms, one of which is mine. 

Since the beginning, I have lived with a good friend, Alex, who has the other smaller room. Until 2 months ago, the large room was occupied by our other good friend, Bailey. The largest room is 1.8x the seize of smaller rooms, but only 1.08x the price. This agreed based on what we could all afford when we first moved in, but all our salaries increased and so it’s no longer equitable.

As Bailey began looking to buy property in Nov, they asked if Alex and I would let them sublet their room for the remainder of the tenancy. We agreed on Charlie who was looking to move to London. Charlie was a stranger, but a managee of a friend. Alex and I had one FaceTime with Charlie before they moved in. 

A week before Bailey completed on buying their property, the agents sent a tenancy agreement Charlie until the end of the original term, in July.

I explained that Alex and I had agreed on a subletter, but the landlord insisted on a new tenancy. Bailey got antsy, insisting that not signing this agreement would jeopardise their future plans. I that I was being asked to do something I was deeply uncomfortable with, especially because through multiple tenancies I have chosen to never sign a legal contract with someone that either I, or another good friend who will also be a tenant, know before. 

I suspect Bailey might have actually known it wouldn’t be a sublet, but it could have been their lack of communication with the agent. In the end, I relented for the sake of the friendship with Bailey. Note, Charlie is not aware of any of this and no one has ever mentioned anything beyond July to them.

Charlie is ‘just fine’ - Alex and I feel no connection over these 2 months. There is now a constant air of awkwardness and I don’t feel at home anymore. Charlie is very quiet and stay in their room a lot. Alex and I have tried to engage them, but there isn’t much engagement back - they only really speak when spoken to. Alex and Iused to cook with our old flatmate- we’ve asked Charlie and they aren’t interested. I invited Charlie to a dinner with our friends, including their line manager who both the new tenant and I are friends with, and they spent the whole time on their phone. Charlie is a bit younger and feels at a very different stage of life.

If the landlord wants us to renew, they will send through an offer in mid-May. Alex and I agree that we don’t want to live with Charlie for what will be 14 more months from when we’d sign the contract. Alex and I want to stay and have someone else move in. We have 3 people who are interested and we already know. However, I understand that legally we have no leg to stand on by asking Charlie to leave while we stay. I’m just at such a loss for what to do.
",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my father that I won't pay for my siblings birthday presents?,"My father has been nonexistent my entire life, and a few weeks ago he wanted some money to get birthday presents for my younger siblings. The thing is, he has kicked me out of their house and I have been living in an apartment in the city. My younger siblings birthday is coming up soon and he wanted to get birthday presents for them. The thing is, he wants me to pay for their presents. Now I love my younger siblings, but he has never really celebrated my birthday when I was young. I would pay for their presents if it was something like a Barbie doll, but the present she wanted was an iPad. I wouldn't be able to pay for that considering I have to pay rent and take care of my dogs.
	I refused to pay for my siblings presents and he began to yell at me through the phone. He said he was going to come over to my apartment. (He doesn't know which city I live in) He also said I was a selfish asshole who didn't care about the happiness of my siblings. Of course I want my siblings to be happy, but I wouldn't possibly be able to pay for it. 
	So, AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting my husband to help out more?,"I asked my husband to pick up or help his daughter pick up her toys that were taking over the living room 2 weeks ago. His answer was always a sarcastic ""yes ma'am"" or ""yes master"". Finally, I just shoved all her crap in a garbage bag and set it next to him where he was sitting on the couch. He got mad and stomped off with the toys and put them in her room. This is not the only time I've been met with tantrum-like behavior when I ask him to do things around the house. His excuse is that he works full time and is tired and just wants to relax (game and drink beer) when he gets home. I also work full time and I'm the primary parent for my two sons and his daughter. I'm tired, too. The only two things I can rely on him doing are taking out the garbage and mowing the lawn. He never takes initiate to help around the house. It's now effecting other parts of our relationship (s*x life). I've suggested making a list, which he shut down. A chore wheel, which he shut down. I can't manage 5 people's messes anymore, I am so resentful of him.",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to pick up my [F23] boyfriend [M25] after he smoked weed?  ,"[Quick update at the end]

So last night my boyfriend came over. After a bit of alone time (I had homework I had to finish) weed was offered to us by my brother. Boyfriend said yes initially, but after my brother has left I asked if he'd reconsider as I'd been really wanting to spend some quality time together (no technology, no substances and no distractions). He agreed and asked if I wanted a cup of tea. 

The kind gesture left me feeling listened to and happy. 15 minutes go by and I get the sinking feeling he's been distracted by something, namely, weed. As I go downstairs to get my tea myself I pass him in the stairwell and I get hit with the smell of weed on his breath. I continue past, and I ask my brother if they'd just smoked together. He said they had, and that boyfriend had said yes to it when it'd been offered to him a second time. I explained the situation and my brother was empathetic. 

Boyfriend and I ended up having a small argument, ending in me explaining that I'm too upset to spend the night with him and that I'm going to drive him home. Once I drop him off I explain we're on a break now, as stuff has been piling up for a while and this was the ""cherry on top"". 

Next morning I get a bunch of messages from him asking me to drive him back to my place so he can get his car. My brother and mother both said he should catch a bus (or walk the downhill hiking track that leads directly from his suburb to mine!) since it was his fuck up that got him in this situation. 

I told him as much, and he told me I'd ""forced him out of the house"", pleaded with me about not ""making him"" spend money to get to his car and explained that me giving him a ride wouldn't jeopardize the break I've put us on. 

I reiterated the reasons why I've put us on a break, and he replied with ""I was [just as] disappointed when you got as upset as you did, but to be fair you didn't really make much of an effort to come and hang out with me last night."" 

To clarify, I'd been busy with homework, he'd put a show on that he'd wanted to finish. When that show was done, he came over, we chatted for like two minutes before weed was offered. Then you know the rest. 

He said a few other things, but there's not enough space for me to quote it. We haven't spoken much at all. 

I'm feeling really confused and frustrated about all this. He's called me several times now but I've ignored them. I don't know if refusing to go get him when he has multiple options to get here himself is a dick move or not. 

AITA? 

TL,DR; asked boyfriend if we could skip smoking weed tonight so we could have quality time together. He agreed, offered a cup of tea, and then ended up smoking weed whilst I was waiting for my tea. We started to argue but I felt so over it all that I ended up driving him home. He wants me to take him to his car but I'm refusing, AITA? 


Update; 

I finished work not too long ago and found him waiting by my car with a smoothie he'd bought for me. And a hand written letter I haven't opened. He then asked me for a lift. He then told me he'd got his PARENTS to drop him there. I asked why he couldn't have asked them to drive him to his own damn car but he couldn't give me an answer. I was so overwhelmed and freaked out I didn't know what to do, but in the end I drove him to mine in silence, and he just thanked me as i walked to my house. I'm so angry. He had the entire day to get to his car. It would have taken him under an hour to bus to mine, under two if he'd walked. I wish I'd just left him at my work, but I don't know if that would really make me an AH


",AmItheAsshole
 for storming off angrily after my friends made plans without me?,"I've already talked to some people about this, namely my mom and brother, and the general consensus seems to be I overreacted, but I'd like a neutral opinion here (my brother and mom are both really biased towards the friends).

A little backstory, my friends have expressed in the past that they think I'm ignoring them as I've been spending a lot more time with other people. Granted, I kind of was ignoring them, as I had more fun with those other people, but in my eyes, I think I've stepped up my game since then.

So basically, I (M 17) was a bit late to meeting my friends (all M 17) at lunch break today. I had to talk to a few of my teachers about assignments and had to pick up lunch. Point is, I had reasons for being late that weren't stupid. When I got there, my friends were planning a hangout. Chill, right? They were around the beginning-middle of their conversation when I sat down to join them.

Not once did they ask me if I was free to join them all throughout planning this thing. Even though I was right there next to them, they just went on until they moved on to a different topic of conversation, hockey teams. Finally, around 10-ish minutes after they were done planning, and the conversation about hockey died down, did one friend (Dude A) turn to me and ask me if I was free to join them that Friday. WTF?? Why didn't he just ask me while they were planning?

Now here's where I might've been the asshole. I kinda curtly told them I wasn't free because of baseball practice, and just left to see other friends. Dude A called me a bit later to tell me I left my backpack with them, but that's about all I heard from them after I left. Dude A and I walked to class together a few hours after lunch, and tried to make small talk, but I shut most of it down. I will admit, I was very angry. 

I felt like an afterthought and like they completely ignored me for literally no reason. My mom and brother say that I'm taking this too far, because they did eventually ask, but if I was there for the planning, why tf didn't they just ask me then? Why make the plans, move on with the conversation, and THEN ask me?",AmItheAsshole
 for not paying the full cost of my friend’s laptop after an accident at my party?,"I hosted a small get-together last weekend. My friend decided to bring his brand-new laptop to show off some work. During the evening, as everyone was crowded around, I accidentally knocked over my drink, and it spilled on his laptop, which immediately stopped working.

He’s really upset, which I get. He’s saying it’ll cost a fortune to fix or replace. But here’s the context: he placed his laptop right in the middle of a busy party table that was loaded with drinks and snacks. It seemed like an accident waiting to happen.

He insists I should cover the entire cost of repairs or replacement. I offered to split the cost, considering the risky setup. I feel it’s somewhat his responsibility too, for placing such an expensive item in such a precarious spot during a lively gathering.

I’m willing to help because I feel bad about the situation, but I don’t think footing the entire bill is fair. He’s adamant I should pay it all. AITA for thinking we should share the responsibility?​",AmItheAsshole
H Not Seeing MIL for Mother’s Day ,"As I get closer to 40, I find it almost unbearable to do things for people based on duty or obligation alone. 

Context: My SO and I have been together for 14 years. My own mom passed in 2015 and my Dad has emotionally distanced himself from my brother (who lives across the country) and myself. He booked multiple cruises this last round of holidays. I have no kids. 

The issue that might make me an unintentional asshole: My MIL is upset that I have other plans on Mother’s Day. For the past few years I’ve made minimal effort to show up for holidays or her birthday. She got mad this past Easter when we only showed up to eat. I realize now it seemed rude to her. I was supposed to come early and help her cook. That was the expectation. I want her to realize I’m not interested in performing social roles or niceties just because.

When we arrived and I asked her how I could help, she looked at her boyfriend with a knowing side eye and said something about it being too late for that. I have chronic pain and fatigue and would’ve been happy with nothing/anything. She has a new boyfriend, so I assumed he would help her at the house. Whoops. 

With regards to Mother’s Day…my mom passed in 2015 and I like to spend the day how I choose. I’ve known my MIL for 14 years and we get along but are not close. I knew her when my mom passed and she’s never mentioned my mom since. She’s never asked me about myself. Who she thinks I am is based only on our interactions together. She doesn’t know my birthday. 

She’s not an outwardly manipulative person, and I’m not a doctor, but I suspect some level of narcissism. My SO is accepting of my choice and I love him for giving me freedom of choice for how and when I interact with his mom. He is loyal to his mom and will always look out for her. She wasn’t the best mom to him, but he overlooks and forgives because she’s the only family he has. I know he wants us all to be one happy family, but I’m just not willing at this point in my life to entertain someone else out of a sense of duty. 

AITAH for nearly cutting all time with MIL? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my online friend that I don’t care about his friends?,"This happened recently and I'm honestly not sure if I'm in the wrong.

So I (19F) met (21M), who we will call Toboe, in 2022 through a video game, a mutual online friend of ours introduced us to each other.

At first, we both didn't like each other. Toboe immediately didn't like me because he saw me as the ""popular kid"" with all the friends. He was never mean to me in-game because I was always surrounded by at least 5+ of my online friends.

I didn't like him because he kept trying to prove me wrong about everything as if I didn't know anything about the game we play.

So when we became friends eventually, we have had a lot of conflict and lots of arguments. He always tries to prove me wrong or say I'm in the wrong.

So, here's what recently happened: 

Toboe and I were arguing about pronouns.

I asked him if he could use they/them or something else in reference to me besides she/her. I often get insecure about my gender being told online and would rather people not know I'm a female online due to harassment I have received.

He got mad at me, saying that I'm not transgender and that I'm born a female IRL so that's what I am unless I come out as transgender.

Toboe has very strict rules when it comes to determining whether or not someone is transgender. If you don't check off his list then you're not transgender.

So, if you're not transgender, you have no right to use another pronoun than the one you're assigned to at birth.

After arguing about it, he claims I treat him unfairly and then he brings his transgender friends into it; saying they find it offensive when regular people treat pronouns like a pair of clothes.

I said that I have my own transgender friends who don't find me using another pronoun as offensive.

Toboe says he doesn't care what my transgender friends think and that he cares what his transgender friends think. Toboe then claims that his transgender friends would rather die than live with people with opinions like mine and my transgender friends.

And I told him I didn't care if his transgender friends died.

Toboe was furious with me after that, saying I'm in the wrong and that I am insensitive, coldhearted, and selfish.

I defended myself; asking him to remember that time he told me in the past that he hopes one of my friends die, and that he would say ""L"" if he learned that friend passed away.

Toboe then claims that my friend deserved being talked about like that because they were rude to him in the past.

I've never met Toboe's transgender friends. They've been ghosting him for years. All of Toboe's friends have been ghosting him for months or years.

Toboe struggles to maintain friendships because of how much he fights with all of them / because of his autism. When I say all of his friends ghosted him, I mean ALL of them.

My friends think I'm NTA, and one of them even said there's a reason he has no friends; another friend said I could've been a bit too harsh.

Toboe hasn't talked to me since.

So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to my best friend's wedding?,"In college, my best friend and I bonded because we had alot in common, but her consistent prioritization of her partners strained our friendship. During COVID, she faced family issues, breakup struggles, health problems, including getting COVID, affecting her mental health. I listened and helped her cope. Later, she persuaded me to move in. 

Living together highlighted our disconnect, she consistently chose another people over me, making me feel isolated and distant. I tried to spend time with them, but I felt like a third wheel. I know where I am wanted. She often iced me out attributing it to her being busy and  her own issues. This made living together uncomfortable. I often stayed in my room to avoid conflict. When I confronted her, she deflected blame, claiming I expected too much. When she began dating again, I felt sidelined as before. She spent all her time with her new partner, yet, when her relationship hit rough patches, I was expected to be her emotional support, despite feeling neglected. This strained our living situation and my mental health, especially amidst other challenges like workplace toxicity and family issues. I longed for her support but I was told my emotions were high maintain and that she didnt have time leading me to withdraw and reevaluate our friendship dynamic.

OTHER EXAMPLES:

When I excitedly shared news of my engagement, she seemed disinterested. She asked to see my ring  quickly saying it wasn't her favorite and she wouldn't have chosen it for herself (her ring now is identical to mine, she used pictures of it as an example for her jeweler) Despite hoping for her excitement, she appeared distracted, unengaged, had nothing nice to say. 

During a surprise trip with my fiancé and friends, my friend was going through a breakup and I got the usual cold shoulder. Despite my best efforts to comfort her, she continued to ice me out. At a dinner later, she seemed normal but as soon as we got home she was cold and distant again. Confronting her, she apologized, citing her breakup stress, and that it was easier to throw me aside during this time. While I didnt take that as an excuse, I tried once again to repair our friendship. 

Present:  
Eventually, I moved out for my mental well-being, briefly reconnecting before our communication dwindled again. Her tendency to cancel plans to spend time with others she claims to have no interest in maintaining friendships with after she moves has left me feeling sidelined. She recently got engaged and is busy wedding planning ( I even flew across the country to celebrate her and help her ring shop). Despite our shared history, I feel emotionally drained and used. AITA for being unsure about attending her wedding as we've grown apart?",AmItheAsshole
 for getting mad at my friend because she said i liked i guy i didn't?,"(i thinks thats how you spell did not, istg if my friends find this or my other post im dead)

So im 15f and my friend (lets call her Emmera, 15f). we both are in the same drama filled group. lets say Emmera is VERY EMOTIONAL. and gets hurt over little things. (my friend did not wanna match outfits with her and she cried over it) Emmera liked a dude named (lets say apple).

Apple had dated another one of our friends in the group. Alot of people in the group liked Apple, not dated, but liked. (I have a bf btw this becomes important later) I had never liked him but i played wingman for my friends.

we became good friends and he had confessed to me once but i said i was sorry and dint like him back. Emmera who had liked Apple dint beileve that but we got over it.

Apple texted me with song lyrics he had made. i joked about them (it was along the lines of him wishing he could be with someone) At the time he liked Emmera and i had asked if it was her?  He said no, i had tried to ask many times who but he didn't say. i ignored it until he told it was me, he had joked this a few times but he was serious. he apologized and i informed Emmera and my bf about this. I told him to not talk to me until he lost feelings since it made me uncomfortable.

Timeskip to yesterday, he said he had lost feelings and we became friends again. Emmera was still upset saying i liked him when i didn't. I hadn't minded it though because she dose this alot. She got over it or so i thought. Today at lunch she said, ""I know you like apple so just talk to him or something its so obvious"" I got really pissed, but said calmly ""I dont, please understand that, Neither you or him can understand i have a bf who i seriously care about. we've been through shit and yeah he might not be the best looking but still""  (I dont remeber it fully but along the lines of these) I told my friends later that im getting pissed that she cant understand that just because he likes me dosent mean i like him. Emmera has been pissed about it all day and continues to talk about him and ask if we talk privately. which i said yes because were friends but if she wants to look over the texts she can.

So yeah ive been mad at her and she knows it. But am i the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking to be reimbursed?,"For starters, I did let the owner know of what happened, but all she said was, “I’m so sorry.” and left it at that. I agreed to watch over this puppy for 8 days. Little did I know, she had a penchant for nibbling on anything and everything in sight – my ethernet cable, laptop charger, shop-vac, and even some boxes fell victim to her teething tendencies.

Here's the kicker: the owner is my boyfriend's cousin, a 17-year-old barely scraping by on minimum wage, who compensated me $75 for my trouble. Meanwhile, her parents are sitting pretty with ample financial resources. So, as a 24-year-old woman, would it be fair for me to approach the parents about covering the damages, considering they likely have the means to do so, or should I let it go and not watch the dog again?

ETA: we were not told she had a chewing problem, nor did they give us any chew toys. we had to buy some in hopes to stop her from eating our stuff. it didn’t help
ETA 2: i did not know the dog was a puppy until about 2 days later when i brought up the incident. ",AmItheAsshole
? I am straight. My gay roommate told me everyone thinks we are a couple,"My gay friend of many years was kind enough to let me rent me his spare rooms after my divorce. He’s one of my best friends and we go eat together, ride bikes and go on walks occasionally, and have a large group of friends. I have 2 teenage children that are my world. They stay with me half the time. This evening after some drinks he said, “you know everyone in the neighborhood thinks we are a couple?” I was taken aback. “No, I didn’t know that, why would you say that?” “Well, we spend a lot of time together and that’s the belief around town now!” I told him I didn’t like this rumor, cause it isn’t the truth and I don’t want this lie putting me in a difficult position with my kids. I have raised them very socially aware and inclusive and tolerant. He was super offended that I didn’t want to be labeled gay, even though I am straight. He called me a jerk for even caring what people think about my sexuality, and I told him it’s my right to care what people think. I feel gaslighted and manipulated. AITA for taking a stance in this scenario?! 

*Edit #1* 
For more context about the situation…I have woken up and he has been next to me in bed without my permission. He gets drunk and flirty and touchy and I have to tell him to please stop. I’ve established boundaries but he pushes them too far and it makes me uncomfortable. This is why I feel like he has feelings and maybe pushing the idea of being a couple, which I absolutely do not want with him! I’m not homophobic in the slightest, but don’t touch me without my permission and don’t assume I want to be a couple with you. I pay my bills, I just want a roommate, nothing more. 

*Edit #2*
Don’t use Reddit much but now realize I should have clarified the edits. I didn’t add the context in edit #1 cause it’s was an entirely different issue in my mind. I see how it correlates now. Not trying to save face. These are details that probably do matter to the entire situation. Going to have a conversation with him about physical boundaries. 

",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my roommate and her friend to do NSFW streaming out of our apartment?,"My (30F) roommate, Vera (31F), has an old friend, Leslie (35F), that's had a lot of success with kink-oriented online streaming. Leslie came to visit for a few weeks, streamed while here, and Vera was..inspired to say the least. Can't say I blame her. The money's good, you make your own schedule for the most part. They did a few sessions together and then Leslie went back to her country. I was supportive of Vera continuing streaming but she eventually lost interest/motivation. 

Now, many months later, she has another friend, Paris (~30F), who is local to us and interested in streaming. They want to stream out of the apartment. AITA for not feeling comfortable with that? Vera doesn't see the difference and says I should be cool with this since I let her and Leslie stream here, but I was only ok with it then because there was an expiration date (Leslie's departure) - though tbf I didn't vocalize that at the time. Idk I don't want her to think I'm shaming sex work but while Leslie was streaming here they would randomly walk around in lingerie and also be weird about when I could be in the apartment. Trying to see both sides. 

Side note: Paris lives at home with her parents so streaming there isn't really an option",AmItheAsshole
: My mother had my ex (narcissist and abusive) contact my eldest child (not his) to tell my youngest son (his) happy birthday and I said no?,"TLDR: My ex-boyfriend blocked me after I got mad that he wouldn't help with his son that he guilts everyone about not having a relationship with - so my mother tells him to contact my other child (12) to avoid speaking to me. I don't let him have unsupervised contact with my son because he's emotionally abusive and my son is autistic.

-----

In the middle of March, I needed help financially and I don't ever ask my ex for help for anything because he's always broke. He doesn't call his child, he refuses to try and spend time with him, and says he feels awful for not having any money so he doesn't want to look bad *eye roll*. I asked him for just $40, and he said no which is fine - I get it you're broke. He then went off on me for acting like I'm holier that thou (meaning that I don't complain to him or often appear to him to need financial help) which yes upset me - and I told him that was not fair and he yelled and got loud calling me a narcissist.

I (not proudly) reacted by yelling that he deserved all the pain that he gets. He hung up on me and blocked me on everything. Out of pettiness, I blocked him also because haha if you unblock me you're blocked (I know, childish).

My eldest child (12, and not his child) has had him blocked because they have nightmares after he texts them. They have CPTSD because of the emotional turmoil this man put us through, so even in kind conversation - anxiety rises, depression comes back, etc. 

Today my mom calls me and tells me that my ex has been trying to get ahold of my eldest child (12, not his) so he can talk to his son, my youngest. I was immediately appalled and told her it was very inappropriate for him to be going through my kid for this. She doesn't see a problem with it. She knew I had him blocked but did not know he had also blocked me. So to see if he had attempted to reach out - I unblocked him only to see I was still blocked from his end. 

I told her that if he wants to be a part time parent to look decent by just saying happy birthday and not being willing to do anything else for his child, he'd at least have to be an adult and contact me to do this. Not my other child. He says he will not. My mom is upset because she says 'She just wanted him to tell his son Happy Birthday' (we won't get into the fact it sounds like this was all her idea and he may not have had the thought in the first place). She is telling me I'm responsible for keeping him out of his life and acting like the only factor in this is that I blocked him.

Am I the asshole? Or am I crazy and not seeing things clearly?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling someone they're not special or a better person for owning a cat?,"I'm sure I'll get a lot of hate for this, but here we go.

I was recently getting dinner with a few friends who I'll call Jim, Rachel, Blake, Ray, and Cassity, though only Jim, Rachel, and Blake are important to the story. 

First, Jim has a cat. He always talks about how his cat secretly hates him and how cats hate their owners and plotting against them. Fine, it's a dumb overblown joke (and I question anyone who seriously believe cats hate their owner), but I tolerate it.

However, the last time we hung out, Jim, Rachel, and Blake brought up how cats only accept attention on their own terms and it means that people who own cats or like cats better than other animals are more empathetic and understand consent better than everyone else.

Rachel specifically said that left winged people only own cats while it's right winged people who own dogs, but I digress. I am pretty left winged, but they ignored that point, though I would like to get my dog a kitty friend soon.

They said their proof is that unlike dogs, cats only tolerate a certain amount of affection. I brought up that dogs also have a limited threshold for attention and some dogs get annoyed if you smother them too much and some cats can't get enough of it. I also know people who force affection on their cat and have a former friend who is extremely far right who prefers cats.

They rolled their eyes and accused me of lying. So I said (and I'm sure this will get me termed the AH by many people) that fine, if cats having a limited threshold for attention means people who own them understand consent and are empathetic, then they must also enjoy putting animals and people into abusive relationships since in their own words, cats hate their owner and are plotting against them. They're forcing their cats to stay in a one sided relationship and if they (the owners) weren't abusers, they wouldn't force creatures who hate them to live with them against their will.

(And before anyone says anything, no, I do not believe that. It was a joke and an attempt to prove a point, while Jim, Rachel, and Blake honestly believe the empathy and consent thing).

They told me to grow up, and that I was just trying to be rude and make them look stupid.

Anyway, AITA?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
: Need help with sibling drama,"AITA: Hello y’all, so about a 3 weeks ago I went on a trip and had my sister watch my dog and cat. I paid her and gave her extra money to buy my dog dog food because he was running out. I get home and I see there is no more dog food and I don’t see my spare key anywhere. I text her and she says she has it… this is kinda usual for her to forget or what have you so I was like “ok can you bring both over sometime this week?” She said sure… however almost every other day I ask if she can bring it over that week she says she’s too tired or doesn’t feel like it. Fast forward to the weekend and my thesis is due Monday night. I am getting a MA in art education so I had to make some artwork as well along w my thesis. I have been staying up most nights painting or working on the writing part of my thesis so come Saturday morning I had a huge headache in the morning and decided to take a nap before I began working again. I also had plans that night to go on a date to an improve show that I already paid for. As I am almost asleep I see my sister is calling me… I decide not to answer bc I was already about to sleep anyways. Well no more than 10 minutes later, I do fall asleep but I here my front door open. It wakes me up and freaks me out and I slowly get up to see what’s going on. It’s my sister… and she has this sheepish smile and she just like fake innocently smiles and says “heyyyy”. I am infuriated. Not only was I awoken from my nap and now my headache is even worse from being startled, she uses my house keys that I wanted back a week ago to enter my house!!! I began yelling at her saying that this is not cool and she was crossing boundaries. And she just screamed back saying, “well you don’t know what I’ve been through!” I am tired and irritated and tell her to leave and leave my keys. I got back to my room to try to sleep again but I can hear she is still here. 5 minutes later she knocks on my door and peeps her head in with another stupid smile. I tell her again how violated I feel and I want her to leave. Anyways she doesn’t and I guess she was hungover so that’s why she came over?? So she is now puking in my toilet super loudly which is right next to my bedroom. Keep in mind she has her own apartment and my parents place only 5 minutes away. She even calls our mom to come pick her up so she could have went to her to begin with! She is also 25 and a grown ass adult and teacher… She wanted me to “comfort her”. Anyways I haven’t spoken to her in weeks and we were both invited to a cousins graduation… I want to go but I’m still so mad at her and she hasn’t apologized yet AND according to my mother, she sees me at fault and wants me to reach out to her first to apologize. I don’t feel like I did anything wrong and feel baffled by this whole ordeal. But honestly my sister has been the princess since she was a child and I really think she can not see her own faults. What are your thoughts?",AmItheAsshole
 for giving away my dad and my sister's tickets to my graduation ceremony and telling them to not bother showing up,"I (18F) have my high school graduation ceremony this Wednesday. It was sent to my parents in an email that I will be giving a speech that day as my grades made me valedictorian of my school's class of 2024, and I was excited to do so. My school made us reserve and buy tickets to the ceremony weeks in advance, and I picked mine up on the 26th. 

The problem started at dinner when I told my family I picked up the tickets for my graduation day and would keep them with me until the day of just to make sure they don't get lost. My dad told me that he and my sister had plans for an hour before the ceremony, but that my mom would be there the whole time, and that they'd try to be there for the afterparty. I was honestly shocked for a moment, before starting to laugh, assuming they weren't serious. 

When I realized they actually weren't joking, I'll admit I was a bit mad. I'm usually a very shy and non-confrontational person, even around my family, but I started yelling at my dad and sister, asking if they were seriously ditching my graduation ceremony. I told them that the afterparty was useless to attend, and that all the pictures of the graduates with their families would be taken at least 2 hours before the ceremony. They said it's fine and we can take our own pictures the day after my graduation, but I got up and left dinner. 

Over the weekend, I saw a few people on my class group chat complain that they didn't get enough tickets, so I offered up the two tickets I had, and met up with a girl from my class to give them to her, and even though I told her not to, she actually paid me the original price for them. 

When the topic of graduation was brought up by my dad today during lunch, I told him that I gave the other two tickets away and only my mom will be attending, so they shouldn't bother with the afterparty. He got mad and asked why I would do that, to which I replied that I don't see the point in wasting money on tickets if they're not going to use them. My dad blew up on me, saying I'm acting like a spoiled brat, and it's not like I'll die if he and my sister are a bit late to my graduation. 

I spoke to a few people about it, my friends and my grandma. My friends said good riddance and if they consider their plans more important, they can have fun. But my grandma said that while she understands my side, I shouldn't have given away the tickets just to spite my dad, because maybe he would have changed his mind and gone on time. So I'm looking for a non-biased opinion. AITA?

Edit for info: the plans my dad and sister have is some sleepover with her and her friend group in the north, around a 2 hour drive from where we live. The parents didn’t want to leave a bunch of under 16 year old girls alone that far, so everyone’s parents are also going for supervision (apart from my mom who is going to be at my graduation)",AmItheAsshole
 for accepting my single mother's wedding gift?,"I come from a family of 3 brothers and I'm the oldest brother. We were raised by a single mother who did her best and worked to the bone to get herself thru university while we were kids. My mom is now a successful and independent professional 58 yr old and us boys are adults ranging from 27-37 all living in Canada.   
I'm the first in my family (including my mom) to be married. I had a happy engagement to my (now) wife and both of our families were involved in healthy ways. As a gift to us, my wife's family paid $10,000 towards the wedding, which covered most of it. My mom offered to pay for an open bar, which we graciously accepted ($800 US dollars).   
Once my middle brother found out we accepted my mother's gift to pay for the bar a switch happened. I didn't know until after, but as we were having our wedding in the USA, he actively stopped trying to renew his passport to attend at this time. He did not tell me. 2 weeks before the wedding he messaged the family group chat advising he was ""too sick"" and ""too poor"" to attend. I messaged and called him right away (to offer to help and/or pay for him to attend) and did not hear from him until 2 days later. He advised our mother owed him money and he was in a rage that she had offered to pay for the bar while owing him. I did not know this at the time of accepting her gift and did not know how to respond.   
I ended up essentially telling him to mind his own business - to give my mom autonomy over her finances and also to stop being tacky (my opinion) and he advised he would not be attending the wedding under these circumstances. My youngest brother stepped up as my best man, my mom was devastated and me and my wife were hurt by his absence. The wedding was still the best day of my life and all other family bonded and came together.   
We are now 6 months after the wedding and my brother and I have still not spoken, except for once around Christmas when I messaged him to clear the air before seeing each other in person and he called me entitled and spoiled and said he would not be attending Christmas if I was there. I went to Christmas anyways, he did not, and we haven't spoken since. AITA for accepting my single mom's gift and how this all went down?   
\*\*\*An interesting aside to this story is my mom never \*actually paid\* for the bar. The invoice was never sent and after many attempts to contact them and pay, they never sent us a bill and have closed down. I've never gotten to tell my brother this, and haven't mentioned it on principle.   
",AmItheAsshole
 For stating my point?,"Context : I live in a former communist country and I am currently in University. I'll be an Electrical Engineer the next month. Where I live corruption is rampant and that frustrates the crap out of me. I get people as classmates who have no business with electrical engineering. Cheating is a big thing here. 

I accused a girl that I offered electronics tutoring of cheating(different course). She and a friend of hers terrorized me to take them in because they took up a complex thesis which they knew nothing about. In the end she did cheat, by using the last year's exam. She flew into a rage when I made the allegation telling me that she was apalled by my behaviour.

The problem is that I finished the tutoring by December of 2023 and as of today I still haven't been fully paid. I only got 50%. Her friend didn't even give me a dime. For context, I charged each one 150 euros total for 6 tutoring lessons(25 euros per lesson)
I did my job and explained the concepts needed by them in their thesis work. They seemed happy. We started in September 2023 and finished in December 2023. 

I was accused of being vain, calling people who knew nothing about our field humps(this one is actually true and I admit it), and being greedy (median income in our country is 850 euros, and a good rental flat costs 300 euros).

I also have to do most of the reports in our team for 9/10 courses because she simply knows nothing. If I ask for help I get seen messages or : 'I'll figure it out"" which means I'll do nothing. She also brought a different friend of hers that does nothing. It has been like this for the past 3 years. I do have to admit that she helped me in the first year of Uni, in two classes but that's it. I offered to pay her then and there but she declined and that was it. Years 2,3 and 4 I was the main worker in our team. I pumped the reports, did the lab work and helped the others.

She confronted me today about calling the people who cheated humps. I told her it was an ugly thing to say but I admitted it and revealed my frustrations with the whole ordeal. I was called insensitive, mean, greedy and other stuff. I offered to pay her the 50% back and told her friend to simply forget about any money.

Am I the asshole for acting like this and confronting her? I talked face to face with her. Then she sent me some messages.

Thank you.
",AmItheAsshole
 for not answering my grandmas call,"I'm gen z and man are the generations so far different between mannerisms, etiquette, etc... I grew up to be respectful to always say thank you, I don't consider my childhood the best majority of the time my parents were the ones making me cry over silly little things and those traumas stuck with me. they don't realize the amount of negatively they've throw onto me they are not educated at all in mental health. 100% sure my mom has some form of anxiety bc she definitely is not self aware that's for damn sure! dad on the other hand I feel has adhd or is just at least somewhere on the spectrum, again he don't know shit about any of that but I see it everyday. now I have some common sense. I have a love-hate relationship with my parents and oh boy imagine if they knew they were the problem. a lot of the times it's a "" well he said, she said"" convos between both my parents and they just keep adding more flames to the fire. so my grandma calls my mom idk maybe everyday? I'm enrolled in a program that helps me find a job but I'm technically unemployed so I have a lot of time on my hands. the thing I hate is someone telling me what to do, I've always been that way and I especially don't want to hear what you have to say if you were just gonna keep telling me the same shit over again like what sense does that make? that's why I low-key feel I'm still stuck in child like mindset because I am sensitive still and have actually did just find out I have a form of mood disorder and little very LITTLE amount of anixety ( partially bc I think in my head a lot). so I feel I have that to blame for the way of I'm thinking about this. so back to the topic my grandma has been calling me a lot recently informing me about what jobs I should apply for and I think it's great she cares but she's all about just work a job just for the money "" who cares if you're happy"" type person 🙂. and I explained to her this program I'm doing to help find a job and the right career for me and it's like I was talking to a brick wall, it's because she doesn't know what yet I'm doing and I'm assuming doesn't understand it. so keep in mind my mom informs my grandma on what all us children are doing and such. so AITA for not answering my grandmas call when she's just gonna keep repeating the same thing to me about jobs and wondering when I'm going to start to working? I'm tired of hearing the same shit over &amp; over I have a goal in life so just let me be and try to achieve it! ( I might be going to school for a career I had in mind) . what I'm getting at is I don't have any new information for everyone who is so concerned about what I want to do in my life it's annoying man.. ( sorry I'm not a singer who goes on world tours, a actor, or painter!) there's nothing interesting about my life. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not celebrating mother's day?,"  
I'm 19 years old, raised by typical Asian parents, and my family doesn't really care about any holiday other than lunar new year. I had made my mom a card and a portrait when I was at elementary school , however when she saw this, she doesn't show any appreciation to my work . She just starts to point out the grammar and spelling mistake I got, and complained about how I drew her eyes too small, and how bad I was with the color. She even claimed she is being a good mom to correct me because it can make me a better person. After this Mother's day, I decided never celebrate mother's day again because her action had really hurt my feeling. 

However, last year, my aunt asked me how would I celebrate mother's day with my mom. I just told her I didn't do anything special about mother's day. After that she just called me a brat, who don't honor my mom and appreciate her work. After that she just talked about how she gave her mom a nice luxury holiday in Mexico, and the Gucci bag she got for her mom as a gift. I was wondering about am I being a bad person for not forgiving my mom 's action that she did when I was an elementary school.",AmItheAsshole
 for pressuring my brother?,"I am 36 F and my brother is 37 M. About 8 months ago our father died from his health issues. The police had to break down the door to get to him. This will be significant later.

At the will reading, my brother volunteered to be the will executer (liquidator). I agreed with him because it is also the oldest who get those responsibilities in our family.

So, I started a conversation with my brother about what we should do and that I wanted to take care of the house (cleaning, throw out the old cloths and food...). He said that he didnt need my help and to sit and wait. He changed the busted door and lock. Now I don't have access to the house.

He also asked me for a salary, because ""I don't want my work to benefit you in any manner."". If I refused, he would give up his role and give it to a lawyer or notary. Now, I have to say that he is a CEO of his company and has millions in the bank and I am jobless and full of anxiety  (due to abuse in my childhood and teenage years). So, he said that it will cost us around 20k to 30k if someone else were to take care of it and he doesn't mind paying because ""unlike you, I can afford it.""  So I had to agree and he had me put it on paper.

I had a panic attack, because after all that he still refused to give me access to the house. I wanted to get a momento and clean because I felt I needed it to say goodbye. I told him all that, but he said it wasn't necessary. I was so angry and sad and anxious that I had a break down and told him I would go hang myself in the house to spite him. 

I told him it was wrong of me to say that because I didn't mean it and I would never do it. He agreed by saying he never saw me like that before and it was out of character. BUT now he is holding it over my head and telling me I am not mentally stable, so he can't give me acces to the house.

He succeeded in breaking my spirit, I had to stop fighting for my mental health. So, instead I can only keep watch and wait.

So, now I am asking him update on the procedure. I ask him for proof of his transactions, I am asking for all the results of the appraisals of my father assets. So far, he gave me nothing (because by law, he only has to do it once everything is finished).

He is getting angry and told me I am asking too many questions and I am demanding too much by asking for copies of everything. I put too much pression on him. Our mother is telling me to stop speaking to him and to stop asking him questions. Some of my friends also say I should wait for it to end and stop speaking to him.

Now, I am still asking him when the process will be finished nand i only get ""I dont know, I will tell you if there is something."" It has been weeks and I keep asking and people keep telling me to stop putting pressur on him.

Also, he won't steal from me, but you can be sur he will profit of any loopholes to get more.

So, AITA for pressuring my brother about getting update and copies of the papers?",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad at my friends for leaving me?,"TLDR: My friends stopped being friends with me without an explanation.

Around two weeks ago I was sent a message from my friend(who we'll call Bob) detailing the following ""Hey lost siren. We need to talk. I know you may be able to tell but I have been growing distant. After some self-reflection, I have realized I don't think I am a good suit to be your friend. You are amazing and smart, and this doesn't affect how amazing you are. I just, I just don't think this is working out and I don't wanna lie to you. I'm  sorry."" It seemed extremely ungenuine and seemed out of nowhere, Bob had multiple times requested and begged to hang out with me and my mom. We had also planned to go to a concert and had cancelled the day I was about to order tickets. Before this, I had realized that I had been uninvited to many events and began to be increasingly ignored by my friend group of five.

   I was invited to parties after this and everyone has sided with her except for one. I've begun to question if part of the reason is my boyfriend which I highly doubt since he is quiet and rather shy keeping to himself. The large reason I have found this to affect me is my ADHD I tend to not understand social cues and it takes me a long time to unmask and open up to people. Around Christmas of 2023 is where I truly started being myself and that's when I started being pushed away. The most ironic part of this all is one of my friends the rest wanted to quote on quote ""kick out"" and when I called them out they called me crazy. That friend is still in the group and everyone has ignored me and won't explain anything. Maybe I don't deserve an explanation but it's so frustrating.

So? AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my friend copy my test?,"I'm a highschool freshman in Biology 1 (honors, if it's relevant). My friend, I'll call her Layla, is in the same class as me, and I've known her since 7th grade. I sit in front of her, and have since the start of the semester. She pays attention (sort of?) but never takes notes. She's always asking me for answers on tests, which I don't mind sometimes, but I really don't want to get in trouble for cheating. I keep trying to tell Layla to take notes and take initiative to go to after school tutoring if she needs to, and she doesn't.

Today, we had a test on our current unit. Layla spammed me in the morning begging to copy off my test. I told her I'd think about it, and she sounded kind of desparate so I felt bad, but kind of already decided I wasn't going to let her. I want her to learn her lesson and start studying and stuff, and I feel like that made me not want to give her answers.

Bio rolls around, I'm doing some last second studying since I haven't really been paying attention either and I don't want to fail, when I get a text from Layla, asking me to let her copy off me. I was already a little annoyed from Layla spamming my phone this morning, so I told her that she should have taken notes like I've been constantly telling her to and I don't want her success to be dependent on my performance. I also said I don't want to get in trouble for cheating, and that her only plan was to copy off my test, and now she's probably going to fail because I doubt she studied or anything. 

Now I'm worried Layla failed her test, and I'm nervous that it's on me. I'm also worried that I was too harsh. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" for not telling my 3yo nephew to call my gf ""auntie"" and telling her off when she scolded him for doing it?","for some background infor, my (21M) gf (20F) have been dating for about 3 years but she only met my extended family this year. among them, is my 3 year old nephew whom i now often babysit because his dad (my cousin) recently moved in near where my family live.  
  
i wasn't around my gf met my nephew but when they did, my parents told him to refer to her as auntie in chinese and she told me she wasn't happy with that since my nephew has always refered to me as big brother in korean because that's just what his dad told him to address me as and neither me nor my parents had a problem with it. when i asked why, she said it made her feel old but and i guess i just shrugged it off since i thought the reasoning sounded pretty vain and i couldn't really tell if she was joking.  
  
this afternoon, when we both visited her at work, my nephew greeted her as aunt again and she sternly demanded him to never call her ""aunt"" and to call her ""big sister"" in chinese. i could tell my nephew got a little scared by the tone and how stern she was so i told my gf to not speak to him in that manner since he was just a child. we then proceeded to get into an argument over how she told me to tell my nephew to not address her as auntie but i have never done so so she had to take things to her own hand.  
  
i kept trying to stress that the whole honorific thing wasn't that deep and it's not worth confusing nor upsetting my nephew over but she said that it just makes her feel old when my own nephew calls me ""brother"" but she gets referred to as aunt.  
  
aita?  
  
info: i feel like this is needed but we're both chinese so she was raised with the same honorific system. she too has her own nieces and nephews who address her accordingly but she just has an issue with my nephew calling me ""brother"" and her ""aunt""",AmItheAsshole
: Didn’t want to give an older lady a ride home,"Yesterday after church we stopped at a gas station less than 1 minute from where we live. It was me (31F), my boyfriend (36M, driving) and my 14 month old in the car. I was on my phone and then suddenly he was opening the backseat door to let a middle aged lady (maybe 60 years old?) in with her grocery bags. Apparently she was asking people for a ride home and he accepted. 

On the way there they were chatting and he even pointed out where we live, which really concerned me. She lived quite far away from the gas station and I was surprised she said she walked there, thought it wasn’t more than 5 mins away. 

I was really upset that my boyfriend let a stranger into our backseat with our daughter. The lady was very nice, but these days you have no idea if people are carrying a knife or a gun on them… I told him I wished he could have at least had her sit up front so she wasn’t near our toddler, or dropped us off at home first then went back to get her (that would have taken 3 minutes to do). 

I brought this up to my bf. He got really mad at me for “being un-Christ like” and called me a shit person who lives in fear. I am honestly quite the opposite and usually quite trusting of people, just not when it comes to my daughter. She’s too young to talk or understand things. Also was pissed at home for what felt like weaponizing religion against me for my concern. 

Im feeling really guilty because it’s not that I don’t think it was sweet he wanted to give her a ride home. I just had a mom instinct to protect my daughter. This all led to a huge argument between us. Do you think overreacted? 

Edit: I think the gesture was very compassionate, and understand if someone asks you for a ride then there is obviously a desire to help and bit of awkwardness declining. I don’t question his desire to help her, nor do I turn down opportunities in my life to help others. But I also want to say that she was by no means elderly/immobile/incapable as some people are implying. You should give middle aged women a bit more credit",AmItheAsshole
 for not accepting my parents money on my wedding,"I (28M) am getting married in exactly 12 months. My GF and I have been saving some money for it in the last year, and thankfully, we have the complete budget already in our bank account. So it is safe to say we are quite ""confortable"" with the expenses.

The thing is that my parents are insisting that they are willing to help us pay for maybe 20 to 30% of the wedding costs. It might sound like a bargain, but there Is a catch.

With money, my parents are kind of difficult, and feel like they are entitled to have power over me or my decisions, and start making comments that I really dislike. For example, even after ten years, they live constantly reminding me how much they paid for my high school education (I live in Latin America, and here is very normal to have private education), and even if they do not do it on purpose, I feel like I ""owe"" this money to them.

In the past, I even had lent money to my parents (a big amount for how much I was earning back then), and to the day, they have never paid me back. And they never did a single thing to start paying me back (like giving me in small amounts or something like that). And when I asked them about it, they were just putting excuses.

So, I don't know if I would be the AH if I just refuse to accept the money from my parents because I don't want them to feel entitled to have all this comments on ""how much they spent on me"".

Or should I just invent an excuse on not accepting the money?

PS: Don't get me wrong, I am very thankful with my parents for their intention of giving me money for my wedding, and even more for the education I had. I would be nowhere without their effort, I just dislike their comments.",AmItheAsshole
[PA] Nanny injured her back laying my baby down in crib. What am I liable for?,"This is in Pennsylvania. Nanny is on the books, taxed and everything.

Our nanny was setting our baby down in her new crib for a nap this afternoon, but suffered intense lower back pain coming back up. The crib is not elevated; it's on the floor, with ~3ft netted walls.

Earlier that morning, we did a test run on the new crib and our nanny successfully laid down our baby with no issues. I also walked her through different ways to approach it if it's too hard, like stepping into the crib and kneeling down to lay our baby down, or unzipping the side wall and going in horizontally.

I have cameras all throughout the house, so I have footage and audio of everything.

Nanny is currently at the hospital getting X-rays. No one is threatening legal action right now, but just want to get my bearings in case shit gets real.

Questions:

• I love our nanny. She's amazing. I want to cover her medical bills, but I'm worried this counts as an admission of guilt. Should I not do that?

• I know homeowner's insurance covers slip-and-falls for guests. Would that cover the nanny's injury?

• PA does not require worker's comp for house workers, like gardeners, cooks, and nannies. Does that increase the likelihood that she'd sue?

EDIT: To the people hung up on the crib, the [product website](https://guavafamily.zendesk.com/hc/en-us/articles/220620187-Can-I-use-the-Lotus-Crib-as-my-primary-crib) confirms it can be used as a permanent crib, and the [AAP](https://www.aap.org/en/patient-care/safe-sleep/) says that any type of crib, bassinet, or playpen can be used for safe sleep.",AskLawyers
"[NC] speeding ticket, looking for insight because the lawyer I hired hasn’t been very helpful….","Got a speeding ticket in North Carolina. Ticket states that I was doing 30mph over the speed limit, but that’s wrong. The road that is listed on my ticket, speed limit would only put me at 20mph over the limit. I told my lawyer this and they said it’s not worth fighting the ticket, and if I do want to fight it, they wanna charge me like $1000, which seems ridiculous. But my concern is that because the ticket is technically wrong (I have proof) the difference between the 30 over v. 20 over is a CnR charge, which I don’t want on my record at all as well as trying to find the time to do a driving course and 30 hours of community service. It’s been about 3yr. since my last ticket which I had the same law office handle and that was damn near a 30 over and they got it reduced. I’m sure with my current charge (30 over) I don’t qualify for a Pray for Judgement. I’ve reached out to the police office that wrote the ticket (awaiting response) to see if he can correct it or whatever. Is it worth me firing the lawyer and trying to handle this myself? Do I need to get a different lawyer? I don’t know what to do and I’ve already paid the lawyer $500.",AskLawyers
[NY] Attorneys,"Applying for guardianship 

Hey folks. I’m seeking a little information on how I can assist my aunt. She’s been hospitalized for almost 8 weeks. She appointed her (50+) year boyfriend/business partner as her proxy. All their finances are intermingled with each other. He is 93 years old, she is 76. He has essentially abandoned her at this facility and won’t respond to anybody’s messages/calls for information on her condition.

My father would’ve been the next of kin but he passed away at the end of February. The hospital is now to the point where they have started to give me information and would like me to make decisions on her behalf. The problem is how everything is going to be paid for because I’m positive her partner is going to start hiding/pillaging her money the moment he finds out I’m involved.

I’ve done some research and understand I will likelihood need to file an article 81 to give me guardianship of her person and or property to really be able to help her. I’ve already been quoted retainers of $4,500/$6,500. Do these seem like reasonable amounts for NYC? Are there anything besides filling for guardianship that would be more appropriate? Any guidance would be greatly appreciated.",AskLawyers
[NY]: Is there a reason Trumps Lawyers didn't just ask a million questions and delay the trial for another year? ,[NY]: Is there a reason Trumps Lawyers didn't just ask a million questions and delay the trial for another year? ,AskLawyers
[AL] How does job quality compare between legal assistants and attorneys? ,"So I'm a recent college grad. I've studied for the LSAT a good bit. I worked as a runner/receptionist for a year and a half when I was in college and it was fun, but I had to leave to go home for a summer when COVID hit and my position was filled. Now that I've graduated, I worked in an intake/legal assistant position. It was awful. Office managers (who weren't lawyers) would constantly watch us at our desks on security cameras and the micro management was terrible, to say the least. I was let go my second full week there, which I'm not really gonna get into. I should've recognized it being a red flag when I got an offer the day after my first and only \~30 minute interview and realizing on my first day there that the most senior person on the intake team had only been there for about 10 months. However, the attorneys seemingly didn't get this same treatment.

So my question is this: is this a common thing in the industry? Do lawyers get treated this same way? Or was this just a particularly bad experience? I'm really starting to question if I even want to go to law school after this happened to me. My LSAT motivation has tanked, and I'm starting to consider other industries.

Any advice? Thanks!",AskLawyers
[Tx] Do part-time interns get overtime pay?,"I started a new job in Feb 2024; I was hired as a 16-hour-per-week intern. However, my supervisor left around march, letting the company dumping all of her responsibility on me. she was a full time employee and now i constantly have to work over time, closer to 22 hours per week. my boss wouldn't pay any overtime because my total work hour is under 40 hours. Can they do this??? or do I need to be paid the 1.5-hour overtime payment?",AskLawyers
[non-US] Advice needed: UK Ltd company start-up wind down ,"
Hi all, I run a startup in the form of a UK limited company. Unfortunately, we’re struggling to raise money and are running out of cash. I would like to keep payroll running for as long as possible for 2 reasons: 1) it’s critical to keep certain staff (eg software engineer) if we want to remain viable / have a fighting chance to keep trying fundraising until we’re out of cash, and 2) we rate our employees highly and would like to give them as much runway as possible to find other roles if needed.

One way I can extend my runway is to stop paying my office lease. It’s due next in 10 days, and we’re considering simply not making the payment. Now here’s the thing: we’re technically committed until the end of Aug with no option to break, so we would be in breach of contract.

I’m wondering, what are the legal considerations here? We’re technically not insolvent yet, so could make rent for another month or two. If I stop paying, would this have any impact on my ability to keep paying payroll / keep the business going?",AskLawyers
[WA] What’s the right answer?,"I’ll give as much detail as I can here, while keeping names and such out. I rent from a private party in WA state. The home is within a community with an HOA. A few days ago, I received a notice on my door from a property management company, stating that I now pay rent to them. When I asked my landlord about it, she had no clue what I was talking about. Attached to the notice was a court document (approx 6 pages) naming the PM company to be paid rent, along with giving eviction power, etc. This transcript was not signed or dated. I’ve received calls and texts from the PM company, and they are alleging that this happened because the homeowner (landlord) has back HOA dues. My question is simply: who do I pay? I have not entered a Lease with the PM company, so it’s quite confusing.",AskLawyers
[VA] Can a medical facility be sued for their patients information getting hacked?,"Not sure if anyone here has heard about it, but all Octapharma Plasma Donation Centers across the entire country have been closed since yesterday (and will remain closed tomorrow) because of ""network issues"" according to them. I looked around and a fair amount of people, including employees, are saying they were hacked and donor's medical information has been stolen. I was donating there for about a month or two pretty consistently to get some extra cash, my last donation being about two weeks ago (got busy at work and didn't have time to go since then). Is this something a class action law suit could be filed over? I'm wondering if any compensation might be a possibility. I know hackers are out of their control which makes me doubt it, but I'm also seeing some employees saying how their cyber security has always been lacking and didn't know if there was any legal obligation on their end to protect patient information better than they have? Thanks!",AskLawyers
[FL] What would happen if I visited Florida with the gender marker on my license changed?,"If I got my gender marker changed on my license in my home state and visited Florida, would they still be able to charge me with fraud? I haven't found anything online in regards to this.",AskLawyers
[VA] Stanley lawsuit: lead exposure and mold,"So, with this whole lead in Stanley cups thing blowing up lately, I find myself in an interesting and frustrating situation. I have a few Stanley cups. One of them has a folding straw lid that continually gets mold in the top dispite cleaning and largely only drinking water from the cup. I started the refund/replacement request for a new lid and they asked for a list of pictures of the Stanley, including the bottom of the cup. There was a sticker still on the cup, so I went to remove it to take the picture and the bottom seal broke off. At this point I didn't know about the lead issue and was just annoyed that my cup seemed to be breaking down after so little use. In the next email where I sent the pictures requested, I specified that the button had popped off and asked if it was an issue.

Here's we're I'm frustrated: They didn't say anything about the lead to me! I was already in the middle of a replacement request, brought up an issue and was ignored. They thanked me for the pictures, didn't say a thing about the button falling off, and said they would send a replacement lid. (The replacement lid also became moldy very soon there after, but that's another issue) Not knowing it was a risk, I thought nothing of it and assumed if it was an issue they would have said something. Wrong!

Seeing now they say the greatest risk is to young children and I was sharing this bottle with mine (I have two littles under the age of 4) and it was all over my house! Touching surfaces, touching my kids hands! I'm not really sure the best way to proceed. I could just email them, but I want more that a refund or replacement. Location is Virginia, US. ",AskLawyers
"[non-US] hypothetical: If a pedestrian causes a fatal car accident and can be identified, can that pedestrian be held responsible? And with what if they so?","Let's say a pedestrian runs into traffic outside a crosswalk in high speed area. They run in front of an older car with no airbags who doesn't have enough time to slam on the brakes and stop and swerves into an oncoming lane, hits another car head on, and is killed. Would that pedestrian be charged if they can be identified? And with what?",AskLawyers
[MN] (hypothetical) would someone be responsible for injuries to an intruder? ,"In a hypothetical scenario, let's say someone has broken into someone else's house, They have a weapon, And they have the proven intent to use it on the inhabitants. 
If an inhabitant defends themselves in such a way where the intruder would need something like CPR to be administered, would they be told to administer it by the 911 operator, And could they get in trouble for not administering it? 

If an inhabitant defends themselves in a way (That is not excessive) and the intruder is disabled or otherwise affected for life, would the inhabitant be liable? ",AskLawyers
"[FL] Who is liable here, if anyone? And what sort of (compensatory/punitive) damages are we looking at? Seems this story could have ended much bloodier. ","[FL] Who is liable here, if anyone? And what sort of (compensatory/punitive) damages are we looking at? Seems this story could have ended much bloodier. ",AskLawyers
[CO] How Legal Are Pranks,"Hypothetically if I were to go around with a fishing wire and some money, and pulled it away when people tried to pick it up, is there any way I could get in trouble for being a nuisance or something.
",AskLawyers
[mo],"If a contract starts with ""...in return for the (service provided)...

Is it enough to prove the service was not provided to prove damages.  (I know a claim would have to damage credit for damages)",AskLawyers
[Ca],"67 years old female now on hospice,  lung cancer .. I Have SS and I was getting a long term sick pay of $900 a month but that just ran out 4/24.. Hubby of 30 years just got diagnosed with esophageal cancer in January has had serious complications and has been back in the hospital for the 4th time for over a week now..   all my life had good credit and I always paid my credit cards. Well I’m now in about 8k in CC Debt… these are my cards in my name.. hubby not on accounts… Should I do bankruptcy? I have no assets, terrified what will happen to hubby..   of course he may die b4 me now… should I call the CC company n be honest.. I won’t be able to pay Mays payment s 
they can’t touch my social security in my bank it’s all I get now…  TY TY for any help on this 😉",AskLawyers
[TX] Legal to place tire-puncturing items in driveway? ,"After recent dispute with neighbor (their unleashed dog attacked our leashed dog on our property and we defended by kicking their dog until it stopped attacking.  We also had them ticketed for it) they have chosen to retaliate by training their security camera on our home so that it constantly triggers and loudly announces “HI!  You are currently being recorded!” as often as every 30 seconds.   Unable to enjoy being in our front lawn because of it.   She has also decided she is now going to drive her entire car into our driveway before backing into her own.   She never did this before and it’s simply a way for her to flop her dick out.  
So, I’d like to know if I can legally place things in my driveway with the intent of puncturing/flattening her tires.  ",AskLawyers
[MO] Threat of active shooter handled poorly forced to work through threat,"
I work in health care and recently we had a patient threaten to bring a weapon and shot the place up. My work at first did not reveal this to everyone in the building. Then we they did My supervisor put us on lock down. The company CEO ended lock down and had a police officer stationed out front. Police officer was then sent off premise and the patient showed up. No one was injuried but I feel unsafe at work and feel my safety and patient safety and patient safety took a back seat to profits. Can do to help protect myself from the company doing something like this again?",AskLawyers
[CA] accessing funds from a settlement ,"How to get my money from a settlement?

 I was in a car accident as a minor. I don't know how to get the money.

 Do I have to have a lawyer do it or can I do it myself? 

Also do I have to travel to NV in order to do it? I am based in CA.",AskLawyers
[NY] Federal - 1st Amendment religious clause,"Most of us know the clause in the 1st amendment `Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof;` How has this been interpreted and ruled as far as peoples' daily lives are concerned? I know some of the big issues would involve taxes on and what is permissible for public schools. What are some of the broader strokes and ways those have been applied practically?",AskLawyers
[NV] Payroll Deduction below minimum wage,"Long story short, damage occurred to a customers vehicle due to miscommunication between I, two techs, and the manager. Because I was the first one to perform work to the car, I am being PRD’d, even though I was not one who did the actions that damaged the vehicle (fighting this internally currently). However the amount they’re attempting to deduct has my gross income to $8.90/hr (assuming I work 40 hours which I typically do not). As far as I am aware, minimum wage for my state is 10.25/11.25. I was under the impression that an employer can not deduct so much that the employee is paid below minimum wage. They’re forcing me to also sign paperwork agreeing to the total amount deduction, but not the rate at which the deduction is being done at which has only been verbally told to me. Is there anything I can do?",AskLawyers
[IL] Aggressive lawsuit from Discover ,"Hello friends, 

I'm currently facing an aggressive lawsuit from Discover Bank regarding a $6,000 debt. Despite my efforts, they have declined any form of payment plan after closing my account and are demanding the full payment. My court date is in October, and I am preparing my defense using AI tools and a legal plan due to financial constraints. However, I feel outmatched and in need of guidance.

Here are my main questions:

1. How can I effectively present my case to the court to demonstrate my financial hardship and willingness to settle through a structured payment plan?

2. What steps should I take to request a postponement of the court date to better prepare my case?

3. If I send a check with terms clearly stated for full settlement of the debt and they deposit it, would this constitute a legally binding accord and satisfaction?

4. Are there specific legal defenses or strategies that could be advantageous in my situation?

Any advice on navigating this situation would be greatly appreciated.

**TL;DR: Sued by Discover Bank for $6,000, they refuse payment plans, court date in October, using AI and a legal plan to prepare but feeling overwhelmed. Seeking advice on how to approach court and whether specific actions like sending a settlement check could legally resolve the issue.**

Location: Cook County, Illinois 

Bankruptcy attorney advised against filling for any type of bankruptcy as I have means of repayment just not a full amount asap as they want. 

ADDITIONAL INFO: Debt settlement company told me to stop paying my debt because they would ""settle it"" for me and my credit score would be OK. 
I have sued that debt settlement company for violating Illinois state law and now I been sued by Discover bank. 

I would also like to add that I'm 1099 contractor and I did a mistake of putting my medical debt on credit cards. Not just being crazy with money and not paying it. 

Thank you in advance for your insights.",AskLawyers
[NY] What is the legality of the Columbia Gaza Solidarity Encampment?,"Students of Columbia University have bravely occupied an area of Columbia University as a form of protest to the university's support for the genocide in Gaza. This is one of those instances where the state has an incentive to break up a perceived threat to its stability.

I'm curious about the laws that are relevant in this case. Is what the students are doing 100% illegal or is there some nuance here? Is the fact that Columbia is a private university relevant? Are there laws about peaceful protest that will protect them against police violence?

What is some of the precedent from similar cases, such as the occupations of universities during the Vietnam war?

Where is the line on what violence police are allowed to use as they break up the encampment?",AskLawyers
[TX] is this illegal?,"If someone assaulted you on your property and you defending yourself (no weapon) resulted in them going to the hospital, is it illegal for them to threaten to press charges over a year later unless you pay them money or give them something? Isn’t doing that extortion? ",AskLawyers
[VA] Is there any way out of a non-compete?,"So this is completely on me obviously and I don’t expect some easy extravagant answer but, I’m desperate. So basically I signed this contract 2 weeks ago and this company is a contractor of Microsoft &amp; works directly on their site. I just found out yesterday that I got an internship for Microsoft, and I’ll be unable to take it if I don’t do something about this non-compete. I imagine the most obvious answer would be to ask my employer if they could absolve it but, It’d make me look like an asshole. Any suggestions/loopholes for this? anything helps!",AskLawyers
[NY] Is it legal to require a social media presence/information for acceptance into a possible job opportunity even though my NY State ID as well as other provable personal information was already given?,"Basically what the title states… I had applied for a potential side gig with a website that deals with adult oriented subjects… I submitted my state id, banking info, dob, address and signed the “contract “ stating that I’m doing this as an adult, and would be working on my own accord.   I do not participate in social media other then Reddit and I just read and look at pics and videos on YouTube and whatnot… needless to say, I was denied based off of not providing a social media platform they could “prove” I am who I say I am…I do not have that type of information on the internet… am I being discriminated against? I am debating contacting the NY State division of human rights asking if this is legal for them to do… I would not be an employee, I would be an independent contractor… I cannot fathom this being legal. Can someone please let me know… thank you.",AskLawyers
[CA] Can someone enforce a wage garnishment because that someone benefits from an estate they are included in to be paid to/for that estate?,I have family with money but aren’t working. Some have passed and I was notified I was included for inheritance from it/them; estste(s). Some have been gone for a long time and after I was told I wouldn’t receive anything I had a credit card paid off early for one month. I think she passed with way more than the $700 a month I was spending on that card to be inherited to me… I can’t afford an attorney. It’s just a question and I don’t think it applies to me but judging by my family I would end up spending more than I have to spend for a very small inheritance; would they force money out of me before anyone has passed? ,AskLawyers
[MN] What are my rights?,"\[MN\] We recently took possession of new home in the state of Minnesota. There is a detached garage with living quarters above the garage. An HVAC tech was in my new garage giving me a quote for A/C in the living quarters.  Unrelated to the A/C, he noticed that several of the lines for the radiant heating system were clear and some of the lines were pink.

The HVAC tech noted that the clear lines had the valves shut off and the pink were operating. He said they all should be pink and have the valves open. It was his opinion, it was due to a broken line underneath the concreate slab in the garage. Since this is a small town, he said he would find out why the lines were clear and the valves shut off.

He put me in touch with the plumber that fixed the broken boiler/radiant heat lines (which were not actually fixed).

I talked with the plumber, he told me that the owners incorrectly winterized the garage and the radiant heat lines broke. The called him to fix the issue, he pressure tested all of the lines and found that several were broken. The owners decided against fixing the broken lines and ran the system with half of the lines which were originally installed. The plumber said it was because the owners thought that it would be too expensive to fix.

In the discloser statement, the owners made no mention of a radiant heat system that was only half operational and made no mention of the broken lines underneath the concrete, epoxy finished floor of the over 2000 SQ foot garage.

The discloser indicated that the heating was operational; which it is only partially operational.

I was deceived.  This was known by the seller, information was withheld.  I was not given the chance to walk away from the property or negotiate a different price of the sale of the property based on the correct information.

I did not get a home inspection; a home inspection would not have caught this issue. An inspector would have been out in 30 degree weather, walked into the 50 degree garage, realized it was heated. The inspector would have bumped the thermostat to 52 degrees and heard the boiler turn on and called the boiler good.

I am getting a quote to fix the broken pipes underneath the epoxy finished garage floor.

Am I right to assume that the seller will be responsible for the repairs to get the pipes fixed to make good on what was advertised to me in the listing, which is a functioning radiant heat with a boiler?

Thanks Lawyers of Reddit!

 

 

 ",AskLawyers
"[CA] If police illegally search a home and find 10 illegal rifles and 3 dead bodies, would the home owner be charged? If not, would they get the rifles back?","[CA] If police illegally search a home and find 10 illegal rifles and 3 dead bodies, would the home owner be charged? If not, would they get the rifles back?",AskLawyers
[KS] Options for breaking a lease,"Options for breaking lease?

This is my girlfriend’s situation. She decided to live with 3 people in an apartment complex. One was a good friend, the other 2 she met through a mutual who were also looking for a place to live. They sign the lease in spring 2023 and it started august 2023. The complex sent out renewals in November of 2023, and they ALL signed a renewal. 

Flash forward to March 2024, and the two roommates she met through a mutual told her and her friend that they would be breaking the lease. They had already talked to the apartment complex, and since they had just planned on staying at the same complex, they let them break and resign a new lease for a new apartment with the two other people. All of this happened before my girlfriend knew they even wanted to break lease. She is finally told and she’s left stranded. She now has a couple of option: 

1. Stay put and do nothing. The consequences of this are that her and her roommate could get random roommates of any age or gender. They heard a story of young girls in their 20s getting paired with a 34 year old couple. 

2. Sublet the apartment. This would be great if they knew back in November that they were breaking, but it was March and now April. Everyone has already signed and they have no idea who would want to do this. They are on roommate apps and stuff. They seriously are trying. 

This whole situation has made them realize that they are not happy in the college town they are in and they want to transfer to a new university in the same state. They would be closer to family and they have more friends at that university. Which leads to the why they want to break lease. Which is third option. 

3. Break the lease and pay the whole lease plus another apartment. This is not actually an option because they could not possibly afford this. 


This leads to my big question. Is there absolutely ANYTHING they could do to get out of this? I know leases are difficult because none of you can actually see the document. But in general, are there any lines in the lease that we should be looking for that would give her an out?",AskLawyers
[AL] Need advice from someone that knows employment law! ,I put in a 3 week notice at my job. At the beginning of the third week I started asking about the second round of vacation time that they give at the beginning of each year you work there. (EXPLANATION: you don’t accrue pto at my job they give it to you up front to use through the year.) The end of my first year was suppose to be today 4/17/24. This past Monday they started getting antsy and weird cause I notified them that since my notice goes until 4/19/24 that I expected to get the pto paid out. The pto policy states that after a year of working you get two weeks of pto. We also get pto after 90 days to us the first year. Tuesday evening 4/16/24 the hr director called me and said that I didn’t need to come to work the next day. Basically so I wouldn’t be entitled to the 2 weeks pay. They said they would pay me through the week but before I get my last check I need to sign that my last day was Tuesday. I think they are trying to cover their butts.. do I have grounds for legal action considering they accepted my notice three weeks ago that said my last day was going to be 4/19/24… 2 days after my year anniversary with the company… what do I do threaten legal action or leave it alone and take the check… ,AskLawyers
[MN] can lawyers drop clients without telling them?,Hi! I know they are within their rights to drop a client but is it legal to do so without telling them? I found out from social security in a letter but have received no communication from my (ex) representative. I was attempting to get social security disability. ,AskLawyers
[CA] Prorated rent at the end of lease help!,"We are we are month to month in CA renting an Apartment. Gave landlord 30 days notice we were moving out today. I told them we would pay prorated rent for may since 30 days from now is the 17th. They say no, we must pay in full for may and THEN they would prorate it and give back to us with the deposit assuming there isn’t any bad damage (which there isn’t) We are pretty strapped for cash with travel and the deposit for the new place we have to put down. 

There have been 3 other tenants who have moved out and it seems there have been a lot of issues with them filling the apartments the last new months so I feel like they are strapped for cash and trying to squeeze us. Is there anything we can do? 
Was considering just ignoring the text and come may 1st when rent is due only sending the prorated amount since we will be packed up and outta there by then anyway. They have never done anything SUPER shady but the management is pretty bad with repairs and overall responsibility for issues with the property. We had to bug them NUMEROUS times to get a leak repaired when it was raining to the point that our ceiling spackle started drooping peeling and falling off. they never repaired the inside. just slowed the leak down on the outside from the roof with a plastic tarp. Anyway.
All that to say me and my s/o are happy to be getting the fuck out of here. I know it’s legal for them to ask for prorated rent and i’m fine paying for the remaining days in may from our 30 notice but I don’t want to give them the full month and have to wait for them to just send it back IF they even do. 

TL;DR
Landlord wants full rent for next month upfront, says they will give back with deposit after instead of prorated amount for remainder (17 days) of 30 day notice from today. ",AskLawyers
[CA] got rear ended in a car I was test driving,"So I was driving a car to get a pre purchase inspection and at a stop sign I got rear ended. The guy who rear ended us (I was driving and my mom was in the passenger seat) was very angry and at first I thought he tried to run. He kept saying that I didn't need to call the police and I only needed his insurance info. When the police arrived they said he wasn't under the influence and he gave them a piece of paper with his ""insurance information"" it had no policy number on it.

The police said they aren't allowed to question him about it and had to take it. I did some digging when I got home and called his insurance that he provided. They said he hasn't been insured with them since 2014. I was also told by the owner of the car I was test driving that the guy who hit me had expired registration on his car that the police I guess just didn't look at? 

The big problem is that the guy who owned the car I was test driving had full coverage but not on the cars he was selling. I had no idea about this and I never signed anything. I am not looking to get any money out of this and I just want the owners car fixed. The attorneys say that since he wasn't in the car with us that they can't go through him but the attorneys seem like swindlers to me who just want the insurance money. Any help? 

P.S. the guy who hit me had a Class A license if that matters",AskLawyers
"[MD] Signed loan paperwork under wrong classification, per bank's insistence","We (wife and I, only share holders) just completed the settlement paperwork for a business line of credit.

We are a ROBS, C-Corp.

The signature pages for several of the documents had 3 distinct signature sections - one for ""if signor is a corporation"", one for LLC, LLP, etc etc ""or any other business entity"" (none of the listed types were C-corp they were all of limited Liability types, and finally one for individual guarantor.

One of the documents didn't even have the ""other business entity"" statement in the LLC/whatever section.

The bank had pre-printed our names in the LLC section.  When I submitted the application I very clearly marked C-Corp.

I was uncomfortable with the misclassification, as we are a corporation and wanted to sign in the Corporation section.  The lending officer (via phone call) tried to blame it on our name, because our name is ""Something Company"", not ""Something something, Inc"", and their software defaulted us to that spot as a result.  

I know that ending in ""Company"" is perfectly valid for a corporation, and told them that their bad programming wasn't my responsibility.

Then a few mins later she called back and said that ""legal"" said that section was just for S corps and that our section was correct and C corps were covered under ""other business types"".  I pointed out that one of the docs didn't even specify ""other"" but ultimately I signed as the bank wanted.

The question is - is this at all likely to be a problem for us?  I feel that my resistance to signing under what seemed like the wrong section was becoming unreasonable so I finally just caved but it bothers me.  I know that legal documents are extraordinarily pedantic at times, so ... are we at any risk?",AskLawyers
[TN] physical therapist lied on her notes ,"So I had an MRI done by and ortho and was told I needed surgery. My physical therapist multiple times kept telling me I didn’t need surgery. After getting my records from the therapist for my lawyer I found that they put some contradictory notes in there like poor movement when asked, but not poor when not asked as well poor effort and patient noted looking for a lawyer. For reference this is a workman’s comp claim for a Slap Bankar in the rotator cuff. Diagnosed by the ortho. Has any lawyer here ever encountered their clients PT taking biased notes to protect the insurance company before? I’m just worried to lose a lawyer that was the first one to take me out of the 4 I called based on a therapist half lies. I did send him an email explaining my thought on the notes and that if he could pull video feed it would show what I actually went through. Is there any chance he can obtain that? ",AskLawyers
[WA] Changing Executors,[WA] Changing Executors,AskLawyers
[NY] During jury selection can they ask for private social media info? (In the Trump case several jurors were disqualified because of their posts)    ,"
How does that work if someone has a Reddit account or a “burner” Twitter account not tied to their name? Would they know or do they have to request all those accounts? Is it an honor system? ",AskLawyers
[NV] my girlfriend bought a university parking pass off of someone and they did not change the information. she now owes 6k,title sums up the situation but my girlfriend bought a university of Nevada reno parking pass off a girl she knew. this girl then did not change the information on the pass so now my girlfriend is getting parking tickets. this girl then refuses to refund my girlfriend or change the information on the pass in order to make it so she doesn't get tickets. she basically scammed my girlfriend and im wondering the legality of this and if there is a potential law suit.,AskLawyers
[TX] Sperm Donor Protection,"I've searched this question online and have not been able to find definitive answers. I have been discussing with a close friend about becoming a sperm donor for her and her wife. I've seen online Sperm Donor Contracts that protect the donor, but I've also seen stories where courts have dismissed these contracts ""for the interest of the child"". As much as I trust my friend, I do not want the risk of child support, as I will not consider this child mine.

I don't know if this makes a difference, but we planned to do the dead the ""old fashioned way"" instead of going through artificial insemination. 

My question is, is this something we can simply sign the donor contract and that's it? Or is it absolutely necessary to get legal counsel for 100% protection? ",AskLawyers
[NC] Should I report my ex for assaulting me last year?,"Trigger Warning: Assault/Violence 

About a year ago, I started dating this guy. This was my first ever relationship, and I was in a really bad space in my life at the time.  He was nice at first but gradually started pushing my boundaries and being emotionally &amp; sexually abusive. Things were slowly inching to physical abuse as well, now looking back. He ended up anally raping me. That was the breaking point. I broke up with him and was so in shock and traumatized.

I texted him about it, saying that he forcefully did a sexual act (not outright saying assaulted or raped) to me that I told him many times that I did not ever want to do. I also talked to him over the phone about it and recorded it for my records (I was afraid the conversation would overwhelm me &amp; I would not be able to catch everything he said). He apologized over text and phone. 

After he love bombed for a few weeks (which I realize he was doing now), I got back with him. I regretted this almost immediately after but I felt stuck and isolated. He was nice for a little but gradually went back to being abusive. I finally got the courage to break up with him after 2 months. 

I've been wanting to report it since then, but haven't because he knows where I live. I'm scared he will retaliate if I report him. I don't want to put myself or anyone I know in danger. I am not able to move until the end of this year, so that is when I'm planning to report it. Is this a smart choice? 

I am also worried that if I go to the police they will not file the report because I got back with him or because it happened almost a year ago. What should I do? Will waiting any longer look bad? Will anyone take me seriously? 

This has been affecting me for so long, and I think about this every day. I'm struggling so much mentally. I want to report but not make things worse.
",AskLawyers
[non-US] whats generally the limits of freedom of speech in democratic countries?,"I'm talking more globally here, trying to understand what would constitute crossing the red line in freedom of speech, and can companies (either privately owned or government) can do anything that would be lawful after such a case of misuse of freedom of speech.",AskLawyers
[IN] Do you have to signal at a roundabout?,"My partner got pulled over this morning for not indicating a right turn. I have been searching online for roundabouts and there's a bunch of ""yeah you should"" nonsense but I don't see anything specifically stating you have to by law. I always indicate a turn but I never thought it was required; I don't see how it's by law that you have to because you're supposed to yield to any traffic to your left so what does it matter if you signal?

Normally I wouldn't care but I don't want to have an opinion battle here, I just don't want to pay a ticket for something we ought to do and didn't. If you can point me to a page of the indiana state law I can see just to clearly clarify this problem I appreciate you in advance, cause I can't find it which is probably because I'm not looking in the right place. Thank you.",AskLawyers
[CA] Seeking Advice on Custody Arrangement Post-Separation,"Hello Reddit,
I’m a 29-year-old father going through a challenging separation and impending custody battle for my two young daughters, ages 1 and 2. We’ve been living separately since early March this year, and I’m currently navigating the complexities of custody and finances.
I work a schedule that has me busy Monday through Saturday every other week, while their mom works five days a week. Since our separation, I’ve been advocating for our daughters to stay with family members as much as possible, rather than going into daycare. The mother and I initially agreed on this.
I proposed a 70/30 custody split, with me taking the weekends. However, she wants weekends too and suggested I take an overnight during the week, which would mean putting the kids in daycare or with a sitter while I’m at work. I’m not in favor of this and would rather have a 50/50 split if daycare is involved, but she’s not open to it and wants to settle this through the court.
For context, I’ve been physically present every day in our kids’ lives, and we were on a lease together until she moved out early. I’m trying to work with her amicably to avoid dragging this out, but it’s challenging when she’s not able to set days for custody and often resorts to legal counsel.
Family Code section 3020(b) states that children should have frequent and consistent contact with both parents post-separation, and section 3040 emphasizes custody decisions in the best interest of the child. I’m trying to align with these principles while keeping our daughters’ best interests at heart.
Since we’ve been living separately, she has threatened to withhold the kids until a court order is in place whenever we can’t agree on scheduling. I’m reaching out for advice from those who may have gone through similar experiences. How did you handle custody arrangements? Any tips on working with an ex-partner who is reluctant to agree on a fair plan?
I’m leaving out a lot of details for privacy and to encourage questions. Thank you for any guidance you can provide.",AskLawyers
[PA] Can I returned a Used Car in PA Within 2 Days of Purchase?,"Thank you so very much for this helpful community. Your service for your fellow human beings is greatly appreciated

1. I’m looking for opinions and commentary, not legal advice. 
2. I’m a New Jersey resident. My wife and I purchased a used car through financing on 4/15 around 7:00pm at a major-brand dealership in Lancaster County PA. Unfortunately, my economic situation changed suddenly and as a result I need to avail myself of the “Right to Rescind” Statutes in order to return the aforementioned vehicle to the dealership.
3. It is my understanding that in order for this to be possible, the majority of the transaction needed to take place from my home. That is indeed the case. In fact, most of the transaction took place from my home. I have proof in the form of text messages between the salesperson and myself demonstrating that I asked questions regarding the vehicle, then negotiated a price and finally agreed to purchase it remotely. Moreover, we sent our NJ driver’s licenses, insurance cards and even applied for financing through their website from my home. 
4. Does my situation sounds like it would qualify for “Right to Rescind” statutes?
5. What is the process to do so?
6. What type of attorney could represent me through this process?

Once again, thank you",AskLawyers
[OH] Legal Advice/Help for a Tenant w/ bad AC,"I work with neighbors in the Dayton, OH vicinity, who have needs they can't meet, in our church's St, Vincent dePaul organization.

Today, I met a lady who's 8+ months pregnant who can't get her landlord to repair the air conditioning. (LL says not included)

I can get her/them a window fan, but I'm asking here if there is good charitable legal advice source.",AskLawyers
[CA] Family friends daughter was recently rushed to hospital because she was given a marijuana edible at school. She is currently unconscious. What's the best course of action?,[CA] Family friends daughter was recently rushed to hospital because she was given a marijuana edible at school. She is currently unconscious. What's the best course of action?,AskLawyers
[CA] I believe my partner and I have some form of a medical malpractice claim and emotional distress claim against her and our son’s prenatal care company! Any advice is appreciated!,"Me and my partner believe we have a medical malpractice claim or something similar against the prenatal care company she received care from. Here is our claim/story.

Prior to the birth of our son, all prenatal care seemed ok. During pregnancy, Genetic testing , anatomy scans and ultrasounds were done and we were always told that everything looked normal with no risks or diagnosis of any genetic defects for our son. Mom was also healthy throughout pregnancy with no risks or complications expressed.

Immediately after birth, our son had to be transported to a local children’s hospital for a suspected condition. That condition and now diagnosis ended up being esophageal atresia with tracheoesophageal fistula. This condition resulted in a need for surgery on day 3 of life. During the surgery a laryngeal cleft was also diagnosed.

Now, our son is in the NICU indefinitely and will now also need ongoing treatment from many specialists including but not limited to, speech therapist, occupational therapist, pulmonologist, ent specialists, and more.

Here are some details we remember during our prenatal care. 1:After an anatomy scan, a doctor expressed a concern for not being able to see his stomach properly and requested a second scan be done. After the second scan was done, we were told everything was ok and looked ok. 2: The doctor or nurse practitioner who saw us for Prenatal visits was not always the same. Often we would meet a new doctor or nurse practitioner who didn’t know of us prior to our appointment. They would essentially bring up our file and attempt to catch up on our current progress. 3: Our prenatal case managers were also never consistent and similar to the doctor/nurse practitioner visits, our file would simply be popped up and be skimmed through to catch up. 4: In one occasion, a case manager propped up a different person’s information and read to us the details as if it was ours. That case manger told us our som would be a girl. Upon noticing more inconsistencies in our information, we had to inform the case manager upon which he realized his mistake and switched files. 5: I’m sure many more details will continue to come up as we continue to think back about our experience.

Now knowing of our son’s diagnosis and doing some research, we know that his condition is possible to diagnosis before birth. The failure to make the diagnosis resulted in the surgery our son needed and the ongoing and potential life long treatment he will need. We believe that his condition could have been diagnosed before birth, and there was negligence to diagnosis his condition.

Aside from our son’s medical condition and treatment, both my partner and I have suffered emotional distress and now suffer some form of anxiety. Our son’s condition was a complete shock to us at birth. We were never told of any prior risk or possibility of anything abnormal in our son.  This whole experience has left us emotionally exhausted and distressed.

Update 1  a response to everyone’s contribution.

I appreciate anyone’s contribution. I understand that it’s certainly a condition that isn’t fixable/preventable before birth and how it could not have been their fault either. The quality and methods of the company certainly raised eyebrows and we see now that we shouldn’t have settled for less. We are first time parents, we didn’t have the experience or comparison information to make a different decision then.

 I suppose a hard question many ask is whether if we would have known beforehand, would we have terminated. Certainly that is a tough decision to make for anyone in that position for any kind of similar situation, and I’m sure anyone would make some form of quality of life decision of their child. I suppose the condition helps determines the next steps.

 Obviously we love our son. We’ve been finding pockets of light through the cloudy days and there has been more light than darkness more recently. He is our sunshine in itself and we will be there until the storm passes and even if it doesn’t, my partner and I will  move through the rain. Being special needs isn’t something to brag about or be ashamed of either. We all have something special about us and I hope everyone, not just my son see’s the special and uniqueness in themselves.

 We’re two first time parents going through a hurricane without knowing there even was one or what one was. We appreciate any and all condolences and advice. Yes even the more to the point, non sympathetic ones too. I suppose having a bit of tough, realist, logical love is great too. Thanks again for any contribution. 

UPDATE 2: 

I want to emphasize as well that we do not see our son’s situation as if we hit gold on the ground to start digging up. Advocation, and advancement in identifying these kind of things for families to have better preparation and support beforehand is our priority. I truly believe that better could have been done to diagnose this condition. The emotional distress caused from the shock at birth and now financial hardship that can follow is something we would love other families to be better prepared for. Thank You! ",AskLawyers
[VA] Question regarding probate tax and will. ,"Hello people! My aunt has cancer &amp; has always planned on making an iron clad will to avoid any issues regarding me inheriting her house (I’m on ssi) she ended up going downhill more quickly then we expected so we only managed to get a Virginia last will and testament signed and notarized (pursuant to title 64.2 wills, trust, &amp; fiduciaries) it states that I will be the personal representative &amp; the beneficiary of disposition of the property. I’ve been told this will not help me avoid probate tax. Is this true?? The house is accessed at $300,000 so the tax would be $30,000. Im on fixed income so I’d never be able to pay that. Any info would be helpful! Thanks in advanced. ",AskLawyers
[KS] Filing a petition for divorce,Which things happen automatically and which things only by request?  Locking of accounts? Setting court dates? Etc..,AskLawyers
"[NY] PA driver, Speeding CITATION on i87","Thank you in advance :)

This past weekend, I was driving myself and two friends to Montreal from Philadelphia for my birthday weekend. I recently got a new car (2024 Mazda CX-5) and I guess it goes a lot faster than I am used to with such a smooth drive that I must not have realized when I was speeding up.

A state trooper pulled me over for going 90 on a 65 (which is what he also cited me for on defendant's speed.. a day before my birthday..). My citation says speed is verified by a radar and model is a ""Stalker Duel"". I just don't know what all of this means. The citation has no fine $, just a court date and I can choose to appear in court (4+ hours away from my home), or plead by mail.

*I am 23F, no points/record on my driver's license. I am thinking I will make the drive to go in person as I really want to avoid points on my license, points on my insurance, and a HUGE fine (saw numbers like +$700 which I really can't afford).*

\- I read, if the trooper does not appear I should be let off ? What are the chances he does show up?

\- Do I plead guilty or not guilty? Do I need an attorney?

\- Do I call the court and also get additional information, relay my situation as this is my first offense?

If you have any experience, or advice on how I should move forward with this I would appreciate it!",AskLawyers
[non-US] Termination confidentiality,"My partner was terminated without cause. They reached out to a closely related employer to ask for a job and explained that they were terminated without cause. Is this a breach of confidentiality? Is it a possibility that they could revoke the terms of severance? They haven't signed the package yet
",AskLawyers
[IN] Is there a site with our laws that is easy to navigate on mobile?,"My roommate and I were discussing something earlier, and we want to make sure we do things legally. I was trying to look on the official Indiana website, but it loads weird on my phone, and it's not easy to figure out where I even want to go to try and find what I need (or, frankly, if it even has what we're looking for on that page since it won't let me scroll to the side). Is there some sort of website that has all the laws, is compatible with mobile, and you can just search what you're looking for and it gives you, like, ""relevant articles"" type results?",AskLawyers
[VA] Timeshare &amp; Storage,"
I am the Trustee and beneficiary of my parents estate. The maintenance fees for my parents timeshare and the fees for their storage unit have been paid through the estate. 

A county auditor is asking that I assign a value to the belongings in the storage unit and a value to the timeshare as assets for the estate. 

My understanding is that the personal property passed to me through the trust and the timeshare is in the trusts name. 

The first accounting I was not asked for any of this. This is for the second accounting and I don’t understand why it is required now and the first accounting was accepted by the county commissioner.

Any help is appreciated ",AskLawyers
[CA] Labor Law/Health Benefits ,"My employer is a school district. The employer caps contributions to health benefits at 14k/year. My position is in the unrepresented management unit where this 14k contribution is included in my salary, (they call it total compensation). Represented units have this separate from their salary. (This whole total compensation scheme seems like a con against the retirement PERS/STRS but that's another track completely)

The employer offers a 125 cafeteria plan for health benefits. To opt out of health benefits you have to prove coverage (not an issue as my spouse has better coverage for our family) and then the employer CHARGES a $500/month opt out fee to the employee.

So if I opted for the cheapest plan and covered only myself I would pay $600/month out of pocket. A member of a represented unit would have no premium for the same option. (I understand that I ""get"" the net difference the represented employee would not). It would cost me $500/month to refuse insurance.

Is this legal? I can't find a definite answer from the California Dept of Insurance, ED Code, or anything else. 
",AskLawyers
[DE] How to handle house transfer on death with a mortgage balance," 

My mother (in her 90's) wants to leave me her house upon her death. She has a outstanding mortgage of $80K, according to Zillow the house value is $200K.

My sister would protest any will - but my mother wants my sister to get zero of anything.

I read Delaware does not allow a transfer upon death deed for a house. What is the best way to do this to avoid probate court after her death?

I was thinking just transfer ownership of the house to me now - IF that is the best method, how do we handle the mortgage outstanding balance?

Her bank account (not a large sum) is POD to me, so that's a non-issue

Any suggestions appreciated.",AskLawyers
[DC] How long does it usually take for SCOTUS to deny a Cert Petition?,"So there's this case that's currently before the Supreme Court: https://www.supremecourt.gov/search.aspx?filename=/docket/docketfiles/html/public/23-958.html

For reasons I prefer not to get into at the moment, I'm kinda interested in how this case ultimately turns out. 

It says the response was due April 3. No response appears on the docket, and it's been long enough now that there's been more than enough time for a response to be sent by the pro se respondent and get processed by the Clerk. It's pretty clear that the respondent has opted not to file a response.

So when can we expect to see the notice on the docket that says the matter is ""submitted to the Court?"" I assume that has to happen first before the Court actually denies the Cert Petition.",AskLawyers
"[Pa] Why would a case that has sentence/penalty imposed docket number MJ-----NT be charged again with common pleas docket number CP-----MD, 10 days after guilty plea/sentenced with MJ? ","[Pa] Why would a case that has sentence/penalty imposed docket number MJ-----NT be charged again with common pleas docket number CP-----MD, 10 days after guilty plea/sentenced with MJ? ",AskLawyers
"[NV] If I have firearms locked in a gun safe, would it be legal for me to move my stepfather into my home if he has felony DUIs?","Hello, 

I am considering moving my stepfather in with me and putting him on my health insurance because he is undergoing treatment for a back injury that he can’t afford and doesn’t have a great living situation.

He has several felony DUIs, and I have several firearms that are stored in a safe in my home that I’d rather not get rid of. Before I go and get a storage unit just for them, I was curious if I keep them in my safe and he doesn’t have access to them, if he could be charged for being in the same house with them? 

As far as I know he doesn’t have any history of violence, and he’s always been pretty strict about not being around firearms even when I was a kid. 

I’m aware that a judge can reinstate firearm privileges for felons, but I wasn’t counting on that since all of his felonies were committed in different states, and a storage unit seems cheaper than court. I’m also not super confident that he won’t fall off the wagon again and while I don’t drink, I live in a place where alcohol is very accessible and in walking distance from anywhere that anyone lives. 

Thanks for any help. ",AskLawyers
[NY] Why does someone have to be present for a criminal trial?,"I don't want to bring politics into this, so I'm not going to talk about a current case.

If someone has been allowed to stay out of jail until the trial, why do they need to attend the court room during the trial? 

If I thought I was guilty and going to jail, or if I thought I was innocent and definitely wasn't going to jail, I'd have better things to do than sit in a court room for days/weeks to hear the whole case. 

On top of that, days of sitting in a court room would potentially leave me making faces that might influence the jury. (E.g. he's gormless).",AskLawyers
[IL] my ex won’t take my kid to school or return them,"We have nothing court ordered just child support. We don’t have a schedule he gets them whenever it fits into his schedule. Tonight he decided he’s pulling them from prek and won’t be returning them till next week maybe . What can I do ?! Is there anything ? He’s saying i can’t do anything unless we go to court and I can’t afford that right now 


UPDATE: he took our kid to school today so he could nap. Can I take him off our kids school list for pickup and drop off ? I’m sure court will have me relist him but for now until we go to court. ",AskLawyers
[NY] Is it illegal to fall asleep in court?,"If it keeps happening, will a judge order sanctions, contempt charges, court ordered naps?

Is it possible a defense attorney might sedate a wildly inappropriate defendant to protect him?",AskLawyers
[FL] Can I find information about someone else's court case?,"There's been a lot of back and forth drama on Tik Tok about an ""influencer"" named Madi accusing her dad Ben Hart of abandoning the family and him rebutting the claims. One thing that stuck out to me in the drama is that he said the divorce judge was a woman and threw him in jail for a year for contempt of court because she didn't like his answer to a question about how he was going to pay the balance of money he owed. Then multiple people after were like 'oh yeah that makes sense, she hates men'. There are a lot of other dramatic details with this story, and I'm not saying this can't be true, but it's so wild to me (especially since we're talking about rich people, not just a normal person getting locked up for basically nothing) that I'd like to try and learn more about what exactly happened. No one else seems to be talking about it, aside from comments on his video talking mostly about how terrible women are. I'm told court records are supposed to be publicly available but I haven't been able to figure out how to actually find any information. Is it possible or is it more 'you can petition the court to give it to you directly if you have a good reason'? I'm pretty sure this occurred in Florida but have no idea more specifically",AskLawyers
[CA] non zoned wedding venue.  ,"I live in central California in the country, my neighbor has decided to open a wedding chapel down the street.  Only problem is we’re not zoned for that kind of business,  I’ve confirmed that with the county.  My question is, can I sue the business civilly for operating without a license??  Any help would be appreciated.  ",AskLawyers
"[CA] Rules of Custody, as a minor.","Hello, I'm having a very unique case, and I'm wondering what rights I have, as a 16 year old.

Recently, due to cancer affecting his brain, my Father has gone what I can only call crazy. Making threats, wrecking my brother's car, and doing many things he would never do otherwise.

However, my Mother and Father agreed to sell out house, and my Mother wants to move out of state. I, however, do not. My mother is okay with me staying somewhere in CA, at a place safe for me while I finish school, but is worried about my father taking me from there.

Can he have legal permission to take me, if my mother has allowed me? Would there be an action I can take to prevent him from taking me from this home? I desperately want to finish schooling here, as my desired career needs connections, and I lose those moving to the other side of the country. ",AskLawyers
[OH] What happens at a status conference in a civil lawsuit? (Pro Se) franklin county court of common pleas,Thank you,AskLawyers
[NY] Former workplace’s lawyer is contacting me,"My former workplace is being sued because of negligence — individual is claiming injuries. There is already surveillance footage indicating that no one harmed the individual nor was negligent.

My former boss reached out by phone explaining that the business’ lawyer would like to speak to me regarding the events. I did not receive a formal letter or notification from the lawyer themself as of yet.

What do I do? Should I reach out now and speak to them? Should I wait for an official notification by mail? What can I expect from this situation if I do have to speak to them? Will I be in court over this?

",AskLawyers
[ok] calculating child support confusion… SSDI,"Calculating child support when on SSDI, Oklahoma

I am not asking for advice on the morality or ethics of child support. I also am not going to blindly follow advice here, my plan is to take feedback and touch base with my lawyer tomorrow. I’d like an educated discussion with him to save time, so I’m seeing if anyone can help check my math. 

I receive $5037 in retirement from the military. 
I earn $2307 SSDI 
I am paid $1241 as an auxiliary for my son. 
I receive no additional income. 

I have 1 child. 

Our days are split 50/50 

Her income is calculated at minimum wage $1160 a month. She receives no additional income. 

I pay $25 for health insurance. 
I do not pay any other benefits for our son
She does not pay any benefits for our son



I have been reading everywhere and using the DHS excel spreadsheet. 

https://oklahoma.gov/okdhs/services/child-support-services/computation.html

Am I calculating my gross income correctly that it includes the $5037 + 2307 + 1241 = 8585

When it asks “enter the amount of SSA title 2 benefits paid for the benefit of the children. Do NOT include SSI benefits. (Enter in the column for the disability or retired party).” 

For this column I enter the $1241 for my son right? 
When I do this, it calculates my child support as $0. This $1241 is paid as an auxiliary benefit since he is the child of a disabled person(me). 

I don’t pay my ex this $1241. 

Can someone explain if I’m calculating it wrong? How does me received an extra $1241 for SSDI negate my child support due to $0. Surely I’m messing this up?

",AskLawyers
[WI] How should I formulate an email to HR in regards to denied time of for bereavement?,"As you'll see I made a very long and detailed post.  Sadly as I somehow missed one thing in regards to the title, my post was denied.  Instead of trying to retype the entire post, I hope it's okay to take screenshots and post those here instead.",AskLawyers
[NY] Say the prosecution illegally obtains evidence and waves it in front of the jury. What ACTUALLY happens in real life?,"I know the evidence is supposed to be thrown out if it's obtained illegally, but let's make up a super drastic scenario. 

A guy murders someone in his back yard. His private security camera that isn't on any network catches him in the act. Somehow, the judge decides they can't have the footage. Don't ask me how or why, just pretend they aren't allowed to. And the prosecution breaks in his house, steals the footage, and then does NOT present this footage during discovery. Then at trial, the prosecutor says ""However, we have this!"" and immediately plays the footage of the man obviously committing the crime. I know illegally obtained evidence is meant to be thrown out and judges frown upon surprise evidence that isn't presented during discovery. But what would really happen in that court room in that moment? 

Sorry if it's a dumb question, I've been watching Suits and just started wondering about illegally obtained evidence. ",AskLawyers
[PA] Can a lease require you to recycle?,"I am subleasing an apartment from someone who enjoys bringing up the terms of the lease to coerce me into doing things. I’m wondering what power she really has and what kinds of things are legally binding when put in a lease. Specifically, a section of my lease says “Sublessee enters into this lease agreeing to participate in the household, contribute resources, share in chores, and make an effort to minimize wastefulness.” What are my rights here? And what legal authority does she have, as a sublessor, to enforce this?

Not that its really relevant, but to be clear I do recycle lol. Just sometimes I forget.",AskLawyers
[NY] trigger warning. Can a suicide note be used as evidence in a wrongful death lawsuit?,Hello I was just wondering Would a suicide note be used as evidence in a wrongful death lawsuit? For example a university student had committed suicide and left a note. They listed their reasons why and in that note they included specific people that made them feel unsafe and the actions of staff members at that institution had affected their mental health in a way that they felt like they couldn’t recover. Could a victim’s family use that note to sue that institution/ people mentioned in the note? I just want to make it clear that I do not intend on doing anything of that nature and that I’m asking out of curiosity because the suicide rates of universities near me are very high and shows like 13 Reasons why exist.,AskLawyers
[Va] What is stopping states like mississippi or even florida from legislating and bringing back Jim crow laws?,Some states in the country have laws implemented by their state legislatures that clearly violated Supreme court rulings and federal law all the time like Maryland or New York states gun laws or Florida's death penalty for convicted child molesters. If states are able to legislate laws that are questionable to the integrity of federal law or Supreme Court ruling what's stopping states from bringing back stuff like Jim crow laws? They couldn't be blocked by a federal judge as they aren't executive orders. ,AskLawyers
[MD] Question about Baltimore Bridge collapse,"This might not be the correct subreddit to ask this, so please delete this if not allowed. I was reading this article today  [FBI agents board ship responsible for Baltimore bridge collapse as investigation continues (msn.com)](https://www.msn.com/en-us/news/us/fbi-agents-board-ship-responsible-for-baltimore-bridge-collapse-as-investigation-continues/ar-BB1lEET5?rc=1&amp;ocid=winp1taskbar&amp;cvid=039f0adf9954460fae0355b6224fc482&amp;ei=10#image=1) And about halfway through it says this:

 ""The announcement comes after Grace Ocean Private Limited, the ship's owner, and Synergy Marine Private Limited, its manager, filed a petition in Maryland District Court earlier this month in a preemptive attempt to exonerate the two companies from any claims or damage costs they incur above $43 million as a result of the disaster. ""

Can someone explain how this would even be possible or what kind of circumstances would even allow such a thing to happen? The way I see it, if I owned a trucking business, and one of my trucks crashed into something and caused a lot of damage either I or my insurance company would be responsible for the damages. I cant just go into court and say ""I know I caused $500,000 in damage, but I am going to file a motion so the most I have to pay is $200. "" Obviously a judge still has to rule on the motion for it to even go through, but what is the thought process behind the company that filed it? ",AskLawyers
"[non-US] General questions for lawyers in terms of career, just for personal knowledge","Saw this in a video and thought it would be great to get an insight on this:

&amp;#x200B;

\- How does it feel being a lawyer? Are you happy, despising it or somewhere in between?

\- What does a typical day look like?

\- What are your current problems in the field?

\- What are your regrets/is there anything you'd change?

\- If you won the lottery, how likely are you to leave your job?",AskLawyers
[VA] Advice on obtaining criminal attorney. ,I need a criminal attorney (felony charges/first time offender) in Virginia. Where do I start? How do I ensure I will hire someone who will do a good job/get me the best outcome? What questions should I ask during free consults? Any help/advice is greatly appreciated. ,AskLawyers
[CA] What kind of lawyer do I need?,"I closed my account with national phone company some 3 years ago. Admittedly, I'm not too good with paying attention to my money and I didn't realize that they were auto billing me on a data plan during that period, in the neighborhood of $61.40 a month. I assumed that when I said, ""close my account"" that meant that I didn't need to specify each device? I called the company to dispute and they are basically asserting that it's my fault. They did confirm that the device has not used any data during that period. So now I've paid something like $2000 over the duration for nothing. To add, they sent a final bill directly to collections (which feels malicious). There is no way I'm paying that, so now I take a hit to my credit, I guess?

I don't even know what kind of lawyer I would contact for something like this. Is the value of this too small to even look at? I wouldn't mind splitting $2000 if I thought it could be recovered. In fact, I wouldn't mind just giving it all to a lawyer, just out of principle lol.",AskLawyers
"[CT] After 2 years, should I agree to a non-compete?","I work for a company, have for the past two years, I was hired as talent, and when onboarded I was told I could seek employment to expand and grow my craft outside of the company. I was informed after returning from vacation that I must sign a non-compete or lose my job. What advice could be given? Do I agree to the non-compete? Do I refuse and get terminated? If they terminate, would it be wrongful since I've preformed in the top 10 in all metrics since I've started. I'm lost and scared. 

Throw away account. 
",AskLawyers
 (CT) Need advice on a situation.,"I work for a company, have for the past two years, I was hired as talent, and when onboarded I was told I could seek employment to expand and grow my craft outside of the company. I was informed after returning from vacation that I must sign a non-compete or lose my job. What advice could be given? Do I agree to the non-compete? Do I refuse and get terminated? If they terminate, would it be wrongful since I've preformed in the top 10 in all metrics since I've started. I'm lost and scared. 

Throw away account. ",AskLawyers
[NV] Tenants rights to break a lease,"So im breaking my lease today in Nevada, my lease is technically up in August but ever since they removed all the sage brush in the lot next to my house we've had a mouse infestation. To the point where we found mouse poop in our newborns crib. In addition theres maintenance requests which didnt see proper resolution, nothing in the house work, gate is broken, its all fucked.

Anyway, per usual and by state law, i am obligated to cover the rent between now and when they find a new tenant, up to when the lease would have expired..my question is due to the circumstance, do i have a good enough case to not pay these penalties considering the house became inhabitable? ",AskLawyers
[IL] Chicago. I cut the boot off of a car with an angle grinder. ,"Chicago, IL how much trouble am I in for cutting a boot off of a car?

My wife and her friends went to a concert in downtown Chicago. Some private (non municipal) company put a boot on her friends car, and they didn't have the 170$ to get the boot off. She called me to come with cash. I live in northwest Indiana about 40 minutes away. I took my work truck (I own the company, so no disciplinary from a boss). By the time I got there and realized it was a security company and not an actual municipal organization, I just opened the toolbox and grabbed my angle grinder. I cut the boot off and threw it next to the security guys car while basically telling him that he doesn't make enough money to stop me. I was being threatening, not gonna lie. 

Afterwards, we all left. 

Good chance they got my plates. I don't really care, just curious on how much trouble I could get into? 

Again, it was a private company. Not like it was Chicago police or Chicago parking authority. No DOT number on my work truck or identifying logos or anything. 

As far as the threatening went, I just reminded the gentleman that 18$ an hour isn't worth it enough for him to do anything. I told him call his boss or call the cops, but his boss probably wouldn't be able to do anything either. I returned the boot cut in half by setting it next to his company car, and politely told him to have a safe shift before leaving. Dude was too confused and shocked to film me or walk around back of my truck to get plates. 

I live in Indiana. This took place in Chicago. Thanks in advance! 

Edit: the sign said no parking 6AM-8PM. it was about 8:30PM. they were legally parked. ",AskLawyers
[AZ] Kingman. Legal question about the limitations of an Order of Protection as it pertains to a custody battle,"Something very heartbreaking and unexpected happened to my friend during a custody hearing and I'm asking for some legal clarification on a ruling.
My friend is in the middle of a custody battle over her two kids with her ex-husband, whom she is also in the middle of divorcing. The husband was physically abusive to her, and she recently found out he was abusive towards her son as well. So she and her legal team asked the judge for an Order of Protection for her and her two kids, which was immediately granted, so he couldn't go anywhere near her except when picking up kids on the weekend, and his visits with them had to be limited and supervised.
So he and his legal team petitioned the court for a hearing to have the O.O.P. either appealed or upheld by the judge, which was expected, so a court date was scheduled. But it the meantime, he lied to the courts and the police and claimed that the mother was a danger to herself and her children, citing mental health problems she had several years ago, and he was granted temporary emergency custody of the kids despite the O.O.P still being in place against him.
This was shocking enough, because we didn't even know that was possible. But then the hearing on the Order of Protection happens and the judge finds the husband's credibility very suspect and decides to uphold the Order for the safety of the wife and kids. Which is great news... except the kids weren't released back into the mother's care. They're still in the abusive father's sole custody, despite an active Order of Protection against him still being in place. The poor woman has to wait a month until the next hearing, where she has to prove she's not crazy and deserves her kids. We have no idea how this is even legal. Can someone please explain to me how this even happened? We're both deeply confused, and so was her attorney.",AskLawyers
[FL]- Can I still charge assaulter after 13 long years? ,"As a MTF Trans Woman, how long do I have to press charges for sexual assault in FL? 

Hello. English is not my first language and I do not want to use translating appl. I am Swiss but my incident happened in the US. I was sexually assaulted by my lawyer and I was so scared to do anything about it in 2011 but I feel it is the right time to seek justice and money from him. 

I moved to US to become a dancer in Florida but I was not good and moved back to the farm in 2013. In 2011, I was live in Florida where I park my camper in grocery store parking lot. When I was younger I was very, very flirtatious and I made a fruit and vegetable employee feel uncomfortable with my advances and I was arrested, then charge, then release on minor crime. 

My parents buy lawyer for me and he is maybe late 30s and handsome. Sad for me (I thought at time) that he had a wife and two kids. He would make inappropriate and sex comments to me all the time. He would pretend that he was the fruit and vegetable employee and make me talk to him like I did before arrest. One day, he put his arm on my shoulder and it touched the side of my breast blouse when he pulled away. I was so in fear. He had all power and I had nothing. 

My case get dismissed after I apologize and I move back to Europe. Before I move back, I am so scared of him and just want to appease him so I ask if I can be baby sitter for his kids or cook meals for him and his kids. Parts of me still have fond memories of my assaulter. 

I dont want to ruin his life I just want to sue him and hurt his wallet. Can I do this from HVR? Has too much time gone by to sue? Do I need lawyer or will US assign me a public helper? 

Thank you!!

",AskLawyers
"[MD] Maryland, Employer is now refusing to allow me to take off for religious Jewish Holiday","Before I started working here and was speaking to HR I told them that if I am to work here I need Fridays off, and can't work Jewish holidays. They told me it wasn't an issue and the same when I spoke to my 3 supervisors. This was all 6 months ago. I notified my supervisor last month reminding them that I would need 2 days off towards the end of the month for Passover who emailed the head of the department regarding this and I was initially told shouldn't be a problem. I sent another email last week again reminding as I wasn't given a clear answer. Today I was notified that I would not be getting those days off. If I want to take those days off I have to use my sick time. I asked what about other holidays as I'm only given 20 hours of sick time a year and they told me to pick and choose which holiday I won't work. I've personally had 3 different situations with this place of employment regarding racial issues. I've had a coworker constantly harass me due to me being Jewish saying thins like ""If only Hitler succeeded in his mission so you and the rest of you dirty Jews wouldn't be here today."" Nothing was done about this employee. I've had patrons spit on me while cussing me out and again nothing was done. I have a written document signed by 9 other employees about how they were discriminated against in this workplace due to their race/religion as well. I'm thinking on going to a meeting with the head of the department Monday morning, recording the conversation (will notify of the recording) and if they refuse to accommodate or work with me on this to turn in my 2 week notice.

I was mainly wondering whether:  
A) Can they force me to use my sick time and have to pick and choose between the holidays or do they legally have to give me those days off even as unpaid?  
B) Do I have any legal grounds for a racial discrimination suit here?

Edit to clarify: I wanted those days off as unpaid. I'm fine not getting paid as long as I can get those days off. They are now trying to refuse giving me those days off whatsoever even if I were to use my sick time.

Edit 2 since people seem to be confused with people having Friday's off. I work Sunday to Wednesday so I still work a full 40 hours 5 days. We are open 7 days a week 16 hours a day. I am getting no special treatment whatsoever for having Friday's off.",AskLawyers
[AL] Why would multiple small law firms split in the middle of federal litigation?,"IANAL, but am involved in complex litigation with a couple dirty closely-held ""family"" businesses employing all the worst tactics. (Trump's legal playbook, basically).

If it matters, the litigation is in federal court and involves entities and shell companies spanning six mostly-southern states (so basically, legal hell).

The multiple law firms my opponents have enlisted seem to have little concern for even maintaining the appearance of good faith, which I've learned is par for the course with attorneys who take on these types of clients. (Side eye at you, Alina Habba). However I've seen something both in my case and in others that have attempted litigation with my opponents: the law firms split up/shut down or just the lawyer(s) involved in the litigation split off and form their own solo firm.

I wouldn't question it if this just happened with one attorney/firm; it's been a total of four now. A new firm enters the mix and starts repeating the lies of their client, obstructing and creating delays. If/when they get called out or sanctioned (three times so far), then boom - they announce they have formed their own firm (and continue representing my opponent). Confusingly, it seems like at least one attorney is still attached/advertised as part of their previous firm as well as their new independent practice - I don't really understand how that works.

Does this happen a lot in the legal world? Is there a common reason that attorneys who have been in practice with 1-4 other partners for a decade or more suddenly go off on their own in the middle of litigation? Is it a way to protect and/or limit the liability of the original firm from a malpractice suit or worse?

Hope my question makes sense; again, IANAL, just trying to make sense of what I'm experiencing trying to get justice against some super shady folks. Thanks for any insight you might have!",AskLawyers
[Ky] Making Near Identical Products?,"There is an industrial aerosol spray product that is expensive, and I am wondering what would stop me from producing something that is very similar. 

I have the sds, know the contents, and I'm aware that things like patents exist, but how could one make a similar product without infringing on a patent? Could the percentage of some of the ingredients in the aerosol be more or less? Ideally it'd be easiest to just sort of copy and paste, but perhaps another ingredient could be substituted.

I'm partly wondering as if I could get said product made without infringing on a patent or similar, there could be lots of money involved. ",AskLawyers
"[MO] If I call in sick, my employer doesn’t pay me and takes away my PTO. Is this legal?","I am a nurse at a non-unionized hospital in Missouri. 

I am paid hourly, full time is 36 hours/week split into three 12 hour shifts. I accrue a set about a of PTO (Paid Time Off) each week. 

If I am unable to go to work and need to call in sick on weekends or holidays
•I do not get paid AND 
•I get 12 hours of PTO SUBTRACTED from my accrued PTO balance 

Is this legal? 

If I call in on non holidays/weekdays they use my PTO to pay me.",AskLawyers
[CA] family law question,"Hi,

I have a question about family law.

I just got a restraining order against the father of our 8 month old boy. I have sole legal and custodial rights of our son. The restrained dad has court supervised visits. 

May I ask what happens when the restraining order ends? Do I still have the physical and legal custody or can my ex come back and fight to have custodial rights? 

I don’t know anyone who’s been in this situation, where they have a restraining order against the father of the child. 

I’m a little confused with how this works.

Advice is appreciated. 

",AskLawyers
[CA] harassment ,"Harassment 

Hi I hope someone could help me. So I’m being harassed by neighbors and I’m the only person who knows it. I live in a studio beneath my mom’s apartment that has a separate entrance in the back so I have my own privacy. We also have neighbors that live in the front house. Then we have neighbors to the right and left of us. The neighbors to the right of us are very nosy and are always standing by my window that’s next to their garage in the back. They’ve hid behind trees and watched my younger niece, they’ve stared at us walking into our home and they can be very loud sometimes. So one day they wouldn’t stop standing by my window and being nosy so I called the cops and the cops spoke to them. Well ever since that day which was about 3 months ago they have been harassing me.

1) they started out by standing by my window and making these weird noises to annoy me. I ended up having to sound proof my windows shut. Then I got cameras and I could never catch them in the act. 

2) once they know I sound proofed my windows they started hanging out in the back of their garage and calling me a faggot. Mind you they are always hiding. 

3) now this is going to sound insane but they’ve somehow managed to get into the walls of my house and in the crawl space. 

I have no evidence of this happening but I know it is because it’s retaliation. My mom, sister, niece don’t believe me but it’s real. 

What can I do about this situation? I’m planning on moving out because it’s just so horrible knowing someone is watching you non stop. ",AskLawyers
[TX] Texas/Wisconsin legality of ornamental possession of peyote cactus?,"I recently got into gardening 4-6 months ago, and currently own 14 plants. I am considering adding a peyote cactus to my collection. However this cactus causes psychedelic effects if eaten. I don't plan on eating or distributing specimen. It is listed as endangered due to overharvesting in the state of Texas.

Is it legal to possess as a purely ornamental plant in both Texas and Wisconsin? If not, is a license needed? I plan on moving to Wisconsin before next year, and want to know if it would be legal to own the plant in both states.",AskLawyers
[TX] What does “2 periods of possession mean”? In regards to visitation,"I recently had temporary orders from the AOG. The father has a step up plan. It says “… on the first, third, and fifth Saturdays of each month for 2 periods of possession.” 
Is that saying he has to do the visits for 2 visits each or for 2 months in order to move to the next step? 
Thank you!",AskLawyers
[non-US] Falsely reported by Reddit,"

My brother got falsely reported for csam on a post of ai edited image of to actress(not a minor). Will we get police at our house? What should we do?",AskLawyers
[IL] Do I have a legal leg to stand on if my 3 year old son was misdiagnosed with an earache then a few days later he was diagnosed with leukemia?  He passed away a couple months later after his cancer returned. ,[IL] Do I have a legal leg to stand on if my 3 year old son was misdiagnosed with an earache then a few days later he was diagnosed with leukemia?  He passed away a couple months later after his cancer returned. ,AskLawyers
[NC] is it possible to get an expungement on a DUI charge on federal land (military post)?,"I received a DUI charge and reckless &amp; careless charge at the entrance to a military post several years ago and it was handled under the jurisdiction of the US Eastern District Court of NC (although the charges were listed as violations of the NCGS, the prosecutor was from the OSJA)

The DUI was dismissed but I plead guilty to the C&amp;R. Is it possible to have any/all of those charges expunged? Or are the permanent since it was handled by a federal court?

",AskLawyers
[PA] Organ Donor Rules ,"To The Point: Can a person who is an organ donor write in their will or something, that if their organs were harvested and used on a living being, that the proceeds of the organ being used go to the deceased's family instead of the hospital? 

Or are donors organs free for the donee and the hospital doesn't get money from it? 

I guess my question here is more from a legal entitlement standpoint. ",AskLawyers
[PA] What does public inspection mean?,"According to the Clery Act college campus police must ""make the crime log for the most recent 60-day period open to public inspection during normal business hours"" and ""the institution must make any portion of the log older than 60 days available within two business days of a request for public inspection"" (34 CFR 668.46(f)(5)). The crime log is just a log of crimes on campus. I was just wondering how public is public inspection? Is it just that anyone can see it? I'm asking because my local police station allows notes, but you can't take pictures or make copies and that doesn't seem especially public to me, but I'm not a lawyer. ",AskLawyers
[AZ] criminal case help,"AZ help with criminal case
Posting for a friend who is looking for a pro bono lawyer he has a case against az and would like some insight, he has everything has had lawyers in the past look at it but they are to afraid to go against the country we are in even though it will win Thank you for any advice",AskLawyers
[IL] What can I do/carry to protect my dog from off leash dogs?,"I’ve had multiple off-leash dogs run up to both my current and previous dog. My previous dog had actually been attacked. I live in a decent area but no LEO care about a call about an off-leash dog (I’ve called before and they never seem to show). 

I just want to know what’s legal for me to carry/use against an off-leash dog if necessary. Or at least how I can look up the statues. Pepper spray, noise maker, air spray… anything. 

Please point me in the right direction. Thank you!",AskLawyers
[FL] Questions regarding expunging record(s),"Hello everyone I hope you're all having an awesome day. I live in Pinellas County, Florida and my question(s) are pertinent to this area. I was arrested in April 2016 and charged with 2 Felonies which happened around a year previously in June 2015. After completing an 18 month Diversion program (PTI - Pre Trial Intervention) my charges became eligible to be expunged. During the time I committed this crime and I completed PTI. I had turned my life around. I haven't really thought much about it as I was and still am working at the same place since 2014. Even to this day I have stayed sober, out of trouble and always tried to be a productive member of society. Anyways, I have began applying for Masters Degree programs in cybersecurity and second jobs. Unfortunately, I have been turned down by 2 companies which I wanted to work at due to this record.  Furthermore, a majority of the colleges I am looking into applying for are asking about my criminal background even without convictions. Now I have no problem with disclosing what I have done when I was actively a junkie and the results of that however, I would prefer to get that expunged and close that chapter in my life so to speak.  The question I have is would it be mandatory for me to hire an attorney for this process? Also, if not than how much should it cost? Thank you everyone for your time!
",AskLawyers
[IL] Is being a lawyer as cool as Suits makes it look?,"REAL lawyers only. Please only answer if you have passed the bar and are currently a practicing lawyer at a law firm. Also, ignore the ""IL"" in the title. It's just there because of the rule. 

I'm watching Suits, and one thing is very consistent: they make it look EXTREMELY bad ass to be a lawyer. Obviously they're corporate lawyers, and deal with 8+ figure cases, but I doubt I'm gonna get many Harvey Specters on Reddit. 

So anyone who is a real lawyer, is it cool? Bonus points if you work in a major metropolitan area. ",AskLawyers
[TX] Will disputing a debt reset statute of limitations?,"I just got a letter of verification on 14.5k debt and only have until 4.11.24 to dispute it!

Will disputing a debt reset the clock? Ie once they prove it's mine? Will a debt collector tell you where the clock is on the statute of limitations? (I doubt it)

Does anyone know how I could get that answer?

 Because I've answered the phone a few times and tried to settle the debt; they came back with an offer for 10k rather than 14.5k but I didn't have that amount. Was trying to settle for 6k to put on a credit card.

I wonder if trying to settle it was the same as admitting I owe it and therefore I reset the clock...

Is there a point to disputing the debt at all? I do owe it. I feel like they'd have evidence

It's a university tuition/boarding debt. Not a private or federal student loan. Colorado (live in TX now)

Any advise or input is super appreciated, even if y'all don't know anything but one or two snipets of advise. TYIA!",AskLawyers
"[Non-US] What is the solution to this legal ""paradox"" ?"," I just came up with a situation in my head and I'd like to know what's the solution.

Let's assume you invite a friend (let's call him Mike) to your house for dinner, he comes with his car and pulls up in your drive-way. The dinner goes on and Mike have a few drinks and ends up offending you (for example, he insults your wife or something like that), thus you order him to leave your property.

The thing is, it's very cold outside and it would be unhealthy and dangerous for Mike to stay out for too long, and as he's drunk he can't drive back home. And because you told him to leave the property, he has too stay out of the drive-way, so he can't just stay in the car. Considering the weather, you suggest him to drive his car out of the drive-way so that he can wait in it while he sobers up outside of your property, but Mike refuses to let you use his car.

What's the solution to this situation, considering you and Mike are very stubborn ? Is the only solution to find middle ground or is there something else involved, like a law, that could decide for them ?",AskLawyers
[PA] Surgery Quote?,"Hello so I’m having surgery May 15th (today is April 6th) I was originally quoted 7,950 for my out of pocket cost, but yesterday I got a call saying they gave me the wrong quote and it’s actually 16,165 that’s due on May 5th
This surgery been booked since May of 2023  is there anyway I can hold them to the original quoted price? ",AskLawyers
[TN] Do I have any recourse to have mine and my children’s names removed from these cases? ,"I am the stepmom now but during litigation between my spouse and his now ex wife, I was listed many times as my full name and paramour in their divorce documents. 

My children were also named in these documents. 

Do I have any recourse to have mine and my children’s names removed from these cases? The “allegations” bitter ex made against my character are offensive and of course, false/invalid. 

I am not listed in the original complaint for divorce, I am not a party, corespondent or anything else formal. In fact, I have never even met the crazy ex wife and I do not reside in TN I reside with my spouse and children in CO. 

I was never notified I had been named in these petitions/motions etc. so I did not have an opportunity to defend these allegations against my character. 

What can I do? ",AskLawyers
[TN] Order of Protection case dismissed with prejudice,"I have two sons. My oldest Son has been married to Beth less than 10 months. Beth stated my husband (His father) made a threatening phone call to our other daughter-in-law. Then DIL called Beth and warned her My husband was going to unalive her and also her four children. Three. Months. prior to filing 😑. 
We went to court yesterday. We had all our phone records. No such call was made to anybody. We had text messages and ring cam. photos of everybody coming over to our home multiple times the past three months. All smiles and happy. We have our other DIL that was named as the person who called plaintiff to testify the call never occurred and provided her phone records. We had our official phone records also. Nobody called any family to that stated day. 

The statement was completely false. She was angry because I told her she met my son when she was four months pregnant.
She should not have had or son sign the birth certificate and check mark the baby was a minority when the baby actually has two snow white parents. It’s was done to give the child affirmative action and minority scholarships, etc. 
That is why she went nuclear after us full force. She has multiple children each with a different fathers my son married her two weeks after he met her and she was already four months pregnant. They have been married since last summer.

In court yesterday. we did not see the judge. The attorneys put us ( my husband, myself, DIL who was there to state the call never happened and our son) in a room with our son who didn’t sign the order of protection, it was only his wife’s Beth signature.


We were talking back and forth, my son kept lying for his wife, despite mountains of evidence proving otherwise. The attorneys decided to have case dismissed with prejudice, and have our son pay court and attorney cost. They gave my husband no contact with our son and Bergman? It doesn't make sense because my husband done nothing wrong. We were able to prove the phone call never happened even our other daughter-in-law was there to state she did not call her and tell her anything like that and provided her phone records also.
We also have to attend Therapy?????

FYI—My elderly husband two days after being served and read the false statement has had a cardiac event and been hospitalized over this stress of this lies and false claims. I am terminally ill and on hospice my self. We feel like we were manipulated by not having the person who lied and stated all of this in the room. 

Do we have any legal recourse in Tennessee? My husband realized how he got shafted after leaving the courthouse. 


",AskLawyers
[DC] Why is only illegal for employers to discriminate/retaliate against employees of specific protected classes or those engaging in a protected activity as opposed to being illegal for them to do that to any employee?,"I am familiar with title vil as the statutory authority that provides this mandate.

I would like to understand more about the rationale and or push back (from who; on what grounds) there was regarding the reasonable obligations and expectation of the employer to (all) employees. Not just just those that fall in a protected class OR are engaging in protected activities. 

I am also clear (I think) that the law does not really seem to recognize 'discrimination' without the 'protected' component. 

However as I understand it, retaliation and/or discrimination are fundamentally hostile actions. What value is there to be gained in the law permitting that behavior within the employer/employee relationship?",AskLawyers
[OH] Is leaving gifts/items on someone's property littering?,"Is leaving gifts after you've been told to stay off the property (trespassing aside) considered littering? I'd assume dumping requires the items to be trash, but not totally sure about that either. Not sure if it would be harassment, but I have a feeling that it would be something. Couldn't imagine you would be able to just leave things on someone's property against their wishes. TIA.
",AskLawyers
[CA] Why are there no lawyers in Sacramento that represent tenants?,"I tried every day this week to get in touch with a lawyer to ask a question about contract laws and my new lease at my apartment complex. I called 311, I contacted all the legal help resources that came up when I searched online, the relative I live with contacted a local free legal assistance service for people 60+, I tried the law schools, I also called every lawyer I found on the first 3 pages of google results. For the both of us, as soon as we mentioned that we were renters, every single person we got in touch with immediately said they didn't help tenants and they ended the conversation. 
I don’t need a lawyer anymore because we ran out of time, but l'm wondering if something happened that made everybody stop helping renters? Or has it always been this way? Am I missing something? 
Thank you for taking the time to answer I appreciate it 🫶🏻",AskLawyers
[OK] photo for facial recognition required at every traffic stop. ,"I understand Oklahoma is a one party consent state, but what’s the legal aspect on this? Could you simply tell them and here’s my ID? Would I get drug out of my car for refusing to provide a facial photo? Everyday feels a bit closer to the CCCP. ",AskLawyers
[KY] Selling Legal Cannabinoids?,"I occasionally venture into smoke shops, and see all the vapes, edible, etc with legal cannbinoids like delta 8, hhc, etc, the list seems to grow longer every day. 

So my first question, is why are these allowed to be sold? I assume the analogue act must be in play here, but I guess not.

Two, what is stopping them from just selling individual grams of the cannabinoid concentrates versus the vapes, edibles, etc?

Three, what is stopping people from just selling legal cannabinoid vapes on the streets, advertised as the legal cannabinoids, not as illegal delta 9? 

I'm just so confused on how smoke shops are allowed to sell legal cannabinoids. I don't want them to stop, I'm more confused on the mechanics of how the law works in this area.",AskLawyers
[GA] Would I be responsible for damages if I bumped into this car's rear hitch?,"https://preview.redd.it/3g1zabui4ssc1.jpg?width=960&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=a316d2c7e8337b68a1f1cd17c7f7efe702dcbd46

For context: There was a car in a parking spot with their rear bumper slightly over the line, and I pulled into the spot behind them. There was a small, difficult to see hitch attached to the rear of the car that went far over the line. Luckily I did not pull in further, but if I had accidentally bumped into that car's hitch, would I have been responsible for the damages?

Edit: thank for the replies! I suppose I was wondering if I would have to pay to repair MY car, since I probably wouldn’t do much to that other car",AskLawyers
[WA] Health Insurance Cancelled despite on time payments of premiums,"Question : 

What type of lawyer do I see for unfair cancellation of insurance? Given ongoing care for serious mental illnesses in my family, can I sue for this termination aggravating these  conditions and no reasonable time frame or options by insurance company for which their doctors work for to transfer care ? Is it likely to win such a suit against a large HMO or settle out of court?  

Explanation: 

   I have a family plan that I bought with Kaiser over 5 years ago. I made on time monthly premium payments for 5 years  via bill pay for which I have evidence of cashed checks by kaiser. 

I was informed on Feb 6th, 2024 that our insurance for my family of five was cancelled due to lack of premium payments. After many hours of research, I figured out that Kaiser had changed the P.O. Box for our specific plan. However both P.O. Boxes are at Kaiser and accept payments for insurance premiums. 

Kaiser  did cash the checks at the previous P.O. box and were just slow (approximately 2 weeks) in forwarding the funds internally. They didn't notify me that this was being done.This had gone on for more than a few months, thus there is a precedent.  Again I figured this out on my own after many hours of phone calls. Kaiser did not inform me . They just took my money and terminated coverage for 'lack of payment ' . 

I contacted the Washington Insurance Commissioner who told Kaiser to reinstate us in early February. Kaiser said they would after I showed proof of cancelled checks,  which I did and Kaiser acknowledged. They reneged on their promise to us and the Insurance Comisioner to reinstate with no explanation, yesterday, 6 weeks later ! 


Potential Lawsuit: Breach of contract, damages, and patient abandonment 


I would like to sue for breach of contract and resultant pain and suffering. I believe our previous history of ongoing mental illness treated by Kaiser has made this unfair cancellation of insurance particularly egregious. Of note, I did some research and found out there was a class action lawsuit against Kaiser in California a few years ago for delay of mental health treatment. 

It was the months of February and March, and now April that despite payment we could not access our doctors. We originally paid out of pocket for medications but eventually I was told they wouldn't dispense an important psychiatric medication for myself (antipsychotic), even if I paid out of pocket ,  and other meds due to our insurance being inactive. 

 I have a significant history of PTSD; all three children battle depression . My daughter had an adverse reaction to an IUD that I diagnosed myself ( I am an MD) and we had to go to Planned  Parenthood  to get it removed ( the IUD was put in by Kaiser) . My daughter also suffered from significant gastrointestinal issues where the workup has been delayed. All of this has greatly impacted her previous history of depression. 

My son had to cancel a therapy appointment with a new psychiatrist that he waited for 6 months. My son has a significant history of bipolar disease / adhd for which he has been suicidal in the past. 

Recently he suffered an adverse reaction to  prescribed ritalin. Ritalin is known to potentially cause mood disorders in adults and thus is not the drug of choice for adults.  In his case, it likely  triggered  a minor mania so he couldn't concentrate, sleep and get organized. He had GPA of 3.8, and this is the first time he has failed a class. He is hoping to be a doctor for which Chemistry is a requirement. 

My youngest daughter had to cancel her counseling sessions multiple times. Her depression has gotten worse. 

For myself, the delay in getting meds which I eventually got from an outside pharmacy, paying out of pocket,  has exacerbated my PTSD. Also the stress of my family not having insurance and having no qualifying event to enroll in other insurance has taken a big toll on myself and wife. I attempted and paid for a 'cost sharing medical coverage plan and then realized the company was not reputable and withdrew. Being out of open enrollment, it was the only choice I had for my family. 

 I have spent weeks and multiple hours on the phone trying to resolve this. I will inform the Insurance Commissioner about them not following through on their promise to reinstate us . However , given the impact of loss of insurance on serious psychiatric illness, stress , and hours of my time I want not only reinstatement, but compensation for above pain and suffering. 

It is completely unethical to cancel a family's insurance due to Kaiser's inefficient internal mail system. I would also consider it patient abandonment analogous to being 'fired from a therapist' without oral and written notice,not given options of other therapists to continue care , and time to do so. Clinicians give patients a month to find a new doctor, if they fire them, (I believe) . As the treating therapists work for the insurance company that terminated our care, the insurance company and employed therapists are one entity bound to the same standards of patient abandonment 


Next steps , prognosis: 

I am wondering what type of lawyer to consult - Personal Injury ? And if you care to comment, does it seem like a reasonable case that is worthwhile going after. I do have the time to invest in it but would want a reasonable compensation i.e at least above  10k .  I live in the Seattle area. ",AskLawyers
[CA] Case against Ford?,"We bought a 2006 Ford E450 retired emergency relief vehicle when it had 48.5k miles. We converted it into an RV to travel and work around the US. Purchased, registered and insured in NY.

TLDR at the bottom.

In June 2023, at 67.8k miles we had a fuel injector break off into the engine and had to replace the engine. We spent $21,119.17 to get a complete engine at a Portland, OR Ford with a 2 year warranty. During that time we had to get a rental van for $2,339.73 and when that got too expense a motel using credit card points for $882.42.

In October 2023, while at an Ohio Ford service center, we replace 2 CAC hoses that connect to our turbocharger pipe that had fallen off. $982.22

In November 2023, while in NY getting an oil change with a local diesel mechanic, we are told that the oil fill tube was not connected and that the passenger side valve cover is damaged, meaning that we have basically had an exposed hole on our engine. He temporarily fixed it but that we should go to Ford to see if it is covered under our warranty.

From 11/28/24-12/11/23 it is in the shop back at that same Ohio Ford getting the new valve cover replaced under warranty and we also have them replace a reservoir and vacuum pump that was causing A/C and heat issues. $2,230.53

The next day while headed to California, we notice that the A/C and heat no longer work again. In addition we look under the hood to see Freon leaking everywhere. We tighten up the Freon leak while on the side of the road.

Jan 12th, 2024: San Diego Ford #1 confirms that it was a faulty vacuum pump that is causing the A/C and heat to not work. Charge us $200 for diagnostics and Ohio Ford says that will cover the diagnostics and ship a new vacuum to the San Diego Ford.

Jan 16th, 2024: We start having hot start issues where the van will not start if the oil/coolant temps are between 100-185 degrees. 

Jan 29th, 2024: We sit in the lobby of San Diego Ford #1 for 8hrs only to be told that the tech got pulled off for an emergency job and couldn’t replace vacuum. 

Feb 5th, 2024: We sit in the lobby of San Diego Ford #1 for 8hrs after being assured that the tech would be able to complete the job that day. At 5pm we are told that they would need the van overnight to complete. $123.34 for Motel 6

Feb 6th, 2024: San Diego Ford #1 completes the vacuum pump job, 2 days later the A/C doesn’t get cold anymore.

Van continues to have hot start issues and realize it wasn’t just a one time fluke.

Feb 20th-Mar 1st: Van brought to a different San Diego Ford for hot start issue, alignment/rotation, brake check, and oil change. Getting ahold of the service advisor was the worst we have ever experienced. Finally told that they couldn’t find the hot start issue. They replace the fuel pressure regulator to try to fix the code present and that it would be covered under warranty but that we also need ball joints replaced. With such a bad experience we figure we will go somewhere else for those. Upon receiving the van back, we notice the airbag light on and the tires losing air when the valve stem is removed. We are told to come back and they will fix the issues. The following day we hear the tire pressure equalizer that connects from our dually tires in back rattling and losing air. Also noticed our diesel heater exhaust muffler slightly bent. We notice the passenger bag connector under the seat unplugged so we plug that back in and light goes off. Stayed with family and $230.74 rental car out of pocket. $563 for repairs.

March 4th, 2024: We bring the van back for them to put the tires back on correctly and point of the slightly bent diesel heater muffler. We are brought into the service managers office of San Diego Ford #2 and told they want to make it right by doing the ball joints at a discount. We agree and bring it back the next day. Later that night we see the diesel heater muffler even more crushed than it was before.

March 5th, 2024: Bring the van back to San Diego Ford #2 for ball joints and get rental out of pocket for the day $41.80. At 330pm told that they can’t complete it and will need it overnight. We stay with family and extend the rental car.

March 6th, 2024: We receive the van back and assured that it is good to drive to Alaska. Ball joints replaced for $755.42.

March 9th, 2024: Van won’t start while hot still. 

March 11th, 2024: CAC hose that was replaced in November 2023 pops off while in the desert and have to reattach on the side of the road. We drive under 40mph to the nearest town. 

March 12th, 2024: We bring the van to yet another Ford service center to have them look at the cac hose that popped off as well as the hot start issue. We pay $199 for diagnostics and they say that the cac hose looks like it was attached well but that we have 6 different codes that are popping up and that we should have it looked at back when we get to San Diego. We get 5 miles down the road and the CAC hose pops off again. We bring it back that Ford and they say they could figure it out as they have “the best 6.0 tech west of the Mississippi”. We leave the vehicle with them, get a motel 6 for the night $90.43 and get a rental car through hertz to get back to our job in San Diego. 

March 13th, 2024: Spoke with San Diego Ford #2 and told that there were no codes present when we left their facility. 

March 19th, 2024: Told that we need to replace our engine again. Mileage: 79.7k Meaning that we got 11k miles out of that replacement engine. Started a ford pro case with a ford representative and emailed them our full nightmare experience with ford over the last 9 months. 

Terrible communication with service advisor on status of vehicle continues and continue to extend rental car at $40/day with no end in sight.

April 1st, 2024: Spoke with service manger and told that engine has been ordered but no ETA available. Spoke with ford experience specialist but told that she can’t do much because she hasn’t been able to get ahold of the service advisor. 

April 2nd, 2024: Told that the engine is coming from Charlotte, NC to California but still no ETA. Request that car rental be covered by ford but told by experience specialist that it’s not guaranteed and she would talk with the leadership team.

April 5th, 2024: No word on rental car reimbursement. After 25 days of having the rental car we return it because we cant afford it and borrow a family members vehicle. Hertz Rental $1,084.60
We stop at the ford service center and are told that the engine will hopefully come 4/8 but that they now think it’s turbocharger and not the engine causing the codes. When the engine and turbo charge come they are going to replace just the turbo charge to see if that will fix the issue.

This is where we are currently at.

TLDR:
-Spent $21,199.170 to replace engine to only have that engine need to be replaced 11k miles later

-Ford told us that we were good to drive the vehicle and then have 6 codes six days later at a different ford, including the code they said they fixed.

-Paid $1k for turbo cac hoses that are falling off

-Paid $2.3k for an A/C job that doesn’t work

-Since 6/26/23, the van has been in a ford service center for 80 total days as of 4/5/24. Thats 28% of the time.

-$1,328.61 for hotels since June 2023

-$3,696.87 on rental vehicles since June 2023",AskLawyers
[NV] Billboard Lawyers,I’ve heard lawyers on billboards are a red flag but why ?? 🚩 What do you guys think about Navqi Las Vegas ? ,AskLawyers
[WI] Is this wage theft?,"I work for a very small (4 employee) home care company and I’m paid hourly “per client”. 

All employees have to come into the office at 9am for a morning meeting and receive our assignments for the day. We are not paid for this time at all and usually don’t leave the office until 10am. We are also not compensated for time spent driving to clients houses (in our own personal vehicles), which are sometimes 30 minutes away. 

Is this wage theft? I’m in Wisconsin. 

EDIT: We are paid piecework at an hourly rate. I.e. client X should take 3 hours, so we get paid 3 hours regardless of how long we’re there. ",AskLawyers
"[OR] If my company uses VoIP on employees’ personal phones, can those personal devices be subpoenaed?","I’m a decision maker for a small organization that is looking to switch our phone system to VoIP. We have four phones purchased by the organization and were going to have the other four employees use their personal phones.

However, my dad told me that if the organization gets sued, or worse, there’s a criminal investigation at work, all personal devices with VoIP on it can be subpoenaed and all personal data unrelated to work would be exposed.

Is this true?",AskLawyers
"[UT] Confused on utilities for rental, land lord did not send a total for the month of February in an email like they always do and now they want it paid in arrears? ","State of Utah, lease ended on the first of April, and landlord has now (April 5th) sent me the last two months bills) we had another fourth person move in part of the way through march, seems like the land lord split the total for march (283.93) 4 ways for everyone else. February was $334.18 split three ways. (Names changed for privacy.)(I would be Jason)

John owes James $71.00 within 3 days please. 
Jason owes James $208.61 or it can be deducted from the deposit, let me know your preference :)

Jason, since the utilities are paid in arrears I need to avg the daily rate and prorate the rest of the month of March. I've added them up to be $137.61 total
Power would be $1.98/day x 24 days = $47.55. 
Water would be $.80/day x 23 days = $18.52. 
Gas would be $4.47/day x 16 days = $71.54. 

Is this right?",AskLawyers
[CO] Forced stay at rehab facility due to having good insurance.,"So i was originally planned to discharge last friday, but was told things weren't set up yet and it would have to be monday. On monday they said they still have to work out on getting the right equipment for my apartment in order for me to discharge, and would have to wait til this friday. the lead director of the facility came into my room yesterday and told me that they fired the lead discharge person and that he was going to be the temporary fill-in. He informed me i won't be leaving until monday now. 

I have good insurance so im fully covered and everything which makes me have more days than others to stay in the facility. Those days end on Saturday. I was informed that they won't be charging me anything for Sunday and that I'll leave monday. 

A therapist warned me in secret that they have been doing this to a lot of people due to lack of patients in the facility. aka. milking all the insurance money possible from patients before discharging them.

The major red flag is that i made my own calls to the home health company/home equipment company and they said that i was scheduled for last friday but it was canceled due to not being ready to discharge and in further need of therapy, which is absolute BS. The director told me that they just didnt have the equipment for me to go home that day. and now he is telling me the exact same thing this week. I made the same call to both home health entities and they still have a held spot scheduled for me tomorrow, but just need the directors go ahead and scripts, which would only be a quick phone call and fax/email.

I was warned that the woman that was fired was, in fact, doing her job and trying to get patients out at the quickest date possible and wouldnt go along with the scheme, so she was let go.

wtf is going on? is this legal?",AskLawyers
[PA] Medicaid Lookback,"Father entered into a purchase agreement for the sale of home with me over 10 years ago. The way the contract was structured is I'd pay a monthly sum each month until the purchase price was paid off. Price was significantly under FMV. 

My question: if my father needs to apply for Medicaid, is this subject to the look back (5 years) since the purchase price hasn't been completely paid off yet? Or not since the contract was signed over a decade ago. ",AskLawyers
[TX] Chacruna leaves in USA,"I'm really confused on this.

In the USA, DMT is a schedule 1 drug, but it occurs in nature all the time (even produced in the human body). Apparently, it is legal to buy plants that contain it, but is a grey area.

So at what point does this become illegal or sketchy:

1. Buying chacruna leaves online
2. Boiling the leaves in water
3. Posting a tutorial video of you making this ayahuasca on YouTube
4. Pouring it out 

From what I understand, all of this is legal in the USA. Is that incorrect? It just becomes illegal if you extract pure DMT or consume the plants. It seems like a weird loophole, like how people can by THCa flower with less than 0.3% delta 9 THC, which is legal until it is smoked",AskLawyers
[DC] Question on the Legitimacy of Civil Courts ,"As a lawyer do you agree with how a civil claim only needs preponderance of evidence in order to decide a claim and not hard evidence without a doubt?

To me it logically and morally doesn't make sense.  Yes the civil penalties are just monetary but they can still be significant and be fairly equivalent to imprisoning someone.  Can they not?

OJ Simpson was found not guilty in criminal court.  But then was found 'guilty' in civil court and was ordered to pay millions of dollars in damages.  So if he's not criminally guilty than what was OJ fundamentally charged with?  Is the crime that he was found 'probable to commit the murder'?  I think the difference between not guilty and innocent is irrelevant here.

In a more simple example

If person A punched person B 2 years ago and person B civililly sues person A and has a picture of a bruise and proves he was at the same location and it turns out that person A has a charge for domestic violence then will person A be found 'guilty' (civil) just because it might be true or could logically happen?  I don't get it.  Couldn't everyone just sue person A knowing they don't need any evidence?
",AskLawyers
[NY] Corporate Disclosure Agreement,"Hey everyone question,

If a defendant gets caught lying on a Corporate Disclosure Agreement and you bring this information to the court with proof will the court do anything? I know they should but what are the chances? And ethically will their attorney disclose this to the court in an admission that their client lied? Federal District court",AskLawyers
[CA] Possibly Fired for Asking for my Pay.,"So I have been waiting for my pay for almost a whole week after I was supposed to be paid. I have reached out multiple times to the proper people who handle my payroll. I have just been pushed to the side over and over, after constantly asking for them to reach out to the higher ups. After half a week I finally got a hold of one of the higher ups and have finally been told I am getting my pay. I come into work today and Instead of being let into the office they’re having me wait in the lobby for my boss who I had asked to reach out to the higher ups but was met with no response. It is a cannabis distribution and production company so things are still kinda shady due to unregulated laws and such. I however have signed a contract and everything but was denied a personal copy. Is this legal?? It can’t be, right?",AskLawyers
[KY] Epo dismissed. Two days later arrested for violation. How is this possible?,"[KY]

So my ex ended up filing a protective order against me after I found out she was pregnant but due to alot of lying and cheating I told her I didn't want to stay with her but would be there as a father. We'll she said she wouldn't let me in the kids life if I didn't want to be with her. I tell her I will take her to court if I had to. I leave she then files a restraining order and somehow gets it when there was no abuse whatsoever. We go in front of the judge and the judge told her straight up she had nothing. She then goes downstairs to the clerk and files an affidavit for violating epo and I get arrested two days later after it was dismissed. Is this legal and what can I do?",AskLawyers
[MO] Landlord says I can’t move in until a week after the move in date? ,Hi! Sorry this is a weird question. I live in Missouri and my partner and I are about to move into another apt. Our potential landlord says that the apt we are looking at (and all other places they own) won’t be available to move in until a week after the lease start date because of cleaning. There would be no rebate for the week we would not be able to stay there. The landlord owns about 75% of all places in town and really are the only ones who have availability in our price range and our current lease ends on the 31st. Is this legal? Is there anything we could do to essentially prevent being homeless for a week? ,AskLawyers
[NY] real estate tax question ,"Hello lawyers of reddit. My dad wants to gift my mom a property, its market value is around 800k, he has about 600k in equity. We live in NYC, how will he go about doing this? And is this a taxable event? If so how much should he expect to pay? Thank you all for your help.",AskLawyers
"[CA] - is there anything illegal about a bumper sticker that says ""I &lt;3 SHOOTING COPS""",tasteless sure but is it illegal? or is this fall under freedom of speech?,AskLawyers
[CA]collection agency,"My daughter and I went to Verizon about 10 years ago as that was my daughter’s carrier … she wanted to buy me a phone since I watched took care of my granddaughter and she wanted me to have a reliable phone as well as payment for taking care of my granddaughter and all her animals…. I don’t remember if I signed anything or not but I never received a bill or any letters or email from them …. Well, my daughter and granddaughter moved out this past December since she wanted her own place at 35 years old and teenage granddaughter… I told my daughter that I am changing phone carriers since I was no longer going to be doing any more with her animals or granddaughter… she said ok … well, on Feb 16 I received a collection agency letter from Verizon for 1,570 dollars that I owed them … I don’t understand if my phone was under my daughters account all these years and she pain the bill why I was receiving this…. I tried calling Verizon but it doesn’t show my account with them …. What should I do … why do I owe this when my daughter has me under her account and paid all these years ….. I’d appreciate any insight … don’t be too harsh …. I’m old … 🤗",AskLawyers
[TX] Buying an inherited property,"The owner of the property died. There is no surviving spouse. There is no will.
The house is in a bad shape and worth around $80-100 thousand. 
There are 2 brothers who want to sell and a sister who does not want to sell. 
They do not have money for lawyers. What would be the best scenario to buy this house from them?",AskLawyers
[PA] Rental Security deposit,"Hello,

After moving out of my previous apartment My landlord has sent the itemized list of deductions for security deposit. It seems to be bull for a few reasons:

1. A steamer came and cleaned carpet the week of move out. We have the invoice which we sent to him as well showing date of cleaning.
2. I lived at this location for 5 years so the extensive cleaning seems absurd and above the normal wear and tear.

Please take a look

* Carpet in bedroom not vacuumed or steam cleaned.                          $200
* Kitchen floor, fridge, shower &amp; range needed extensive cleaning       $200
* Bedroom wall damage                                                                         $25
* Accrued late rent, Aug. 21', Sept. 21', April 23'                                    $310

**TOTAL:                                                                                                            $735**Total Security Deposit:                                                                                    $700

My biggest thing is if they can withhold the late rent even if late fees were paid?",AskLawyers
[MS] I have a question about 3rd party contact. ,"I moved away from my bio-mom because she was being really abusive towards myself and my family. I got a restraining order against her and that includes no 3rd party contact. With her repeatedly calling the police on me for ""well checks"" and calling child services on me constantly for ""over-feeding my son."" Is that considered 3rd party contact? I have copies of the reports from the police. I also have copies of the findings from the cps investigations. ",AskLawyers
[MT] Is This Dental Malpractice?,"I originally sought dental treatment due to a severe infection lying between a tooth that had previously undergone a root canal procedure 5-6 years ago and a separate tooth that had not received such treatment. 

When I arrived for my first appointment, they trimmed down the side area of the root canal tooth and partially on the top of the other sore tooth (which I later found out, due to going to the hospital, may have had, or still has, an infected nerve). However, the dentist's focus on the treatment shifted, and they opted to solely address the previously treated tooth, not the pain I was experiencing in between the root canal-treated tooth and the opposite one, by placing a temporary crown without fully resolving the underlying infection issue. 

As a result, I continued to experience significant pain, the worst I've ever experienced, and discomfort, necessitating the use of antibiotics and prescription medication. I lay in bed for weeks in absolute agony, unable to do my job or make time for friends or family. Despite appointments being scheduled, the dentist consistently rescheduled me and did not address any ongoing pain, only proposing corrective action after an extended waiting period. 

However, this ""corrective action"" I waited for through several reschedulings was simply to trim down the gum along the already root canaled tooth and place the new permanent crown in. Once again, a procedure I didn't think was necessary, but was willing to undergo since I was fully under the impression that Medicaid would cover the full extent of the infection treatment. 

Furthermore, now I’m being told that there would be out-of-pocket payments for the corrective procedure I originally wanted (which would be treating the infection and the root canal on the actually sore tooth) due to me reaching the amount Medicaid will cover for dental. 

Additionally, I want to emphasize that I didn't want to be on the prescribed painkillers as they were opioids, and I had experienced addiction with them back when I was 16. I was in the worst pain of my life for a solid two weeks and had a total loss of enjoyment of life. I was told medicaid would cover what I needed to be done, but instead received a different treatment and now can’t get what needs to be done. Given these circumstances, I am curious if I even have a case, and if so, what kind of case I'd be looking into (e.g., malpractice, negligence, etc.).
",AskLawyers
[CT] Can my boss at a smokeshop have me do training for almost 2 weeks with no pay and then not give me the job?,[CT] Can my boss at a smokeshop have me do training for almost 2 weeks with no pay and then not give me the job?,AskLawyers
[NJ] Can one party of a contract continually tempt the other party to violate said contract?,"I’m interested in a lawyers opinion on this. I do rideshare driving for both Lyft and Uber. We are under contract as independent contractors with these companies. Part of this contract is that we are not permitted to transport minors without being accompanied by an adult. This is not the law but simply a contract requirement. 

However, the issue is that they consistently send us rides where it’s only a minor, which means we have to cancel the ride and lose money.

The first question is, do these rideshare companies have any sort of legal obligation to take all measures necessary to reduce or eliminate these sort of requests?  Since my agreement is with the rideshare companies and NOT the customer, am I correct to assume that although technically the passenger has obtained an account under age, that the rideshare company allowed this to happen by failing to verify their identity?  

The second question is, after these companies send us these requests over and over, does that create an argument on the side of the driver that this particular part of the contract is unenforceable seeing that the company refuses to uphold their end?

TLDR:  Can party A in a contract say “you cannot do X” and then continually tempt party B to violate that provision?  Does party A have a responsibility to ensure they are not tempting party B to violate their contract?

Third question. Seeing that my contract is with Uber and Lyft and not the passenger, am I correct to assume that if I arrive to find only a minor that these companies have essentially waived that part of the contract?

Should I do other things like send certified letters informing them to cease and desist attempting to violate their own contract?",AskLawyers
[WV] Why is some evidence disallowed due to being “too punitive”?,"This is for anywhere really. Is that the whole point of evidence? If a fact or proof exists to the detriment (or benefit, I guess) of the defendant, why wouldn’t you want it admitted?",AskLawyers
[FL] car repossessions ," I’m not sure if I’m in the right sub for this but I’m desperate. Last year I financed a car through Carvana I had pip insurance which covers nothing, apparently since I financed the car I had gap coverage. Fast forward to February my car went through a puddle after a storm and it totaled the car. My insurance wouldn’t even go to declare it a total loss wouldn’t touch it so I had to get the gap coverage insurance to go out and declare it a total loss. They sent the finance company a check for $4000. I still owe $10k on the car. I called the finance company because it’s still their car I can’t get the title to scrap it. Today I’m told my car is repossession even though I’ve never had one late payment and I’m still current on all payments, not only that I was told that I’m responsible for all auction fees and that the repossession it’s going on my credit report. Can someone please help me with this my car was in a puddle and now all this is happening thank you for reading if you’ve made it this far. ",AskLawyers
[NY] Exactly how illegal would it be to fly a drone in NYC? Is the airspace protected?,[NY] Exactly how illegal would it be to fly a drone in NYC? Is the airspace protected?,AskLawyers
[TX] apartment complex neglect has caused us to live in hazardous conditions,"My unit's upstairs shower was causing a leak to occur above my kitchen light a year ago. The complex management sent maintenance over who just patched a pipe and put wood to block the hole. All was said and done.


I was cleaning my shower the other day, and a tile on in the bottom corner falls off, exposing a hole. No wall, no wood, just tile and hole. I alerted the complex management and they sent maintenance out a few days later. 


Maintenance comes by to investigate. They pull another tile off and scope out the former leak area in the kitchen. They decide it's a foundation/structural issue and they needed to call in a professional. 


Pros came today and showed me (about 20 minutes ago) where THE ENTIRE BATHROOM FLOOR IS BREAKING INTO THE KITCHEN. 


This is crazy liability and I'm genuinely afraid of being inside right now. 


Do I have the right to move units, free of charge? Side note, I'm in the process of switching units anyway (haven't signed the contract yet) but it's not scheduled until the 10th. 


As I'm typing this, they just told me how much mold we've been breathing in this entire time. 


What's my best move here? I feel like they've endangered my entire family's life and expect me to continue in these living conditions.


Should I stay in this unit any longer or get a hotel? I don't really have money for a room atm but fuck I don't like being in here. I have young child that I am TERRIFIED could have side effects from the mold we've been breathing in for YEARS.

 No one ever came back after the first call until I told them about the newer issue. 


I'm sorry if this post is all over the place. I'm livid and so concerned for our health. It's hard to think straight after being told there's a chance we all 3 could have cancer by now. ",AskLawyers
[PA] SA,"Hi so here's a preface me and a girl were in a very toxic relationship, we ended recently and she claims I SA'd her. And she has reported it to my job. However we called and I got her to admit to exaggerating as well as admitting to genuinely sexually assaulting me, I have recordings but I live in PA. I sent the recordings to my job, however I want people to know what she did without me getting in trouble for recording. What should I do? I considered meeting up in person with her school and playing the videos and just deleting them immediately and making everybody else delete them but I really need help!",AskLawyers
[CA] Is this legal? Sovereign citizen starts a “law firm”. ,"https://www.williamsandwilliamslawfirm.com/

Brandon Joe Williams has started his own “law firm” and basically offers services to “help” sovereign citizens with their bat shit crazy litigations. Is this legal? Anywhere he can be reported? 

Services offered: Mergers and acquisitions, letters on behalf your behalf to employer to eliminate taxation, “infinite money” (apparently in the works, debt/ tax discharge, etc.

https://www.williamsandwilliamslawfirm.com/services

Description of what they do:
“We operate as attorneys-in-fact through the Power of Attorney Act located at the Federal level and in each State. Due to the way that the laws are set up, we cannot file on your behalf and present on your behalf. So the way it works is we help you write everything and we help you present yourself. This is the only way we can pull this off. WE ARE VERY CLEAR AND TRANSPARENT ABOUT OUR INVOLVEMENT IN THE CASE (we will come to teleconferences, etc, as needed. We just can’t file on your behalf and run the whole show for you, legally).”

https://www.williamsandwilliamslawfirm.com/how-litigation-works",AskLawyers
[IN] - EX husband doesn't want to pay for anymore of minor child's medical expenses,"My 16 year old son had shoulder surgery last year and has had a lot of pain and issues since including basically the lose of use of his dominant hand.  Figuring out what is wrong has spilled into this year.   I was asked about what our divorce decree says and it has me listed as the custodial parent but we have joint legal custody.   There is nothing stating who makes the medical decisions explicitly just the percentage we each pay of the bills.  Per our divorce and child support agreement I pay the first $1,385 of the kids medical bills and they are split 43.23%/56.77% after that.  (don't ask why weird percentage, its what the child support calculations deemed).  I have a spreadsheet of all expenses and I track it all very well.  My Ex hasn't taken him to any appt this year but I have kept him informed of when they are and what new MRI/EMG or whatever was being done.  A few weeks ago I started needing payments from him.  I asked for the first lump sum and told him then there was one more big bill and then a few smaller ones before we hit our deductible and they would all be smaller.  Today I asked him for the $366.19 owed towards this bill.  I am a reasonable person and offered to provide him the online payment option to pay his part with a credit card if wanted.  

We have run tests to see if it was the suprascapular nerve or a pinched nerve in the neck.  It was neither of those.  The tests that have been done were not unreasonable as the doctors try to figure out what is wrong.  It is just unfortunate that it wasnt a simple answer.  We have been referred to a pain management and neurology for nerve issues.  There is still no guarantee this will work but I'm not going to allow my son to keep being in so much pain and everything.  

Here's where I am asking for legal advice....  His response to the bill was ""Holy Crap! I'm officially requesting that no more money be spent on the shoulder.  Everything keeps coming back inconclusive.""  Given his ""request"" can I still bill him for these future doctors visits?  I don't want to take him to court but I don't want him to bully me into paying for all this in full because legally he is responsible too. We live in Indiana if that makes a difference. ",AskLawyers
[TX] Swindled out of significant money,"For the last couple months, I've been helping a homeless veteran get back on his feet. Paid for a few nights at a motel until his VA benefits kicked in. Bought him groceries. Heard about his life. Saw paperwork. It all checked out.

When his VA benefits kicked in, he got an apartment near the base in another city. We kept in touch, and he ask for help with other expenses, and he assured me he would pay back all of it.

Long story short, I'm pretty sure he's been making up stories to ask for money ever since he moved to the other city. And I'm pretty sure he has no intention of repaying me.

What legal recourse do I have to get that money back? Does his word that he would pay me back legally bind him such that I could sue him for that money?",AskLawyers
[WI] Wisconsin Watts v. Watts,"Is there anyone that has experience being the plaintiff, defendant or counsel for either party in a Watts v. Watts case. Wondering if they're viable cases, overall. What was your situation and experience with it? Also if you care to share, what county did it take place in? ",AskLawyers
[VA] broken laws ,"I have about eight soft checks against my credit for someone to open a loan or credit card now. None of these have been approved as far as I can tell, but I'm wanting to know is that enough to say the law has been violated. Now this is important to me because the person that has been doing this has a domestic and a PO violation along with GPS tracking hanging over top of their head now based on good behavior. ",AskLawyers
[FL] Is it possible to get child support arrears modified? ,"CAN you get child support arrears modified, the amount reduced when children are grown. I have a friend that still owes 50 thousand and has been paying all along, the children are now in their 30's. ",AskLawyers
[DC] can I sue my college? ,"I attended an HBCU in Washington DC 7 years ago and they have listed one of my classes as in progress. For the past six months, l've been trying to get them to close out this class and just about every way you can think about and they have been unresponsive or unhelpful. I have been lead on goose chase of calls and emails to lead to dead ends. What can I do from here? This is stopping me from transferring to a new university currently in IL.",AskLawyers
[TX] Father wanting primary custody when he’s not been involved ,"I had a paternity hearing this morning. The father has requested primary conservatorship. He has never reached out to visit with our son (10 month old) and he has an attorney while I do not. I’m worried what could happen at my next hearing. His attorney requested an in person hearing because he said it will take an hour on their side so I’m unsure what to expect. I cannot afford an attorney myself and do not know what I need to prepare for. He also said he only makes 300 a month which I find highly untrue. Is there any way that I can request proof that is what he makes? Also what sort of evidence should I prepare to have ready for my hearing?
Thank you for your time",AskLawyers
[MI] former juror at sentencing?,"I was a juror for a murder trial recently and am strongly considering attending the sentencing in a few weeks. I’ve struggled with emotions from this case and think this might bring me some closure.

During the trial, I was seated most closely toward the families, and my appearance is unique so I’m certain to be recognized if I attend sentencing.

So for sentencing, where do I sit??? Obviously not the jury box, but I feel like I have to choose a side.

If any of my fellow jurors attend (I have had no connection/contact with any of them), should I sit with them regardless of which side they’re seated on?

I suppose I chose a side when I rendered my verdict, but… I don’t want my seating or presence to be a source of added pain for either family, who BOTH deserve compassion and support. 

Is there a standard for this?",AskLawyers
[AR] I want to sue my ex wife’s lawyers…,"My ex wife used three attorneys. Two had to withdraw after I proved to the judge they committed ethics violations. The third “authenticated” perjury by my ex wife. (Video evidence which she wouldnt hand over) she also knows my wife lied about key parts of her testimony. Yes I can prove she knows. Please don’t ask how. I just can. 

Anyways, this led to me receiving a protection order that never received final adjudication after 8-9 months. It stated ex parte. Then came the charges for violating said order. Which were dismissed. 

Now I want to sue the lawyers for their part in this. The lies they told the judge and the hiding of material facts. All which contributed to my ex wife engaging in malicious prosecution. 

However, nobody will take my case. Will lawyers not sue other attorneys? They arrested me, tried to lock me away for months. I spent 11 days in jail before I got a miracle release. I won’t Justice. Why won’t anyone help me sue these attorneys? One of them has significant assets and there’s no doubt they both violated several rules and laws. ",AskLawyers
[AL] Being molested by a school employee and wanting to sue the public school system ,"In 2014-2015 I was molested by a school employee. Went to trial about the molestation, won the case but he also  went to prison for CP charges. i was groomed on school property, he showed me nudes on school property, took me off of school property and brought me alcohol onto school property (i was a minor). the molestation happened off of school property. i have sever PTSD, lost all trust of everyone around me, moved out of the city it happened in, have anxiety about him getting out of prison and finding me or my daughter and retaliating. I have lost enjoyment of life and change my appearance exponentially. just to not be looked at the same way. i have lost all confidence and don’t trust older men. nightmares and insomnia. 
my question is what is the statute of limitations and would it be worth sueing. If it is worth sueing, what are my next steps. ",AskLawyers
[CA] illegal medical reimbursements to company? ,"To make a long story as short as I can, my wife works for a company, where for 4 years they were not properly deducting medical costs for health insurance out of the employees checks and the company was still fronting the costs. Only after four years did anyone realize it and the owner has, sought reparations! He is telling employees ""sorry you got this freebie for four years but I need my money back"" and he's saying things like ""you signed a contract when you signed up for medical that you'd pay the cost"" well here it is four years later and he's coming to collect. One poor woman owes $15,000! My wife owes $1,000.00 not a big deal but at the same time, it's the principal of the matter. He let go of two years but he's still coming for 2023 and 3 months of 2024.

Legal or illegal? ",AskLawyers
[WA] How do I contest a chicken sh** speed trap ticket? ,"Recently, a camera was placed by a school to issue speeding tickets without needing a police officer. The school is in the middle of and bottom of a long steep street that on either end is 35 mph, but becomes 20 mph where the school is. I got a $150 ticket (by mail) for going 28 mph in a 20 mph zone. It’s literally impossible, going down a steep decline, to reduce your speed in time unless you know in advance where the school is and slow down to a slow 20 mph crawl in time. This was the middle of the day btw. with no kids around. I don’t even know if school was in session. The ticket has a photo of my car with a remote officer claiming I was driving 28 mph and Im officially contesting it. Any advice on what to do? ",AskLawyers
[CA] Can defense in a criminal case introduce police interrogation recordings/transcripts or is it hearsay?,"Can defense introduce police interrogation video or is it hearsay?

In a YouTube video, a Canadian Lawyer ['Runkle of the Bailey'] explained that in Canadian law the prosecution *can* introduce interrogation tapes because they meet the criteria for an exception to the hearsay rule (iirc they are statements by a party against their own interest) but defence *can't* introduce the tapes because they are hearsay. He was emphasizing how speaking in interviews can  only harm, not help.

Is US law simpler? 

If so, can the defense play any recordings already introduced by the prosecution? 

Can the prosecution pick just portions to introduce, or must they introduce the whole interview/tape/transcript even if they only play a small portion in court? If the latter, are there effective limits on cherry picking to the point it changes meaning?

Is defense limited to playing only the specific portions the prosecution has already introduced?

Hearsay rules seem simple but I find it gets a bit confusing at times.",AskLawyers
[PA] Can my landlord hold me to a verbal agreement? ,"Hi all, 

Not sure if this is a dumb question but in October 2022 I signed a one year lease for my current apartment. I communicated roughly 6 months later to my landlord that I wanted to resign when the time came, but I was never asked to resign a year later. I now want to move out sooner than expected. 

Can I be held to telling my landlord via text that I wanted to resign even if I never signed an updated contract? 

Thank you for your time. ",AskLawyers
"[GA] when I see people discussing law schools online, I see them using “$$$” or “$$”, in reference to their school. What does this mean 😅","[GA] when I see people discussing law schools online, I see them using “$$$” or “$$”, in reference to their school. What does this mean 😅",AskLawyers
[MD] Classes to take to know if I should be a lawyer?,"Can anyone recommend resources to read or watch online to see if law school/being a lawyer would be a good career move? Maybe take a practice LSAT?

I like to read and do research , and often entertain seeing situation from an opposite point of view than my own to gain a new perspective.

I know that law school is costly and a time commitment, so I thought it might be a good idea to take some online classes first.

Others have suggested to work as a legal assistant or get a paralegal certificate to work as a paralegal first.",AskLawyers
[TX] I'm from Texas and my ex wife is currently living in China,"How do I send divorce papers to ex wife in another country?

So I'm in Texas. My ex wife is Chinese and has been living back in China sense last year now. We separated last year. We agreed to divorce. I don't have a lawyer. We have no assets. No kids. We are both 26. She agreed to sign the papers. I have the divorce papers to submit to the court and I just need to sign my part and she needs to sign hers. I have paper copies. How do I get this to her? ",AskLawyers
[SC] Getting back at texting advertisers ,"My information was sold to a bunch of car dealers apparently who have been texting and calling me to come buy a new car. I replied to their initial texts something along the lines of ""By continuing this conversation, you agree to pay $4.99 per additional message to the account holder associated with this number."" Some of them have continued to message me after acknowledging that message. If I know which dealers they are from, am I able to send them a bill? I did this mostly because I was bored and am annoyed about getting unsolicited advertising text messages but am always looking for a way to ""stick it to the man"".",AskLawyers
[IL] Would a lawyer accompany me to State police HQ even though I do not have a case? ,House was raided a few years ago and they confiscated my firearms. No charges. The person who was the reason my place was raided also acquitted on all charges. From my understanding I just have to call to pick my firearms up. I just don’t want to do it alone and am afraid of harassment and rights not being taken serious(that’s what happened when raided). Would a lawyer accompany me to make sure everything goes smoothly? I’m in Will County ,AskLawyers
[TX] Question about mechanic lien,"When a mechanic puts a lien on your car because of unpaid repair costs, my understanding is that the lien does not add any expense. If you owe $100 and they put a lien on your car, then a week later you still owe just $100 to get the lien off. Is that right? Or are there additional fees? Or simply fees for late payment unrelated to the lien?",AskLawyers
[GA] car note/ repossession ,"A one point I was dating a person A. We decided to get a car together and put both our names on the title. We'll after a while we broke up, I kept the car. He moved to Michigan. 

Then I got into an accident and totaled my car. We had purchased the GAP coverage, but for it to go into affect we both had to sign a power of attorney. I signed mine and sent it in. From what my insurance agent said she had gotten in contact with him, got his address, sent him the POA, then never heard from him again. He also blocked me on social. 
Well the car ended up getting repossessed.

Just got out of court, the company who we financed the car from is suing us both for the money. He never showed, never filed a response, nothing. They said he is being given a ""default judgment"" (whatever that means) but also ruled that I have to pay the remaining 3grand myself. 

They told me i could try to speak to a lawyer in that state to get the money from him, but I was just wondering if I could have some advice on what type of lawyer to try to get in contact with, if it would be worth my time, and if I would even have a case.

Because personally, I don't understand how the only party involved that's trying to resolve this has to pay for everything while the other party gets away with causing this issue and gets to not have any repercussions. ",AskLawyers
[NC] help with spousal support ,What do I need to do to prepare for spousal support court? ,AskLawyers
"[CA] If a police officer sees a milk crate in my home, does that give them the right to break in?","[CA] If a police officer sees a milk crate in my home, does that give them the right to break in?",AskLawyers
[MI] How can I exercise my disaffirmation rights on a Creative Commons license from when I was a minor?,"Forgive me, I am new to law and in dire need of assistance. This is also a throwaway to protect my identity.

When I was 16, I contributed art and animations to an online video game mod project as a volunteer. I am nearing 24 now. I have recently reached out to the head of said project, requesting alteration or removal of said art from the project, and offering to do all of the work needed to replace it with a new set of images and text. Unfortunately, the project head refuses to honor my request, citing Creative Commons SA 4.0 as their reason, ie:

&gt;By adding it to the mod, you consented to the license and all it entails. As per the CC-BY-SA license there are no limitations on how things are used, nor are we obligated to remove it under the CC4.0 agreement.

As far as I know, the project head is also located in the USA. Where, I am not sure at the moment.

I have been doing research into Creative Commons with some companions, and we have found a section on the FAQ website mentioning the ability for minors to disaffirm CC licenses once they reach age of majority. 

&gt;**Can children apply Creative Commons licenses to work they create?**  
&gt;  
&gt;*This issue depends largely on the laws in place where the child lives. In the United States, children can be copyright holders and are entitled to license their works in the same manner as adults. However, they may have the right to disaffirm certain types of legal agreements, including licenses.* ***In many parts of the United States, for example, children have the ability to disaffirm some types of agreements under certain circumstances once they reach the age where they are considered adults within the relevant jurisdiction****. We are unaware of any attempt by a licensor to exercise the disaffirmation right with respect to a CC license applied to a work.* 

[\[src\]](https://creativecommons.org/faq/)

Unfortunately, search engines are not very helpful in finding more information on such a situation, and with the lack of knowledge on attempts to exercise disaffirmation rights with CC, I have a few questions:

1. Is this project head able to hold my copyrighted creations under Creative Commons, ie hold it under license for me without owning my work?
2. If no legally binding contract was signed, does the Creative Commons license hold any ground here at all?
3. Does the Creative Commons license cover a project where the owner does not hold copyright to all of the material within the project?
4. Under what ""certain circumstances"" is a minor-turned-major able to express their disaffirmation rights, especially with Creative Commons?
5. Where would I be able to seek Creative Commons lawyers in a situation where I am able to issue a DMCA or pursue further legal action?

The last question is in regards to the fact that I am unable to locate lawyers for such a situation, [especially considering the Creative Commons wiki has only dead links for their US references.](https://wiki.creativecommons.org/wiki/CC_Friendly_Lawyers)

Any help at all would be really, really appreciated.",AskLawyers
[TX] Can you be sent to State Prison for Federal Crimes,"If one commits a federal crime will they always be sent to a federal facility? If not, when could you be sent to a state prison instead? Is that something the convict would have to move for during sentencing and hope for a kind judge or could the government unilaterally decide to sentence you to a state prison instead if they know you exclusively committed fed crimes this time because you prefer the food and company there to the state alternative?",AskLawyers
[GA] received a letter from the Solicitor’s office today,"My step-daughter was involved in an accident on 12/1/23. It’s been a complete nightmare and things are still not settled. The police cited the lady who hit my daughter, but her insurance company is claiming only 75% liability for their customer and 25% liability for my daughter. I don’t understand how they have come up with these figures since she was given a ticket. 

Anyway, today my daughter received a notice from the Solicitor’s office asking what losses my daughter has suffered as a result of the accident because they are reviewing the case for prosecution. I’ve never heard of this before and am just curious why they would possibly be considering prosecuting the other lady. Does anyone have any experience with a situation like this?

Thank you in advance for any insight you can give me. ",AskLawyers
"[NH] Asked boss for info on FMLA, now I’m watching my shifts disappear ","So unfortunately my mother is dying. She’s “stable” for now but things are progressing ever so slightly. I asked my boss for info on FMLA and she was like a deer in headlights. She told me I need to contact HR, which I did later that day. Since then, I’ve watched my 20 hour workweek dwindle into 2 shifts a week from 2pm-6pm. I’ve not even filed yet because I don’t need to just yet, but wanted info on what’s involved and what I need to do for it. I feel like my boss is retaliating? ",AskLawyers
[AL] Liability For Leaving Behind Things After Home Sell?,"I’m worried about personal injury liability specifically……

We’re about to sell our home and move out of town and we’re downsizing extremely. There is some shop equipment in the shop, a large powerful professional grade lawnmower, a big screen TV on the wall, and a bench with shelving in the basement I built. I just don’t have time before the move to sell it or otherwise get rid of it. I am wondering if there is any liability involved if I include it in the sell of the house as far as anyone getting hurt using any of it or something falling on someone etc., there is a couple of dangerous spots in the yard as well. I would list the items as included in the listing or paperwork of the house so they would know it’s staying and there is a separate shop the equipment is in.

Items include:

Tool chest full of hand tools

Power Tools

Welder

Shop Press

Drill Press

Bench Grinder

Lawn mower

Generator

Chainsaw

Miter saw",AskLawyers
[WI] How to remove an unwanted guest?,"We have a homeless woman living with us since the beginning of October.  She is not related to us.  She had been previously evicted (or served an eviction notice) due to not being able to afford her rent. 

While living with us, she found a decent job.  After she found the job, I asked her if she would be willing to pay a small amount (even say $100) in rent to us each month. I pointed out to her that she could use us as a rental reference to help make up for the eviction on her record.  She said “no” and told me that she didn’t need us as a reference because she was not officially “evicted”- she was served notice, but got out before she was removed. 

She is generally very quiet, polite, and cooperative- but we’re tired of having a freeloader and want her to move on. We think it’s odd that she does not want to contribute at least something to us.  

Again, she has never paid us rent nor agreed to anything in writing. 

How do we legally get her to leave? ",AskLawyers
[CA] Can FGM done in childhood be a ground for Asylum in USA? ,"As the title suggests, my girlfriend is in India and belongs to a community that follows FGM in childhood for young girls. Now my girlfriend has never bothered about this but I recently brought her attention to possibility of Asylum for FGM Victims. Can this work? TIA",AskLawyers
[MA] Hearing for homicide trial Tomorrow. What are possible outcomes? (More info in post),"Hello, tomorrow the person who took the lives of 3 people, (one of the victims was a family member of mine) is having a hearing. It's been many years. They were never found competent to stand trial. But I hear they may be ready now. What do you think they would hope the outcome will be?

They were literally caught red handed, and admitted it to police. Is there a chance they could be let back out into society? What could the defense hope for?",AskLawyers
Divorce Consultation Advice [VA],"I am getting a divorce. I've done my homework but have some case specific questions I would like legal advice for. At this point, I want to know what my options are. I want to go in prepared with reasonable expectations. I have the expected questions regarding child support, custody, assets, etc. 

To get my questions answered, is there any paperwork I should bring? 

How much billable time am I looking at for just consultation regarding typical issues?

How many meetings does it normally take to just get information and advice?

What should I look for in a divorce lawyer?",AskLawyers
[PA] Dealer Won’t Give Me Truck or Truck’s Title,"Dealer Won’t Give Me Truck or Trick’s Title

Hey all! Back in December, my dad bought a truck (Freightliner) from a dealer and paid him the agreed upon sale amount of $23,000. We did get a bill of sale saying that the truck was paid in full. Dealer said that he’d send the title for the truck in the mail. My dad was planning on going overseas for two months and didn’t have somewhere to store the truck. The dealer offered to store the truck in the back of the lot and my dad agreed. My dad understands that he takes full responsibility of the truck and whatever damage may have happened to it while stored. 

Weeks go by and no title shows up in the mail. I try calling the dealer since my dad can’t call himself and he doesn’t answer. After my dad gets back, he finally is able to get a hold of the dealer and the guy tells my dad that there was some problem with the engine starter and that his truck was with the mechanic. Mind you, nobody told the dealer to take the truck to the shop for us and we were NOT notified of the problem until WE tried numerous times to contact the dealer. The dealer tells my dad that the truck will be ready in a week.

On that Monday that the truck was supposed to be ready the dealer claims that the mechanic messed up the repair and the engine is totaled. My dad goes to the dealer and asks him to show him the truck and he refuses to do so. 

He also comes up with excuses for why the title didn’t come to the house saying he had to get it from New York and mailed it to his house in New Jersey instead of it coming directly to us in Pennsylvania. This all happened about 3 weeks ago now. 

At this point my dad just wants to guy to refund him the sale amount and we can move on from this.  Every time my dad tries to contact the guy he has some new excuse for why he can’t talk and keeps on trying the placate my dad by saying “I’m gonna find you a new truck” and “My son will talk to you about paying you back” but nothing has come of it. What are the possible legal steps that we can take. We’ve tried to file a police report however his dealership is always closed when we go over and there’s no way to know when the guy is in to be able to file a report. Any help would be greatly appreciated!

(Edited for clarity purposes)",AskLawyers
[IL] POA concerns regarding my terminally ill mother,"For the last 3 years my sister has taken a more active rolle with myself in helping our mother as has developed a lung disease that will only progress and get worse with time. That said, ive been in school for the past year and she has been taking my mother to and fro a vast majority of her doctors appointments. Prior to this, I had been solely advocating for our mother for about 15 years. Recently, our mother transitioned into a nursing home, where I discovered that my sister had become her medical Power of Attorney (POA), a role previously held by myself.

Currently, my sister and I have no communication, and it seems unlikely that this will change in the future. As the designated POA (which my mother was unware of) my sister has instructed the nursing home to provide updates on our mother's health exclusively to her. Despite this, I'm concerned that in the event of a serious situation, I might be left uninformed. This worry stems from the fact that both my mother and I were unaware of her placement in a nursing home initially. Additionally, the social worker at the facility refuses to engage in conversation with me, citing my lack of POA status as the reason.

Given these familial issues, and my understanding that there cannot be two POAs, I'm wondering if there's any way I can ensure that I am kept informed about my mother's well-being.",AskLawyers
[NJ]child support and waiting for ssdi approval ,"My husband was laid last year as a part of RIF.
Nevertheless he has been child support diligently until now about 1000$ a month. 
He also has been on short term disability for the last 7 months and applied for SSDI. 
SSDI approval could take a year, two or more. My question is can he reduce his child support while waiting for SSDI approval?
It's a touch situation to pay 1k monthly while not being able to work for years. I have another child with my husband, for the context.",AskLawyers
[NC] Malicious employer?,"Leaving the details spotty so y'all can ask questions bc I worked this job for 5 years and I don't really know what I'm going for right now. 

Former job has three major periods of the year. I was fired after one period after an investigation on me by the owner. I ran one of the owners stores and was the most experienced. I found out he's holding a competition for 200$ for his employees - whoever makes the best and most fake reviews, wins the money. I feel like that's highly illegal.

I want to go after my former boss for his malicious actions. He is a franchise owner. I don't know if I should go to his corporate owners, the BBB, or what. I also don't know what proofs I would need.

This isn't really a 'pissed off former employee attacks former employer' type thing, moreso a 'former employee was wronged and the current employees are getting into possibly illegal matters under/for the owner and I believe everyone should be treated morally right without having to do possibly morally questioning actions'",AskLawyers
[MA] Requirements to Run for Governor,"Hi! I’ve been looking through the laws on who can become governor of Massachusetts and I am confused about the residency requirement: Is it seven years in your life, or seven consecutive years prior to the election? Furthermore, how is it determined if you are a resident of the state?",AskLawyers
 for asking SGD to help with chores!,"AITA for asking my step granddaughter to give a hand to do housework while her mother is at work. I am also giving a hand to do chores. This occurs when we are staying with them visiting. The granddaughter complains to him mother that I am picking on her she is doing nothing but sitting watching TV. Recently we went to visit in the is GD is now 24 it and there was a family dinner where everyone bought a place they were approximately 20 people there. After everyone left her mother and I were cleaning up into her boyfriend got up to give a hand and she remained sitting I said to him I see she is still lazy. Later her father came out extremely angry because I had said she was lazy and that I was not entitled to do that inhere home and that I always picked on her. That I had disrespected her. In my eyes she is a lazy little madam, her brother and sister give a hand but never her and the parents make excuses for her. I feel that she should be made to help her mother. I ended up cleaning all the dishes and everything on my own. I feel that she disrespects me by not offering to give a hand when she supposedly organised the family gathering. AITA",AmItheAsshole
 for going for drinks with a colleague?,"I've worked in my current job for over 2 years now and throughout that time I have had 10 exams I have had to complete. I started at the same time as two other people, lets call them Nicole and Liam. The three of us get on really well and have helped each other out and supported each other throughout exams.

As the job is primarily work from home, we haven't met up in person as much as we would like. Liam lives in a different town to me and Nicole and our office is in a town none of us live in.

We recently found out we had passed our final exam so Nicole suggested we all go out for drinks to celebrate. I agreed and said it would be good for us to meet up. Liam apologised but said it wouldn't be easy for him to get to us but for us to still meet up anyway and he'll see us in the office another time.

Since it was just going to be me and Nicole we suggested inviting our partners along. Nicole's boyfriend messaged me to thank me for the invite but said he was away with work so would not be able to make it but that he hopes we have a good night. I invited my girlfriend and she just refused. She didn't have a reason, she just said she didn't want to. I said fair enough but mentioned I was still planning on going out to celebrate.

My girlfriend said I should not be going out with just Nicole but I pointed out the only reason it is just me and Nicole is because she is refusing to come. My gf said it's disrespectful but I just repeated that I'm still going and that I deserve to go and celebrate my achievements.

She just repeated that I was being disrespectful and unreasonable and that I should be cancelling.

AITA for going for drinks with a colleague?",AmItheAsshole
 - I'm going to Chicago... He's not,"
Ok, so I'll make this short and sweet...

I was offered an opportunity to go to Chicago for a work event. I'd never been to Chicago, so thought I would spend a few days there.

That night, I asked the husband at dinner out if he wanted to come with me (after the work summit was done). He shook his head and said ""It's not my thing"". ""Ok"", I said.

So I proceeded to plan my trip. I was telling him about all the stuff I was planning - museum visits during the day, the CAC boat and a visit to a jazz club (he's not a jazz fan) as well as a couple of restaurants I'd like to try.

Then I went looking for places around the city to rent. I found an AirBnB and glad I found what I did and where I did for the price as close to the city as I did. Only hours after he noticed me looking for the perfect place as he thought he could find a cheaper place for me to stay. I did find something worthwhile and proceeded to book.

The AirBnb came with a contract that needed to be signed in order to book the place. I booked it for one person and thought that was it.

Well, here we are today and talking about a potential visitor coming (a very good friend of his). I suggested a possibility that she could visit (she needs to get away) while I'm in Chicago.

He got bullshit at me asking why I booked it. I told him I thought we had this settled the first night at the restaurant. He said ""I didn't say 'No'"".

Well, not specifically but you did shake your head and say ""It's not my thing"".

And where was he when I was telling him specifically (more than once) of things I""m doing....going to museums and jazz clubs - two things he specifically did not have an interest in.

AITA here?

",AmItheAsshole
 for Changing my mind about a Roommate after she Filled out the Paperwork?,"Okay so i(18F) committed to college 2 months ago. It’s my dream school and I’m so happy about it.

A little over a month ago a girl dm’d me after seeing my picture on the decisions page asking to room together. Our college has a thing where you like fill out a bunch of info about yourself and they match you so that was my plan but I was cool with finding someone this way too.

She seemed a little odd just from insta but nice when I was texting her so I didn’t think much of it. She filled out the paperwork saying we were going to room together like 2 weeks ago, I still haven’t done it but we won’t room together if I don’t do it as well.

But we were talking about what we were getting for the room and she asked if I would split the cost of a Kuerig. I just responded I wouldn’t use it because I hate hot coffee so I assumed that pretty clearly meant no. We were also going to split the cost of a fan for the room. I also said that we should wait to buy anything until like august but then 2 days ago she Venmo requested me for $30 more than half of the fan. 

I asked what fan she got that cost that much and she replied “oh I got the fan and the Kuerig.” I was still trying to be nice and said “I’m not paying for half the Kuerig bc I don’t plan on using it.” And she kept telling me stuff like you never know, you probably will need it for like studying and stuff.

I kept trying to just like joke around about it and was like “no I survive on energy drinks I’ll be okay” but she was adamant that I had to split it with her. I said it was a lot of money for something I would never use and she said, “oh I didn’t buy them yet so I could try to find something cheaper.”

I assumed them was referring to the Kuerig and the fan. She still wouldn’t let up so I ghosted her for a few hours while I was with friends and then texted her later Friday night to say “I don’t think we will work as roommates if we bicker this much about something so small. Im still so excited to get to know you when we get there. Have a good one!”

She has been spamming me ever since saying the paperwork is irreversible(which is def not true) and that I need to at least pay her half for the fan. I responded, replying to the message where she said she didn’t buy “them” and she claimed that wasn’t true and she already bought the fan. I don’t believe her because that doesn’t make much sense.

I’ve been ghosting her and started talking to a different girl who dm’d me from the insta post. I feel kinda bad bc she did already fill out the stuff and I am not gonna pay her half of a fan that I won’t use and told her not to buy. Ig I like feel guilty but I kee rationalizing it to myself and everyone irl keeps telling me I did the right thing I guess I just need confirmation from a totally outside source.",AmItheAsshole
" For being mad, because I feel like I'm disrespected all the time? 26 M","Am I the asshole for consistently being ridiculed and bullied by co-workers, friends, and family, and then speaking up about it that I'm sick of it and want it to stop? 

Some context I am a (26)Male. I work really hard to make ends meet and take care of myself and family. I live with family and pay a good portion of rent. I also tend to alot of different family members needs on a pretty consistent basis, leaving me with not alot of time to myself. I do like to joke around from time to time with all of the people in my life, but nearly most of them seem to take things too far. I get called little annoying nicknames like gayboy, smelly, and alot more honestly. Some things my family does too is consistently cut me off when I'm talking about something important, and then get mad when I tell then to stop and that it's rude. 

An Example: Me and my mom are at the dinner table talking about musical artist and how we feel about some of them. I'm a bit of an audiophile and like a good chat about the music industry. She says what she wants to say, then I start talking. As I do she gets on her phone then ignores me as I'm talking. Watching a tiktok video out loud. I recognize this and stop mid sentence, kind of disappointed. She then says something about how I look like the guy in the video. I then ask her if she was even listening to me. She then gets mad and says that I'm being rude for pointing out her own rudeness. I then get yelled at and berated because I just wanted to talk and enjoy a conversation with my mom. 

Another problem I have alot is when people touch me. I do NOT like being touched. It is something I've made a point to many people. Yet many of them still touch me. For instance family members will touch me even with out asking me, and it will scare the shit out of me. I will tell them to stop and that if they want a hug, hand shake or anything to tell me before they freaking just touch me. And they'll argue, ""your my son! What I can't hug you? That's shitty of you."" Or ""bro rude, we're family, I'm not gonna hurt you!"" Or even ""wow, you must think your so special then!"" 
All it is, is a preference, and something that startles me. I don't have alot of trust in alot of people and I've been hurt by people I even thought I loved. I just want boundaries.

 All I ask is that I don't get touched, jump scared, and consistently berated for no good reason. Does that make me the asshole for asking for that? I just want to feel respected, and loved, and I am trying my best to be a good, patient person. ",AmItheAsshole
" for leaving my ""best friend"" due to her insecurities?","(P.S: These are fake names)

Backstory: I met Mia in a couple of my classes during August and quickly became best friends. She was THE best friend but she also came with Lia. Lia was a gorgeous person who thought she was too ugly to be loved. But, I think her personal problems made her insecure. Also, Mia and Lia are the best friends who can't be separated cause of their 7 yr old friendship but they were acquaintances for most of it. (Became best friends this year AFTER I joined).

I started talking to both of them but I clicked more with Mia than Lia even though Lia and I have the exact same interests. I admit that I envied her at first but it's all love now. But, she didn't see that, instead I was the maniac that wanted to ruin everything. Her crush, friends, and prettiness. I would NEVER do that.

August - December was the best time but I did notice some toxic traits. I'm not complaining but Mia was always giving therapy to their older cousin (by 9 yrs!) through her phone. I could never have a convo w/ Mia without her phone. Lia always made sure to remind me that they both have been ""best"" friends for longer. I didn't notice it then tho, but now I do. Also, Lia also asked me for validation all the time through texts.

But, in December, I hit a really low mental state yet as usual Lia asked me for advice and care. It was draining. Once, she spammed me abt never finding love and stuff while I was having a panic attack. I shakily texted back saying ""hey I think I'm having a panic attack rn, ttyl?"". She texted ""lol, anyways..."". And then she continued. Turns out, she was also texting the exact same thing to Mia an hour ago and she was just copy pasting to WASTE MY TIME!!! (Mia showed me her texts).

So, during winter break, I did a digital detox (from them mainly). Never responded, and just took pictures on my trip tbh. BEST TIME EVER! They did question it tho but I said I was inactive everywhere  and told them before too.

Then, in January, everything went downhill. Lia called my mom a B\*\*\*\* out of nowhere. I tried resolving the issue but she kept it going. Insulting everything I'm insecure abt, always mentioning that I'm ""stealing"" Mia, never including me in plans, always interrupting me, and the list goes on. I texted her abt how she has been treating me (w/ proof). She responded with ""I'm sorry but I'm trying to get my crush back into my life..."" (exact words) and she said she would change but ofc she didn't.

Then it's v-day! Mia gets gifts for everyone except me. I was ok with this and gave my gifts to people who gave ME one. So she deleted our group insta, blocked me, and deleted our gc. I didn't notice till March when I asked her for a ""friendship break"".

Now, she is going around to people stating that I flirted w/ her crush. I didn't mind tho. Mia did follow Lia ""for their friendship"". People did come up to me w/ many stories from her. Idk anymore... AITA? Shd I still keep a friendship w/ them? I want the honeymoon phase back :(  
(read comments from me for a little clarity if needed)",AmItheAsshole
 for “not taking care of her insecurities”?,"I've been in a relationship with my partner for almost 8 months now. She (24F) and I (30M).
Since we started dating, I've noticed that she has a big insecurity problem. At the beginning of the relationship, without me having done anything to provoke it, she would interrogate me about my past. We could be doing anything, and out of nowhere, she'd ask me questions (which frankly felt like interrogations) about people I followed or who followed me on social media and/or things in my past. 
With the intention of calming her anxieties and being transparent, I would try to explain in detail, but she would refuse to listen, claiming that ""the more she knew, the worse things she would think."" I told her it didn't have to be like that because I respected her, and what I was telling her was true.

Recently, I had to delete my Instagram because the interrogations about my past were becoming too frequent. I wanted to give her fewer reasons to doubt and to create a secure environment so that she could heal, but the first thing she did was doubt me, telling me she felt like I was hiding something and that it was suspicious that I deleted my Instagram.
After that, the interrogations did decrease, but they didn't disappear. I suggested that it would be best for her to start seeing a psychologist (I already do it for other family issues), and she also took this defensively, arguing that she has ""other forms of therapy"" (reading, writing, etc.) and that I'm nobody to condition her healing process.

Now this is the question of my post:
What happened now is that she's on a trip with her family, and I responded to her message with a casual ""What's up,"" She said she didn't like me responding like that and asked me not to do it anymore because it made her feel insecure (I don't understand why). I told her I would try, but she needed to understand that it's something that could happen again since it's a greeting I do unconsciously. She insisted that I really try, and even though it wasn't something bad, I should understand her feelings and respect them. 
That's when I told her that she really needed to manage her insecurity, and there was nothing wrong with me saying that, that I had the right to do it if I wanted to. After that, she started crying, arguing that I should take care of her feelings without so much questioning, but frankly, I'm tired of giving in to these behaviors. I've changed a lot of what I say and do to the point where I'm starting to feel manipulated and frustrated.
I truly love this person, for many other reasons, and despite my actions, I'm starting to doubt if AITA (Am I the Asshole) for not keep being supportive as I’ve been, by “not taking care of her feelings"" anymore.
Thank you!

— UPDATE 29/04/24
Thank you everyone for your comments, I really appreciate them.
I talked to her, and gave her an ultimatum, after a long talk she accepted that she needed therapy and is willing to try it for the relationship, because I told her that it just wasn’t working out.
I’m naturally a people pleaser, I love to do things for my family and the people I love, and sometimes is a bit hard for myself to set boundaries and make people respect them. 
Thanks!",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband to listen to his kids because I'd be the one facing the repercussions if he doesn't?,"I (36f) have been married to my husband Nick (42m) for almost 6 years now. My husband has two teenagers with his ex-wife Lyndsey (40f) and they have been divorced for 11 years. My stepdaughter is Melody (15f) and my stepson is Jace (13m). My husband and I also have a 14 month old son together.

Nick and Lyndsey have shared custody of my stepkids. And typically they can get along okay...ish. It's not what anyone would call a friendly co-parenting relationship and both can be stubborn with the other at times. I'd hate to see them forced to sit in a room all day to mediate but it's not as bad as some divorced people I have seen in my life. My relationship with Lyndsey is not good anymore. Around a year into my marriage she grew annoyed that she and Nick would be harder to reach than me and I was getting more calls from the kids school when they were sick or whatever. Jace has some health issues so it's a common enough thing for him. It made Lyndsey extremely jealous and on her custody time I would be calling her to try and get the kid who was sick or to make plans with her. But her job made it difficult for her to be reached hence me being the only one available to pick them up. Once we got to the point where she was jealous there was no going back. I had hoped during Covid and the kids not being in school that it would maybe take care of some of the jealousy, but it didn't. And once she turned against me so did the kids. We had a close relationship before and now they don't want that with me. They complain if Nick leaves them with me for a couple of hours or when I pick them up from school. They're not as open and talkative with me. I spoke to them, Nick spoke to them, he spoke to Lyndsey and we even did some family therapy together but the relationship is not what it was and it's not what it was becoming before the issues.

I bring all this up because recently my husband learned that during his parenting time he will be out of town for four days in May and those four days fall on his parenting time with my stepkids. He wants them to stay with me for the four days so he can see them for a few hours on the day he comes back before they go to their moms. The kids do not want to stay at the house with me during that time. They want to be with their mom. They were pissed he wanted them to stay with me. It started a fight between the three of them and the kids told Lyndsey and she wants the kids to be with her, but the parenting agreement doesn't have a clause about this.

I told Nick he should listen to the kids and he told me it won't help anything if they refuse to stay in the house with me while he's not there. I told him he better listen to the kids because I'll be the one facing the repercussions of him not doing so. He told me I should want the kids with me and I told him not when I'll be dealing with their anger and disrespect while he's gone.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" For Showing A Picture Of Me With My Stepsister's ""Deadbeat Dad""?","Throwaway Account because people who know me in real life know my main.

I (30f) have a stepsister ""Betty"" (28f) and we do NOT have a good relationship. I am my parents only child together and my dad had full custody of me growing up. I love my mom and she's a good person and we have a decent relationship, but if she could do it all again my mom would definitely be childfree. 

Betty on the other hand was raised solely by her mom because her ""dad"" isn't really her dad because her mom lied about Betty's paternity. Betty's dad found out when about her mom's infidelity when she was 6, had Betty tested, filed for divorce when Betty turned out to not be his, and ceased all contact with Betty by the time she was 8. Instead of getting Betty into therapy Betty's mom thought getting her a new paternal figure would fix everything and my dad was the type who wanted the title of ""father"" but not have to do any actual childrearing so Betty's mom and my dad thought that this would be a good set up for everyone. 

Except it sucked for me. Betty's mom obviously favored her own child and looking back on it I would say Betty resented me for having a dad who ""wanted them."" I also think that's one of the reasons why she's such a ""Pick Me"" chick. Anything I had Betty just had to take and I was made to ""share."" Except my bedroom, Betty got that entirely and I just had to be the mature one and give it up because I was the oldest and Betty would have a hard time switching to a new school district. I could go on with countless of examples but the biggest one was her hooking up with my then boyfriend ""Mark"" (30m) while I was in college. We met and dated in high school and decided to do the long distance thing. At least I was.   
  
I found out when my dad took me on a one-on-one dinner and explained how Betty and Mark were in love and expecting a baby, and that I had three months to be upset and then never talk about it again. I did not invite any of them to my graduation ceremony. Betty had the baby and moved in with Mark and they have been in a state of ""permanent engagement"" while I continued living my life.  

I moved to another state, got into grad school and at a work event guess who I run into? Betty's ""dad."" I recognized him from Betty's secret stash of pictures that she used to keep and he obviously didn't know me so there was no awkwardness when we engaged in friendly surface level chatter. He's a widowed father of two girls (neither of them are Betty) and he loves them so much. 

This was a two-day conference/convention type of thing and he and I became semi-buddies. On the final day he and I (plus 5 other people) took a group photo together and I was right next to him. I posted the picture and captioned it ""When you meet a new friend who's also a great dad"" on Betty's birthday. We don't follow each other on social media but we do have a few mutuals and it took about 72 hours max before it got back to Betty and she was blowing up my phone, but I was busy so I didn't return any of the calls, texts, or messages. I did post another picture of me that had Betty's dad close by. 

Now I know I'm being petty asf but given the context AITA? 

",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to my dad's house anymore,"My mom died when I was 4 and my dad said he wasn't ready or able to take care of a kid on his own so I live with my aunt and uncle and I see my dad every other Thursday afternoon - Monday before school. I've always known that he wasn't that interested in me but it got worse when he got married and started having kids. His kids are 4, 2, and newborn right now. 

His car and his wife's car only fit 5 people and they have 3 kids so we can't go anywhere when I'm at their house because they don't want to take 2 cars. I also miss a lot of school on his days. He'll pick me up early on Thursdays because that's when he gets off of work and he doesn't want to wait 2 hours or drive home then come back to pick me up. Fridays and Mondays there's a 50/50 chance they'll tell me to stay home because my school is too far (it's 10 minutes from my dad's work but he doesn't want to leave early). If I do go to school on his days I'm always late then I get in trouble for being late and my aunt has to call the school to try to get me out of detention. 

I told my aunt I don't want to go to his house anymore because of the car situation and the school thing. She decided that was fair and told my dad that visits are going to stop until he gets his shit together. Now he's telling my aunts family that she's keeping me away from him and called her some names that I don't think I should repeat here. AITA for not wanting to go there anymore?",AmItheAsshole
 for still meeting up with someone after a family trip?,"My (19F) sister’s birthday is at the end of April, and for months we have been talking about going up to Lake Erie like we often do for her birthday and getting ice cream at this place we love. We were going to do it on her actual birthday, which was a Monday. I thought this was a super fun idea and took that day off of work right away. I have a pretty bad memory so I take care to put events in my calendar so I don’t forget otherwise it’ll disappear from my mind.

I recently broke up with my ex a couple months ago, we’ll call him Brad. We were no contact for a while so we could both try to move on. I’ve really missed having him in my life tho and honestly really wished we could be friends again. Recently he reached out and asked if we could meet up in a public place just to talk amicably and test the waters to see if a friendship would be possible for us. So we made plans for us to meet up the Sunday before my sister’s birthday lake trip. 

A couple of days before I was supposed to meet up with him, my mom told me that the lake trip was on Sunday and it always had been. I told her I didn’t know that the plan had changed and she told me that we had discussed it already. She does this a lot where she says that we’ve talked about something several times but I don’t remember her ever saying that. I have a bad memory, but if she had changed the day and told me I would have put it in my calendar for this exact reason. 

My other sister had a church activity on Sunday at 6:30, so we would have had to be home by 6 pm. So I said it’s fine and asked Brad if we could push back our meetup a few hours. While we were at the lake, however, she told my mom that she didn’t want to go to the church activity and my mom said she didn’t have to. My mom was aware that I was still planning on meeting up with Brad once we were home. I can tell she didn’t want me to tho because she never really liked that I was with him in the first place. I also had a bad feeling before we left for the lake that we definitely wouldn’t be home in time for me to honor my commitment to meeting up with Brad.

It was around 3:45 and we were two hours away from home, so we would need to leave by 4 so I could be there on time. I asked her if we would still be able to be home by 6 since that was the original plan anyway, and she sounded super annoyed and said “I don’t know”. Time kept going by and I knew I was going to be late. I was upset at this point and was not as engaged with my family playing by the water. After we started driving home an hour after we were supposed to, my mom lectured me about how selfish I was to put my ex over my sister and told me that she couldn’t care less about my plans because she thought it was a horrible idea anyway and it wasn’t her fault I didn’t know the day had changed for the trip. I still have a day off work for my sisters actual birthday. Should I have canceled my plans with Brad for my sister or am I valid in still wanting to follow through with it?",AmItheAsshole
 if i snitched?,"During my recent visit to my school counsellor, I expressed my concerns about a teachers behavior in my junior high social class. I explained how this teacher constantly uses his phone during lessons, relying on pre-made notes, textbook pages, or educational platforms like blooket. Instead of dealing engaging instruction. His habits has been affecting my learning experience significantly. Dispite bringing this issue to the counsilers attention, she advised me to take it up with my schools admin, stating that she couldn't intervene directly.

SOme of my peers discouraged me from escalating this matter, as they seemed comfortable with the lack of academic challenge. How ever, the impact on my grades has become undeniable, as evence by my current 61% compared to the 94% i previously. Additionally, I've noticed that he shows more favoritism towards my lebanese classmates, which adds another layer of complexity to the situation. felling troubles my these circumstances, I'm now seeking further advise from reddit

so WIBTA if i snitched?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to tell my friend my honest opinion about her situation?,"My friend Kara (F32) has been making questionable decisions for the last year. She ended a long-term relationship and then met someone new called Selim (M23) within a few months. It was casual with her calling him her friend with benefits. After such an intense LTR, she wasn't ready for anything serious, but she also knew about his immigration status and limited language skills. When they first met, he had a visitor's visa that was going to expire in a few months. Since the start, he had been asking her to marry him, which was a red flag for me. I don't know what his plan was when he first arrived here, but ultimately, he decided to overstay his visa (he's from a developing country). Within several weeks, he revealed he voluntarily turned himself in at the Home Office and submitted an application for refugee status, which he's now waiting to hear back about.

In the meantime, she discovered she's pregnant and after seeing medical professionals (OBGYN and counsellors), she ultimately decided to keep the baby. She then told him, and he and his family have been supportive; however, her family hasn't been. Her mum was a single parent and has suffered from mental health issues for years. She's tried to be supportive, but she goes between knitting outfits for the baby and advising Kara to get an abortion. She also tells her that her friends are saying she should leave Selim and get an abortion immediately. When Kara told her sister the news about her pregnancy, she cursed her out and said she's an idiot. Kara recently told me she married Selim in a religious ceremony (but not a legal one) because it was important to him since they're now having a baby together. Even worse, Kara was made redundant at work and is now trying to find a temporary role until the baby comes. Kara never asked for my advice; she only shared with me her pregnancy news, how her family has reacted and what's been going on with her and Selim. I've tried to be supportive and haven't said anything negative, but I'm wondering if as a friend, I should be honest. I've told her I've been worried about her and the decisions she's been making, but that's been all the criticism I've given her because she's gotten a lot of harsh advice from her family already and none of this has changed her mind.

AITA if I tell her what I really think, which is that she's making a huge mistake to have a baby with an illegal immigrant who doesn't speak her language fluently and has been working illegally, even as he's waiting to see if he can obtain refugee status? I'm not even sure how she plans to support her child if she's unemployed herself. I know it's not my place to dictate if she has the baby, gives the baby up for adoption or has an abortion, but I feel like her life is chaos right now and she's running around putting out fires instead of thinking about her life in the long run. Or is it better to just keep my mouth shut?",AmItheAsshole
 or am I really selfish?,"This is my first time on here and I just need to know if I’m wrong. Ok first I have been with my partner for 5 years and married 2. We keep our finances separate. 
Well I just came into some money and I gave my partner some cash as a gift. Well at the same time rent is due soon so I reminded my partner about that. My partner got upset and said I was selfish because the money I gave just came back to me. 
My partner said they told others and they said the same thing I’m selfish. Now my part of the rent is coming out my paycheck not the money I got. I’ve also got things for my partner with the money. Anytime I go somewhere I always ask if they want something or I just get what they like. 
Now a little back story my partner has said I never give cash fyi I don’t carry cash. I went to the atm just to pull money out for them. In my mind I was doing a good thing getting the cash for them I wasn’t thinking just tell them I’ll cover this months rent.
 Like I said before whenever they ask for money I will cash app them. Now I’m feeling hurt and confused am I really selfish. I don’t know what to think. Should I just of said I’ll cover the rent. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for calling a girl “fat pig” ,"Background: I am a guy. There’s 4 people of interest here: Girl 1, Girl 2,  Boy, and me . Girl 1 and Girl 2 used to be friends but recently had a falling out and they’re still arguing, for reasons that I won’t get into because they’re not relevant. I’m not a part of this argument, but I am friends with Girl 1, and close friends with Boy. I’ve heard of Girl 2 but never really knew her that well. 

I will say this: Girl 1 is a bit crazy and is known to be a loudmouth. Everyone she knows, knows everything she’s ever done. That’s why I’ve even heard of Girl 2, every time I talk to G1 it’s like I get a life story. Anyways, I was talking to Boy, and he told me  that G2 was saying that I was “weird and ugly.” Which is odd because I’ve never even spoken to her before. I asked where he heard this from, and he said G1 had told him. I asked G1 and she confirmed it. Now, I was very upset, because G1 had no reason to even bring me up to G2, but I’m also upset at G2 for saying that about me. I found G2 on instagram, and texted her “Keep my name out of your mouth piggy.” Now she’s telling people that I’m “bullying her” for being fat, and that somehow I was in a secret relationship with G1. I told G1 that I would never be in a relationship with her, and for some reason this really upset her and she hasn’t spoken to me since. So am I in the wrong for calling someone fat because she called me ugly and weird?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting anyone look through my phone?,"I have been with my partner for 3 years. Near the beginning of our relationship she was talking about her friend who regularly looks through her boyfriends phone and we both agreed it was an unhealthy thing to do and something neither of us would do.  
  
Last weekend my girlfriend said she thinks I've been acting differently and that she wants to look through my phone. I refused and mentioned our previous conversation to her.  
  
I tried to get her to talk about how she thinks I've been acting different but she refused. She said she only wants to look through my phone once but I refused again.  
  
The thing is, one of my best friends has been going through some things and he has asked me not to tell anyone. I don't want to betray his trust by letting my gf see the messages and also I just see it as an unhealthy thing to do. There's also messages to family and friends etc that I don't think should be read by anyone else.  
  
I told my gf again that I'm not letting her look through my phone but we can talk about why she wants to but she refused and accused me of hiding things from her and said it shouldn't be a problem for her to look through my phone just this once.  
  
AITAH for not letting my girlfriend go through my phone?",AmItheAsshole
 if I travelled alone or with my best friend instead of my girlfriend?,"Me (36M) and my partner (30F) have been together for 2.5 years. We both love to travel. When we first met I had been to quite a few places around the world, owing to the fact that I have been in my job for around 17 years, and travel has been my primary reward for working FT over most of this time.

My girlfriend had only been overseas twice, as she only had her first FT job about a year into our relationship. Knowing that we both wanted to travel more became a motivation and last year we both went to NZ for around two weeks, which was fantastic. 

When we started the relationship I had initially planned a 3 month trip with my best friend of 16 years (38M), who is also my housemate. This was planned in early 2020, long before I was in a relationship. Girlfriend didn't like that idea at all, so it was eventually scraped. 

Lately (past six months or so) the urge for travel has become stronger and stronger, mixed with some homesickness - I live on the other side of the world and haven't been ""home"" in almost seven years now. Unfortunately my girlfriend was made redundant around 2 months ago which meant she has no holidays at all. By comparison, I have around 11 weeks as Covid stopped my usual routine of saving up holidays and then going for longer trips as I figure to maximize my time off. 

Recently I've made the comment that I would be okay going either with the friend - he's in a similar situation with his holiday balance and he also needs a break as he works FT - or solo. I put forward a compromise where I would limit it to 3-4 weeks as I don't want to have the time paid out and staycations seem like a waste (to both of us, girlfriend) agrees, and also planning bigger longer trips with her once her holiday balance is up again. She doesn't want me going without her at all. She says she would be jealous of me and there would be some resentment over me going somewhere when she can't.

TL;DR WIBTA for travelling alone or with best friend instead of my girlfriend?",AmItheAsshole
 for inviting my brother instead of my boyfriend to Disney while it’s our 1y anniversary?,"For context, tomorrow is our 1 year anniversary with my bf. I invited him to spend the day at Disney.
It is a surprise. For a week and a half now we have been in a fight due to an event.
My bf suggested to me a month ago that we organize a vacation in May before he goes to the army. I accepted with great pleasure and pushed us to organize a vacation together. But when it came time to pay for the tickets he started avoiding my messages about the trip.

For 4 days as soon as I texted him about the trip he didn't answer me. I asked him several times if there was a problem he didn't tell me about it and seemed very keen on the idea of ​​leaving. Suddenly it tells me that he is “not very ready to leave anymore”. 

It started with us not going abroad (we have to stay in Europe because he hasn't had his passport redone).
Then it continued with a new excuse, saying that the start of him joining the army was at the beginning of July, which was too close to the vacation. Since that day I have been very angry with him for changing his mind overnight and not having communicated.

For a little more information, it's not the first time that he talks to me about a project, that I start to make it happen and as it is almost ready he tells me he no longer wants to do it. I've been trying for 3 days to get him to make a compromise, to go to Greece for 4 days instead of the 10 initially planned. He continues to refuse, telling me that he does not have to compromise on a trip and does not feel selfish in the story despite having made a firm decision on a subject that also concerns me. (You have to take into account that this is my only vacation of the year and he knows it).

So Am I the asshole for taking my brother instead of my bf?

Sorry if there’s any mistake I’m not a native in English",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to slow down my edible usage for my partner?,"I (F25) have been dating my boyfriend (M24) for a little over a year. We’ve got plans to move in together within the next month. I love him very much and want to make this work.

I’ve been a regular edible taker for about 3 years now. I started to help fall asleep during college. Now I’m graduated for a few years, so I usually just take my edible after I get home for the day to chill, unwind, and still help me fall asleep. During the day, I have a great job, I go to the gym 4-5 days a week, financially independent, involved in the community, etc. So not the type to wake up and immediately hit a bong.

My boyfriend was raised in a home where weed is the devil. His father’s side has also dealt with alcoholism and it tore the family apart. A few reasons for not liking edibles is health concerns and feeling isolated when I get high, as sometimes I go a little mute. I told him I’d make more of an effort to be talkative if that’s how he feels. He also doesn’t think getting high every day is a good way to live life (seems to be the core issue here), but my thought is, if I have my shit together life-wise and I only get high at night, does it really matter?

He makes some valid points and I want to respect his wishes, but on the other hand, I don’t feel like I should have to stop to appease him, especially when it seems like the biggest reason he doesn’t like it is because of his family. I empathize his family doesn’t like weed and that addiction has caused many issues for them, but that doesn’t have anything to do with me. This is something I hope we can figure out a solution because right now, one person is going to start resenting the other. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 from trying to prevent my toddlers from making messes,"I am a firm believer in keeping our hotel room clean when we are on vacation and not making a mess for the housekeeping staff. I don’t care as much about messes at my house.

I have an 11yo daughter from my ex, and a 3y daughter , 2y son, and newborn son with my wife. I was not really involved with my 11yo daughter until she was 4 years old (I only saw her once every other month when I would fly up my ex and daughter for a weekend).

My wife thinks I am an asshole for not letting our toddlers eat messy foods like crackers, chips, cookies. We are on vacation and we have already called house keeping twice to sweep up the floors and I am getting embarrassed that I have to keep calling them. On top of that, my wife let them have a pack of stickers that her brother gave to them as a gift. I took it away from them before they could start stickering up the place. Then she tried to give them crayons, I took those away also.

Ill let them play with big toys like toy cars, plastic balls, dolls and my ipad.

And then near bed time, they wouldn’t stop jumping around and running around. She was yelling at them to get in bed.

We have a 3 bedroom hotel suite. I took them out of the room that her brother and his wife were in, brought the toddlers to one room, gave them their milk bottles, put them in bed, turned off the light and shut the door. Then I started cleaning up the hotel room. They were crying in the room for 2 mins before my wife opened the door to let them in the living room and then told me I am an asshole and that I wouldn’t have done that with my 11y daughter.

I am much more strict with my 11yo but I pretty much spoiled her as a toddler.

AITA for trying to prevent my toddlers from making messes at the hotel ? (I let them be messy at home.) I was not as strict with my first born when she was a toddler (with my ex). 

AITA for putting them to bed in a dark room with the door closed? I can see them being scared but I don’t think this is traumatizing or worse than yelling at them like my wife does. ",AmItheAsshole
 for requiring my flatmate to ask permission before using webcam/Facetime in the shared living space?,"So I’ve had my current flatmate for coming up to a year. We’ve lived a fairly chill existence together and he’s a very likeable guy. He has a long-distance GF who, since he’s moved in, he’s constantly on either FaceTime or webcam to her. 

For the most part, I tried to tolerate it as I understood that he’s far from basically everyone he knows, so never said much about it. However, there have been regular moments where I’ve been caught on the camera while he’s either talking to his GF, and other members of her family have been involved which has always made me feel super uncomfortable. So I asked him to stop using it in shared living space unless he asked first.

I told him that most of the time I wouldn’t have an issue with it as long as I was prepared, and he agreed to this term, however, since then, he’s put it on on three separate occasions. Ultimately the issue for me isn’t necessarily the camera, it’s an issue of consent and common courtesy and an understanding of my own right to privacy. 

Am I the asshole if I crack down on this and give him an ultimatum? Eg if he does it again I won’t allow him to use the desk where he uses his laptop to game (and also speaks to the GF)? I’m starting to doubt myself about whether I’m getting annoyed over nothing, but the fact he’s done it multiple times since we agreed he’d ask first just screams a lack of respect and courtesy.",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my bf while he is in the hospital? ,"so my bf(17) M recently got back surgery and he was loopy after it. when he was done he barely texted me and when he called me it was for 5 mins.(which is totally fine w me but he was in surgery for 6 hours and i wanted to talk to him more and make sure he was alright). the next day he was feeling a bit better but was still on meds, so it was easier to talk to him. he had asked me (18) F to call that night, he wanted me to be on the phone while he got checked on every two hours for the rest of his stay. it was like 1 am when i heard talking and i thought he was talking to me so i asked are you okay and he said that his doctors were checking in on him so i said oh and i went back to bed. his doctors (he has 3 ) said that we were talking all night (we weren’t) to his mom. we didnt call saturday night but he texted me every time his doctors came in and told me everything was fine every two hours. 

saturday night i texted his mom (43) F if my brother (20) M and i can visit my bf on sunday as a surprise. my bfs mom said she’d have to check because it was sunday (is not a business day) then she proceeded to tell me that my bf needs his sleep and we cant call at night and his doctors dont know that someone was“listening in”( i wasnt). and she also said that when his doctors come in to check on my bf, he would be texting me which is rude to the doctors ( like it was my fault he was texting me). and because i wanted to see my bf i apologized (even though in my opinion it wasnt my fault). but i told my bf to not text me when his doctors were in the room to make his mom happy because she was in the room with him. my bfs mom said that my brother and i could visit him. so AITA because i knew that he was texting me while his doctors were in the room and didnt say anything? ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my husband to not poop in our main bathroom?,"This isn’t that big of a deal but it’s a fight we’ve had multiple times so I thought I’d bring it to Reddit to put it to rest. We have 3 toilets in our house. A half bath downstairs, the hall (kids) bathroom and our main bedroom bathroom. The half bath has the littler box in it so we don’t tend to use it, don’t expect him to. The two upstairs are equally nice and clean. Most of the time my husband uses the hall toilet. I don’t really care which one he uses. Except for when we have to get ready. Our bathroom has all our shower stuff as well as all of my hair and makeup stuff. Is it that crazy to ask if he’s going to poop to just do it in the other bathroom so that I don’t have to smell it while I’m getting ready or sitting in the bedroom? Am I being unreasonable or unfair? 

ETA for context: I myself use the other restroom when I know he will be needing our main bathroom. This isn’t specific to him. I don’t want to smell anyone’s poop, not even the 5 year olds while I’m having to spend time in the bathroom. I am asking for a curtosey of walking 5ft on the rare instance that anyone needs to poop immediately before everyone needs to use that bathroom to get ready. ",AmItheAsshole
H for asking my wife and her friend to stop calling her new SIL the siren?,"My (m34) wife (f35)  is best friends with her ex sister in law, Jen(f35)  who was together with my wife’s brother,Jack (m38)for 15 years. They got to know each other when the Jack introduced Jen she became close with my wife.

I have been a part of this family for 10 years. I am very close friends with Jack.

Jack and Jen has always had a turbulent relationship. I don’t want to take sides and I think both were wrong and right and it wasn’t really anyone’s fault and nobody really knows what happened behind closed doors. They have had breaks on several occasions and I will not lie Jen is always the instigator. I also won’t lie and say that Jack is a flawed man and Jen had point in not being satisfied with him. Anyway the last time she asked for a break, Jack met Amy. This time Jack didn’t want to go back to Jen. Jen became distraught and devastated. It was devastating to everyone because we all were friends. 

Now my wife and Jen call Amy the siren. I think it is unfair. First because amy is a great person. Second because I have never seen Jack this happy and third because I believe Jack is family and we should welcome his soon to be wife into our midst. I think calling her a siren is cruel and disrespectful not only to her but to Jack as well implying that he was dumb enough to be hoodwinked. 

On the other hand, I see that Jack is a way better man with Amy, that he never was with Jen. He even admitted that he learned from his mistakes, which is unfortunate that he learned from Jen who put up with him to be a better man for another who just got the final draft and best version. So I get my wife’s and Jen’s hurt. 

Anyway I told my wife to stop calling her a siren and to grow up. People move on and life is unfair. She cried and called me an ah

Edit: Jack and Amy have been together for 2 years now and Jack has proposed. Jack has even changed his mind about being child free (both Jack and Jen were child free)


**Update** 

Yeah so I have told my wife that the internet sided with me. Thank you guys. It backfired on me tho because my wife was so angry with me! Wife said that she is team Jen and will always be team Jen. And that she will do EVERYTHING IN HER POWER (yelling) to break things between Jack and Amy. 

I told her that I was team Jack because I value family and no matter the past, Jack is a better person now. A happier person too but that I understand that a 20 year friendship is strong. I advised her however not to do anything sinister to break a loving relationship because karma would bite her in the ass. And that if she really loved Jen, she should help her move on to a relationship she can actually be happy in since she wasn’t happy with Jack. My wife got VERY Angry and told me that I didn’t get to decide when Jen was happy or not. That I never liked Jen. I didn’t deny it but I told her that me liking or disliking her has more to do with our personalities not vibing and I still wnt her to be happy because she isn’t a bad person. I told her that I will be having Jack’s back.

I called Jack in front of her and told him everything. Turns out he already knew about the bullying and he said that they(Jack and Amy) basically don’t care. I told Jack about my wife’s threats about breaking him and Amy up. He laughed and said bring it on but that I should warn her that if she wanted to be a part of his family not to do stupid shit. However they don’t want an apology nor even for my wife to stop the bullying behind their backs because they don’t care but to keep it civil when they are around. He understands that Amy will never be a close friend but that she should be treated as a sister in law. Not many sisters in law are friends.

Then Jack ended the conversation with a message to my wife, that when Jen is done using her and dropped her like a hot potato. She is welcome to commiserate with him about it.


This is my update. Thanks everyone. Now I need to go fix my marriage ",AmItheAsshole
 for keeping food my boyfriend is trying to avoid in the kitchen?,"My (25F) boyfriend (27M) just found out that he has type 2 diabetes. This really scared him and he’s trying hard to make lifestyle changes, including completely cutting out carbs. I told him that cutting them completely might be unsustainable, and that it would be easier to just limit them, but since he insisted, I respected his decision and make meals for both of us that he can eat.

The issue is, I have type 1 diabetes. Because of this, I also have to be careful with my carb intake, but I don’t want to completely avoid them, and doing so would be pretty dangerous. So, I keep them in the house for when I have lows. My boyfriend understands this is necessary, but we got into an argument the other day. He said that keeping carbs and sugary snacks in the pantry was “tempting” him and that by doing so I wasn’t respecting him. He insisted that I moved them to my office because he never goes in there, and I have storage I could easily use as a pantry.

I want to support him, but I think this is absolutely ridiculous. I have one cupboard for these things, and I told him that if he really wants to cut carbs completely, he’s going to have to learn to resist temptation in many situations, and that I don’t want to keep food in my office because it’s not as easily accessible when I may need it. Am I being unreasonable here?

Edit: fixed grammar for clarity.",AmItheAsshole
 for automating a happy birthday message to my gf ?,"I (25M) was in vacation and was returning from vacation the day of my girlfriend’s (21F) birthday.

I had been looking for a job for months. After I finally found one that is starting very soon, I book a flight to an all-inclusive to decompress for 1 week because I was really depressed over graduating and not finding a job and she knows that very well as she had been very supportive. She could not come with me because she have exams. My budget is also obviously very tight and it was the only available flight within my budget that would let me at least be there the day of her birthday.

It’s really important for her that I wish her happy birthday exactly at midnight. Problem is that my flight departed the night before her birthday but only arrived at 1AM. 

The flight was supposed to have wifi upgrade option and I payed for it, but for some reason it was not working (It was a low-cost company). I knew it was a risk, so just in case, I thankfully had set up an automatic message to her wishing her happy birthday with a beautiful and thoughtful message written in beach. I would have sent it myself if it was possible.

Now she is really mad that I wasn’t able to tell her happy birthday myself and is giving me a cold and avoidant attitude. I had actually bought her an expensive gift that I had been saving up for months and I also organized a date night at a fancy restaurant and bought flowers, while being unemployed, and now she does not even want to see me the day of her birthday and is giving me excuses.

So, AITA for automating a happy birthday message to my GF? What should I do ?


",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to my girlfriend's prom?,"I (19m) graduated last year in May. I have a girlfriend (18f) who is a senior in highschool. We started dating when I was a junior and she was a sophomore. Our highschool had a strict no-underclassmen rule, so that year for prom I stopped by her house and took pictures and then I went to prom with my friends. 

We went to prom together once when I was a senior and she was a junior. Our prom does allow graduates of up to two years to go with a current student but literally NO ONE brings their older girl/boyfriends. 

Honestly, I do not want to go. I already went twice as intended and I went once without her so I do not see it a big deal if she goes once without me. I encouraged her to go with her friends and I told her I would stop by her house to take pictures with her beforehand. She absolutely hates this idea and insists that I need to go with her. I ran it past my friends and they said to stand my ground, but if I am being a douche and unreasonable here I will go with her. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for forgetting to include my sister in my wedding?,"About a year and a half ago, my fiancée (28F) and I (27F) started planning our wedding. We wanted a small, intimate affair with only 65 guests, including the wedding party. My sister (30F) , who stays across the country, was supposed to be my maid of honor, and she enthusiastically helped with the planning until she faced a serious health issue about a month ago.  
Due to her health problems, my sister was advised not to travel after her surgeries, which meant she would miss the wedding. After discussing it with my fiancée, I offered to postpone the wedding so my sister could attend, but she insisted we stick to our original plans because she knew how important they were to me. I told her that i would be replacing her as the maid of honor with my childhood friend, and she was perfectly okay with it.   
Fast forward to two days ago, our wedding day. Everything seemed perfect until I spotted my sister sitting with my parents during the ceremony. It turns out she had gotten clearance from her doctor to travel last minute and surprised us by showing up. I was really happy to see her.  
after the ceremony she came over to talk to me and told me everything. amidst all the hugs and congratulations, i completely forgot that we had not planned for her to be there. due to the limited people at the wedding, we had strict seating charts and catered meals for everyone, as well as the wedding favours. it turns out, my sister didnt get to eat that night and just ate a few of the table appetisers, which were very small . she also didnt have a proper chair and one of the venue workers got her a completely mismatching one from elsewhere, and she had to squeeze in next to our cousin. the wedding party and us (total 9 people) all sat at the front of the hall on a long table, facing everyone.    
This morning, my sister calmly called and explained how excluded she felt at the wedding. I told her that yes, we didnt have extra favours/seats because of how strictly we budgeted for it. she understood but also felt that i couldve been more inclusive  by asking her to sit at the bridal table since she was originally supposed to be a MOH, or getting her a meal .

 she felt very judged the whole night and  the least i could do was try to include her after she flew all the way down. i apologised profusely because, had i not been so caught up with everything , i wouldve definitely tried to get her a meal from somewhere. but i also explained to her that she wouldnt have been able to sit with the wedding party  as we had a color scheme that she didnt match, and that she should know how detailed the guest list was for favours/seats . the conversation got a quite heated , and she said ""well i guess it wouldve been better for you if i was still bedridden and i didnt come at all"" and abrupty hung up the phone, though i know that line was probably an emotional outburst because of how hurt she was.  AITA for not including my sister at my wedding?   
( feel free to ask for any missing info)",AmItheAsshole
 for reporting my college professor after she gave my brother information about how I'm coping in college?,"I (20F) am a first year college student and I have been struggling with college lately, I feel burnt out and I've struggled with my mental health as a result. I have an older brother (41M), yes there's a significant age gap between us. I recently found out my brother knows one of my professors as they worked together and they remain good friends. A few weeks ago, I had a really bad day at college and it led me to breaking down before the end of the day. This resulted in me being referred to the mental health team. My brother called me and told me he knew about my breakdown in college and wanted to make sure I was alright. I know he comes from a caring side but I was really pissed off, I feel my privacy was violated. This breakdown happened in my professors office whose a good friend of my brothers, only she witnessed it. I don't know if I need to say this or not but my parents are listed as my next of kin and not my brother, I would have understood if she went to my parents about this. I contacted my parents to see if college contacted them, they said no but they heard about my breakdown as my brother called them and told them.

  
This professor is a professor I looked up to and admired, I could go to her about anything, I could talk to her about anything and I always felt safe and respected around her. All of that is now gone. I trusted her and I felt she has violated my trust and privacy. Again, I know my brother, parents and professors are concerned about me and my mental health, however, as my brother isn't my NOK if she needed to contact anyone she should contact my parents as they're my NOK. I found out my brother knew because they met up outside of her work hours and she spoke about me to my brother. This has led me to filing a complaint against the professor and I only recently submitted the complaint, they just started the formal process for dealing with the complaints. The professor is a well-liked professor, she's good at her job and I won't deny that, but it's led to students ganging up on me, calling me all sorts of names and berating me for doing it. Even some professors seem to be treating me differently.

Was I in the wrong regarding making a complaint which could lead me to being a complete asshole?

  


  
",AmItheAsshole
 for laughing when my friend opened up to me?,"My (M19) friend called me (F18) yesterday and was showing me a bracelet he had gotten from an ex-talking stage, and it had something funny written on it. When I asked what happened between them, he was hesitant to say at first but it didn’t take much convincing to get it out. Apparently, he lost her during an event and when he found her she was holding hands with another guy.

Just some context, this friend is a person that doesn’t take a lot of things seriously and is just very funny. Whenever we’re in group settings he’s always the one making jokes.

My response to what happened was to start laughing, as he had been laughing too when he was telling the story. I admit, I laughed way longer than I should have, but the call wasn’t longer than 4 minutes. 

He proceeded to hang up and when I asked why, he started calling me a terrible person and to stop talking to him because he was disappointed in me. I was confused at first, and I was asking why he was so angry. He was actually being vulnerable and opening up to me about her, but I hadn’t realized at all. When I told him, he said I was playing the ignorant and victim card. Our conversation went around in circles with him name calling and telling me to stop talking to him and me apologizing, but I eventually did manage to apologize to the point where he was OK and said he would talk to me later to clear it up.

So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for skipping a celebration for my sister?,"My (16m) younger sister (12f) was born way early and almost didn't make it. For the first year of her life I lived with my aunt and uncle because my parents wanted to devote as much time to her as they could and didn't want to worry about me in that time. I came home when she finally did. She has chronic health stuff from being born so early. She's had a few surgeries since she left the hospital too. I remember my parents adoring her so much and celebrating every tiny milestone she hit and making it into a very big celebration.

I was jealous, I admit. My parents attention was focused so much on her that I was overlooked a lot and I still am. They cheer on every little thing for her and don't notice anything for me. I was given an award at the end of middle school for best artist and my parents didn't show up to it, they didn't mention it, and I know they got the emails and I gave them a note from my teacher about the ceremony and how parents needed to be there at 2. I mentioned it to them and they seemed so disinterested. It pissed me off.

Another reason for the focus being on my sister so much is when she was in first grade her school went on a field trip and there was an accident. My parents were freaking out and going crazy with worry and after she got back safe and unharmed they were saying how she really was a miracle and they almost lost her twice and how she was the most precious thing in the world to them.

My sister got so used to talking about herself and her struggles that she takes over things for other people. She brought it up at our cousins wedding and so many of her classes birthday parties that my parents get calls to pick her up early most of the time. But she really adores me and wants us to be so close and always wants to hang out but she also talks about how sick she was and early she was born and how special she is. It annoys me. I don't like my sister. I don't even know that I love her. Part of me resents her. Like I know this is on our parents and they're at fault. But I hate being around her. I hate that she loves me. I wish she would focus on others because I'd rather not be in the same room as her. I don't want to celebrate her.

My sister got some early report card that was all A's for the first time. My parents decided to throw a party to celebrate her. She told me how excited she was and wanted me there. I didn't want to go. I hated the idea of celebrating her achievements. So I just didn't show up. I went to a friends house. My parents only cared or noticed when my sister got upset that I wasn't there.

I was grounded for two weeks and it just ended. My parents told me it wasn't fair to my sister to skip something so important for her. Something so huge. I asked them when I was celebrated like that and they told me it wasn't about me, it's about her. My sister has been so different since. I hear her cry sometimes. So I know it did hurt her.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for bothering my boyfriend for using his phone while driving?,"I (f19) have had road anxiety for a while now. I have breakdowns every time I see a motor accident and freak out when people try to run red lights, speed, or use their phone while driving. Usually I keep my concerns to myself because I realize most people do these things while driving even if it is illegal. However, my boyfriend (m20) is a chronic distracted driver. It's gotten to the point where he'll be scrolling through social media, looking for and buying things off of Amazon, and scrolling Facebook marketplace. He'll often use both hands and drive with his knees while keeping both eyes on his phone. I'd suck it up and deal with it except he's almost hit cars a couple times and we go off the road all the time. Not enough to be dangerous, but enough to be scary. He'll also hold his phone high enough that any passing or waiting cop could see it clearly. The other day we went almost completely off the road and I screamed and scolded him for being on his phone. He apologized but then said ""hold on baby I have to just finish buying this and I'll be done"" then proceeded to spend another 30 minutes scrolling - and I'm assuming - buying whatever it was. I ended up being extremely quiet the rest of the ride home and clearly upset with him trying to explain that he knew what he was doing and wouldn't put me in any danger. I'm still upset about it and it seems to be just getting worse. AITA for getting mad and saying something about it?

Edit: our relationship seems to be very healthy in most aspects, this is one of the very few things that bothers me. I don't want to make him seem like a bad person because I don't think he is but I definitely still need some input from the outside.",AmItheAsshole
 FOR NOT SENDING OUT PRIVATE  WEDDING INVITES TO MY FATHER'S SIDE OF THE FAMILY ? ," Hi so I (23F) got married a few years back like at the end of 2020(December). Please bare in mind that COVID was still around.  Please bare with me . It's long 

I recently visit my grandmother (father's mother ) and she told me that she is still disappointed and upset that I didn't invite her side tomy wedding which I did, the only down fall was that I could only invite 2 of the oldest in each family due to restrictions at that time. So we booked a hall with only 50 guest as per restrictions according to hall. And my mother's side of the family is extremely huge (like she has over 5 siblings). But anyway. I messaged the same to them as I did with my father's side of the family, and I only got 2 responses from his side. But it's cool. 

So the day before my wedding alot of preparations had to be done and low and behold uncle president said we on locked down. To which the hall called us to let us know that it won't be available anymore. So instead of privately messaging everyone. I noted on my whatsApp story that the venue is not available anymore. So we will be doing a drive by wedding and that everyone can come. So basically we had a house wedding with a drive by. 

Anyhow my father's side of the family then contacted my grandmother after the wedding saying how disrespectful it was to not invite them to my wedding. I should have personally drove to each of their houses and let them know about the wedding and should've gave them their physical invitations. I then told my grandmother that why should I drive all the way to each of their houses with invitations when I literally found out the day before my wedding that venue is cancelled due to locked down. I literally had to make alternative plans the night before to ensure that day goes well with regards to decorations. She still didn't understand and said that I favored my mother's side of the family more than hers and that I am an asshole who is unappreciated of her family. I then had to remind her that not once did that family visit us when I was alot younger. We always to visit them. Like what's wrong with our house??? And why is it that they want special treatment. When I literally made a post about the change on whatsapp and the reasoning behind it. And those 2 that said they will come did. Oh and those that called my grandma saw my post on whatsApp literally minutes after I posted it. 

She said its been weighing on chest about she wanted to bring it up. I told her she should've told me when they called at that time. Not tell me 3 years later after I got married. 


So AITA for not personally sending out my father's side of the family invites?? 
 ",AmItheAsshole
 for this discussion about racism while at dinner with my sister?,"I went to dinner w/my sister &amp; she brought up how she had a couple latino men at her house. One joked that white people smell like ham &amp; she thought it was funny &amp; jokingly asked what other races smell like. I rolled my eyes bc I never know what she's gonna say as she gets a kick out of offending people.

20 years ago I stopped talking to my parents &amp; sis bc they were mad I was dating someone 1/2 black &amp; said terrible things ie: he looks like a monkey. My sis &amp; I know we r different in our political/human rights views. We live 1 hour away from each other &amp; keep in touch by having convos over Snapchat video messages. She'll say things like ""I know you dont like the word ""gay"" used to say something's bad (I'm bi), ""but this was f\*cking gay"". Or says ""n\*gga"" &amp; laughs. Since it isnt a live video call she never sees my eye rolls.

When she saw my reaction she got upset &amp; says THEY were the ones who started making jokes so why is it a problem? I said I worry what will happen if you say the wrong thing in front of ppl/person who dont take it well. She said she doesnt go around freely saying these things. I said its good you dont go around saying stuff like this but how am I supposed to know how you act in all social situations? She says she never questions my character bc she knows Im a good person &amp; thought this was mutual. I say I know shes good but she says a lot of cringey things &amp; some might not take it well. She says its for comedy &amp; do I even like comedy &amp; does everything offend me? She asked if I think jokes about white people r funny &amp; sometimes I do. I can understand how oppressed ppl might use humor to deal &amp; I do think part of our white history in America is terrible. That upset her. She said she didnt enslave anybody &amp; doesnt feel guilty.

She says she isnt racist bc shes in a relationship w/ a Puerto Rican (new relationship, 1st time being close w/someone who isnt white &amp; is enjoying learning the culture.) I made a comment about misogyny: a man can be a misogynist &amp; still be married to a woman. It didnt go over well. The convo kept on, she steps back on her tone, gets calm &amp; says she wont say stuff like this around me again. My insides were tingling - Im triggered bc of how I stopped talking to her &amp; my parents years ago. I explain &amp; she said I cant blame her for things she did when she was little. I said I get it, but I had no family for years. She says she thought I was a safe place bc Im her sis &amp; shes said stuff like this over Snap &amp; I dont react. I just didnt want to fight about it/lose her again over racism/different views.

I couldnt shake my feelings &amp; was sad about how the evening went. She said ""You wont let it go. You're toxic."" I said ""I'm toxic?"" She said ""You called me racist."" I told her, ""I never said -insert her name-, youre racist. We were discussing racism."" She didnt understand. At this point, I get up to leave &amp; go home. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for criyng over over a bad joke that my friends made?,"AITA for crying over a bad joke? Also, English is not my native language so sorry from the start.
  I (20f), have a small group of friends in college. All of them are special and have a place in my heart because I have been friends with them since middle school. But recently the girls started to change. They started making rude comments and jokes about me when we are all together even after I told them to stop. The jokes are mostly about me being a teacher's pet because I have the best grades and about my looks (I am dealing with some acne and they know that I am insecure about that, but are still talking about it). There still are some small issues but they are personal to me.
   So a week ago we were sitting on a bench outside and my classmate, that I will call P walked up to us. The girls gave him a seat near me and we started talking, after some chatting one girl started to say how nice we look together and pushed P so that he will be near me as much as possible. Another girl grabbed my head and started pushing me into P's face for us to kiss, all that while laughing and smiling. P has a girlfriend that watched the whole scene and was looking very sad, and I have a boyfriend. So after I pushed the girls, I saw that other people were looking at us. I felt so embarresd that I sprinted out to the toilet, closed myself inside a cabin and cried for a bit.After I calmed down I grabbed my stuff and walked home, all that while the girls commented that I'm a cry baby and an asshole. So, am I the asshole?
",AmItheAsshole
 for making my sister in law pay rent?,"AITA for making my sister in law pay rent? 

A few months back, (december, it’s now almost may) my husband and I let my sister in law and her family (her husband, 13y/o and her 3 y/o) move into our driveway with their camper trailer until they got back on their feet after basically packing up their life and moving. We live in a rural place, they moved up from one of the biggest cities in our state. 
  
Ever since they’ve moved in, they refuse to pay more than 50 bucks for rent. She’s a traveling RN nurse with a sign on bonus, I hate to assume that they have lots of money but with the multiple trips to town and the ups packages they get I can only assume. They use our water, sewer, electricity, laundry and utilities. Even after claiming their camper is “self contained”. they come in to our house eat our food, use all of our utilities, have made a mess of our (Once) beautiful yard (that we’ve worked very hard on) with their two vehicles and motorbikes tearing up our grass. They also refuse to let us lock our front and back doors. 

One night my husband and I had a talk about it and looking at our bills, they almost DOUBLED in about 3 months. So we kindly asked her to pay 300 a month for rent. !WOW! I actually have never seen grown adults throw such a fit. Screaming and yelling. Ended up calling my mother in law and telling her I was kicking her out which in turn got my mother in law very angry with me. Basically blaming me for the WHOLE thing. Calling me multiple names including calling me a f-ing b**ch and the c-word. 

After a couple weeks they ended up paying us 200 dollars, better than before but not what we asked. We compromised, they stopped taking our food and being in our house constantly. But still using all of our utilities and such. 

Last week when we were gone on a mini vacation, they flooded my laundry room. For context, our washer drains into a utility sink that can clog if not cleaned after each load from link/hair/etc. we asked them about it, since it looked like someone shoved plenty of towels under the washer itself and baskets and our clothes racks. They denied everything. So now I have four bags of moldy towels and clothes and a somewhat moldy mattress. They refused to help clean it, or remburse us for the cost of our now lost clothes. Their response was to buy a brand new combo washer and dryer for their camper (That they run off our electricity remember). 
  
Now they REFUSE to pay anything because they are now “completely self contained”. So in return I’ve locked my doors at all times. Which means they again threw a fit. Now we are at a stand still, she’s ruining my relationship with my in laws, since she blames me only. I really don’t know what to do.

??AITA???? 

Update: to clear things up since I didn’t word it right, my MIL didn’t call me names😓 it was my SIL. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom that if anything is wrong with me it's because she gave birth to me,"My mom makes a lot of comments on my appearance, from a very young age. There always seems to be something she should fix in me whether it be my curly hair, stretch marks, clothes you name it. Sometimes I don't even pay attention to those things but when she points something out, it turns into an insecurity. Today, she was pulling at my cheek when she said ""your skin is so dry. you need to get a facial"" and i was like yeah okay whatever but then 2 hours later she noticed my hands are sweaty and asked in a weird tone if they were always this sweaty and i answered that they usually do when it gets warmer and before she could add another comment i said "" you know, you gave birth to me"" in a teasing tone and she suddenly lashed out saying that i always blame her for my problems and that i'm always harsh on her that she was just looking out for me because she knows that sweaty hands can bother me in exams or so... But the thing is everytime she would make her little comments i felt like she was projecting her insecurities on me and when i tried to ask her why she felt hurt by what i said she explained that i always seem to be against her however when i tried to explain my side of the story to her, she started screaming at me to go to my room and not talk to her. I know this is a dumb fight but i don't know if am really just oversensitive to criticism or if she is indeed just projecting ?",AmItheAsshole
 for making my son pay me back as a consequence?,"My (F42) son (M15) has recently become friends with a new group at school, and his relative level-headedness has disappeared in place of wanting to take part in all kinds of schenanigans. They have been relatively harmless until this point, but I have asked him on more than one occasion to be smart in his decision making.

Recently, my son saw a video online where someone put a cob of corn on a drill and tried to eat it while the drill was spinning. Obviously stupid at best and dangerous at worst. Unfortunately, my son's friends convinced him to do this and he ripped out two of his front teeth.

Of course I was worried, so I rushed him to our family dentist who was thankfully able to fit him in. My son was in a lot of pain, but the dentist was fantastic! Unfortunately we had to go down the route of dental implants.

After this very expensive exercise, I told my son that I expext him to pay me back. If an accident had happened or he needed dental work as part of his daily life, I would have no problem as this is my obligation as a parent. However, he chose to do something reckless and stupid, and now must face the consequences. What makes it worse is that he knew the risks - the man in the original video ripped his teeth out too!

My son says that this is incredibly unfair, he says that he was acting like any teenager would and I should be prepared for unexpected costs as the parent of a teenager. He says that I am putting him at a disadvantage because he will either have to get a job or dip into money from his grandparents. I told him it is high time he gets a job anyway to try and learn some sense of responsibility, but he says I am being too harsh. Am I the AH?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend she isn’t the centre of the universe,"Long time lurker, first time poster and looking for some unbiased advice. My (30f) best friend (29f) and I have been friends for over 10years. We have two other really close friends and for the most part things have been good but lately I’ve noticed that when ever something is happening in my life or the lives of our other friends, something “bigger” happens to her and our things get pushed aside. For example: - when my long term bf and I broke up because he cheated, she and her fiancé got into a huge fight and she needed all our friends as support - I started dating my current Bf and her and the fiancé broke up so I felt awkward talking about my new happy relationship - I’ve struggled with fertility for many years and I’d just found out I was pregnant. She had been hooking up with someone and got pregnant but didn’t want it so instead of being able to talk about my pregnancy, she just wanted to talk about how awful and sick she felt going through her ab0rti0n - not long after that I miscarried but I couldn’t feel sad about it because she had lost her job - After 4 rounds of IVF I got pregnant again and of course something else happened, she broke up with her new bf and was inconsolable.
Similar things have happened with our other friends, one came to us for advice on a fight she was having with her BF and while the rest of us tried to offer her advice, my best friend just changed the topic to what she was thinking about doing for her birthday later that month or when our other friend was kicked out of home by her dad and step mother and had to move in with me, my best friend turned it around saying when SHE was kicked out of home she was homeless and had nowhere to go..
It all came to a head last weekend when one of our other friends got into a car accident, she was okay expect for a couple bumps and bruises and while we were visiting her my best friend made a point to remind us all then when she was in a car accident like 15 years ago she was so much worse off because she had broken bones. I snapped and basically told her that it’s not a competition, not everything in life needs to be about her, she isn’t the centre of the universe and she should learn to have empathy and be more considerate of the rest of us.
She called be a bunch of choice words, said if I was really her friend I’d care more about her and left crying. She messaged our group chat last night saying if we felt that way about her then she might as well just make it easy for all of us and just disappear amongst other things. Which in turn ended up with us having the police do a welfare check.
One of my friends and my bf are 100% behind me but my other friend thinks I could have handled it a bit more delicately.",AmItheAsshole
 For Not Wanting My Cousin's New GF to Come to Dinner,"I (27F) had my birthday last week and am still dealing with the repercussions of this decision. 

I live with my uncle, Ralph(47M). My other uncle, Peter, his wife (Tracy 45F) and my cousins (Jake 20 and Stacy) live ten minutes away from us. I wanted to have a birthday dinner, and invited the other household to meet at a restaurant in town. Tracy (the one I texted) said they would be there. 

The day after I sent the invite, Tracy texts me saying that Jake's girlfriend is going to be joining us for dinner. Not ASKING if the girlfriend could come, TELLING me she was coming. I was annoyed, but didn't want to cause issues so I said ""sounds good, I didn't know Jake had a gf?"" 

Tracy replied saying it was a new relationship and that they (my aunt, uncle and other cousin) hadn't met the new gf yet either. 

That changed my answer drastically. If I had known that no one had met her, then I would have said no, because now this dinner that was supposed to be for my 27th birthday was now going to turn into a Girlfriend Meet-and-Greet. But I can't take it back because then I would be the bad guy.

Later that day, I expressed my annoyances to Ralph. He then texts Tracy to stick up for me, telling her that I really only wanted family at dinner, that I didn't want to make a big deal about it, that I don't know he was reaching out to her (which I didn't). 

Tracy blows things out of proportion, saying that Jake already invited the GF, that the two had prior plans and instead of canceling on the gf or not coming to the dinner, he would just bring the gf. That if it was a big deal I should have said something to her, and that she will just tell Jake to go ahead with his prior plans with his gf and that only Peter and Stacy would be coming to dinner, that she (Tracy) wouldn't be coming because she ""didn't want anyone feeling uncomfortable."" (Ralph and Tracy currently have a rough relationship due to another issue.)

Ralph just let it go and said fine but next time please ask. Tracy then went on to say that when it came to her children she doesn't ask permission, that if it depends on her kid joining an event or not she gets to make that decision. She then said she was done with the conversation and to go through Paul if there was anything else. 

I talked to my mom and few friends about it, and they all agreed that Tracy was in the wrong, that she was stepping over a boundary and someone's birthday meal was NOT the appropriate time to introduce a new partner.

When I brought it up to my grandma, though, she blamed ME, saying that I should have just let the gf come, been grateful that there were a group of people to celebrate me, that I'm an adult, not 12, and despite it being a meal for my birthday it didn't have to be all about me. 

Should I have just let the gf come in the first place and not mentioned my annoyance to anyone? Or am I in the right?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to respond to my dead dad’s girlfriend? ,"Starting off with sorry for the long post.

A few months ago we were notified that my dad had passed. 

We were not close, both him and my mom stepped out of my life when I was little, gave me to his parents, and gave up their parental rights. 
Over the years I saw him once in a while and once I had my own kids, he sent them birthday cards. He visited us once. 

Anyway, the reason I was contacted is because the police had me as next of kin, which once our family situation was explained, they changed this and I was taken off their notes as legally, I wasn’t. His parents were given all information and they had been working with coroner, funeral home, etc.

The problem is… it gets complex with his girlfriend. They were together over 2 decades and when we were notified he had passed, they gave me her number to call. I’d never talked to her and neither of us had each other’s numbers.

I called her, and I regret it. I just wanted to help. She had lived with him for 2 decades and suddenly he was gone. So I felt bad for her. She didn’t know what to do with his things, his house, car, job/coworkers so I was offering to help. We don’t live in the same state so it was all over the phone. 

It’s well over the scope of this post but his parents were named his beneficiary at work so they took care of that (he had no personal will) and them and her have a very bad relationship. Ultimately she wanted his parents to come up and help her and I knew they wouldn’t so I offered. 

In the state they lived in there’s very loose guidelines behind what a common law spouse is, what that person gets in case of death, etc. 

His parents signed off that he was not married on his death certificate, and evidently this causes issues on what his girlfriend now has claim to. She technically didn’t contribute to their income and she isn’t on the car or house. So her family got a lawyer. I immediately stepped out. Everyone started trying to make me mediator. 

Over the weeks I’ve gotten small rant updates from his parents that the coroner called because her lawyer called them, or the funeral home, or his job. From my very little understanding, to get his parents to amend the marital status. 

Last week his girlfriend started calling me again. I just had a baby 2 weeks ago, and we were released from the hospital this Tuesday. I just cant/don’t want to deal with it. I answered once last week and tried to explain this but she seemed to want to get straight to talking about all of that and then (thankfully) the call dropped. She called today again and I was nursing so it went to voicemail but I sent her a text asking how she was doing, no response. 

She left a voicemail talking about past family issues, how she didn’t know what was going on, asking what his parents had been telling me and essentially that our family is heartless. I’m just going to keep ignoring her? Or does that make me a huge asshole?



















 





",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to tutor family friends children ,"I volunteer in rural schools to teach them English for two months each semester. 
Cause those schools don't have teacher in that subject .
And all students have passed with good grades every time .

So people around me too got to know about it and cause I was unofficially not going to college.  I was asked to tutor children of family friends .3rd and 4th grade .

I agreed at no fees cause I was told it looks disrespectful to ask fees from people you know . And I was only teaching them for a month at most so I agreed . And the children are a menace.  They act so obedient in front of their family but alone with me they act as if I am to do everything they ask for . Like if they say we don't want to study or do our homework for us or don't ask us this .....
. They even tell their family I did not teach them when my mind is blowing up teaching them .

And then if they do not well in test they tell that I did not teach them .

So I stopped teaching them and then I was asked to teach them during exams and another month so I did again cause everyone was continuously asking me too .

I was asked to teach them in may again and I said I will to calm them from asking me .
The family is great they are good people , really close friends of ours , . but their sister's children are demons  .

Now I want to reject them as I'm going to enter a new college which took me a lot of years to decide to do what I want . I'm still not confident  . But I know I want to start my life again .

So how do I refuse them .without being rude or snobby in their eyes .


Edit: They go to tuition themselves but maybe they think the children will change like the students at the school I volunteer at . But those school children are respectful and better even when they have nothing in resources near to these two children. 

Edit2: the children are of the sister of our family friends . So we are friends with their uncle family and not directly with the children's family ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to get a tattoo of my cat but not my boyfriend? ,"Hi hello!

My cat is like, my sweet angel baby. She is about to turn 6, and i’ve had her almost as long. She was an unexpected pet for me, circumstances of others around me not taking care of her, and she is like, my baby. she has gotten me through really hard times, like she has always been there for me and has been who i cry to and who has always loved me. 

i’ve wanted to memorialize her with a tattoo. i just know she won’t be with me forever, but like what she has given to me will always mean so much to me. the thing is, when i told my boyfriend this he like got upset. he said that he doesn’t understand if i want to memorialize me love for someone id be willing to get a tattoo for my cat, but not for him. he thinks if i love him the way i say i love him, i should be just as willing to get a tattoo for him as i am for my cat. when i tied to explain that the love fr my cat is like, this nonjudgmental, unconditional love, he said “so you don’t love me like that?” it turned into a huge fucking fight and we haven’t talked since. 

i love my boyfriend but idk how to explain my love for my cat is like, different? am i like so shitty and in the wrong for being okay with memorializing my love for my cat over my boyfriend? ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my old roommate to clean her side of the room that’s a mess?,"my old roommate left her side of the room a mess and didn’t do any of the things you should do when you move out. she also left some of her belongings on her side and i could face charges for her irresponsibility. i reached out to her after checking with my RA to see if she could clean her side of the room and take care of her things. she responded pretty mean and dismissive which was surprising to me. 

i basically just dropped it because there’s not much i can do and it’s not worth it if it’s becoming an argument. i really tried to be as kind as possible and had so many friends review my messages to make sure they weren’t mean in any way. she had blocked me on all socials shortly after i texted her which was also alarming. i cleary knew she was angry so i texted her to ask what was wrong or if i upset her and apologized. 

she responded with a bunch of things that aren’t true and when i attempted to respond she had already blocked me despite me replying within a minute of her text. i never blocked her like she claims and just deactivated my account temporarily. it is confusing how she thinks i blocked her bc she had to see we were following each other when she went to block me. she also has only said hi to me once since i moved out and it was when i was leaving the building in a rush to get dinner before it closed with headphones on and it caught me really off guard and by the time i processed it she had already continued her conversation with her friend. i also did not intentionally ignore her happy birthday message and that is the only message she has sent me since moving out. she sent it over snap and i didn’t see it for weeks until it was pretty late. i’m hardly ever on snap and have always texted her almost exclusively on iMessage so it’s strange she’s taking it to heart.

i just feel like crap tbh and this has been bothering me all day and night. i don’t understand why she’s jumping to conclusions when it’s just a misunderstanding. it seems like she really hates me all of a sudden and it’s hurtful but if i am in the wrong somehow i would want to know. i’m tempted to go to her door and tell her the truth since she only moved into a dorm down the hall with her friend. my boyfriend thinks she’s embarrassed bc she thinks i don’t like her and that i should try to go to her door to talk but my other friends think i should just leave it. i normally don’t post but this is just really bugging me and i hate leaving on such bad terms like this over something that isn’t even true. what are your thoughts? am i the asshole in this? should i go to her door to try to talk or have my boyfriend reach out to tell her the truth about the situation? or even leave her a note? i just hate the thought that she thinks these things and is upset with me when it’s not even true.

*unfortunately i can’t give full context and detail since there’s the character limit and i can’t provide screenshots but if there’s questions lmk😭*",AmItheAsshole
 listening to books while driving,"My husband loves to listen to books while driving. I, as the passenger have not heard the book from the beginning but he insist on playing it whether we are running errands or headed to church. I’d like to have a drive where we can just chitchat about life, us or our family and he would rather listen to his book. When I ask him to stop the book because I have no idea what going on he gets obviously frustrated and huffy. Am I the AA for asking him to turn it off?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my partner's co-worker pushy and telling her to leave?,"My (FTM19) partner, Moz (M23) works at some revenue office. It isn't his scene at all, but the pay is a bit more than the minimum wage we got by on before. 

Ever since he started, Moz has always been lamenting to me about how miserable he is at his job, its a nightly occurrence. At first, I chalked it up to him just being his usual self, he's always very sarcastic and cynical, but I think he genuinely does hate it there. According to him, his co-workers are always ready to take the piss out of him, they're all friends with each other and he's not included in whatever they all have going on. They make fun of him because he is painfully shy, bit of a smart arse, he dresses pretty 70s. He's not really a lad's lad, he's too sensitive for that type of thing.

A new woman started working in their section of the office recently, Libbie (F28). Moz has said a few times that she's basically a Lad stuck in an attractive woman's body, she's identical in personality and hobbies to their other co workers, only difference being that she actually tries to befriend my partner. I thought originally that that'd be a positive, but he despairs. Apparently she's very in your face and overwhelming to be around, she doesn't get the hint that he doesn't want to be friends or even acquainted with her. She's tried a few times to invite him out to places with her, or to parties but Moz has always declined.

There was some kind of work dinner going on last week and after much cajoling from me, Moz decided to go. Libbie was insistent on Moz walking her home and when he refused she offered to spilt the taxi fare with him, though she ended up coming to our place rather than her own home.

I was surprised to see them, it was almost 9pm, I looked a huge mess because I'm 7 months pregnant and sick and the flat was in a bit of a state. I could just tell that Moz was feeling awful and uncomfortable, he tends to practically chew his lip off and blushes. 

Libbie tried to be nice and causal but that was beyond her, she was loud and  insistent on being given an apartment tour and was just being super patronising in how she spoke to me, she acted as if she was in her own apartment. I asked her if she didn't think she was being pushy by practically forcing herself into being invited over? To which she called me a rude little guy, and started joking around with Moz about me practically being an impertinent kid and stuff. I ended up telling her to leave, that she wasn't welcome here at all. She told me that I was acting like a dick.

The next morning, Moz and I talked about it and he said that while she shouldn't have come over, she was tipsy and that he's surprised I was angry about the jokes since I make similar ones myself. He said that I should've let him sort it out himself because now they're going to be even worse at work.",AmItheAsshole
 for 'excluding' my cousin's gf from my birthday party,"I'll be celebrating my 20th birthday with my family next week. I was really excited about it until this all happened, causing a huge situation where everyone from my family is telling me I'm in the wrong, while my friends insist I'm right. So, I decided to take it to Reddit.

When we were chatting in the family group chat to figure out who can make it (I have a really large family, by the way), my aunt texted, ""Hey, can Sarah come too?"" It took me a minute to even realize who she was talking about. Then I realized it's my cousin's girlfriend. The reason I didn't recognize the name is because they've only been dating for a little over a month, and I've never met her.

Something important to note here is that I'm on the spectrum, and unknown factors really stress me out. I'm sure she's a really lovely girl, but I don't know her. I know it will stress me out, so I don't want her at my party.

I texted my mom this, she read it but didn't respond. At this point, I'm really starting to stress out about it, so I privately messaged my aunt and said, ""Hey, Sarah is cousin's girlfriend, right? If I can be completely honest, because I myself haven't met her yet, I'd prefer it if she didn't come. I hope that's okay.""

I texted my mom letting her know I took care of the situation myself and sent her my message as well. She called me the next morning, telling me how what I did was incredibly rude, how it's mean of me to exclude this girl, how she's just a part of the family now, and then she drops the ""well I texted your aunt letting her know Sarah can come.""

I know to some, this might seem incredibly trivial, but to me, it's a really big deal. To quickly put it into perspective, imagine having a birthday party and your family suddenly texts you, ""Hey, is it okay if we make it spider themed?"" And you tell them that you have a phobia of spiders and how that would be incredibly stressful for you, and they go, ""Yes, but we like spiders, so it doesn't really matter.""

So when my mom said that, I panicked and got angry. I told her, ""Well, if that's the case, you can hold it without me because I will not be coming,"" and hung up. I know that was an overreaction, but it's just this whole situation that rubs me the wrong way. My mom knows I struggle with these kinds of things, so to then not even listen to me and just go over my head really stings.

Now that side of the family is upset with me, my mom hasn't talked to me, and I don't know what to do. My friends, though, agree with me and think it's unreasonable that I don't have a say about it at my own party. I still don't think I'm in the wrong. So Reddit, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my coworkers to speak in english around me?,"I (17F) work retail with several other girls. Half of the people who work “behind the counter” speak spanish, and a few are actually immigrants from South America. I do not know any Spanish (but am planning to take a spanish course at my community college over the summer), but my coworkers are either conversational in English or fluent in English. Yesterday I worked with two of my spanish-speaking coworkers, Jennie and Lily. Jennie is first generation American, and is fluent in both English and Spanish, while Lily immigrated to America a few years ago.
Because they both speak Spanish, most of the time they will speak Spanish to each other, whether for casual conversation or giving instructions (you can describe Jennie as a shift leader/junior manager). This feels very isolating because I have no idea what is going on when they are speaking in Spanish, and it is annoying to always be like “huh” and wait for them to translate it for me if I want to know what is going on. This also happens when I am hanging out with my coworkers and two or more speak Spanish (they will talk about something in Spanish while I am there). 
I could be the asshole because I would be asking my friends to speak in a language they aren’t as comfortable in when they have someone to speak that with. ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my son to have a more traditional wedding to reflect on his career choice?,"I had a complicated birth with my youngest son matt and I have always had high expectations for him. 

Matt is still in law school but is still insisting on getting married this October. I’m  not the biggest fan of his fiancee Amy’s ideas for her wedding . She decides she wanted a Halloween marriage and Amy doesn’t care how it looks infront of matt’s peers and professors and other people in his conservative field once he finishes law school. Amy picked out black dress and somehow got it in her head that she wants to wear ruby slippers tp the wedding since she love wicked. 

I have repeatedly tried to tell amy to have some respect for matt’s future field but Amy thinks it’s okay because she does marketing and some of her coworkers are coming to this disaster of a wedding. 

My oldest daughter dropped out of being a bridesmaid before Amy wanted the in red dresses and my daughter thinks amy is being tacky and matt still won’t do anything about the wedding and making it more traditional. 

I tried to talk to him again after the ruby slippers issue and he told me maybe if his wedding stresses me out so much I should skip it. I tried explaining that this kind of tackiness can backfire on his career because when he has wedding pictures up people are going to notice his bride in a black dress and question his integrity as lawyer. 

Matt has told me that I’m going to be uninvited to his wedding if I continue to make a scene but I’m just trying to help people see him in a better light.",AmItheAsshole
 for being surprised by my fiancée saying she wants to take a job for significantly less money?,"I (40M) and my fiancée (41F) just got engaged.  We had been dating for 1.5 years.

I want to start off by saying I love this woman to pieces.   When we met, everything between us felt so special and it felt meant to be.  I’ve been in love before but never like this.  I felt like I met my life partner.

Around the time we met, my professional situation was precarious.  I have been a Realtor for over a decade, &amp; with the recent market and high interest rates things have gotten increasingly difficult over the time we have been together.  I have started focusing on changing industries.

In contrast, she was at a high-paying job ($500K/yr range).  She told me then that in a short time she would be leaving that job for one that pays 1/4th of what she was making because it would be valuable experience that would make her an even more marketable professional.  She said her plan was to stay at this job for 2 years and then go back to what she was doing before.   She made the jump to that new Iower paying) job \~10 months ago.  I totally understood &amp; really it didn’t matter to me what she was making.

After getting engaged we said we would come up with a plan for starting a life together.  We began having that convo last week but didn’t get far– she started saying the idea of having to say she’d do one thing or the other was “too much pressure” &amp; it “shouldn’t all be on her.”  I backed off.

Well, a few days ago I read some articles about how we live in one of the most expensive states to raise a family in.  I freaked out &amp; really screwed up by then forcing the issue.

She told me she was now thinking about just working part-time when she leaves her current job next year.   With her qualifications she can still clear 100K if she’s doing 30 hours a week, but now I’m really worried that if we have an income of &lt;200K a year then we are going to be struggling.  Data supports that.  She said I shouldn’t expect her to make anything more than $130Kish so that she has options &amp; can make the decision herself.  I kind of get it.

She then tells me that I’m entitled &amp; I’m exploiting her.  That if I were a doctor or a lawyer this wouldn’t be a problem.   That it’s my fault for not getting a degree, &amp; if I were with anyone else I’d be stuck leaving the city– it’s just dumb luck that I met someone with the earning potential she has.  Wow, I’m taken aback &amp; I can’t believe I’m hearing these things from my now-fiancée.  I would never say such hurtful things to her.

I don’t know what to do.  I am not with this woman for money.  It would all be better if I could make a bunch of money myself, but I think my earning potential is probably capped at 100K/year in a good situation.   There is a lot going on here. 

  
Edit:  I have been told that there is important info in some of my replies that should have been in the original post.  I had to delete some wording from the original post to add this edit.  ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to travel without my husband?,"So I (32f) have been with my husband (34M) for 6 years, together for 3 and married for 3 years. I love traveling and going to music festivals but I never truly found a bf or a friend to do all that with. My husband works in music so he travels sometimes for it, he does not like going to music festivals at all, he’s not super opposed to traveling though.  My issue here is that I finally have a female best friend that likes the same things I do, not too long ago we went to a music festival together. I had the time of my life,and we are planing to go to more festivals ( just girls) . Now that I finally found a friend to go to festivals with, my husband has now expressed interest in going when our whole relationship I would beg for him to go with me to a festival. He has also been drinking way too much to the point where he becomes negative and aggressive and I have to stop drinking so I can care for him. I am a drinker but I know when to stop and handle myself . So am I the asshole now that I don’t want him to go with me to festivals? ",AmItheAsshole
 for threatening to call the cops on my brother over prom expenses?,"My brother and his useless wife are broke. My oldest nephew ""Alex"" is a senior. He wanted to go to prom but had no money. As a birthday present, I agreed to pay for everything prom. He got tickets for him and his girlfriend, tux rental, dinner and a limo. It came out to about $800.

Alex got into it with my brother and said he can't go to prom. I told my brother if Alex can't go then you have to reimburse me for all the expenses. He said he's not paying me anything. He accused me of trying to make him let Alex go to prom by asking him to pay me back. I said you're only grounding him from prom because you didn't pay for it.

I sent him a money request for $800 and he rejected it. I said either he let's Alex go or I will call the police to get him to reimburse me for Alex's prom.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to upscale places with my friend due to her lack of hygiene and effort in appearance,"My friend May and I have been friends since high school. We’re both in our early 30s now. May doesn’t take her personal hygiene seriously and thinks it’s funny. 

As an example, once after a multiple day hiking / camping trip, she went to the airport and boarded her flight immediately after coming out of the woods. Those in her row were understandably very unhappy to be seated with a muddy, grubby person and gave her disgusted looks, even asking the stewardesses to change their seats but got denied as there were none to spare. May was laughing while telling me this story, as though it were funny while I was horrified. 

(I had asked her why on earth would she go straight to boarding her plane not having showered throughout a 4 day hiking and camping trip and she said she had no time. But seriously, shouldn’t any sane person have accounted for this and not booked your flight the same afternoon your camping trip would end?!)

It may be shallow but I also can’t help but to be embarrassed by some of the other things she does, such as chew with her mouth open and bits of food fall out onto the table, burp loudly and glaringly pick her teeth with her fingernails to dislodge bits of food particles stuck in her molars after we are done eating. When I mentioned how inappropriate and ill mannered it is, she thinks I need to chill and not take things too seriously.

By extension, she also thinks that dressing and grooming are vanity and wears oversize button down checkered shirts, ripped stained jeans, and ratty sneakers everywhere. She has also had the same bowl haircut since we were 8. When I’ve tried to encourage better styling (she’s told me numerous times she wishes she could have a better sense of style), she thinks it’s too much effort and expensive.

Anyway, she had expressed her interest in going to some nice upscale classy bars and restaurants which coincidentally had also been on my list (but I’ve never mentioned to her, cos I wouldn’t wanna go with her) and suggested we check them out together. I told her ‘maybe’ then ended up going with some other friends and she saw it on Instagram. She then messaged me about blowing her off.",AmItheAsshole
 telling my sister she was wrong for saying a comment about my boyfriend. ,"I (23 F)live with my parents and I am trying to work things out with the father of my son John(25) we were broken up for about a year and now started to work on things for us and our son. 

My (29 F ) sister Sam and John haven’t always gotten along, anyways I love with parents John sometimes come over and sleepover or something just passes by to spend time with us. My parents house has 3 restrooms 2 inside and one in the garage for me and my son since my brother also has his whole family living with him in his room (family of 5) they have the living restrooms and my parents have they’re own restroom, well since the winter I have been using my parents restroom to take my son and me a shower and get out, we’ve never had an issue. 

I would like to add I do not like the restroom in the living area for the reason that restrooms to me is dirty , since I moved in with my family I have never showered there , the only reason why I do not shower in my own restroom in the garage area is because there is no hot water during the winter, I only shower and get out again. 


John and I agreed on working on getting back together and I would only move out of my parents if he has a place for us and proposes. 

On a Saturday we were hanging out at my house we were planning on leaving to go to John house but I told John our son needed to shower he took the initiative to say he would take care of that for me not to worry, I told john would have to shower him in my mothers restroom, John showered him , I walked in with the towel and I just  pushed the door behind me , as I was taking my son out of the shower, John turned to the toilet to pee and I could hear Sam calling me loudly and before I knew it she walked in on John with his sausage in his hand using my parent’s restroom, sam said very loudly and annoyed eww , can’t y’all fucking close the door and John snapped back and said can’t you fucking knock? I was in the middle of it once again , I was filled with emotions I had no clue what I felt but I just began to cry. 

Sam says that John is getting to comfortable because of the way john spoke to her in her own parents house, I told  Sam should have never the eww comment it was unnecessary, if she could of just said can’t y’all fucking close the door , it’s understandable, I explained the fact that I was the last person to walk in and I had no clue he was going to pee till I was already in the shower getting my son out. 

Also when I spoke to Sam about this yesterday she says the she never made a comment and she down played her reaction to walking into the restroom. That really made so upset because she went and told our brother that lives there (28 M) and my brother told Sam he’s never had an issue with John while has been over but that he would of kicked John out of the house for speaking to her like that in our parents home. That hurt me and i felt only one side was herd. 


",AmItheAsshole
 for disappearing after a student loan dispute with my parents? ,"For context: I graduated high school early and wanted to take a year to figure out what I wanted to do. I’d always planned for college, but waffled about my career. My parents, disagreed with this and pressed me to attend an expensive Christian university on the other side of the country.

I got a 30 on the ACT, worked through high school, and participated in every extracurricular but sports but barely received any financial aid/scholarships. I had no idea when I enrolled that it would be nearly 40k for just one year at this school, but my parents also took out a parent plus loan, and I was under the impression that it was to help me go to the school of their choice. I was unfortunately very passive to my own life decisions then. 

Now I’m 24. I dropped out of the program after a health crisis freshman year and later started to attend community college for my Gen Eds. Then, after working and volunteering for a few more years, I got my Bachelor’s in Nursing. I make 60K a year against an increasing COL in a Midwest metro area.

My parents know I’m struggling to pay bills, and I have my own student loans I took for nursing school to pay for, but they insist that I pay back the parent plus loan they took out for me. They’re telling me that I promised to pay them back. I distinctly remember it being presented as a gift. I can’t believe they’d lie, but I doubt even then I would’ve been okay with going to a school I hated with a price tag this high. 

It’s around $500 a month. I’m already paying just under $300 on my own loans. There’s just no way I can continue to do $800/month in loans on my income anymore. I missed a payment because I genuinely couldn’t swing it before my next paycheck, and they’ve now started to badger me the week before it’s due because it dinged their credit. I’ve started to distance myself from them because every month, as I try to pay this off, I just get more depressed and hopeless. I can’t even look at them without feeling cheated and betrayed. Am I wrong? This really sucks. ",AmItheAsshole
" For planning to go to my best friend’s wedding without my (38M) partner (36f), when my ex will be there?","I separated from my ex-wife 4 years ago. I have since started dating my new partner of 2 years - we share a ton of interests, have great chemistry and deep conversations and intellectual kinship.    
  
However she is very insecure and jealous, and has intense emotional reactions when triggered.  At times we could barely go out in public without her becoming upset because she thought I was checking out another woman, even though I had no idea who she was talking about.    
  
This has improved over time, but there is still a cycle of positive connection followed by her being triggered by what to me feels like nothing.  
  
Her insecurity comes down to not feeling “seen” enough in my life.  When we started dating, we were both going through divorce; we’ve since become much more open with friends, hanging out and even traveling together, though we haven’t gone as far as meeting family.   
  
Now, my best friend’s wedding is coming up, and he has asked me to perform the ceremony.  We met in college and they live outside the US, so it will be a destination wedding, with many old friends in attendance -- and since both he and his fiance are friends with my ex, she is invited as well.   
  
They don't know my partner, and it's unlikely she could attend as she is not a US citizen and getting a visa would be difficult.  Even if she did go, I am afraid that she would have an anxiety attack/jealous blowup and impact the festivities.   
  
I have absolutely no romantic intentions with my ex, and my partner knows and believes this. To her, though, having me go to this event with my friends, with my ex there, and my partner being left out is unacceptably painful.  It is a symbol to her that what we have isn’t real, and that I will be seen there with my ex and all my friends, without my partner as part of my life.   
  
I empathize with the pain this can cause - at the same time, I don’t think that my friend’s wedding should be used as a vehicle to resolve our relationship issues.  It’s not about us; it’s about them.    
  
My partner says this will be too much for her to bear, and that she needs me to change my plans or that she needs to break up and start emotionally distancing herself.   
  
She has stated that her basic need is to feel important, and that if I change plans because of her feelings, this will help her feel more validated.  But isn’t this a bad precedent to set?  

If this is her boundary, I will have to respect it; but I can’t help feeling that this ultimatum is unfair.  
  
It seems my options are:   


a) Break up and go ahead with the wedding as planned

b) Not go to the wedding in order to avoid the trauma/drama, sacrificing an important life milestone with a good friend

c) Compromise by only going for the 2 days of the wedding and come back immediately after, and telling my friends it’s because my partner is uncomfortable.   (this will involve changing international travel plans and mean missing out on time with my friends.)  
  
What do, reddit? ",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to help a friend with an embarrassing health problem?,"Hello everyone,

(sorry for the spelling mistakes, my english isn't perfect)

First of all, here's the background. I (21F) have known ""Marie"" (22F, pseudo of course) for 2 years, we're studying the same course at university and she's become a friend over time. We've been really close for 1 year now, to the point that since September 2023 we've decided to share a flat with 2 other mutual friends. The important thing in this story is that Marie has been having health problems for +/- 1 year and I've really been her confidante through all the stress of her diagnosis etc. It's been a while since she's had to deal with a diagnosis.

For some time now, she's been experiencing sudden dizziness, numbness in her legs for several 10s of minutes, etc. In short, she ended up having several medical imaging tests and learning that she unfortunately has multiple sclerosis. She told me as soon as she found out, and I did my best to support her.

Lately I've noticed that she seems stressed out and hardly ever goes out with our group of mutual friends anymore, each time having a reason to stay at home. I noticed this + the fact that she sometimes seemed very nervous recently, so I asked her if there was anything wrong...and she broke down crying, telling me that because of her problem she also had major bladder issues. I remembered a few moments recently when I saw her sometimes get up suddenly and run to the bathroom in a panic, and it really affected me to know that she had to deal with this on top of everything else. 

As the weeks went by, I saw her more and more withdrawn and visibly sad, and yesterday I asked her to come to the restaurant with our group. She was completely depressed and replied: ""I'd love to, but I can't because of what I told you, and I know I'm isolating myself and I'm going to lose my friends"".

It broke my heart to hear him say that. So, even though I knew that medically nothing could help her, I had this awkward word to say, thinking of a time in my life when I spent 2 weeks wearing diapers to school because of kidney stones. I said something like ""I've never told you about it, but I've had this kind of problem before, and even if it's not ideal, there are protections that at least allow you to live normally until it gets better"".

She burst into tears, opened her cupboard and showed me a pack of ""protections"" and said, ""I've already got some diapers, but they're for life in my situationand that doesn't stop me wanting to disappear when I have to use them. I know you want to help me and that's great of you, but I'm screwed, leave me alone and go and find people who aren't broken"".

I left and since then she hasn't spoken to me, hasn't replied to messages where I've apologized for my clumsy words.

TL;DR : my friend suffers from multiple sclerosis, and I tried to reassure her by sharing my experience with such issues...but it was awkward and she won't talk to me anymore.",AmItheAsshole
? Friends went with me after breakup.,"A few weeks back i (25M) broke up with my girlfriend (24F) of three years. It was though as hell as i still cared about her, but it just wasn't working out for several reasons. Although i don't miss her I still care about her and look back fondly on the time we spent together. 

Anyways, we share a bunch of friends and after the breakup they pretty much stopped hanging out with her. I never asked them to chose a side or stop spending time with her. But looking back i guess they were always closer to me than her. Thankfully she got other close friends to support her.

Ever since they stopped hanging out with her i felt extremely guilty. I feel like i fucked her over by robbing her of good friends and I just can't stop beating myself up about it. I'm driving myself crazy. The other day for example i met a bunch of the our shared friends, but I just couldn't enjoy their company because of all the guilt from her not being there.

How should i think about this?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my BF to grow out a mustache,"Edit: we agreed he’d let me paint his nails if I let him grow it out

I just want to start with I understand it’s his face and I shouldn’t be upset. I get it’s like if he said the same about my hair.

My Boyfriend(M19) told me (F19) that his friends are growing out mustaches and he is going to as well. I’ve been very open about my distaste in facial hair. It feels HORRIBLE when I try to kiss him and it irritates my skin and causes crazy acne when we cuddle. Aside from that I just do not like the look of it. It makes him look so so so much older and makes him look like a dad or something. Also my dad has facial hair so that’s another role in why I don’t like it. I understand it’s his face but we kind of have an agreement that we can veto certain things. Like I had been thinking about dying my hair crazy colors and he said he wouldn’t be into that so I didn’t. I feel like that’s fair? Am I wrong?

Am I a real asshole for not wanting him to go through with it? If so, how can I get over it? ",AmItheAsshole
?/ am i being unreasonable?,So I (F) is now in a 1 year relationship with my (M) I care about him a lot and do want to keep intimacy alive. As a current college student it is low final season. I have two pressing finals this Monday and I also took some medication that made me extremely sick today. I am wearing an oversized jacket and some leggings. My partner asked me to do my hair and put on something better because this weekend I have been a little bummy I can admit as I am also moving. The issue is I dress up for work everyday and I do put an effort on the weekends too but it just happens to be a stressful time for me. I am thinking am I a bad partner for not wanting to do these things when I am worried sick about my exams ? The exams will be done in a day so it is not med school or anything.,AmItheAsshole
" for not letting my 6'6"" brother have the free first class upgrade the airline gave me on our 12 hour flight?","Hello AITA--

We are at the beginning of my dad's retirement family trip. He is paying for all of us to meet as a family in Hawaii for a week since he is retiring after working at the same company for 42 years. There are six of us but my brother and I live in the same part of the country. 

I guess it's relevant to say I am 5'1"" and my brother is 6'6"". I fly all the time for work and have quite a bit of status with the airline for which my dad bought our tickets. 

This is what happened way earlier today. We were all boarded and ready to go when a flight attendant came up to me and whispered that they had a first class passenger not show up and they needed the coach seat to accommodate a standby passenger. She said I had by far the most status of anyone on the plane so they were willing to move me to first class for free. I was like oh yeah--and I took it in a heartbeat. I told my brother I'd see him in 12 hours and let me know if he wanted any food or drink and I grabbed my stuff and moved. Needless to say I had a nice flight. 

When we landed and were waiting for our shuttle my brother was so pissy but wouldn't tell me what was going on. He didn't speak to me the whole shuttle ride. We had a nice hello with the rest of the family but after I got down from my shower my mom took me aside and said what I did ""was awful."" I asked her what she was talking about and she said that I should have given my brother the seat. I thought that would be the end of it but all 5 of my siblings and my parents are upset with me and the vacation is off to a very rough start. 

I was trying to play with my niece and nephew in the lobby waiting for lunch and my sister said ""no they only like to play with people who give a shit about their family--what were you thinking?"" I asked her if this was about the first class thing and she said ""what do you think its about?"" I said that he never asked me to switch with him, she said ""an asshole makes people beg, family members don't.""

I've been by myself since brunch and not having much fun. AITA?

Edit: wow this totally blew up, thank you for commenting everyone. I only saw my family for a little but yesterday and they were still made at me to varying degrees. I have a really good friend that lives here in the military so she hung out with and we met some really fun and cute guys at a dive bar. So my vacation will be great no matter what. But reading your comments really gave me to confidence to not give a crap (or try to at least!) thank you.",AmItheAsshole
 for my response to a friend insisting I discuss their weight? ,"Weight loss stories can be inspiring, if I see before/after posts from people proudly sharing their journey I feel good for them. But I don’t judge either way. You be you at any size, it doesn’t occur to me and it won’t affect our friendship. 

I’m even uncomfortable coming up with neutral words for this discussion, so let’s say my friend (let's call her Daisy) was uh, average size? Unremarkable size? Maybe 5’5” 150?

Over a couple of years, Daisy gained a lot of weight. Her boyfriend confided in my girlfriend (Daisy’s best friend at the time) who then told me “the scale starts with a 3 now.” 

So what? Did I notice it happening? Yes. Did I care? No. Her weight affected nothing in our lives or relationship; we were the same friends doing the same activities as ever. 

Then she starts The Journey. She eats healthy. She exercises. She’s losing weight. She’s pumped, she’s proud. Good for her… but as with the gain, plus or minus 150 pounds never affected what we do or how we hang out. It’s not a part of how I see her or value her. 

One day she’s agitated. Upon being asked if everything is ok, she responds (approximately) “I’ve worked sooo hard to lose weight. I’ve lost over 100 pounds so far, and no one has said anything! No compliments, no congratulations, Nothing! This is a hard journey and a big deal! Why haven’t you commented on my weight loss?” Not giving it any deep thought, I said “I didn’t comment on your weight gain either, I don’t comment on your weight, period.”

Why would I dare comment on a woman's weight either way? But this seems to have literally ended our friendship.

",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my dad's parents to be a big part of my wedding,"So my dad's parents never were really grandparents or a big part of my life. In fact I get treated with the least amount of respect and love out of all the grandchildren. Growing up they never came to anything important and for birthdays it was whatever my cousin got and wasn't ever really something that interested me, so it just felt ingenuine. Everyone else got something they liked, just not me. They never really tried to develop a relationship with me, but they get offended whenever they aren't invited to anything and I think it hurts dad's feelings, even though he understands why. I plan on getting ties for all the important men in my life and the groomsmen, but not for dad's dad, and the mothers and my moms mom will have special colors, but not my dad's mom. My mom's dad will help walk me down the aisle along with my dad and mom and mom's mom, but dad's parents aren't going to be included. Should I include them even though they weren't ever really apart of my life? AITA",AmItheAsshole
 for flaking on my friend?,"I work a job that takes up the majority of my day from Monday through Friday. Typically 11-12 hours but if I’m lucky It will be 10 hours. Point is, obviously I’m not going to be going to bars and clubs on week days. It’s irresponsible.

Most of my friends are very understanding of my schedule, some even work in the same industry so they would never have any confusion.

I have this one friend in particular, he mentioned several weeks ago that he wanted to go out for drinks. I told him we could that Saturday night, but then a couple days after I made that plan I got invited to a surprise baby shower for that Saturday morning. It was about an hour away. I told him we could possibly still go out that night but after being there for so long it tired me out so I had to cancel.

Flash to this week, he asked if I wanted to go out this weekend. I told him I most likely could. Then I got asked by my one of brothers if I could let his kids spend the night at my place. (Him and his wife had something come up) So I ended up canceling on my friend again. 

He’s taking it extremely personal. He mentioned that he saw me post an IG story at the gym with my brother that week as well as a picture at dinner with my husband. (During weekdays) so he feels like I clearly have more time than I’m saying I have. But I do not hangout on weekdays. I want to hangout with my friends as much as I can obviously, but when I’m on a production(I work in film) it’s very complicated. I’ve also explained that I only have a couple more months of this show and then I’m taking a break.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend the truth?,"So me and my friend were texting ( she  initiated the conversation) she sent me a picture of a donkey and said “How did the find a picture of you?” I took was as a joke so i joked back and sent a picture of levi (the fat anime one) and said “this u?”. A couple minutes later, She called me and went “How dare you! You know im insecure!”
Stuff like this had been happening for months. 7/10 times during our conversation, she would insult me for no reason. My laugh, teeth, forehead, skin color, legs, and glasses were her main targets. But whenever i insulted her back, she would get mad and defensive, which happened just now. This begs the question, am i the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying something to my roommate whose boyfriend stays for multiple days out of the week and comes and goes as he wishes? ,"So,
Me and my roommates (24 Fs) live together since we are in grad school. One of my roommates recently got a new boyfriend (28 M) within the past couple months. He’s a nice guy, but me and my other roommate don’t really know him. 

To preface, me and my other roommate have our boyfriends over whenever we spare time. Me and my boyfriend are long distance and he is also in graduate school- so it’s probably every couple of months we see eachother.

Anyways, her and her boyfriend spend the entire weekend together. She began by asking the first time if he could come over to our apartment, in which he stayed for 3 nights.  But, now he’s been here for the past 5 weeks- 3 days out of the week. She no longer asks. He stays here, eats here, showers here, etc. He goes out while she stays here and comes back at late hours in the night, like 1:30 am. She also gave him our key once to lock up since we all had a appointment to get to, and didn’t tell us until we left for our appointment. Before coming back super late, I told her I do not want him to come back late and she agreed. However, she gets pretty salty if you say anything to her , from previous experiences.

AITA if I say something to her regarding this? If he’s going to be staying here this much because of some odd reason, I would have wanted to know before. But now it feels like we are in too deep in the issue for me to even say anything. I feel pretty disrespected and everything’s out of control. 

Thank you in advance ! ",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving the pool?,"Throwaway 

I (16f) went to the pool with my father (46m) and my brother (13m). When we got there, I realised I forgot my goggles, I told my father and he got very angry, calling me selfish, so I decided I would call my mother to collect me from the pool.

I called her, then my father came out, arguing with me and saying I should just stay at the pool, but my mother agreed to collect me. He's still very annoyed with me, I know it wasn't a wise decision and I know I'm not fully right in this situation, but I decided to get some unbiased feedback on here. AITA?

Edit: I forgot to mention these are prescription goggles 

Edit 2: I wrote this in a rush while I was still at the pool, so I left out some context. I thought my goggles would be in my packed bag as I have left them there for a long time, we looked for them but we may have to get a new pair,  17 is the legal driving age in my country so I couldn't drive and since we live a 30 minutes drive I couldn't walk home and all my grandparents are too sick or busy to drive at the moment (2 of them can't) and all my aunts and uncles and cousins were too busy. I may still be wrong in this situation but I decided to add more context so I'm sorry ",AmItheAsshole
" for calling out a local ""artist"" and shop for selling dollar store art that they painted over a little?","I called out a local shop on Facebook for selling ""100%"" original painting for $200+. The artist wishes to remain anonymous and sells their art through a local yuppie art/antique store downtown. Every single piece of this persons art is literally dollar store canvas art that they painted the back ground a different color and the person, animal or object a different color. 

One piece sold and someone commented that they would have bought it and we're sad that its sold.. I commented that they just need to go to the dollar store and buy the print and paint well they are there and make there own.

The shop deleted my comment and someone that claims they work there sent me a private message saying that I'm crossing the line and that they will sue me if I keep it up. Then they kept going on about how I'm an a hole for not supporting a local artist and that I'm ruining their business before I blocked them. 

I just think it's kinda scummy to claim it's 100% original art work when it's clearly not and is just up cycled repainted dollar store art. I'd be mad if I spent that much money thinking it's an original piece only to find out it's just from the dollar store and they scribble some paint on it. 
  
And it's not like the creative stuff that's popular online where the artist buys an old thrift store painting and adds a pop culture character to it and resells because at least you know that they up cycled it and don't claim it's all their original art. 
 
Am I wrong? Is it really considered 100% original art work? I'm autistic so I usually have trouble with people taking what Ive said as something other than how I've ment it so I'm not sure if it's something to do with that. 




",AmItheAsshole
 for being upset that my ex introduced our son to her new partner after less than 3 months,"My ex and I (both F30s) split up at the start of Feb after nearly 15 years together, her decision. We have a nearly 4 year old son. Although I've explaindd to him as best you cam a child of his age, he still asks about when I am coming home. 

I found out today from our son that my ex took him away to stay at her new partners home. 
If I am to believe her, she didn't know him prior to Feb which means she introduced and had our son stay at a person's house she has known for less than 3 months. During which time she has only spent time with him on weekends as they live over 3 hours away. 
Her choice in friends leaves a lot to be desired in my view given their drug and alcohol use. 
She can't understand why I'm not at all happy she took him there, AITA for being upset about her taking our son there?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband that he is not a Chef,"My husband and I got into a stupid argument yesterday about going to a high-end restaurant. This restaurant is literally right around the corner from our house and they host James Beard nominees and awardees. I was getting a little sad about not being able to try it out yet since we are not that far away and we are moving soon. This triggered the argument. 

My husband literally said (and believe) that he is a Chef and we can get high quality ingredients and cook similar to the ways that they may cook at the restaurant. I told him absolutely not...we are not Chefs. He told me that he is a Chef. I told him he is NOT a Chef. Does he like to cook? Yes...Can he cook? Debatable. He added chicken to water to boil it and seasoned the water not the chicken and not with fresh aromtic herbs and vegetables....dried spices. You decide. 

He truly believes that he is a Chef and I am trying to tell him that he is not a professionally-trained individual who learned techniques and skills in cooking to say that he is a Chef. 

My purpose is to level set (and maybe go to this restaurant before we leave the area), but my husband is truly convinced that he is a Chef to the point that he wants to argue his point. Should I feed into his delusion to be an agreeable wife or should I stay steadfast in the truth? Please note that he has other amazing strengths that I give him props, but this is not one of them. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my grandmother to my graduation?,"So this story is kind of long but I’ll try to keep it short. 
  I (17f) am graduating soon and couldn’t be more excited for it. As most graduation ceremonies go you are allowed to invite those who would like to watch you walk for the ceremony and my grandmother was on the list until some of her actions made me rethink it. 
   For context she used to live in a low income apartments until her landlord told her she needed to move out since she was making more money and had no more need to live in those apartments.  Since she was making more money you’d think she would go and get a nicer place but no she decides to stay in a motel which is more expensive than actually getting another apartment. She stays in the motel and accuses me and my family of being cruel for not helping her find a place when we live 5 hours away from her and there is no room at our place for her stay. And it’s not like I can buy her a whole house when I’m only 17.
   My mother had tried to talk to her about it but my grandmother refuses to reason with her. She would text me directly accusing me of being a terrible granddaughter and being selfish. She would do this even when I was at work so I had to block her number as it was affecting my life. She even accused me to my mother that I had smoked pot and that she had proof. (I have never in my life touched pot and I have no idea why she would even accuse me of something like this.) After a while my grandmother texted me through my cousins phone saying “We will be at your graduation but if your mom wants to start drama then so be it.”
    I didn’t reply but my mother and I both agreed that if she is going to be angry and cause fights at my graduation that I don’t want her to come and spoil an important day for me. Since then she has constantly been telling me what an AH I have been. 

So AITA?
    ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for a photo of the accommodations?,"Okay, so me (M33) and my wife (F31) were planning to attend my family reunion (dad’s side that happens every 5 years or so) at the invitation of my dad. He wanted me and my brothers all to attend this year, so we obliged. When it came time to talk about accommodations, my dad said we would be able to stay in a camper parked on the property for free (my brother and his wife, my dad and his wife, and my other brother were both staying in rooms inside the house).  

Now for background, I’m very outdoorsy and wouldn’t have minded sleeping in a tent, but my wife is the opposite and is not a fan of camping at all, and has actually never been. The reunion was also happening during her birthday/birthday weekend. In order to make her feel more comfortable, I asked my dad if we could get a photo of the camper, as my wife didn’t even know what one looked like. Another piece of background, my wife was concerned about the bathroom situation in the camper because she has stomach issues and wanted to have one close by if possible, especially if she had to go in the middle of the night.

 So, when I asked my dad for a photo of what we would be staying in, he was offended, saying we should just be happy we have a place to stay for free, since this was more of a family obligation than a vacation. Also important to note that we were the family members traveling from out of state for this, along with my brothers. AITA for asking for a photo to try and put my wife at ease?",AmItheAsshole
 for trying not to tip the Valet ,"I went to a restaurant last night that has complimentary valet parking (meaning that they have no self parking available and it’s all valet). I had never been here before and didn’t know this. I also arrived by myself and being a girl, did not want to park farther away and have to walk far alone at night to the restaurant. 

When we were leaving, two of my friends rode with me to our next destination. I told them I didn’t have cash on me and that i had some buried in my car that I would have to dig for when I got in. I asked if it would be rude of me to just not tip the guy this time. They both said no and we all noted how we could see the guy going only about 10/15 feet away from the font of the restaurant to get my car because it was parked right by the front. 

Well once I am walking to get into my car, and I hadn’t even put my butt in my seat yet, the man goes “so will you be using cash app or Venmo?” I was pretty shocked… I responded by saying “how much is it?” (knowing that it was free valet). He told me it was just for tips. So I started digging for my cash that I had in my car. I was annoyed at this guy’s audacity at this point so I just grabbed $1 and held it out to him. To which he looks at it and goes “oh.” And he tries to push it back towards me. I just sat there holding it out and staring at him until he took it and I left. 

This interaction left a bad taste in my mouth. I thought that the guy handled it very poorly but that I also could’ve just tipped in the first place. I hadn’t fully decided not to yet but when he saw me without money in my had and asks me before I even get in my car how I will be tipping him, it really irked me. Was that inappropriate of him? Was it rude on my part? For context, I work in a restaurant as a waitress so I obviously respect tipping but I feel like this is different… I can elaborate on my reasons for thinking this in the comments is anyone would like me to. 

Elaborating : tipping a server at a restaurant vs. a valet is different to me because of the service that is provided. You are spending most likely an hour or so in my section at a restaurant. I am bringing you everything that you need to ensure that you enjoy your experience during that hour. I am also paying tip out to the other staff on the bill. (Look that up if you don’t understand how that works). Tipping a server at a restaurant is also as a “reward” to a job well done. If I gave you good service during your visit, you leave a good tip. If I didn’t give you good service, you leave a bad tip. The hope of getting a good tip is why I am going to try my best at every table to give them the best experience possible. There are times when I don’t get tipped or I get tipped poorly. Of course this is upsetting, but I would never follow a table out the door and ask if they’re going to be tipping me by Venmo or cash app then. Someone pulling my car around only warrants a couple bucks in my opinion. The reason I pulled out only $1 is because of this guy’s entitlement. That really is the whole principle of the issue imo. I can accept that it’s a dick move on my part and I won’t try to not tip a valet in the future, trust me I’ve learned now lol, but he was an asshole to ask me to stand there outside of my car and a pull out my phone to give him $5 for pulling my car around? The only words he ever spoke to me were “cash app or Venmo”. He didn’t even attempt to help in or out of my car during the experience and like I said, I hadn’t even gotten back into my vehicle before he is asking me for his tip. He was an asshole for that, so I was an asshole back with my $1 tip to him. But I don’t think attitude like that for poor service needed to be rewarded with a $5 tip amount. That’s why I gave him $1. Tipping culture is out of hand, as someone who works in an industry that is based on tips. All of this bullshit is ruining it for us. Tipping is a reward for good service and hard work. It shouldn’t be expected. I know when I am not the best server to my tables and don’t expect a 20% tip in exchange for the job that I did. I also know when I do a job worth 20% and don’t get that. It sucks but I move on. I don’t have the same entitled attitude as this guy. 

Anyway, thanks for the feedback. I should’ve asked my friends for their cash so that I could have given him something off the bat. I can accept being the asshole there. I also appreciate those who agree that the man working acted entitled and unprofessional. ",AmItheAsshole
H for not offering help to my fiance?,"I (21m) and my fiance (20f) have been together for 3 years. We met through social media and I moved in with them, let's call them Mary. Mary has always been there for me and I have been there for them, but the past few months, I feel like I am just someone to put the blame on. Like, I can't even show any emotion to them otherwise I'm the bad guy. So when Mary is stressed I used to offer things to distress them and keep them happy but recently its not been working and they just throw it in my face, so I've stopped offering help but no, I'm the bad guy for not helping when all I do is when they're here or not, is clean, do things to help around the house. Baring in mind, I am autistic and normal things is a massive task to me and I have a crutch to help me move. So, AITAH for slowly not offering help when all it does is making me the bad guy either way?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my in-laws see my children every weekend?,"My wife (36) and I (29) have 1 year old twin boys and my in-laws have been very involved since day 1. They lived at my house for 3 months last year helping out and stayed over every weekend last summer. And now are over every weekend (just one day at least). And at least 2-3 FaceTimes a week with the boys as well as almost nightly phone calls with my wife about the boys. AND a shared photo album app where we upload pictures of the boys and they all comment on them. And if they miss a week, yk for certain they’ll be over the next weekend. 

My in-laws also don’t listen to us when it comes to handling our kids. We have certain ways we want to feed/raise/play with them and they do not listen to us when we tell them to stop doing this or don’t do that. “I’m the grandma I get to do whatever I want and it always is with good intentions and that’s all that matters”.  So when they’re over, it’s not exactly a stress-free environment.

So when they recently did not come over on a weekend because my wife said that she didn’t want them over I thought maybe we could work towards maybe less time with them coming over. The last time we went more than one weekend not seeing them was when they were away this past October. Otherwise, it’s been just about every weekend or every other weekend since late 2022. 

I told my wife that I am feeling overwhelmed, uncomfortable and suffocated by how often her parents are over and I wish we could cut down on their visits to maybe once a month or at least not so rigidly scheduled. She did not like that and got mad at me. She said that her parents not going to be around forever and it’s important for the boys to have a relationship with their grandparents. I clarified for her that it’s not that I don’t want her parents in my children’s life. I just want some “alone” time with my wife &amp; kids and maybe see my side of the family.

My wife is very close with her family. If I’m being honest, I think a little too close. But
I don’t think I’m being unreasonable.

AITA for asking for less frequent visits from grandparents (down to maybe once a month).

",AmItheAsshole
 for calling out people in a friend group?,"Here are the contenders (you might recognize them)

Rein-Fiancé of Oil

Oil-Fiancé of Rein

OP- Yours truly

Some context

I have been a part of a friend group for about 6 years and I recently introduced my sister to the group and Oil proposed to Rein since then Oil and Rein have changed Rein and my sister had several disagreements and Oil backed Rein I tried to talk to Oil but he went off on me when I said Rein pulled a bitch move by telling my sister she would she if she could fit her in her schedule when she wanted to talk.

After a couple of months of this my sister decided to leave the group and I decided to stop holding my tounge on this situation and I spoke up saying how Rein and Oil cannot just decide to kick someone out of the group because of how they feel. (which they have tried with my sister.)  After this Rein Oil and two of their friends went off on me so i responded which eventually lead to them kicking me from the group server and thus out of the group. In dms with Oil he insulted me several times and told me ""Go talk to a fucking therapist.""

A little while ago Oil wanted to set up a time and place to talk so we did and during our talk He apologized for bringing up the time I stormed out during a card game (I have depression and anxiety and they were going off that day.) When I tried to speak he interrupted me and told me he wants me to respect him (I didn't insult him) and to respect his fiancé as I called her a bitch (I called her moves bitchy) I laughed when he said that and went to say I never called Rein a bitch to which he said I never said you did to which i respond with ""You literally just  said"" and then he hung up on me.

So I don't think I'm in the wrong here and me and Oils friend ship is hanging by a thread AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for being physically upset (frowning),"Some background information that will make sense later: -I was in charge of handling lawyers issues for my dad
 -I kept not replying to my friend with a definite yes or no cause I had to deal with my dads personal issues first for my mom -My mom lacks patience (she can’t wait more than 1 day for things) 
This story goes back to about over a year ago. So less than a year ago I lost my dad suddenly and was (still am) in the grieving stages that he is gone. One of my closest friends at the time offered to take me on a vacation this year (covering my cost) as a vacation for herself and myself. Fast forward to now we have basically 99% sealed the deal for the vacation and just needed to pay for the fees when my friend just asked a simple question of: “is it -airplane company-?” I told my mom and she immediately said “cancel the trip”. My mom is very superstitious and when she is anxious, nearby people can sense it by her reaction to things/responses becomes aggravated. I got into an argument with her about it not being a big deal but she vehemently kept telling me to cancel the trip (even going as far as bringing up the loss of my dad, the loss of a friend during c*vid -all not involving planes) she said it is a bad omen and to ask anybody and they would agree not to go (anybody being: my very paranoid relative and a friend of hers that believes Feng Shui) after using those examples she goes “do what you want” However, after saying such a thing, she will continue to barrage with superstitions that happened every few days and try to tell me not to go. Because it hasn’t been that long since my dad passed, and constant pressuring from my mom not to go, I said “I won’t go” but doesn’t mean I was happy about this. (It’s like giving you the option of “go but you will be told constantly it was the wrong choice and make her paranoia constantly there or not go and feel disappointed but she will be satisfied”) I was angry and upset. I screamed into my pillow, ripped paper in my room and was just physically upset(2 days). My mom would say “I have no right to be upset like this since I made this choice”. This rarely (happened once years ago) happens where I get this physically upset and I feel it is a mix of my grief, stress, frustration and disappointment colliding all at once and I told her “just let me be upset like this for a few days” because this is my way to release and vent the emotion. (It was too late in the evening to go for a jog when it occurred or go to a boxing club to take out my anger) She then goes arguing that “I never considered her feelings and hardships”. That I have no right to show I am upset because life isn’t fair. I purposely tried not to interact with her during that time because I knew that my anger would spike but during the instances when we pass each other, I was just frowning. No interaction, no jabs at her—just frowning. So am I the asshole for being physically this upset?",AmItheAsshole
 If I didn't share details of my pregnancy with my mum?,"Sorry for long post. I'm a 36F and don't have a good relationship with my mum. I recently finished therapy and they confirmed that my mum was my 1st abuser.
When I found out I was pregnant, my partner and me decided to wait to tell our family and friend as our last pregnancy sadly ended in a miscarrage. I told my family about a week ago and everyone was happy.
Recently my mum called me and I shared with her, I was having food cravings of Pineapple and Wheatabix. She came out with the old wives story that I was having a girl because I'm wanting savoury food. I told her that the midwife had said it is based on what my body needs. She dismissed this medical opinion and said she had proof as she had cheese when pregnant with me and my sisters. 
This did grate on my nerves as she often does this, dismisses all information and refuses to listen any opinion I have on a a subject if I haven't had first had knowledge/experience. This is normal for my mum, which is very toxic behaviour.
I decided to press on with call in a hope to end quickly and continue with making dinner. 
She then said she had picked up some wool. My friend's mum had already kindly asked me if she could make a knitted blanket. I really apperciated this and expressed it was kind of her. With this in mind I thought my mum had decided to make something for her grandchild (she doesn't know about my friend's mum offer) so I asked if she was planning to make something for grandchild and she said No. She had found out a friend was pregnant and was making something for her. 
*This really hurt me* I don't live close to her and I thought this was her way of helping out and showing support. She didn't even offer to make me something after something for her friend. I ended the call very quickly and talked how I felt about her actions with my partner.
I said I didn't want to share anymore with her now. I just felt it will upset and stress me out, something that could be bad for me. My partner agrees and supports my choice.

But I always feel horrible pushing my mum away. However some thing she says and does just hurt me.

So would I be the Asshole to not share pregnancy details with my mum(to avoid being emotionally hurt)? ",AmItheAsshole
H for not wanting my boyfriend to hang out or talk with one of his childhood female friends who he had also dated in the past?,"So my boyfriend (19m) of 4 years off and on and me (f18) have been together for 1 full year and 2 months. Before we were off and on all of high school. The first time freshman year we got together he broke up with me too fool around with another girl (who was ""just a friend""), then got back together with me before telling me about the other girl which you probably know how that ended. A year (sophomore year)after that we got back together I ended up helping him cheat on his (at the time) current girlfriend without knowing it and found out about it afterwards. And then senior year we got back together and things were a lot different. He changed a lot got more mature and stopped fooling around with other people. 

We were dating for about 4 months and I ended up getting kicked out of my parents house because of school and went and lived with him and his sister. I had trust issues in the beginning because of the past and slowly we built that trust and now I trust him 99%. We ended up getting our own place and we have a great relationship. He recently brought up how he started talking to his childhood bestfriend who I will call Hannah. 

He had told me about Hannah before hand how they dated when they were younger but it didn't last very long. And the reason I'm very hesitant on this is because last time he talked to her I was on the phone with him back when we first got together senior year; and he completely ignored me and kept talking to her. And our friends don't like her either. I told him I didn't like the fact that he was talking to her and really didn't want him to. He swore up and down that he doesn't like her. So I hesitantly agreed and told him there will be boundries. She's not allowed at our house, he is not allowed to hang out with her alone or without me.

 I sometimes will check their messages just to make sure. He agreed with me and I really do appreciate it but I feel like l'm being toxic and unnecessary. Sometimes there is a small part of me that worries. I do trust him. And sometimes I get iffy when it comes to other girls around him but I try not to go overboard because I love him i our relationship.

Am I being unnecessary and toxic?",AmItheAsshole
 for being petty/mad that I wanted to go home early,"My boyfriend 23M and I 23F have been together for about 2 years. 

I have recently started to make my friends. But most of my past friendships came about through him. Usually, it's another couple and we all become friends. 

A couple that we are friends with invited us to a party. I wasn't going to attend because I had to work the day of and thought I would be drained. I ended up going with him as a DD. We planned ahead of time that we would not stay long, so about 2 hours. I also had to work early the next day. I wanted to go and he wanted me to come, rather than him going alone. 

So we get to the party, the first ones there around 7:20 pm. Per the invite the party started at 6 pm, we let them know I would be late because of work. Other people start to show up around 8:30-9 pm (very late). So he asked what time we would be leaving because he was “worried about me” since I had to work in the morning. I decided 10 pm would be good. So 10 starts to creep up and he doesn't seem like he wants to leave. So he begins to joke that we are about to leave and his friends say come back (after he takes me home). He says yeah I'll come back sarcastically and then says to me  “I'm not coming back I'm sleeping with my woman tonight” (loud enough for others to hear). 

They convince him to let me leave and Uber home later. He walks me out asking if this is okay &amp; what I want him to do. I let him decide
 to stay or come home on his own. I didn't want him to feel guilty about staying and having fun but at the same time, I had hoped he chose to come home. He didn't, he stayed and I drove home alone. Before I left he said I'll be there later to go to bed with you. I get home and go to bed. 

AITA for being mad that he chose to stay. Or should I suck it up buttercup?! ",AmItheAsshole
 for stepping over my friend in an escape game during a holiday,"Hello, this is my first time here, I (21F) and two of my friends Amanda (20F) and Sarah (20F) went to an escape game during the holidays in April. Note that it's our sixth escape game, and we are used to it, but usually, we avoid doing horror escape games due to my very sensitive soul. 
Nonetheless, we decided to do an escape game in a cave (It's spooky, but mostly thriller). We did our things, and it went smoothly until the last level of the escape game, where we had to go through a small passage where everything turned black, and I really felt scared, so I rushed through the passage walking over my friend Amanda (i didn’t walk over her literally speaking, but it was mostly I passed through her pushing her behind), I didn't think right and I felt really bad after it, I tried talking it over once we finished the game but she would refuse to speak to me or answer me even in a public setting (after the escape game we went to a caffe where she wouldnt even look at me). Three weeks have passed, and because of my end of the year exams, I couldn't apologise properly. I sent her a message 4 days ago, and she refuses to answer me at all. I asked our comun friend Sarah to tell her to answer me but she replied to her saying she won't answer me and that I could have apologised in my exam because and i quote ""its just one sentence and could be done anytime"", but mind you that my last exams took all my focus, time and energy that i didnt even speak to my parents. I just wish for her to answer me or at least to make it clear that she won't forgive me (it's giving me an additional stress because we've been friend for 8 years and i don't want our friendship to end beacause of a small mistake i did because of my fears). 
Note that I'm always the one to apologise first in any problems that arised between us because someone has to make the first step. 
Thank you for reading till the end and sorry for the grammar and spelling mistakes.",AmItheAsshole
 for saying my mom has trashed the car they bought for me?,"My parents bought me the very generous gift of a suburu back in 2015 when I started driving. I love it. Nice little 2014 suburu legacy that can i have been told Can go up to 300,000 miles. 
So the drama started when I moved countries. I’ve been living out of the United States for 4 years now and after my moms car broke she started using mine. Fine, not a problem for me she drives it regularly and keeps it running while never taking it far so I thought she was a great person to keep it running. Well whenever I visit it looks worse and worse.  Now there are two vomit stains in the back, trash everywhere… drink trays are sticky. It’s gross. When I say I would like her to take care of it I’m ignored. So… it’s technically purchased by my dad but amitheasshole for this? I have been told if I come back to the US that it will still be my car.  ",AmItheAsshole
 for getting annoyed at my girlfriend locking me out repeatedly?,"When we’re outside she’ll go inside and absent-mindedly lock the door behind her, leaving me locked outside. It’s happened at least 50 times. Usually she’s inside and can unlock the door but sometimes she has left for work leaving me locked outside wet after a swim for example. 

Today it happened twice and I was really annoyed about it. She says she has no control over it so it’s not fair that I am annoyed. AITA?

Also, it’s a screen door, there’s no key for it, just a switch thing so I can’t keep a spare out there.",AmItheAsshole
 for “flaking” on my friend’s birthday trip and other events?,"So I (22f) have a friend (22f) that I’ve known for years. I would say that she’s one of my best friends. She is the friend I normally do events with, like concerts and festivals, or clubbing. We also have sleepovers and do chill things, and I always have a wonderful time with her. 

My financial situation is not the best right now, and she has offered numerous times in the past to either front me the money for something for us to do together, or just pay for it herself straight out. I accepted a few times, but in the past 6 months I have been saying no to pretty much everything that costs more than ~$50. I didn’t want to take advantage and I knew I could not afford it.  My friend has a very steady income and can afford these things, and I am still trying to find my footing in my career, so our financial caps are very different. I cannot afford such a large expense. 

The issue is this: She let me know her birthday plans back in November, and let me know that we would be traveling in mid February. I said it sounded fun and I would do everything in my power to be there. She offered to pay for my plane ticket straight out and said that I could pay her back in consecutive payments. I initially agreed because I genuinely thought my financial situation would improve within that four months period. By early January, I knew I could not afford it and let her know immediately. I asked her if she could refund my ticket and she said that it was extremely last minute and there was little chance of a refund. I apologized at the time and offered to try and resale the ticket myself, and pay for whatever was left over if need be, but that I could not attend and maybe someone else could use the ticket. She refused and said her brother would handle it. 

I tried to reach out so we could talk a few times and she pretty much disengaged every time. I left her alone until yesterday, when she texted me a long paragraph about how I am a flakey friend and provided numerous examples including: cancelling on her last minute and leaving her to figure out the plane ticket expense by herself, not showing up to the club for a night out, “forgetting” we had plans in the first place, etc. I apologized for upsetting her but stood by the fact that I had let her know my situation numerous times and expecting me to make it happen anyways is unfair. She accepted my apology but did not engage with me past that. AITA? 

Edit: I might be the AH because I have cancelled on her a few times, but only ever when I cannot afford it. I am always available for low cost plans, like sleepovers, picnics, game night, etc. ",AmItheAsshole
" for refusing to play ""brother of the bride"" to a cousin I barely know?","I'm (27M) the classic family nerd – the one always glued to a computer rather than socializing. My cousin (26F) is getting married soon, and her family expects a heartwarming brother-of-the-bride performance from me. The problem? We've always been more like oil and water.

Her sisters – the picture-perfect, outgoing, popular girls – made sure I knew how different I was. Sly digs about my tech obsession, mocking my interests… those forced family gatherings were brutal. My cousin herself has never reached out except to ask for favors. She didn't even bother to check on me when I battled dengue in 2019 or when I had COVID in 2020.

To make matters worse, my aunt (the bride's mom) and her husband have a history of disrespecting my grandfather (now deceased). It caused major rifts in our family.

Now they want me to walk my cousin down the aisle, give a phony sentimental speech, and pretend we have this amazing sibling bond?  It feels like a complete betrayal of myself and my grandfather's memory.

Here's the extra drama: my cousin's fiancé seems like a genuinely nice guy. I feel awful ruining his picture of a happy, united family. But on the other hand, maybe this wedding is the moment for a little dose of reality.

I'm seriously considering two options:

1. Suck it up, smile through the charade, and try not to cringe at the thought of my fake brotherly speech.

2. Disappear completely – leave them scrambling and send my mom to deal with the fallout.

WIBTA wanting to ditch this whole wedding and the toxic family dynamics that come with it?",AmItheAsshole
 for avoiding my ex for 3 years ,"I (m25) dated my ex for 8 months. It began during Covid and I would be lying if being incredibly lonely during this time did not impact how many red flags I was willing to ignore. 
We met in my small university town which was a long way from my hometown (7 hours drive), this is relevant later. She was not a student but a local who was training in an apprenticeship for her job. 
During our time dating things became incredibly toxic and problematic. This began after I moved back to my hometown. She would demand that we FaceTimed every night before bed and when I said I was busy she would make me feel like a dick for not giving her my time. She obsessed over my attention as she had been very poorly treated by people in the past, in particular her family, for bing transgender. I believe I was her first real real relationship rather than a man simply fetishising her. 
As well as the demand of my time she would also frequently hint at needing money. I was working a minimum wage job fresh out of college at this point but I would usually succumb and lend her money. This became a real issue for me when I realised we had to break up as she still owed me around $1000 which was a lot at the time. However, she was beginning to have a very bad affect on my mental health and so I realised we had to break up. However before I could do it she broke up with me by text while I was at work one day. I was sent home as I didn’t really know what to do. But a week later she messaged me asking to get back together and foolishly I agreed. We got back together and broke up again 4/5 times over the next 5 months.
Until eventually keeping it all a secret (as my family hated her for breaking up with me) and her treatment of me I couldn’t do it anymore. So I told her we had to spend a week not talking for my mental well-being and if I felt better after that time I would text her. 
But I saw my chance and blocked her on everything. 
After that she went quiet for a while. But after a month or two she began what has now been a tirade of attempts to contact me for 3 years. 
1. She would withhold her number and call me 40-50 times usually around 12-2am
2. She would make new social media accounts to get in contact. 
3. She sent a cash app request for $69 asking to call her (this one did make me laugh)
4. She would take the train (7 hours) to where I lived and try to come to my work and home. 
5. Send me emails/use friends phones etc you get the idea. 

However I persisted in ignoring all this and refrain from being active online under my real name. But it still persists. 
I have recently moved countries and use a chat app that is only used in that country. And yesterday she somehow managed to find my account. 
However, this made me wonder if maybe I’m the asshole for never replying. And would this all go away if I’d just messaged back after a week saying things wouldn’t work out? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not introducing my fiance to my parents sooner?,"My fiancé and I have been together for 4 years, my siblings have met him but my parents have not. I got divorced a long time ago and my parents were awful to me about it, it was the worst time of my life. 

My ex was cheating a doing a lot behind my back to not get too much into detail he gave me extreme anxiety and I was afraid to go home most nights. Our marriage was only a year, because I was unsafe. The divorce needed to happen but at the same time I have never been so hurt and so lonely when it did. I lost all of my friends because they were all his friends, he took most of my money without me noticing and when I tried to fight that he said his rich parents would pay for a lawyer and he knew my parents would never help me and because he took my money “I can’t afford it”. So I let it go. 

When I told my parents I was getting divorced they were furious. They were so ashamed and kept on saying how shameful this is and what are people going to think of them (never did they ask what I was going through) and how embarrassed they are of me. They also explicitly said they don’t want to meet any new man until I was engaged. They cared more about what they would look like rather than what I was going through. 

This was the worst time in my life because not only did I lose someone I thought I would be with forever, my parents were now no longer talking to me because of it. I found out about a year ago that my mom never told her siblings I got divorced and she has pretended for yearsss that I was still happily married, all because she is ashamed. They found out recently I was divorced because of my wedding invite. 

Fast forward 8 years, I am now happily engaged to the love of my life. We have lived together for 3 years and we get along so well, we never fight besides the usual bickers, he is my twin flame and just my perfect match and I am sooo excited to have my real dream wedding and be so happy with him. I honestly don’t even remember my last wedding because it was so traumatic so this is truly the wedding where I want my little girl dreams to come true. 

Anyways, when I got engaged my mom said she was happy for me and my sister said she was ranting about how she hasn’t even met this person. I was planning on flying out for the whole family to meet him (we have lived in different states for about 10 years) but at the same time, I don’t really care about their opinion. They can come if they want but how they treated me after my divorce really hurt our relationship and I have no interest in their opinions. My sister thinks I need to give them a chance and let them try again, which I’m happy to do but I don’t want to inconvenience myself for it, we’ll be there for a family event in July and I was thinking of just introducing him at the same time. 

AITA for not caring to go out of my way for them to get to know my fiance or for not involving them in our wedding planning/caring about their opinion? Should I be giving them another chance?  ",AmItheAsshole
 for not calling my brother a relative?,"Me and the wife were talking last night and she mentioned how she saw someone post that once you have your own family your previous family becomes relatives. I said that sounds weird to me, to call my brother a relative and not family. My wife said that means that our family isn't a priority if I can't consider my brother a relative. I was completely thrown off and said it's just titles of course my family with her is my priority. She did not budge and insisted that ours is not a priority for me. That pissed me off, to accuse me of not prioritizing my family over some stupid titles. This morning we still haven't talked so I wanted some outside opinions.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to add my spouse onto my accounts/deed,"I am divorced and newly married but during my single time between marriages I opened up bank accounts and bought a house. My new spouse has made several comments about wanting to be added to the title on the house and joining bank accounts. I don’t really see the need in doing either as I don’t ask her to pay the mortgage or any other bills related to the house. 

We have had several disagreements about it and I’m wondering if this something that is a problem for other relationships and advice on how to go about this. I had joint accounts with my ex but we shared in paying bills especially since we were young and depended on each other to make ends meet but I make significantly more than my new wife so it’s never been an issue for me to just pay all the bills so I’ve never felt the need to join accounts. Am in the wrong here?",AmItheAsshole
 for starting a fight with my brother over his driving?,"Long story short is that I went on a hike with my bro and Mum yesterday, he drove us there in his ute and on the way back we got caught behind a car doing the speed limit on a windy back road with no road markings.

Now my bro is fairly heavy footed behind the wheel at the best of times though i never see it as an issue worth critiquing, however, on this occassion he was tailgating the car in front dangerously close and feeling like we were being put at risk I said to him ""there is no reason for you to be riding this guys ass like this dude"" his retort was to say ""you don't get to tell me how to drive in my car"" to which I responded something like ""nah, I'm standing my ground here, you are putting us and the people in front at risk for literally no reason, just hang back man, driving isn't a game"" he got pissed at this point and got even closer to the car in front to prove a point or some shit, I told him he was being immature and he started yelling some shit about me being arrogant and thinking I'm always right when I rarely am, how I'm immature because I make less money than him (irrelevant but true) and that I should have taken my car if I wanted a say on his driving. I got pretty mad at this point and told him he was being ""a f\_ing dick"" and that a real man would see the point of my words and take them on board instead of getting mouthy to defend a point that they are 100% wrong about. He mumbled some petty shit that i didn't quite catch to get the last word and then end of and awkward silent for the remaining 10 minutes home.

So he was meant to be staying at my place for the weekend while he is in my town but we had an extremely awkward Saturday night together as he refused to talk to me and left very early this morning (Sunday).

He's usually a pretty mild mannered guy so I'm honestly not sure where this outburst came from, he just really seemed to take afront to me seemingly ""telling him what to do""and I'm really not sure why. I pretty much transcribed the interaction accurately, do you think i chose my words poorly? should I have maybe held my tongue or would you do the same? Do you think an apology is warranted on my end?

cheers.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting help? ,So my mom died last June and as siblings we got 50 thousand dollars in life insurance. After my payment and fees I got 15k. As the oldest I had to pay not only my bills but my late mothers. Am I really an asshole for asking my sister to pay her share of the bills and telling her she can’t come back if she doesn’t? Like I hate that we can’t get along but her dad abused me for years and she reminds me so much of him. It absolutely pisses me off that I have none of my money left but she chooses to waste hers and not let me borrow to pay our bills. ,AmItheAsshole
 for asking my sister not to discuss her traumatic events with me?,"I (38F) have a sister (40F) going through a traumatic time.  She and the rest of my family live on the west coast while I live on the east coast.  Since everything has started to implode in her life, I have done my best to be there for her in any way I could, which most times is just chatting on the phone when she needs to vent. I have experience with what she’s going through and I can empathize with how awful it is.  Based on what she tells me, it seems like she has a pretty great support system there to help her out.  Family helps with childcare and going with her to places she doesn’t feel safe going alone.  All of this, I think is wonderful.  I’m glad she isn’t navigating all of it alone.  I’ve done my best to be understanding about her not getting back to me when she says she will, or not responding when I reach out, or stuff like that because I know, sometimes you don’t want to have a convo where you’ll get emotional or you’re drained from just dealing with it and you don’t want to be social at all.  I understand.  I try not to be too pushy or a pest so she can deal with what she needs to as she needs to without distractions.  

All that being said, I feel like when she does reach out to me, it’s because she’s exhausted everyone else and I’m a last resort for whatever reason.  As mentioned, I have been through what she’s going through.  I’ve offered advice, which she ignores.  Or she’ll call and be like “Aunt said this, and cousin said this, and dad said this…” so it’s fairly clear, she’s reaching out to just about everyone before she reaches out to me.  Which is kind of hurtful when I ask her to update me on important days, and then I don’t hear from her until a week or two later, and I guess she had time to update everyone else.  She called me crying one day because she had plans to get some important stuff done and had not been able to.  She was really upset about the set back.  I did some research and found out how to do it, which I sent to her, and told her I would pay for it as it can be really expensive.  She has enough on her plate without also straining finances.  I would have just done it but I didn’t have the info, so I also said, if you can get me the info I can just go in online and do it and pay or if you do it, just let me know the amount and I’ll Zelle it immediately.  I’m doing my best to be supportive and helpful even though I’m so far away.  As far as I know, she never did what she had been trying to and she ran out of time to have what she needed by when she needed it.  I offered to come out and stay with her for a bit since my income won’t change.  She had no interest in that.  Just ignored the text when I brought it up. 

Our last convo was me saying it seems like she has a ton of people to vent to, I don’t like being ignored, and it’s a waste of time to seek solutions for problems she clearly doesn’t want solutions for, she has plenty of shoulders to cry on and ears to listen.  It may have been too harsh.  
",AmItheAsshole
 for taking my girlfriend to my ex’s birthday dinner?,"i (22m) have been with my girlfriend(19f) for around 8 months now. i took her to my hometown for the first time, as it was going to be my dad’s birthday and i wanted her to meet my family. it also happened to be my ex girlfriend’s birthday around that time, who i grew up with and still talk to because she was my first love and our relationship was very impactful for me. I am a part time singer-songwriter and i have a lot of songs that mention this ex by name that i still perform to this day(theyre very meaningful to me), and i haven’t asked my girlfriend how she feels about it but she’s been to the shows and im pretty sure she’s fine with it. 

anyways, after i told her i would be in town my ex invited me to her birthday party(which i was really excited about). It was a dinner with her and her family at a restaurant and i told her that my girlfriend and i would stop by. my girlfriend seemed a little confused when we got there, as she assumed that this was a party and not an intimate dinner, but she got along well with my ex and her family. she and my ex even wore the same color shirt, which i thought was really funny and i took a picture of them together to remember the whole thing.

while we were driving back, my gf seemed a little off and i asked her what was wrong. she said that it was weird that i wanted to go to this party, and it was even weirder for her to meet the girl that all of my songs are about. she said that i put her in an uncomfortable situation and didn’t really give her a choice in going to this thing and that she came to my hometown to meet MY family, not my ex’s. i thought the dinner went really well and she seemed to be getting along with my ex just fine. i think she’s overreacting and is coming off as jealous. am i missing something here? AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for thinking it's unfair I have to change my clothes just to accommodate my brothers friends?,"I (16M) have always been feminine growing up and people often mistake be for being a girl. I never had a problem with this and I didn't think my family did either until yesterday. My brother told me that when his friends come over I'm starting to make them uncomfortable because of the way I dress. I've known his friends for a while now and they have never said anything or made it known that I was making them uncomfortable before and I hardly talk to them anyway.

 Like if I see them I speak and all but I mostly be in my room. I told him that I don't see how I can make them uncomfortable if I'm not around them enough to do so. But he then told me that his friends started getting uncomfortable because I look ""too much like a girl"". I was confused by this as I didn't see how that was my problem as I'm literally barely around them but okay. 

He got our dad involved when I started ignoring him and our dad agreed with him and told me to try and dress less feminine when my brother's friends are around because he doesn't want them to be uncomfortable since they are guest. When I told him that I found it unfair he told me that he wasn't trying to be unfair but just want everyone to feel comfortable and welcomed and he's just trying to be considerate of everyone's feelings. 

Atp I just gave up because it was really no point in arguing. So the problem happened earlier today. My brother was gonna drive us home from school and two of his friends always ride with us since their house is on the way but im like since im making them uncomfortable I decided i was just gonna walk home and when I told my brother this he asked me if I was being serious and I told him that I was and that's exactly what I did. I made it home like 50ish minutes later. 

Our dad came home like 2 hours after I did and my brother told on me and my dad got mad. He literally started screaming at me and told me that what I did was dangerous blah blah blah. I told him that since my brother's friends are uncomfortable around me I was just trying to be considerate of everyone's feelings. He got upset that I said that and told me that I took his words out of context but I told him that I wasn't dressed very masculine so I'd be disobeying him.

 He told me that I knew it didn't apply for school and that I was being stupid by putting myself in danger to prove a point? I told him that if that's the case I can ride tje bus then cause I'm not riding home with people who are uncomfortable with me and since they have a problem with me I don't want to be around them at all. This just made my dad mad. He told me that he doesn't understand why I'm purposely being difficult when I'm normally reasonable. I'm just so upset rn, I don't see why I have to change the way I dress for people who aren't even living here. Am I really being unreasonable or..


AITA for thinking it's unfair I have to change my clothes just to accommodate my brothers friends?",AmItheAsshole
H? I think my sisters boyfriend stole my earbuds.,"As the title says, im pretty sure my sisters boyfriend stole my earbuds but i dont know how or if i should tell her or confront him. Situation complicated.

My sister and this guy, lets call him Rob, have been in an on-again off-again relationship that goes back at least the last 9 years. We've suspected he's stolen from us before, from my parents, brother, sister and i also suspect from my nephew but since he hasnt been caught in the act, its hard to prove.

For convenience i keep my earbuds on a shelf in the living room. They were a gift from my sister and her boyfriend helped her pick them out. He has the same kind only older. 

Now, he is not the father of my nephew but my sister gave him the title(complicated but not relevant to the story)so he comes over to see them off to school in the mornings. 

I have no way of knowing when exactly the theft would have taken place. I dont use my earbuds everyday, and everything breaks eventually, so i didnt suspect theft until later. But all of a sudden they started to give me trouble. Not wanting to charge from their charging case but needing to be plugged into an outlet. Their is also a crack on the bottom of the charging case that was never their before. 

Its difficult to bring up my suspicions to my sister. She gets pissed off whenever anyone says anything critical about him. Like in a if were criticizing him were criticizing her type of way. I did bring it up to my mother and she looked at it and mentioned that it looked a little scuffed along with it being cracked and said she thought mine was in pristine condition as i take care of my things. That made me realize that mine WEREN'T in pristine condition. On mine their were scratches where the plug goes into the charging case. The ones i have now has no scratches. Clearly not the same case. 

I believe he switched his broken earphones with mine when he was here one morning, believing i wouldnt notice the difference. 

Is this enough proof? Should i talk to my sister about it? Should i let it go? Would it be worth the possible bitchfest that WILL go down if she dosent believe me? Would i be the AH for confronting him with this little proof?

Fyi were all adults in our 30s. My sister, nephew and i live in the same house. The boyfriend does not.",AmItheAsshole
 for turning down a 'girls day' with my stepmom and stepsister?,"So I'm (15m) not a girl. But I do like a lot of stuff that people would consider ""girly"". I think it's dumb to label stuff that way but it happens, it'll always happen on some level and I'm used to it.

In February 2020 my dad got remarried to Shauna. Shauna brought her 3 year old Missy into the marriage. Dad brought me and my older brother Devon (20m). Our mom died 7 years ago and Missy's dad left Shauna and didn't want to have any part in Missy's life. When Shauna and my dad first got married/moved in together (it happened at the same time) Shauna's niece Lizzie was around a lot and basically like a daughter to Shauna and a sister to Missy. But a year ago Shauna and Lizzie had a huge fight and Lizzie is no longer around. Missy misses her a lot. Lizzie did not stay in touch with Missy.

Dev doesn't live with us and typically when I see him it's because he takes me out and spends time with me and I stayed with him a few times as well. But he doesn't have a relationship with Missy really so she's never included in that. He's also not that close with dad really. So he doesn't really visit us all much.

Ever since Lizzie stopped seeing Missy she's been struggling a lot and Shauna and my dad both try to involve her in extra curricular's or friends to help make up for the loss of that relationship.

Missy asked me to go for a girls day with her and Shauna. She said I'm her brother now and she'd like if I joined the girls days since I like baking already and shopping. I told her it was nice for her to invite me but I didn't wanna go. She asked how come and I said I like doing other stuff on my weekends. She begged me to come and said I never spend any time with her (this is true) and asked how I can be her big brother if I never spend any time with her or get to know her. I told her some real siblings don't spend time together.

She told Shauna I said no and Shauna asked me why I couldn't spend a few hours getting to know them and she told me it meant a lot to Missy. I told her I know it did but I wanted to do other things. She asked me why I didn't want to make Missy happy and I told her it's not my job. She spoke to dad about it then and the two of them tried to talk me into going. Dad said he wasn't going to make me go because it would upset Missy more if I was being forced and it was clear. He told me after everything Missy has been through it would be nice. He said she gets upset when I go with Dev and she gets left behind. He also told me I could be the big brother to Missy that Dev is to me and I'd have a brother and a sister. He also told me Shauna and I might bond and maybe I'd see her as more like a parent instead of just like his spouse.

I told them I still didn't want to go. Shauna told me I could have made Missy so happy by saying yes and rejecting it was rejecting Missy. Dad told me he was disappointed I couldn't find any wish to spend some time with two members of my family. They also explained how wrong I was.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" For telling my mom that my brother’s spoiling his opportunities in life because she’s coddled him so much, knowing she has insecurities because of her health conditions?","I have a brother named Jack who graduated high school last year. Our mom developed a lot of health conditions after having Jack, including a hospital visit that she almost didn’t come back from. She cannot afford to get stressed by arguing with Jack. Jack knows this and takes advantage. My grandparents have tried to be authoritative with Jack, but it’s not much help because Jack knows at the end of the day, he can run to Mom and get his way by pushing her. Jack went to his dad’s house one weekend a month because he lived hours away. I have no idea what his situation is or if he’s tried stepping up. (Anytime I ask mom she changes the subject or claims it’s not my business.) What I do know is that Jack claims his dad let him do whatever he wanted, so I don’t have much confidence.  
  
Jack has already spoiled so many of his friendships and opportunities in life. Jack has a very friendly/charismatic personality. Always been popular. He can make friends and get opportunities easily, but he can’t keep most of them because of his behavior. Jack quit his third job a few weeks ago and Mom just found out. She was on the phone with me in tears saying she doesn’t know what to do with him anymore and she doesn’t understand why Jack is spoiling his opportunities in life the way he does.  
  
I did help my mom calm down first but I told her that he’s spoiling his opportunities in life because she’s coddled him so much. And she should send Jack to a boot camp or some other program for people who need to learn the world doesn’t revolve around them. I know she still has a large settlement from my dad’s passing and that money gives her more of an advantage than a lot of other people have to work with. If Jack refuses, he can move out and see how it is trying to live on his own and pay his own bills. Either way he’ll be forced to get his act together, but this is honestly long overdue.  
  
My grandparents called me a few hours ago to say that they agreed Mom needs to start showing Jack tough love and they’ll do their best to back her up in that regard. But they said I was wrong for telling Mom that Jack’s spoiling his opportunities in life because of her coddling. They said she already feels like she’s failed as a parent with Jack. And she still has a lot of insecurities over her health conditions and struggling to do things she could before she got sick. So regardless of what I said, all she heard was that she was a failure as a parent and responsible for Jack's spoiled opportunities in life. Are my grandparents right that IATA for that and I owe Mom an apology for saying that part?",AmItheAsshole
 for not coming home after a 1-week vacation?,"For context, I come from a traditional Asian household and I still live at home (I pay rent). I 25(F) recently went on a week trip with my boyfriend and to my surprise my parents were okay with it and what not. Throughout the entire trip, my family barely even called me or text me so I got the hunch that no one missed me since I was sending pictures and videos often and hardly anyone was responding. My family is not keen on showing affection, so it is hard to tell if they truly missed me or not. Plus, I was enjoying my time away from home since the past couple of months have been nothing but stress. Dreading coming home to this stress and an unwelcoming environment, I called my mom the night before my landing just to catch up on how things are going, and told her I wasn’t going to be home until midnight on the day I landed back home. I wanted to go on a hike with a few friends and I figured since they were in the area, why not go visit them after the airport. She said this was okay but she also said that she was cooking a home cooked meal for me upon my arrival. I politely thanked her and asked if she can move it to the following day since me and my other siblings will be home then. She said okay, and ofc this gave me the green light that I was good to go hang out with my friends.

When I got home that night, I was met with an unhappy mom and a dad that barely looked up from his phone that he was watching. He looked up once to say “oh hi” but that was about it. He isn’t generally affectionate so this is normal of him. My mother, on the other hand, started complaining about how disrespectful it was for me to be away for a week, and while she had been looking forward to my arrival, i decided to not come straight home from the airport to hang out with friends. I thought I communicated well enough that I was not going to go straight home right away. This was the warmest way to tell me “welcome home!” 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for texting other guys?,"i know the title sounds stupid but hear me out, i’m a 21yr old (F) my ex is a 33yr old (M) when me and him were together we had issues granted no relationship is perfect but we worked through it, couple months later things got worse and life ultimately became too much on both parties and we parted ways. cue to about 2-3 weeks later i find out that he got back with one of his exes as well as moving her into what used to be “our home”. few months later he tells me he wants me back that he likes me more than her and that she’ll most likely be out of the house once she gets a job and asked me if i would consider moving back in. note: im still very love this man so i said yes of course. alsooo we had been texting on and off throughout this whole thing. while occasionally seeing each other to hook up. anyways, the last time we met up we were talking about how we missed eachother and how he’s still very much in love with me and what not, which then proceeded to him asking if he could see my phone and i was like sure, soon as he went through it he saw that i had been messaging one of my exes who lives in a whole other state now but he feels some type of way towards that ex, he also saw that i was texting some new guy and from there took it to heart and said that i was a hoe so he no longer wanted anything to do with me. so my question is AITA for texting other men?",AmItheAsshole
 for thinking £40k+ hidden debt is a big deal?,"TLDR: mortgage meeting reveals £40k debt. Husband acting like it’s NBD and i’m overreacting by being so upset.

Me (39F) and my husband (43M) have been together 9 years and married 3. We have 3 kids (14, 13 and 5) but the older 2 are his from a previous marriage. We’ve been renting for our whole relationship, but I’ve always been keen to buy. Our landlord is now selling, which means we have to move.

We had a meeting with a mortgage advisor this week. Ahead of the meeting, husband said he had a poor credit history and wasn’t sure we’d get a mortgage because of some missed credit card payments. When I looked at both our credit scores, the average puts us in the range of being accepted for a mortgage so I wasn’t worried. Come the meeting, it’s revealed that he’s sitting on £40k+ of debt, spread over loans and credit cards. It felt like a complete gut punch to find out that way - I think I was in shock because I didn’t really react initially and it took me a few days of floating through life to really comprehend what this means for us and our relationship. 

I tried to have it out with him last night after our youngest was in bed (older 2 at their mum’s) and his reaction was so defensive and aggressive. He basically said he isn’t good with money, chronically overspends and always has and what do I want him to say? He then left and went to the pub, leaving me with our 5yo who had woken up crying. I just don’t know where to go from here. I don’t think I handled last night well-I was angry and I did shout, but I’m so hurt. It’s less about the money (though that’s terrifies me as someone debt averse) but more that he didn’t talk to me about it at any point in our relationship. Also worth noting that his mum left us £50k for a deposit and he spend £40k of that 2 years ago clearing debt. I feel like the trust is gone. 

I want to get through this but I can’t see him putting in any emotional effort to understand my position. His approach is to carry on like nothing’s happened, as we did after the inheritance spend was revealed. My natural approach to things is to avoid conflict, but I don’t know if I can carry on as if nothing’s changed. I don’t know what to do-can my relationship recover from something like this?",AmItheAsshole
 for treating my family better than treating my in laws?,"
My (F30) parents always put me above their wants and needs. They wanted to give me best opportunities. They invested in my education, took me on trips etc. At a point, when my father got some money at retirement, he put a major chunk that away for my wedding instead of doing anything for them. Knowing how much my parents did for me, I always dreamt of doing things for them when I had the means for that. 

When I started dating my now husband, all this had come up in our conversations. I had told him my plan was to set aside a set amount from my salary to do things with them. He was always positive about it. 

I went on several trips with my parents before my marriage. We got married over a year ago and last week I was planning another vacation with my parents coming comjng June. My husband saw this and asked if we could take his parents somewhere as well. I said sure and revised budgets and approximate accordingly. I went to discuss with him about how much it will cost and how much I needed him to put down. 

He seemed taken aback and asked if I didn't already have enough money to take our parents. I did have money saved up, but that was set aside for things for my parents only. If I took from that to fund trip for his parents also, I would be reducing what I can do for my parents. 

I asked if I took care of this entire vacation, would he be open to funding another vacation for my parents (the one balance money was for). He said no asking why my parents deserved an additional vacation as compared to his. 

It was frustrating to me and I said all this money I saved was earmarked for my parents. If I take from it to spend on his, he ought to compensate and spend on mine. He said I was showing partiality to my parents and not treating his parents as my own. 

So I told him while I have no qualms about having his parents come on the trip, I wouldn't be funding them. He is mad at me about this. 

Additional note just for full disclosure : I make more money than him, around twice. We contribute to our household expenses accordingly as well. We share all household expenses and has personal accounts for rest of the money. And we do take vacations just us during the year. 

AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 if I refuse my friend's request? ,"Hey everyone! 

I (21M) have the following friends which are relevant to the story- Sarah (21F), Jake (20M), Adrian (20M), and Stella (20F). Some background, Sarah and Jake have been in a relationship from late 2022; Adrian and Stella have been on-and-off since around May last year (9 breakups and getting back together 10 times). I have known Stella since the start of our time in our university, then I got to know Adrian through mutuals, and I've known Sarah and Jake closely for the past year. 

For some context, Sarah and Jake are good academically (both having 2 tech internships under their belt), as well as being quite fun, as we've been on trips, and have partied together. This has made me develop a close bond with both of them, both socially, and academically, even though we've known each other closely only for a year. 

On the other hand, Stella is someone who needs constant emotional support and we've been there for each other whenever the other has needed it. Adrian was someone whom I considered very close till the last year, but his regular breakups with Stella, and his tendency to drag me between their issues, as well as constant lashing out and emotional outbursts over several of his breakups on me has made me a bit distant. As of now, I consider all four equally close to me.

So now coming onto the main issue. Sarah and Stella were put in the same dorm/room this time around and things have been going okayish between them. Adrian and Jack chose to take a dorm/room together, despite Adrian knowing that his interests and habits don't align well with Jack, and me warning him of the same. Slowly, they started bickering over nothing which usually turned into huge arguments, and Jack came back at Adrian with ""yo mama"" jokes which made him lose his temper multiple times. 

With time, issues between Adrian, and Jack and Sarah rose till the point they were all fed up with each other, and Jack and Adrian trying to remain civil as roommates. Adrian and Stella had another patchup-breakup cycle and they got back together again recently.  Stella also has some problems with Jack and Sarah but they're not as apparent, or major. 

Recently, Adrian has told me (and Stella), that he won't take it well, and stop talking to us if we were to hang out with Jack and Sarah. I told him that it's unfair, as they are also my good friends. I ensured him that I can make it work such that I can hang out with Sarah and Jack, as well as Stella and him in a way that they won't have to hang out with each other. He claims that he knows he's unfair, and he wouldn't have done it usually but he's just too annoyed to deal with them, and it'll effect our friendship if I were to hang out with them.

I understand their might be deeper issues than I know of, but Adrian has been cutting off people over small things recently since his last breakup with Stella, and I don't want to choose one over the other as all of them are important to me.

So, WIBTA if I refused Adrian? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting a family member move in,"Backstory, I previously lived with my husbands parents/family when we were younger (early twenties). During this time his sister and brother also lived there. My husbands sister was a complete slob, would damage things from her anger issues and overall showed no accountability for any of her actions. She made it a very hostile environment for everyone and if she did not have her way she was making it known to everyone by screaming, throwing things, and damaging the property. Overall not a great person to be around or live with.

Now, she is going through a divorce because of her cheating on her husband and is looking for somewhere new to live. She has brought up that she would like to move into our house to my husbands parents without asking me or my husband about it. I know that the conversation will come up soon because we have plans to grab lunch later this week. 

I do not feel comfortable with her living with us, she has been sleeping around, is still a slob and our morals and values do not line up whatsoever. My husband also has said he does not want to deal with her nor does he want to support her. Her parents also do not want her to move back in but I am starting to feel guilty about not helping her through a hard time. She does not have many friends and does not have a job where she could support herself or afford an apartment in the area, so AITA for not wanting or allowing her to move in with us?",AmItheAsshole
 for helping my girlfriend with her diet? ,"I (28M) have been dating a beautiful girl, let’s call her Lily (26F) for a year and a half and she just moved in with me. I think she’s absolutely gorgeous.

However she is a bit chubby and she has told me she wants to lose the weight and she needs my support. She said she grew up with a really unhealthy view of food and wants to start eating healthy. I’m in pretty good shape myself so I was over the moon to help her.

I started waking her up at 6AM so we could go on jogs together. I encouraged her to learn healthy recipes. I encouraged her to uninstall uber eats, doordash or any other delivery app. I got her a gym membership so we could go to the gym together. I have gotten rid of anything in the apartment that is high carbs and I have put her on a low carb high protein high fat diet. It’s worked: in a month she has lost 7 lbs and she looks even more gorgeous.

But Lily started to get irritated. At first I chalked it up to her breaking an addiction. But she got mad at me and told me that I went too far. She got angry because she says she never gets to have any sort of cheat day, or really anything that isn’t meat and vegetables. I got angry and told her that’s how you lose weight, if you relapse and drink wine and eat pizza you’ll gain the weight back.

She also told me she hates the gym and she hates lifting weights and I told her that it’s temporary and she’ll learn to love it. I told her if she just dieted without lifting she’ll just look skinny but if she wants to look fit she has to do squats and lift heavy. She didn’t seem convinced.

I made sure to congratulate her on her hard work but she accused me of being controlling and taking over her entire life. I really just want her to be happy and feel beautiful and I know that being healthy is the only way to lose weight. I really do have the best intentions for her and I feel uncomfortable being accused of malice.

Was I unreasonable? AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for cutting contact with a trusted friend?,"(all names are fake) For some context, I (17 F) have been in a relationship with Jaiden (17 nb) for about 2 months in the summer, we are teenagers so I expected the relationship to not be a long term relationship.
After 2 months of dating, they broke up with me saying I can't be loved.
Steve (16 m) was a pole for me to hang onto all this time, he brought me from feeling bad to feeling amazing.
After a couple of months my ex started spreading rumours about me saying I'm an asshole and a creep, and it really hurt my mental health.
I had a lot of panic attacks and I feared I would lose all my friends.
Now Steve knew all the things Jaiden did, and I thought he broke contact with Jaiden, but yesterday I found out he was still friends with them.
I confronted him about that and he said that they were friends for a year and he won't leave the friendship just like that.
I told him that they brought me trauma and he had to choose, me or them.
We had a long fight and at the end he chose them, so I cut contact.
Today he messaged me out of the blue saying he thought about me while harming himself, and he said I was an asshole for leaving him and some of the people I know agreed with him, so I ask you this reddit, am I the asshole here?",AmItheAsshole
 for blocking my boss,"
I 23f when i first started at this job my manager didn’t really talk to me but after a week of working there he needed my number to get a hold of me if he needed to me to come in or to pick up any shifts or if i had questions. at first he didn’t text me so often and im not a big texter myself. 

These were very long shifts sometimes a lot of overtime since I started. as weeks go on i noticed he started to give me more attention and texting me more. (there wasn’t a lot of girls where i worked) but there was still girls for him to talk to. Just like an average person would do i go to work and do what im assigned to do and then go home. however through out my shifts i noticed he would constantly talk to me or make ways to go another side of my job from where i would be just to see me even if its the longer way to go. he would constantly text me out side of work hours and try to get to know me on a more intimate level and know things about my childhood and stuff like that. if i didn’t respond he would get annoyed even mad at me and be petty.

At this job I did have a crush on some guys and don’t get me wrong I would flirt with them and I did hook up with some of them. somehow my manager found out that i was talking to multiple guys at the job and he got LIVID blocked my number and completely ignored me even if he was the only manager scheduled. he noticed i didn’t care bc he’s my manager why would i care that means he can stop bugging me and texting me. while he texts me he would sometimes say “i want you to move in with me” (my home situation was crazy at the time) but it wasn’t crazy enough for me to want to move out. i do admit i would respond purely outta boredom but i always knew to never get flirty with him or cross lines. I lived across the street from my job so it was convenient for me to work there. One day me and my coworker clocked and we’ve been booking up a couple times a week actually but we knew to go to my house a different times so my job doesn’t see us walking together. that same day my manager drove by and was pissed. texting me and calling me, calling me every name in the book and saying hell transfer me but then regret what he said and tried to get me to talk to him again or just even reply. i can go days w out responding to his messages and he would always get so butthurt and it was an endless cycle where i felt like i was being watched and he would make comments about my clothing and if i wore something that wasn’t even revealing but shows my tattoos and stomach outside my uniform but first to comment.sometimes he would text me he wanted me go to go over to hang out.The two guys I was hooking up with never said anything to anyone bc we three had a 3 way and we all never wanted that to be known information at work. my boss wouldn’t stop calling me so i blocked him

AITA for blocking my boss ? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for moving out while my mom is sick?,"I (25f) used to live in a sharehouse, moved back home almost a year ago to go travelling and while I was away my parents went travelling too so I looked after the house and dog (now deceased) alone during that time. 

It took me a while to find a new job so I stayed at their house longer than I had planned to, and I’m grateful to have been able to do that. They got back at the end of the year and were patient and supportive during this time. Luckily, I am working full time again and this leads me to want my independence back and to move out. 

The thing is, in the last month my mum has been put into palliative care and we don’t know how long she has left. She has been sick all my life but it has gotten worse the last few years. I am an only child so I feel obliged to stay and help my dad look after her. I also want to be there for her and spend time with her. At the same time I feel suffocated  and resentful of my predicament as I don’t have the privacy / independence I long for as someone in my mid 20s.

Would I be an asshole if I moved out?",AmItheAsshole
 for exposing my in laws?and telling them how much upset I am?,"AITA for telling my in laws about how upset I am?Am I over reacting to my SIL?

My young  BIL got blessed with a baby and his sisters and mother accompanied him in the hospital while his wife was getting a c-section,
Although I gave birth before and they were never there for me,they would come the next day to visit me at hospital but they never stood with my husband while I gave birth.
(Although they never liked his wife and consistently would fight her)
I saw this as extremely disrespectful and I have told my In-laws about how extremely upset I am for sticking with her and never with me.
I got a call from my sil later and she apologized 
And said she never favored anyone,but her brother called her and asked her if she could come to the hospital and stay by his side,and because he called her she couldn’t find it in her to say no so she went and her sisters tagged along.
Although at my first born child my husband called the same sister crying telling her how hard was it for him at that time, because I was in extreme pain ,and because he couldn’t endure staying in the room he went outside to catch his breath and called her, but she never showed up but why is it different when it comes to my BIL.
Note: they would go to my BIL house while she was pregnant and would clean for her while she’s asleep and would even take the garbage out and mop the whole house for her and they never did that for me never checked on my well being while I was pregnant never came by to help me clean I would do everything on my own.
Am I over reacting?
",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my friend a crazy bitch?,"Happened a few weeks ago.

I’ve more recently discovered I’m pregnant and planning on keeping it. I’ve told my friends and one of those friends, I’ll just call “M”, has been very very excited for me.

It was fine in the beginning but now she’s starting to practically act like she’s the baby’s father. 

She will insist on buying items for the baby even if I don’t need or want them and if I refuse, get really upset and call me ungrateful.

Refer to the baby as either ‘hers’ or ‘our’ baby. 

Is really obsessed with knowing the gender once I can, really wants it to be a boy for some reason.

Staying over at my apartment more and more and has offered to let me stay in her house which has a bit more space, like really insisting. She has shown me pictures of nursery’s that she’d like to do for ‘her’ baby.

Posting ‘updates’ and photos constantly, like some people thought she was the pregnant one.

I kinda got tired of it all lately and when she was talking about something baby related I snapped and called her a crazy bitch. Of course, an argument ensued and she left my apartment. 

She has told our mutual friends about what I said so I’m getting called a AH and heat for it. Starting to wonder if I’m really just being rude /TA.

Aita?
",AmItheAsshole
 for feeling conflicted about lending my car to my roommate for his sister's wedding?,"TL;DR: I refused to give my roommate my car to get to his sister's wedding because he always returns it with dents and scratches, and now he won't be able to arrange for transportation.

Hey everyone, I'm facing a moral dilemma regarding my roommate, Mark (26M), and I could really use some outside perspective.



About two weeks ago, Mark asked if he could borrow my car for his sister's wedding, which is happening out of town. Initially, I agreed because I understand how important this event is for him and his family.



However, here's where things get complex: I've let Mark borrow my car in the past, and it's come back with scratches, dings, and once even a dent! Despite this, I've always covered the repair costs and tried to be understanding.



Adding to my dilemma, last weekend, I lent him the car for another trip, and it came back with more scratches and a dent. This made me really anxious about lending it to him again for such an important event.



I've been torn between wanting to help Mark out for his sister's wedding and protecting my car, which has been damaged multiple times before. I know he needs the car for the wedding, but I also feel like I'm being taken advantage of.



I hesitated to retract my offer because I didn't want to let him down, but as the wedding draws closer, my anxiety about my car's condition grows stronger.



Mark got upset when I brought up my concerns, accusing me of going back on my word and letting him down when he needed help the most. Now, he's giving me the silent treatment, and I can't help but feel guilty.



Am I the asshole for feeling conflicted about lending him my car, or is it understandable given the circumstances?",AmItheAsshole
 annoyed by parking situation one of many minor issues.,"AITA for being bothered by my bfs deep connection to all his mothers personal belongings? I moved across the country and got rid of everything I owned couches dressers etc.. so we didn't one have to haul and 2 could use his/hismoms stuff instead.
I feel like my stuff in the house has to all be 2ed option to his; currently we have 2 cars and one spot so one of us goes on the street.
My truck which is under lease and newer (2017 canyon) has to be parked on the street because as he has told me nothing can happen to his car(his mom's old car) he cares about it to much.. but my trucks fair game? Idk if I'm just being cranky about it but I feel like my stuff ain't valued as much it was easier to get rid of and so on for him I gave up alot. What do yall think?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to listen to my friend's troubles all the time?,"One of my besties has a lot of issues (so do I tbh). She decided about three months ago to date a red flag parade. So did I. I dumped mine like three weeks ago. 
Well, she's still with hers. And unlike me and my ex, they're not official. Let's call her new dude...Richard (cause he's a real Dick).

 Well, Richard made his stance very clear this weekend to everyone, by shouting it drunkenly at her; ""I'M NOT YOUR BOYFRIEND!"" 
Now, I have to note that Richard is a jobless bum who lives at my besties house rent free. He cooks, cleans, buys food and takes care of her pet, but that's the minimum for crashing there, no?
She took him back last night, after he got into a fight and humiliated her in public. Yes, he was very drunk. But c'mon. She also didn't give him the ulitmatums she said she would. 

I told her I never wanna hang out with him again. I also told her that I wish her good luck but no longer will listen to her crying. And I mean it. I've said everything I had to say on the topic. 

Should I still support her and listen to her troubles? I want to be a genuinely good friend to her. But I'm also so annoyed. She's being effin stupid. But she's an adult and she said I should respect her decision. And I want to but I also don't wanna listen for hours and hours about this guy. We all told her. I feel like a Richard just typing this. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for pushing financial literacy on a friend after she called me cheap?,"I’ve (F 28) had a friend since college. I am a high earner in a HCOL city. She is in the same city and makes around half of what I make. We both grew up middle class but as the relatively poor kids at schools where the rich sent their kids. Ever since I moved to her city she has called me cheap, because I do things like make us bus instead of Uber and say no to buying drinks at clubs. Other than that, she has been a great friend.

She was unemployed a few months between jobs and I noticed her relationship with money start shifting. She started wanting men to give her a “princess treatment” and on LNY she spent her red envelopes on clothes as soon as she got them. At the time I did say it would be financially wiser to save them. She was embarrassed to have to start financially depending on her parents again. She normally is super independent.

Things came to a head for her birthday. A few weeks before she texted me asking for a gift that’s over $100. It’s from a brand that’s very hyped but poor quality (both of us have bought things from them before), and the item isn’t on sale. I thought this was delusional and said nothing. A week later she asked for something else that was $85, and since Sephora was about to have its insider sale and I forgot her gift last year I bought it feeling like it was a good purchase.

We met up for a free corporate lunch days before her birthday as we’d be in different cities the actual day. She said every time I do/say something cheap it makes her hate me a little.

When we got back, to celebrate a new job, she started doing a few things I was concerned was living beyond her means, like buying expensive clothes and ordering delivery (normally fine, but after a few months of unemployment seemed like a lot). After years of being called cheap, I called her spending financially unwise and asked if was still able to return what she had bought.

It escalated today when she sent me a book with a titled, “Why We Hate Cheap Things.” I wrote back “At least my ability to retire won’t be dependent on me marrying a rich man.” She wrote back she’s her own sugar daddy and I was putting her down. To her credit, before she was unemployed she was super independent.

I decided to be thoughtful about it and explain I don’t mean to put her down, but I am concerned about her financial literacy. I explained to her I know we do things differently. I invest or save half of what I make, and offered to share with her some resources that helped me gain financial literacy to take money being fun to a tool. I know she makes less than me, but all income levels can benefit from having more financial literacy.

She wrote back saying I was judging her lifestyle and she rather live in the moment because the future is not guaranteed. She pointed out health is more important than money, which she has a point, I’ve skipped Drs appointments I could afford because they are $500 an appointment with insurance. That said now she is angry at my judginess. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 Sketchy Window Cleaning ,"My mom hired someone to clean all the interior and exterior windows of our house.  A few days later there was a guy going door to door seeing if people wanted this work done. My decided to cancel the initial appointment and go with this guy since he was obviously looking for work. He came today with a few people and all he had was the brown thin paper towels and Walmart brand window cleaner. We thought a cleaning service would be more professional than this and since he was charging a significant amount of money we had to say no. He got mad since he brought a crew out and didn’t see anything wrong with how he was planning on doing the job. I feel bad because this is obviously unfortunate for him but the way he was planning on doing the job just seemed so wrong. AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
" for calling my brothers girlfriend ridiculous when she said my brother painting my nails was ""creepy""?","I (33F) met my brother (30M)'s girlfriend (29F) at a family dinner last night, they've been dating for six months and now things are getting slightly more serious he wanted her to meet me and our parents. Things were going well and we were all having a nice time, after dinner when we were all having drinks my brother told me my nails were driving him nuts and jokingly asked me if i'd  painted them blindfolded. Now I felt i'd done a good job with them but I have shaky hands and of the two of us he's always been better at painting nails as he was a goth in Highschool. 

He stated he couldn't take staring at them and went to our parent room to raid our Mums makeup. Then at the dining table he removed my polish and began to paint them afresh, this is nothing new to our family and basically summed up our teenage years. Our parents laughed and joked about it and all the times we'd gotten nail polish on various tables. My Brothers girlfriend seemed uncomfortable and was quiet and just drinking her wine, I asked her if she was ok and she mumbled she was fine but as my brother kept painting my nails she seemed more and more uncomfortable. He picked up on it and checked if she was ok pausing in painting my nails.

His girlfriend then shrugged and said it was just odd to her and honestly seemed creepy to her, as it was just so strange. This had us all a bit baffled and we laughed a little uncomfortably unsure what to say about this, she seemed to get upset by this though and and stressed it was creepy and normal families aren't like this. I got a touch annoyed at this and told her she was being ridiculous and there is nothing at all creepy about painting nails.

The mood dipped a lot after this and she asked my brother to take her home, he complied but clearly wasn't happy. In hindsight i'm worried maybe I took it too far calling her ridiculous, I just didn't like her calling what was a bonding moment for me and my brother in our youth ""creepy"" but I perhaps should have read into her thinking it's not normal for families to be like this, perhaps her home life wasn't as nice as ours growing up. I just worry I was too harsh considering it was our first meeting. Maybe I should reach out to her to try and apologise? I texted my brother today to see if things were ok on the drive home and he said it'd been mostly silent and she hasn't talked to him today and he's just honestly confused by her reaction.",AmItheAsshole
 for messaging a friend while he was out? ,"My (30F) friend (37M) and I struggle sometimes because I have a lot of mental health issues and am being investigated for autism - he has a very “tough love” way of responding so I try not to talk to him about stuff if I feel bad. 

Yesterday, he told me he was going out for dinner with his wife and friends while we were messaging during the day. At around 9pm, I sent him a message saying “I’m PMSing and I don’t feel good”. He didn’t reply and the next day we just talked about something different. Now he’s telling me that he’s annoying that I messaged him when I knew he was out for dinner. 

I feel like I didn’t bombard him with messages, I sent one and I didn’t get upset that he didn’t reply, but he says it’s not fair that I messaged at all. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for Scolding my husband,So I came home one day looking for some cleaning products and asked my husband where it was and he said “under the sink” as I go to look under the sink I found a toilet paper roll. As I reached out to grab it I noticed it was soaking wet. Confused I asked “the hell is this?” And he replied “oh I dropped it in the toilet and I’m going to dry it so I can use it still”. Of course I was disgusted and very upset so I scolded him telling him that “that’s just not done! Throw it away!” His father overheard our argument and asked him later what was wrong. My husband told his father what happened and how he was trying to save money by drying it out. His father agreed and said I shouldn’t have gotten so upset about him trying to save money. So I’m confused AM I THE ASSHOLE?,AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend to rest instead of hanging out with us,"So basically I have two friends one of them applied to a college that’s out of the city and I have not seen her for 6+ months, the other one is in the uni i attend to so we have seen each other ALOT , even without going to uni we meet in just regular hangouts, so the friend who is in a different city on Wednesday suggested that the three of us meet on last Saturday and I was so happy about it because I haven’t see her for ages and i immediately agreed but the other friend said that she wasn’t sure about it , next day which is Thursday i asked her on our private chat if she is coming she said “ I’m mentally exhausted “ so normally I told her “ oh shit man if you can’t come on Saturday it’s alright I won’t push it” and I said “ maybe your mood will be better on Saturday “ and she replied with “ If you wanted me to come you wouldn’t accept my no that fast “ AND IM A PERSON WHO STRUGGLES WITH MENTAL HEALTH PROBLEMS AND I WONT APPRECIATE SOMEONE FORCING ME TO DO SOMETHING I DONT WANT TO DO WHILE IM FEELING DOWN AND I DON’T PUSH ANYONE INTO ANYTHING THEY DONT WANT TO DO BACK!!! She also said “ I don’t think my mood will be better after what you said “ and also “ your reactions shows how much unwanted I am”! 

Did i do something wrong that I can’t seem to pick up on? We didn’t hang out on Saturday none of us met and I haven’t received a message from that one friend.",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my sister-in-law to My Son's Graduation Party?,"A little history... I do not have a relationship with my in-laws. 

When my husband and I started dating I tolerated their jokes (about my culture), jokes that is sometimes below the belt, their passive agressive comments, unsolicited/condescending advise, etc.

After our wedding, I started seeing a therapist as I had panick attacks whenever we are going to see my in-laws (couldn't breath panick attacks), I was also going to grief counseling as my mental health was taking a toll on me at that time... 

My therapist suggested to communicate to my husband what I was feeling towards his family. 

It did not go well. It took years of marriage counseling before my husband can understand where I am coming from, and REALLY respect my boundaries.

We decided and he laid out our boundaries to his family. I was no longer coming to family events at his hometown. The family events we are hosting, they are welcome to come unless they are uncomfortable and we respected it.

It did not go well with the inlaws. My sister in law will call her Marcie threatened that if I don't have a relationship with them, then I shall not have a relationship with her children.

Honestly, it is the bed I made, and I was happy to lay in it.

I told my husband I understood and I will not stop any of my inlaws to have a relationship with my children.

Through the years, my husband always invites his side of his family whenever we have an event at our house. My children's birthdays, and other occasions. My inlaws never come aside from my husband's mother, but rarely. 

For the record, I always encourage my husband to visit his parents/family. Mother's day, father's day, etc. I just don't feel comfortable around them but i don't want to be unfair to my husband and children.

Through the years, whenever my inlaws send their invitations or cards, it is only addressed to my husband. 

I just look it as... Well it is not like I am going anyways. So I did not really care. 

My son is graduating high school this year. I was doing the envelopes last weekend when my son made a comment. ""Why are you inviting Aunt Marcie? She's not coming anyways and she's drama, don't waste your postage"". 

I talked to my husband about it and he was surprised with my son's comment. When we talked about it with my son. He simply said, he does not care, if his Aunt will come or not. But, he rather not have a drama at his graduation party. If that's gonna be the case then he rather not have it.

I agreed with my son and decided not to invite my SIL. My husband said I would be an ahole if I don't invite his brother's wife.

I am not sure where my son is coming from as I have not seen my inlaws for about 15 years so I am not sure what they have become, and don't want to take a risk to humiliate my son in front of our family and friends.",AmItheAsshole
 for sharing my poetry after a school tragedy,"Edit: I guess I should add that she told me she was angry with me sharing those poems two months after the tragedy, so there was a bit of a space between the event and the conversation we had.

I (F24) wanna talk about a weird conflict I have been going through recently. I am an aspiring poet and several months ago few of my poems got published in one of the most important poetry magazine in my country. Unfortunately, the publication happened a day after a huge tragedy took place at my university during which several people have died.

I wondered whether it was appropriate to announce the publication on my fb page because of what happened the previous day, but I came to the conclusion it was harmless, since the poems were already out and the ppl who didn't want to read poetry at that moment did not have to. However, the post got me in a conflict with a friend of mine (F25).

The friend is a photographer and  took a couple of photos as accompaniment to the poems. She got very angry with me, because she felt the post was disrespectful to her as a co-creator. She was in the school during the tragedy and although she was in a completely different part of the building she felt quite traumatized by the event.

I told her I wanted to look at the silver lining of the situation and focus on a life moving on rather than dwell on the tragedy (it was quite painful for me as well, two of my friends got severely injured). I also liked having a distraction from the dreadful event. I did not asked anyone specifically to read it, I just felt like it was okay to post after the event about other things than the event. Three of my classmates told me that they found the distraction pleasent as well.

I asked her what did the post mean to her. I was okay with apologizing to her and looking for a solution, but I just could not  (and until this day cannot) grasp why she was so angry about it. She did not gave me any reasoning about it or an explanation, she told me it hurt her a lot.

She also mentioned several other ppl being insensitive to her and I felt like she was just expecting to much from ppl. She was angry at one person who wrote to the school group chat ""gee, I'm glad I skipped a class today"" and at her boss because she did not approach her to make sure she was alright (this caused my friend to quit the job). I told her I thought she was overstating the harm. it just felt like she was pissed at everyone who did not react to the situation in the exact way she wished them to.

After this she essentially ghosted me. She stopped replying to my messages. When I meet her in the school she avoids looking at me, she does not reply when I say ""hello"".",AmItheAsshole
" for texting my sister ""I just realized you never took me to get stuff as my birthday gift?","I (17f) have a sister (25f) we'll call her belle and she is currently pregnant, for my other sisters birthday (we'll call her Anna) she took her out to go shopping and got Anna books and basically anything she wanted to an extent. On my birthday however she didn't even tell me happy birthday. I was willing to let it slide because belle said she'd take me to pick out my Christmas presents when she had spare money because she was too broke around Christmas to get me anything or my sister. The other month she took Anna to do her Christmas shopping but she expects me to re earn mine.

 So now I'm debating texting her about this but she's nearing her due date so I don't know if I should or shouldn't text her and If I'd be an a hole by doing so. both times she brought Anna she spent around $50 to $60 on her and got her basically anything she asked within a limit ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my stbx to apologize to my 19 yo daughter? ,"My stbx likes to joke, but most of his jokes are about making me feel small. 

He came in my room, while my 19 was there with me, and said, next time we fight, I'll tell you this - and he shows me the word ""curve"" on a dish (it's a brand name or something). 

I asked what does that mean? He says Google it, it's in Romanian. So my daughter googled it and turns out it means slut. 

My daughter became upset, and was like, why does he think it's remotely funny? And was clearly offended on my behalf. 

Anyway, I got busy with work, and about an hour later I came over to him and asked him to apologize to our 19 for saying this in front of her. 

He started getting agitated, saying I don't know how to take a joke, am too sensitive and influencing our daughter to be like me, saying he'll never joke with us again (we have 4 other kids), and that we're becoming a sensitive family (meaning me and our kids). 

AITA for overreacting and making a mountain out of a molehill? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my dad to come on my field trips? Am I being ungrateful?,"I (16M) have a field trip coming up Friday. I didn't tell my dad because he's been volunteering to be a chaperone on every field trip I had this year. Which have been 2. I was already on edge when he started coming but the last time he chaperoned  he over heard a conversation I had on the bus that he WASN'T supposed to hear as hes NOT even supposed to come. He put me in an uncomfortable situation because he forced me to talk about it. I cried so much that day. 

That's when I knew he should NEVER be a  chaperone again. However, my brother is stupid and let it slip about my field trip despite me literally telling him that I didn't want my dad to come. I'm positive he did that just to be to hateful because he started laughing about it. My dad was mad and accused me of lying to him which was not true I just didn't tell him. We got into an argument because I told him that I already told my teacher that he'll be busy that day and I already turned in my permission slip. This made him more upset because I forged his signature and he told me that he was gonna call the school and let them know he was available.

I told my dad that If he chaperones I won't go because I'm going to get AWAY from him not to stay close to him 24/7. He got madder and told me that I was going whether I like it or not and I should be grateful I'm not punished. I told my dad that forcing me to go is just as bad as a punishment because I'm tired of my friends making fun of me and making comments about him. He did not care and basically told me to ignore them.

I don't understand why he does this to me. Like I just want to be myself and I can't do that when I'm around him everyday. I told my dad that I'll go but it just proves to me how little he cares about my well-being. He got upset with me and started telling me that it wasn't true and he just wants to spend time with me.

 I don't want to spend time with him. It's embarrassing. Like once a field trip okay. But every field trip is just no. Like I don't mind spending time with my dad. I love him. I just don't want him at my school. He embarrasses me. And my friends don't make it no better. He's too involved in my school life and I want him to stop. I asked my uncle to convince my dad to stop but he told me to be grateful that my dad wants to be involved in my life as many kids don't have that??!

That right there was confusing because I never said I didn't want him involved Just NOT AS A CHAPERONE. So he was wrong and was just making things up. So I went to my other uncle and he was also wrong and it genuinely made me sad because I felt like I was getting gaslighted. 

I don't see how I'm being ungrateful?",AmItheAsshole
 - I called out a friend for a random comment,"So a friend and I were having a discussion not related to fitness or anything and out of the blue 

the friend randomly says : “ hey did you notice how better my fitness metrics were compared to yours?” And my response was “I don’t log my fitness to compete against you but rather to share it with my community and inspire people”. I then told my friend that I thought it was toxic to turn this whole fitness thing into a competition since a lot of people get discouraged by even just starting.

Anyways all this ended with the friend saying I took it too personal. I would kind of get it if we were talking about fitness and friends throw little jabs but out of the blue seemed kinda weird to me.

What are your thoughts ? Am I being too sensitive or was my friend’s comment uncalled for ?",AmItheAsshole
" for not going to a ""friend's"" birthday ","Hello, first of all, English isn't my first language, so grammar and maybe some confuse details lol

So I (F17) have a ""friend"" let's call her lyra, so lyra (f17) and I have been friends since early 2022, we were introduce by my bestie Eric, honestly she was really nice and I got along with her quickly.

Maybe I'm playing Martyr here but I was there for everything, i was there when her friends group separated, when her cat died, when she needed help to take care of her sister, basic human sympathy things but still, I was there and we only had one discussion (it was a stupid thing related to a character list and she gave a shitty apology) when in the end her mom got in and I decided to leave it for peace, that was last year June.

So, a bestie and I had a fight, a big one, regarding fake screenshots and all of that, we're fine now and we're starting to share what our friends told us during that time, every response was between ""he's and ah"" and ""I'm sure you can solve it"" except her's

Eric told me that she said to him everyday 

""She always do this lol, don't you remember the last year incident?""

I was surprised, by the ""everyday"" part, since two friends told me she said this before, but I took it as just being angry at the moment, but hearing that it was a daily thing (and that Eric had a similar story with she when they were in 9th year) I started to feel uncomfortable and avoiding her, Eric and other friend (let's call him river) did the same thing

So, today she saw us and lend us the invitations to her party, I'm seriously thinking of not going and instead going to the house of another friend with Eric and river instead, so, Would I be the AH?",AmItheAsshole
 if I put a lien against my parents' house and sued them for my college tuition?,"I, 17F, am graduating high school next month and am set to attend my first-choice college with a partial scholarship in the fall. It's an instate school about an hour away, and because of my dual enrollment credits, I should only be 5 semesters from finishing my bachelor's degree and then going for the master's degree I need for the career I want.

Five years ago my Mamaw, (mom's mom) died, leaving behind a college fund for me and my siblings, Kyle (M25) and Kelsey (F22). Mom's Aunt Teresa was supposed to oversee it, but she died in 2020, and somehow my parents wound up in charge. I don't know all the details because I was 12 when Mamaw died and 14 when Aunt Teresa died. I'm not even sure exactly how it was structured or how much there was, except that it was supposed to be enough to cover a significant amount of our expenses if not everything.

Kelsey is a fine arts major and her first year of college was derailed by lockdowns, and she wound up losing an entire year. She was supposed to go back for her final year next fall just as I am starting college, but last night at our Grandpa's birthday dinner (Dad's dad) she announced that she had been invited to participate in a Junior Artist in Residence study program and was deferring her last year of college. Everyone congratulated her and my grandparents asked about what sort of stipend she was getting. She said there wasn't one, but Mamaw's money would cover her living expenses.

My uncle said that between me starting college and them covering that, the fund would be empty soon, and would her share be enough to pay for her final year after? That's when my dad said that since I had scholarships and my sister needed it more, I wouldn't be getting any of the money Mamaw left for us. Everyone was shocked and started asking questions, but my parents insisted that it was important to support my sister's artistic goals ""the way we never were"", and that I'd be fine.

When my grandparents argued with them, Mom said I could take out loans for what my scholarship didn't cover and live at home to save money. I was in tears and my sister was upset that people weren't happier for her. When my uncle asked if there was even going to be money left for my sister to go back and graduate, my parents said they would take out a loan against the house to cover it.

Everyone got in a huge argument and my parents and sister left. My grandparents, uncle, and aunt got to talking and my uncle, who is a lawyer, says he's going to look into it and that we may have to sue them for my share of the college money because he believes they mismanaged it. My grandparents are worried about them mortgaging the house and losing it, and suggested we take out a lien against the house for my tuition money so they can't use it to get a loan to pay for my sister's expenses.

WIBTA if I sued my parents for my college tuition and put a lien against their house like my grandparents suggested?

Update: Thank you all for the advice. I know you can't just ""put a lien"" against the house, but my uncle and grandparents are talking about suing for the money and since my parents won't have it, putting a lien against the house. They want to move quick before my parents can ""do any other stupid crap"" as my Grandpa put it. We all know if my parents spent the money, there is no way they will be able to pay it back, neither will my sister, and Grandma basically told me, ""but at least they won't be able to lose the house"". My parents inheriting the house from Mamaw was the only way they could afford a home, they have never been good with money, so growing up my grandparents covered a lot of their bills so we could have groceries and that is probably why Mamaw left Aunt Teresa in charge of it. They are worried what will happen to my parents if they do take out a loan on the house because none of us believe they would be able to pay it back.    
  
My uncle is going to talk to his law partner about taking the case, but most importantly, I was able to call Kyle and since he was an adult when Mamaw died he actually has a copy of the will somewhere that he says he'll find and send to us, but he knew how much was in the account and where it came from. According to Kyle there was a 300,000 life insurance policy from when PopPop, my maternal grandfather, died, and Mamaw saved it for us to use for college. He's not sure how it was structured exactly, except he is pissed because his college didn't cost very much and what wasn't used was supposed to be distributed when we all graduated or turned 25, whichever happened first.  So they stole not only from me but from him too. I knew my sisters school was expensive, it's a private college, but I guess I assumed she was using loans or a scholarship or something? I never really thought about how they were affording her college, I just focused on doing well and getting as many dual enrollment credits as my school would allow so I wouldn't have to spend as much time or money when I graduated and went to college. When he told me I was in tears because 100K would more than cover my bachelors degree and probably my masters degree too. What I want to do (meteorology) really requires a masters or even a doctorate if you want to do any of the really interesting stuff. 

My parents were mad at me when I went home last night like I had caused the fight, so I just went to bed then went to work this morning, and am just sort of drained or like I got hit by a truck. My best friend says I didn't do anything wrong and just sort of got sucked into everyone else's drama and scheming, which seems pretty accurate. Even more stupid is that my grandparents told me that because they knew I had a ""decent amount"" from Mamaw,  they only saved for my aunts kids college funds, so they feel bad too, and Grandpa's birthday dinner got ruined. I got him some cheesecake from my work and I'm going to take it over to him when they get back from church tonight.   
  
Either way I got into my first choice college and am going to go, even if I have to sell blood or take out loans, so I've got that going for me, which is nice.  I'm trying really hard not to let this affect me too much because I still have final exams coming up and even though my grades are good I don't want to let this screw up anything else since some of my scholarships are dependent on my grades. My brother suggested in the meanwhile that I can file paperwork for my fafsa to not have my parents income counted, just my own, so I might be able to qualify for more aid, so I'm going to talk to my guidance counselor tomorrow about that. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to pay for my son's dentist?,"My ex-wife, Lena, and I have a son, Matt (6M) and I have 50/50 custody. We don't have such a... healthy co-parenting, we avoid each other most of the time and everything in relation to the routine and Matt, we resolve it through an app. All expenses related to our son, such as school, doctors and others, we split 50/50. 

I'm a dentist to be clear. And until last year, before we separated, I took care of my son about this. 

Recently, she sent a message to me through the app, letting me know that the dentist appointment was x amount and for us to pay 50/50.

 I asked if something emergency had happened, she said no, just routine and I asked why she didn't just let me know and I would take care of it. Her response was that now she has her own dentist and went through him, since our kid was with her and would be more easy. 

I agreed, but asked what the point of, because it would literally be free if it was done by me. 

She kind of snapped me and said she expected payment from me. 

I replied that I would see because I don't refuse to pay anything for Matt, especially for health reasons, but a stupid expense like that doesn't make sense and she can afford it, if she simply prefers to pay for something that I do for free.

She was not happy, she said that this was an expense for our son that we agreed to share and I was refusing to do so, considering that I am his father and that she was not obliged to choose me as a dentist. 

We do have an agreement to split 50/50, but, for me, this is the most absurd expense she had charge me, because I would understand if it was something emergency or outside my specialty, but a routine appointment... 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for making a joke about a dog at work offending his owner?,"
Okay so here’s what happened, I work at retail, I’m not gonna say where but it’s a pretty alright job all things considering, it pays well. 

Yesterday, for some reason, I saw a bunch of costumers bringing their dogs to the store, it’s a big place so it’s easy for dogs to walk around freely. I say, as a joke “everyone seems to bring their dog inside the store today” the owner says “ell it’s either I bring him in or leave him in the car to die?”

So I said, as a joke mind you, “you could leave him at home where he has food and water” and he immediately overreacted to what I said. He calls me some of the worst obscenities imaginable, and the. When I apologized for the joke he told me the grow a spine and leaves. The costumer next to me simply sighed and told me not to worry about it. 

So I go and report it to my manager and she said “the joke is innocent on its own, you should leave it to yourself, but you did the right thing by not fighting him”. Now something about me, when you start snapping at me, I’m going to snap back, but I couldn’t because I’d lose my job. If this happened while I was off shift, it would’ve been a different story. 

So, now I’m wondering if what I did was innocent or not. I have a dog too, and I can be protective of him, even though he doesn’t go outside too much. So, AITA for the simple joke I made that offended this costumer?",AmItheAsshole
 - for arguing with my wife about hair removal,"AITA for arguing with my wife that hair removal doesn’t make your hair grow back thicker.
 
This is what happened:
-We were watching something on YouTube and the person said that shaving doesn’t make your hair grow back stronger and it’s an old wives tail
-I said yea obviously…
-She was adamant that shaving makes it grow back stronger. 
-I made a annoyed facial expression (so I have been told) and told her that is ridiculous. 
-She got mad at me and said that I’m trying to push my beliefs onto her
-I said it’s not my belief, but that it is literal scientific fact 
-she refuses to listen and I feel like I’m listening to someone say the earth is flat…",AmItheAsshole
 for blowing up on a kid for ruining my jersey,"So I am a huge Orlando Magic fan and one day I brought my jersey to school and I had a conversation with this one guy named Steve (Fake Name) about basketball I thought it went fine cause there was no screaming and I just gave my points in this situation and we walked away normally. Until lunch happened and I was talking with my friends and I felt 5 things hit my back, I turned and saw 2 things. 1. My jersey was stained as hell like drenched ( and I just washed it that night) and 2. Steve and his friends dying of laughter with ketchup packets in their hands and I blew up and screamed at him pretty much laying into him calling him every name in the book until the teachers split us up
and sent me and Steve to the office and we got a scolding now I am conflicted and I think I went too far and some other people agree so AITA",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my sister to knock before entering out shared room?,"Me and my younger sister live at home at my parents house in a shared space. I have recently become slightly insecure and wanted a bit more privacy. So I decided to ask my sister if she could knock before entering the room out of politeness. She was outraged by this and got very angry. She said that we were both girls and it didn't matter if I was changing and if I was worried about it to stay behind the door. Mind you the space behind our door is small barely enough room to move and she has stuff all over the floor there. We've had many fueds over our small shared space, she likes to read out loud and late into the night or listen to podcasts and I like to play on my phone or listen to asmr to sleep. She wants light, I want darkness, she wants to sleep in. I want to get up early. It's gotten to the point where we fued every night. As the eldest of 5 children in a 3 bedroom house I'm great full for the decent space and what privacy I do have but I've become rather frustrated over this privacy issue... am I really in the wrong for asking for more space?

  
 Edit: for those saying go in the bathroom or closet thats not an option because the closet is filled with storage and but mostly my sisters belonging and in a house with 5 kids and all shared rooms the bathroom isn't available for me to use as it's busy with showers teeth brushing and my sister yells at me for changing in there for holding up the line.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband he embarrassed me,"My (44f) husband (44m) and I went to a party. On the way there I told him that one of the couples that would be there were coworkers of mine and to keep his conversations PG-13 around them. (When he gets around another man that I knew was going to be there they often loudly make inappropriate jokes and comments about sex, jerking off, drugs, etc). When everyone was being introduced he immediately says to the couple, “oh you’re the ones she said I have to behave around” and everyone laughed it off and it was fine. He made a couple of comments that were toeing the line of inappropriate but he never went overboard and everyone seemed to have a good time. 

After the party we decide to go grab dinner on the way home and after ordering I notice my coworkers are at the same restaurant and must have come in after us. My husband wanted to go run over and say hi and join them but I thought we should let them enjoy their meal and then stop by the table on the way out to say hi again. About 10 minutes later the wife comes up to us and says that she just spotted us and small world and all of that and my husband says “yeah we saw you too but she said I shouldn’t say anything to you!” at which point the coworker was like “did I get snubbed?!!” she laughed but it felt kinda awkward and she went back to the table. 

After she left I calmly told him that it makes me uncomfortable when he tells people things I’ve said about them so he can get a laugh and it feels like a violation of trust and he apologized but the apology felt disingenuous like he just wanted the conversation to be over. I remind him that he’s done similar things before (like I shittalked someone to him and then at a party someone brought up this person and he was like “isn’t that the person you can’t stand?” in front of everyone) 

So then it spirals into a fight about how it makes him feel like shit that I’m embarrassed by him “just being himself” and that he hates me telling him what he can and can’t talk about at gatherings w my friends. We finish our dinner mostly in silence and then he barks at me the entire 10 minute drive home about how he knew I was going to try to start a fight bc I’ve been in a bad mood all week and how I care too much about what other people think and how much he hates me being embarrassed by him. 

I feel like this is some basic social norm shit but maybe AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my best friend she has it easier in life and is being entitled?,"To put it short; my (27f) mom recently (3 months) died after dealing with chronic disease for many years, I broke up with my boyfriend and closest friend of 10 years around a year ago and had to find a new apartment, new job etc - and had a couple of smaller inconveniences and difficulties in the passing year alongside having a very demanding job I get paid not very well for (which I'm only doing for experience to get accepted to a masters degree.)

My friend, let's call her Sara (26f), has recently decided to complain that ""I'm not attentive enough to her these past few months.""  I tried to gently tell her that while I love her a lot, and care for her, and do want to hear any complaint or difficulty she has in her life - I obviously am not as attentive as I once was (we have known each other for 10+ years too), and I need her patience since I'm going thru a lot. Her reply was that she thinks ""I can't see anyone else's pain anymore and think my pain cancels everyone else's."" 

I will add that Sara's recent ""pain"" has been around being super busy with her upcoming wedding (which she declined any help from me at preping) and job, and admittedly some past trauma she was reminded of - but I DO listen when that comes up to my best ability.

Long story short, I got mad and told Sara that while I get that you can be sad or mad or tired while having a decent life, rn she DOES have it way easier and can cut me some slack and lower expectations for a bit, and she is acting completely entitled unlike what I expect of her as someone who actually did have some hardship in life (in which I was there to support her.) She told me that while she knows I'm doing bad, I'm also being selfish and self centered, and for the past two weeks hasn't talked to me at all. AITA for telling her that?",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving my dad's bday party early.,"So my parents and I have a sort of cold war going on because they treated me disrespectfully and I (a chronic people pleaser) voiced my feelings. And they gave me the silent treatment.
My dad's birthday was on Saturday and I wished him well because I don't want to be petty. On Sunday we celebrated with the entire family and I went for like 1h30 and then went to the cinema with a friend. 
Now, my parents both tell me that I'm a disappointment because I left earlier and I feel like a total dick about it too. But am I really the asshole here?",AmItheAsshole
 if I told my boyfriend to be more mindful of his meal/snack portions?,"My BF and I eat most meals together when we're not at work. When I cook I like to make several servings worth and save for leftovers. But unless I proactively separate and put away what I want to save for later, BF ALWAYS will eat whatever is left after I serve myself, even if it's multiple servings.

I'm not necessarily mad because I think he's eating too much. He's a grown up and can make his own decisions about his diet. But it is annoying when, say, I'll make 6 servings worth of pot pie, take one serving for myself, and watch him load the entire rest of the dish onto his own plate.

I will say that he usually asks me if I've taken all I want first, and since I usually don't go for seconds I'll say yes. So I guess I do technically give him the go-ahead. Sometimes I'll respond yes, but I wanted to save some for lunch tomorrow. He'll reply along the lines of ""Oh...well, how much did you want to save?"" and then take the rest of whatever I don't section off to save for later. Which isn't a big deal, but it feels weird to me that I have to physically put away the extra portions instead of him just not taking All Of It every time.

Another issue is when I bring home a treat/special snack and offer some to him, if I don't specify exactly how much I'm willing to share he'll inevitably end up eating most of it. Like a couple weeks ago I brought home a loaf of banana bread my coworker made, planning to make it my breakfast for the next few days. But BF took my offering him a slice as permission to eat 90% of it within 24 hours. What I was planning to make last several days was gone in less than one!

I said something for the first time with the banana bread, and chastised him (mostly in a joking tone) for barely leaving me any and could he please make sure he saves more for me next time. He apologized and seemed like he meant it, but the next night when I made dinner he once again took the entire rest of the dish after I served myself one little portion of it. I almost made another comment but I worry that anything I say will come across as a judgement on how he eats so I held my tongue. 

I'm thinking my best solution is just to continue being proactive about putting what I want for leftovers away ahead of time, but it's annoying to feel like I have to essentially hide food away in order to ensure that I actually get to have my fair share of the dish later on. I want to say ""FOR GOD'S SAKE STOP EATING EVERYTHING!"" but I know it will sound like fat shaming and his feelings will be hurt.

WIBTA for saying something?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to cancell plans with a friend?,"I (F27) made plans to go on a weekend trip with my friend (F25), and two other people (her friend and her mum). The main event will be a concert that she is super-hyped about. This city-trip is about 3 months ahead. The tickets are already paid for. We were about to book a hotel, however I found out the other trip that I have planned will be moved to another time and collide with my weekend plans.

The other trip was supposed to be 10 days long, to another country, with my dad. My dad always wants to go on any trip really, and was delighted to go together there. I always wanted to go there, but I never really had a chance. First, as a student, I had no money, then my ex bf didn't want to go with me, and last year I booked that trip but it got cancelled. This year I hoped I will finally go there, I booked it via travel agency, but they decided to change the date. 

Now I told my friend that I really want to go to the other trip, that I am really disappointed about the changes and that I would love to go to the concert, but if I have to choose, then I really want to go with my dad... And that of course I will pay for whatever costs were already made in connection to the city-trip. She is upset with me now...

For context: she knew about the 10 days trip before and that I have been planning it since last year really. We visit each other regulary, we used to be pretty close as kids and got closer again in the last two years. We went together on a trip only once, a really long time ago. She didn't leave the house since her child was born about a year ago and that weekend city-trip was important to her. That weekend trip won't get cancelled just because I won't go there. In the (close) past we had some really loose plans to go to together somewhere, but she always cancelled due to being sick or her child being sick, and I completely understand that, it is not within her control. I just think it adds to her frustrations. There are other weekends and trips that we can go to, but I think she might be a bit too angry at me to even consider.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for banning my friend from our gaming group after he spoiled a game’s ending?,"So, a bit of background: I run an online gaming group where we often play through story-driven games together. We coordinate our playing schedules so we can experience the plot twists and endings as a group. It's a great way for us to bond, especially since we all love discussing and theorizing about the stories as we go.

Recently, one of our friends, let’s call him Dave, decided to play ahead of the agreed schedule. Not only did he play ahead, but during one of our group chats, he blatantly spoiled the ending of the game we were all invested in. Everyone was pretty upset as it ruined weeks of buildup.

I confronted Dave about it, and he just laughed it off, saying it's just a game and we were taking it too seriously. Given that this isn't the first time Dave has shown a lack of regard for group rules (though the first for a major spoiler), I decided to ban him from the group to prevent future disruptions.

Now, Dave is upset and some in the group think I overreacted by banning him entirely, suggesting a temporary ban would have been more appropriate. However, others support my decision, tired of his casual attitude towards our group norms. AITA for banning him instead of giving him another chance?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my brother not to let girls stay in the house by themselves?,"My brother and I share an apartment together and each of us got our own room and bathroom but share the living quarters. He is single and likes to mingle, I got no problem with that and he brings ladies he's met at bars or online back to the house often, most of the ladies I've never met and will probably only meet once. My issue is there has been a few times where he would leave the house and let these ladies stay in his room when he is away. 

My job allows me to work from home so there has been a few times I'm working in the living room and these ladies will just wonder about and leave, other times I am just at home chilling and these ladies appear out of nowhere and I am shocked to see a stranger in the house not knowing they were there beforehand. I am not sure how many ladies there has been when I am not in the house. 

AITA for asking him to not leave strangers in the house? He says it's his room he can do whatever he wants and he pays half the rent so he has the right to do so. 

I don't think its asking too much for him to not leave strangers in the house is it? IF this was his long-term girlfriend or someone I am familiar with I would not mind but they are usually ladies he is having a one-nighter with. 

",AmItheAsshole
 Baby Shower Registry and In Law Drama,"I’m 8 months pregnant and had my baby shower recently. When I was throwing around the idea of having a shower my friend offered to throw me one. I got married less that 2 years ago and am showered out (I had 4) but I agreed to have 1 and was happy my friend was throwing one for me. I told my friends and family I was only having one but they were more than welcome to come. My mother in law kept texting me asking when we would set a date. The second we set a date for it I told her. I also created my registry after lots of time and research on what I will be needing. I in NO WAY expect people to buy anything for me honestly and feel guilty when people do. I more so use my registry as a list and full expected to purchase what I needed off of this list, it’s just a perk if someone gets it for me. 
Fast forward a couple weeks and my registry is pinging (I haven’t sent invites out yet). When I look it’s my husbands cousins who I don’t know that well buying stuff off of it. The venue I booked for the shower was small and I had my guest list set already. My mother in law then texted me asking if my husbands cousins could bring their kids to the shower. (I sent gifts to all his cousins that send me baby shower invites. I wasn’t going to send them invites and in no way expected any gifts from them.) we had a awkward conversation that they weren’t invited and it was going to to just be my MILs sisters. No one from her family marked anything else as purchased from the registry so I assumed maybes the auntss would bring the purchased stuff since it was marked as purchased on my registry or maybe they’d just return it. 
We had my shower and it was great. I mentioned to my husband that his cousins purchased some stuff off my registry I needed and didn’t give it to us so I was going to just buy it. But I was kinda bummed I wouldn’t get the completion discount and wish they would have waited or just not gotten me anything. 
He then called me all excited and said his cousins have his mom all the stuff for her house. I told him the toys were for 0-6 month olds and I wasn’t planning on dropping my child off with his mom when I’m home in leave and it’s annoying they marked it on my registry that I created. He said I’m being ungreatful but I just mainly feel 
A.) irritated they mucked up my registry 
B.) mad my MIL assumes she’ll be watching my kid so much that she feels she’ll need a house fully supplied.

AITA for being mad that my in laws marked things as purchased on my registry then gave them to my MIL? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling the teachers that my daughter’s bully being a foster kid isn’t an excuse to be a brat?,"My (36F) daughter (11F) has a close knit group of 5 best friends with whom she does everything together. At her school students have to sit in the same seat for every single lesson, and my daughter and her best friends all sit together at one table.

There is another little girl in my daughter’s class called Winny. Once, Winny came to sit at my daughter’s table when one of her friends was off sick. That day, Winny constantly knocked my daughter’s books and pens off the table on accident, and borrowed her stationery only to snap one of her rubbers, stain her highlighter with black ink, and was even found with my daughter’s pens in her pocket.

One morning Winny came to school crying non stop. The teacher was very sympathetic and asked if there was anything she could do to help. Winny said she wanted my daughter removed from her seat so she could have it, and the teacher agreed. The only empty seats left were all the way in the back corner of the classroom opposite her friends, and the only students sitting there were a girl who was known to be a delinquent and two older boys who had been held back.

The teacher refused to give my daughter a real explanation for why she had to move seats, instead saying some generic stuff about being kind to those less fortunate. My daughter cried for a week straight. In our country, the school year ends in December, so that’s over 7 months of being isolated from her closest friends. She’s also starting highschool next year and will be attending a private school, while her friends are going to a public school, so this is the last time she can hang out with them everyday.

A few days ago, I was called into school because my daughter had gotten into an argument with Winny. Winny had confided in my daughter’s friends about how she had gone into foster care after her parents overdosed. Winny was always a loner at school and wanted some girls to sit with during this time, and the teacher sympathised with her so she agreed. The only reason my daughter had to move was because there wasn’t enough space for 7 girls and my daughter was simply the one Winny liked the least, and she admitted to lying to the teacher about being uncomfortable around my daughter to get her moved. When my daughter found this out, she told Winny she didn’t understand why she had to pay the price just because Winny’s parents were a bunch of insane criminals who didn’t want her anymore.

I know Winny’s had a hard time, but so has my daughter. Her older brother passed away only months ago. I told the teachers that Winny isn’t the only child going through a tough time and I didn’t understand why my daughter had to be punished for another girl’s struggles as if she wasn’t suffering herself. The teachers wanted me to make my daughter apologise for her remarks, and I said it was their fault for punishing her and forcing her to sit with the problem kids despite doing nothing wrong, and they were downplaying my daughter’s grief and trauma to cater to a brat. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for replying late to a message ,"
---

I'm 20 years old, and I have a friend named Stacy (that's not her real name), who's 4 years older than me. Stacy often comes to me to complain about her past friendships and how upset she is that her former friends have moved on with their lives after she cut them off. I never really understood why she felt this way, but I always try to help her see that she needs to find healthy ways to cope, rather than wishing ill on people she chose to cut off.

Recently, I posted something on my WhatsApp status, and Stacy responded. However, there was a day when I was really tired, and I thought I had replied to her last message, but it turns out I didn't. Two days later, I noticed my oversight, apologized, and explained that I thought I had replied. A week later, Stacy sent me pictures with some girls I didn't know, and then she sent a message saying she thought she had replied to my response, but had to prioritize the important people first.

That same day, she sent me six voice notes, which I didn't listen to, because she told me she wanted her haters to see her. Since I'd had a day filled with positivity, I suggested that she focus on the love around her instead of her so-called ""haters."" She then sent me a message of a list of things she needed to do: Step 1: she needed to vent; Step 2: she needs to go out; Step 3: she needs to stop being fake towards me, and that I should block her on all social media. I simply replied with a paragraph saying that it's fine, she could block me everywhere, because she had already insulted my character instead of talking to me like a normal human being.
---

I hope this helps. If you need further revisions, I'm here to assist.",AmItheAsshole
 for putting myself first?,"I'm using an alt account as I didn't want this on my main. I've been struggling with anxiety and depression for nearly 20 years now and most of the time, I am fine. However there are periods where it declines and I end up in a bad state.

For background, I've recently started a new job in an unfamiliar sector as the pay and benefits were unmatched by any other company, and it's causing me severe anxiety (think panic attacks; throwing up; unable to sleep; not being able to eat full meals etc...) and this has been going on for about two weeks. 

I was signed off sick by a doctor after I told them everything but am due to return to this job in a few days.

My doctor has extended my sick note by another week however my partner wants me to go back as I'm not entitled to any sick pay as I am new to the company.

I know we need the money and I get that at the moment he is stressed regarding finances as well as everything else going on in our personal lives and that I've been working unpaid for the last few years running his business (he has a full time retail job so I run it at home whilst he's working) so he's sick of being the only one who brings an income into the household and I completely see where he is coming from and respect his point of view. 

My issue is the fact that this job really doesn't suit me, I used to love my old job but I was made redundant due to the company taking a hit on sales due to the cost of living rising. I'm freaking out everyday and I'm dreading going back. I'm sick of being physically ill because of the crippling anxiety and it got so bad in my brain that when he was at work over the weekend, I wrote a note incase he ever found my body. 

I want to continue to live and to make something of my life and I love him more than life itself but it's getting unbearable with my mental health. He's of the mindset that I just need to get some willpower and get over it and honestly, between therapy, medication and my own self determination, I'm trying so hard and I don't want to live the rest of my life this way. I just feel like I have no choice but to go back to this job and suffer health wise because of it.

I want to put myself first but the only way I feel like I could do that would be to either run away or end it and I don't feel like I can do either as I'm putting him in an even worse situation financially but I really want to put myself first and get better whilst finding a job that suits me.

I'm sorry for the long one but I'm at the end of my tether and I'm struggling.",AmItheAsshole
 for reporting my group project members for harassment?,"This all started around two years ago in college. We were in a filmmaking class and we had to present a short film by semester's end. I was put into a group where the film concept, in hindsight, was overly ambitious for the minimum runtime we were allowed. It seemed compelling at the time. Not gonna go into detail about it, but the professor was the one who first pointed this out. I was slightly familiar with Director, whose concept was chosen, but not CoDirector or Other Member so much. We were a team of four. Outside of class, we kept in touch on Discord.

Everything seemed to be going smoothly at first, as we were still planning out the story. However, things took a bad turn over time. I started having issues with prioritizing my other classes and showing progress when asked by Director and CoDirector. For the work that I did show them, they left much of it out of the project and claimed that I was taking too long to finish it or not following instructions. Other than using the college’s support services, these were issues that I didn’t know how to resolve at the time. They kept getting frustrated, but everything really blew up in my face during our last two weeks together. Director started posting long, angry messages directed at me in our server. I felt genuinely guilty about the state we were in, so I offered an apology. I did my best to take responsibility for it. Unfortunately, that did not ease up the tensions. Director and CoDirector continued to badger me about falling behind until we finally presented the film. Their behavior felt completely off the whole time, so I took screenshots just in case.

After we finished the class, I immediately left the server so I could finally relax my brain. The film was done, but most of my work went to waste. I thought that since it got scrapped, it would only be fair if I shared the parts I did with my friends on Instagram. After all, we never signed a contract saying I couldn’t. Big mistake. I started getting dozens of spam comments from none other than Director and CoDirector, demanding that I take all my work down. I refused at first because it seemed like they were definitely crossing a line this time, but they just wouldn’t let it go. I eventually caved and took it down. Then I sent my screenshots to the professor for the class. He was appalled by what he saw and wanted to help me, but because the semester ended, he couldn’t do anything beyond letting the Dean know about it. I reported Director and CoDirector for harassment again later on and managed to get our college to investigate them. I’ve been ordered not to contact either of them again, even though I blocked them both already. The two were just recently found to not be in violation of any policies, so now I'm wondering if I'm the asshole for putting them through all this stress for nothing.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to add my dad’s fiance to our Facebook group announcing pregnancy? ,"My husband (23M) and I (23F) found out we are expecting and recently announced it to all of our family and close friends. (Just a side note, when we called and told my own father [56M] had the worst most unenthusiastic reaction of literally everyone we called to tell the news. I.e we spent 30 minutes on the phone, and less than 2 were talking about us or the baby- the other 28 were talking about my dad’s cow farm and work.)
We decided to make a private Facebook group to add all of these said people to in order for us to have a more private way of sharing updates with a larger crowd. My husband and I did not immediately add my dad’s fiance, C, (60F) to the group bc neither of us are crazy about her and she has treated me like crap in the past. 

A bit of background, C and my dad started dating 1 month after my mom passed away when I was in high school. They were engaged less than 3 months after my mom’s passing, and prior to my dad ever even introducing her to my brother and I. She then would come over every weekend and practically every holiday and act like she was the queen of the house and whatever she said went. For the most part, my dad still enables that despite how my brother (17M) or I feel about her. 

Anyway, after my dads reaction (or lack thereof) to his first grandchild, in conjunction with the fact we aren’t keen on having C involved in our child’s life based on how she’s treated me in the past, we didn’t send her an invite to the group immediately. Plus, I was sending out invites as I scrolled across peoples names on my friend list. 

My dad then sent me a text 2 days later angry asking why or if I didn’t invite C to the baby page. It ruined the rest of my day as I stressed about whether or not to invite her and I broke down and did it anyway. He has done this on several other occasions, (our wedding, my HS grad, etc) basically guilting me into including C. in everything despite how much I don’t like her, bc I cannot seem to want to completely cut off my relationship with my dad. He has always created these situations where he is allowed to be mad that we don’t include her, but we cannot be angry or show any emotion contrary to liking her.

AITA?

TLDR: I didn’t invite my dad’s fiance to our pregnancy announcement group right away and my dad sent me an angry guilting text to get me to add her to the group anyway, despite my bad history with her; and both my husband and I not wanting her involved with our children. ",AmItheAsshole
 For Getting Pissy When My Wife Ate My Food?,"My (M30) wife (29f) is pregnant with our first kid and I think it's been going pretty smoothly. She's due in August and if you're lazy like me and don't want to do the math, 5 months pregnant.

My wife, as any woman, has her pregnancy cravings, which was ice cream and potato chips. After work i would just run out to get them, not out of my way or issue really. Yesterday, after work I was heading to get takeout from a steakhouse, and asked my wife if she wanted anything. She said she was cooking at home and was fine. Note this is at around 5 p.m.

No problem, so I get my food and I'm ready to EAT when I get home. Upon first sight, my wife immediately started asking for some, which annoyed me it was whatever. I gave her a few bites, and gave myself a few bites before heading to shower (I know its weird to have some food *then* shower, but I didn't finish it, so it's okay).

10 minutes later, by the time I'm back to the dinner table, the container is basically fucking ravaged. And my wife said (May i add, sheepishly) she ate it because she was hungry, even though I specifically asked if she wanted anything. I was actually kind of annoyed by it and said ""you're not funny,"" before just making something else.

After I made my Plan B dinner, my wife came up me apologizing, but I was still bummed out about that steak and just said ""whatever."" I guess she was upset that I was upset because she gave me a face and walked away. 

I eventually told her it was no big deal, and I think that made her feel better, but I still feel bad, so im asking if the ass.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to give my best friend tampons anymore?,"I love my best friend. We have known each other for 10+ years since high school. But she is really irresponsible. She forgets her backpack, her headphones, etc, at home all the time. She’s the same way on her period. Every period she asks me to borrow a pad/tampon. She always forgets them.

I’ve gotten to the point where it annoys me. Like she asked me to borrow one today. She starts her period at this time of the month every month. 

I asked why she didn’t remember to bring them and she looked shocked. She said she forgot. I told her to use toilet paper. She told me she can’t she’ll bleed through it. I said I was tired of giving her tampons, I’ve loaned her out a bunch. I always remember to bring mine,
why can’t she? 

She said I was being a shit friend. She asked if I was seriously not going to give her one, I said I was serious and she’d figure it out without me. I’m not always going to be around, she can’t always rely on me. It seems to me she forgets her stuff on purpose because she knows I’ll always bail her out. 

She ended up buying tampons and I watched her do it. I said she has to understand, they’re expensive and she asks me almost every month. She said I was a terrible best friend and left her high and dry.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking the lady at the gas pump to move her car forward?,"Hi. I (m38) pulled into my local gas station to get some diesel (I was driving my old Toyota 4Runner) and food, all but 3 of the pumps were occupied and a 4wd pulled into 1 and I didn’t want the 1 behind it as it only has the basic diesel, I fill my car up with premium diesel. 

I noticed a lady walk up to her car and space behind her so I pulled in there not realising how far back she was parked and that I couldn’t actually reach the pump.

No worries she’ll be driving off soon I thought and I can use the front pump, nope she proceeded to start putting air in her tyres, starting with the back left and she knew I was there waiting. 

I waited for her to do the tyre thinking it might only be one but then she started to move onto the next one so I beeped my horn to get her attention and motioned with my hand for her to move her car forward. 

Another customer (middle aged man) immediately came up to my car and started abusing me telling me she wasn’t doing anything wrong. I tried to explain my point of view but he wouldn’t have it. Then a male staff member came out and stepped between him and my car window, this was good on his part. 

Once the hero got back in his car the staff member asked me what my problem was. I told him and he replied with “she wasn’t parked back towards the middle of the 2 pumps and I could’ve reached the pump, This wasn’t the case though as if I’d tried to do so my car would’ve been touching hers and I still wouldn’t have been able fill up my car, this felt like gaslighting on his part so I told him he was a fuck’n idiot and that I’d take my money to a different gas station. 

",AmItheAsshole
 for not congratulating my best friend on her pregnancy ,"A little back story, I go to college 7 hours away from my family and high school friends. The fall of 2023 was my freshman year. However, I had to withdraw from college in February because of medical issues. I leave to go back to college in 2 weeks.

My best friend and I have been friends for 8 years, since 6th grade. Now, our friendship wasn't perfect it had been on and off since freshman year. Since graduating we have gotten closer and our friendship had been better than ever. My boyfriend came to stay with me over spring break and I had asked her if he could spend some of the nights at her house as she had a spare room and a queen-sized mattress. I only had a twin-sized mattress and I had to make my boyfriend sleep on the couch. She said that he could stay the whole week if he wanted to. 

Around this same time, she stopped her birth control and I asked her if she was going to use condoms and she said no that she and her boyfriend wanted a baby. They are nowhere near ready to have a baby. They just got a puppy and they live in an apartment they can barely afford. It wasn't a stretch to say I thought a baby right now was a bad idea, but I bit my tongue and said I was happy for her. She was super excited and said that I would be one of the first people to know right after her family. After my boyfriend left she ghosted me. We kept our Snapchat streak but every time I asked her to hang out she came up with some excuse. 

Fast forward a month, she posted all over social media that she was pregnant and she had not told me at all. A few minutes after she responded to my snap from earlier in the day, I opened it and didn't respond as I normally would. A few days later she sent me a text message saying that it was good being my friend but goodbye. I asked her what I did and she said that she was upset that I didn't congratulate her on her pregnancy. I explained that I was hurt that she didn't personally tell me about it. She said that it was because I said that she didn't need a baby because now she had a puppy. In all honesty, I don't remember saying that but I could've said it. We talked it through and worked it out. I asked her when she could hang out as I go back to college in 2 weeks and I don't know when I will be back. 

She once again ghosted me so I reached back out to her and asked why she was doing this. She made a bunch of excuses and I called her out on it. The biggest excuse was her pregnancy and I asked how her being pregnant prevented her from texting me back. This turned into a fight and she ended up saying that I would be happy if she had a miscarriage. I have no idea where she got this idea from. I don't agree with terminating a pregnancy just because. I told her to quit lying to herself and I hope that she and the baby are healthy. I have also removed her from every social media. Am I the asshole or was I justified?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my prospective brother-in-law in my house?,"I don't want my girlfriend's *sister's* **boyfriend** visiting my house.

My girlfriend wants to have a pizza night at my house (she has been living with me for 9 months).

She wants to invite her friends and sister, who I of course would want to come. 

The problem is that I don't want her sister's boyfriend to come, and would rather we just go to a restaurant to avoid this situation. However, this is something that would quite likely come up in future, so I want to resolve it now.

Reasons:

* He is (in my opinion) emotionally abusive to my girlfriend's sister.
* He disrespected me for no good reason in front of my girlfriend's family. Specifically, I asked the waiter if we could add a chair to our table at a restaurant so that he could join us - he then mocked/mimicked me...
* They very recently broke up (for the 3rd or 4th time), and are now back together + expecting everyone to act as though this didn't happen.
* My girlfriend and her entire family do not like him.

To clarify, I have never treated him badly, and accept that I will have to see and interact with him at other family events - I simply do not want him in my home.

In future, if they were to get married, and my girlfriend and I also got married, I would certainly accept him into *our* home, regardless of my feelings towards him.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 in this apartment situation?,"I admit that I can be on the more particular side when it comes to housekeeping and tidiness, but I (25F) try to be fair with a roommate of a few months (20-21F). She and her boyfriend tend to leave messes in the common space and won’t clean up until much later, even keeping it dirty during times where I need to cook or something. They do not use coasters on the wooden coffee table that belongs to me (pretty much every piece of furniture in the shared spaces are mine, since I had already been here for a couple years, but I have always said that anything is welcome to be used as long as they are taken care of), so now I have stains from where their drinks left rings on my table. There are other examples here and there. Anything like this I try to communicate, she pushes it back onto me as “complaining,” and as nitpicks against her. She even went as far as to say that I can’t handle roommates, which I have had plenty: some great and some not so great. She, however, has never lived with a roommate before. She calls me rude when I have never said anything against her personally, but she takes everything personally. No owning up to her faults. I’m not her mom, and she makes it a point to say I’m not her mom when I ask her to put my things back where they belong or to do simple things like using a coaster, but is it “being her mom” when I’m just asking her for basic housekeeping? There would sometimes be things that I need and would be looking for, and I take a peek to find it in her room (which I never go into unwarranted) because she didn’t put it back. I pick up my own messes and take care of my things just fine, but this feels like manipulation from her that she twists around to be me “nitpicking.” I don’t want to kick her out until I find a replacement for her, as I can’t afford to live without splitting rent, and I enjoy where I live too much to move. It’s too much of a pain in the ass to move, and I shouldn’t feel like I have to move when somebody else is the problem anyway. And her logic usually just goes no further than, “I pay my share of rent and I split the bills evenly, so I’m not doing anything wrong.” I was here first, all the furniture aside from her bedroom belongs to me, the bills are in my name, and my name is the only one on the lease. So I have a hard time believing that someone, unless I was being a threat to them or their safety, can have a say in what is “fine” and what is “nitpicking” when they’re in somebody else’s place.

She said to me before that she has been diagnosed with a number of mental disorders in the past: anxiety, depression, OCD, and ADHD. There may be more, but I didn’t push to find out about those. However, she does not get persistent treatment for these aside from a little bit of anxiety/depression medication. There is not a therapist that she regularly keeps in check with or anything like that. So the defensive and manipulative behaviors that I mentioned earlier, I notice they’ve been escalating lately.",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my ADHD cousin to my graduation?,"I, f18, have an annoying, entitled younger cousin, m12, we'll call Darwin (not his real name). Darwin and his sister's mom died 3 years ago, and they've had everything handed to them since. 

I live with my grandparents because both of my parents live 30 minutes out from the school I've attended since freshman year, my dad moving away end of junior year. Since I'm autistic and resistant to change, my grandparents let me stay with them. My grandparents also let my cousins stay with them as opposed to living with their dad. 

Darwin has always been a pain in the ass. He has ADHD, and in the beginning, I got it. But now he uses his ADHD as an excuse for every shitty behavior. Disrespects his grandparents? ADHD. Breaks expensive stuff? ADHD. Ordering stuff he knows isn't a safe food, hence wasting $12+ every time we go out? ADHD. My grandpa tries to be a disciplinarian, but my grandmother cuddles him. It's gotten to a point where me, my grandpa, and his sister refuse to go on trips if he's going. The trip we took this past March told us everything we need to know. As soon as I vote in the next election (the polling location is right down the street from here), I'm moving in with my dad and his gf, as moms house is already packed. 

However, there's one key thing coming up: my graduation. I seriously don't want him or his sister there. However, his sister has agreed not to be glued to her phone while I graduate already. Darwin, however cannot sit still, shut up, or behave. It's not even ""typical ADHD behavior"". It's just him simply misbehaving. I've already told my grandmother but she's just brushing me off. So would I be the asshole if I uninvited my cousin from my graduation? Even if it means uninviting my grandmother, my grandpa and I are closer anyway. ",AmItheAsshole
 for confronting my partner about more personal time? ,"Hi there, throwaway because I really need to know if I went too far.

My partner and I have very different hobbies. I tend to do more of his hobbies because he’s pretty resistant to doing some of mine just because they don’t require much participation.

He and I got into an argument the other day about personal time, feeling unbalanced in the time we spend doing his stuff more than mine, and feeling like I no longer have time for my own hobbies. We talked about it, resolved it, and came to the conclusion that I would attempt to spend more of my time doing my own things. 

Onto the issue, I recently learned this card game he really likes that requires a lot of work and I really don’t like card games? But I definitely do my best to involve myself in his hobbies because I like to hang out with him and it makes him happy. 

Recently, our friend M came back from out of town and we decided to hang out with him. I was feeling particularly exhausted today, probably because I’ve just been extremely tired recently (being sick and a big ass workload). My partner and I showed up to M’s house and M was playing something with his brother that would last a couple rounds. To pass the time, my partner and I busted out the card game and played a little. 

After one game, I was feeling a little tired and M was still playing the long game. I said “hey, I’m going to head home after this”. My partner pretended to be all sad and said “You’re leaving me? Oh no, how could you!” and it was all just very mocking, almost guilt trippy from my point of view. I just wanted to go home and it kind of made me feel bad? I told him not to do that in an irritated tone and he just went “do what?”. I stayed quiet and just watched stuff on my phone for an hour or so. 

My partner was looking a little anxious and was trying to talk. I picked up my stuff and made my way to my car. My partner walked me out and apologized for whatever made me feel bad, I told him that I wish he would take me seriously when I told him not to do things like that and to maybe lessen the guilt trip. He said that he felt sad that I was leaving but it felt like I was asking him to stop feeling which really isn’t it. I told him “forget it, it’s not worth arguing” and he went “okay”, stomping off back into M’s house. I’m just so frustrated, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I don’t want to delete acc with dead friends messages ,"So as the text states my gf (17) and me m(17) are at the breaking point of our 1+ yr relationship over my old fb acc. 

For context at the beginning of our relationship she would feel that I’d prioritize my friends over her, which admittedly I did. I felt like I was balancing my personal life and relationship by separating them a bit. I would spend the majority of the time with them and stay out late. In doing this I was also poor at communicating to her what I was doing at the time. Only telling her I was “chillin”, wouldn’t tell her where I was going, or who I was with. In hindsight this was absolutely the most stupid thing I could do. It’d be the same 2 guy friends and I’d assume she’d know but this just led to a huge amount of trust issues. I no longer hangout with them. It’s gotten to the point where I cannot talk to my female coworkers other than a nod or mhm. If there’s any female on my feed even if it’s just them with a chunk of text or their opinions it’s a still a female. If I don’t ignore my coworkers or hit uninterested then she takes it as disrespect. She only takes it this way because of how big of an clear she’s made it. I understand that these are her boundaries only because of how I’ve fucked up in the past. 

I don’t want it to seem like I’m painting her as this control freak for no reason, I’ve kind’ve forced her into this position. These aren’t all the examples just a few. 

The title of the post is where I’ve felt the most conflicted. My friend passed 5 years ago today and my old acc has their messages on it. I got a notif from my old acc that I am not logged into about some mutual posting a picture. She immediately saw it and left my house (already about to leave anyways). And texts me about how I only have that acc to follow bitches. I had made a whole new acc just to have no one on it and so she knew I didn’t have anyone else. I thought this would be enough, but it wasn’t above and beyond as she needs to be shown and what she’s done for me. I should’ve unfollowed every girl I had on that acc previously but it didn’t cross my mind because I was never on it. 

This was the ultimate sign of disrespect atp in the relationship. She’s given me an ultimatum now if I don’t deactivate the account then we’re over. She’s suggested that if it was really the messages I was worried about then I’d just screen shot them to save. This just really irked me. I love this girl and I want her to be able to trust me again. Is this the way?

Edit: I wanted to add that at the beginning of the relationship I was completely in the wrong. I’d talk to people she didn’t like, I wouldn’t prioritize her, and do things to make her feel disrespected. It wasn’t my intent at all, but it came off that way. In my head I had my own way of balancing my personal relationships and my relationship. We’ve had history for years and we fell off for about a year. During this time I was confident that I learned from my mistakes and wanted to be a more open and friendly and open. I was carrying this sentiment early into the relationship I didn’t want to cut people off because of my relationship with her. I’d already done this and ended up isolated after we had stopped talking. I think this is why she feels so insecure in the relationship. If I’d known these actions would have this much impact I’d do it no hesitation now. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to my family reunion?,"My family planned to go to outer banks for a full week and expects all the grandkids to be there. I (a 24yo male) started a new job about a month ago that really requires me to be there every morning to get the crews ready for the day and schedule their jobs each day. So, taking a week off is out of the question in my opinion. The amount of work that would be built up after the trip would be beyond stressful.

 I’m also saving up money to move out with my girlfriend, and spending $200-$300 dollars on a plane ticket feels like a lot. But I’ve been pressured by multiple aunts and uncles and my own parents to take the full week off of work to go to the reunion. I don’t particularly like that side of the family and made my reasons for not wanting to go clear to EVERYONE. 

I made a concession to drive down (16hr drive) and spend Friday and Saturday with them. But that’s not good enough. There was a plane ticket bought for me recently leaving Wednesday morning, with the implication that I would be paying for it. Am I the asshole for wanting to skip the flight and just not go? ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for a text before having kids to ring a doorbell to play?,"My 38(F) and my husband 39(M), just moved into a new neighborhood in our area with our daughters, 9(F) and 6(F). We have been in this home a total of 3 days. Had to trim a tree down significantly, look to replace some broken appliances, unpack, etc. 

For background we lived in the area and our kids are friends with several children in the area from school. Down the street the 2nd day a girl came and rang our doorbell asking to play with our girls. We happened to be free and they went to her house (have met the parents before). But over the course of 3 days another families children have come over 6 times and rang our bell asking to play with our kids as early as 8. Our oldest and their oldest daughters are the same age. My oldest is very friendly and never wants to exclude or hurt someone’s feelings, however in the past has admitted to not enjoying her company. Their sons are the same age as our youngest and she has no desire to play with them. 

The times they have come however we have been at activities for the kids or just not ready to play (helping unpack, set up rooms, in pajamas) so wasn’t even a factor to ask their feelings of playing with them. I or my husband have had to turn them away as our kids were not available to play. If they had the option we would have had to pull them away to ask (respecting their feelings as well). 

So I texted their mom asking if instead of just sending them to ring the doorbell if she could just text to see if we are home and free?  And expressed some concern with us having tree trimmings and large deliveries sporadically for safety. Hopefully prevent any disappointment as we don’t want to keep having to tell them after coming to our door that they can’t play as our daughters have after school activities frequently as well. This mom snapped back with “so they should never right the bell?  I was taken aback when the boys came to ask and if they don’t want to play that’s fine then. Kids in the neighborhood ring doorbells. We just won’t send them anymore”.  So AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for being toxic towards my 72 y/o grandmother who pays for everything I do?,"I (23F) just moved to Greece with my grandma (who is from there originally). We have a long history together; she raised me and has practically paid for everything that I do as a single parent. I've never had a job before because ""school comes first,"" and seeing as I am applying to a masters program, I have no money to do so. She has given me a 24k budget for tuition, housing, food, travel, etc for an entire year total. Which, in retrospect I should be grateful for (and I am... incredibly). But at what cost? I never noticed it until I left for college, but our relationship is very toxic and at times she can be very emotionally and verbally abusive when she doesn't get her way. I feel like she always holds the fact that she is funding me over my head, and that nothing I ever do will be good enough unless it's exactly how she wants. (Here is 1 of the many examples) I have a very estranged relationship with my mom, but in an effort to mend things, I invited her to my senior dance performance, my grandma thought I was paying more attention to my mom and spending more time with her, so she called my dad behind my back and told him some elaborate story, which made him call me and biitch me out that I ""hurt her feelings."" Which I can acknowledge is true, but was was completely unintentional. Thus, then I tried to rekindle things with my mother, again in college (by inviting her to my graduation as a first gen student) I was shut down and told that it would be a bad idea because my grandma would throw a fit behind closed doors, and it would only just stress me out on a day that's supposed to be about me. But as I graduated, I realized that I HATED my degree and wanted to get a masters in something different. Seeing as I have no money and live at home with her, I would either need to take out a loan or have her pay. Only, she now wants me to stay in Greece with her and attend a more expensive program, because it would be better and more convenient for her if I stay near by. Two of the top programs I want are in Barcelona and cost less tuition than the American school in Greece. We had a HUGE blow up fight about it and now everytime I see her I get practically enraged for seemingly no reasons, or for small things that I wouldn't normally get worked up about. Like recently, she broke her arm and she needed help and when I didn't clean the litter box exactly when she wanted me to, it became a huge thing because she needs help. to be fair, I have been helping her but at my own time. It's just so infuriatinig to have to/want to help someone who never respects my boundaries, makes fun of my mental health issues, comments on my body size and appreasnce, and keeps me around to use as someone to control. I once told her that the second I got the chance, I would leave and I meant it. I could tell it hurt her feelings, and I feel bad but at the same time I just don't want to have anything to do with her, even though I am living off of the funds she gives me.",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to go on the Family Vacation?,"My Father and his gf (not my mother) are planning a Family vacation to Italy that I initially wanted to go to. They showed me the vacation house today and everything was great until my Dad said that he would lend a small bus for us to drive in. So it would be my Dad, his gf, gf's daughter, gf's son and me in one car.

While I don't hate them I also don't like any of them (Aside from my dad) enough to willingly spend multiple hours (would be around 13h drive) in one car. Just five minutes is to much so I told my dad that. He said that we can't go by two Cars because of the Gas prices which is right. So my options now where either going with them or staying home alone.

I said I would rather stay home alone for the time they are on vacation. Even though I agreed to stay Home I'm still upset about it and so is my dad since He wanted me to come along but I'll definitely not torture myself by staying in a tight space with them. But I do feel bad since my father wanted me to come along with them.


So reddit AITA for not wanting to go on the family Vacation even though I initially agreed to go?

(A few details: I'm 19 and have my own car but still live in the same house as my dad and his gf. The Kids are 16 and 11 respectively and were both raised without any actual rules so they are not the best Company at all. The trip would not have been free for me since I would have payed for part of the vacation house, help with the gas and the groceries)",AmItheAsshole
 for asking a professional for advice?,"I am a 31f who just bought a new home and is renovating it. I know absolutely nothing about houses, and how to create a kitchen project. I’m also on a strict budget so I asked a friend (31F) to help me. She has gone through the same thing years ago and has also helped her boyfriend with his own kitchen/home renovation. 

We did a simulation on the IKEA planner and I was pretty happy with the result. She helped me a lot by taking measurements and everything so I’m very grateful for her help. The next day I called the contractor who will renovate the kitchen and he gave me a few pointers and we changed a few things. I then went to the IKEA store to modify my project and to ask a few questions since I had a big doubt about the position of some of the furniture. 

I told my friend all this and she took offence saying I only went to these people because they are so called experts and I don’t trust her. She said that after 5 minutes with the contractor I changed my mind and that he convinced me only because I consider him an expert. In reality it wasn’t 5 minutes but I spent an hour with him taking measurements again and discussing the new kitchen. He made me realize something I hadn’t noticed.

In the end, I sticked with my original idea cause I liked it but I perfected it thanks to the contractor advice. I only modified a small detail of our original project , I’d say maybe 5%. But she is mad at me for going to other people for advice. It’s my first home and I wanted to make sure I had everything right. I know nothing about these things and I’m afraid of choosing wrong so I asked some professionals for their opinion, while also letting my friend help me. I told her this and also told her I’m grateful for her help , but that maybe she is overreacting a bit. She is still angry and not talking to me. Was I an asshole? Should I have handled the situation differently?",AmItheAsshole
 for intervening when my female friend was getting harassed?,"
I (17M) am part of the theatre program at my high school. This year, a girl named Connie joined our group after transferring from another state. She quickly became friends with Henry, another friend of mine, and his girlfriend, as well as with others in our community. Connie is outgoing and kind-hearted, always trying to see the best in everyone, even those who aren't kind to her. While I don't know her extremely well, I consider us friends.

During the closing weekend of our last show, Connie started experiencing harassment from a guy in our group named Carson. Carson is known for his rude and aggressive behavior, which made Connie uncomfortable. Knowing this, Connie asked Henry and his girlfriend, as well as me and a couple of other friends, to keep an eye on Carson during the closing party at Henry's girlfriend's house.

Throughout the party, Carson persistently followed Connie, making her feel increasingly uneasy. At one point, he cornered her, causing her friend to alert Henry and me. Sensing trouble, we rushed to help while Connie's friend sought out her boyfriend, Gabe, for support. 

Upon entering the room, we found Carson yelling at Connie, who looked on the verge of tears. I attempted to calm the situation, but Carson grew more aggressive. Henry intervened by physically pushing Carson away from Connie, while I positioned myself between them to shield her. Henry's girlfriend comforted Connie, who was visibly distressed.

Fortunately, Gabe arrived shortly afterward, and Carson finally left, hurling insults at Connie on his way out. Understandably shaken, Connie and Gabe left the party early.

The next morning, my girlfriend expressed dismay over my actions, suggesting that I prioritized Connie over her and implying that I had overstepped boundaries by intervening physically. She refused to communicate further, leaving me feeling conflicted about whether my actions were justified.

Now, I'm left wondering if I should have intervened at all. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my ex husbands baby mama near our children.,"So for a bit of background.. me 26f and my ex husband 28m spilt up in June and got divorced in December of last year, after finding out that he had been having an affair with my best friend 28f. 


She had been going through a divorce herself and i really didnt thank that they would stoop so low, but it happened and i found out on the day of our youngest daughter's birthday..

However she would gaslight me into thinking i was imagining things and telling me she would never want to be in a relationship with him, while telling him they needed to go look at houses together while I'm in the same room as them(i was getting the rest of my belongings). 

They started their relationship within a week of me moving out... During the months from June to December, both of them were incredibly nasty towards me and threatened to take away my daughters 9f and 3f because I'm unstable because of my depression. 


I found out the she was pregnant after them being together for 5 months, and then they split up because she attacked my ex husband in front of the children. Although she claimed she was certain my ex was the father there was a time in which she wasn't sure and wanted to raise the baby on her own. 

But about a month ago she got back in touch with my ex husband and they have become close again... 

So where the issue comes in is i dont want her around my children as she has often told them that she will be their new mommy because she is pregnant with their baby sister and that daddy loves her more than he loved mommy and she will be a better mommy for them when they get married... 

She has also had my children lie to me when they are spending weekends at their dad's place by telling them to tell me she wasn't there and that i will lose my temper with them if they told me she was ( I've always assured my daughters that i wont be angry with them if they tell me the truth in regards to that and that my ex and his baby mama is in the wrong)

I dont want that woman around my children regardless of her being pregnant with their half sister yet my ex husband thinks im being unfair towards her because she has ""changed"" 

Am i the asshole for not wanting her around my daughters?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my friend live in my house while he visits?,"I will use fake names for privacy. 

So, my friend Jo (27M) lives on the other side of the country and is coming to my city to meet his GF, Bo (27F) who is flying in from another country for a few months. So, around the end of March, through text, he told me he is coming in May. On 3rd April, he asked me if he can crash at my place and gave me the dates - 21st to 27th May. I said, yes, he can. 

Context for the apartment in question. My family has two apartments. The first, my uncle bought back in the 90s. I have lived in this apartment since I was born. The second belongs to my parents since 2014. From 2017 - end Jan 2023, I was living in that apartment, alone. The two are on either end of the city. It takes about 40 mins b/w them.

There were many times I hosted my friends, including Bo, who is closer to me, there for a few days. One of these times, Jo had come too. They lived in a hotel for a day and then stayed at mine for a week. I used to do most of the cooking and house chores, because I wanted to. My friends paid for some groceries and meals, but every other bill was paid either by me or my parents.

Then, in Feb 2023, I had to come to the old apartment, where my uncle lives. I have moved almost everything important from the other apartment to this.  So, the new apartment is vacant, collecting dust. When my father is here, we go and get it cleaned, but only the bare minimum, and once every few months. If I wanna house guests there, I would have to pay to get it deep cleaned, wash and change all the sheets, and buy a lot of groceries.

The reason I agreed to him crashing in the new apartment like the last time was because the weather was nice and I was going out a lot, getting a lot done. Getting the house cleaned did not feel daunting at the time. Yesterday, my dad told me to ask him not to, because at some point they will take me for granted. There is also a heatwave going on for weeks now, and it's impossible to go out, let alone travel back and forth b/w the two apartments to get the other one to be habitable. I told him and Bo, that I won't be able to host them, that my mom wasn't happy with the arrangement and it was too hot to get anything done. My argument is the same, and that I gave them almost a month's notice. At first I felt guilty, but then they began to say that I should have told them before so he did not plan for so many days and booked flights. Now he has to change flight dates and, acc. to Bo, it will be a big fin. burden on him to do that AND get a hotel room. She can't keep him in her house because of her parents, but doesn't want to live with him in a hotel because last time, the hotel was terrible. I looked for good places for him for this time.

Bo is messaging me, telling me that it is very financially stressful for them, and maybe he should just not come. This is making me feel cornered and pressured to say yes to housing them.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to watch my niece for a week?,"I (31F) have been with my partner Nolan, (32M) for 4 years. We have a 2 year old daughter Maria, and live together. He has a brother Dario(21), that also has a 2year old daughter, Rene with his girlfriend Kelly(20). Recently they came to me to ask if I would be willing to babysit their daughter for a week during the school holidays as their normal babysitter (Renes maternal grandma) is going on holiday and they don't have the funds for a babysitter.

I told them I don't feel comfortable looking after Rene as I have never babysat her before and only ever spend time with her at family gatherings,etc. They tried to convince me by telling me I have the time and it would be good for the girls to spend more time with one another.

I still said no. I am planning on going away for two weeks including the week they want me to babysit to visit my sister in a city 4hours away. They said I could take her with. I still said no, I will be staying at my sisters house and although it has the space I am not inconveniencing her by bringing a child she doesn't know to her house. She also WFH so I would be going to other family members nad friends I haven't seen in a year the first 3 days we are there since she will be working those days.

Having my daughter to travel with will be exhausting enough, I do not have the energy for another child. They have been blowing up my phone and included MIL in the argument. She is taking their side as Dario is her golden child and Rene is definitely her favourite grandchild.

I got fed up and said maybe MIL should take some personal vacation days to babysit her grandchild instead of forcing me to do it.

They tried to get Darios aunts and uncles involved but they are all on my side as I am closer to them and told them exactly why I didn't want to babysit.. I am now being called an a\*\*hole who doesn't think of anyone else by MIL, BIL and his girlfriend.

I really don't think I am TA. I am very strong minded and refuse to be forced into anything. But am I wrong? Should I help them?

  
Edit:

My partner agrees with me, he has also been wanting to go to my sister's for a while and even took the time off to go as my brother who is he close friends with also lives in the same city.

He has told his brother, mother and Rene to back off. He told me to block them but I dont want to as I feel there are better ways to resolve this. I asked him if we could possibly help them pay a babysitter as we are able to but he doesn't want to as he feels its time to cut the cord and let his brother figure things out for himself.

  
We came over today to have lunch with all of them. 

SIL and BIL were still adamant that we help them while MIL has now changed her mind. 

Apperently she didnt know we're planning on going away. She has told them to make other arrangements or take leave if need be but to let me and my family enjoy our time together. ",AmItheAsshole
 that I exploded to my mother? ,"Haii, good day! This is a throwaway account and English isn't my first language my apologies for any mistakes. 

An hour ago I left a family dinner with my younger brother after I exploded to my mother. She kidnapped us when I was 6 and my younger brother 5, eleven years ago. To this day she believes this wasn't kidnapping because we're her children and she's our mother. Also very stubborn. 

We were arguing about something unimportant I was trying to get done for my younger brother when he told me to drop it, so I did. Immediately after, my mom told me we must just 'listen to their mother,' to her new husband. It sparked another fire in me that, this time, I didn't manage to hold in. I asked her 'We have to listen without being allowed to offer our opinions?' in which she repeated we must just do what she says.

After, I retorted to my mom,' You want us to be your slaves?"" She got defensive, whining about how she was doing so good and great as a mom for us and how we should be more respectful, so I nearly screamed at her: ""Then why do you keep pressing on about issues I've told you many times I don't want because it makes me uncomfortable?"" she always keeps asking every single visit I have with her about when I'm going to sleep over at her house. When I didn't have her phone number yet about when she'd get my phone number. She only gives 50 a month for childcare, too, for each child.

While I had my eyes mostly focused on her as I kept demanding her for an answer she kept trying to deflect back to the previous issue about the small argument, I did manage to see the reaction of the others. My two cousins couldn't understand a thing but looked worried at my mother, her husband (previously tried to keep butting in to help my mother  until my Lil bro told him to shut up and keep out of the argument) was glaring angrily at me, and her husband's friend did too albeit not as furiously. My Lil bro really wanted me to shut up at the beginning too but then let me continue on, probably because this was the first time I refused to listen to him. After we left he told me he was on my side.

But since the other adults were on my mother's side, even though the cousins didn't understand a word I'm like 100% sure they're going to stand by my mother's side, I was wondering if I went too far. My father told me to be kind too (for the last 10 days because we're on a holiday with my mom, another thing I only agreed to because she just kept on asking and asking) after I told him about the situation. I mean, she does try I suppose by gifting us 70 a month and some clothes when we go to her (which is usually once every few months). She tells me often how she cries every time we left her again, and especially when we were angry at her. Back when we were young, I especially wasn't the kindest. I'd often run away from her.

I guess this is more like a: AITA for not being sympathetic to my mother? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not taking down an instagram story?,"I (18F) had my high school graduation 3 days ago. After the ceremony we all stay at the venue to have dinner and take pictures together. Last year I came out as a lesbian to basically everyone at school. This year, there are 7 people in my chemistry class and one of them (17M) hates doing experiments. He sits right behind me so I would always help him out. From the first experiment we did in September, it started a running joke of calling the other our lab partner for life. So after graduation we took a selfie together, where we are just standing and smiling at the camera. We aren't even touching shoulders.

One day and a half after graduation, I posted our selfie and captioned it ""lab partners for life"" and tagged him in it, and he liked the story and replied ""fr"". An hour later, he asked me to take it down because his girlfriend was mad. I told him to tell her that I'm gay and he said it wouldn't matter to her and asked me to just take it down. This whole time, I was getting ready for my sister's wedding with the other women in the family so I asked them for advice and everyone said I shouldn't delete it if I don't want to. I told him I'm sorry but it's my graduation too and I don't want to take it down, but I won't include it in my feed posts and I'll be happy to talk to her and try to sort it out. He asked me to crop him out of it but I got caught up with the wedding and now the story has expired, but I think he's mad at me.

For added context, I didn't even know that he was dating anyone until he asked me to take the story down, and I don't know who his girlfriend is. If he had asked me not to share the picture when we took it or at any point in the day and a half before is posted it, I wouldn't have posted if in the first place. But the story has been up for an hour and he had already reacted well to it. He has also been posted and tagged in small group pictures on the feed of another classmate (19F). So AITA for not taking down my story?",AmItheAsshole
 if I moved out early?,"Hello, this is a sort of messy situation that's been picking at me for a while. My opinion keeps unbalancing, and I keep considering myself immature for what I think, so other opinions would be appreciated.

To start out, I (15f), have moved around a lot in my life. I have not gone to the same school for more than three years in a row, so I never really knew what it was like to know everyone in one place since childhood. My parents moved us in with our grandparents for a short amount of time while they found a home for us.
I settled in extremely well, for whatever cursed reason. I always had trouble fitting in just right, constantly feeling insecure, but I just seemed to click here. I found myself, and I found what I enjoyed. I was generally well-known, and I picked up several talents, skills, and made some memories and had new experiences that people my age don't come across too often (one of those was working a job. I was 14 at the time.) I think I enjoyed living there so much because I felt like I was being treated my age for once. My parents have always seemed to downplay me and discard my opinions and feelings simply because I'm younger. Yet I could feel my time there coming to an end. I knew we had a year, but the longer we spent there, the less willing I was to let go.
Towards the end of my time there, my aunt and uncle (I'd assume sensing how distraught I was), decided to ask my parents if there was any chance they could leave me with them for the remainer of my high school career. I could fly out to visit them with the money from my job. and I could continue to live my life without it being uprooted. I jumped on this right away, begging my parents to let me stay with them. My parents refused to budge, however. They never gave me a proper argument. We just moved away. They did promiss, however, that if I didn't enjoy it here for a year, they'd move me back.
Over this past year or so, I've felt my mental health slipping. Everytime I bring these concerns up to my parents, they insist they'll do something about it and then never do. After months of persisting, my parents grated me a visit, and I decided to take that. As expected, I didn't feel completely okay again. But I felt more supported than I had in months. It all felt normal and fresh, like I had never moved away. I realized the opportunities I had missed out on, where I could have gotten ahead of the curve. Now I have no room for that, even if I wanted to go back before high school was over, it's going to be less enjoyment because I'll need to make up the credits I'm missing for that school.
When I returned from the trip, something I had aniticipated for months. My father pushed my move back another year. And I couldn't take him at his word anymore because he had done this so many times. He keeps telling his friends how stupid I'm being for only focusing on moving back, and I feel like an idiot for wanting to go back. My parents keep ignoring my arguments and dodging my issues.",AmItheAsshole
 in this relationship argument?,"Long story short. I have a recurring argument with partner.
They say my way of commenting is rude and insulting.

I think I was trying to flatter them, and that they understand it wrong, and I've been pushing this viewpoint obstinately.
Here's an example: a comment from me after they got a haircut: ""oh, you're planning keep it like that?"" and after confirming, I said to the effect of ""Ok, nice."" 
I feel like I was not being rude, but after several arguments over the fact -  I was asked to post it here for peer review.",AmItheAsshole
 for standing up for myself and hurting my parents,"I married a guy my parents didnt like 10 years back. My parents hated it, then grew to love my husband over my other inlaws and they even helped in the wedding financially. My Dad's cousin and family did not come to the wedding citing their opposition. They berated me in my chats, to other relatives and were downright hostile, not locking eyes with me for public events. This hurt my parents too, but they have since forgiven them and used to attend their partys.  
Me and my husband stay away from toxic family members. Although one or two in the family had become cordial in the recent years, I still do not like them for the way they treated me and my family.  
Recently due to family pressure I invited them to my kids birthday too, which they didnt come for, since we didnt go for one of their functions either. Now they have invited us for another one of their functions which my Dad is emotially manipulating me to go for. In addition other family members have also called to ask us to join, since they feel I should be the one to break the Ice. I have asked them why should i be the one to break the ice, considering they were the ones who stopped talking to me and berated me. They said someone should stip this drama for the sake of the family and it should be me who should be initiating contact. I have been fighting with my family daily over this as the date approaches.  
My dad is now really hurt that I am not forgiving them and not taking the first step in Amends. Me and my husband think they should be the ones talking to us first and making amends, since they were hostile not just to us, but to our parents too years back.  
AITA for refusing to make amends with a toxic family and hurting my parents because of that?

1. Me and my husband decided to not to go a toxic family members function even though my parents and other family members have been calling to make us attend it. In addition in the multiple calls i had with my family, i set my boundaries, that i do not appreciate the way they are guilt tripping me to take the first step, when the issue was with the toxic family member.
2. Usually if we set boundaries and do not say yes to our parents , this makes us assholes in our community. Being Asian is being a people pleaser. I had to go to therapy to break out of my people pleasing tendencies. Now I am questioning if I am actually an asshole for not listening to my parents even though i worked hard during therapy break out of my people pleasing tendencies",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to take my nephew's girlfriend out for pizza?,"I (35F) invited my nephew (18M) and his girlfriend (21F) over for dinner tonight. I do this with my niece and nephew and their SO's every few months just because it's a good way to catch up on things, I like to cook and they enjoy home cooked meals without having to lift a finger or do dishes :D . (Young people with full time jobs I get they don't cook every night)

My nephew has a new girlfriend and I invited her along, since she is an extremely picky eater (not because of mental health issues or ED's or anything just extremely picky) I asked her before hand what she liked to eat and catered a full meal to her liking with her food preferences.

I spend the whole day doing groceries and cooking today as it's my only day off from work and like I said I enjoy cooking so I do not mind this at all. And I also invited my mother so she can see her grandson and I always make way too much anyways.

I had just finished everything in prep work that I could when my nephew calls and I can tell he's sort of awkward in calling. I ask him what's up and he very carefully asks me if it's okay that we just go out for pizza instead tonight. I explain to him I rather not since i've been cooking all day and it'll just go to waste and he explains to me that his girlfriend only likes the foods she told me she liked when they come from fast food places and she's worried she won't like it so she'd rather either not come at all or go out for pizza (implied that i'm paying for all the pizza as well).

I can tell he's sorry for the drama but I inform him that im just not gonna budge on this and I won't be springing for pizza when i've been cooking  all day and that she doesn't have to come then I'll just see him and my mom. But she would prefer him staying home as well if I won't cater to her needs. And since the car is in her name I would have to go pick him up which is half an hour back and forth for me at this point and not ideal.

At this point I was annoyed and told her she was kind of being disrespectfull and entitled and he said he agreed but just couldn't deal with the drama of her right now.

I told my mom this and she said that it's financially no problem for me to spring for the pizza's and I could just portion out the food and put it in the freezer and it's about  all of us being together not about  what we actually eat and that I was being an asshole for not accomodating my guest?

so, am I the asshole?

UPDATE: Wow this blew up more than I thought it would :)!

I ended up following the advice given here and texted my nephew that if he still wanted to come by himself over I'd spring for an uber for him. He basically just texted me a bunch of hearts back so he also loved the idea!

I also ended up telling my mom the dinner was off, that way I could have the alone time with him. As he is also my godson we're very close. He said girlfriend wasn't happy he was leaving her for the night but apparantly he had told her to stick it because he was over her drama. We had a great dinner together the two of us and he talked a lot about his doubts in his relationship and is concidering breaking up with her not just over this but many other things.

It ended up being a really fun evening just the two of us, and I send him home with a big batch of Auntie's special brown butter brownies (just yummy special not ""special"" :D before you all ask LOL!)

So thanks everybody for all the great advice &lt;3

Small Edit: Since people keep asking me, I got the Brownie recipe off of Tiktok about a year ago and the creator's name is BromaBakery Enjoy guys! ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to move from our home town for a better life for our kids? ,"AITA I want to move North, Wife refuses to think about it. 

I (34m) talked to my wife (33f) about moving north from our current town. 

We currently live in southern England, on the coast. We have 2 children M (13) and F (10).

They currently share a room as we have a 2 bedroom flat, rented, for £900 a month. The flat has no outside space or parking. 

I recently started a new job, completed my probation and got a pay rise to £28k per annum. My wife doesn’t work and we get some benefits worth around £1100 a month on top of my wages. 

The kids can’t share forever. I want to move to a 3 bedroom. But the prices in the area for those are £1400/£1600. Even with my wages we would need a gauruntor for the remaining and we would be barely scraping by after food and car costs. 

My work has a secondary office up north, outside Sheffield. I looked up the price for a 3 bed up there, with a garden, driveway and close to local schools and found a lovely one for £750 a month. I know work wouldn’t care which office I worked from. Even remote. 

We can’t afford to live in our home town. So I spoke to my wife about it. She shot the idea down straight away. Her reason is her ‘support network’ as she does have anxiety issues. She does choir practice, has a few friends, and all our family live close by. She doesn’t want to leave and I understand that. But the quality of life for our kids and ourselves will be better, a bigger house with more space, outside area for the summer, a drive for the car, extra money for holidays etc. 

When we moved to where we are now she hated it as she was further from her mom. By 30 minutes. We only see her mom once a month if that. The drive is around 4 hours each way from where I want to move. A lot but doable in a weekend each month if we wanted to. 

The last words my wife said on the subject before I went to do the weekly food shop, was if you want to go with the kids, go! 

AITA for wanting to move? AITA for thinking about what she said at the end seriously? ",AmItheAsshole
? Declutter and Organize House In Prep for Selling Next Summer?,"I will be 65 in October.
My husband will be 65 in July
2025. We have a two story home for 3 people (husband, 95 y/o Mom and me). My son and daughter have their own apartments and store some of their stuff here , not much and I don't mind. I  explained to my husband, son, and daughter at least three months ago that in preparation for our putting the house on the market June 2025ish I was going to start systematically going through the basement, attic and closets to organize and declutter. My husband and I agree in downsizing and that this house is too much to maintain physically and financially as we get older and will be on fixed incomes on the future. In a side note, I  have lived here ten years since my divorce from first husband, and the house is a that I received from the settlement-still need to maintain, pay taxes, utilities). I also work full time and I am the major breadwinner. Ideally I would like to move out of state depending on everyone's health and if not downsize in the state we now live in now. Well,  I started with the basement yesterday as promised and everyone knew in advance. It take 4 hours with a friend (not bad ) and we have a yard sale, sell online, and throw out pile. Most of the stuff was my husbands and sons so I put their stuff neatly in boxes a for them to individually go through to decide what they want to keep, donate, etc. at their convenience.  Next month I will move on to the attic and work my way around the house to declutter in prep for going on the market and to help make moving a little easier. 
Well, everyone/meaning husband and kids -are ""annoyed"" with me for starting to declutter and organize now saying ""if we/you are moving next year,  that's when you do this, it makes no sense that you are doing this now.""  AITA for starting to declutter and start organizing stuff now in preparation for putting the house on the market summer 2025?  I feel it will help streamline the sale and moving process while reducing some stress-AITA?  I am getting quite the cold shoulder(s) and I am trying to process this. Thank you. ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my little brother to voice-talk at videogames less?,"I live with my family (I'm still quite young) and there's my little brother (he's 15) whom plays videogames voice talking with his friends for several hours a day (at least 5/6 hours a day). The walls of our house are thin and you can hear ANYTHING from a room to another.   
I told him kindly to cut a bit on his call time like doing 2/3 hours but he's not caring, I also talked with my other co-familiars and he keep not caring or the co-familiars tell me it's my fault I hear it loud or just find a way to tell me I'm the actual asshole for not letting him play and that I'm pretending too much (because ""don't try ever to say families should just accept and respect everything everyone inside them does"" basically their words).  
Keep in mind I'm also diagnosed neurodivergent which my family knows really well so it's extra hard for me to deal with noises. Also I'm often at home studying.  
My brother's been voice talking like this since he was 10, he stopped for a few months recently and he just started again like nothing was.  


AITA for pretending my lil brother to voice talk a bit less?",AmItheAsshole
 for not answering my friend's messages?,"Hi. So, for context, this friend and I had lost contact over the summer as they didn't have a phone at the time, and we live far away from each other. We reconnectted this past September and messaged semi-frequently for months afterwards. Around the beginning of this time and during our conversations, I mentioned my dislike of texting/calling and how I prefer to speak in person.

Now, this person later became more clingy and physically affectionate in person and it bled into their texts. (Their nickname for me for the longest time was 'Cutie'). And I began to get uncomfortable and didn't speak up.

I soon began to stop messaging back, ignoring them until later hours until I merely left them on read every so often. This turned into infrequent messages. And then I would only text when out or on long car rides. And they would complain. And I would apologize, explain I spent my time with my family. My time on social media was limited, etc. etc.

Around the beginning of this month, April, around the 7th? They began to ignore me. They brushed me off and only spoke to me while in group conversations. At the end of the first week of this, I asked them if they hated me or why they were ignoring me, and they explained they were treating me the way I was treating them. 

So, AITA for ignoring my friend's text messages?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my best friends ex fling that she’s talking to his best friend?,"Throwaway. I (21f) and my bestfriend (22f) have been friends since our freshman year of highschool. I later made more friends that were added into our group. During our sophomore year, we met these 2 guys that went to a neighboring high school. They were both in the grade above us. She ended up talking to one of the guys (We’ll call him Johnathan) and I ended up talking to the other, Johnathan’s best friend, (we’ll call him Connor). Since they went to a different high school, and both mine and my best friends parents were strict, we were on and off talking to them.

 Although, throughout the years, Johnathan stayed in love with my best friend. She liked him back but not in the same way. Whenever we would get chances to hang out with them once in a blue moon, they would rekindle their little fling and as would Connor and I. Connor and I were never as serious as my friend and Johnathan. Johnathan ended up staying in our friend circle but Connor drifted off.

Fast forward to now, I go to college abroad and haven’t talked to Connor since high school, however, we somehow got in contact and started talking again. Talking about living together once i come back to the states. It was never that serious though.

I came to visit for spring break and saw him a few times and things were cutesy and flirty between us. However, once i left. They all had a big falling out with Johnathan. Apparently, he was shit talking everybody idk. I wasn’t there. I know i should take the side of my friends and cut Johnathan off, but my brain couldn’t really process everything i guess. Terrible excuse on my part. Connor ended up joining the friend group and distanced himself a bit from Johnathan too. 

Connor stopped talking to me and I noticed him and a few friends (including my best friend) were getting weirdly close, to the point i could tell something was going on. I’m a very understanding person and I would never intentionally put a man over my friends. If a friend wanted to talk to an ex fling, go for it. Just don’t hide it from me. Well, I found out that my best friend and Connor had started talking and sneaking around behind my back. Everybody in the circle knew, but nobody told me. Finally, she told me. I was hurt to say the least. Mainly because she kept it a secret from me for a couple weeks. I would have never done that to her. That’s girl code. I was pissed enough to text Johnathan and tell him everything. 
 1/2
",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to spend as much time as I can in my own house in the country for the last two months before I move in with my long distance boyfriend?,"I'm currently in a long distance relationship and after a couple of years we've decided to move in together. I'm 35 F and live alone in the remote countryside of central CA, and he (33) lives in a cluttered city apartment with very little space for me and my stuff when I visit. We will be moving into a new apartment that has room for both of us, however I do really love my home and where I live and how I keep my space, and while I'm excited to move into a new part of my life and understand I will have to compromise on what our shared space looks like, I love what I have and will be sad to leave it.

I have two more months here and want to spend as much time as I can here, and expressed this to him to which he said he understood and had empathy for my reasoning. However, he shows frustration and irritation with me when he tries to plan last minute weekend trips and asks me to stay at his place for two weeks at a time for convenience, which is really difficult for me as a remote worker who takes lots of meetings. I also get stressed in small cluttered spaces (which he insists he will de-clutter when we move in together). Another thing to note is that he is not able to make the journey up to me because he doesn't drive, so it's literally all on me to drive to him if we want to see eachother.

Is his frustration warranted and I'm just a huge ass for wanting to soak in my last bit of being an independent 30 something before I start a life with someone, leave the countryside and move to the city for him?",AmItheAsshole
 if I chose not to invite my sister to my wedding?,"I (24F) am getting married to my (25M) fiancé in September, 2024. My sister and I have never really been close growing up, and it grew worse when I moved out in 2021. I met my boyfriend in May of 2023 and got engaged in January 2024. Back in October 2023, my stepdad had money set aside for me that I was allowed to use for emergency use while he was in Florida. I brought $400 of the $1000 on my trip to 6 flags with my friend from Michigan, and planned to pay him back whatever amount I used. When my boyfriend came over shortly after the trip, the full $600 was still where it was hidden. 

The morning he left, it was still there, and so was my sister (who was doing laundry at the house) later that night when I came home from work, she was gone and $300 was missing. after trying to prove my boyfriend innocent, she said “you only trust him because he’s your boyfriend”. Which is true, but he never stole the money because the full $600 was there *AFTER* he left to go back home. the only culprit would be my sister. 

NOW, months later, my mom and stepdad finally believe me that she took the money, and therefore I do not want her at my wedding if she’s going to steal money. ",AmItheAsshole
" for letting my kids disturb my husband during an important work meeting, after he said he would handle them for a day to prove how easy my job is?","I'm 31F and my husband is 36M. We have two boys, a 5yr old and a 7yr old. My husband works in an office and he has the option to work a few days a week from home, but he prefers not to because he says it's easier to focus in the office. I run a small business from home. I don't have a lot of daily work, just some emails and planning (maybe 3 hours a day?)  but the business does make about a third of our household income. But my younger son is home all day and just dealing with him takes a lot of energy. He's really high energy and will probably wreck something if you leave him alone for an hour. And then the older one comes home at 3 and both of them are with me until 8 or 9, which is when my husband usually comes home. A few days ago, I was really tired and I didn't make dinner. When my husband came home I asked him if we could just order something. He was also tired and we were both short tempered so we ended up snapping at each other. 

He said I should have at least ordered before he got home and he was hungry, I said I forgot and it's not fair that food is always my problem. He said that I'm home all day and I even admit I don't have much work to do, so I'm basically a SAHM and should at least take care of dinner. I said he has no idea how much I do everyday, and he said he'd handle the kids for an entire day while also working from home just to prove it should be easy for me. I said sure, so he made the arrangements to work from home yesterday. 

  
I slept in, and when I woke up he was already frazzled from getting the older one ready for school. He ended up having to cancel a meeting to make breakfast, and was worried about that. Then when he took another meeting later on, the boys went out to play in the yard and got super muddy and left footprints all over the house. which he then had to mop, and I didn't help at all. By this point I did feel sort of guilty because it was definitely harder for him to take care of work at the same time, but all I wanted was an apology. He said he was doing this to show that I do nothing all day, and if he just admitted he was wrong I would have helped out straight away. 

Later on he had another meeting, and he told the boys not to bother him for an hour. But about 20 mins in, they got in an argument about something and our younger one went into my husband's room to complain. He was really loud and my husband's video was also on, then he told the kid to leave him alone but he was upset and crying and wasn't listening. After a few mins my husband went back to the meeting and apologized to the other people. when it was finished, he was really angry at me. he said I could see what was happening and I just watched him struggle without helping. I said all you had to say was please help, he said I shouldn't be so petty and prideful. This probably made him look a bit stupid in front of his manager, but it was only a few minutes and I don't think It was the huge deal he made it out to be. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling my family I got eloped ,"A year ago my husband (24 M) and I (24F) eloped after being together for 8 years. Before we got eloped we were planning a wedding, potluck style. My husband didn't really care for the wedding but he was willing to do it for me. The reason why he wasnt so caring for the wedding is because my husband's family isn't from this country, he only had 6 family members to invite and I had 82.

As I was preparing my wedding my dad tells me that the family is talking behind my back. My dad was visiting his sister when he heard she was on a facetime call with many of my dad's other siblings (my dad is 1 of 7). On the call they were saying that my wedding is gonna be ghetto, cheap, broke @ss, hillbilly trash because I didn't want to spend more than 20k and it was gonna be potluck. They also continued saying if they had to cook then they won't come, my dad got upset and asked her if they were talking about his daughter. They laughed and said ""yeah your daughter is an embarrassment"", my dad then told me all of this and said he fully supported what I wanted to do next.

After hearing this I was completely unmotivated to continue with the plans of a wedding. I told my parents that we will get eloped and they fully supported us. The following week we were at the altar with both sets of parents as witnesses.

Once the rest of the family found out everything erupted. It's been a year and my family still hasn't said congratulations. I got a hold of one of my aunt's and she told me how disappointed she was in me, I told her it wasn't fair on how the family it treating me since everyone else in the family has gotten eloped as well. She then called me selfish because I took the opportunity away from the family to have a reunion. All my aunts, uncles, and cousins have me blocked since I got eloped and refuse to talk to me and my parents. If you're wondering why they're ignoring my parents it's because they believe my parents shouldn't of gone to my elopement to support the family. AITA 
",AmItheAsshole
 for not adding onions on a Pizza?,"So...this is going to sound dumb, I know...I'm currently trying to wrap my head around it and I just need a place to vent becuase Im so tired...

So (for some context) growing up, my dad has grown to be...unstable. The older we get, the more immature he gets. He gets upset over small things, becomes a hypocrite, and will scream and get himself riled up just for the sake of there being an argument. I'm constantly being gaslit and I just do my best to ignore it, while guiding my younger siblings to try and not let it get to them. My dad has gotten a little better recently, but I'm not going to lie, I struggled to trust his change because I know that one day his ""kindness"" will all go away, but even so I try and be a little optimistic.

Now, back to the actual story...

Tonight he said he was going to cook something and it didn't defrost, so he said he would cook it tomorrow. In the moment hearing that, I decided to make some pizza from scratch because after my dad said that, I didn't know if we were going to have dinner so I took initiative just in case. Everything went fine, I made the dough and made it a simple pepperoni pizza. Now my dad and siblings wanted other toppings (like onions and hot dogs), and I sighed and made another dough. I didn't want to make another pizza to be honest, but I didn't want them to be dissapointed.

I made it very clear to them, that if they wanted to add certain toppings, they could prep it and just add it to the pizza. I'll make and roll out the dough, and they can just add what they want. My siblings agreed but my dad didn't want to prep his onions, so he didn't which was fine for me. Just incase, I made the crust thin (he likes thin crust) and baked it when it was done.

Fast forward, I'm finished cleaning and am getting ready for bed, when my dad calls me. I go to him and he begins to say the following:

""why didn't you prep the onions for me? it's so simple why didn't you do it? Why were you so selfish. I don't want to eat your pizza if you are going to be like that."" 

and I was...confused to be honest. So, I wanted to ask here, because I'm sick and tired of being guilt tripped over these kinds of things. Just tell it to me straight, Am I the asshole? and if I am...am I that bad of an asshole for not adding onions?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my wife to find a job,"We are married for 10 years. She didn’t work first 5 years and I was ok with it since we had 2 small kids. Then in 6th year, she finds a minimum paid job with remote work. I have been telling her since then to upgrade her skills. We also had a nanny for help and kids were going to school. She just spent her time winging at her job. When the time came they laid her off. Now it’s been 8 months, she still hasn’t found a job and I don’t see much efforts from her to learn anything to find a job. I feel like she is gaslighting me telling me that she is looking for job but not doing what’s needed. She is good at taking care of kids and cooking though. 

We live in hcol area and my salary is barely enough for rent, car, groceries etc. Now kids are missing activities, summer camps. We did 2 or 3 vacations in past 10 years while my friends and colleagues gives everything to their kids that’s needed. We don’t have any savings for retirement. I don’t know how to explain to her. She thinks I’m making enough to lead life and some day she will find a job and everything will be fine. I’m tired working extra hours to make ends meet and can’t afford anything fun in life. I didn’t participate in any sports or extra curricular activities in my childhood because my parents couldn’t afford it. Now I don’t want that to happen to my kids while their friends do after school programs and camps. I really worked hard to reach this to this stage of life and to realize all I make is just enough to eat and pay rent. I can’t even afford own house. Pardon my grammar.

Edit1: I’m also paying her student loans monthly. I came from a poor family and had to clear my own student loans. I used up all my savings to support family.

Edit2: We are renting a house out of our budget for 1 income. We started renting it when we both had jobs and now my credit cards are filing up with monthly expenses. Credit score went down from 800+ to 650. My kids are everything for me. I really hate to break my family and put kids through the suffering but I also hate to be the only one putting efforts to support family.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to prom?,"I (M18) have never been the type to want to go to every single event that’s relevant to my life, prom for my high school is slowly coming and I don’t plan to go to it for a multitude of reasons such as:

1. I don’t have a significant other to go with and most of my close friends aren’t going either

2. The prospect of going alone would make me feel like I’m going just to stand there and look stupid

3. The “remembrance” aspect of it is a load of bull since I’m fairly certain that I won’t remember a gathering which has no significance to me whatsoever.

My mom and other family members heavily wants me to go to prom, so much so that my mom even tried to contact someone I don’t even know to try and get me to take them to prom, they’re the ones which boast about the memory aspect of it however I feel deep down that I’d be able to make better and much more relevant memories at college. Am I the asshole Reddit?",AmItheAsshole
 I asked for my friends to give me cash for my birthday,"So I (16 Female) recently had my birthday party. I asked my friends to not give me some random gift because last year I got mostly perfumes (it's usually a pretty low risk gift to give) and now I have enough to last me years, 15-16 bottles (some boxes had 2 in them).  
Since it is considered rude to send the link to buy whatever you want for your birthday to the attendees (which is stupid  in of itself), I asked them to give me cash, which I could save or get art supplies with.  
According to my parents that is rude as well, for some reason. So now here I am, getting yelled at before I am even fully awake, like I hadn't even opened my eyes fully. wtf.  It's not like I am careless with money, I have saved close to 20,000 rupees (about 230 usd) over the past 7 or 8 months.  
And the funniest thing, I asked my parents to get me the exact same thing (some art supplies) and they said no and told me to ask my friends to get those for me instead, even though I knew most of them would have planned and even bought the gifts for me (this was the day before the party). I was already scared to ask them and my bestie literally had to convince me to ask.  
I said just give me a part of the supplies that I want or some cash (specifically, 1000 rupees, about 11 usd) and he said that my grandmother already gave me the cash and that was from all of the family.  
they even said that I never get them any gifts even though he knows I don't earn (16 year olds getting jobs is very risky in India as we can only do unrecognized jobs like laborer or something) and I don't have time to make them a card or anything either due to studies (9th and 10th are very hectic years in the Indian education system).  
And no, we aren't poor, we aren't rich either but we have a comfortable life and I rarely ask for any gifts or anything, I haven't asked my parents for a bday gift in years. I ask for art supplies or books very occasionally. Often times I am turned down (mainly by my dad but my mom takes his side pretty much always). This has just resulted in my being to afraid to ask them for anything at all. I don't even ask for a pocket money at all.  
so am I the asshole here?

Edit, I should have clarifyed, I wasn't forcing anyone, my exact message was: please don't bring any gifts, I don't need them if you really need to give something, just give me some cash.  


I hope my bad English doesn't make this hard to read",AmItheAsshole
 for not going to a family event for someone I’ve never met?,"I (22m) am still living at home while I’m saving up to move out. I work mostly from home as a video editor. This is important to the story.

So on Friday, my mom comes in and tells me on Saturday (tmrw) that my second cousin was having an engagement party and she wants me, her and my dad to go. 

Ngl, it already kind of annoyed me that she only gave me a day’s notice, I feel that’s kinda inconsiderate for if I didn’t already have plans for the weekend. Especially since I already did for my job. On Saturday, I had two progress meetings with clients and I had to work on a project that was due that Monday. 

Also, this definitely was a deciding factor, I do not know this cousin. I have never met them in my life. In fact, I have rarely met anyone from that side of the family ever in my life. I’m someone who doesn’t believe that just because I’m related to someone, especially when it’s that distant, i owe them something. 

I told my mom about my work obligations, and she pushed if I can move them or skip them. I can’t. She drops it, but she did not say a word to me Saturday morning. Last night when she and my dad came back, she’s just been really passive aggressive about it, telling me, “i should try to be closer with the rest of the family”. That’s just been her mood since then. My dad’s pretty neutral for the most part, but he also said it would’ve made my mom happy. So AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not giving my parent any money?,"For a while now my mom has been forcing me to take 500 dollars out for rent money each month for about a year, but recently I moved over to my grandmother's and she's said to me that I wouldn't haft to pay rent or anything over there while I paid for my college classes.

Fast forward a few months and she's been berating me ever since for money saying I still haft to pay rent, so I caved and said I'd give her 350 when I could, for her insurance and whatever else she needed. 

Now it's been nearly every 2 weeks she asks for it, and she's finally blowing up about needing money for insurance, despite me giving her plenty for it at the start of the month. So, of course I said no, and that she should have that amount. And now I've heard nonstop about how terrible of a child I am for this, and how ungrateful for this. So, AITA for this?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting a relationship with my “sister”? ,"For context: I am a caretaker for an elderly woman and my brother in law and boyfriend do property work on her husband’s property. Now I wouldn’t say it’s been perfect but it’s been okay. Now the issues didn’t start until their “daughter” moved in after she lost her apartment which she shared with her fiancé (the reason why they lost it is because they both kept quiting their jobs after only been there for 3-4 weeks, basically enough to get one check and then stopped going in atleast from what I heard from her on video chat and the stuff her mom has vented to me about.) 
Anyway, she moved in with us and she hasn’t done much of anything, she complains and uses her mild case of back issues as a reason she can’t pick up something that weighs 10-15lbs. (I have two rods and 18 screws in my back and her own parents say I do more than she does). Now we (my brother in law and boyfriend) has already told her parents that she makes them very uncomfortable and does thing that either piss them off (her attitude or the way she speaks to people or the fact that she will ask them to do tasks that she can do example: she asked one of the boys to get her a water bottle! That was 20ft away!!) so in the last month I have told her mother I am done and don’t consider her “family” like I do her and her husband but she (the mother) tells me that her daughter needs me because “everything you tell her she tells her councilor” 🤨🤔 and I brought up the fact that she could be twisting my words and make herself to be the victim (which she does very often example: she asked someone to help her carry a tote box to a shed, the tote box weighed five to ten pounds and when the person said “you asked me for help with this? (Drops item) you can carry that.” (Walks off) and the daughter runs to her mother and father  saying “she screamed at me do something before I snap!” (Now mind you we all saw the situation and the person she asked to help her didn’t yell or anything but literally just talked to her) 
But anyway back to the main point, I told her mother I do not like her attitude, I don’t like how she think she runs each household on this property like she’s paying any bills or doing anything for anyone, BUT helping the dude she’s flirting with, oh yes! She’s engaged telling everyone she and her fiancé (from above) is getting married at the end of the year blah blah blah BUT is up another guys ass! And when I mean up his ass, this women follows this man around like a dog! Everywhere he is, she is. AND EVERYONE SEES IT! BUT NOBODY SAYS ANYTHING! 
But when I tell her mother like hey if she expects me to be her “sister” then she needs to come spend time with me too! Her mother confronts her and all she says is “I’m trying to divide my time between everyone” 🤨🤔 everyone looked at her mother when she said that. We all mutual said “how is she spending time with “her sister” when she’s always over there? (The guy she’s flirting with is living on our property along with his family) 
 ",AmItheAsshole
 for calling one daughter in law more beautiful than the other one(both are of my aunt)?,"My aunt has two boys and the younger one married recently(last month) and the older one got married 3 years ago.On the wedding day during dinner I was having conversation with my uncle and aunt(I am personally close to them) about the wedding,the food,the venue and then the conversation comes to the bride who was standing with the wife of the older son on the stage and my uncle says ""she looks beautiful doesn't she"",now it was my fault that I did not see that the bride's father and mother were sitting nearby vaguely paying attention to what was being said by me and my uncle and  my aunt,and I replied ""yes she does look beautiful but the older one looks even more beautiful"" referring to the wife of the older son.Both the parents of the bride who were sitting there did not take it kindly,they turned around and called me disrespectful,abusive slurs.I,to calm the situation down just left the area and went to my hotel as did not want to be seen as party spoiler.My uncle and aunt have said it was not a big deal but after that I was not invited to the reception and I think it is lucid to know why.So in this situation AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 FOR MOVING OUT OF MY BOYFRIENDS? (F18),"So to explain why I was living with him and his family in the first place was because I was kicked out of my parent's house. I was kicked out because I could not financially support my father's gambling addiction while still in my senior year of high school and he was emotionally abusive to me and i was exhausted and needed to get my things in order for college.

 Me and my boyfriend (M20) were not together at the time of my moving in; I was originally long-term best friends with his sister (F20) and she offered to let me stay while her mom was in jail. Eventually, my boyfriend and I got together and their mom got out of jail but she was okay with me staying as long as I contributed things like gas, groceries, essentials like laundry soap, did chores, etc.

 Flash forward to Easter I went and saw my parents to try and fix things because honestly I missed them despite what they have done to me. Turns out my father was getting help for his addiction and my mother started holding him accountable. They offered to have me move back in and said things would be different this time so I thought about it and had a discussion with my boyfriend's family a week later. Everyone seemed extremely supportive of me hashing things out with them and I told everyone I was going to start slow and spend a week with my family to see how it goes. 

Fast forward to a couple days after I move into my family's again--- It's going fantastic, Im getting to see my siblings again and it truly is different this time around. Then I get a SERIES of texts from all three of them. They are claiming I used them, left at a purposeful time (their mom is struggling with money), left as soon as my ebt card got refilled, did unfixable damage to my relationship, etc etc. 

The only thing I can think of for why they would be mad is the fact that their mom is struggling with a child support case, and she may have to get a job (she is on disability). Their bills are all behind but I feel that I have paid my dues tenfold and at the end of the day why should the stability of the house fall onto me? 

I have continuously given money into their family even when I was not living there, I babysat my friends child and her cousins kid for free all of the time, I fell behind in school because I couldn't get transportation to the bus stop, couldn't have a job because it was a waste of gas (even though i was putting 60 in gas a week), taking out of my college savings (about 2 grand total) to help out, and I was the only one who took care of the house on top of school while their mom was in jail. 

&amp;#x200B;

TLDR; AITA for moving back into my parents instead of staying at my boyfriend's while their mom is struggling with bills. Despite helping out and not being able to get a job because of the situation. 

Am I the asshole for leaving or should I have stayed? 

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for talking shit about my roommates to my partner?,"I (21F) and my partner (23M) are living with another couple (22F and 25M), Sarah and James. We live with them because it's a good way to save money until I finish school in May and start my new job. Sarah is a student and James is a janitor and doesn't make very much. Financially, this was a good decision. Sarah is the most negative person I've ever met. She is constantly talking shit about James to me and tries to get my partner and I to agree then talk bad about each other. Sarah also talks bad about everyone she knows, including my friends and mutaul friends between the rest of us, and I have heard her talk shit about me a few times but I turned on my TV so she knew I was home. Everyone who knows her warns me she is a narcissist and to be careful around her. My coworker is friends with her dad and says that she is bad news. We've been living with them for about a year and our lease ends in about a month. 5 weeks ago I decided I wouldn't talk to Sarah unless she spoke to me first because she was always so negative. We've talked once in the last 5 weeks because James talked to me first and she was there.

This past weekend I had enough and told my partner while in our bedroom that I couldn't handle how rude Sarah was anymore and he suggested I just keep being nice, be the bigger person because we will be living somewhere else soon anyways. I was upset and in that moment felt like he took her side. I went off about what a terrible person she is and how I hate living with them and called her every name under the sun. Yes, even that one. He finally got me to calm down after we argued about a few things for 30ish minutes.

James texted my partner and said he heard a lot of what was said and that he was sorry we felt that way and that he didnt realize we hated both of them but that he can't hang out with someone who doesn't like him. James and my partner have been friends for a very long time and I feel as if I ruined their friendship. My partner responded to James letting him know that there is no issue with him on his end and that he sees James as one of his really good friends. James left him on read. I texted James letting him know I never said anything about him and I think he's a good guy. He ignored me too.

Everything I said about Sarah, as rude as it was, is how I feel. My partner did nothing wrong. He even stood up for James and Sarah when I went too far but they don't care to hear it. They eavesdropped only to hear me say I hated living here and i hated Sarah. My partner says he isn't mad at me and he's upset that they were eavesdropping (we spoke very softly for the whole thing). Am I the asshole? Is there a way I can make this next month less terrible?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my wife I don't like my wedding bands ,"15 years ago, in total spur of the moment, my partner asked me to marry her. A month or so later, she asked again, on bended knee and with a ring. I said yes (obviously) and proceeded to hint at the style of rings that I liked. I circled rings in magazines and conveniently left them around the house or gushed over rings I'd see on TV etc.  The one thing I had asked or hinted at while we were dating was no diamond rings.  I would prefer a Sapphire. 
Christmas Eve 2008, on a starry she asked. To my utter surprise, it was NOT the style I expected. Mind you, it's beautiful, with a Sapphire center, with diamonds and sapphires encircling the band, gorgeous. 
 However, I'm a really simple girl, and the ring is way more flashy with thick bands and large stones. Opposite my style and personality.  

I didn't have the heart to tell her at the time I didn't like it and have chosen to wear it for the past 15 years. 
In the past few years,  I've made comments to change my wedding bands into more of a style. better suited to me. 
I've explained it doesn't really suit my style, and if I'm the one wearing it, it should be what I like. 
When I mention it to her, she gets defensive and assumes I'm criticizing her and being ungrateful, and we end up having an argument and I drop it. 

I don't want to hurt her feelings. I also don't want to wear these anymore. 

AND

I don't want to be an asshole. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not appreciating camping gear as a graduation gift?,"For context, I have always hated camping. Since I was a child this was a well documented fact and routinely the butt of family jokes. On the other hand, my mother loves to go camping/hiking/backpacking and has trips planned almost every other weekend until September. 

She’s recently expressed that she wants camping to be something that we do together after I graduate from college in a week or so. Last summer, we went on a camping trip with extended family in which I borrowed a sleeping bag and mentioned that it was comfy. When asked if I would want one in case of future trips, I said that I by no means needed one but would be happy to have one if it went on sale or something to that effect.

What started as a sleeping bag has now become that, a blow-up mattress, a tent, a backpack including poop shovels, and various other things. Not only do I have now a bunch of camping gear but more recently I have received the news that this gear is in fact my graduation gift. 

I’m not saying I don’t appreciate the sentiment nor that I don’t acknowledge the money that went in to getting those things, but every time my mother brings it up I can’t help but wish she had thought of something else. Not only does she know I don’t care for camping but as my mother who I am close with I feel overlooked and misjudged on the things I actually like. I’m graduating from film school and have always especially adored photography. When I was asked a while back if I had any ideas for graduation gifts, my first answer was a camera as I have never had one of my own. This is the only thing that I have consistently wanted (and expressed wanting) for several years.

Now my best friend has mentioned that their parents, who historically don’t gift well at all and aren’t the greatest in general, are giving her the camera which I have wanted for years. My mother knows this, and when I heard I expressed doubly that I would love to have something along those lines. I am the first in my family to have achieved a degree, and while I wasn’t even expecting any graduation gift in the first place, I do feel like the one that I’m being given is not one that is really for me - rather, it is something which my mom got for me so that she could guilt me into staying at home longer in order to camp with her as opposed to moving away for work. 

Even then, those camping trips that I mentioned? The ones that she has planned through the next year? I’m not going on any of them. Instead, my mom has decided that I have PROMISED her (never did anything of the sort) that I will stay home for the year so that I can watch the house and pets while she goes off and does her soul searching. I’ve been told that to get a job and move away before they are done is inconveniencing her and causing her stress, so if I want to stay in her good graces I need to be her house sitter and wait to actually get a job until it’s convenient for her. 

AITA for being upset about this?  ",AmItheAsshole
 Telling kid she cant go to Prom because she got drunk and lied.,"Hi,

Trying to figure out how best to deal with a situation and think I need some outside opinions. **Would I be the AH if I told she cant go to prom as a consequence of these decisions?**

Back story, 16 year old sister in law who lives with us due to irreconcilable differences with parents got drunk in a public place and blacked out at her friends house later.  Friend called us in a panic and we had her taken to the hospital where her BAC was dangerously high.  This is not the first time this has happened.  She is in weekly therapy.

My wife and I are at our wits end with her.  She is combative with us any time we fuss at her for doing things she isn't supposed to do.  She has brought weed vapes into the house (I have three of my own kids and I don't want them around that).  She brought Oxy into the home once.  She is dis-respectful to us.  She lies to us all the time.  Argues every time she doesn't get her way.  Again this is not the first time with drinking.  First time it was at a friends house, the mom of all people gave it to her.  Second time was at a school football game where my son is in the marching band.  Third time was on the BUS ride to school.  Blacked out in the hall way.  This time was at a different friends house.  Obviously we cut off contact with these people that enable her.  She always finds new people.  Her therapist tells us we need to give her some freedoms as a sign of trust but ever time we give just a little bit she does things like this.

Now really looking for advice to deal with all of it, its not yall's job, but any advice would be considered.  In any case would I be the AH if we denied her prom this year as a consequence of the bad decisions?",AmItheAsshole
Update: H for not supporting my sister’s engagement?,"https://www.reddit.com/r/AmItheAsshole/s/4htqqV9Guo

Thank you all for the advice in the comments of my original post! I’m sorry for taking so long to post an update for you! Btw the sister is NOT pregnant! 

I spoke with my sister on Tuesday of this past week and it was not a very positive conversation. I was still extremely hurt and she was angry with me for ruining her excitement. I ended that conversation by telling her that at the end of the day, she would have to make her choice on wether they would go through with this engagement and wedding or wait until after my wedding based on what felt most right to her. She left me on read and I didn’t reach back out because I felt like the ball was in her court. 

Last night she reached out to me and apologized for hurting my feelings. She said that she doesn’t want things to be bad between us over this. She then started asking me more questions about how I felt. After some more explanation I asked her if she had talked to her boyfriend about our phone call. She said that she did and when I asked how it went she said that he told her she needed to reach out to me and try to make things right. She said it took her awhile to reach out because she was still trying to process her emotions but ultimately she knew he was right. 

I asked her what they decided to do and she said that after several days of talking it over they have decided to postpone the proposal until after my wedding in September. She said that their new plan is to get engaged soon after my wedding and plan their wedding for early 2025. They have not said anything to our family about the engagement and my family has been blissfully unaware of the state of my sister and I’s relationship. 

I guess you could say that this is the best case scenario for this situation. There is still quite a bit of tension between my sister and I but hopefully that will get better with time. ",AmItheAsshole
 for letting my 9 year old daughter watch a Saw movie?,"My (32M) oldest daughter (9F) and I bond over our shared love for horror movies. She’s watched all those more kid appropriate horror movies, like Coraline, The Witches, Hocus Pocus, and most of Tim Burton’s films. She’s seen all the classics, Halloween, Friday the 13th, Nightmare on Elm Street, Chucky, etc. She loves all the Scream movies, as well as The Conjuring/Annabelle franchise. She’s even watched creepier movies like Sinister, The Ring, and US, without being scared in the slightest. In fact, at this point I don’t think there’s anything that can scare this girl.

Yesterday, my wife (32F) was away for a few hours in the afternoon for her friend’s birthday celebration. My daughter wanted us to watch another horror movie together. She looked through my DVD collection and found an old DVD for the original Saw movie, and begged me to let her watch it. I’d seen it before and I know it has a reputation for being a darker film, but after seeing how high her fear tolerance is, I decided to let her watch it. I know the sequels are less suitable for a 9 year old, but I figured that the first film wouldn’t be that much scarier than the movies she’s already watched. She ended up LOVING the film, and even considers it one of her favourite movies. She didn’t look away from the screen once, not even during the ‘scarier’ scenes. 

When my wife got home, she asked me what we did that day, and I told her that we watched the first Saw movie. She freaked out, saying that I was traumatising our daughter. She knows how much our daughter loves horror movies, but she said that there was a line that had to be drawn, and I couldn’t just let my child watch a ‘torture movie’. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for no longer doing the bare minimum at home? ,"I (20sF) live with my best friend (20sM). I'm a student and usually only scheduled to work about 8 hours a week, however, that's because I'm basically on call every day. He works full time. 
Most of the time, with him finishing at midnight, I tend to do most of House work. I clean the kitchen, the bathroom, I buy or cook food, and make sure the fridge is stocked for when he gets home, and when he gets home, I often massage him. When I notice that his bed sheets havent been changed, or his dirty clothes are piling up, I stick em in the wash and make sure he has fresh sheets. All I ask in return is that he cleans the dishes when we eat food. 

We recently got into a fight, with him saying HE does most of the cleaning and that I'm basically useless. Sure, occasionally when I'm depressed, I don't do as much, but I always show him my gratitude and appreciation when he picks up the slack. He very rarely thanks me for everything I do for him. 

So WIBTA if I stop being his maid and only cleaning up after myself? I hate the thought of it just coz I know the house will become filthy but I'm already so overwhelmed by everything. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I tried to beat a kid in a race?,"I suppose that this is more of a “would I have been TA” if I did this. I (f late 20’s) signed up for a community track meet and seeded myself at a time that I thought was reasonable for my current fitness level. Turns out, the heat was mostly kids aside from two other adults who I think were there to pace their kids. I had no idea what the heats would look like until they were finalized and sent out. Anyways, I still wanted to race since I already paid and wanted to test my fitness. 

The gun went off and a twelveish year old girl took the lead. I decided to let her pace for a while since it seemed like a decent clip, then maybe pass her near the end. Unfortunately, I waited too long to make a move and with less than a lap to go all the adults were cheering for her. It felt like there was no way I could try to pass this kid without looking like a major AH so I just stayed back. 

I also want to clarify, there is a solid chance she still could have won even if I did make a move. I have no idea if she’d be able to respond to it or if I would’ve just successfully passed her. 

Anyways, I am slightly disappointed with the time I ran, but I feel like passing this kid just to get a faster time would have been the AH move. Thoughts?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friend  for the money for a thing of mine that he broke?,"I (32 M) was in a road trip with some friends. My friend ""G."" (29 M) was arranging the luggage in the trunk of the car with some help from the rest of us, we were bringing the stuff to the car basically and he was getting everything inside.

He then closed the truck and we all heard something broke. It turns out it was the buckle of the waist belt from my backpack.
This feature was one of the reasons I bought the specific backpack. Since it's very useful and even necessary while hiking.

G. then proceeded to say a not very convincing ""sorry"". I said I understood it was am accident and we went on with the trip.
I was honestly expecting that he would offer me to fix it / pay for it (only the buckle) but it never happened. 

A few days latter I bought the replacement in Amazon, it was quite cheap, just 7€. I then put this expense in an app we were using to track expenses and debts yo each other.

G. got a little mad about it and said hopefully I never brake anything of his by accident. In the end he refused to pay for it and that was it.

This was not really about the money but about the attitude. I was raised to make myself responsible for things I brakeI, even if by accident and I thought this was common sense.

In the end I did not press further because the friendship is more imprtant to me but I still think about it sometimes.

So AITA for asking for the money for something my friend broke by accident?",AmItheAsshole
 for cancelling the home internet since the roommates don’t want to pay their share?,I hardly ever used the internet since I only go to the house to sleep. Every month it was some lame excuse why they couldn’t pay. Finally had enough &amp; cancelled the service. Now they’re all complaining that internet is a basic need &amp; they can’t do anything without it. They had their chance. I only wanted $10 each month from each roommate.,AmItheAsshole
 didn’t tell mum about my wedding,"Throwaway for privacy.

I (22F) got married to Matt (22M) last weekend. We met in university, same course, and we’ve been inseparable ever since. He’s my best friend and the best partner one could ask for. We both live with my parents or rather they live with us since my dad got an opportunity for work in our city and they have not been able to rent somewhere yet. Matt’s family are quite well off so bought him a big 3 bed flat in our city when he started university which I moved into when we got serious and now my parents moved into the spare room which we used as a workout space. 

When I was a kid, my parents seemed largely disinterested in me. Over time, I stopped telling them about my life hoping they’d become invested as I grew up but it never really happened and our relationship was what it was. I guess I’ve carried that sentiment into adulthood too - they don’t know anything more than my job title and that I’m in a serious relationship. They’ve never once offered to take us to dinner or try get to know Matt which I don’t expect them too but it would be nice.

When it came to the wedding weekend, we invited our friends and my older siblings (I have 2 older sisters) and Matt’s family. I’m very close to them, basically a daughter they never had. I get invited to their family trips all the time and I’m in their groupchat. It was only an intimate wedding, Matt’s parents hosted the ceremony and we all went out after for dinner and drinks to celebrate. Both of us didn’t want anything too extravagant and were more than happy with this. We had dinner at the restaurant we dined at for our 1 year anniversary. We told my parents that the flat was theirs for the weekend because we were going out to eat and celebrate with friends and staying in a hotel. I did not mention our wedding at all. I wanted them to ask more if they wanted to but they didn’t. 

Come today, I put up a framed photo of everyone in our wedding attire on the wall in the living room along with some other photos. My parents saw, asked and flipped and told me I should have said something. I wasn’t in the mood and told them they never asked. My mum told me I should have said something and they would have come but I just repeated myself and walked away. I’m now getting texts from my older sisters that Mum is really upset she missed out watching me get married and I should apologise. Am I really an asshole for this?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to participate in all of my friend’s bday activities?,"My friend (26f) has a birthday coming up. She’s turning 27, which I don’t find to be a special birthday, but I love birthdays and love to make sure everyone has a fun one.

A point of contention has come up amongst my other friends (that don’t know her) when I’ve complained about the plans.

We live in a nice town outside of Boston. Her plans include a dinner this Wednesday at an upscale local restaurant, then wants to go into Boston on the weekend to get lunch, shop, do a pasta making class, get dinner, go to bars, then stay the night and go to brunch in the morning. And Ubers! This is at minimum, $500. 

I’ve complained to my friends since I feel bad asking people to spend $50 at a nice restaurant for my dinner… I feel like this is a LOT but she is insisting I attend things and she rescheduled things around my work/personal events that I was using to not attend everything.

I told my friends I refuse to spend $500 on a birthday but my friends think I’m being rude since it’s my friend. but… isn’t this a bit of a big ask? Am I just cheap?? ",AmItheAsshole
 for hating my homewrecking aunt?,"So last week my aunt Amy (mom's sister) showed up to my house to wait for my mom to come home. After my mom came home they threw a party which I thought was weird because it was the middle of the week. The next day my brother asked me if I knew why Amy showed up to our house depressed and got extremely drunk. Naturally I asked my mom what happened, she agreed to tell me the entire story. Apparently Amy had been sleeping with her cousin's (my aunt Lily) husband and had become depressed after being found out. Now if that weren't bad enough about 21 years ago Lily had been dating a man for a few years, but before this happened she wanted to introduce her bf to her family including Amy. Upon meeting they seemingly fell in love, ran off and had a child together a year later. After the man left Amy she decided she'd try to make up with Lily but couldn’t, so they didn't talk for the next 20 years. Recently, they started talking again but as soon after Amy started seeing Lily's husband. Lily has two other boyfriends and her husband has multiple girlfriends so Lily can't confront Amy for fear that her own affairs will be exposed. I know it sounds like I'm only blaming the horrible women instead of the deadbeat men in this situation but as a Mexican I've been raised to believe that family matters more than anything. Of course I blame the men but it takes two to tango. These men decided to cheat but at the same time Amy decided to go after taken men. THEY ARE BOTH AT FAULT!!! 

After hearing this story I was disgusted with Amy and wouldn’t do her any favors. My mom was extremely upset at me and said that I shouldn't be mad because ""Amy is our family so we have to stand by her."" My family's pov is that we should support her but I think this is bs. It may not have happened to me directly but she did a horrible thing to her own cousin. One thing about me is that I HATE cheaters with a burning passion. As a child I watched my mom suffer over my dad's infidelity and secret family. The first man Amy ""stole"" from Lily had a secret family and I watched Amy suffer for it. A lot of the women in my family have suffered over men's infidelity. Unfortunately it isn't uncommon for Mexican men to cheat and have secret families so I'm not surprised that these men cheat but I am upset that Amy went for men who she knew were taken. Now my closest cousin (Amy's daughter) is saying Amy isn't at fault at all, that it's only the men's fault. While I believe that both of them are!!! Now, my other aunt Lily is also a horrible person but that's not an excuse to be horrible in return!!! I seem to be the only one who's angry! Some of my family condemn Amy's actions but all of them still support her. I'm told that I should continue doing favors for Amy but I can't look at her the same. I'm being told that I'm an asshole for being upset, I don't think I am. I would like to know what others think about this, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not allowing guests to poop at my house?,"Me (42F) and my husband (49M) own a home and enjoy hosting friends and relatives. Here's the thing: I am completely disgusted by the thought of other people's poop. The thought of another person that's not me or my husband defecating in my house fills me with disgust, dread, and anxiety. As such, it's always been a policy in my house that guests are not allowed to poop in my toilet. I am very clear on this whenever we have guests over. Guests are allowed to pee in our bathroom, but that's it. If they really need to go #2, I just ask that they please go somewhere else to do that. I have made this policy clear to all our guests in the past and it has never been an issue. Hubby has always disagreed with me on this, and I can tell he thinks I'm being ridiculous, but he doesn't fight me on it.

&amp;#x200B;

  
Well, this past weekend hubby and I were hosting friends at our house, another couple: Courtney (40F) and Mike (41M). Court and Mike stayed the night with us after we all had a little too much to drink and they crashed on our couch. Court and Mike have been to our house many times and are well aware of this rule. That's why, when I woke up the next morning, I was appalled to find 'evidence' that someone had recently pooped in the downstairs bathroom. Without being TMI, there was that lingering stink smell mixed with febreze and markings in the toilet bowl... Yuck. Upon discovering this I immediately felt a sense of panic setting in. More than anything I was deeply upset and hurt by the disrespect of my guests. (It wouldn't have been my husband, as he uses our upstairs bathroom).

&amp;#x200B;

  
I angrily marched over to our guests in the living room. Mike asked what was wrong. I told them I had just been in the bathroom to get a tissue, and that it stunk in there with was a mess in the toilet. In my anger, I said that I have one big rule in this house and if they ""want to act like pigs then they aren't welcome to stay over anymore."" Mike looked confused, so Court fessed up that she ""really had to go to the bathroom"" and she ""didn't think I would be out of bed for a while."" She looked embarrassed and her face turned red. She was initially apologetic, and I admit this was a bit harsh, but I told her what she did was disgusting, unsanitary, and that it was disrespectful to me to violate my boundaries like that by getting her germs all over my bathroom. Court suddenly got defensive, called me ""insane,"" and we had a little back-and-forth before she and Mike decided to leave. She left my house crying.  
My husband was irritated with me and said I was being unfair to Courtney and should apologize, and that I should stop enforcing this rule in general. I told him my reaction was fair because she was being disrespectful of my boundaries, and she could have easily driven 5 mins down the road to a public restroom but chose not to.

&amp;#x200B;

  
We haven't heard from Courtney and Mike since.

&amp;#x200B;

  
AITA for not allowing guests to poop at my house, and calling someone out for it?",AmItheAsshole
"[KY] “Unearned PTO” taken from final paycheck, legal?","Hey guys! I have always been curious to ask questions about laws!

TLDR: my former job took a few hundred dollars of my PTO out of my final check, and are charging me more through my account at the business because what they took was the max they “could legally take from my paycheck.” They had a vague mention of “any PTO determined unearned” in the employee agreement I signed but as I said, it was vague. I will try to find the paper with the actual wording and post it in the comments. Is this actually legal?

The basics of what went wrong:
I had a situation a few years back where a job I worked at for about two years started getting sketchy. Wages were not keeping up with inflation and they were abusing the hard work of their employees, asking them to do a lot more than what was in their job description, and reprimanding employees for conversations had outside of work. Denying hours, raises, and training to employees but making them to do the work anyways and telling the rest of the team they had asked for less hours or changed their mind about training. They rehired someone they had previously fired for selling controlled substances (from the hospital) in the parking lot. Said employee relapsed, stole our ketamine and mistreated patients due to it. Was not fired again until a patient was almost seriously injured. The list goes on.

Examples of employee mistreatment:
Their longest standing employee who was simply encouraging younger women to advocate for themselves and their hard work was threatened her for it even though the conversation was off the clock and off the property. Another long standing, hard working employee was denied training opportunities and labeled unreliable due to taking approved time off to care for her mother with cancer. She had asked for part time and they denied that so she just requested specific days to take her Mom to chemo treatments, all of them were requested and approved in an adequate timeframe with no grief from HR or management. Another employee was taken from only surgical assistance (her job title) to only grooming also receiving a cut in hours. Another long standing employee had a designated locker (as many of us did) and management removed her items without permission or notice “to make room for new employees.” (Not a huge deal but that is a bit sketchy and invasive when they could have just asked) things like this were happening to everyone at every corner. HR was denying people hours, pay raises and positions but telling team members that said employees had asked for these things.

What happened to me:
I had gone from about 45 hrs/wk to about 32, and was moved to shifts that were desk work and grooming. I had told them that I would learn the front desk to help out part time for a couple months while they hired new people but that I could not do it full time because I was NOT a desk job person. After about a year they had at least 8 new, competent people on the desk team and all of the desk employees were threatening to quit due to the lack of hours and inability to pay rent and bills because of it.

What I did:
My job description was for assisting in surgery mainly, nothing was added in title or pay for learning front desk. I became full time on the desk with occasional grooming shifts for an entire year. I was no longer enjoying my job, nor was I making enough money to pay rent or bills. I got a second job that offered me more for full time, I presented this to them and asked again for either a raise, hours, or at least to do the job I was hired for. I was told they could not do any of this. I argued because my coworkers were begging for hours and I was taking them, so it didn’t make sense. After this they told me I was disrespectful and to apologize or resign, I apologized to the HR coordinator that I had accused of abusing hardworking employees because they took this as a personal attack (was not intended that way but I understood why it seemed that way) and chose to resign as well because there was no longer any benefit to me staying at the job as I had a second job paying me $2/hr more and willing to give me full time immediately.

The money:
After I left I received a letter detailing that I had “unearned PTO” that was taken out of my final paycheck and a leftover bill on my account which was also for “unearned PTO”. ",AskLawyers
"[LA] Hi, i deposited a fraudulent check when i was younger. (see body text)","As the title states, when i was X years old, i fell for a scam which involved depositing a fraudulent check. I owed the bank $100 which i payed back ASAP and cleared everything up with them. I didn’t face any legal consequences or jail time other than paying back the bank. I would like to become an FBI agent in a few years, which requires having a perfect criminal record. Does this destroy my chances of becoming an FBI agent?",AskLawyers
[OK] Quiet Title Suit - Abandoned Railroad Right of Way,"I have a rental property I inherited when my father passed.  It is a double wide trailer on a very small lot (0.06 of an acre) in the middle of town (not in a trailer park.)  My past couple tenants have shown me that I'm not fond of being a landlord so I would like to sell my property.  The lot was purchased from a friend of my Dad's back in 2000 and he purchased the double wide brand new that same year and had it setup on the lot, added driveway, carport, porches, sidewalk, etc.  The trailer has been on this lot for 24 years now.  


I go to start the selling process, buyer wants an updated abstract, which I go ahead and have completed.  Her attorney looks over the abstract and does some record digging for the opinion of title and informs me there's an abandoned railroad right of way running straight thru the house. My mom had always told me the lot was terrible for planting anything because it was built on top of a locomotive switching circle and you hit solid concrete about 6 inches down. To get a better idea, the attorney asks me to get a survey done. The survey shows the abandoned railroad right of way and says that ""The surveyor suggests consulting with an attorney to address title rights""  From my research the railroad line went bankrupt twice, and fizzled out sometime in the 1940s/50s.  It seems a larger railroad that is still operating might have bought some of the assets, but I have no idea how to tell if my property would be up for the taking.  The two attorneys she has consulted with have given us quotes to start the process and unfortunately, the minimum price is about 10% of the selling price and depending on how the case goes, I assume it could be much more. (I am taking a loss on the property due to its condition.)  


In the 24 years of my family owning this property, no one from a railroad or the city municipality has ever tried to do anything regarding the property or the right of way.  


1. What is the ""worst"" that could happen if I choose to keep the property, fix it and continue to rent it out?  Does the city or railroad have rights to my property? (Of the \~2900 sq ft lot, this parcel looks to be about 100 sq ft of land they have going right thru the trailer)  Can they make me remove the trailer?
2. If I do file the quiet title suit, am I crazy for thinking the city or railroad would fight me for this tiny triangle of land?  I assume if that did happen, I would start to rack up legal fees. Since this property sale would get me out of debt, I am trying to do the right thing but also maximize the profit I walk away with.  I don't want to sell if I end up pay 50% of the sale price in legal fees.
3. If there were another buyer willing to buy it as is, with full disclosure of the railroad right of way issues, can I sell it to another person without going thru the quiet title suit?  My only ""logic"" on this strategy is that no one has said anything about it for 24 years and it's a tiny triangle of land with a trailer on top of it.",AskLawyers
[CA] Can the opposite of Section 230 be argued?,"Okay, one I am in no way, shape, or form a lawyer.  I'm just a person with a thought and this is question that has been bugging me.

So with the ""ended with a whimper"" that was Reddit's API situation, it got me thinking about section 230.  Please correct me if I am wrong.  As I understand it, 230 says that internet companies can't be held responsible for what people do on their websites.  Like if someone uses Reddit to try to hire a hitman, that is super illegal but Reddit isn't responsible.  And there have been a bunch of court cases and laws passed that have eaten away at 230 but that's pretty much what it says and does.

My question is, could the opposite of 230 be argued?  As in, since 230 protects companies from the conduct of individuals on their websites, companies cannot, by default, profit from the conduct of individuals on said websites?

The whole API thing came about because, and this is a guess, Reddit understands that the most valuable thing on this site is the posts.  Individual people just talking.  Advertising has never been huge, as much as Reddit might want it to be.  Reddit isn't like Facebook where the draw is being able to reach people.  It's the content itself.  And since that content is almost ENTIRELY user generated and moderated for free, what exactly is Reddit's contribution besides creating the framework and hosting the data?

So if I am crazy, just let me know.  Can the opposite of a law be argued in court/has it ever been successfully?",AskLawyers
"[TX] If husband isn’t there to sign the birth certificate, what rights does he have to the child?","Would he need to sue for custody? Would that relinquish the child’s right to child support?

Quick backstory: an altercation occurred where he wound up in jail, part of his bond conditions was no contact with the me, and can’t be 200 yards near me or 200 yards near the house. However I’m giving birth to our only child in 4 weeks so wondering what happens at that point. ",AskLawyers
[KS] How common is it for the attorney/client to match on personalities?,"Do personalities match between attorney/client? KS

Matching Clients Personality 

Is it fair and reasonable to say that it's more common than not to have a highly narcissistic client match the personality of a highly narcissistic attorney they retain to represent them?  Both being high up in the spectrum for narcissism for those of you who look at the clinical definition.

Same holds true for a more empathetic client matching a more empathic attorney. Similar pairing?",AskLawyers
[VA] Do I need to hire a lawyer as the victim in a PO ,"so just to keep the incident brief, I (21F, 95 lbs, 5’2) was pushed into a wall from 2-3 feet by my brother (26M, 145lbs, 6’4) resulting in me hitting my head and having a laceration above my eyebrow about 1-1 1/2 inches needing 3 stitches. I was granted an EPO and will go to court in a couple weeks to get a full PO of hopefully 1-2 years. Already had a pre trial where I was granted a standard order until the official trial. I’m wondering if I should seek a lawyer to be granted the full order? He may also be lawyered up as he is lawyering up for the criminal suit when police came for the incident. I’m wondering if I have a strong enough case I won’t need to pay lawyer fees and go without one.. this was a verbal argument that lasted 3-5 minutes before I was shoved into the wall. He has previous orders POs against him from previous employment and doesn’t have an overall great record. ",AskLawyers
"[ID] Personal injury,Landlord Tenant or Both?","# 

Legal aide has an advice line but it seems stuck in a loop. I cannot get past the recording to talk to an attorney and I need some advice so attorneys?

I live in a complex that was built almost three years ago. I moved into my apartment one week after it was completed. I have an electric fireplace that I have never been able to use. When I complained about the smell-from the first time I used it-I was told it was just because it was new -let it burn off and then try it. I opened my windows and let it run for about two hours. I turned it off and then a couple of days later turned it back on. I could not use it because the smell was so bad it made me vomit. I talked to the manager and was once again told to let it burn off. When I tried to tell them that it had been run for about two hours just a couple of days ago I was again told to let it burn off. I could not use this fireplace due to this smell making me ill. The remainder of the time(nearly three years) I have not used this fireplace. I have what is known as a PTAC heater/air conditioner combination that I use for heat. Recently there was the smell of something burning when it was on and what sounded like a bearing squeaking. I had the maintenance man come in. He said the blower motor was going bad and he had to order parts. This was in December-before Christmas- so I waited until after New Years day and asked about the parts. He said he had to go look to see if he had them. He came back to my apartment and evaluated the heater again then said he had the parts and would need to schedule a time and day to fix it. He left and after a month I went back to the office and the maintenance man returned. He said ‘I don’t want to fix it”. He did not fix it, he went on vacation. While he was gone there was a man who took over for him. I had him come in to look at my heater. This man took the cover off and cleaned the leaves and mud and other debris out of the heater. He said that the yard crew had blown that stuff in there when they come to work in the yard. He also stated that he would talk to them and see if he could get them to blow that the other way.

He came in while I was at my allergy testing for a 3 hr test and worked on the fireplace. He cleaned the filters and said it was debris left when the contractor installed the fireplace.

My dishwasher had been leaking for a time-this to was sent as a repair request and was not fixed until the second man came in. He repaired this problem and covered the hole the first one left in my wall.

The repairs I am talking about with the heater and dishwasher were needed in December but were just finally completed two days ago. The fireplace was needing to be cleaned from the day I moved in.

The yard crew blows the leaves and trash onto my back patio-still and I received this from the manager telling me to clean this up.

Dear Residents,

We hope this message finds you well and enjoying the early signs of spring! As we look forward to warmer days ahead, we wanted to share some important reminders to ensure your home remains a comfortable and safe space.

Spring Cleaning and Air Vent Maintenance:

We encourage you to make sure you clean out the vents in your air conditioning unit (they can be pulled straight out and rinsed off just like a dryer lint trap). It's important to clean out any debris that has accumulated over the winter months to ensure your air conditioning unit operates efficiently. If you have animals or anything that may cause extra dust in your apartment, consider cleaning this more regularly to improve air quality and cleanliness in your apartment. Please note, the first time you run your AC this season, you may notice an unusual smell as any trapped debris is blown out. This is normal, but if the smell persists, please reach out or submit a work order online.

AC and Heater Check-Up:

With the unpredictability of spring weather, we kindly ask that you test your AC unit sooner rather than later. This way, if there are any issues, our maintenance team can address them before the real heat of summer kicks in. That said, we may still experience some chilly days, so please ensure your heaters are set to a minimum of 58 or 60 degrees, especially if you plan on traveling. This precaution helps prevent freezing pipes should we face an extreme temperature drop.

Patio and Balcony Upkeep:

As we all enjoy the beauty of our outdoor spaces, now is the time to tidy up your patio or balcony. Please remove any debris, old furniture, or boxes that have accumulated over the winter. Ensure that non-patio items such as tires or coolers are stored properly and not left on your balcony. We also remind you that, per our insurance policy, open-flame grills are not permitted on any patio or balcony. Your cooperation in keeping these areas clean and safe is greatly appreciated.

Lease Renewal Notices:

For those of you whose leases are nearing renewal, please expect to receive a letter outlining your renewal options approximately 45-60 days before the end of your current lease. We value you as a resident and look forward to continuing to serve you!

Thank you for your attention to these spring reminders. Your efforts help maintain the quality and enjoyment of our community for everyone. Should you have any questions or need assistance, please don't hesitate to contact the leasing office.

My lease renews in November and I am currently looking for a Condo to buy.

My question is If I find something prior to November can I move without consequence or would I have to pay off the lease?

Also this has not only caused me to have to go to allergy specialists because of my constant cough that developed due to the mold spores that blew all over my house through the P-Tac but has also caused problems for my service dog. His allergies cost me $200 at the vet and have caused him to have an ear infection.",AskLawyers
[MI] Wife Cheating on Dead Husband,So my friend’s dad passed away. During his marriage my friends mom was apparently cheating on him. My friend has full evidence and was pissed off and confronted his mom. She’s now taking him off the will and refusing to give him any assets at all. Is this legal and can he fight it?,AskLawyers
"[FL] Who's responsible for damages caused by natural road debris?

If a rock or pebble that was on the road is kicked up by someone's tires who's liable? I could only find places that said it was whoever caused the road debris, not who's fault it was if the debri was already there. ","[FL] Who's responsible for damages caused by natural road debris?

If a rock or pebble that was on the road is kicked up by someone's tires who's liable? I could only find places that said it was whoever caused the road debris, not who's fault it was if the debri was already there. ",AskLawyers
[MD] Interstate Custody Appealed,"
Keeping it short... In maryland I won my appeal to have the custody of my daughter returned to me. Maryland would not relinquish jurisdiction based on subject knowledge of the case. No one has ties to Maryland and no one has lived there for 2 years. Unfortunately they awarded my daughters mother custody who moved to Texas, the cause of the appeal. My daughter resided there for 8 months, waiting for the appeal to move through. Now that the order granting her custody was vacated, she filed an emergency motion for support. I live in Pennsylvania and the state was home state prior to the appeal. If jurisdiction is brought up what case law would show that PA would assume home state as the her time in Texas would be a temporary absence.",AskLawyers
[MD]/[GA] Which State Has Precedent in a Remote Employment Possible Wrongful Termination Case - Company Location or Remote Employee Location?,"If a company is based in one state and it's employment contract states laws governing the contract are to be handled by that state but I was purely a remote worker in another state and everything I've read and pulled up, including various AI and lawyer info pages on sites in both states, seem unclear yet indicate the state of residence has some form of jurisdiction, leaving me confused, is there any clarity on which state has precedent?",AskLawyers
[UT] Is there such thing as excessive time between Protective Order Hearings?,"Back in  the middle of December, my wife and I had not started the divorce process, but the day after I told her I retained a lawyer and was going to fight for full custody of our 4 y/o child, she filed and was granted a Protective Order against me. Her chief complaint is harassment. I also live in the east coast while she lives in Utah.

The first hearing was late December, the second hearing was in late January. A few days before the evidentiary hearing in late February, she retained a lawyer and filed for continuance. I vehemently opposed the motion, as we have a very strong case, but told my lawyer that if he thought it was best then so be it. The continuance was granted and the evidentiary hearing was scheduled for the end of April. 

Her lawyer said that they were open and eager to negotiate a Mutual Restraining Order and resolve this out of court, however they have not accepted or returned a counter proposal for the MRO since February after the hearing in February. 

The amount of time I have been forced to wait seems intentionally obstructive, but my lawyer wants to take everything nice and easy and is insistent on dealing in reasonableness. And any attempt by me to encourage further action is either dismissed or ignored. 

Is there any precedent that indicates that the time between the order being granted and an evidentiary hearing (December 12-April 22) is excessive or contemptuous?",AskLawyers
[FL] Unresponsive Trustee,"Live in a house in Florida which is owned by a trust in my husband’s (deceased) parents’ name. Husband’s brother is the trustee. We want to sell the house and move North to be near family. Trustee has put in writing that he is on board with this but has admitted verbally to being challenged by being a trustee. Meanwhile our realtor is waiting for him to sign off on the seller agreement and seller’s disclosure, neither of which he has done. He was supposed to call us today but blew us off. Time is of the essence here . He lives in CO. 
What are our legal options?

EDIT:  This issue is now resolved ",AskLawyers
[FL] domestic violence,What laws protect victims of domestic violence?  Are there names of them like Marcy's Law?,AskLawyers
"[CA] Is it illegal for me to ask my Dad to stay with me while my wife and I are considering divorce?
","
My wife told me a few months ago that she wants a divorce.

She has not filed yet. She has however been treating me with complete irreverence and passive aggressive behaviors. 

My mental health is at an all time low. I am alone and suffering. 

Is there anything illegal about having my Dad move into the loft to keep me company during this troubling period? Is there a possibility she can claim to a judge that I am pushing her out of the house or causing her harm or anything like that?

Thanks for any feedback. ",AskLawyers
[IL] if custody court makes me stay in the state can I request the same?,I’m thinking of taking my ex to court because he won’t even semi make a schedule for our child.  I know he will request that I stay in the state. If he does that can I request the same? ,AskLawyers
[CO] Can an assisted living facility require the POA's social security number on the admissions forms?,"I am the POA (both medical and financial) for my father who is entering assisted living. The facility is requiring me to list my social security number to use for generation of a Resident Agreement to gain access to his room. Can they require me to give them my Social Security number? 
",AskLawyers
[CO] Can an assisted living facility require the POA's ss# on the admissions forms?,I am the POA (both medical and financial) for my father who is entering assisted living. The facility is requiring me to list my social security number to use for generation of a Resident Agreement to gain access to his room. Can they require me to give them my ss#? ,AskLawyers
[CT] Who would I contact about receiving a copy of the paperwork for my Noelled charge?,"Title. I'm trying to get global entry and since it's the federal government, I figured I'd be upfront about the arrest and the misdemeanor being noelled and subsequently dismissed. However I have no idea who I would contact to get a copy of such paperwork.


Any leads would be greatly appreciated, thank you.",AskLawyers
[NC] Potentially being sued for civil trespassing within a river that falls within the public trust doctrine,"Homeowners “own the bottom” of the river (that is verifiably navigable- I have video of me kayaking it a couple months ago) and are trying to deny the public access to fish there.  I checked with WRC, sheriffs office, and the local warden to make sure I was in the right , and fished there by wading in from other private land that I had permission for.  They called the sheriff, I called the warden and both showed up.  LEO’s both said they would not charge anything because I was within my rights but homeowner told them he would be civilly suing me.

I have never so much as spoken to a lawyer in my life and have no idea what that means, as I’ve always thought trespassing was a criminal charge.  Question is: what should I be worried about with this, and how to prepare?  Guy is very well off so I don’t doubt he would try and leverage the law against me.",AskLawyers
 for not enjoying a party with my partner’s friends?,"My partner and I attended a wrap party for a play she had been in, first one, and she’d been looking forward to me meeting everyone. We don’t usually attend parties together as we have kids and if we go out it’s usually dinner and an activity etc. She’s understandably very excited, she’s hyper anyway but tonight is overly hyper and excitable and generally not a version of her I see, ever, so already I don’t really know how to act around this different version of her. She introduced me to 2/3 people and instantly ran off out of sight, I sat down with our drinks near her friends with seats sat in a line rather than round a table. Obviously people are drinking and the majority of the 40+ people I don’t know. I’m talking to people and trying to enjoy myself but ultimately it’s not my sort of environment, I don’t know most people and I feel uncomfortable but I’m trying my best. My partner all the while is running here and there talking to people, singing karaoke etc, totally fine I want her to enjoy herself. I’m sort of sat on my own which I’m totally fine with. She eventually comes over to me and is talking to me/her friends but I can tell she’d rather be elsewhere and is forcing a conversation with me bcos she feels bad. Again, I don’t really know this version of her so I don’t know why she’s on edge round me. I say I might get an Uber home but she should stay and enjoy herself, I don’t want her to feel like she has to sit with me. Bearing in mind I’m exhausted (it’s almost 1am) and have been entertaining my family all day and up with the kids since the crack of dawn. Well, that wasn’t ok and an argument ensues. She starts crying which I find embarrassing. Apparently I should not be sulking in the corner looking miserable and she wants us to have fun together. I say we don’t have to enjoy the same things, I’m not asking her to leave with me. She starts on one saying how I don’t want her to have fun or enjoy herself, how I'm boring and that’s why I don’t see this fun side of her. (Like that’s my fault, when she’s admitted she is OTT around other people) which I just find hurtful. All in all it ended with us leaving together and her ranting at me the whole way home about how she’s right and this is all my fault. Honestly, I just think that I accept her for everything she does, out the house most nights while I run things at home and just want her to be happy in whatever she does, but she’s expecting me to act a certain way to make her feel better. But she can’t accept that its not my scene, I don’t feel comfortable in a room full of drunk people I don’t know, one of which she’s been flirting with all night, talking very fondly about for weeks. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my boyfriend not to go to his dad’s retirement party?,"My 26M boyfriend and I 26F had planned a trip back in March for a long weekend in May. This would be our first trip together and after we agreed on where we would be staying and booked it I told him to put it in his calendar (in March when we booked). Fast forward to this past week, he texts me asking if we can either a) move the trip or b) cut the trip short, because he told his family that he was free on one of the days our trip was already scheduled, for his dads retirement party and then later realized that our trip was the weekend. Keep in mind this trip is really 2 days of actually being where we are going the other days we are traveling back and forth.

 I had told him that I was not moving the trip because I already had requested the time off work and I can’t get it back because it is approved and the place we are staying is non-refundable; and that I am not leaving the trip early because I don’t want to go to the retirement party. 

We had discussed and he was convinced that he would travel back and forth on the day to go to the trip (over 8 hours) and the party then come back so we can check out the next day. I frankly told him this was stupid and made no sense. So then he tried to rearrange the trip so he can do both. I also expressed to him that I don’t even feel like going now because clearly a trip that was supposed to be about us (we have been going through a really rough patch) and reconnecting was now about his dad because he chose not to mark his calendar and double booked himself. And now wants me to either spend an entire day of the trip by myself and or change the plans we had so he can still go to the party. 

I understand his dad retiring is a big deal but our trip was planned months ago and his dad’s party was planned a week ago. I expressed to him how I felt like this was his saying our relationship was not a priority to him and that my trust for him keeping his word to me is broken. 

AITA for wanting him to keep the trip with me and not go to the party? ",AmItheAsshole
 for playing a powerful MTG commander deck?,"So this is kindof a nerd question. I'll give some pre-amble for those who don't play Magic the Gathering. MTG is a game that has historically been played in a 1-v-1 format, but there is a specific format called commander which features multiplayer pods as well as a wide range of potential power levels decks can operate in. Commander players have a reputation for being a bit on the casual (less competitive) side. Tournaments are a thing but commander is also viable for friday night game night with the boys.

  
My friends and I have recently gotten into commander. I built my first deck with my brother's help, who is a very experienced magic player. Basically the deck works by chaining together extra turns. Totally legal, but maybe not much fun to play against. This deck proceeded to stomp the pod without much competition. My friends convinced me to nerf the deck, which I wasn't too thrilled about but I did it. Even after I nerfed my deck they would sort of grumble and groan whenever I pulled it out. Sorry, it's what I got!

After seeing their reaction I decided to build another deck on my own without my brother's help so my friends couldn't complain that I had an unfair advantage by getting help from a magic veteran. This second deck doesn't chain together extra turns but is powerful for different reasons. My friends still complain about how unfun it is to play against. Today I took the deck to game night at my LGS to see how it might be received in a different meta and I noticed my pod yawning and playing on their phones whenever I took my turn. To be fair, turns with this deck can take a minute, but I go as fast as I can. I have exactly one friend who seems to enjoy the challenge because he plays an equally powerful deck of his own making.

As far as I've seen, nobody in the magic community can seem to agree on what strategies are ""broken"" or ""unfair"" vs. what strategies are ""appropiately powerful"". Personally, I think that distinction is arbitrary and stupid. I think people should play whatever they want within the legal rules of the game, especially in a multiplayer format where power-levels can balance out by teaming up on the most powerful player.

  
I don't know what to do. I want to play to win, but I want to win in such a way that my friends want to keep playing with me. I've already dropped about $600 dollars on magic cards so I'm not to hip to the idea of building an entirely new (deliberately weaker) deck just to make my friends happy. Am I the asshole for playing to win?",AmItheAsshole
" for being on the computer while on a quick call with my boyfriend on his birthday, when i've strived to make him happy and gift him prior to the date?","Today its my boyfriend's birthday, he went 2.5 days ago abroad for his birthday to engage in some activities that he loves with a friend of his, i got invited but couldn't go as i had a university midterm evaluation that i couldn't skip. Since i could not go on this said trip with him, i booked an expensive restaurant which has one of the best reputations in town for us to go on the weekend prior to his flight, turns out that we had to cancel 2 hours before the dinner itself since he wasnt feeling well on that weekend and I took care of him for the 2 days, giving him care, massages, you name it.  
  
Knowing the date of his trip, i decided to surprise him and make plans for another run of events prior to his birthday. I got the washbag that he wanted for him to take for his trip, and in the night prior to his trip i invited him to go with me watch a public event as it was a holiday in our country. He did not know about it and we ended up spending time together watching a videomapping, followed by a concert, fireworks and a drone lightshow (both of us have never seen one in person before).  
  
Due to some hurtful things he said on the weekend, without even knowing he was being hurtful, i've been feeling blue (there is also my current burnout but that is another story). I did not want to make my feelings a topic to be discussed as he was going on vacay since I did not want to ""ruin them"", and at 00:00am in his bday i sent him some happy bday messages.  
  
The day went on, I went to sleep, Woke up, sent him a good morning message, we chatted a bit, but i was still feeling down. I've tried to be productive during the day, fight my negative feelings and how sluggish i was feeling, and suddenly he sent me a message at 21:11 asking if i'd be down to join a videocall for 5 min. at 21:28 we had the call and I was on my computer managing an excel tracker that I have and checking an IP course online. I had the call in the upper corner of my screen so even though i wasn't focusing on the videocall, i was there and listening. However, he got upset over the fact that i wasnt paying as much attention as he deserved in his bday and i immediatly got it. I appologised stopped everything i was doing and told him there was no need for him to call me later on, i was all hears from that point onwards but he just hangued up on me.  
  
immediatly after this I started appolagising for my behaviour and stated how i was willing to always give him full atention whenever he'd call me I went through almost every possible way i could to show how sorry i truly felt, but it looked that the more i appolagised the more mad and rough he would get at me stating that ""i could go back to my fucking laptop on which i spend 24/7 of my days"" that i was ""extremely insensitive in his bday"" which made him furious and he told me that i made him sad on his bday of all days, followed by mentioning how i told him stories about my ex hurting me in both my bdays, and that i should ""do better"".",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for money back that I paid for a concert I can no longer go to ,"I (19 f) paid my cousin (19 f) almost $400 for a concert she planned. Context: Our family has a long history of stealing from eachother. There’s been periods of time where I went no contact due to her breaking my trust, but we were younger so I set it aside as juvenile issues. But I am now starting to question whether or not I should have ever broken no contact. 

She posted on her Snapchat story a few months ago asking if anyone wanted to go to a concert for an artist I am a huge fan of and was dying to see. So I said I would love to go and asked her about every little detail she could give me so I could make sure 100% I’d be able to go and wouldn’t run into any issues (this is important to know) 

She told me that everyone would have to pay for the ticket, the gas to get there, the hotel we’d be staying at, and for food. The last part I found slightly odd because we could all just pay for our own food while there, but again I decided to trust her. She had a note in her phone keeping track of how much money everyone had sent her, because instead of us all setting money aside we have all been sending it straight to her.

Over the span of the last few months I checked in weekly for information about the concert, where we were going, how much I had left to pay, what days I needed to request off, etc. I tried to avoid every little road bump that could cause us not being able to go. When I originally asked her what days we’d be gone so I could request off and have the time off guaranteed, she told me May 23rd-25th. She claimed we would drive there on the 23rd and back on the 25th. She asked if I would be willing to drive at any point and I told her I would do whatever’s needed no problem.

 The concert is now in less than a month (25 days) and she reached out to me two days ago to tell me that the plans have changed and my heart sunk. The company I work for needs pto to be put in months in advance which is why I asked months ago what time I needed off. I voiced to her that I was frustrated and that I understood it was difficult planning something like this on your own, but I asked for all this info months ago to make sure I’d be able to go. 

I told her I would no longer be able to go because I can’t change the time I requested off. We had a very heated discussion that she handled very immaturely (I will go into more detail in the comments) and because of the way she handled it I told her I would need my money back before the concert which is in 25 days. I know she is planning on using the money I sent her for the concert and I told her I worked really hard for that. She originally agreed but is now saying that she can’t pay me the 225 I paid for the ticket, because she would be losing money. She said that it’s my ticket and if she can’t sell it she’d can’t pay me back. AITA for asking for my money back due to her poor planning? 

",AmItheAsshole
 Feeling frustrated at my wife. ,"Lately we have been visiting my in-laws about once every week or babysitting her niece and dropping her off to her parents/grandparents house. Granted, she often visits them during the weekday when she has a gap from work also. Since we bought a house, we live about 45 minutes away from her family, and I get it, she has a close bond with her family but it hasn’t always been like that, especially when she lived with them. The drives are tiring and we usually have a really unproductive day of just lounging around. 

Even though it is tiring, I power through it if it makes her happy to see them. There was one time when I’ve openly communicated this to my wife that sometimes I do want to visit her in-laws that often or babysit her nieces on the weekends because there are times where I would want to either visit my family or set out the time to work on chores around the house, work on a business idea that we had come up with, or just have a weekend to relax from work. 

When I first opened up to her she got upset and left the room. When I brought up the conversation again it seemed like we found some common ground and understanding of my side of my feelings. 

However, it seems like nothing has been understood and we are continually going through this same routine and it’s just been draining. She sees that I get frustrated but does nothing about it.

I also feel like I’ve done a lot for her family over the years, but I wouldn’t want to get into the weeds here. 

I’m at the point where I feel like I just keep giving and giving my time and love but nothing ever feels like I get any appreciation back. I guess this is what we do for love? We adapt and adjust? Sacrifice our happiness?

Am I the asshole? Am I the asshole for even writing this on Reddit? ",AmItheAsshole
 for getting my nephews initials tattooed on me,"I (24M) got my nephews initials tattooed on my hand a few weeks ago, and everyone in my family is mad at me for it. My brother (29m) is especially mad because he has 4 kids my two nephews and nieces whom i am pretty close with. 

I was excited to show my family but everyone was immediately angry, My brother says “You know you have other nephews too right” and my mom thinks it was very rude of me, that it isn’t far i got my one nephews initials on me and didn’t think of his kids and they could be hurt by seeing their cousins name on me and think i am favouring him. 

But I live with my sister (26f) and my nephew (2m) and practically am raising him too, I am so close with him he feels like my own son and i am very close with my sister.

My brother has his kids names tattooed on him and I am gay and know i will never have a kid of my own this is the closest i got. 
Am i in the wrong for getting my nephews name tattooed on me? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling to my mother-in-lay that I went with my husband to the hospital?,"

Am I the asshole for not telling to my mother-in-lay that I went with my husband (her son) to the hospital? 
It was a small thing, i thought better if he saw a doctor and that's it...
It was not a serious thing, so my husband would tell her in the next day but apparently she got upset because she knew from someone else that he went to the hospital. She didn't seem to be worried about him, but more with the fact that she didn't know. 
Apparently she probably found out from someone that works in that hospital",AmItheAsshole
 for making my daughter use a broken tablet?,"Ever since I (45M) divorced my ex wife (40F), my daughter (16F) and I haven't gotten along very well. I know she's a hormonal teenager, so it's not really her fault she's so hostile, but she seems to always be upset with me for one reason or another, and this situation is the most recent.

The other night, I broke my phone, so I went to my daughter's room and asked her to help me find something else to use (we tend to have old tablets and stuff laying around the house). She was annoyed and told me she was getting ready for bed, but I reminded her that she usually stays up scrolling after bedtime anyways so I wasn't keeping her up, and besides, she wasn't even in bed yet. After a bit, she reluctantly agreed to help me look.

Eventually she approaches me with an old tablet, and I thank her for helping me, but when I take it, I see that the screen is heavily cracked. I quickly realize she brought me a cracked tablet just to be rebellious and punish me, so I calmly tell her that I can't use this and to find something else. She objects, rudely telling me that it still works just as well whether or not it's cracked, and that she shouldn't have to do this for me just because *I* broke my phone, especially when she'd just been in the process of getting ready for bed.

I was upset by this and told her that, if she thought the cracked tablet worked so well, *she* could use it for the night, and that I'd be taking her phone and wouldn't give it back until the morning. She panicked and reminded me that she needs to listen to music on her phone to sleep, but I told her the tablet would play music just fine.

She looked like she wanted to cry and told me this is why she wants to live with her mom, which really hurt me, but I just sent her to bed knowing she was exaggerating.

I feel like I have to ask, though, am I the asshole here?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to return a gift I was given 7 years ago?,"For context, I was dating a girl in college who went to Thailand and got me a handmade machete as a gift. I have kept it through the years, but it's mostly just been in my garage and I use it for random things like cutting boxes up to fit in the trash can. 

Long story short, we broke up over 7 years ago and she blocked me on every form of social media and other forms of communication. Last night, her friend (who I'm not friends with on Facebook) messaged me on Facebook saying that my ex-girlfriend wanted the machete back. I was pretty taken aback by the request and asked why she didn't reach out to me directly and pointed out how strange it was to make that request, especially after not talking to me for nearly a decade. She acted like I was an asshole for insinuating that the request was tacky and strange. The majority of my friends think the request is ridiculous and I should tell her to kick sand, but some friends are saying if I hardly use it, why not just give it back? I don't really care that much about having the machete, but the principle**(ETA) of it just really rubs me the wrong way. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for lying to my friend's face in front of our boss?,"I (32F) and my friend Sarah (34F) work in a retail establishment. We both signed up to work inventory. For reference we have a team come in and scan inventory and we double count and in some sections our own staff will do their own scanning to compare accuracy.

This year I got put up front to count with my friend to do barcode look ups as we are the only 2 who can do it. We both had to do some renewal training so when she left I double counted what was done up front. I noticed one had a missing row of 3 items but while multi tasking I got distracted and had not flagged someone to fix this. I had signed off on the other lines tallied on the ticket for that section as they were correct though. 

We also had our own staff scan this section and they had done it correctly so there was a discrepancy.

Our boss came up looking into the discrepancy saying whoever is counting up here isn't even f-ing counting and everything is f-ing wrong in a rage. When I asked him what was wrong he ignored me and refused to tell me. He just kept lashing out. For context this aggressive behavior is quite common in general and worse when interacting with me because he does not like me on a personal level and tends to make things personal rather than professional which is well known and usually leads to disrespectful conversations and treatment such as this.

So cue my friend who asks if I signed off on the ticket in front of this boss. Had my boss politely asked me if I had done it and explained the discrepancy I would have gladly responded yes and that a row of 3 items was not accounted for and one 1 that would not scan adding up to the missing 4 I just had not flagged anyone down yet. Instead I said I don't know who did it and walked away as I was no longer going to tolerate the verbal abuse. Eventually the situation was resolved and everything was accounted for on their end.

Later on I told Sarah I did sign off on the ticket and lied which is when I found out she told our boss that she thought I made the mistake which is what caused the escalation and aggression of the situation in the first place. She was upset I had not said it was me. I explained to her that it wasn't anything against her I just would not tolerate that level of disrespect and there was no another option where it wouldn't have gotten worse so I chose to remove myself from the situation. She did not agree with my decision and has now ignored the last few messages I sent her.

So am I the asshole for not saying it was me? 

",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to attend the opening ceremony for my father's newest venture,"So I (20F) is the only child of my parents. My father, who is an ambitious businessman had decided to open his newest venture. It was the day before the ceremony that I came to know that the venture is to be named after me. I also overheard my parents talking about how they'll make me do the presiding. Although it is a great privilege to have a venture named after myself and to inaugurate it, it just did not sit right with me. They never informed me of the procedures nor did they ask me for my consent to use my name for public display. Probably because they knew that I'd never agree to it. I later complained about it to my mother but she said that I should be glad to have this privilege.



The thing is, I was never particularly close to my father. It was my mother who looked after me all through childhood and teen years. My father on the other hand was barely around. He did not involve himself in my affairs. My mother used to pay for my education with her hard earned money. Which is very rare for a woman to do so when their husband's working. I have heard from my mother that he had denied paying for my education as he had no money on him. No money and yet he had enough to spent it on his many ventures. This and due our obvious lack of bond, made me question as to why he would let me do the presiding for such an important event.



Not to mention that I have severe social anxiety and a hard time being around large crowds. This was a very well known fact among everyone in my family and yet they  ordered me to go. During the morning of the event, I claimed that I had the right to make the decision as to whether or not I would attend the event and therefore won't be attending it. This caused a ruckus until finally, I was forced to come along. I was then told by my family that I was spoiled and ungrateful for behaving the way I did. And the fact that I had refused to attend the opening for a venture that my father named after me showed that I was a cold hearted person. But as a grown woman of 20 I think I do have the right to refuse it or am I the asshole here?

",AmItheAsshole
H for telling my dad I would institutionalize him if he kept faking illness?,"So, recently my partner and I spoke to my father about him moving out after he behaved badly towards me, as we share an apartment via a long winded story where I never wanted to live with him in the first place and he essentially foisted it upon me. 

After this convo occurred, all of a sudden he’s “ill and can’t work” and essentially locked himself in his room and refused to function. Ruined Thanksgiving, Christmas and a milestone birthday for my partner. Eventually took him to hospital to be told he’s fine and even the nurse had some words for him. 

Fast forward to last week. I ask him if he’s made any strides in reaching out to past landlords/realtor to potentially move states and he finally does so. Finds something affordable, in town, with a landlord he really liked. I’m pulling money out of MY RETIREMENT to help him with move in cost/transfer of bills. Ever since we talked about he’s been behaving the same way he did when we previously discussed his moving. Essentially mind melding himself into appearing sick even though he’s fine. 

I became upset and in the moment told him he needs to get his shit together or I’d be forced into looking into some sort of mental healthcare institution since he clearly has some problems. I feel bad for what I said but I do mean it. He meddles in everything we do, is home almost all the time, we have no privacy, and he messes with things like turning off the oven when we clearly are about to use it. AITAH?",AmItheAsshole
H for humbling my colleague that her age is irrelevant compared to our other colleague’s beautiful wife?,"So I have this colleague Jada (f26) who is very obviously in love (or in crush is maybe a better term since I believe true love comes after knowing a person) anyway, she is in crush with another colleague. This dude is 40 and he is stunningly handsome so I get the crush. Anyway he brought his wife to work once and she is as stunning if not even more. She looked around his age too. Then I knew for sure that she is 42 because Jada did some stalking online. She said eiw she is old. I thought it was a silly comment but ok.

But ever since, she’s been relentless in her attempts in pursuing our colleague. It had gotten out of hand and it was getting unbearable sincewe three work very close together. I confronted her and asked her what she was doing. You saw that he had a wife and he seems very happy in his marriage. 

“That old cow?”

The “cow” is maybe 120lbs. I ignored this comment. I told her she wasn’t old, she was his age. What I said next might be AH. I told her that she was crazy if she thought just because she was younger she would automatically have advantage over the wife since beauty outweighs youth. She got very upset and accused me of calling her ugly. Not at all I said, just that the wife is very VERY beautiful. Besides all of this isn’t important because he obviously loves his wife and to go ahead and try and if she succeeded, it won’t be because she is young and the wife is an old cow. It would be because the guy is a cheater or doesn’t love his wife. 

She thought I was the ah and is livid with me. Insisted that I called her ugly. I told her fine! I haven’t spoken to her and the atmosphere is very awkward now. Did I say anything wrong? Should I apologize?",AmItheAsshole
 for Asking Brother for Money Back,"My younger brother recently got laid off. He was making good money so his last check and severance are a significant amount. 

The other day he asked me to spot him for gas money ($25) and promised to pay it back the next day when he got paid. 

It’s been a few days now and not only has he not paid it back, he simply hasn’t acknowledged it either. This is the second time in this situation the last two months, last time he paid it 2 weeks after the promised time. In fact, he went and bought a new (2024) car before paying me back that time. 

The lack of acknowledgement is more upsetting than the $25 bc I hold people to their word. He also has a history of gaslighting. I could honestly go without the $25 but I do feel a bit disrespected.
 



",AmItheAsshole
 for backing out of a lease agreement with my friend and refusing to pay half the lease break fee?,"Using fake names for privacy. A few months ago, I (31m) went through a messy breakup and I moved out of the apartment that my (now ex) girlfriend (Steph, 31f) and I shared.

During the breakup, Steph read all my text messages with my two best friends (Jen and Allie, both 31f). Jen and Allie were both supporting me and angry at the way I was being treated, but my girlfriend got mad that they were saying she was emotionally abusive. My ex Steph now hates both of them and it made our break up even messier. Steph got mad at me even when Jen and Allie’s names would show up on my watch so I had to hide and delete most of their calls and texts for weeks.

When I was trying to move out, I was really stressed out about finding a place while dealing with my breakup so I verbally agreed to move in with one of my best friends (Jen) since she lives nearby in a 2 bedroom apartment with a roommate moving out soon, and was set to renew her lease. She renewed for a year, but her roommate wouldn’t be able to move out for a few months so I got a short term lease for a 1 bedroom apartment on my own until her place would be available.

Now that I’m on my own, I love living by myself and don’t want to give it up. A part of me is also afraid that living with Jen would ruin my chances of getting back together with Steph because Steph hates Jen now.

I ended up telling Jen that I won’t be moving in with her when the apartment is available. I offered to help Jen post to find someone to replace me, but she refused because she doesn’t want to live with a stranger since she was initially going to live alone.

Jen is really pissed at me now, and asked me to help pay the fee to break the lease, which is two months rent ($8000). She is expecting that I pay half, $4000. I don’t think I should have to pay any part of the fee because I didn’t sign anything.

AITA for refusing to pay half the fee for breaking a lease that I never signed?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to swap seats with a woman on the bus so she could sit next to her husband?,"Let me explain, I was travelling on a bus and I would have been on this bus for an hour! This woman and her husband got on the bus after about 20 minutes into the journey. (I have a disjointed hip so I was sat in one of the handicap seats) when they both got on the bus, her husband sat next to me and she sat in front of me. I was feeling anxious as she started questioning me as too why I was sitting in a handicap seat because “I’m young enough” I wasn’t going through my medical history on the bus, I also wasn’t going to give her my seat so she could sit next to her husband AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for moving in with a guy friend?,"My bf of a year said we shouldn’t live together in the fall because his parents said it wasn’t a good idea. We’re in college, and they’re worried about us living together and potentially breaking up. He said it was better for us to have our own places.

He is moving in with his male best friend. I don’t have a close friend like that, so I asked one of my guy friends who was looking for a roommate and he agreed.

But my bf is uncomfortable with this. It’ll just be us living together and he doesn’t like that. He also says the guy has a crush on me. I’ll admit he probably does, but what does that matter? Doesn’t he trust me not to do anything?

He said I’m being disrespectful, he wouldn’t live with a woman alone. I said man, woman, it shouldn’t matter if he trusts me. He’s my friend, that’s all that matters.

He says it’s risky and he isn’t sure if he’s okay with it. I said well, he better live with it. 

AITA or is he? He’s just a guy friend, and my bf should trust me.",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting the travel agent share my room?,"A friend invited me to a resort. I agreed and booked through her travel agent. When booking, the travel agent disclosed that she is also going on the trip and that she hasn’t booked yet which I found strange. I booked my trip about a month ago. 

The trip is next week, and my friend calls today to ask if I’m ok with the travel agent sharing a room with me. I don’t know the travel agent (and have only known the friend for a few years long distance with seldom meetups). I told her I don’t know the travel agent and she began to vouch for her saying that the travel agent is best friends with her husband. 

I told her I don’t know how I feel about that and rather than directly saying no, said I’d think about it with no intention of thinking but hoping we could move on from the topic with the understanding that no I’m not sharing my room with a stranger. 

The friend explained to me that the travel agent is going through a divorce and money is tight, but that’s not my fault. AITA for not sharing my room? 

EDIT: this trip was not paid for by the friend. I paid my own way and it was not cheap. 

EDIT: the friend says that the travel agent doesn’t know that she’s asking to share a room on her behalf. She told the TA to reach out to me, but she hasn’t. ",AmItheAsshole
" for telling my MIL to please keep her criticisms to herself, and eventually for kicking her out of lunch?","I (F32) am a mom to a beautiful little girl (F6), and she has been telling me all about a new cafe that her friend went to which serves ""princess cakes"". She says it is very fancy and people only go for special occasions when they can dress up. I had a look online, and they specialise in high teas. It looked lovely, and I knew it would make my daughter happy, so I booked a table.

Unfortunately for me, this place is brand new and very popular, so I while I initially wanted to book for Mother's Day in a couple of weeks, I could only arrange a table for today. I thought we could still do it as an early Mother's Day celebration, so I also invited my mom (F60) and my MIL (F64).

My daughter was so excited, she wore her favourite dress and told everyone that she would be just like a princess. It was lovely to share her joy. My MIL on the other hand was not so thrilled. Now it is important to note that while my MIL has a heart of gold, she is very salt of the earth and is quite frugal. I genuinely don't mean this as a criticism, it is just who she is.

Despite it being my treat, my MIL insisted that the whole thing was a waste of money, that the cakes were beyond ridiculous in their size, and it was all a bit pretentious. She is obviously entitled to her opinion, but I could clearly see that her comments were sapping some of my daughter's joy. Even when my daughter said that this is what princesses eat (after a comment about how ridiculous it all looks), my MIL said that princesses would want a proper meal and not something that is fit only to feed birds.

Eventually I asked my MIL to accompany me to the bathroom, and I asked her to please keep her criticisms and negative comments to herself. We were trying to have a nice day together, but more importantly, my daughter had really been looking forward to this and it was difficult for her to enjoy when someone is constantly acting negatively.

My MIL said that I was giving my daughter far too much credit, she wouldn't understand half of the criticisms, and even if she did, it is important that she understands the value of money. Eventually I asked her to please leave if she couldn't let my daughter enjoy herself, which is what she did.

Now my MIL is telling the family that I cut her out of the Mother's Day celebration because she was too frugal and wouldn't pander to a child. I know she is being ridiculous, but my husband is saying I could have just kept the peace for a couple of hours but I instead chose to act drastically. He said the family being together is more important than whether someone feels a restaurant is overpriced. Did I act drastically? Was I the AH?

\*Edit: Thank you everyone for your comments, I went away for a few hours and this blew up. I am trying to read through everything, but I appreciate you all taking your time to share your opinions. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my roommate to adopt a potentially wild dog into the home? ,"So I live with 4 other people in a house, each with our own room. A week ago, one roommate (I'll call her patty) called and asked me if I could watch a dog that was found on the street for a day, before it got back to its owner which would presumably be found. 

It turned into about 5 days, with me picking up some of the responsibilities of caring for the dog while she's been at work for the day, and often times the dog is barking all morning long- really screwing with my sleep. 

Now, I've just found out through another roommate, that's she's planning on adopting the dog and has already ordered the adoption files. Didn't mention it to any of us. 

My other roommates and I are considering giving an ultimatum- after the lease ends she either doesn't resign the lease or give away the dog. 

Are we in the right?",AmItheAsshole
 for removing myself from this situation?,"Myself (25) and my best friend (Kay, 24) birthdays are one week apart. We both agreed to celebrate our bdays together this year along with our other bestfriend’s (Ashley, 23) friend, Lynn (we both know lynn through Ashley. I see her here and there but Kay talks to her more than I do but I was so excited for the 3 of us to celebrate since shes always been so kind. Well yesterday the 4 of us hung out and throughout this hang I find out that Lynn had invited Kay and Ashley on vacation that they all had flights for next month. I felt so awkward because we were out shopping and all they did was talk about the trip pretty much all day. I tried to not let it get to me but I was genuinely hurt because I know majority of the other people who are also going along with them.
 
 
So fast forward to later on in the evening we start playing board games and I kind of was spacing out and start scrolling on my phone because they all started talking about the trip again and it was just so awkward for me. So anyways, our bdays get bought up and Ashley suggest we do a theme. We all agreed a theme sounded good and came up with a triplet kind of theme were we would dress alike and stuff like that. Kay makes a comment and says,”Me and Lynn could match and you can wear a jumpsuit”. I instantly felt excluded because if its themes, “tripplets” why would they match and I wear something else? Now Im not a fan of dresses and everyone knows that but I would have thought if the plan was to match we could find something that we all can agree on.
 
 
Now this combined with the whole vacation thing just made me feel out of place and I kind of want to just tell Ashley I would rather not combine my bday with Kay and Lynn and they could just celebrate together. I would still attend it but I would just not be apart of it. 

AITA for wanting to remove myself from this whole thing??
",AmItheAsshole
 if I tell my best friend to stop share her private life moments with me?,"Fake names will be used for anonymity.

I (19 years old) and my friend Gabby (23 years old) are friends for a long time. We joke and just hang out on Tik Tok and Messenger for now.  But we plan to meet.  

She introduced me to her boyfriend Anthony (29) over a month ago and I actually really liked him.  He and I quickly became best friends.

Anthony said once while we were talking on a Messenger video call that he would like to have two kids or one, but my friend Gabby said she don't want kids. 
I fully understand that not all girls want to have children and I agree with that.  But did I need to know that, I have no idea.

 My friend is the same as her boyfriend, they like to joke or often ""play with me"" when they show me something and ask me: Guess what's here.
My friend also played this game with me. She showed me some kind of box in the camera and asked: What's here?  
I didn't say anything because I just didn't know what to say and she said that there were condoms in that box.

In another situation, she simply showed her home even though I told her not to do that.  She sends me pictures of her and her boyfriend or tells me to look at her Facebook profile.  I'm starting to wonder if she's doing it out of politeness, when she just wants to share something special with her best friend, or if she's just ""specially annoying me"".

What do you think Reddit?
Is my friend Gabby Asshole showing me too much of her private life and WIBTA if I told her straight to her face to stop sharing her life with me, even if this friendship would end after I say that sentence.",AmItheAsshole
 for inviting another friend to our workout plans?,"A few months ago, I met a woman (""Alice"") at this cool community space I like to go to. Alice and I haven't spent much 1:1 time together, but she's sweet and nice and I would call us acquaintances. 

About a month ago, Alice texted me asking if I would like to be workout partners with her for accountability, and I said yes and was very excited to start.

There is another woman (""Tiffany"") who frequents the same space/types of events, and both of us know her and have interacted with her, so I decided to invite Tiffany to our workouts, especially because she was interested starting up a fitness routine too. I later texted Alice confirming our workout day and included, ""Tiffany will be joining us too!""

Alice responded positively, but come the day of the workout, Alice seemed off, and has lately been declining to workout with us. Did I do something wrong by inviting Tiffany?",AmItheAsshole
 for ignoring my mom because she got mad at a restaurant for forgetting a part of our order?,"Earlier this morning, my mom and I (19F) went to Panera to get lunch. We placed our orders using a tablet and the order included 3 brownies. When we got home, my parents had to go someplace else for a few hours. As I was taking the food out of the bag, I realized that they didn’t add our brownies. But when I told my parents about this when they came back, my mom started yelling at me at full volume. She then yelled why I didn’t check the bag to make sure we had everything before we left and what of waste of money it was. 

If I were in a clearer state of mind, I would see where she was coming from. I should’ve double checked the bag and Panera’s brownies are almost $4. But whenever my parents yell at me for something, I usually keep my mouth shut. And because I normally don’t get confrontational with them and that I keep my frustration in, I cope with it by not wanting to see them for a while. 

So far, whenever my mom comes by my door, I either ignore her or use single word responses. It sounds petty of me but it’s how I keep my emotions in check. She’s now upset at my behavior. 

So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 For Not Helping My Sister?,"Throwaway account.  I'm new here, please be patient.  
  
My sister (24f) and I (17f) are both very tech-savvy. Around New Year's, we decided to work together on changing a popular video game. In January, the progress went along smoothly, and we got a lot of things done. I was in charge of doing the visuals while my sister did the coding.  
  
As the months passed by, I worked less on the mod in favor of doing school work. (I am dual-enrolled in college and high school) My sister graduated last year, she has no job, and she lives at home.  
  
She told me that she wanted me to play test the mod when I was trying to unwind from homework, and I told her I didn't want to do it. I wanted my free time, so I told her I didn't have the mental capacity to do that. We fought that day, and she didn't talk to me for a week after.  
  
I told her about my work, and she said I could miss a few assignments. I understand the mod is important to her, but school is a greater priority for me.  
  
We fought again today. She asked me to play test it again, but I didn't want to today either since I just wrapped up an essay. She told me that since I do no work for the mod, she's not letting me work on it anymore and she's never talking to me ever again.  
  
I think this is so childish of her.  Not only would the mod quality diminish, she's also ruining our relationship.

She said that I don't care. It aggravates me so much because I care about this mod, but she doesn't give me the time I need.   
  
Whenever she doesn't get what she wants she yells at me for it. I don't think she knows she does this, because I don't think she genuinely means me any harm, but every time I think about her I feel devastated now because she's always upset with me. She has no control of herself, and I would have expected her to be more stable-minded considering she's older. She's so intolerant of my mistakes and she's too stubborn to admit when she's wrong.  
  
She has such high expectations of me, and I feel like she's just being inconsiderate considering how much I do for her for free.   
  
I especially don't understand why I need to work on it so often considering it doesn't have any deadlines. We're not up against some clock! I can take my breaks where I need them!  
  
She has a right to be upset with me considering I was free both of the times she asked me to help her, but I just didn't have the energy. I'm so frustrated that she doesn't understand that though: she's never cared about education as much as me so she's never been under the same kind of stresses.  
  
I considered blocking her from the assets I created for the mod since ""I'm not a creator"" of it anymore, but didn't because I don't want things to escalate. She's normally nicer than this, if she does yell we'll fix things but I think she's passed a certain point where she should at least apologize.  She doesn't care about how I feel, is what I think.  
  
Please ask if you need clarification, and feel free to give criticism.  ",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to rat out my brothers vape stash,"context: I (F, 18) am living in a household with only my dad and my brother (16). It is a breeding ground here for favoritism due to my household being only guys besides me.

I'm out of school and stuck at home most days, but im constantly awake when my brother gets home from classes. Usually when my brother leaves the house in the morning and returns home, I ALWAYS see him hit a vape until my dad gets home. 

Usually when I show concern for family members, my dad usually takes it as jealousy or delusion and immediately starts an argument. Over the past few days, I have been getting photographic proof to text my father about my brothers vaping addiction. I've gotten nothing out of it.

This is always out of pure concern for my younger brothers health. I know snooping around his room isnt GOOD, but I really just dont want him to fall down the line of addiction I had for a few years.

tldr: brother is vaping, i am concerned, father tries to dismiss his addiction due to some form of favoritism in my household.",AmItheAsshole
 for not arranging childcare when my husband was sick ? ,"Over the last 7 years I have been the primary caretaker for my husband’s and my 3 children (7,5,2). Through maternity leaves, and then working evenings or overnights, I am still the one who does the most childcare and household tasks. 

Whenever I was staying at home with the kids and was sick, my husband would just go about his routine as normal. He would leave without checking if I would need help for that day. There would be times when I was so ill I needed to call reinforcements, but I would arrange that. 

Recently, my husband got a job where he gets one weekday off. Today is his day off. I am working today and have several meetings and trainings that I need to attend. He has been messaging me non stop that he is sick. I told him that it’s his responsibility to arrange for care since he is the parent at home, as I had done many times, when I was home with our children. He has texted me WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU several times about me telling him he needs to make his own arrangements. I asked him several times if he had ever asked me if I needed help while sick. He keeps asking what is wrong with me. 

I don’t feel like I am the asshole because this is the same treatment he gives me but maybe I am ? 

****Edit: my husband wasn’t always like this. Our first two children were pretty equally cared for as well as the house. We used to work opposite shifts to each other so whoever was home was in charge of kids and chores. During my third pregnancy I was extremely ill, it’s also when my husband got a challenging physical labour job. With me being off on maternity leave for 18 months I feel like that’s when things really started to slide. When I went back to work I took evening or overnight shifts at a hospital while he started at 1pm. I almost went insane as he would not take the kids in the morning after an overnight and not let me sleep. I would be up all night and all day with them and was losing it. He kept complaining that he really didn’t like my overnight job because our youngest would still scream for me in the middle of the night. He mentioned me finding a day job, I said fine you try to find childcare in the area and after school care, let me know when you do. Obviously he couldn’t because wait lists are miles long in our area. 

I found a remote overnight job, which paid more and was more in line with my interests. That was fine except the same problems arose of him not respecting the need for sleep after an overnight (even for a couple hours). The complaints started again, but I loved my job and I wasn’t going to change it. Then I got laid off. It was a job I really loved and it really shook me to my core when it happened. I was depressed but still took care of the kids, the house suffered a bit but I was too tired to do anything. 

My new job requires day shifts for 3 months. Hence why I was working today. At around 2pm I drove home to grab my bank card as I had promised my oldest we would go shopping after school. I watched in disbelief and AMAZEMENT as I saw my husband rounding the corner with our two youngest on the way to the park, and not the closest one either. So there you have it, he was not dying, he was capable, he may have shit his brains out this morning but somehow he was able to persevere. Unfortunately the little kids saw my van and wanted to come shopping but we ended up having fun. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my wife she needs to be a better houseguest ,"I (56m) and my wife (56f) visited our daughter out of state recently.  We usually go twice year and stay anywhere from 4-10 days.  She is late 20s, married, with our granddaughter (3f).  Having guests around holidays especially with a young child is stressful, so I help out as much as possible with dishes and other household projects her husband needs assistance with.  I wish I could say the same for my wife, who literally sits there on her phone unless asked directly to help, even then I get attitude.  She also complains incessantly about the food that is served.  She does this when we visit friends as well.  Finally this time I said something, privately, do as not to embarrass her in front of our daughter.  About how we shouldn’t be a burden as houseguests to which she replied, “why didn’t you tell me that’s what I should be doing?”  Meaning helping out.  I told her, “I wouldn’t think I should have to tell a grown woman basic manners.”  Now she’s being cold to me.  AITA?  I think I might be the a-hole because i was kind of a smart ass when I said it and should probably have said something awhile ago but I don’t like being confrontational.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to meet my daughters (30f) new boyfriend (58m),"AITA for not wanting to meet my daughters (30f) new boyfriend (58m) who i will refer to as Bob (not his real name)

I’m 58 (for context). Bob is not yet divorced (his current wife is the same ageish as him).

Bob has two daughters approximately my daughter’s age.

Bob hasn’t told his daughters or his wife that my daughter exists.

Bob has a son from a relationship he had about 9 years ago while married to his wife.

My daughter met him at work, where he also met his previous fling (sorry that might be pejorative)

He has grandkids my grandkids age.

IMBTAH because I have already judged Bob. Because i do not want to like Bob. Because i cannot get over Bob being almost twice as old as my daughter.",AmItheAsshole
 for going off over a photo,"So long story as short as possible Myself and my Partner (OH) have been together for nearly 10 yrs I have a child (sibling A) from a previous relationship who was 3 when we first got together( bio dad not involved). We recently had another together (sibling B) so they are technically half siblings but we see them as just siblings simple as that as far as we are concerd OH is Sibling A Dad. Well we went on a trip to introduce sibling B to some of my partners family. The trip was already tense from some previous issues but we were just trying to make the best of it, anyway OH's Nan (NIL) &amp; mum(MIL) wanted a bunch of photos which was absolutely fine untill the NIL asked Sibling A to leave the photo so they could get a ""generation photo"" of just OH, NIL, MIL and sibling B and after that is when things blew up. Myself and OH went off about it and they think they have done nothing wrong that Sibling A isn't blood and shouldnt be in generation photo but we see it as they are Sibling B's blood, OH sees them as his own child and so they should be in the photo. We even asked if Myself and OH had already been together and then adopted would they do the same, would they do the same if we had used a donor embyro as both would of technically not be ""blood"" and they wouldn't answer and just kept saying they wanted a ""generation photo"" So  AITA for telling them off over a photo",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to have anything to do with my MIL anymore,"I (26F) have been with my SO (29M) for almost 2 years and we just had a baby 2 months ago. My SO is and always has been a big mommas boy but the longer we’re together I feel like the more it just irritates tf out of me.. he literally tells her sooooo much and says that she’s like his “therapist” but he talks about our arguments and tells her things that you just shouldn’t involve your parents in.. sometimes I feel like I should tell him move back to CA so he can be with her (he moved to TX for me) and I know that I would never be able to move over there because we would not last, I would not be able to handle him constantly putting his mother before me.. we have an upcoming trip to CA to see his family and I am sooo dreading it now because his mom and I got into a small argument today and she tried to say that I said something when I clearly didn’t- and she continued to try and say that I did and I held my ground and kept saying no I didn’t, and she says “well it’s basically the same thing”.. then what really made me mad is the fact that she tried to scare me by saying “oh man if I told my son about this, you can forget about it, he would be so mad… but it’s okay I’m not going to say anything to him” as if she was doing ME a favor when I didn’t say anything wrong to begin with!! Finally I said “tell him if you want to tell him, I don’t care- I will show him our messages and he can clearly see what I actually said” at that point she was like “oh calm down I never said I was going to tell him blah blah blah” but like wtf…. I finally told her I’m not trying to be mean but I got frustrated at the fact that she kept implying I said something else when I didn’t and that next time I will be more mindful of what I text her so this doesn’t happen again and told her “have a good day”. She never responded.. and she talked to my SO on the phone but never mentioned it which to me shows me that she knows she was wrong for that…. But now I’m at the point where I don’t even want to be around her or in her home when we go visit, we’re going to be there for 4 DAYS!
Am I overreacting?!?!

Ps I didn’t mention anything to my SO because I feel like he might just take her side anyway (he sees his mother as an angel who can do no wrong). 🙄🙄🙄",AmItheAsshole
 for choosing not to go home to see my goddaughter,"I (20f) live with my grandparents (70) and my uncle (50). I live with them because it’s closer to my workplace than my mom’s, which is in another city, although it’s not that far (around 20 kilometers). I am very close to my grandparents since they basically raised me because my parents had me very young, but my grandmother is very “old school”, and I’ve had a few mental health issues because of her way of raising me.

My uncle (who I have a difficult relationship with for a few reasons) is living with us because he divorced his second wife in the pandemic, and has taken my room, which made me sleep with my grandparents since there’s only 2 bedrooms in our house. My mom’s house is my safe place. I come here every weekend to see her and escape my family for a few days. 

Yesterday I learned that my goddaughter,(7, let’s call her Laura) was coming to town. 
She lives with her mom/my uncle’s second wife, in a different town. After their divorce, we spent 3 years not being able to see her, and recently her mom started bringing her around more. My grandma is very adamant on me being close to her, because of how great my godmother is to me, and I should follow her example, which I 100% agree.

The problem is, I was already on my mom’s house when I learned that she was coming, and everyone knew I wouldn’t be able to see her this weekend, because even tho it’s not that far, I depend on my mom to take me there, and I can’t afford to be spending much on uber (I’m a teacher, so I don’t earn that much). My grandma called me today to ask me to go home because Laura couldn’t sleep last night and started crying asking for her mother, who was at her boyfriend’s house. When she called I was having lunch with my friend, so I told her I would see what I could do and would call later.

I kept thinking of solutions, but I didn’t want to go, because this is the only time I have to be alone and have some silence. I work 7 hours every day, do an intensive Teacher Training course 2 times a week and am also on university. I called my grandma saying that I wanted to stay here for today, and would try to go home tomorrow morning to catch her before she left, and she said it was okay, and that I shouldn’t bother coming early tomorrow. She tried to sound nonchalant, but I knew she didn’t like it.

Now I can’t help but feel like I’m an AH for not making an effort to see my goddaughter, and I know my grandma will eventually throw this in my face. I don’t know what to do. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving my mom 30 minutes away from home?,"i (18f) have a pretty sour relationship with my mom. basically, when i was 16 years old my aunt(her sister) passed away and my family decided that i would inherent her car as my first car. my mom has always been salty at the fact i got my aunts car instead of her(it is a nice a car and she didn’t- and still doesn’t have a car) so up until i moved out of her house a year later it was a constant fight over the car, even though it was given to me, she insisted that it was hers too since i am her daughter. 

i would be completely fine with letting her use it and take except for the fact she is never back when she says she’s gonna be back. and im not talking like 30 minutes/ an hour late. she is ALWAYS several hours late- often multiple days straight gone with it. lord only knows what she is doing for that long but it makes me furious when she asks to go to the store for 30 minutes and then she doesn’t come back for days when i have to go to school or work.(she doesn’t work) i also pay for everything of the car, the registration, insurance, car payments.

 it got to the point where i would never let her take my car because she was inconsiderate and a liar and she would straight up steal my keys and take my car for days. should i mind you- there’s no electricity in our house. she can’t afford to pay it. she would very often leave me for days home alone,  in her house with no electricity, no phone, no food.

now i’ve moved out of her house and live with my grandma. so it’s a usual day and i wake up to go pick up my grandmas prescription after she was in the er the night before. i walk out and see my car is gone. this isn’t the first time this has happened so i immediately know who it is. luckily i have an airtag in my car solely because my mom steals my car. i’m furious and past my limit of letting this slide. i call my best friend and ask her to help me get my car back and we start heading over. 

side note: she also has crashed/ gotten impounded every car she’s ever had. she goes thru cars like baby diapers because she’s such a bad driver with a terrible driving record. she ruins every car she ever touches and it heavily worries me that i’m going to get a phone call that my car has been crashed abandoned in a ditch and assumed it’s my fault.

luckily i also have a spare key. after a few hours of tracking her down i find my car parked in a motel about 30 minuets away from home. it’s the middle of the night by now, probably 4 am and my car has been missing for almost 24 hours. normally when this happens i wait for her to come out of wherever she is and drive her home. but not only did she steal my car, she had no regard for the fact my grandma needs her medication, and i have work. AND she has done this numerous times before.im just past my limit at this point.

 so i decide to get in my car and leave without her but with all her stuff including her phone that she left in the car. she calls me the next day furious that i left her stranded but i felt it was completely rational of me to get in my car and leave her.

edit: ive never reported it stolen or anything like that because i don’t want to get her into legal trouble, neither of us can afford that and she is still my mother i don’t want to ruin her life like that, but she needs to stop stealing my car and i don’t know how else to stop it",AmItheAsshole
 for treating my “friend” like this?,"I (Rain) and my friend (let’s call her Ava) are friends,but I’m not sure if I want to be anymore. She is very clingy and always clings onto me, (hugs,holding my arm etc.)*She’s not a shy/scared person* Because she does this it’s in my way of movement and her being in front of me/ extremely close makes it hard for me to walk. I have told her many times that I am not comfortable with her touching me without asking and after telling her to stop, I’m told things like “it’s her love language” or “She does does that”. The other day it was my BSF’S Birthday and we went to an Adventure active park (I swear I’m not 9). She kept on clinging to me and stopping me from talking to other people/ only talking to me. As a result of that I would remove her hand from my hip/arm and try to move a bit away, but she would continue after I would tell her to stop. She’s always giving me a WHOLE LOT of Compliments, which were okay at first, but they’re always the same things like “I love you” or “You’re Amazing”, but she doesn’t mean them and only says it when others are around. She also calls me Pookie or Baby (which makes me uncomfortable).And if I compliment her back she’s like “Thanks, but no. I’m ugly!” (Kinda pick-me). Her actions/words annoy me (She thinks she’s my best friend). So AITA for trying to Avoid her?",AmItheAsshole
 for not asking my husband before buying something. ,"I 35f my husband 35m. Please be brutally honest with me. I make good money and got a bonus 5k the other day. Since my husband and I just re did our back patio I wanted to get some new patio furniture. He knew I got this bonus and I told him that I wanted to get a new patio set. He said “we can go look at rooms to go, or if you find something you like that’s fine” I did find something I loved (a small table with 4 chairs and an umbrella) then I also purchased market lights to hang over head. Now it is here everything has been delivered. He is furious. I ordered the incorrect clips for the lights (less than $10) so I just need to get metal hooks. He said what I ordered is unusable, but it’s not. He said I should have asked him before and included him. I reminded him of our conversation and he said I was selfish and wrong. He is not speaking to me now. I told him I wish he would have said that he wanted to look together but he said he shouldn’t need to say that and I’m selfish. (I do have ADHD and Autism) so when he said “If you find something you like that’s fine” I thought it was ok to get something. But that was not the case. I think I am the asshole here because he’s pretty upset even though I still don’t really understand and I’m frustrated that he wouldn’t just say “I want to do that together” but maybe I should just instinctively know that… 
Also I spent $900 on the patio stuff and deposited the rest into our shared account. 

I just wanted to say thank you for all of your comments. This is my first time using Reddit so I’ll try to get back to everyone as soon as I can. Hopefully I’ll have an update soon. I really appreciate you listening to me and giving me advice. It really means a lot. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I pronounced my taken name differently than how my future husband pronounced it?,"
I am not comfortable sharing the actual name due to privacy, so I’m using another name as an example. 

My 41F partner 39M has a surname that is of French origin but he pronounces it the American way. The problem is, the American pronunciation has an unfortunate rhyme in the American language. 

If I were to take his last name, I would like to pronounce it the French way to avoid the embarrassing rhyme. 

An example would be: if his surname was Dubois and he pronounced it “Duboyz” and I wanted to pronounce it “dubwah”. 

WIBTA for pronouncing it differently?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to school tomorrow?," I did skip last Friday because I found a small bug infestation in my room at 2am and I was too tired to get out of bed later on in the morning after exterminating it. On Friday night, I ended getting quite a runny nose and feeling sick

 Yesterday, I had a huge fight with my mum and she said some crap that really triggered my depression and I ended up accidentally hurting myself on something, which caused a big cut which went into the fat layer of skin. I slapped a Band-Aid on after washing it.

this morning, I googled some crap and realised I do need stitches so I told my mum and we went to a medical centre for stitches. It was my first time getting stitches lol

So the doc wrapped my arm and it feels okay right now but that’s probably because of the numbing stuff he injected into the cut. im not sure if it’ll get more painful tomorrow or not. I’m also still kind of sick, my nose is blocked and I’m always really warm now and in general, don’t feel well.

My parents want me to to to school because depression sucks aka I’ve been having horrible attendance at school, I missed 14 days last term and 3 days this term. So I guess I understand why they want me to go to school.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my aunt’s child in my room? ,"So I(17) collect anime figures and keep them on my shelf and today I went out and I forgot to lock the door to my room. My family was also there and my aunt(42) has a kid(1) and she let the kid into my room. After I came home, I discovered that my shelf was messed up and luckily nothing was broken, but once I saw that my stuff was moved around, I asked who let the kid into my room and I explained that I didn’t allow the kid in my room and I was sort of pissed at my family. My mom then called me selfish for making a deal about letting the kid into my room and I’m wondering if I did anything wrong. 

So AITA for not wanting my aunt’s child to be in my room? 



Extra info:
In the past, I had made it clear that I didn’t want the kid in my room, usually I would lock the door, but I forgot to today.

EDIT:
My aunt was supervising the child, from what I know, my cousin(the child) went into my room and then my aunt allowed him to start playing with some of the things on my shelf. ",AmItheAsshole
 for yelling at my 'family' for suddenly wanting me in their lives?,"For some backstory, I (26F) am a product of my father's affair.

My three half siblings, Jacob (36M), Lily (32F), and Helen (30F) have never wanted anything to do with me, and at first my father didn't either.

When I was around six, though, my mother died. Nobody wanted an affair baby, so I ended up living with my father and his family after all. I was treated differently, like a guest in their home. I could tell my father resented me for ruining his family.

I tried my best to make my siblings like me, hoping they'd warm up to me eventually, but they made it clear they never wanted a relationship.

I know reddit is generally forgiving of people like my siblings, and that's fine. I get it, they don't have to want a relationship with the brat who tore their family apart. But once I got over trying to beg for their love, I began to hate them.

They had two living parents who actually wanted them, college funds, toys, therapy, and siblings who loved them. I had *none* of that. My father hated me, he barely spent a cent on me, my mother was dead, and they all wanted nothing to do with me, but I was the monster for just being born.

It's taken years to accept that I was unwanted by my siblings, but I got through it. I got myself through life, into college, into a good apartment and (very well paying) job I love.

Recently, though, Lily reached out to me. Apparently, she's pregnant. She says becoming a mother ""made her realize how important family is"", so she wants me in her- and the child's- life.

I admit, I wasn't very cordial. I asked harshly why I'd want a relationship with the people who abandoned and rejected me for so many years?

Lily said her baby was innocent in all this, and that I owed my nephew a relationship. I admit, I lost it at that, and I ended up screaming at her. Her baby's innocent in this? Where was that attitude when I lost my fucking mom and my entire remaining family rejected me at six years old?!? Where was that attitude when I practically *begged* for their love for years?!?

I screamed at Lily that I don't know why she suddenly wants me in her life- whether it's money for the baby or to ease her own guilt- but that she made this bed and now I'd make damn sure she lies in it.

Since then I haven't heard from Lily, but Helen and Jacob have been trying to contact me to call me a monster for screaming at my own pregnant sister.

I don't feel bad for not wanting a relationship, but admittedly, I lost it a little bit, and now I feel like screaming at Lily may have been too far, especially since stress probably isn't good for the baby. I don't know, am I the asshole here? I feel like I might be.

ETA: Answering a few questions I saw in the comments (i answered the comments directly too but figured they'd be relevant info here)

1.) Did Lily apologize? Kinda. She said she regretted rejecting me, but she brushed past it quickly and right into talking about other things, which made me feel like she expected forgiveness to be a given and made the whole thing feel insincere to me. I also never directly heard the words ""I'm sorry"" from her, so y'know.

2.) Why did I take her call in the first place? To be honest, I thought there was some kind of emergency going on, like that my father was dying or something. I genuinely couldn't see any other reason she'd be calling me. The last time I saw her was when I was 18 and she was 24 and she was mocking me for how I'd have to move out and ""finally stop leeching off her dad"", so I genuinely didn't see any reason to think she'd be contacting me for anything short but a life or death situation.

  
BRIEF UPDATE: 

I've been thinking a lot as I watch the comments roll in. Thank you for all your support, both to the people saying I did nothing wrong and to the people gently suggesting I apologize or that it might be good to mend ties. I don't think I'm comfortable having much of a relationship with Lily. She was cruel to me for my entire childhood for things beyond my control, and I can't just get over that, nor am I impressed with her one sentence apology. 

However, I keep thinking about my future nephew, and, well..while Lily may be a hypocrite, she's right that this baby is innocent, and I refuse to reject this child for what his mother did. I refuse to be like my siblings or my mother's family in that way. So I've made a decision. 

I'm going to reach out to Lily and apologize for yelling first and foremost. Then I'm going to make her a deal. I'll take her child out on auntie/nephew days, give her money if he needs anything (under the condition that she provides proof of purchase), and potentially attend family events if he's present. However, if she at any point insults me or blames me for what our father did, I'm going to cut her out again. I'm also going to start putting money into a college/life fund for him (under my name, not lily's. this is for the child to access when he turns eighteen, not for her to spend.) and any of her other future children. I'll make the same deal to my other siblings if they have children as well.

Some of you may be upset I don't want a close relationship with Lily and only want to see her child. Some of you may be upset I want to be in my nephew's life at all. But I want to do right by him. He's innocent, after all, and I'm going to lead by example in not punishing children for the sins of their parents.",AmItheAsshole
H for hating my brother’s relationship with no longer friend PT 2,"So it sounded like they were over. On the cruise ship they sold gold by the foot, and my brother and I wanted to match our moms chain so we buy one. They gave us an additional free bracelet to match the necklace. Few days later my brother tells me the girl at home is taking a hairdressing class and it would be cheaper for her to stay at our house than get a hotel. I’m like yeah that makes sense whatever. But then I see her Snapchat story and she’s sleeping in my bed with my cat. I ask my brother why and he said cause his bed and the guest bed were taken. She could have easily taken the couch or my parents bed. We get home and I climb into my bed to feel that she left a pair of her dirty socks in my bed. 


We’re home for a few days and my brother gives her the free bracelet he got on the trip. She thinks this is the most heartfelt gift ever and posts all about how her boyfriend bought it for her. It’s now like March of 23 and i come home to see that she’s there on the deck smoking with him. I ask them why. Because brother made it clear on the trip that he’s on the prowl for other girls. They go inside and offer me a dab to placate me. I say ok I’ll take your weed. We’re talking and then the girl gets up and THROWS UP AGAIN. 

She’s a witchy type girl so you’d think that if every time you’re coming over and vomiting maybe it’s a bad sign. I sit them down and I’m saying how this is obviously not working for either of them and it’s best for everyone if they just stop this nonsense. I felt like I had the right to say that cause they asked for my approval in the first place, and I no longer approve at all. This was a mistake cause I created a “forbidden fruit “ type situation. GO TO PART 3",AmItheAsshole
 for not wrapping a gift for “secret Santa “,"So at the place I work at my boss hosted this not really secret Santa but one of my co-workers is a jahovas witness ( someone correct me  if misspelled that). I was confused because they danced around the secret Santa thing. They called it an alternate name and wrote in all caps that it nothing to do with Santa. So I went to ask my boss what the situation was with wrapping paper was ,and he yelled at me about how apparent the answer was. So I just didn’t wrap it ( I was ent assigned the jahovas witness. But he freaks out when someone sing happy birthday in his vicinity. Then my boss got after me for not wrapping it. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting my partner to have dinner started by the time I get home from work?,"My (32 F) partner (34 M) and I both work full-time. I am also in the process of obtaining my bachelors degree and take three AO classes per semester.  

My partner gets home significantly earlier than I do, by almost three hours, on Wednesdays and Thursdays. Those are the only two nights in the week that I request that he handle dinner for us. Thursdays are particularly important because I don't get home until 6-6:15 (after an almost 12 hour day) and then I have a virtual class from 6:30-7:45 that I cannot eat during, so I really like to eat before we start. The other five days I will cook, usually from scratch (I enjoy it). When my partner cooks I'm okay with things that are ""easy"" like salads etc. I have also completely altered my cooking habits to accommodate my partner, he is vegetarian, I am not, so for the last two years I've been cooking vegetarian at home. When we eat out we split meals 50/50.

Because my partner has ADHD he has really severe time blindness. Often, on Wednesdays and Thursdays, we eat much later than our usual time of 6 pm, sometimes not eating until 7:30-8 pm. I end up getting really annoyed and hangry. On Thursday, I had a particularly long day at work, and asked if he could please manage to get dinner ready by the time I got home so we could both just sit and eat together. He told me no problem. When I walked into the door he said he hasn't started yet and told me to come with him upstairs and hangout while he prepped everything. 

I got upset and told him that if he didn't think he could get dinner ready in time please don't tell me he would because it lead to my feeling upset. He told me I got home earlier than I usually do, so it wasn't his fault (I was less than 10 minutes early.....). He then told me I was acting like an ""abuse husband who works all day and expects his wife to have dinner ready the second he sits down"" and how it was ""fucked up"" of me to expect that from him. I got upset because I just wanted a, ""Whoops lost track of time babe, I'll make dinner super quick, don't worry about anything"" and it would have been okay. His immediate defensiveness and claim that I was acting abusive greatly bothered me, but I also don't know if my expectations are out of line. 

AITA? 

My (32 F) partner (34 M) frequently doesn't have dinner ready on the two nights I expect him to cook because I get home late, am AITA for being peeved? ",AmItheAsshole
 for this response to changed plans with another couple?,"Had an incident and wondering what you all think.

My wife (F 40s) and I (M 40s) have plans with two other couples this evening (an activity and dinner). One of the couples had to cancel bc one of them was sick, leaving just four of us. The activity was one I was probably the most excited about. 

Right after couple 1 canceled, the husband of couple 2 texted to suggest we change plans to just dinner. My wife texted back saying that she got it, it was more of a group thing, and that since I was working out, we’d get back to them. I was indeed working out, and pretty much at the same time as she responded, I responded as well saying that I was definitely looking forward to it, but that since I figured I was probably more psyched than anyone, I’d be happy to go with the will of the group. Other guy texted back saying we could go, and then again saying we could also get back to them. I responded saying it sounded like everyone else was a pass, so I was fine with passing. 

My wife texted me off to the side and totally freaked out saying I was impulsive, embarrassing, and that I over shared all the time. Her specific issue was that I responded without checking with her first. I can definitely be impulsive and have a penchant for over sharing. I also was maybe not thinking as clearly as I could since I was mid-workout, but… this time? Really? It’s not like I spoke for the two of us, I just stated my opinion, and when I realized I was in the minority, I gave it up super easy. Trying to figure out what my role is here — if there’s something to look it, I want to, but really I’m not seeing much on my end. Thoughts? ",AmItheAsshole
 for lying to my mom,"I’m (27f) going to stay overnight at a hotel room with a man I’ve met in person twice. I am still casually dating and he hasnt asked to be exclusive yet. We met on Instagram and I had a really nice time both times. We talked about how we’re both loooking for something serious and he’s been nothing but polite to me in every exchange we’ve had. We both have a love of taking trips and he decided to book us a hotel at x city so we could explore, have dinner and then get brunch the next day. My mother (52) isn’t happy about it. I told her that I’m going off with a friend because she would never understand me staying overnight with a stranger. She’s accused me of lying and has threatened to follow me to make sure I’m being honest. AITA for telling her I’m going with a friend to prevent her from being upset?

EDIT: I still live with her, pay half the rent though ",AmItheAsshole
 for rolling my eyes at my husband's SIL and telling her I'm tired of her whining?,"A little bit of IL context first: One of my BILs ""Joe"" is married to ""Jesse"" who was his childhood best friend. Jesse was always like another son and brother in the family. He's known them basically his whole life and had a shitty childhood with his biological family so my ILs basically adopted him. He even lived with the family for a while. Because of this Jesse was always included as a member of the family as a unit and not just as an IL. Honestly Jesse is my MILs favorite child lol and I think he's the favorite brother of the family.

This was something I always knew. My husband was upfront about it when we dated. I know the rest of his siblings have been upfront with partners as well. I don't take it personally that Jesse is treated like a son/brother in the family but I'm a DIL and SIL. It makes sense to me. We don't have the same long history where they watched me grow up and I never lived with my husband's family.

Another BIL ""Frankie"" is married to ""Emma"". Of all the fellow ILs, Emma is the one who has a problem with Jesse being just another son/brother but us being more clear ILs. She has complained about it to a number of us fellow ILs. We've all explained that we're cool with it because we get Jesse has grown up with the family. Emma likes to vent to me a little more. I asked her once why she married Frankie if she was so bothered by it when I know he told her. She told me she had assumed that it was only at first and after a while everything was the very same. That she didn't really believe they called Jesse their son/brother and not SIL/BIL. And on she went whining about it. She heard Jesse was written into the will alongside the children (I don't know if true and I don't really care) and she was so outraged. 

It gets annoying. The others find it old too. Especially because she likes to get us alone to do this.

It was Joe and Jesse's birthday and everyone was celebrating and Emma decided to track me down to bitch about it some more and she really sounded like a child. I asked her to stop and she told me she needed to get it off her chest. I tried moving away but she walked and talked. Then I rolled my eyes and she was like omg stop being such a bitch and I told her I was tired of her whining. She told me I should be more understanding and supportive and us unwanted ILs need to stick together.

I don't feel unwanted. I just know I'm not their daughter/sister.

She demanded an apology from me later that night.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to share Mother’s Day?,"I (33F) generally get along very well with my MIL (62F) “Lauren” — she’s kind, loving, and supportive. There are a few things that frustrate me about her relationship with her sons and me but nothing too serious. 

However her view of holidays and traditions has been annoying me. I am not very close with my parents so I’ll call them for holidays but only see them once every year or two. DH “Dan” and BIL didn’t include SOs for holidays until I joined about 7 years ago, so the family has always done holidays as a nuclear family, and it always follows the same patterns I.e. every Easter Lauren gives baskets and makes a specific bunny cake. Every birthday is appetizers, dinner, cake, and presents at ILs house. 

Now that Dan and I have a toddler and another on the way, I want to have some other traditions not necessarily always with the whole family on a schedule. For example, I want my kids to do Easter egg hunts and crafts at my house where we invite friends their age (like I grew up doing). I don’t really care about my birthday and generally want to save my social battery so prefer a mani/pedi, takeout, and a movie at home. I don’t need presents. I think adult birthdays every year are a bit silly but to each their own and I’m happy to celebrate others who want to do that for themselves.  

Lauren and I agreed to who handles each of the important holidays — Thanksgiving, Xmas eve, and Xmas. But we never discussed Mothers Day or Fathers Day… last year was strange. Lauren seemed put off that I chose to keep Mothers Day low key and give her her Mothers Day gift and her birthday gift two weeks earlier at her family birthday dinner. We called Lauren on Mothers Day as well but she immediately asked if next year we would meet in the middle. I said that I didn’t know yet what the plans would be. 

For Fathers Day, we went to their house for the usual plan but Lauren went out of her way to make it clear that it was FIL’s day (literally used those exact words at one point) despite it being Dan’s first one as a dad. Lauren only asked FIL what he wanted for apps, dinner, and cake, got him an expensive gift, and gave Dan a Bluetooth speaker and a Home Depot gift card. It was truly strange. 

This was the first year Dan and I didn’t make plans with the whole family for my birthday but they turned our next “hangout” into a birthday celebration for me, with dinner, cake, and presents despite us telling them that we couldn’t stay late due to baby’s bedtime.

I can already feel the tension of Lauren expecting us to go celebrate Mothers Day with the full to-do instead of doing our own thing (I’m pregnant with a toddler — all I want to do is relax). I’ve already scheduled a flower delivery for her and feel like that plus a FaceTime should be enough but I’m sure if I don’t explicitly say something I’ll be ambushed by another full day of social battery draining or passive aggressive Father’s Day. AITA for wanting to keep some lesser celebrated holidays low-key? 

ETA: I send Lauren flowers and call her for Mother’s Day, call her at least weekly the rest of the year, and text almost daily. I also do get my husband a present from myself and my baby to celebrate him on his days. ",AmItheAsshole
- childcare but won’t give a timeframe,"AITA- 
I had a friend(Dave) reach out last month asking if I was free this Saturday to watch his child. Here’s the conversation 


Me- “I don’t wanna speak to soon but I have no plans, what time?” 
DAVE-  “I don’t have one”. 
*fast forward to yesterday*
DAVE- “Hey, you still on for Saturday?” 
Me- “Sure, but what time”
DAVE- “I haven’t gotten that far”
Me- “please let me know! My weekends are my lifeline”   

NO REPLY TO THAT! Whatever event this is, is in 6 days and DAVES known for a month.

I’m not a “babysitter”, I’m a friend doing a favor that works 40 hour weeks and my weekends are beneficial to me.
",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to move out,"I’m 22 years old and I recently got into an argument with my family and they told me that because I was struggling with depression I was selfish as depression is all about me and how I feel. I stated that my depression stems from home and that I was going to leave and my dad threatened to call the police on me if I left the house again. The last time I left the house he did call the police on me and the police told me that I was free to go. They get angry anytime I talk about moving and tell me I’m mentally ill and unhinged. WIBTA if I move across the country to another state and never talk to them again? 
I think cutting them off I WBTA but the way they treat me sometimes makes me want to cut them out of my life. AITA for planning to move and not telling them about it?",AmItheAsshole
 for not sharing the prize money I (F30s) won with my (M30s) ex bf,"I’m a writer, nothing professional but mostly for fun&amp; because I enjoy reading and have been in love with books since I was very young. I started writing at 15 as a way to get ideas out of my head, or write some less cringey versions of things I’ve read a million times. Anyways onto the story. Last summer I wrote a few short stories and submitted it to some writing contests my ex suggested as a way to help me step my foot out and maybe get something published as it’s my dream. I’ve never had anyone read my work because it’s mostly for fun&amp; my own enjoyment. But I decided why not&amp; wrote some really good ones. We joked about what we’d do with the money if I won&amp; I told him I’d get us both our dream cars&amp; a nice vacation. He never read anything or gave me any input on WHICH contest I submitted to. I still find it embarrassing to share my books with ppl I know. Two days before Christmas we broke up. I was very upset and rightfully distracted for the last few months. I ended up changing my phone number so he couldn’t contact me again&amp; I’d stop hoping he’d call and change his mind. It’s weird but helps me move on and not check my phone repeatedly.  When I applied for the contest I put both our numbers and my email. Recently I found out I won two out of the five by email( all contests were from the same website/company) because my number is no longer we active. Before they emailed they called my ex and also told him I won which I didn’t know until just recently. But he didn’t have my number as well so he also emailed me two days after I won. He asked me to call him and at first I was excited but after I called he barely asked me how I was before straight up asking if I was going to still buy him a car&amp; a vacation. All the feelings I had left completely dried up in that moment. I said no and hung up. I completely don’t believe I owe him anything especially after I bought him SEVERAL gifts for Christmas he took&amp; never gave me mine. I ended up telling some friends and family and a few of them said I should’ve atleast gave him a cut since it was a lot of money&amp; I was offered more to write a whole book based on one of the stories. I don’t think he deserves it; he didn’t help me write or pick the contests I did it alone. But I’m starting to feel like I could give him some money from it as it won’t effect the whole amount I’m getting by much. So AITA if I keep everything myself? ",AmItheAsshole
? For not attending my sisters baby shower? ,"So my sister is two years older than me, I was the first one to get pregnant back in 2022… she was very involved in my baby shower, which I deeply did appreciate, but it’s more like she just loves to be in control.  My Mother in law was super supportive and she basically told my MIL to fuck off and said she hated the invites she made, just petty stuff like that.  She started fights with her and just kind of wanted full control but it was very ugly and stressful at the time. 

Even when I got married, she kind of started fights with my husbands father about who was going to take pictures…  she is very controlling and always has been. It rubs everyone the wrong way…. 

Okay so leading up to 2024, we both are pregnant currently and both of our babies are due this August.  Like I mentioned earlier, she’s very controlling so basically wants to plan her own baby shower. Okay cool, I know how she is… so I am kind of just sitting back because I know she deeply desires to plan it, I did pay for her venue already and told her I will help financially just let me know what you need. Well now she started a fight with me a few days ago saying I’m so unsupportive and she shouldn’t have to ask for my help and yeah I paid for the venue but what else am I going to do?…… 

she always talks shit about me to her close friend and now said that her friend is going to help plan it…, so now when I see her friend, she gives me a nasty attitude and it’s just so uncomfortable. With all that being said,   I don’t even want to attend her baby shower. If anyone knew my sister they know she is controlling.  Trust me, there is nothing I can do for her baby shower but supply the funds!  I will be 38 weeks pregnant at her baby shower in July and just feel like not coming. Besides this, my sister has always been toxic towards me. My mom said it’s because she’s jealous of me but I’m just done with her treating me like this. I am distancing myself as much as possible for my own mental wellbeing. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not apologizing further after accusing someone of cheating?,"I (29M) joined my girlfriend (30F) for a board game buffet brunch three days ago for a get together with a couple of her work friends that I wasn't familiar with. There were about eight of us (I was one of three men) and we decided to play scrabble after a quick round of zombie dice. 

I love board games I like believing in the integrity of the game. During the scrabble game I was impressed by the vocabulary of... let's call her Cassidy. She played a lot of big words and managed to secure a good chunk of points through it all. But then as I started to see her thinking I noticed that every so often that she'd pull out a device and start looking at it. After the third time this happened (just after she drank a glass of water) I called her out on it like ""Wow, I guess some of us have to rely on more than our brains to really play together.""

Cassidy got quiet and handed me the device she was using. It said 'Glucose/blood sugar/blood pressure' on it. She explained that she was just checking her blood sugar through the brunch.

I went pale and didn't say anything for the rest of the game. The game changed to a fake artist goes to new york and I went with Cassidy to get extra markers. I apologized to Cassidy when we got hte markers, saying that I didn't like it when people played games off of what I perceived to be a different advantage and she said it was uncomfortable but she could see how I mistook that for happening. We finished up brunch and the board games and started to head off.

When my girlfriend and I got back to our place she started saying that what I did was a total social gaffe. I agreed with her and I told her when we got a fake artist I apologized to CAssidy. She said that wasn't a good enough apology because I publically humiliated her and I needed to publically apologize to her. I didn't agree with this statement because I think public apologies are just a way to save face with people who weren't involved in the conflict. I said that I apologized directly to her and she said she accepted the apology.

The next day I went to pick up my girlfriend from work and she said that it was the perfect time to apologize to Cassidy in public as Cassidy was just pulling into her shift. I didn't want to make a big deal of it so I just walked off to the car. My girlfriend followed but I've been getting a frosty reception ever since.

anyways, AITA for not apologizing further to Cassidy after publically accusing her of cheating in a board game?",AmItheAsshole
 for being a terrible daughter in law and fiancee?,"I (27F) have been with my fiancee (31M) for 8 years now. 



Background: This started when I first met her at my fiancee's (then bf) convocation. She flew here to see his ceremony as he studied abroad. It was all going well until the day of the ceremony. We were running late. My mom and sister were coming to show support and we had difficulties finding 4 seats together near the front. That is when my MIL suggested that she sit at the front in a single seat and we can all find a seat in the back together. I was very upset and this turned into a big fight between my fiancee and I. After that, I was low contact with my IL's.



Context: I have always struggled with my weight. I have health issues that has caused significant fluctuation in my weight. My MIL would make comments, whenever she sees me, about losing weight. My fiancee said it is from a place of concern. Besides those remarks, we rarely spoke. The rest of his family were kind to me and we were rarely ever in contact beyond the odd check in's. She would also reach out to me when she could not get a hold of her son but not much beyond that.



Last year, we purchased our first home together with financial help from my parents. My IL did not offer any assistance with that, nor did I want them to. It is a small 2 bedroom home. Half a year later, my SIL (40f) said she wanted to move to a new country with her child (10f) and come live with us. She told my fiancee that she waited for us to buy a house first before moving. I was not asked for my thoughts as from their culture, we were expected to help. Having them live with us was a nightmare. I cleaned up after them while also teaching them about how to live here. When they first moved here, they facetimed my MIL. My MIL saw my body for the first time as I had avoided video calls due to comments about weight. The first words from my MIL was oh wow, you have gained a lot of weight. I laughed it off and went to my room to cry. After that, my feelings towards my IL soured. SIL and niece were not good house guests. They rarely cleaned or help out with the house. They originally contributed to groceries but stopped soon after. They did not pay rent or help financially. 



Recently, SIL and child finally moved out. They left after 6 months since the relationship got very bad at the end. I have not emotionally recovered from their stay and my face sours every time my fiancee mentions his family. This caused a huge argument as recently as his sister asked for help with things for her new place. I got upset and asked why she couldn't do it herself and this led us arguing about how disgusted I look whenever he talks about his family. I am angry but I can also understand how difficult this is for him as they are his family. This led me to think if I am the asshole for not being more understanding. My fiancee has always been supportive and had my back so AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for how I took my brother's comments? (Petty argument),"My cousin is staying with me, I'm helping him try to salvage his life which has been homelessness, injuries, misfortune, and addiction for a while. He's weird about what he eats and drinks. He doesn't like to drink tap water. He also doesn't drive or have the ability to contribute much monetarily at this time, so in other words I buy the groceries. The budget is extremely tight (too tight), especially with all his dietary requirements. Anyway, I try to keep water jugs on hand so he can avoid using tap water like he wants to.

He ran out of water yesterday morning or so. Shortly after I had gone grocery shopping. I hadn't known he was so low on water when I went, and I work full time and I'm a parent. So I haven't made it back to the grocery store yet. 

I mention maybe swinging by the store to grab an ingredient for dinner. He's like ""oh and I'm out of water"" I was like ""cool, I can get some."" Then he goes ""yeah no offense but the tap water just tastes bad and I ran out of water so I just haven't drank any water in 2 days and I'm really thirsty.""

And honestly this irritated me. I took him saying this as some kind of implication that him not drinking water for 2 days was my fault. I thought, why is he guilt tripping me about this water when I just said I'd get some, and he is perfectly capable of drinking the unflouridated tap water if he's that thirsty? I responded kind of snippy, I was like ""yeah, that seems like a bad decision, I don't see how that's my fault.""

We got into an argument. He says he didn't mean it that way, and I believe him. But he didn't understand how I could possibly take it that way, and that's been my sticking point. I'm willing to adjust to the knowledge that he wasn't trying to guilt trip me. But the fact that I took it that way seems reasonable. Why else would he proceed to complain at me about how thirsty he was?

But...I'm trying to improve my trauma responses. Maybe that really is a huge leap to make? Does his comment seem like a reasonable thing people say to make conversation? Is that really just my defensiveness? I know this is a petty small argument but your honest answers would really help me. AITA for how I interpreted his comment?",AmItheAsshole
 for taking back my dog that I gave to my dad,"In 2022, I moved out of my dad’s house after moving home after college. During college I adopted a puppy and raised him for 4 years. He was honestly my best friend and brought me a lot of joy.  
  
It was very stressful living with my dad after college because he was an alcoholic. He functioned fine during the day and was his normal self but when he drank in the evenings he would get depressed and irritable. There were many nights he would cry at the dinner table while we’d be eating dinner. I felt absolutely helpless to help him. 

One night after I moved in he got so drunk that he was passing out at the kitchen table, and couldn’t walk. He broke a drinking glass on accident and I was afraid he’d hurt himself by walking in it. I had to carry him upstairs, at some points supporting all his weight. He passed out when we got to the top of the stairs and I called an ambulance because I thought it might be alcohol poisioning. That was my breaking point after many years of his alcoholism, more than 3/4ths of my life.  
  
I secured a job in another city and moved out shortly after that event and in with my friend but I couldn’t take my dog because my friend’s dogs didn’t like other dogs so I had to leave him with my dad. 

My dad asked if he could have him, and honestly I felt bad for my dad and wanted to support his recovery (he decided to join a 12-step program after I told him I was moving out) and honestly in that moment I was desperate to get away after years of worrying about my dad, that I was sad to do it, but it seemed like nothing else mattered but getting away.  
  
Two years later my dad still has my dog and has recovered. I just desperately want him back. He was such a comfort to me and made me laugh, and now I can’t look at him without getting sad. I’ve told my dad multiple times and asked if I could have him back, but my dad says he’s become attached to him and he provides him company.

Ollie (my dog) now never leaves the house or backyard. We used to go hiking and to the dog park together and traveled together. He always got a lot of interaction. Now he’s pick of a nervous habit of chewing through sheets (bed sheets) due to anxiety. (I read on the internet that this is a nervous habit because of lack of stimulation). It breaks my heart.  
  
Would I be the asshole if I took my dog back anyway, despite what my dad says? I want to just take him. My dad says ""Don't be an Indian giver"" which would mean breaking a promise in his eyes, making me an asshole. It makes me feel bad to think of taking him since my dad is a senior and lives alone, but I feel like he should understand that I gave my dog to my dad because I felt desperate to support his recovery. 

Taking my dog back would make me an asshole because my dad might get lonely and I would be taking him despite his wishes since the dog is his now. 

I think I’d be the asshole because I’m taking away Ollie after he’s become attached to him.


Edit: Modbot keeps denying my post because I’m not “posting the action that may make me an asshole and 2) “why that action may make me an asshole” I’m confused so I’m just going to say speaking in future tense… I took my dog back that I gave to my dad. That would make me the asshole because the dog is his now. And see if that works…my",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my BF bring her dog with her to stay with me?,"So to give a little background I (29F) live alone in a one bedroom apartment. One of my BF's still lives with her mom and they are going to be put out of the place they live in soon.
My BF has 3 dogs that she takes care of (only one of them is actually hers) and she asked if she can stay with me if/when they get put out. Of course I told her yes I have no issue with her staying with me especially when the cost of living is so high these days
Anyway, while I told her that she can stay I also had to inform her that she couldn't bring her dog with her. She didn't outright get upset with me initially (she actually seemed fine with it), but (maybe it's just me) she keeps telling me how the stress of finding somewhere to live with her dog has been affecting her health and saying things like how I ""can't deal with her  bringing her dog over"".
Now don't get me wrong I love dogs just fine but there's a myriad of reasons as to why I don't currently have a pet.
1. My lease does not accommodate having a animal in my apartment so I will be at risk of being put out if the pet is discovered. 
2. Her dog is NOT house trained. I can't even list all of the past stories she's told me of her dog peeing and pooping on her clothes, bed, carpet, etc. I don't want to say I'm a neat freak but I like my place to be a certain way and I just know I wouldn't be able to deal with an animal who isn't trained.
3. I love her but she isn't exactly the cleanest person (trust me I've been to her place and was afraid to sit down) so that combined with her dog? It literally almost makes me hyperventilate at the thought of it.
4. Again I live in a one bedroom apartment. So accommodating an extra adult is already tough enough as it is w/o adding a pet on top of everything else.
Idk. I've just been feeling really guilty about the whole thing and wish I could be the type of person to just welcome them both with open arms but I've done that before (taken on more than I could handle with people staying with me) and it made me so stressed out. I just don't want to put myself into that situation again. My home is a safe place for me to relax and forget about the outside world (if you can't tell I'm an introvert😓) so I'm very determined to not let my heart soften and ""give in"" but in the process I'm feeling like a bad friend. Ik how much she cares for her dog but I just don't think I have the mental capacity to deal with both of them in my space. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I (17) excluded my sister (14) from my ACT celebration?,"To start things off, I'm autistic. For me, this makes it really easy to understand a lot of information. I'm also a really good test taker. 2 years ago, in 9th grade, I took the pre ACT and got a 25. Already an amazing score. Now I'm in 11th grade and just got my scores back today. 29 composite. 35 in science. 8 on my writing.

Safe to say, my family was extremely excited. We called my grandma and aunt to tell them the news. While I was talking, my sister kept butting in, saying how I got my brains from her. Weird, but I tried to ignore it.

Well, once I had gotten off the phone and was talking to our mom, I look down to see my sister hiding in her blanket. When I jokingly asked if she was okay in there, she started sobbing, saying how she's worried she'll get a worse score than me, which is likely, given that a 29 is extremely high. She gets really anxious about tests. But, at the same time, she's only in 8th grade.

She's done this kind of thing in the past. Crying when I got a birthday present she wanted, crying when I had friends over, basically crying whenever I got something that she wanted. Well, we're planning to celebrate my score, but I don't know if I want my sister there. I don't want her to take away from my moment.

She goes over to our father's house every other week, so it wouldn't be in her face that we were celebrating without her.

So, WIBTA if I excluded my sister from my celebration?

  
Update: I'm going to talk to her and give her the chance to come if she wants. 

I know that my sister is usually extremely sweet, and I know she cares about me. I don't really know what else to say.

To those who say that my scores weren't that high, I recognize that they could definitely be higher, but they're also nothing to laugh at. The average in my state is 17.8, so I feel as though I've done really well.",AmItheAsshole
 food telling my brother that he's becoming a father in a lot of ways,"I-18m have been fighting with my brother and father a lot of the last few months due to a lot of stresses. My paternal grandmother passed away back in January, over the last few months I've reconnected with my brother 17 m and he is behaving a lot like how my grandmother said that my father behaved when he was that age and still behaves. My father 48 m doesn't show a lot of emotions unless he's extremely angry in which case he yells screams and swears, my brother has been acting the same way and whenever I try to mention it to him he says I'm saying that he's our father which I'm just trying to compare the similarities in the way they're acting, today I lost a family dog of 11 years and both of them seemed extremely cold when I told them. According to my brother my father's has said that it was a part of the family but he never said that to me and I have been taking care of the dog since January but me and my grandmother have been taking care of it for 6 years and my grandparents had it since before then. I am not using the dog's name because if any of my family happened to be on here they would be able to tell who it was. I've also been going through a bunch of stuff with other family members that all culminated today before I found her, I am trying my best to deal with all of it but it's extremely hard and I'm having to contact lawyers on it on Monday. My brother only knows about the dog passing and that's it. When I told him how the way he's acting as the same way our father reacted he got extremely angry with me and was accusing me of saying there's something wrong with him which I never did. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for uninviting my friend on an amazing backpacking trip?,"My long-distance boyfriend and I have been planning to hike the Grand Canyon R2R hike for about 3 years now... and I finally was able to snag a permit this year. I was talking to roommate about it and she expressed being interested in that, so I invited her. I thought, the more the merrier! She and I were very friendly back then. That was a few months ago, after only a couple of months of knowing her (a VERY big mistake on my part). Since then, sadly, she has shown herself to be someone I wouldn't ever room with again, or probably stay in contact with. Much less go on a bucket list adventure with. 

Long story short, she basically is never around and I am forced to take care of her cat that she neglects. Clean his litter, feed him (and I do it happily for the cat otherwise he would literally starve), but he's clearly been anxious about her being away so much and has stopped using the litter box and is pooping in my ROOM... and when I brought it up to her, her solution was for me to ""watch my step"" because there was nothing she could do about that. Yes, I was floored. Just blatant disrespect. For me and for her own cat. It's sad. That, along with the fact that the only thing I asked of her courtesy-wise was to give me a heads-up when she was bringing a guy over. Since she is single and dating and bringing many of them over every weekend. She did that for the first couple of weeks, then stopped giving me a heads-up completely and sneaks them in. The apartment is small, our bedrooms are right next to each other and we share a bathroom and I just want to know there isn't a stranger in the house so I'm not lounging around without a bra on or whatever. Just overall, doesn't seem to respect me with simple things. 

Any way, I don't really want her going on this trip any more. Luckily, she hasn't paid me back for reservations I made for it or her part of the permit. But I know she still fully intends to go. I still feel GUILTY though because she was excited about going... but there is no way now in my mind that I would enjoy her company. Plus, who's gonna take care of her cat?? (...lol) Part of me also wants to enjoy the trip with my LD boyfriend, who I've been dating for 5 years, and haven't seen in 4 months. Yes, I know I shouldn't have invited her in the first place... but I did :( 

EDIT: AITA for uninvitjng my roommate on a backpacking trip she was excited for because I feel she’s been disrespectful toward me? ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking him not to dm her anymore? ,"TLDR I've been talking to this guy for awhile now. We're in a weird situationship (long story and unimportant to this question) so not really a couple but still involved romantically somewhat. Anyways so there's a girl that's been always a bit flirty with him and for this reason I haven't been too fond of her. For reference, she knows I'm close to him and still continues with flirty comments here and there. Recently things got heated up in our close circle of friends and some unpleasant things were said. In an attempt to make him feel better, this girl sends him a message that started out something like ""hey, I just want you to know that ily. (insert other text unimportant to this question"". Now, although I would have no problem with something like this coming from any other female friend, the fact that this girl has been making advances towards him for nearly a year - this text just didn't vibe with me. I expressed my feelings to him and asked if he would stop direct messaging her out of respect that it hurt me and for me, this crossed a line, and he was ok with it. AITA for asking this? ",AmItheAsshole
 for arguing with my friends about them being late?,"Here it goes, I was planning for us to hang out in a restaurant with my 2 friends, my friend's cousin, 2 boys in which one is my friend's boyfriend.

So, we planned for everyone to be there at 7:00 pm, they have came almost 9:00pm and I have ate my food by this time. Then I asked, why were they so late, she said that it wasn't on purpose but then I said ""You know, when you plan something for a certain hour I believe you are supposed to come in that ceratin hour"", one of them answered that it was because of ""D""'s boyfriend lived far away from the place, I said that they could have come without him and that the they should still have the responsibility to came on the hour we planned to hang out, she said ""Girl, you live like *area in which it's next to the place* and he lives *area which is far away from the place* and it was raining"" in which I replied ""So you came late because one person?"" she stared at me in silence then replied ""Well, if you are complaining, then you could just have not came."" In which I just ""Ok then"" because I was already mad and wanted to go home. Then I called my mom and waited for her to come, in that time she didn't came my friend talked to the ""D"" about how I was silent after her response and then looked at me in which I just crossed my arms and rolled my eyes up, then my mother came and I go home. So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my in laws there will be no wedding if my best friend(f) is not invited?,"Me (m), my wife ""Nancy"" and my best friend Alex(f) are all in our early 30s. Nancy and Alex know each other and even hang out alone and have their girl time when Alex comes to visit as she lives in different country.

Now me and Alex used to date back in the high school but broke up before we turned 18 as we found we want different things in life. However despite the break up we became best friends and never displayed anything romantical towards each other. She is like a sister to me. She supported me when I was in prison, lost relatives and through a lot of other hardships before I met Nancy. She is my rock and the person I am comfortable to open up to and she also gives advice if I mess up with Nancy and explains why I am an idiot. It is also important that she has a long term partner who both me and Nancy get along well.

Now to the problem: me and Nancy are getting married in a couple of months and I have noticed that we haven't received rsvp from Alex. My future mother and sister in law were in charge of invitations, so I have messaged Alex to see if she received anything and what her answer will be. Alwex confirmed she and her partner would be happy to attend and how excited she is to see me and Nancy getting married. 

I have contacted my in laws and asked why Alex haven't received an invitation and have tried to be as polite as possible thinking it might just be an issue with delivery or lost in mail, but both MIL and SIL have told me they have never sent an invite as they believe my friendship with Alex is inappropriate and I would be disrespecting Nancy by having Alex in our wedding. I was confused as Nancy is also really excited to see her as they grew close. I have tried to reason with them but they basically said if I invite Alex they won't come to the wedding.

I have checked with Nancy and she is visibly upset about the whole deal as she doesn't think it is fair to leave Alex out.

Here where I can be an asshole: after some consideration and discussion with Nancy, I have sent my in laws a message saying there will be no wedding if they are not comfortable with Alex attending. Of course it tipped them off with my MIL and SIL believing I am a huge asshole and spreading rumours to distant family.

It is also important to know that the wedding was only happening to keep her side of the family happy and we would preferred to elope and have small celebration at a restaurant with close friends.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend to not get his hopes up too high in his new relationship?,"A close friend of mine (21 years old) just entered his first relationship 4 months ago. Ever since then he has been posting her all over his instagram and snapchat. Recently he made a highlight on instagram and named it loml. That stands for love of my life for those of you who don't know. He posts her about her at least once every other day. While i'm happy for them, i am becoming worried that he is putting all his eggs in one basket and getting his hopes up too high that his first relationship will be his last. So one day when we are talking on the phone he was talking about his girlfriend. I said to him that it's great that he is happy, but that he shouldn't get his hopes up too high because it's only his first relationship. He seemed to take offense to that and said that he doesn't care what I think. I told him that he should not think that this girl is the love of his life just yet because it's only been a few months, and most people don't end up marrying the first person they date. I told him that i'm not saying his relationship will not last, but i said don't be surprised if it doesn't. He got mad at me and claimed that I am jealous of his relationship. That was 3 days ago and i just found out that he has me blocked on instagram.

When i told my other friend what I said, he said to me that I was being rude and I should let him enjoy his new relationship. I did not mean to come off too harsh to him but I wanted to warn him. I understand at 4 months you're still in that honeymoon stage so i could see why i was the asshole for telling him that so early. Am i in the wrong for what i said?",AmItheAsshole
 for friend-zoning my coworker?,"A few months ago my coworker asked for my snap. It was after 5 months of working together, but barely ever talking to each other. He would text me everyday, all day. He eventually told me he liked me over snap. I thought I liked him too, so I said that. We went to the movies, he held my hand. This was very awkward, because we can barely talk in person. Everything was just very awkward and made me very uncomfortable. About a week ago, I went to his house again to watch some shows, he held my hand again. I prayed over and over and over again to let me leave early because of how uncomfortable I was. I ended up having to stay like that for an hour.

He also kept showing how insecure and immature he was. He would constantly “test” me to see if I would text first. I realized I didn’t like him, but I was two months into this whole thing. 

I’m a very busy person, and so the last few days I’ve been setting up ending it by saying how busy and stressed out I’ve been. Today during our shift, I said “ you’ve probably noticed how busy I’ve been, I think I’m too busy for a relationship right now. I think it’s best that we stay friends for right now.” he just said okay and turned off his mic. We spent the rest of the shift in silence. He cut me off before I could say anything else and explain that I’m very busy. 

I sent him “Hey, I just wanted to say sorry that it was pretty awkward tonight. I wanted to talk to you in person because I think it’s pretty crappy to do that over text. I was trying to be honest about where I’m at. You’re really nice, and I’m glad I got to know you. Again, I’m sorry that I made the shift awkward.” He responded lol we’re all good. a few minutes later, he sent a very long paragraph. He was basically saying that I hurt him, I led him on, he accused me of not liking him the whole time, he said I switched it up as soon as I got stressed, he said we all get stressed, “welcome to adulthood,” told me I’m like all the other women he’s ever met and thought I would be different, just a lot of crap. It really hurt me, but I didn’t respond with anything because I didn’t wanna be petty. I just thought he was nicer than this.

I did think that I might have been leading him on a bit and I felt terrible about the whole thing. I understand why I might be the AH. I think I let things get too far and didn’t tell him about my uncertainty with my feelings. 

 I tried my best not to hurt him or make things weird, but I did. I’m quitting my jobs soon (for other reasons), but did I handle this wrong? AITA for friend zoning my coworker?",AmItheAsshole
 for following my contract and doing my new apprtment's inventory ?,"I just saw I missed up my title. I meant apartment



Hello , I (18F) am a first year student. Recently I moved to a new apartement in order to live closer to my campus. This story is between me , my mother , and the couple of landlords.

Yesterday , I moved to the new apartment , my mother was with me because I needed help moving all my stuff. We noticed that my apartment had some issue and was pretty dirty so we decided to take some photos and to write this stuff down.

Because it was written in the contract that we needed to do an inventory (which had to signal any damage or abnormalities found in the apartment) , me and my mom did exactly that. We wrote an inventory. Inside , we told the landlords the abnormalities we found (Such as broken smoke detectors , no/ripped curtains , tartar in the shower and toilets , damaged walls , stained sofa..). While this inventory was taking notice of many damages , it was not a critic in any way. It's just the procedure (And it ensure that I'm not getting in troubles for damages that I didn't caused). Actually , despite its issues I'm pretty happy to be living in this place

When the landlords got the email with the inventory , they took it very personally and were basically very mad. The lady called my mom and was being pretty aggressive toward her about our ""list of complains"". Her husband wrote me a salty email saying that the apartment was just old , that they never had any problem before and that I was more than welcome to leave and find a better apartment if I was not happy.

The thing is that my mother and I never had the intention to hurt their precious feelings. We just did as we were told on the contract and made an inventory. It's not our fault the apartment had issues (And it wouldn't have made sens to overlook these issues in a paper made to take notice of those issues)

Now the landlord (husband) wants to see me for some reasons. He does not seem very happy with me.

AITA for doing an honest  inventory (and thus respecting the contract the landlords wrote) ?

PS : Forgive my grammar issues , I'm from France",AmItheAsshole
 Husband booked holiday without telling me.,"My Husband and myself were meant to go away for a 2 nights for his bday &amp; to see his family. I then said oh why don’t we take the kids (3  boys ages 2-4). After asking this I was told we won’t go, there’s no point in going for 2 nights. I thought ok great end of story. I was more than happy to just stay home. 

About a week ago I over head him on the phone with one of his friends asking him to come away for 2 nights (to the same place we were meant to go). I wasn’t happy at all as last I heard there was no point to us going. Anyway he didn’t book it so I thought he wasn’t going. Yesterday I asked him what are we doing for your birthday he then told me he is now going away for 4 nights!!! Leaving me alone with the kids, I also have work so that will mean I need to take time off. The fact he didn’t even tell me he booked it has seriousily annoyed me, I would never do this to him. The whole thing just seems really sly as if he doesn’t want me to be there. I’ve told my mom, friends etc and they all agree. I’m at the point where I think I am going to leave himWe haven’t been in the best place and for him to just go and book a holiday without telling me &amp; also the fact me and the kids won’t see him for his bday really upsets me. I just have a bad feeling about the whole thing. I’ve told him how I feel and he doesn’t care in the slightest, he just thinks I’m over reacting. ",AmItheAsshole
: mother dragged boyfriend into confict,"I (F18) and mother (F50) recently got into an argument that we had resolved regarding a communication issue. TLDR; I didn’t keep her updated about if I was writing an exam or deferring, and she refused to tell me why she was upset until the end of the argument. 

The next morning, she texted my boyfriend of 6 months (M18) to “tell me immediately” if I’m writing my exams as depending on this she would come and surprise me. He was uncomfortable doing so, and then she changed her request to be to call her on Tuesday with an update. 

My issue with this is that to me, it feels like she’s using a second person to get around our communication issue. She insists that this is not the case and she simply wanted to surprise me. 

Throughout my life, whenever my mother would have a conflict with someone, she would try and drag outsiders into the conflict. This is a behaviour that scares me because this could easily cause “outsiders” to be fed up, and no longer associate with the person dragging them into conflict. I don’t want the people Im closest to  to leave me because of her. 

Although I have accepted that using a second person to get around our communication issue may not have been her intention, my main issue was that I didn’t want her to think that it is okay to drag other people into our conflicts in the future. So, during the past 3 weeks, I’ve expressed this to her many times, calmly and clearly, as well as angrily, and her response was that I was disrespectful, manipulative, ungrateful, and that I have no right to give her an ultimatum (“do not get other people involved in our issues”). She also mentions that she is my mother so she would never do anything to hurt me.

Typically, I drop minor conflicts like this one. However, out of this fear, I’ve refused to just drop it. It’s been three weeks now and I’m getting fed up. Am I in the wrong? Do I just drop it and apologize? Is it that serious? If I don’t just drop it, and this is actually that serious, what do I do? ",AmItheAsshole
 for taking the big room on the group trip?,"The characters: Me (29F), Phoebe (27F), Ross (29M), Rachel (29F), Chandler (28M), and Monica (27F). These are obviously fake names, but the dynamic mirrors our friend group pretty well.

My friends and I are spread out across the country, and we like to meet up once a year or so for a long weekend. For context, Ross &amp; Rachel are a couple, as are Chandler &amp; Monica; Phoebe and I are both chronically single. This year, Phoebe booked a 3 bedroom, 2 bathroom house. The plan was for each “couple” to get a room, with me and Phoebe being the last couple. 

Phoebe had a last-minute emergency and couldn’t come, and admittedly, I was pissed. Not at her, but at the idea of fifth-wheeling the other two couples *again*. I’ve been single for a long time, not always by choice, and while my friends don’t rub it in my face, it still sucks to be surrounded by people deeply in love and when I don't have anyone to share it with.

I arrived first. The bedroom situation was weirder than it looked online—there was one massive master bedroom that took up half the upstairs, and it had its own private bathroom. Then, there were two much smaller bedrooms that shared an external bathroom. Since I arrived first and checked in, I took the big room.

Apparently, this was the worst thing in the entire world. Each couple had a small bedroom, and the four of them had to share one small bathroom, whereas I got an entire ensuite to myself.

I don't think it was fair that I should take one of the smaller bedrooms because I’m single. Phoebe booked everything, and I believe that whomever books and does the effort should get first dibs—she would’ve picked this room if she’d been able to come, and I would’ve bunked with her, therefore, I stayed in the big room anyway. Also, I shared my space as appropriate. Nobody slept with me obviously, but in the mornings, Monica came in to get ready with me or shower in my bathroom so that Rachel, Chandler, and Ross could use the other one. Nobody else asked or tried.

I could tell people were annoyed, but Ross was actively pissed. He said “when we went to XYZ, I shared a bunk bed with OP, because we were singles. I thought now that I have a girlfriend I might have earned the bigger bed.”

AITA for taking up the big room as a single person?

ETA: We paid for the house equally, ie, split it 5 ways.",AmItheAsshole
 For Not Apologizing To My Friend ,"So I live in a mostly medium size town. I took my friend to a bar (let's call it bar Hill) the other night where she (let's call her Jane)met a guy and they hit it off/planned a date later on that week on a Friday. Fast forward to Friday, one of my friends had a birthday on that day and wanted to get out the house. 

I took the person who birthday it was to the first bar which closed in a few minutes (Jane happened to be there but we didn't see each other.). Then I took my friend to the second bar which is Hill. Jane was also there waiting on her date who eventually stood her up that night. I spoke to Jane and then did my own thing later that night (Jane was mad and left).

 Fast forward to the next day after not responding to me that night, Jane was mad that she felt like I was ""over stepping boundaries "" because I didn't avoid the two bars that she was at while she was on a date (who never showed up) because that's what she would do if I was on a date. 

I expressed to her that the bars that she was at are among the only handful of bars that I go to in our town long before I took her there. I told her ""If I unintentionally overstepped your boundaries then I would try not to next time."" And she feels like I'm being an ass and not showing remorse for not apologizing. I see no reason to apologize or show ""Remorse"" because I'm not going to go out of my way to avoid going somewhere because someone I know happens to be on a date there. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my boyfriend there are more important things than football?,"My boyfriend (29m) and I (27f) have been together 3 years in July. We moved in together a couple of months ago. 

We made plans to attend a memorial event this weekend with my family, but his football team won last week and they have an impromptu match this Sunday, during the time we should be with my family. 

He is demanding that he goes, and when I told him I needed support, I got accused of being controlling and that I don’t respect his hobbies (because I don’t follow or really like football). When I reminded him of our prior commitment I was told he doesn’t care, and he absolutely must be at the game. His compromise was to attend the event but be back in time for football, which physically is not possible due to the travel time. 

He hasn’t really spoken to me for 3 days over this issue and when I asked him tonight if football was more important than me, he refused to give me an answer - which told me pretty much everything I need to know. I left. I’m staying with a friend tonight and I think my relationship might be over. 

AITA for standing my ground and telling him there are more important things in life? Am I being a bad girlfriend? 

ETA: he watches the game, doesn’t play in the team - my bad! UK football as well for those asking. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I stop my coworker from stepping over my boundaries?,"Hi everyone, my coworker is rather manipulative and regularly steps over boundaries, not just mine, other coworkers boundaries too. We have different rols/tasks and different workloads. While I have usually a lot of projects to manage, she has very little to do (she even can read books at work, which I am not envious about) and complains a lot if she has to work more from time to time. 

She likes and has time to talk a lot, mostly in monologues and (to me) not very interesting topics and I would rather concentrate on my tasks. When I tell her in a kind way, that I have to finish a project to a certain time, she couldn’t care less. Instead she would get angry that I don’t take time for her. When I talk to coworkers in person about a project, she would interrupt our conversation or talk and laugh loud on the phone at the same time, so me and my coworkers can’t understand what we said.

Most of the time I try to avoid conflict and do as she likes and listen or let things go, because it would not be worth the drama. One day doing things the way she likes was not enough and she started talking to me in a rude and demanding manner, as if I was her personal belonging. That was the point where I told her, she can’t talk to me in this way or demand things, because we are in a work environment and not „friends or family“. 

In a concrete situation, I turned down the blinds and while I was at it, she asked me to turn down hers too, which I said loud and clear, I would do. The blinds are a little difficult to handle an I like to turn parts of it down and adjust them, before I turn down the next. This takes some seconds and while I was doing it, she told me to lower all at once. Because I did not do as she told me again, that I could also turn all the switches at once, and as I did not react, she called me names and I told her, that’s not the right tone to use for a colleague. (I thought, so now I can’t even turn down blinds anymore the way I want it?) 

Since then she feels offended and doesn’t talk to me or snaps at me in a rather aggressive way and even coworkers jump on „her side“ and tell me, I should apologise. Am I really the a… because I will not accept to be treated this way?

Thanks for your opinion. :)",AmItheAsshole
 if I stop trying with my *future* SIL?,"I (28F) have been in a relationship with my boyfriend for more than 7 years, which naturally led to forming close bonds with his family, particularly his mother and sisters. 

His older brother, Joe, tied the knot with Sarah  after a whirlwind romance of about 6-7 months. My boyfriend's mom and I were keen on building a friendship with her, so we extended invitations to dinners and outings. I held a friendly demeanour and even when I was invited over to her house (last minute, may I add) to plan the wedding, I took her favourite chocolate cake as a nice gesture. The whole night her sisters were taking jabs at me for not being married after being with my bf for so many years. I just shrugged it off and turned the other cheek. But I noticed early on that whenever it is just me and Sarah she  consistently exhibits a chilly and condescending attitude towards me or even when she calls me it is extremely rude and passive aggressive. 

Cut to Joe's wedding, where the stress of planning probably to got the best of Sarah, resulting in a major fallout between her and my boyfriend's mom. Following the wedding, she went almost a year without speaking to my boyfriend's mom, making family get-togethers uncomfortably awkward as she would only engage with the father-in-law while ignoring the rest of us. During this Time she was constantly texting me and calling me asking about family Christmas plans, birthday plans, etc. I had never received so many calls and messages from this woman before lol 

In January of this year, I decided it was time to address the tension head-on, orchestrating a sit-down discussion to resolve the issues. Thankfully, Sarah and my boyfriend's mom managed to patch things up, but now Sarah's attitude towards me has taken a nosedive. Every interaction feels like im walking on eggshells, with her huffing, puffing, and rolling her eyes whenever I speak. Not to mention, she didn't even extend a simple thank you for helping to mend the fences. Now she ignores me. No calls, no texts lol I've made numerous attempts to be friendly and civil, but her behavior is becoming increasingly unbearable. WIBTA if I simply just stop trying with her????",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my sister into my apartment?,"About a year ago I (21) moved into an apartment with my husband (21) 
I moved out of my mothers house and into my brothers house at 16. So this is the first place I can actually call mine.

My mother had a hoarding issue, and often picked up things off the side of the road.
Due to this habit we ended up getting bed bugs and to this day my mother has and continues to do nothing about them.
That is the main reason I chose to move out.

With that said, I told my sister she could visit while she’s in college and closer to us as much as she wanted, as my other three brothers who do not live with my mother come and visit regularly.
I have been no contact with my mother since moving out.

Recently my sister has moved out of the dorms and back into my mother’s house. 

When she lived in the dorms, I didn’t have to worry about her bringing bugs, as my mother refused to visit her in college, and my sister doesn’t bother to go home unless it is needed for emergency’s. 

Due to her moving back in, I told her that she has to change in the guest bathroom, which is directly next to the front door, before actually coming further into my apartment. And leave her cloths in a bag outside my apartment.
I purchased multiple things for her to wear, in her size and in her style to wear at my house, because of this rule, I know it wouldn’t be fair to expect her to buy clothes she will only wear at my house.
I have spend over $200 for her to be comfortable in my home.

I also explained my reasons to her multiple times, bed bugs have left me with a lot of anxiety and stress. They are also hard to get rid of.

She came to visit Wednesday, when she arrived I was running errands, so I had told her to let herself in with the spare key I gave her, I reminded her that the cloths for her are in the linen closet, and I even bought new hoodies for her to try.

When I came home, she was sitting on my couch, in cloths she arrived in, with a blanket she had brought from our mother’s house. My sister isn’t a very feminine person, and her wardrobe is very small, excluding the things I keep at my apartment.
So I know these are cloths she’s worn in our mother’s bed bug infested house.

I panicked and told her she had to get off the couch and change, immediately.
This upset her and she started to accuse me of calling her filthy, nasty and other words.
I tried to explain to her again that bringing things from our mother’s house could risk bringing bugs to my apartment, and I could be evicted for it, not to mention I’d just rather not have bugs again, they are incredibly traumatizing if you’ve ever had them.

She accused me of being paranoid, and essentially called me an asshole. She left with her things, and
I had my husband take apart the couch and take it to a storage unit when he got home.

Since then I have gotten a few messages from other relatives, telling me I had no right to kick my own sister out of my house.

So, am I the asshole? How do I explain to her better about my reasons? ",AmItheAsshole
 For Stealing My Stepdaughter's Jewelry?,"Throwaway Account

I (52f) have two stepdaughters through my husband of five years Donna (26f) and Dana (21f), and while Dana and I had a decent relationship I virtually had no relationship with Donna. Although, not through lack of trying. I met and dated my husband for two years before I actually married him and during that time I tried to reach out to Donna and offered to take her out on fun outings, figure out what her interests were, or even engage in some polite conversation during family gatherings.

Donna was not interested and I started to back off when I felt her annoyance at my behavior. I wasn't trying to be the type of stepmom who wants to replace the dead one, I just wanted to have a positive relationship. I ask my husband for tips but he told me not to bother as Donna has always been stand offish and difficult. Her grandparents told her to just give her time while Dana called her a stubborn and sensitive b\*tch. Apparently Donna wasn't very nice to Dana's mom (they're half sisters) and she blames her for her parents divorce and resents the fact that Donna is their grandparents favorite.

I wanted to ask more about it but I felt like that would be too pushy and nosy and just kept on. When My husband and I got engaged I reached out to Donna (through her grandparents) about her being a bridesmaid but she declined and didn't even show up to the wedding. I was hurt but didn't say anything when she graduated I didn't kick up a fuss about not being invited to the ceremony but passed along a message in the form of a card stating what an amazing accomplishment this was for her, that she has so much potential, I know how much her mom would be proud of her as I would be of my own children (I've got two kids from a prior relationship), and that I'm here for any advice if she needs it.

After that I just let it be. Then I found out the past family drama and it all clicked. Dana's mom was a horrible stepmom to Donna. Dana's mom treated her horribly and favored her own daughter constantly. Dana's mom even took jewelry that belonged to Donna's mom for herself and sold most of them. My husband did nothing about it.

I had a horrible stepparent myself and really felt for Donna so I went through Dana's room, found Donna's mom's necklace and then gave it to Donna's aunt who in turn gave it to Donna. This has caused a lot of strife between me and my husband but I refuse to apologize. Dana's is now calling me a b\*tch and a thief and says that she's going to call the authorities unless I pay her so AITA?

ETA: I left out a lot stuff because of the word count but I hadn't tried reaching out to Donna for years and she sent me a ""Thank you "" text. Also I confirmed the story with my husband and Dana before I did it. Dana made it clear that she didn't care and would NEVER give up the necklace.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my dad to stop snoring?,"I (M16) live with my dad (44m) and don't really have anywhere else to live unless i want to move to my mum's house which is not a safe environment for me. Me and my dad live in a one bedroom house so we can hear eachother during the night. The problem is that he snores VERY loudly and it tends to wake me up several times a night (usually 2-4 times a night) this makes me extremely frustrated and I end up having very bad sleep, he also tends to get up very early on weekends like 6am and is very loud.

 I've been telling him for MONTHS that this bothers me and affects my concentration, mood and gives me headaches, all he has said is to ""go to sleep before I do and it won't wake you up"" every SINGLE TIME that he says this I say ""no it's so loud that it wakes me up"" he either starts laughing and says ""well if you don't want to take my advice stop whining"" this makes me extremely angry, and I tell him that a lot of the time I do actually sleep before him and I ask how that makes sense since I literally just said that it wakes me up. 

He just won't listen to me and I know he can't control his snoring but I atleast want him to listen to me and not disregard this situation which is really affecting me.

tl;dr my dad loudly snores and it wakes me up, he doesn't take it seriously and starts laughing when I tell him about how it's affecting me",AmItheAsshole
 for lying to my girlfriend about buying her a car?,"Mckaila (22F) and I (25M) met in college and have been dating for several years. We have since both graduated and while she has struggled to find work in her degree field, together we are doing quite well. This bothers her a bit, since she is very independent and doesn’t like feeling like a burden. I do what I can to help her feel independent, but I also want to give her the life she deserves. We have found compromise in that she is okay with gifts because a gift has no strings attached.

This was really tested about a year ago when her car was totaled. She had no way to replace it and had to have a way to get to work and school daily. I let her borrow my car for a couple weeks while we figured out what we were going to do long term. 

I was happy for her to drive my car as long as she needed, but she hated it. Every day she felt like she was taking from me and giving nothing in return. I can and have named a hundred reasons why that’s not true, but she feels like that anyway.

One night she came home in tears and said she can’t handle being responsible for something that isn’t hers anymore. So we decided we would sit down and pick out a car online for her that night. After narrowing down her options, she fell in love with one that had low mileage and great fuel efficiency. When we went through pre-approval, her heart sank. The monthly payment was way out of her price range. 

I offered to split the payment and she immediately refused. She needed it to be her responsibility only. So I said okay, what if I buy it outright and make it a gift to you. She felt like I was mocking her. I told her I was serious and to at least sleep on it. We talked about it more in the morning and I reassured her that it would be 100% hers, that I wouldn’t sign anything and her name would be the only one on it. She reluctantly agreed. 

I told her I would finish up the forms online while she was at work and we could go pick it up together when it was ready. When I got to the final steps, I selected the monthly payments. I figured if she doesn’t know, she can’t feel bad about me making them. And if I ever needed to, I could pay it off immediately. 

We went to pick up the car and as soon as she saw it her reluctance turned to joy. She was ecstatic and I felt justified in my secret. Everything worked out perfectly. 

Fast forward to last week. She comes home visibly upset and before I can ask what’s wrong she throws the folder of her car’s paperwork down on the counter. I say what she already knows and confess that I have been making payments the past year. We get into a huge argument and she spends the night at her parents’ house. She has not come home since. 

I am prepared for this to be the end of our relationship, so I paid off the remainder of the loan yesterday. I tried contacting her so she knows she can decide what her next step is without being dependent on me, but she still won’t take my calls. I guess she will find out when she gets the title in the mail. ",AmItheAsshole
 for writing in my notebook,"I'm 14 years old and a few months ago I came to a different country to be with my grandfather. My grandfather has a wife that I'll call K. 

When I first came here K was civil with me, I could tell she didn't really like me but she was never mean to me, infact when she realized I didn't really have much, she bought me stuff she thought I needed (clothes because I didn't have very many, water bottle, stationary). Me and K didn't talk much but we were never rude.

The problem comes in when yesterday, my grandfather and K got into a fight. The fight was pretty intense so my grandfather, K's son, and I took the dogs to the beach to give K time to cool down. We only took about an hour and a half, when we came but K had locked us out the house. We had to come in through a window. My grandfather called her and they spoke for a while, after he was off the phone I went to go ask what was wrong to which he told me that K had read my notebook and something in it had upset her. She came home and started fighting with my grandfather, her son, and I. She told me I was an ungrateful and nasty bitch, she wants me gone and doesn't want to be in the same house as me.

She took back everything she gave me, which I don't mind, she payed for it. But now she's trying to kick my grandfather and her son out the house, and she's also insulting and yelling at all of us. She yelled that she opened up her home to me and how dare I write that shit about her, and that if i didn't want to be here I should've said so. The thing is, I never wrote negatively about her in my notebook or said I didn't want to be here, infact I expressed how grateful i was. The only times I mentioned her were in passing and positively. I've been racking my brain trying to figure out what she could've been upset by, and the only thing I can think of is where I mentioned missing my family.",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my friend a dumbass?,"Okay so I know this probably seems like a joke post, but I’m genuinely questioning if I’m the asshole here.

I (21M) and My friend (34M)


My friends whom I game with tend to tease and mess with me because I don’t usually play MMOs but we all play one together. Now, they’ll call me dipshit.. dumbass.. what have you, and I couldn’t care less. We decided to go back to destiny 2 because final shape. Lo and behold my friend didn’t know what to do with the dungeon key, so I told him what to do and added something about him being a dumbass. 

Things got worse when I didn’t realize he was serious when asking me to say sorry since he did it so much I just assumed he was joking and brushed it off. Granted I did apologize once I realized, although I was still really confused. During the rest of the night of gaming he proceeded to interrupt and give me the cold shoulder.  

We were playing Crucible and I don’t tend to enjoy crucible very much but whatever, I’ll play because my friends are.. and eventually ended up getting so tired of dealing with my friend and the others weren’t exactly helping since they just went along with whatever. But I ended up leaving his discord because I wanted to avoid saying something I would ultimately regret, as my dog had died recently so whatever emotion I might feel would be alot stronger because of the grief. 

Then apparently I am toxic and my actions were uncalled for even though I’m not really quite sure what I did that was so terrible.

So am I the asshole here? I mean sure my view might be skewed and I missed something I did but…",AmItheAsshole
 for blowing the “surprise”,"My father’s 60th birthday is coming up and his 3 kids( me, Cory, and Lisa) wanna plan a surprise party/ event. My father has been with his wife for 20 years. 

I want to include my step mom in on the plans and let her have a say. My sister doesn’t want too and says “she will be fine not knowing” 

Background, my step mom(Janet) is the sweetest human and would do anything to make you happy. So if we came up and said “we are planning a party is that okay” she is the type to say “whatever you want to do” 

So I told Lisa to ask Janet what she wants. Does she want an active role or does she want to be suprised either is totally fine. 

Lisa doesn’t want to cause she says Janet will “ruin the surprise”. She does tell my dad everything (which is great, that’s her husband) but I feel like she would never if it was a surprise for him 

I want to go behind Lisa’s back and ask Janet what she wants anyways. WIBTA for asking and including her ?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my sister spoiled,"I (M23) got married last year, my wife and I didn’t have the means to have a large wedding, and elected to elope with just our witnesses and our son. We spent over a year planning details and searching for the exact colours we wanted everything to be. My step-sister (30) “Stacy” got engaged late last year, and has been planning and coordinating a large scale wedding since then. 

During this time she made several extremely similar arrangements to my wedding, and has been what I would call a bridezilla. This has resulted in me calling her spoiled. 

For context some of the decisions Stacy has made since becoming engaged;

1. The wedding is taking place at our parents house (who are footing a lot of the bill) in the woods, and she has made our parents curate and grow the flowers for her wedding. These flowers are the same types of flowers that I had hand picked and tied into bouquets for my wedding, plus several more expensive types. Our wedding was also in the woods.

2. My wife and I both wore green, the wedding party and our son all wore royal blue. My sister has decided the men are all wearing royal blue, and the women are wearing green. I told Stacy I was going to wear a blue suit (not royal). This sparked a huge tantrum in which she stated that no family member can wear any blue or green, as none of us are in the bridal party. 

3. My sister and I had discussed that I was eloping, but would be planning a vow renewal for as soon as we could afford to host a “big wedding”. One of the things I had made very clear was that I loved the song Tell me something good, and would be using it for our entrance song to the party for the vow renewal, and it was the song that played while we toasted did our cake at our elopement. Stacy, upon starting to plan her wedding said it would be their entrance song for their party, and that I “should have saved and had a big wedding first”

4. While I don’t believe that family HAS to be involved in your wedding, our family is extremely close. Stacy asked me to be the DJ and my father to walk her down the aisle. I was very excited for this task and immediately started making a playlist, and writing an introduction for the newlyweds. Months after this, I presented the final products to her and was told I wouldn’t be using either of those, as our parents friend would be doing intros and all I was to do was press play on an add free radio station. I expressed my frustration to her about this, and was called an asshole. 

4.5 Our other sister (Tracy) was not asked to do anything to help. Tracy expressed to our mother that this upset her, and she must have spoken to Stacy. A few days later Stacy had the family together on facetime and was going on about how she had an extremely important question for Tracy and that it was a big deal. She proceeded to ask Tracy to be the one to fix her train for her, before walking down the aisle. 

More has happened but I keep hitting the post limit.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to baby proof the house?,"My husband (M50) and I (F30) have an 11 month old baby girl. She’s starting to walk and is now trying to open drawers and cabinets. The problem is I haven’t baby proofed the house yet (I know shame on me I’m working on it). When I brought this fact up to my husband a few days ago, he’s totally against it. He thinks I’m being controlling and in his words ‘depriving my daughter of childhood experiences’ and that she’s smart enough to know not to drink or put the chemicals in her mouth. Yes she’s smart but she’s not even a year old and doesn’t know. I just want to cover power sockets and put locks on a couple cupboards that have cleaning supplies in them. I want my daughter to be able to explore but I want her to be safe while doing so.
Things came to a head this morning when we talked about it and we got in a huge argument again about it and he got pretty nasty. I think I’m going to baby proof anyway and just deal with the consequences, but I’m starting to doubt myself. AITA if I baby proof the house even though my husband is very against it?",AmItheAsshole
 for moving my roommates food out of my fridge?,"
I (19F) moved out today from my dorm. I lived there for the first semester, but had to move back home due to family issues, most of my stuff was left in my dorm room (I have my own room but common area and BR shared) because I wasn’t not allowed to cancel my agreement to live there. I was fine with it and left my stuff in my room and my fridge in the common area. My roommate dropped too during this and I was to get another roommate. This was all at end of fall sem. I planned to commute since I wasn’t far from school.
 
Beginning of this semester, I went to my dorm room to meet my roommate and tell her that I wont be there bc of family issues, but she could use the fridge. Everything was okay and she agreed. She gave me her insta cause she didn’t have a number bc she was international, we kept in touch.
 
Fast forward again to the end of this semester, I go to DM her to ask her when she is planning to move out. I see her insta is deactivated so I use her email and send her a email that says that I was trying to contact her over insta and wanted to see when she was gonna move out. This was at 11AM yesterday.
 
I waited a couple hours to see if she responded, nothing. I contact my RA to see if she can give me her number or them call her.. they try but she doesn’t answer and I don’t send another email since I figured it wasn’t working.
 
Today I go to my dorm and she’s not there. Food is in the fridge, common area and bathroom floors are sticky and hairy, her stuff was everywhere. Idk what to do so I pack all my stuff hoping she’ll come. She doesn’t, so I asked front desk to call and email her, but didn’t hear back. I can’t wait any longer and the front desk just tells me to just put her food in her room. I do just that and leave it at the front of her door. I told my RA to tell her I tried my best to contact her. I also did not take some small things of my mine from the bathroom cause they were extremely dirty and sticky b/c I didn’t feel like causing a problem.
 
 
A few hours after I check out, I get an email from her asking why I dumped all her food on the floor and why I didn’t email her, along with photos. I said I did email and call, she said my email didn’t say I was moving out today and that I should’ve sent another email, and her phone service plan was expired. I say I figured her email wasn’t working since her phone wasn’t so I didn’t try - front desk people also told me it would be no point. She said I still could’ve sent another email. She also asked me if I scratched her MacBook on her desk and sent me a picture of it. I did not but I’m worried that she’ll try to accuse me.
 
Im also worried I could get charged a cleaning fee from her not cleaning the room before leaving – even though I made it clear I was never there. It can be disputed but I might not win and I don’t wanna go through that since I hate confrontation. I’ve been feeling like crap all day due to all of this
 
AITA for moving her stuff? Should I have emailed her again?",AmItheAsshole
 if I confront a bridesmaid because some money issues?,"One of my friends, Stacy (F31) is getting married in May. A group of friends selected by her started organizing a bachelorette party around last December, including a little trip and some activities in another city, 3 hours apart.

We were seven bridesmaids, and four of them, me included, were from the same group. One of the others, Mary, took upon herself to organize a lot from this trip, and we were pretty thankful for that, tbh. Every step she took, she would send us all the tickets and screenshots, so everything felt ok.

A month after the first payment for the airbnb, Mary told us that she received back the money in her account, and was trying to speak with the owner of the airbnb, because she suspected the reservation was taken back. We were all shocked, because was scheduled in March, and this was already in February. We all feared it was the end, maybe we couldn't find anything else and it was an bitch move from the owner. 

Apparently, Mary talked with him and the reason behind the cancelation was that he had already booked the place for someone else in another platform. Erika (F30) started to look for another place to stay to help Mary, they found something a little pricier, but we accepted, better that than nothing!

Mary said she expected the platform to give us some sort of discount for the inconvenience; told us to wait until then to distribute the payments.

A few days after the bachelorette, Mary told us that the platform was refusing to reimburse her or give her any discount, and that she was talking to a lawyer to know if there was anything else to do. Other friend, Sally (F32), asked her to share all the documents she had about the reservation and cancelation and everything, because Mary did not share any of that. She didn't respond.

In this moment, everything went down. Mary sent us in private chats the amount she calculated was missing from the change or airbnb, I paid my part at the moment. But Sally refused to. She said that it was strange how things unfolded, and needed proof of the cancelation. Mary, instead of showing said emails or documents, started to act quite deffensive. Sally contacted Stacy, who didn't know a thing about this (she was the bride, she didn't pay for anything).

Stacy talked with Mary, asking again for proofs, and finally, Mary snapped and confessed to her. She had our money but didn't make the reservation, she used the money for something else. Later, she tried to book the airbnb and it was already taken, so she lied. Stacy promised to keep her secret but insisted that Mary had to pay us back the last payment, the one that was her fault (because the first apartment was cheaper).

This is why I could be an asshole. Mary talked to me privately, stating that she feels more confortable with me. She told me that she finally received the discount, and was going to pay me, for me to distribute with my friends (not Sally, she dind't pay). I want to meet her and face her with the truth. WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
 for ignoring my ex-teammate when she said hi to me? ,"
Hi there - I’m 22F and need some advice. I play for a sports club in a local competition. 

I left my old club in not the greatest of terms 18 months ago. I was severely bullied by several girls in the team, which led me to develop bad anxiety. I have now gotten to a place where I can play with less anxiety, and joined a very friendly club with a nice team. 

Said girls from old club have started their own team, and I have not seen them since I left the club. I played their team today for the first time and things got a bit hectic. My ex-teammates were being extremely rough and playing dirty. 

During the course of the game, one of my teammates rolled their ankle and I had to quickly sub on for her. In my sport, this means taking Velcro bibs off which can be tough. Whilst my teammate was on the ground, I quickly took her bib off at her request, I had to yank it hard to get it off, it flew a bit off, and then I picked it up, and put it on me (this will be important).

As the game was re-starting, one of the said girls said hi (we’ll call her Sally), but I didn’t respond. I felt like engaging with any of them during the game was only going to cause me to start conversations that would cause drama, and be distracting and anxiety inducing. So I simply chose not to engage with them except for saying good game and shake hands at the end.

Game ends and we win by 2 points. As my partner who came to watch my game was packing up his chair, Sally came up to him and said the following things:
- [insert my name] acted so childish and I want you to pass that onto her, she ripped the bib off her teammate and threw it at me. When I said hi, she just ignored me. She needs to know how inappropriate that is and walked off.
- I was so nice to [insert name] when we played together

My partner said he was not there when my teammate got injured bc he had to call first aiders. He did say in response to Sally saying she was nice to me something along the lines of “well you and your teammates behaviour back then certainly was childish, so I’ll leave you with that.”

If you read before, I never actually threw the bib at her, my teammates were like wtf. And what is it her problem who takes off my teammates bib. If she had a problem with what I was doing then that’s fine but to talk to an innocent spectator like that crosses a line. It seems they have used one tiny thing with me ignoring them and misconstrued other things with the bib to try and paint me as a villain. 

I may be the asshole for completely refusing to engage with any of them and putting my partner into a situation like that. Family I have spoken to believe I should have just said hi to keep the peace, but I don’t think I should have to if it would cause me stress. 

AITA for refusing to talk to my ex-teammates? 
",AmItheAsshole
 Sibling edition,"
I’m really questioning if I am or not.
    I've endured a tumultuous relationship with my sister, who has consistently struggled with addiction and irresponsible behavior. Despite my efforts to support her and her children, including providing financial assistance and taking in her kids when necessary, she repeatedly betrayed my trust and neglected her responsibilities. 
   After enduring months of broken promises and financial strain, I reached a breaking point and decided to cut off contact for the sake of my own well-being. Despite attempts to communicate calmly, my sister and her boyfriend continued to disrespect my boundaries. I made the difficult decision to prioritize my mental health and distance myself from the toxic dynamics. Despite criticism from family members. But now she is emailing me about how hurt and upset she is and how much she cries because how could I do this to her.",AmItheAsshole
 My wife blames me when she’s late…,"AITA? I’m confused. My wife and I both work. No kids. When we wake up in the morning, it naturally takes her a good bit longer to get ready. Women have the added pressure of putting on makeup and are sometimes judged more on their appearance than men. Not saying it’s fair. Wife just likes to look good for the day and that’s how she chooses to do it.

Anyway, I get up when I need to be on time for work. I’m lucky it takes me less time and it’s not her fault it takes her longer. But even if I’m standing by the door ready to go in the morning (we drive together), she still blames me for us running behind. The time for us to leave will come and go so sometimes I have to call an Uber and leave her the car or vice versa. When I ask if she’s about ready or if I should go she gets mad when she’s not ready. I’m not trying to badger her but I need to know what the situation is. I have a job too. She might be late but it shouldn’t make me late.

When we talk about this her repeated argument is that she stays in bed longer than she should because I don’t get up when she needs to be up. I tell her to set a separate alarm and to get up whenever she needs so she can get ready and be on time. It’s not like I’m sitting around while she makes me breakfast or something I could do for her to lighten the load - at least I genuinely can’t think of anything that would help. When I asked she said it would help if I got up earlier so it would motivate her to get up too. That just seems ridiculous to me though. Get up and do what? Force her out of bed? Please help me understand.",AmItheAsshole
 for considering something a betrayal,"I(18F) and my ex-friend, Amy(Fake name, 18F), had a falling out and now we aren't friends anymore. When we were, we used to be a trio with this girl I'll call Leif(17F). Leif wasn't the best to me;
•She wouldn't let me make certain jokes that she and Amy could
•wanted me to change my personality in front of people
•Always canceled plans, even when I spent 100 bucks on a ticket (that she never paid me back for)
•try to get me to shut up with “Inside thoughts OP”
•call my interests embarrassing
•And would lie about situations to make me look bad

Soon Amy started to have issues with Leif as well so we both agreed to drop her. Afterwards, we found out more information about Leif being horrible to multiple other people.

Following this, Amy was ignoring me, which confused me because things were going good. When I brought it up, she kept saying she'll text me more but never did. One day, we were hanging at her place, doing her with homework. I finished half of her homework so I was watching her write the essay part, then a text from Leif pops up. I read the message while Amy tried to close it. I asked her if they got back in touch; she replied yes. I asked her why she didn't tell me and she said it was because she didn't want to lose me.

After which, I dissociated the rest of the time. I was silent for a while thinking about what happened. Amy would ask me if I was okay but I would just nod, as I wasn't ready to talk about it yet.

Once I was ready, I brought up to her how I was hurt and she responded with ""Well, I was gonna tell you at some point,"" I rebuttal that she wouldn't be okay if I talked to a bad person from her past. We both went silent as her friends came by so we started to text.

after texting for a moment about the situation, she got upset with me then things were raido silent. I reached out later; Amy expressed her thoughts weren't organized so I gave her space.

Weeks went by, she suddenly asked if I was okay with talking. I said yes, explaining how I was still hurt and felt as if she dismissed my feelings. Amy said she was dismissing me only because she didn't understand. I asked why she couldn't ask me to elaborate, she said I was being distant and never reached out. During the whole silent Streak, I was the only one to communicate and she claimed she did despite not once texting, calling, or approaching me in person. 

I argued how this wasn't the case, she argued ""So, are you saying it's my fault?"" I said, ""No, but it's not like I wasn't trying to reach out."" We were on this for a bit until I said ""I apologize for being distant but you don't just go back to normal after a betrayal"" 
After which, she claimed that it was rude for me to consider this a betrayal.

We argued about this claim until our friendship ended. Following this, I found out she was pretending to not know about the things Lief did. This solidified me not wanting to be friends.

I know this is just HS drama but AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 Help my Friends  or do what my BF says,"My (mixed gender couple) friends were due to move out on a weekend. However they didnt get to finish it so they planned to finish the following weekend as they work in the week. I (gay male) was meant to help them the first weekend but wasnt able to but was able to the second weekend. 
My (also gay male) bf doesn't like them and doesn't like it when I hang out with them.  I've been friends as long as I've known my bf. 
I really should say my ""ex"" now because he broke up with me because I helped them move. 
He couldn't spend time with me the second weekend if he wanted to as he is away. But he feels I shouldn't have been there and just stayed home. 
So....AITA for helping out my friends? 

Edit: He doesn't like them because the first time he met them, I was helping them move into the home. He felt that they were using me. Which they don't.

Edit: added genders",AmItheAsshole
 For Not Turning Down The Speakers/TV At Night When My Brother Asks,"My brother is an EXTREMELY loud snorer, and his bed is placed right next to my wall, so i can easily hear it. Earplugs don't work for me. They are unbearably uncomfortable in my ear(i can't even use earbuds for listening to music. i hate how they fee. i only listen through speakers), and i believe i ways take them off in my sleep at some point and throw them somewhere I guess. I've lost like 3 pairs at this point. But either way its so loud you can still he it faintly enough through earplugs

I have found that blasting brown noise, either through my speakers or tv really drowns the snoring out almost completely if i play it loud enough. Not every night, but some nights he wakes up from it and bangs on my door demanding i turn it off because he can't sleep through it.  
i have gotten to the point where I'm just pretending to still be asleep until he gives up when he's telling me to turn it off.

I understand he can't control snoring, but his snoring is literally nails on chalkboard for me. Having to listen to these EXCRUTIATINGLY loud snorting noises the entire night not irritates me.... it drives me absolutely mad(and daytime sometime. Days he's off of work he'll sleep from like 11PM-1PM)

AITA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to move to another country and separate from parents?,"So, I (F20) am currently living with my mother. Honestly, I don't like the conditions we are living in at all (not anyone's fault, we are ukrainian refugees), and I really feel that I need to separate from parents to live an autonomous life and take care of myself alone. I have two really close friends in another country and they offered me help with the moving and settling there. I don't have any friends or social life here tho. Also I should say that the country I am going to move to is better for me in different ways, but the most important two are friends and language (it's English there and English for me is the foreign language I know best)

I have been planning to move for almost a year now (since last summer), but my mother really didn't want to let me go and she made out like a hundred reasons for me not to go anywhere. And me, being a good daughter all my life and listening to my mother all the time, did as she said and didn't go anywhere. 

After a while I really regretted that I had stayed as I had really good opportunity to relocate which I don't have now. Nevertheless recently I made a decision that I will move regardless what my mother says because it's my life and I want to build it as I want it and not how other people tell me to live even if it's my own mother. I even have the date already, it's the end of May.

When I told her that I am going to another country she was really angry at me and told me that I am an ungrateful and egoistic daughter. She even doesn't want to talk to me anymore and that's really painful. 

I will move anyway but I am just curious if I am making the right decision or am I really an asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 if I confronted my aunt for stressing out my mom?,"My (25yo F) mom (47yo F) is getting married in a few months and she’s trying plan it mostly by herself cause wedding planners are to expensive. Recently my mom had asked me to take her save the date picture which I happily agreed to. We did the mini shoot which was stressful in itself and she posted the save the date to her social media.

The issue starts with my aunt (50 something yo F) asking my mom why she’s being left out of the wedding planning and blaming my stepdad (48yo M) for trying to keep her out of all the decisions or whatever. Which is not true cause my mom has gone to her to talk about what she wants for the wedding and her opinion on decoration ideas and the guest list. She started saying that my stepdad is a blocker and that I might also be blocking her from being involved due to an argument my grandma and I had which was also about how they had issues with my stepdad but that whole other story. She just goes on and on about how my mom is excluding her and it’s my stepdads fault and how she think he hates her cause she owe his a couple grand that she borrowed from him and that he called her the b word on a phone call with me that I have no recollection of. My mom already stood up for herself by telling my aunt that she’s delusional and no one has an issue with her or said anything that she thinks.

I just feel bad for my mom and I’m protective of her so when some gives her issues I feel the need to shield her. It may be too much but my aunt started involving me by saying I’m trying to block her from being involved and it’s pretty annoying. Would it make me an AH for confronting her?

My stepdad invited my aunt to dinner to let her express herself to him directly about how she feels and she straight up rejected the invite by saying she’s busy.

I want to point out that not once did my stepdad or I tell my mom to not invite anyone, we both let my mom do her thing and if my step dad actually wants or doesn’t want something he’ll absolutely voice it to my mom and vice versa for my mom. They have a very strong and understanding relationship.

These are real quotes from the messages my aunt sent my mom:
“Oh wow, they're really beautiful. (Talking about the pictures)
We took the pictures with some matter. You guys didn't want me to take the pictures. Why are you suddenly not including me in your wedding what happened? It's really obvious. happened? It's really obvious. We talked about your wedding for years and now all of a sudden after the Beachouse stuff and (stepdads name) and OPs(me) fight with mom and maybe $ idk but ya so obvious. What’s the matter (stepdads name) doesn’t want me involved?”

Let me know what you guys think in the comments or ask for more info if you feel it’s needed.",AmItheAsshole
 for pointing out my friend for being the only alcoholic in our friend group? (Please read the description),"Side note: I am sorry if the formatting is not good. I am new to this subreddit.  
I (21 Fem) got into a fight with a friend whom I’ll call “Josh” (23 M) about three or four days ago. So we were playing Hero Wars at his house, and he suddenly piped up, ”I’m totally gay for [Aidan](https://hero-wars.fandom.com/wiki/Heroes/Aidan) right now. He is so goddamn sexy, I wanna marry him so bad.” (Which was totally understandable since Aidan is quite handsome).  
Now, you see, Josh has an ongoing and obvious grudge with a gay male that I’ll refer to as “Cam” (23 M) he sees quite often at his favorite bar where we socialize with our friend circle. This causes him to be somewhat homophobic towards gay males, and he was just rambling on about how ”disgusting” gay men are yesterday and that they were “menaces to society”.  
So I replied, “Wait, I thought you thought that gay men were gross?” This caused him to go insanely mad and throw sexist phrases and terms at me, like, “You’re a woman, go back to the kitchen”. When he said the phrase aforementioned, I was just as enraged as he was.  
So I told him, “You’re a drunk bastard, go back to your drunk gangster clan, you unsightly dog!” When I said this, he got angrier about the fact that I pointed out that he was the only alcoholic in our friend circle of nine people.  
So, Reddit? Am I the Asshole? If I am, what should I do? Please tell me your judgements. And also, do not attack me if you think that I am the Asshole in the situation.",AmItheAsshole
H for not bringing wifes charger to gym,"AITA for not bringing wifes phone charger 

My wife went to the gym in our apartment complex and I hopped in the shower. I get out and see she texted me “my phones about to die”. Ok. She finishes the gym and comes home mad, asking if I saw her message. She’s mad i didnt read that and think to bring her charger to her at the gym. I figured she was telling me her phone was gonna die so if I call/text her and she doesnt respond I know whats going on. 
AITAH for not thinking to bring her charger?",AmItheAsshole
 if I tell my mother that she is being overprotective and babying me too much?,"I am 17f I live with my single mother. She was always overprotective toward me ever since I was child. She will not let me go to outside by myself and then later taunt me that I should go outside alone.Recently we had fight. So basically I used to go to my tuition by private bus, but when I have to stop for extra lectures or doubts the bus doesn't wait so I have to miss the lecture. So I told my mom that from now on I will go alone in public vehicle. My friend is also with me almost till home. But my mom is saying that I am still child and people outside are not good and stuff you tell 5 year old. I am 17 and I have to move out next year for college , if I keep being dependable on her I can't do anything without her. And its not only this she always force me to eat and tell me that I don't understand how much I should eat, like it's my body and ofcourse I know how much I should eat and this doesn't stop here. Would I be ah if I confront her??",AmItheAsshole
 for locking my classmates out of the group project I did all by myself? ,"Alright, this seems like a stupid question at first, If I worked on it solely then I should be entitled to lock them out of the ""group"" project they never contributed towards. 

However I have done this exact same thing beforehand to them. It was a CS project where we had to fix up issues in codes (C++) and write clear and definitive reasons about those changes and how it fixes the mistakes. 

I did this back in January, I have a severe common cold problem, If I catch it, It wont go away for like half the year, and especially since it was winter in December/January, my cold was worsening. I then made dumb decisions to eat more cold food like Ice creams and what not. Then by January my condition worsened, In class I was put into that specific group even though I tried to explain to our teacher that I was in no condition of helping them. I did this by calling him, in my house. I wasn't even present in the school and wasnt for a week beforehand. Since this was a project that needed to be done in school, and the fact I couldn't attend for the entirety and after this group project, I was labeled as a betrayer by the other people in the group. I did get credits for my supposed ""part"" in the project even though I NEVER asked for it. 

Fast forward to March we all get the same groups yet again for another CS project, A documentation on various methods of defence against cyber crimes. Now this chapter about Cyber security is the largest chapter, it's like the length of FOUR different ones all put together. Even then I decided to repay them and offered to do about 50% of the work and the other 5 people would split about 10%.

But just last week, They all sent me over their ""part"" of the project together, all of which containing practically nothing but a fuck you text sideways. This confused me and I reached out to them. But in the group chat all of them flamed me for abandoning them the last time and how they expected as a Computer nerd I would do majority of the work even though I was sick. 

This pissed me off and I decided to fuck them over. The submit dates are on the 30th, I sent them the link to the google drive file but cut off access unless approval and rejected each of them several times. Then they started a group voice call to berate me about being a bad friend and to learn to take jokes. 

I had to do ALL the work myself, 50% of which IN THE PAST 3 DAYS SPENDING AROUND 8 HOURS for this. But when I talked to a mutual, they thought I went too far. So AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for charging $50 plus petrol money to drop my sister’s friend’s ID off at the club?,"Changed some details to maintain anonymity. 


Last night my (24F) sister Chloe (21F) and a group of 7 friends (21-23M/F) went out to celebrate one of their birthdays. They went to a restaurant and then planned on clubbing afterwards. Everyone came to our house for pres and to get ready, and then our mum dropped them off at the restaurant. Upon arriving at the restaurant, one of the boys, Jay (21M) realised he had left his ID at our house and wouldn’t be able to go clubbing with everyone after. 


Chloe called me at 8:30PM and asked if I would bring Jay’s ID for a fee. I offered to do it for $50AUD ($32USD) plus any petrol money. For context, we live semi-rurally so the restaurant is a 30 minute drive away, and petrol is currently $2.20 ($1.44USD) per litre at the moment. It is nearing winter so it’s cold, plus I was ready to go to bed and watch tv. Anything below $50 is not enough incentive for me to get up and drive an hour round trip at night to drop off an ID to someone that’s not even my friend. 


Jay initially declined and told me not to worry about it but called back 15 minutes later to ask if I could bring it and that he would pay the $50 and petrol money. I said yes and did the trip and he paid me $50. Now it’s the next day and my sister and her friends are saying charging $50 for a 30 minute drive is outrageous and that I totally ripped him off.


 I said that I’m not doing an hour round trip to make only $30 profit after petrol money and wear and tear on my car. They said that I should’ve just done it for $30 and that it would’ve been equivalent to working for an hour at a job anyway. Jay basically said I took advantage of the situation because I knew their entire night would be ruined if he can’t get into the clubs with them, and that he believes $50 is more than enough payment so he won’t be transferring me extra for petrol fees. 


So am I an asshole for charging $50 + petrol money to drop off his ID? 


Edit: pricing is in AUD, not USD. In USD the price would be $32USD. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I confronted my partner about her family,"I (19M, AFAB) and my Partner who we'll call Gale (19F, AMAB) have been in a relationship for almost 6 months. I've been noticing patterns with Gale since she came to live with me.

Gale contacts her mother and her older sister to stay in contact with them but never her father. Gale hasn't talked to her father since she moved out.

Gale has met up and reconnected with her sisters and mother during the time. They are Roman Catholics and don't support Gale's decisions to both move out and date me. 

Gale recently went to her family's 2024 Easter celebration. Gale's father pulled her aside before she left to tell her that he supports her.

Fast forward to last night (4/26) where her father reached out to me through messenger and Gale through text to meet up with us and have coffee this coming week. Gale is on the side of not wanting to meet up with her father, despite Gale's father supporting her.

I think it's a little weird for her to be just fine meeting up with her sisters and mother who don't support her decision to be with me, but not meet with her father who supports her.

Gale said we'd talk about it more when she gets home, but WIBTA if I brought it up to her?


Edit: Thank you all for your perspectives, and comments. I've should've worded the title differently, I'm not confronting Gale just having a conversation with her but I couldn't think of the word at the time. English is a little difficult. But that's not an excuse for my wording of the title.

I didn't know at the time of posting the og post, some personal things on her end.

I do want to clarify that Gale's father reached out to her first and got my number from her with my consent, I've noticed some comments pointing out how weird it was. But Gale's father contacted her first. I would never push her to tell me anything, and I understand that it's her family and not mine. Her safety, opinions, and things she went through are important to me. 

Gale and I talked last night and she explained some things that are personal that I won't share here, because that's between her and I.

Again thank you all for your comments.",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting my family to do our weekly cleaning without me because at the moment I'm the only one working full time?,"My dad is working in another country at the moment so I'll leave him out of this. 

My mom (43f) is a SAHM and she does a wonderful job taking care of the apartment. She left her job about a year or so ago and tries to find herself in freelance (SMM, targeting and related fields). My sister (19) left her job three weeks ago to pursue a career of a tattoo artist, she did some courses in January while still working. She had 3 models on that training and after quitting the official job had 2 on her own. So, she just stays at home doing what she wants. 

I'm an office worker, 5/2, 8AM - 4PM, an hour trip to/from home. 

Basically, throughout my life my sister and I did most of the choirs when we were in school, college and so on but then the dynamic changed when mom decided to stay at home. We (my sister and I) did the occasional dish washing, vacuuming, cleaning, washing when we saw something needs to be done but still most of the work was done by mom. 

But now, every weekend I get asked something like ""when I'd prefer to participate in the cleaning, Saturday or Sunday"". I know for some of you you might seem like not of a big deal but I'm generally a person with low energy bars, which I constantly get joked on by my family members. So, this cleaning takes a couple of hours and feels like an additional work day for me. 

When I was on my vacation and my sister was working I never asked her to do anything, I willingly suggested to mom that we do the weekly cleaning when my sister is working so everything is done by the weekend and she can just rest. 

I feel like they don't treat me fairly but I keep quiet and just go along with them.

P. S. I'm 22F.

edited: I'm the eldest child of four. beside my sister I also have two brothers (6 and 10 y.o.). thought it is worth mentioning.

edited: some people are asking what I contribute in terms of money. There is no set amount because every month is different. I don't specifically pay for rent but I buy all the needed groceries 1-3 times a week. 
My family is a bit tough on money and I earn the average wage for my country (which is not exactly little for one person living with parents). So I contribute a lot to paying for community facilities, for my little brothers' needs, or when we need something at home. since I got the job 1 year ago I started paying for whatever I can when my parents were figuring out their issues with work. when my sister was working officially, she paid for things too but since she earned less than me, I willingly made sure to contribute more.",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to apologize to my partner for yelling?,"My partner and I got into an argument tonight because we bought a pull out couch for our guest room, and it won’t arrive before our guest does. The reason it won’t arrive is because the color I wanted is out of stock at both Ikea locations in our area, so I decided to cancel to order and purchase the other color that is in stock so it will be delivered before the end of the week. 

When my partner got home, I brought up my idea, and she got very stressed about it because we made the purchase using her Klarna account. We were trying to figure out how the refund process at Klarna works, and during this exchange she was getting more stressed and we were making no progress. Since buying this couch was my idea, and I didn’t want to make this purchase on her Klarna account to begin with, I told her not to worry about making another purchase on her account, and that I’ll just use my credit card like I’d originally planned. I left the room to get my wallet out of my purse (10 ft from the room) and she yelled at me “this shit is still on my Klarna account though, what am I supposed to do about it!” 

I immediately turned around and yelled back “I already cancelled the ikea order already so the pending charge will be refunded! And if it isn’t, you call them with proof the order was cancelled and they fix it!” I admit, I was condescending in that response. Afterwards I walked away from her and placed the order on my own. 

She followed me and asked me “so now you’re mad at me now?” And my response was “Yes, because why are you yelling at me?” 

She said that she was frustrated and she yelled out of frustration, and I said that she still yelled at me and there was no reason to. She then got irritated and said that I yelled at her too, as in when I yelled back at her. And then walked off to take a shower. She got out the shower and is now not speaking to me.

I think she expects me to apologize for yelling back, but I don’t think I need to since I was matching her energy. And she didn’t even give me an apology for taking her frustration out on me. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my cousin to take his daughter home early from our wedding?,"Background: my first cousin has a high school aged daughter with special needs. She is very social and talkative but does not have social cues. Developmentally she acts like an elementary school aged child. At social events, she clings on to people, especially me and my sister, interrupts conversations constantly, and overall makes it difficult to talk to other people. She makes uncomfortable comments to people (telling a friend she stalks them on Facebook), touches people’s hair, kisses them with lipstick on, touches their clothes, etc. At recent life cycle events including a wedding, she was essentially unsupervised by her parents and it was very hard to have moments away from her. 

Situation: My parents asked my cousin to consider bringing his daughter only for the ceremony and cocktail hour, and then have someone pick her up, or to have her supervised by a parent the entire night. My cousin and his family were very upset to hear this and have told us they aren’t coming to the wedding. They also told my parents they don’t want a relationship with them anymore (though there are other things that have made their relationship fragile). My parents did not want to have a conversation with my cousin about this issue at all, but after seeing how much she impacted my sister at her wedding I felt saying nothing was not an option. Am I in the wrong?",AmItheAsshole
 for snapping at my gf when she was trying to help me?,"Just to preface this. My girlfriend had a friend group and that friend group broke apart and she was very sad for a long time because of this and to date she is still not in a good place with most of the friends from her former group.

On Friday I had something very similar happen with my friend group falling apart. I am very sad about it and my girlfriend has noticed the similarities with both situations. She has also noticed I have been very sad about this as a result and she has been trying to cheer me up.

My girlfriend has been pushing me to talk with another friend from my friend group but I really don't want to talk about this right now and I am not ready to address it. I communicated this to her, but she was insisting that I need to talk about it and I should rely on her as she has been through this experience before. So for the whole evening she was pushing me to either talk about my feelings or pushing me to talk with my friend about the situation and each time I told her I didn't want to.

This morning I felt pretty much the same and my girlfriend has continuously asked me talk about it or call my friend. I told her that I appreciated that she wanted to help but that what she was doing was actually bothering me and I once again reiterated that I didn't want to talk about it. She told me that I should talk about it and once again brought up how she felt when she was in my position. Thats when I told her that just because she has been through this situation doesn't mean she is an authority on the matter and that her way of addressing the problem isn't my way and I felt like she was disrespecting what I wanted in this situation. 

She told me I was a fucking asshole and then she locked herself in the bedroom. She put on clothes and she left and she isn't answering her phone now. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling someone she needs to let someone babysit her youngest son sometimes?,"My sister Laine (30f) has two sons. Jake (6) and Luke (1). She's a single mom and the boys have two different dads and both are uninvolved. Until Luke was born a year ago Laine and Jake had their ""things"" together that mom-son time for them to just bond. Jake loved it and when it stopped after Luke was born it really hurt his feelings. Laine told him that mom-son time had to stop now that he had a brother who needed her time. But where the problem comes in is Laine has no problem sending Jake to me or to our parents or our grandparents while she spends mom-son time with Luke. A few times we have offered to babysit Luke so she can have time with Jake as well and she has always said no.

In recent weeks Laine has been complaining that Jake doesn't seem to like Luke and has shown zero interest in playing with him or interacting with him. She told me Jake refused to sit with Luke when she asked him to so she could get some photos of them and another day he waited to eat his lunch until she had Luke down for a nap even though she knew he was hungry. She told me Jake won't even touch Luke or look at him.

I asked her if she felt like it might be jealousy because Luke gets time with her alone when Jake doesn't. She said no. I told her Jake had asked for mom-son time with her and she said no. She told me because he's a big boy and Luke is a baby. I told her Jake was still her baby too and deserved her time just as much as Luke. She asked what she would do with Luke and I told her we'd offered to babysit so she could have time with Jake. Just like we do with Jake and did even when he was a baby. She told me it wasn't happening.

A few days ago she started complaining again about Jake not paying any attention to Luke and acting so resentful of him. I told her I explained how she could help with that and she ignored me. She told me I gave her no valid advice. I said I had. And she ignored it. I told her she needs to let us babysit Luke sometimes or Jake is going to continue feeling replaced and resentful and she'll push him away and never successfully get him to bond with Luke.

She told me I had no right to tell her what to do and fuck me because I'm still a kid (21) and don't need to interfere in her parenting.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
[NY] I need advice please ,"so I had a traffic ticket and the lawyer I hired didn’t do anything in 3 months didn’t even get in contact with the court so i told him it’s not going to work out and asked for a refund, I then found a new lawyer and he said he going to take care of it, the only issue is the old lawyer won’t send me my money back and is asking who’s going to represent me to do a consent to change attorney but the part I’m confused in is that the old lawyer didn’t even get in contact with the court at all so why do I need to tell him the new lawyer info and why won’t he give me my money back. 

Sorry I’m new to this never had a lawyer before ",AskLawyers
[WA] Breaking my lease because of lay off," I recently was laid off from my job and can no longer afford my apartment. I was planning on moving back home while I get back on my feet but when I discussed breaking the lease, I was told that I’d have to pay a 3 month penalty plus any concessions I received. This place is pretty expensive and as a promotional they offered 2 months free. So grand total, breaking the lease would cost about $12k. I kind of expected them to work with me since I am pretty sure I could just stay here for months before I could be evicted.  Should I point that out to them? I’m also leaving the state so I believe they would have to serve me in another state to get a judgement? Thanks for any advice! ",AskLawyers
 for telling a close friend that I no longer want to listen to his problems ?,"A close friend of mine i have known for about 6 years has always had problems with women, and i would say in some ways he is what one would call a ""nice guy"".   
  
He keeps trying to get with women and when they do not reciprocate he feels really sad , upset and breaks down.   
  
He has this idea that since he is such a nice person, it should work out and the women should be interested in him. 

He is quite emotionally fragile but also has this feeling inside him that being nice should get him women. 

After each episode he comes to me seeking a shoulder to cry on , and keeps telling me how he was xyz and they still just treated him with disdain/ did not show any interest etc 

Now for the last 3 years or so i have stayed up many times to help him feel better , i have given him advice and also told him many times that nobody owes anyone anything and that being nice is good but doesnt mean someone will be interested. I told him to just work on his confidence and stop seeking validation from women all the time. 

Over the 3 years it has just not changed, no matter what i tell him he does the same thing again and again. Then comes to me for support , dumps all his problems and asks me to help. 

I recently got super tired of the whole thing and how negative it has become and told him that while i do care for him , if he wants to maintain this friendship then i no longer want to listen to his problems and that it is getting very difficult for me to take this much upon myself especially when he just doesn't change

He said that a good friend provides emotional support and is always there to listen no matter what. 

So AITA for telling him to stop sharing ?",AmItheAsshole
 if I brought my own snacks?,"My in-laws meet at least once every two weeks. We start by having dinner and then enjoy some games together while having coffee, tea and some snacks. However the last couple of times, they have served the same snack.
The first time my mother-in-law suggested it, I politely told them that I don't like it but she didn't have anything else so she served it and I had do without.
Now, she has served the same thing the last three times without any alternative and I'm considering bringing something myself so I also have something to snack on while playing. My partner seems to not understand why I feel annoyed but he also the type of person who barely have anything he doesn't eat.

So, WIBTA if I brought my own snacks?


EDIT: We all pay towards the food, but they always host as my mother-in-law enjoys cooking and my father-in-law is disabled.",AmItheAsshole
" for being annoyed my roommate want's to keep a ""stray"" cat","So here's the situation.

I (22M) live in an apartment with a 23F, a 22M and two cats. We've lived together for going on 4 years now. A couple of weeks ago, my roommate (23F) met this stray cat. Super friendly, talkitive, and seemingly well-groomed. She wanted to bring it home, but ultimately decided against it. Fast-foward to this morning, and she has allowed the cat to follow her up three flights of stairs into our apartment and has sequestered it to the patio. Here are the issues I have.

1: It has a collar. When we first saw it, it did not have a collar. It hasn't lost any weight, it's super people-friendly, and it is cool enough with the apartments to follow a human up three flights of stairs. These factors lead me to believe this is someone's outdoor cat (hence the ""stray"" remark). I feel morally wrong with keeping it and not at least attempting to find the owner. My roommate has said she believes the same, but has made more than enough arguments as to why ""we should just keep the cat."" ""I wouldn't just let the cat out... what if they aren't taking care of him... he could die outside..."" etc. etc. It's obvious she wants the cat, which is fine. But I'll admit that her bringing this cat all the way into the apartment and just expecting everything to slide is annoying me.

2: It seems like a male cat (haven't inspected yet). It being a male cat is an issue for me. The two cats that I've had for 3+ years are mine, and they are female. This cat is pretty big, and if things were to go south it's got the 2v1 easy. Not that it is a guarantee that anything bad would happen, but we know nothing about this cat. The amount of effort and work that we would HAVE to do to ensure my cats are safe around this cat is a lot, and now it's being lumped on us. I kind of hate that we are now being forced to do so. Because the other possibility is not keeping the cat, which would make me feel like a huge asshole to my roommate.

I realize I could just tell her these things, but I don't appreciate needless confrontation. Also, now matter how I word it, I fear I'll just come off as saying ""No, you don't get to have this cat because I already have cats,"" which is not the case. I've made it very clear that both of my roommates are allowed to get animals. My 22M roommate tried to have a dog at one point, that ended for completely separate reasons. I would love for my 23F roommate to have a cat for emotional support. Would I be happier if the cat was acquired from a vet? 100%. But I do not want to let that bias effect how I am viewing this. I just don't feel like this is the appropriate way to introduce a third cat into our lives.

TL/DR: It seems like the ""stray"" my roommate grabbed is someone else's because it has a collar, among other things. I'm not 100% ok with it being around my cats, and I don't like that she wants to keep someone else's cat. I would feel like an asshole voicing these concerns.

  
Update: It was not chipped. ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my husband to stop sharing about his country's folklore with our daughter?," I''m (38F) German, married to a Brazilian (39m), and have an American daughter (11F). My husband has fair skin and hair, so our daughter doesn't look mixed. Growing up in the USA, she has absorbed a lot of American culture, but regarding her parents' cultural heritage, she tends to identify more with the German side (food, music, language, etc.), which my husband doesn't mind. Recently, one morning our daughter couldn't find her hair tie, and my husband made a joke about a Brazilian folkloric figure who supposedly hides people's belongings. Intrigued, our daughter, who has always been interested in legends like wendigo and skinwalker, asked him to teach her more about it. Although he admitted he didn't know much, he offered to research further. Since then, it's become routine for them to discuss it, researching together and sharing stories (she evem print some imagens and articles about it and hung on her ""creepy board""). I wasn't concerned until I found out she was sharing her discoveries with her schoolmates. I don't want her to be considered the weirdo kid at school and asked if her friends were bullying her. She said some classmates made jokes, but she explained that are just legends, like every country has, and it was interesting to learn more about it. Still, I decided to ask my husband to stop encourage her to research Brazilian folklore anymore. To my surprise, he didn't like the idea, saying our daughter was finally showing interest in something Brazilian and he wouldn't stop her. After that, he acted strangely all day. Before we go to bed he said he needed to get something off his mind and asked if I was ashamed of who he was and where he came from. Of course I'm not ashamed of my husband's origins, but at the same time I don't want our daughter to be considered the weirdo at school. AITA for asking my husband to stop sharing about his country's folklore with our daughter?",AmItheAsshole
 for not Giving my Friends a ride if they Didn't Fasten their Seatbelts?,"Last night, I (18m) was getting off work at 11:30 PM.  My 2 other friends (both 18m) were also leaving as well and asked me if they could get a ride. I said sure. They all live within 1 1/2 miles from our workplace (a 3 - 5 minute drive / a 15 - 20 minute walk), and they both live in separate houses at different ends of town. It's a pretty chilly night at about 40 degrees and only a few cars are out and about. We all packed into my light blue 2004 Buick LeSabre. I waited to hear all of their seatbelts click which never came. I asked if they could fasten their seatbelts and they looked at each other with confused glances. After a solid minute, one of them broke the silence and asked ""Wait, you're serious?"" and which I said ""Yeah?"". 

They asked why and I said the obvious reasons: safety and I don't want no tickets if we happen to get pulled over. One chimed in correcting me saying ""the driver doesn't get a ticket, the passenger does"". I sat there for a second and said ""If you don't fasten your seatbelts, I'm not taking you guys anywhere."". They both let out a bunch of scoffs and exited the car. I said ""Suit yourself"" and drove off. Leaving them in chilly weather, on a dark night. With a 20 minute walk home.

AITA for not Giving my Friends a ride if they Didn't Fasten their Seatbelts?",AmItheAsshole
 to not celebrate holidays with extended family,"I just need some outside perspective to see if this would be normal or not. 

Every year, my husband (33m) and I (32f) jump back-and-forth between my family and his for holidays. For example, if we went to his family’s on Thanksgiving, we would go to my family’s on Christmas. Over the past couple of years it has been getting more and more stressful. My husband and I thought maybe moving forward on the day of holidays we would celebrate with our immediate family, we have 2 kids ages 10 and 8, and then celebrate with extended family either before or after the holiday. My mom is a force of nature in a way. Last Christmas I told her that we were going to his families house and her response to me was that she better be able to see her grandkids on Christmas because it’s Christmas and she misses her grandkids. Her and I don’t have the best relationship. Also when she says stuff like that, it makes me not want to. Is it normal for you to just celebrate the holidays with your immediate family, and then celebrate with extended family on another day? I know she’s going to flip out if I tell her this, but if this is already a normal thing to do I’ll feel less guilty ",AmItheAsshole
 - for asking about wedding pics,"My husband and I got married last July. 
He asked a friend to be our photographer - which I agreed to because it would be kinda personal and also save some money. 
We took some pre pics which I thought looked liked hobby shots at best but might look nice enhanced with photoshop.
I later on told my husband I wanted some shots explicitly with the parents and in-laws and with best man/maid of honor. And some nice shots of us… but otherwise the photographer could roam and just take pics as he fits would „capture the moment“. 
I did not know that my husband asked to look through ALL pictures without any restrictions, no editing done, no sorting whatsoever. 
As the photographer does this as hobby we got the last pictures (raw! Nothing done, just of the memory card) end of November! 
We did not write thank you cards, we do not have any enhanced (it was raining that day) pics. We have a few very rash taken shots with the parents/inlaws, all in one shot. No single shots with each parents. 
No chance of redoing these shots as my father died in December. 
Anyways everytime I bring the topic up, my husband acts offended. He said he knows he messed up - but still no pics! Or any wird of we might ever get some. 
I know there’s options online, but I don’t have access to the originals as they were send to my husband to choose from. 
I’m very bitter and disappointed, yet my husbands reactions let me second guess myself. Is it too much to ask to have pictures to show to family and friends after 3/4 year? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my girlfriend I don’t want to celebrate my birthday? ,"My girlfriend likes to plan big things for my birthday but I hate it. I hate when people celebrate me, mainly because I don’t know how to react to it and I don’t want to hurt their feelings or come off as a dick. I have hurt peoples feelings in the past by not showing a reaction to birthday or Christmas gifts. I don’t want to hurt my girlfriend’s feelings but I genuinely hate celebrating my birthday and would rather have a nice meal at home and watch tv or play games so I told her that after she said she planned a birthday surprise for me and she said I was a dick because I can’t appreciate it when she does nice things for me after I have explicitly told her in the past I hate receiving gifts or celebrating me. So am I the asshole? 

Edit: spelling mistake",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go see my grandmother after she had a heart attack.,"My grandmother had a heart attack this morning and was flown to the city I live in to have surgery. I (M23) have hardly had a relationship with her my whole life. Her and my mother have had a rocky relationship to put it lightly, even at the best of times. I think that my sisters and I received some second hand baggage because of that. Although I was pretty close with her as a kid because we lived really close, we moved away in 2008 and didn’t see her nearly as much. And since my grandfather passed away in 2010, her and my family have only made the effort to see or talk to each other on important days like birthdays and graduations. 

I feel like I am obligated to go see her because I am one of her only 4 grandchildren, however I really don’t want to because it doesn’t feel like we are close enough. Feeling guilty about it and wanted to hear from someone outside of this situation.",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my broke parents out of the house?,"I’m 20 years old and live in a 2 room apartment, one of those rooms is my room, and the other one is the kitchen/main room. Since my parents lost their jobs last year, I offered for them to stay in my apartment until they found another job. My parents sleep on the floor of the kitchen/main room. When my parents and I finish up with dinner, we socialize for a couple hours and then head off to bed. My parents usually go to sleep at around 10:30 to 10:45 while I usually stay up until 12:15. My dad keeps complaining about how my tv is too loud, even though it’s at 15 volume. I thought this was rather odd, but I complied with him and turned it down to about 5 volume. He still kept complaining and I kept telling him back that it wasn’t that loud, hell I went over to where they slept, laid down, and couldn’t even hear a thing, just the slightest of mumbling. His bright idea was to unplug my router and not give it back, even in the morning, or after work. I told him “it’s my house, and I bought that router and the wifi here, you have no right of taking it from me!” He responded back with “I am your father, I control this house!” which is obviously not true because I own the damn place. My mom didn’t help me out, hell she made it worse, she was defending my father and pushing me whenever I tried to take it from him. This had been going on for about 3 days already, and I decided to kick them both out. I told them to pack their stuff and go, but both of them said that they had full authority over me, that I can’t kick them out because I’m still their child. I called the cops on them and got them trespassed from my apartment complex. Over the past couple days they’ve been texting me of how selfish I am and how over sensitive I am about everything. Is this true? AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting anything to do with my moms boyfriend ,"AITA? I (17) female and my mom (35) female have always had a rocky relationship since I came out as lesbian. I came out on accident at 12 and since then my mom has been a little more accepting. She recently broke up with her last boyfriend and automatically started dating another guy.

 The first time we hung out together he was raving on about how it’s only natural for a man and a woman to date as well as white with white, and black with black. My mom agrees with him and they just start talking shit about lgbtq+ people. I have put up with this behavior with my family for so long and felt the need to stand up for myself. I told him I was lesbian and felt uncomfortable and with them taking like that and if they could stop. They called me “soft” and laughed about how much of a liberal I am.

I sat back down to do my biology and study for my finals knowing there was no point and accepted the fact I won’t be able to change there views on me and other like me. Later my mom asked if I liked him and said “I was sulking the entire time and ruined the mood”.

I got angry and said I didn’t want to hang out with him and didn’t want anything to do with him. I told her I was happy for her and glad she had someone to make her happy, and she got livid. She started yelling about how I was ungrateful for everything she’s done for me and about how what I was doing is unnatural, I can’t expect everyone to accept it and shove it down there throats. 

I left it at that and still refuse to have a conversation with him. I don’t say anything derogatory about him, and I hang out and talk to his kids when I have to see them. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not using my retired military status to get freebies for friends?,"
Hi. I'm 53m, retired Air Force. Served 27 years and am thankful for the opportunities I was given, but very subdued about my service.

Recently, my GF wanted me to get her friends free minor league baseball tickets for military appreciation night. I told her, I'd be glad to go. I'll buy our tickets and her friends can buy theirs.

As I said, I was blessed to have a wonderful career and nice retirement (save for the 37% my ex-wife gets of it). I believe I benefited greatly from my time in and just feel wrong continuing to benefit. I'm not a ""do you have a military discount"" person. I don't stand at events asking military members and vets to stand for recognition. But if I'm asked if I served for reasons of discount, I will say, ""I'm retired. My days of discount are done. I greatly appreciate the offer.""

So, when asked to use my retired military status to benefit myself and others, it just sits wrong with me. My GF is very irritated with me, but this is a weird integrity and humility issue for me.

AITA for not getting the free tickets?",AmItheAsshole
 If I Asked My Friend To Stop Talking About Her Summer Vacation Plans?,"I (14F) and my friend (14F) and my family are going on a cruise this July. By the way, we are taking her, not the other way around.

Because of this, my friend has been going and talking about it so frequently it could be considered bragging. For example, in any random conversation, she'll purposefully switch the conversation to summer, and then mention that she will be going on a cruise with me. I get that it's exciting and stuff but I don't want to be seen as *that* girl who brags about shit. 

I've been considering asking to stop, or at least tone it down, but I don't really wanna kill the excitement, so im asking here to see if i would be wrong if i went through with this. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not calling the lady that hit my car back?,"For context, I am a new driver. I just got my junior operator’s license last week and I started driving to school, driving with my sister to get ice cream, shopping, etc. April break came a few days later and my parents took themselves, my siblings, and a few of their friends on vacation. I opted out as I had gone on college tours over winter break and I really wanted to spend a week at home studying for upcoming AP exams. 

One day, I was coming home from a store and heading to get some lunch when I approached a crosswalk. There was a man walking by who looked like he wasn’t going to enter the crosswalk. Then, at the last moment, he ran into the road and I had to slam on my brakes. I would’ve killed him if I hadn’t. When I thought all was well and I was safe to go, I felt a car come crashing into the rear end of my car and I jerked forward.

I am a very cautious driver. I don’t speed, I buckle up, I do everything that’s required of me to be safe while driving. I was only going 32 mph in a 30 mph zone. Clearly, the driver behind me had to have been riding my ass for her to hit me. And she was.

We pulled into a parking lot and the lady asked me if I was okay. This lady had to have been in her 60’s. She was driving a white Mercedes-Benz. Immediately, she accused me of going way too fast and criticized my driving. I was astonished and almost was brought to tears. I had no idea what to do in this situation as I am a brand new driver and never would’ve expected anything like this to happen during my second week of driving with my license.

I only had a few scratches on my bumper (thank the Lord!) and the hood of her car was curved in a bit to the point where she couldn’t pop it open. She insisted that she take pictures of the damage and a picture of my license, to which I told her that I didn’t have an official license card yet, just a permit paper with the indication that I passed the driving exam at the bottom of the permit. She had a field day with this.

After the screaming, she told me that she would let this “slide under the radar”. I didn’t know it then because I believed that somehow I was in the wrong, but she was trying to make an insurance claim for this whole situation-something she wouldn’t have been able to do successfully since SHE hit ME. So we parted ways after we exchanged numbers and she said she would call me to update me.

I told my parents and they said I absolutely shouldn’t contact her. They told me that she must’ve wanted to make an insurance claim for this accident so that she wouldn’t have to pay for the damage out-of-pocket. They also told me if I contact her, I could accidentally give permission for her to do things that would get me in trouble (not entirely sure what though.) She left me a voicemail saying she wanted to touch base with me and I haven’t responded at all.

So reddit, am I the asshole for not responding to her?",AmItheAsshole
 if I didn't tell someone their friend is a predator so I can protect my family? ,"Last July my daughter (Anna) turned 16.  Her dad and I, along with her 18 year old sister (Beth) went to dinner to celebrate.   Following dinner,  they wanted to go shopping.   Beth drove them to the store and my husband and I went home. 

While they were there,  we get a FaceTime call from them stating that a man is watching them and following them around the store.   Before they could get to security,  the man exposed himself and was touching himself.   They got safely to security and the police were called.  Despite being able to see him on camera,  the outdoor footage did not clearly show his license plate when he fled. 

A couple months later I get a call from the police.   He has done it again and this time,  they got his license plate,  they connected the two cases and he was arrested. 

We went to district court in early this year.  He was there with his wife who was wearing a t-shirt that said ""sorry,  not sorry"".  They have 5 young children together.   He was sentenced to 6 months.  He appealed and was released 3 weeks later.   He chose a jury trial in circuit court and that case is pending. 

My problem is that when I learned his name,  I researched him online.   He has previous charges for the same thing in 2018 and 2020.  I also looked him up on social media and found that we have a mutual friend,  Cara.   I became social media friends with Cara through a good friend, Delaney. Cara is really more of an acquaintance.  However,  we live close by to each other and her daughter plays on the same high school sports team as my daughter,  so I see her frequently. 

I feel torn regarding telling Cara.  I don't know her that well and I cannot tell online how good of friends she is with the predator and his wife (she's friends with both of them).  I'm worried if I tell Cara,  she may tell them who I am/where I live etc.   His behavior seems to be escalating and I'm concerned he could retaliate. I'm also worried that her children could be in danger if she's allowing them around this man.   Cara has 3 children,  her oldest being 16.

WIBTA if I didn't tell her?   ( I would of course wait until after the trial).",AmItheAsshole
 for saying my mum's SIL is my favourite aunt?,"My mum's got two brothers and my dad's got a brother and a sister, and all of them except my dad's brother are married. I've always viewed the spouses also as my aunts/uncle, as they've all literally been in the family for longer than I have, and when I was young I didn't even understand the difference between ""blood uncle/aunt"" and ""uncle/aunt in law"", for lack of a better term. 

The ""aunt in law"" in question is the wife of my mum's younger brother, let's call her Amy. When I was born she wasn't yet married to my uncle (they married when I was a toddler), but they'd been together for a few years already and she's actually my godmother. I absolutely adore her, she's the best godmother/aunt I could have asked for, and I can say without a doubt that she's absolutely my favourite. I actually thought that it was so obvious. 

Well, my mum's older brother and his wife recently got a divorce. Still, I mentioned her the other day while talking to my parents and called her aunt, so my mum said: ""Not anymore."" I shrugged, cause while I guess in my mind I'll still consider her my aunt, since that's what she'd been for the last 23 years, I was never particularly close to her, so I'm not that phased about it. However I mentioned how if it were Amy and my uncle getting divorced, Amy would 100% continue being my aunt and that while I love my uncle, I would definitely take her side. 

My mum then tried to argue that blood is more important, but I disagreed. I said that I consider my ""aunts/uncle in law"" equals to my ""blood uncles/aunt"", and that in fact Amy was and always had been my favourite aunt. My dad then got offended on behalf of his sister (who I also love, she's great! She's just not Amy). Both were calling me disrespectful, so I just left because I wasn't in the mood to argue with them. My mum then texted me that I should apologize and always support family, but I left her on read, and haven't talked to either of them since then. So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my best friend not to move in with her boyfriend?,"My(27F) best friend(26F; we'll call her Sadie) has been with her boyfriend(28M; we'll call him Ben) for nearly 2 years. 

*for some context this is her first romantic relationship*

Ben is a wonderful guy. He treats Sadie very well and they are extremely compatible. Since they've been together both of them have expressed wanting to break up with each other at some point. The first time was a couple months into them dating - Ben felt Sadie was a little immature with finances and had to fix some underlying issues with her family. He said he wanted to see other people for awhile. After a couple days apart he essentially begged her to get back together with him. They were mostly fine after that.

Fast forward to about a year later, Sadie and I are getting coffee and she tells me she wants to break up with Ben. She said they don't have a foundation in faith like she wants and he is not willing to pursue faith any further and that's that. Ben has also has never met her parents (still to this day) so she felt/feels uncomfortable about that. Sadie said she felt like she was wasting her time and that he couldn't get her what she was looking for.

They ended up breaking up...for about 5 hours. Sadie broke it off and was devastated. She called me saying she was willing to forgo all the family issues and his lack of a relationship with God if it meant getting to be with him. 

Now they are back together. They were going to move in together in the fall but Ben was saying he may move in now in July. Sadie told me she didn't feel comfortable with that plan because she's worried he won't want to get married later on. They ended up talking and he explained why they need to move in together, and how she's basically going along with it.

Like I said, Ben is a great guy and treats her very well. But with the history they have had I'm very worried that something is going to go wrong. I texted her and said ""from an outsiders perspective, it seems like you are being very complacent and doing whatever Ben wants and your wants/concerns are being swept under the rug.""

Sadie has sacrificed her family, her beliefs, and her principles for this man and, as nice as he is, he hasn't done the same for her. I'm also worried that, because this is Sadie's first real relationship, that she doesn't think she could find another partner and will just settle. It's been a couple weeks since I texted her and she hasn't responded. This isn't unusual for her, but I can't help feeling like maybe I crossed a line. I don't want either of them to get hurt but AITA?

TLDR: my friend and her boyfriend have been together for 2 years - off and on you could say - and now they want to move in together. She's hesitant and I told her that she's doing everything he wants with little regard to her feelings and to not go through with it, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for playing my music ,"So for some background I(20f) live in a basement suite with my mom and stepdad, our upstairs neighbours (42 Dave and 38 Sheryl) have been hell. loudly playing music and partying till 4 or 6am every Friday night and every night before a stat holiday, even after we explain that either my mom and I work on the stat holiday or that my mom who is an insomniac and extremely light sleeper works early every Saturday morning. We’ve told Sheryl and Dave multiple times that we work those days and have asked multiple times that they keep it down past 12am so we can get our rest. 

They say they will keep it down when we talk face to face and everything is civil till night comes and they go back on their word. Last Saturday my parents had a conversation with them on keeping it down because my mom has work on Saturdays then that night after the conversation they pulled an all nighter which ended at 2pm on Saturday. Claiming they weren’t loud when I could clearly hear both of them on the opposite side of the house, lying saying they’re children weren’t there when I could hear the baby crying all night.

Onto where I might be the AH I played my music today on the speaker system we have not too loud that it would shake the house and be a disturbance but loud enough to hear when I was washing the dishes it was at 30 when I usually have it at 60. I’ve been doing this for months now playing it louder then this and for a longer period of time and not once have they messaged me or come down stairs to ask me to tone it down which I would’ve happily obliged to do. 

Well like I said I was playing my music quieter then usual and the woman upstairs started jumping around because my music “was too loud” then she went on to tiktok to make a 4th video about my family and our ongoing “fued” because I woke up the baby from his nap. So like legally I’m in the right when it comes to playing music because it is in the hours where it’s not a disturbance and it’s under 50-60dB but morally I feel like I’m the wrong due to waking up the baby from his nap and having the kid be dragged in to the problem which wasn’t my intention so AITA



",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to play video games I hate,"My friend group (this includes my wife), all love to play video games. For years, we played a ton of competitive games, Halo, Overwatch, Apex, Fortnite, etc. And it usually was a fun time. A few years ago, games started inserting a system called Skill based matchmaking, or SBMM for short. This made sure you play against people similar to your groups skill.

I love my friends. But out of all of us, I feel like I was a little bit better than them. When I played solo, I climbed very high in ranked modes. But when I was them, it was typically 50/50. I had to try very, very Hard in games we played, to try and carry our friend group. If I wasn’t able to carry them, they would weirdly start fussing at me, telling me to “actually try”, or blaming me for losses, even though I was the only one on the team playing objectives, and going positive. About the time Elden Ring came out in 2022, this had reached a boiling point, and I got fed up with being blamed. I was genuinely losing hair, and sleep because of how mean, my friends were being over a video game. 

So I  decided to get lost in Elden Ring. Once I had fully 100% that, the new GOW had come out. I kept playing more and more Single player games, and realized I didn’t enjoy multiplayer games anymore. Eventually I stopped hopping on their games with them. I played sparingly throughout 2023, maybe a few games every other night, until about late last year, when I dropped online gaming completely. We had one final argument, where I was blamed for being outplayed by an enemy team in Quickplay Overwatch, made up completely of Masters players. On my team, I am the only master player, with next highest being Platinum, several ranks below me. Being blamed likes this, in mode that didn’t even mater made me realized I only want to play games where I don’t have to carry my friends, and sweat so hard the game isn’t even fun anymore. 

So, now, I’m trying to get to get everyone into some fun PvE games. I offered to buy every Helldivers, they didn’t want to play. I asked if they wanted to download Fallout 76, since it’s free with gamepass. They declined. Eventually I asked why they didn’t want to play, and they called me an asshole for abandoning them. Since I’ve left, they’ve been in stuck in low ranks, and they think I was being a baby, over them “joking around with me”. Even my wife, who plays with us, took their side. When I doubled down, and said I didn’t like how they talked to me, and just wanted to go back to being able to chill with my friends, they made the decision to kick me from game chats when they’re playing online instead of letting me talk to them. They continue to only play the same rotation of online comp games, and refuse to even talk to me about games I’ve been playing. But when we hang out in person, or I try to talk to my wife about it, they just deflect and act like I’m crazy. 

So, am I the asshole refusing to play stressful games, that they want me to carry them in?",AmItheAsshole
 For not wanting to go to the college my family wants me to go to?,"So I (F18) am now starting to apply for college as a Jr. I started school late so that’s why I’m older than usual but onto the issue; I’ve had my eye on some colleges for a good minute now and have an idea of what I want to apply to. 

I wanted my parents to be involved so that way they knew what to expect with me applying and all. I had a college advisor meeting where we discussed what I would need to do what to expect and the usual college things.

It’s important to note that during the zoom meeting, I expressed what I wanted and certain things I wanted to do in college. Afterwards everything started going downhill.

 My mom yelled at me about how stupid I was for wanting to go to college for certain things. I want to major in computer science, minor music and be a college athlete(Female Wrestling). I know what it would realistically look like, and I know that I can balance it. 

My dad seems rather indifferent about it all but seems to side with my mom. My mom really wants me to go to a college that one of my family members has been raving about and how good it is. 

I’ve looked at it and it’s a really good school, good campus, amazing professors, and amazing connections. 

My mom is obsessed with having me go to this college. In her mind she can see me going to NO OTHER place. While for me the main thing about colleges is weather they have the athletics that I need. 

Now before all of this happened, I had scheduled a college tour of one that I really wanted to attend. But now my mom is refusing for me to go to any other college but the one the family wants. She’s says it’s a waste of time since I’m already going to the college. 

As stupid as it may sound, I don’t want to go. I’m not the smartest person but I still want a choice. Now all my mom keeps telling me is how people would die to be in my position, and how I have to go to this college.

She already has talked to the family and everyone thinks I should go to this college.

She thinks that what I want is stupid and while I want to make her proud I’m finding it harder and harder to do what she wants of me. She’s always told me to never give up my dreams for anyone but now she’s asking me to do that for the family, to give it up for her.

She knows I hate it but she still puts a smile on her face and talks as if I’m already going to the college. So am I the asshole for not wanting to?
",AmItheAsshole
 for not making my boyfriend lunches for work?,"I (24f) make my bf (24m) sandwiches for work, i started this as a token of my appreciation and also to cut down his spending as he often spends £10-20 a day on lunch. I enjoyed doing this as he really liked them and appreciated it a lot and i liked knowing he always ate.

 I stopped doing this as often and then he complained that i don’t appreciate him anymore and how it seems like i don’t care as much, this kind of put me off of doing it as i was doing it as a token of love and appreciation and now it feels like an expectation. If i don’t do it he’s not happy sort of thing which puts me off more. 

Now i feel trapped into always having to make him sandwiches for work (3 btw) and part of me wishes i never did as i didn’t realise i was entering an unwritten contract. 

For context i also make my lunches for work and often sort dinner even though he gets home hours earlier than i do (he does go to the gym though), however he starts a lot earlier. Am i the asshole? 

EDIT: I really appreciate all the comments, i wasn’t even expecting one tbh. For a little further context i recently injured my neck in a work related injury so im also home all the time and have been for the last couple of weeks because of not being fit to work. 

Update: So he said last night about how he doesn’t feel appreciated as dinner wasn’t ready for when he got home from the gym and mentioned how i don’t really make him lunches anymore. Which is what spurred this post. 

I said i could put dinner on now, it was just going to be some quick air fried stuff so would’ve taken 20 minutes and he made a point of saying that he wasn’t hungry now and how he doesn’t want to eat so late, i told him he was hungry 3 minutes ago and it doesn’t take long to cook but he was insistent on even if i did cook it he wouldn’t eat it and it would be wasted.

 I told him i didn’t want to eat without him and he told me to starve then. I caved and made the sandwiches for the morning as i felt guilty and apologised for not doing better. He barely spoke to me and went straight to sleep. 

This morning he has been off with me so i asked if there was anything he wanted to talk about and he said no, i asked if it was to do with the lack of appreciation thing and essentially it is. He then said that he’s tired of having to tell me the same thing over and over again as it’s pointless as nothing will change. 

I do want to add that he has started getting me my nails done every 3 weeks (£30) so he does treat me. 

I want to explain to him about the expectations thing but i think it will just cause further arguments so i’m not sure what to do. I feel like i shouldn’t be expected to do things for him but at the same time still feel like an AH. ",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing trips with my father and brother,"My father left for another family when me and my twin brother were 14 years old, our little sister was 3 at that time. A nasty divorce and a bunch of bad meetings between us and him kind of erased any form of contact in the 10 years that followed. Years later, in 2018, we established contact again and slowly things got better to the point that we see each other a few times a year. My brother and I both have families, he has a 5 year old, my wife and I have no kids. 

Now, for the last 3 years, my father has insisted to go on weekend trips with my brother and I once or twice a year. At first it was a nice idea, he said he wanted to use the trips to reconnect with us. After one or two times however, I started asking him to include my wife and my brother’s family. It felt odd that he was only interested in contact with us. My brother did not raise any concerns.

I have now refused again and again to go on the trips, because I really want him to actually make an effort including my family. He doesn’t seem to care. It feels very much as if he is just living in the past. 

Even though I have asked him to use the money he spends on the plane tickets and fancy hotels (he has money) to just rent a cabin or house and invite both our families for the weekend, he has continued to just book fancy trips for me and my brother. 
If I don’t go, he just takes my brother (who raises no protest).  When I didn’t go the last two times he tells me what a shame it is I didn’t want to be there afterwards and tries the whole process of taking me and my brother on a trip again a few months later.

My question is Am I The Asshole for refusing him and asking him to connect with his sons families instead of trying to make up for lost time and ignoring the people we have become so far? It really sucks that I am always the only one resisting and don’t seem grateful. 

Tl;dr - dad takes twin brother and me on trips after leaving our family and not seeing us for ten years. Ignoring our families and current lives. I refuse to go, wanting him to include mine and my brother’s family. Brother does not refuse, so he ends up taking my brother alone and just tries again a few months later. Over and over again.",AmItheAsshole
" for ""abandoning"" my step daughter?","Hello all. I (43 F) have been married to my husband, George, (45M) for about a year now, and it's been wonderful! Except for one thing. His daughter, Rachel, (15F) can't stand me.

Ever since we got married, George has been pushing ""family trips"" and ""quality time"" between me and Rachel. I have no problem with it on paper, but Rachel does. George and Rachel have gotten into many an argument over the fact that Rachel doesn't like me or want a relationship with me. Rachel says I'm not her mom, will never be, and that she won't pretend I am.

I've been conflicted on what to do. On one hand, George is Rachel's parent, not me, so I don't really get a say in what rules he puts on her. On the other hand, I hate seeing Rachel so miserable every time we go out on a girls trip or are sent for bonding time by George.

So I made a decision. I sat George down and explained I wasn't comfortable with these family trips anymore. I explained that Rachel would always have a place in our home (this is where her dad lives, after all, she belongs here as much as i do), and that of course I'd be there if she *asked* to spend time together, needed something, or if there was an emergency and I had to take care of her. But I wouldn't be going on these outings anymore because I was uncomfortable with how upset they were making Rachel.

George was pissed. He accused me of undermining his parenting decisions and abandoning Rachel by refusing to fight for our family. I replied that I *wasn't* part of Rachel's family! She doesn't like me! She's made it clear I'll never be her mother! So I didn't see the point in forcing her to have ""mommy-daughter spa days"" and whatever else with me against her will!

George told me I needed to reevaluate my priorities if I wanted to stay together and accused me of wanting to cut his daughter out of our family before storming out. I'm gutted. Of course I don't want to cut Rachel out of our lives or family! She's George's daughter, I know she'll always come first to him, and I'd never want to sabotage their relationship or hurt her! But that's why I don't want to keep forcing a bond between us! Because *that's* hurting her and putting a wedge between them!

I don't know. Did I overstep? Am I really hurting Rachel or our family by putting my foot down here? I love George, and I care about Rachel, so whatever the judgment is, I'll accept it. I just want to do what's best for everyone!

EDIT: Briefly editing to ask people to please please not be rude to Rachel. Most people here have been supportive of both her and me, which I appreciate, but a few people have called her a brat and similar such things. Rachel is generally well behaved and hasn't done anything drastic or overly disruptive, she's just a kid who's a bit standoffish and sarcastic sometimes because she's hurting over her parents divorce and not seeing George enough.

  
**EDIT/UPDATE:** 

Okay. A lot of you gave the advice that I should talk to Rachel so we can present a united front to George and show that neither of us wanted this. I sat Rachel down this morning and gently broached the subject with her. 

I explained that I knew she wasn't looking for a mom, that she already had one, and that was okay. I told her that I didn't need her to see me as a mother, or even like me. She was a smart and well behaved kid and she deserved to have a say in who she wants a relationship with. I told her that I was with her 100% in what she wanted, and that we could talk to George together, because I was going to follow her lead no matter what. 

Rachel got kinda quiet for a minute and then her face just...crumbled. She told me she didn't hate me at all, that I was nice to her and seemed interested in her life. The real problem was, in her words, that she wished her parents were too. 

I'll be honest, that broke my heart. I had to try very hard not to tear up in front of her, because this was the first time she'd opened up to me or given any indication she even liked me at all, and I didn't want to ruin that by putting my emotions first. I did my best to comfort her, and promised Rachel that I was here for her in any way she needed.

I'm going to have a talk with George. First by myself (rachel is scared to talk to him), and then potentially with Rachel so she can speak for herself, if George is receptive. I'm also going to push George to get therapy (individual and also couples, potentially with rachel too if she wants to). More than anything, I'll keep trying to be there for Rachel. I know I'm not her mom, and I'm not expecting her to suddenly start acting like we're best friends. But I know now that my efforts are appreciated by her, and that only makes me more determined to advocate for and support her however she's comfortable with.",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my sister to my wedding?,"I (26f) am getting married in a few weeks. I didn’t invite my sister (37f) to my wedding after sending her a save the date originally. To provide some context to the situation: my sister lost custody of her two sons years ago. Both boys have different dads and my older nephews dad allows her to see him occasionally on weekends. My younger nephews dad does not allow her to see him as she never did any of the Child Protective Services steps to reunification (never even attended the supervised visitations). There’s more to the story of what she did to younger nephew, but for CPS to get involved I’m sure you can imagine. So at this point it has been 8 years since she has seen him which is pretty much his entire life. Younger nephew is the ring bearer during our ceremony. Sister was told when save the dates went out that if younger nephew was able to attend, she would not be allowed. As wedding invites were sent out and she realized she wasn’t getting an invite, she blasted me on social media with lies of why she wasn’t invited and proceeded to blow up my phone with hateful messages. She now has older nephew believing I’m a terrible person and purposely did all of this to spite her. AITA for protecting my younger nephew and choosing him over her?

Editing to add that invites had JUST been sent out. Like only a few people had received one and younger nephew hadn’t received his yet for me to know for sure he’s coming. ",AmItheAsshole
 for only buying my brother and I food?,"so my younger brother and I work at the same minimum wage job and we got off pretty late and I decided to get him and I some food, we stopped by at jack in the box and I got myself a wrap and he got some tenders. I paid since it was my idea to go 
we get home and our mother starts asking what did we get her and my sister, I told her nothing since I thought they’d be asleep since they go in around 7am at their jobs. 
She started yelling at me and calling me selfish for not thinking about them or at least buying them some fries. I buy my family food every once in a while, pay the bill when we go out to eat, I even buy our basic hygiene necessities like shampoo, body lotion, tooth paste, etc… I even pay for groceries when I have enough money saved up so it really upset me that she called me selfish :( 
It made me lose my appetite so I just gave my food to my brother and went up to my room. It makes me really sad since I don’t have a nice job but I still go out of my way to do things and it just goes unnoticed or they forget about it :( 
Soooo aita?",AmItheAsshole
" for wishing my friend ""Happy Lesbian Visibility Week"" at a gathering?","Last week, my friend, J (21F), from high school came to a reunion after like 2 years because she lives overseas now. I live in an Asian country where people can be somewhat homophobic. She's a lesbian. She's never ""come out"", but if you've ever talked to her you can tell she's gay (talks about past relationships and attraction to women) and she's just never made a big deal out of it, the most she did to ""come out"" was add a pride flag to her instagram bio in June. So our friend circle is all in the know - also, some people have asked her if she's gay before and she has always responded affirmatively. She told me she was only attracted to women, when I asked. 

  
We met up at a restaurant for dinner, there were like 30 of us, and when we met, I wished J a ""Happy Lesbian Visibility Week"" as I've recently come to know that's a thing. Pretty much everyone at the event knew she was gay, except maybe 3 guys who we don't talk with much, so others also chimed in with wishing her. One guy, H, spoke up and said he didn't know Lesbian Visibility Week was a thing and asked J why she couldn't be happy with the entirety of June being ""for the gays"" and said ""congrats for being a homo"". It kind of soured the conversation and J looked clearly uncomfortable so I told H to shut it and that no one asked for his opinion. For the next 10 minutes, H kept talking over J and asking her questions like ""what's wrong with liking men"" and ""do your parents know about this?"". I told him to stop multiple times but he only did once I threatened to kick him out of the restaurant. The vibe was gone and we wrapped up the event early. 

  
After it was over, J approached me and thanked me but said she'd have appreciated it if I hadn't brought up her sexuality in the first place and that the reason she didn't ""come out"" was because of reactions like this and that she didn't want to have to deal with that. I was confused and told her that well she did come out I mean she wasn't hiding it so I didn't know it was supposed to be secret. She got irritated and told me to just keep it to myself next time and I said I didn't appreciate her disregarding my good intentions and maybe there wouldn't be a next time we meet at this rate. I don't think I did anything wrong, if anyone was in the wrong it was obviously H. 

  
AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for being close to my friend’s crush?,"So the story goes, we are in the same friend group, me (f) and her crush (m) are friends for a very long time, and she recently had a crush on him since last year. At first, she would sometimes ignore me because I interacted with her crush, (1. At that time I didn’t know 2. We were just talking with eachother) sometimes she would ignore me for half a day and interact with me normal in the afternoon, or ignore me the whole day. Which always made me confused. 

Soon later, she would confess to me that she had feelings for him, at that point on, I would try to distance myself from him, or try to interact with him as little as possible. There would be little times where I teased him and such, and if she caught on, she would ignore me like she always do. But sometimes, she would completely ignore me, leaving me to overthink my actions i’ve done during the day or the day before.

After that she would confess again that she thinks that her crush has a crush on me. (Keep in mind that I only see him as a friend, and already *friendzoned* him). She would always complain to me about how she can’t move on from him , and asked me to date him so she can move on. (Which I don’t, because I know she meant it as a joke.) Every time I had an interaction with her crush, I would always make sure to include her in it as well. 

When we went on the group trip, whenever her crush is with me and she wasn’t present, I didn’t focus on him, I mainly focus on other friends because I don’t want her to feel like i’m going to ‘steal’ him away from her, plus I just want to be a loyal friend. So I kept my distance from him even when she isn’t around. But after that day, she hasn’t contacted me since. But from what I’ve asked others, she still kept contact with them. 

P.S. I’m not looking to date anyone, plus he isn’t even my type.
",AmItheAsshole
 for loosing my cool on my sister!,"I 35 F, am travelling early morning tomorrow (leaving for the airport at 4 am). Given this I have a lot of end moment errands to run, complete work for my business, finish some end moment packing, wash and style my hip length hair for the trip all this while I try to get to bed by 10 PM so I can make the flight!

My sister 25 F, lets call her Jane. So Jane today morning tells me has to go somewhere, where she cannot enter without me, somehow its has to be done today. I tell her its not possible today as I have a very packed schedule. I tell her I can arrange the visit for her, she says no, she needs me to go with her. I tell her I will try to make time in my schedule and will inform her what time we can go. I do tell her that I wish she would have informed me a day in advance so I would have made time in my schedule for her. 

I end up rearranging some errands and tell her we can go around 4 PM. She says okay. Suddenly she calls me at 2 PM and says that her friend also wants to come with us and she would really like to accommodate him and now can we go by 6 PM? I tell her that is absolutely not possible as I would have no time to pack, wash &amp; Style my hair, Make/Eat Dinner and get some rest before leaving. She keeps requesting me to accommodate her friend. 

I loose my shit and give it to her, I yell at her to try to make her understand that I have already gone out of my way after refusing initially to still take her, I yell at her for inviting her friend without asking me first. She gets very upset and says ""Oh i didn't think it was going to be such a big deal, Why are you making a mountain of a mole hill?""  She gave me so much grief that I have started feeling guilty for not accommodating her and am now questioning myself.  So, Reddit AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving a party without telling my friends,"My friends were having a party and they all really wanted me to be there, so i ofcourse went to the party too. This was probably one of the last times we are all together, since they will move homes and live somewhere further away. So it was now or never. They thing is that it wasn't a party with just my friends, but also some random people I don't know.

At the party I didn't really wanted to drink a lot of alcohol, because it wasn't that late yet and i just wasn't in the mood. But all of them had a goal to get very drunk and wasted. In the beginning I also drank some alcohol, but I didn't like it. After two not very strong drinks, I didn't really wanted more. My friends still gave me more drinks I had to try out, since I never tasted this or that drink before. I should just have said I didn't want any more drinks, but instead I drank it and said how happy I was that they made this drink for me. I just didn't have the guts to tell them I didn't want to drink. I think because I didn't wanted to be the party pooper. 

After a while I went to a close friend of mine and told her I wasn't feeling the party or vibe anymore and all I wanted was to go home. She said that I need to do whatever feels right and nobody will judge me for doing so. I couldn't find my other friends at the party, so I just left without telling them. Later some of them messaged me and asked where I was. When I told them I was home they sounded kinda disappointed. ""Just because you lost us, doesn't mean you can just go away without telling us"". I completely understand where they are coming from, but I already told one friend so I thought she would tell everyone else. She didn't tell anyone though... 

I understand if my friends are worried or mad that I left and I know I should have told them. So am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 For saying my parents care for my sister more?,"I (14f) have a sister (10f). I am the first born and yet it feels the least cared about. For a little bit of context my sister is A little bit deaf(To the point of what she has hearing aids)

So I broke my fingers last week, leading to me going into the emergency room for 8 hours. This was a hard time for me, because the doctor told me that I might need surgery to put pins in my fingers. I was sad because I had a competition in 2 weeks and a show for theater a day after. I cried hard. And during this my mother got a call from my father. My mom came back into the room and sat by my side, A few minutes later, saying that my sister and my father sorry for me. I later found out that this was false. I came home and immediately flopped onto the couch from a shocking day. The next day my parents went shopping and my sister came up to me and said “You seriously had to get hurt? Are you that SELFISH?” She stormed off to her room and I was left in shock. We have never had an amazing relationship though this had made me feel as if our sistership was terribly tarnished. She has yet to bring the conversation up though.

When I told my parents later that night they brushed it off as non important and I should think about how she must be feeling. I hated my parents and said this was kind of like me being jealous of her being hard of hearing. They said this wasn’t the same and I agreed but like her it wasn’t something I could help right now.

There have been other incidents where I’ve told my parents of the injustices she’s done and they have brushed most of them off. This time I snapped and said they cared for her more than me.

Was I over reacting? Am I the asshole??? I have no idea any more!",AmItheAsshole
 if I refinance my ex's car into my name only and report it stolen?,"The good news is my divorce is finalized. The bad news is my name (and my ex's name) are still on my ex's car loan and they are not paying the bill for it. My ex stopped paying the car bill several months ago while we were getting our divorce. 

I didn't want that to hurt my credit so I paid it before it went 30 days delinquent... Christmas day... Fast forward to now and my ex has not made a single payment on the car since. I'm making all of them... The day before it goes delinquent. I even let it go delinquent once to see if they would pay it after...

They didn't. 

I kept having to pay the bill month after month. It felt like we were playing chicken. But, idk if they even know about it because they won't talk to me except through my divorce lawyer. They haven't talked to me, despite my efforts to reach them, for 9 months. Fast forward to now, and the divorce is finalized and I'm still making the car payments. 

I haven't seen this car in 9 months. They have it on one side of the country and I'm living on the other. I told my ex I need them to refinance the car into their name but I'm expecting they won't do it because they have gone out of they're way to hurt me every step of the way. So...  


AITA if I refinance the car into my name alone and retitle it into my name alone and report it stolen?  
or  
AITA if I stop making payments and let it go delinquent from here on out?   
Also, I'd love to hear alternative ideas for rectifying the situation. And what actually happens if you don't pay a car loan.",AmItheAsshole
 If I Didn't Let My Widowed SIL and Her Kid Live With Us?,"My (38m) SIL (idk, late 20s/early 30s F) husband died a couple weeks ago. SIL was a SAHM and didn't have much left besides some inheritances that were left to her that still need to be settled. My wifed has told me that she probably will have to sell the house due to a) They have no emergency fund and b) SIL dropped out to become a SAHM and has no income source of her own. 

As sympathetic as I feel, moving her and another kid into our house, on top of our own two under 10 kids is a HUGE lifestyle change I'm not sure we'll be able to take on. SIL's kid is 4. We *do* though have a vacant home (3bd/3ba) that we usually rent, but our last tenant moved out, so it's just been existing for the past few months. I offered that they live there (about 45 minutes away from us) but my wife is persistent on them moving into OUR house since my sister needs a support system. 

I'm open to help out, but I feel the case of moving in needs some more consideration, besides les do it. 

WIBTA To Just Say no?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my roommate’s mom when she plans to end her stay with us after her apartment was flooded?,"My (21 F) roommate’s (22 F) mother has been staying with us after there was a small flood in her apartment. Nothing was seriously damaged, especially since she had been home at the time and managed to mop up most of the water with towels and blankets. However when it happened my roommate told me her mom needs to stay with us a couple of nights while it was sorted. I was fine with a couple of nights, as it was a bad thing that happened to her and she is my roommate’s family and needed somewhere to stay. 

However when her mom showed up, her mom told me that her landlord had actually offered for her to stay at a hotel under his cost, as the flooding was due to plumbing issues within the house. I was a little confused as to why she chose to stay in our little two bedroom apartment instead of a hotel, but I figured she may just want to be near her daughter with all the stress. 

It has not been a couple of nights. She is coming up to her eighth night of being here. She has also been an incredibly rude house guest (I’ve made previous posts about this woman’s behaviour actually) she has been loud late at night,(which is frustrating for me who needs to get up early in the morning to work 10-12 hour shifts) causing a lot of dishes and not cleaning them, taking long hot showers multiple times a day, leaving the heater on full blast, lounging around watching tv at times I would like to, constantly in the kitchen or bathroom when I need to be. Even when I need to get ready for work in the morning, almost every morning she is in the bathroom for 20 minutes during times I need to be. Every time I ask her to get out she says “I’ll just be a few more minutes!” And stays in there for a while longer. When my roommate and I go to work, she sits around in our apartment as she’s unemployed so she doesn’t need to go to work. 

I have spoken to her about things several times. Asked her to not be in the bathroom when I need to be, asked her to do her dishes, asked her to turn the heater off when it isn’t necessary. We live in a very expensive city, so since my rent is already expensive I don’t exactly want a super high power bill either. She has also offered no kind of gesture of appreciation to me. 

AITA for asking when she plans on leaving? ",AmItheAsshole
 For refusing to pick my daughter up and instead leaving her to get lectured by her dad?,"  
My daughter Kelly’s extracurricular was hosting an event that she wanted to volunteer for. The plan was that Kelly would stay for the full weekend to do the event, she would go on a bus to the building where the extracurricular is usually hosted, then I would pick her up from there since it’s only a 20 minute drive from home.  
  
It was over five hours of driving. It took three hours to get to there plus another two hours just to sit in traffic at the car line for the event. Traffic was not nearly as bad on the return trip, luckily. My younger daughter and I were having dinner an hour away from home, when I got a call from Kelly asking to come home.  
  
Nothing bad had happened. Kelly just said she didn’t like the things they were having her do (Carrying boxes/supplies, manning the check-in booth, etc.) She knew beforehand that she would be sleeping on a cot with a bunch of kids in the same area but claimed she didn’t realize what that was actually like until now and she wanted to go home.  
  
I told Kelly no, we were already hours away. Kelly started saying it wouldn’t be as bad as if we were already home, and that the traffic probably wouldn’t be as bad as it was earlier to get near the event. I again told Kelly no, and that, frankly, her asking this was extremely inconsiderate to us and our time. There was a convention that her sister wanted to go to but had to turn down because I had no one to take her and Kelly promised this event was important to her.  
  
Kelly kept begging me to pick her up. I told her no and suggested she ask her dad David if he’s willing to drive out and pick her up. Kelly eventually did end up calling David and claims that he lectured her for the entire two hours that he was driving them home. Kelly told her grandmother, who told me that Kelly’s actions were inconsiderate, but I know Kelly and David don’t get along right now. And I should have gone to get Kelly since I was closer than I would have been at home and a two hour lecture was just excessive on David’s end.  
  
I agree David’s lecture was excessive, but Kelly could also take it away as an important lesson that when you ask other people to accommodate you for a commitment and end up breaking said commitment, people are naturally going to be upset with you. Besides, it wasn’t as if Kelly was stranded in the middle of nowhere or in a bad situation. She was perfectly safe at the event. She could have either rode out the weekend or dealt with the lecture from David.   
  
I know a typical response in this situation is usually to say my mother shouldn’t have any input because she isn’t Kelly parent. But she does help with the girls and it wouldn’t be right to say she isn’t entitled to some input considering she has stepped up and gone out of her way as a grandparent to help in that regard. I’m looking for other perspective because I’m still unsure of whether I should consider my mother’s words or apologize to Kelly. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling out my bestfriends shitty behaviour towards me in front of our friend group?,"I (16F) have a friend i’ll call her Madeline (16F), Madeline and i have been bestfriends for 3 years and just recently she has been downgrading me infront of our friends saying stuff like “pull your shorts up you have no bum” and “ew your acne makes you look gross” and just overall talking horribly about me and has really made me self-conscious.

after that I distanced myself away from her until we seen each other at a party and she tried to pressure me into taking a substance with her which i refused multiple times, she then got mad and started screaming at me in-front of everyone basically saying “why did you come here if you’re going to be a loser and not take drugs? might as well go home” i obviously was embarrassed so i went home and completely avoided her as much as i could. 

it was like 2 months i had been avoiding her for and she kept making comments towards me in-front of everyone on the days she actually was at school (which was like 2-3 times a week) which i don’t understand why she would say stuff towards me considering i have been by her side through everything she has been through, one day at school it was lunch time i was already having a horrible day because of her and she was criticising what i wear outside of school very loudly and so i stood up and said to her “you are the shittiest friend i have ever known a real friend wouldn’t be treating me like you are,  you barely ever come to school you have these big dreams but you won’t achieve them if you are out all night every night with men 7 years older then you, taking drugs and drinking your life away. you got angry at me because i wouldn’t do drugs with you yet you should have understood why I didn’t want to not only because of my past trauma but also yours, f*ck you and f*ck this whole table i would have thought someone here would have stood up for me.” and then i left. 

So, AITA? because now the whole group hates me for what i said but i believe i had a valid reason to voice my opinion. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for asking someone to stop watching a movie so I could lower my headrest?,"Recently, I was on a group trip on a bus and we had 12 hours trip ahead of us. Around the start of the trip I tried to rest my head on the headrest, but it felt uncomfortable. When I looked some girls from behind had raised my headrest so they could fit a phone in between to watch a movie. (They didn't ask for permission)

I then told them it was uncomfortable and I said would like if they lowered it. They argued there was multiple people watching. (around 3)
After arguing for a while they moved their phone under the headrest of my friend, next to me, who said it didn't bother him. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for letting my daughter play with her friends?,"My (38F) Husband (40M) got in a fight with our neighbors a few weeks ago. We have been friends with them the last 5 years. We all hang out and our kids play together most days. My husband was over there playing darts with them one night until 1:00am. They all had a few drinks as well. The neighbor (40M) I’ll call him S apparently (I wasn’t there so I don’t know their side) went off on my husband out of no where. My husband says he went to the bath room, came back out to the garage and S just went off. Saying some really mean things to him basically everything that’s ever bothered him about my husband he said to him. They were playing for money and S owed my husband about $120 at that point. He says S’s wife was sitting there the whole time agreeing with what S was saying. My husband is VERY upset. He doesn’t want anything to do with them anymore. The problem is like I said my daughter (10F) plays with their two girls all the time. She’s an only child and I love that she has friends in the neighborhood to play with. My husband doesn’t want her over there anymore. I said thats punishing our daughter for a stupid fight he got in with one of his friends. He thinks I don’t have his back and it’s been a fight between us since it happened. I’m not going over there anymore hanging out. Our daughter isn’t there late at night or anything. It’s literally letting her play with her friends for a few hours after school or on the weekends. I don’t think it’s far to not let her play with her friends because two grown men can’t get along. So AITA for letting my daughter play with her friends? ",AmItheAsshole
 For not giving my ex bf my new blog details?,"So I recently broke with my bf, I am from Sweden but currently live in the UK studying and he knows I have quit social media for a while for my mental health but have started my new blog today. He asked me for the blog address and I told him no as I don't want him spying on me or knowing my thoughts right now. Is this bad please?",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad and ignoring a friend for leaving my birthday party,"Me (24M) and a handful of friends went to a restaurant on sunday to celebrate my birthday. I also invited some friends from college. Note that there were two distinct groups of people: friends that I met in college and ones that I didn't, so they didn't know each other.

One of my friends (lets call her Annie, 20F) from college arrived late, didn't bother to meet and talk to anyone besides her close friends, and decided to leave after staying for only 20 minutes. I asked why and she said that she was going to see a cover band with the same group of friends that I met in college.

Important things to note: it was not the first time something like it happens (won't be specific) so it's not an isolated event; I invited them A WEEK before my birthday, and I only knew they were leaving because I saw them leaving and reached for them first.

I sent Annie a message and asked what the heck was going on. After a handful of messages she opens up and says she wasn't liking the party and she didn't know almost anyone (except for two friends), and decided to leave.

There was no effort from her part to stay, I wasn't informed about anything before myself asking, and above all, I didn't get an apology.

A day later at college Annie wents after me and acts like nothing happened. She knew I was pissed since sunday and still wasn't given any clarification and any apology, plus she knows that my birthday is an extremely important day to me. I immediately dismissed her and told her I was too upset and didn't want to talk. I'm ingnoring her since sunday and I plan to do so before second notice.

Am I the asshole for doing this?",AmItheAsshole
 For being frustrated with my partner for doing no housework whilst he looks for a job after being made redundant?,"My (23F) partner (25M) has lost his job nearly 3 weeks ago now. 

Thankfully, his old boss has agreed to pay him for 1 month if he left immediately, to give him an opportunity to find elsewhere.

This is his third job that he lost, due to redundancy.

I'm trying to be a supportive girlfriend but I won't lie, it's really stressing me out. Due to everything going up in cost over the last 2 years, we spend nearly double on bills and haven't been putting that much away into savings, as odd costs keep coming up. My entire wage just about covers all our bills but nothing else. 

We are okay this month, but come May - we will most likely have to dip into our savings until he finds a job which isn't ideal as we are trying to save up to improve our house. 

Now, he has used this time to apply for jobs. He's had a few interviews. He's not been told no, the interview process is just drawn out, so he has to have at least 2 or 3 calls with each company.

My partner has therefore been at home for nearly 3 weeks now, and during this time has done barely any housework. 

I work full time, 5 days a week. I work from 9am and finish at 6 or 7pm, with a 30 minute commute. I find my job to be high stress and low reward so I'm unhappy but obviously it's not wise for me to leave anytime soon, as at least it's very stable. After work, all I want to do is relax and play games and save all my chores for the weekend. 

My partner only does chores when I tell him to, usually with me at the weekend. His job was pretty relaxed and he would always be home sooner than me, at 6pm.

The house really needs a lot doing, with my job taking up more of my time recently, house work has piled up but I just don't have the time. I've worked 3 weekends recently too. It would have been really nice to come back to a clean home, and a maintained garden. 

I tried to find a balance between being a supportive girlfriend, so I hinted at housework needing doing. Prompting questions like what was he up to, and telling him that XYZ really need doing. 

Nothing happened. 

Eventually I got annoyed and told him that as he's not currently working, he should have the time to do housework - he's not done anything, not even washing dishes after us. 

He got defensive and told me he doesn't sit on his arse all day and he has been applying for jobs, in call interviews, and had a couple physical ones and a few more lined up. 

It has been a week since I snapped but he's still barely done anything around the house. 

I know it's stressful for him too, so I don't want to pile on, but am I crazy for thinking he genuinely does have a LOT more free time to do the tasks we have struggled to get on top of such as garden work, painting, cleaning, etc, whilst both still working? 

I feel bad for snapping, but I've come home today and the house is still a mess. I know he didn't have any interviews today, and with the stress of my job and his unemployment - I feel really fed up and I just can't cope. 

So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" for setting boundaries with friends and standing up for myself?
","About 2 years ago I was coming to terms with being trans (27MTNB) and got super sick at the same time, so I took a hiatus from my friend group to deal with that. I didn't want to affect other people with my anxiety and I could tell that I wasn't handling the stress very well. I took about a 9 month break, and a few friends reached out to me, since we're all pretty close-knit and have been since we were kids.

•  Will - I've known him since we were about 2. My oldest friend and I've shared so many good and bad times with him. Confused but trying to be supportive about me being trans.

• Vince - Old best friend, known since about 5. Used to be as close with him as I used to be with Will, if not closer. Started to become borderline white supremacist a few years ago. Used to be a good person, but there was some sort of shift in him and he became bitter. Transphobic.

• Steve - Vince's new best friend. Has BPD but generally a good guy, and  decently trans positive, but he tends to do things for shock value. 

• Gina - Only girl of the group. Bisexual, trans positive. Tries to keep some of the more nasty comments in check. (Racism, sexism, etc.) 

To start to re-intigrate, I joined back up with some of the group chats after coming out to Will, Steve, and Gina since I trusted them the most about having my back. I knew Vince would probably be hateful since he's said stuff in the past like ""If it were my choice I wouldn't give trans people their medication"" (Paraphrased, he's a pharmacist). Overall went pretty well coming back to the Facebook chat, no issues.

Then I tried to reintegrate with playing games with them on Discord. We have a server for just our close friends but it's not being used really anymore in favor of a more open server owned by Will and moderated by Vince and Steve. I joined that on the condition of I would leave if I encountered any transphobia, since it had some random people they like to play Destiny 2 with in it as well.

I was joking around and someone called me bro (which honestly, I don't have any issue with Will or other certain people calling me that, it was more so the issue that it was one of the people I wasn't comfortable with).

 I asked them to not call me that, and it ended up devolving into them saying:

• I wasn't ""normal"" for putting my pronouns in my name

• said he wouldn't ""cater to sissy mindset"" etc.

Vince's reaction as a mod was ""Reading the drama 🍿"" which I should have expected, I don't really to expect them to understand me being trans since it's so new to them, but a lot of them said they expected and sort of knew. I just wanted to be treated with basic respect and not called slurs. So I left the server and just cut myself off again, since I figured they aren't people who would support me through this process.  I set the boundary that I would leave if people were transphobic, Will knew that boundary and didn't stick up for me, and neither did anyone else. Am I expecting too much or AITA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for not sharing my pictures with my landlady? ,"I (19F) had a formal event the past weekend and was running late because my friend, who was supposed to pick me up, got sick. I was trying to contact another friend when I saw my landlady (73F) return home. She told me I looked pretty and mentioned that she had had a really bad day. She had a doctor’s appointment that was a long drive away and was visibly tired. Despite this, she offered to take pictures of me in my dress before offering to give me a ride to the event as well. It was only a 10-minute ride away, but I felt bad because she seemed exhausted.

During our ride, she asked me to send those pictures to her so that she could set me up with her neurologist, whom she had an appointment with today. She mentioned that he looked cute and she wasn’t sure if he was married, but she thought he would be a great fit for me. I just agreed and laughed it off because she seemed to be teasing me.

When we arrived, she waited until I found the venue and my friends at the formal before driving back. She was so sweet about it. Yesterday, she asked me to send her my pictures as I had agreed to because she will have a follow-up appointment with this doctor soon. I didn’t think she would be serious about this. I’m actually not okay with a random stranger looking at my pictures, and it seems unprofessional if she does that to her attending doctor. I’m not interested in being set up either. She doesn’t understand that I’m only 19, and this doctor she’s talking about is probably 35+ and possibly married. I find this situation uncomfortable, and she thinks it’s normal for a man to be much older than a woman, possibly because of the huge generational gap between us.

She’s a sweet lady, and I think I WIBTA if I don’t share my pictures with her because she helped me, and I casually agreed to it at first without giving it much thought. Now, I don’t know what to say to her, and I feel conflicted. It makes me look selfish that it seems like I just agreed to it initially to seek her help, whereas now that I don’t need her help anymore, I’m being honest. Plus, I need to maintain good terms with her. It’s just sharing my pictures with her, but the thought of the possibility that she might casually try to set me up with someone using those pictures is unsettling to me. So, WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling out my grandmother on her prejudice ,"My grandmother (75F) is a very traditional. Growing up I used to love her stories and would listen with no problems but now that I’m older (17F) I’m starting to realize she’s not as good a person as I thought she was

Recently my family has gone through some rocky times due to how busy my mom is with her work and the frequency trips she’s been taking for work to various places including India and France. 

It should be noted that my mom (49F) is my father’s 2nd wife. My father(50F) married his highschool sweetheart at 19 as soon as he graduated then went into the army. My grandparents adored that woman and considered her a daughter. While he was deployed his first wife who I’ll call Maria ended up cheating on him while he was deployed in Italy in 1998. He divorced her shortly after and while he was in the process of divorce he met my mother and they hit it off. About a year later they married as soon as my father’s divorce was finalized. My grandmother hated the fact my father moved on so quickly and expressed her disapproval of my mother at every opportunity. 

After that the rest in history and they’ve been married nearly 30 years. It was only recently I discovered my grandmas distaste of my mother. I figured it out by her snide comments to my mom and the fact she took my father and her grandkids including me and my siblings out of her will. She’d criticize my mother at every opportunity and make comments on the fact she was busy and successful. Saying things like she wasn’t spending time with her son and that my mother was abusing us by being away from us so frequently.

Recently at Easter dinner my grandmother made a comment to my mom who was talking about it her recent trip to Spain and said “I don’t understand how my son puts up with your absence, he’s a person too and you’re ignoring him,” the table went silent and my mom didn’t say anything and my dad was gobsmacked. I had enough and told her she was being ridiculous and cruel to my mom for no reason. She was shocked and said that I was being very disrespectful.

My parents are asking me to apologize but I refuse. She has no right to treat my mom this way. 

Am I the asshole? 

Edit - It should be noted that the older my siblings got the more she took some of her disapproval out on us. Mocking my older brother’s (22M) career choice because he went to school for theater, making rude remarks about my older sister (20F) and her tattoos and piercings, and even me for my mental issues and the fact I have autism. However she shows no ill will towards my half sister (30F) whom my dad had with the first wife, she can do no wrong is my grandmothers eyes, even though she’s a college dropout and had a child out of wedlock which my grandma is supposedly against. 

Edit #2: Seems you guys are confused on why my dad hasn’t stopped this sooner. I’ll explain what I think is going on based on what I know. My father is actually adopted by my now grandmother whom was my biological grandmothers sister, making her my great aunt. My biological grandmother was extremely abusive to my father and he has lasting effects from it even at 50 years old. I’m sure he feels some sort of loyalty to his adopted mother and doesn’t want to mess up their relationship after all she’s done for him. I may be wrong but that’s my personal view on the situation. ",AmItheAsshole
 for spending a long time in a public toilet? ,"TMI warning

I'm on day 2 of my period and had severe stomach pains while at college today. I chose to go to a toilet at the end of college because you are in a small room that has a lot more privacy rather than the toilet stalls. 

I knew that I would need privacy because I knew there would be quite a lot of poo and blood and if I got blood on my hands I would want a sink right next to me rather than people seeing me go outside. I also wanted a room so people couldn't hear me.

Turns out my period problems have been getting a lot worse, when I pooped my body had to push out more to the point where I probably lost 1kg, there was non period blood, I thought I was going to be physically sick and had to go home from the pain.

Now here's the issue, I had someone continuously trying to open the door, at one point knocking and also called someone (staff) to tell me to hurry up. I think I was in there for about 20 minutes.

Normally I wouldn't really be annoyed at this but I could hear them saying rude stuff to their friends about ""whoever was in there"". When they knocked I was going to answer with ""sorry I will be a while"" but as soon as they knocked they all started laughing loudly. 

When I came out I went past them and I heard her go ""finally"", and decided to basically let me frustrations out a bit. I told her if she can not be rude when people are trying to use the bathroom because I want to use it peacefully without hearing all of that stuff and I had been having stomach issues. 

She said and kept saying ""well you were taking a while"".

She said that to everything. I made it clear I was having stomach problems and that she could've just used the toilet that was literally in the room next door (that is probably the same distance). 

So AITA for spending a lot of time? I couldn't have been any quicker but I could be the A for having a go at them as well
",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking someone out with nowhere to go?,"Recently my (39F) family member (40M) got in financial trouble and needed a place to live. He has a roommate (44M) that was going to be homeless with no job and no money. Family member vouched for him (fully trust them) and we allowed the friend to stay for a short time. He got a job and we said no need to pay us rent, but be gone by May 1st.

Fast forward to now and I hear he has not been saving much money for his next place. He has been paying off money he borrow from others and will just be homeless when our deadline runs out. I know he is just trying to make good on old debts, but we can’t keep paying for rent/electric/water/etc indefinitely for everyone.

AITA for sticking to the May 1st deadline knowing he will likely be living in his car?",AmItheAsshole
 for not want to go to my husband nieces graduation party,"My husband and I have been together for 8 years we both have kids from our previous relationship and somehow managed to establish a family dynamic. My husband has always treated my son as his own, and has always included him in all of his families functions. He has always told his sister to make sure to include my son in anything that she does for his kids and also to treat him as family. Last month, she organized a family photo shoot for all of my husband’s grandmother’s grandkids. My husband asked me to make sure that my son attended the photo shoot. I had to ask my ex-husband for permission to take my son for a couple of hours on the weekend seeing that it was my ex weekend to have our son. I don’t get along with my ex, but nevertheless, I made an effort to talk to my, ex because this was important to my husband. Everything was set and we went to the photo shoot. At first everything was fine and my son was included in the first couple of pictures. I was talking to my husband’s aunt when I looked over, I noticed his sister had pulled my son out of the photo shoot and lovingly hugging him to keep him out of the picture of all the grandsons. I was very upset, but did not make a scene out of respect for his grandmother and his family. I let it go since it did not seem to bothered my son. Now his sister is having a graduation party for her daughter. I told him I did not want to go and explain to him why.  He immediately knew what I was talking about and said that he was upset too,but did not said anything because his sister paid for the photoshoot and I did not mention anything to him. My husband said that I need to go to the party because his nieces should not have to pay for her mothers actions. I am at a lost, since it really did upset me and honestly I do not want to socialize with his sister. What should I do? Should I just go to the party and leave early or stand my ground and not go at all and piss off my husband?",AmItheAsshole
 for not waiting my brother to attend my graduation ceremony?,"I (18f) do not want my brother (21m) to attend my graduation ceremony. For starters him and I do not have the best relationship— I would practically say it is nonexistent. We don’t talk, text, or hardly ever see each other. Growing up we had a terrible relationship, I don’t really like him. So i think our nonexistent relationship is for the best.
He is currently in the military, and lives in another state. He requested time off to “attend my graduation” (what he told me).
in the past I stated to him and my parents that I don’t want him to go to my graduation ceremony for personal reasons.
Today, my mom and I got into an argument about this. She called me selfish saying that he already bought the plane ticket and what not, but I honestly don’t care, I never asked him to do that. And I have been clear about my thoughts and feelings and have voiced them on various occasions for the past 2.5 years.
However I do feel guilty, and don’t want to cause any more arguments with my parents. Should I just suck it up and let him attend?
I have even contemplated not attending my own ceremony to avoid any further conflict.
Aita for not wanting him to come?



backstory (?): 
My brother is in the military, every time he comes back home, mentally I am not the best, and usually break down, my parents have seen these brake downs, so every time he is home I try to leave for the time being in order to avoid this. And i think my graduation is one of my “special days” and I would want it to be free of any stress etc… ",AmItheAsshole
 for reminding him his job is to fix things? ,"My boiler recently turned off, and hot water isn’t working. 
My landlords handy man has came in. He turned it on thankfully, but as my mum (sweet, but fiery immigrant, who was trying her best to explain in English)was explaining that she thinks it turned off because she turned on the guest room heater, he started getting irritated and was telling her to tell me to download a manual and learn how to fix it myself. I find this funny because I’m really clumsy and would probably end up breaking it while trying to fix it. I’m not even going to attempt to fix a boiler or let the water out. I watched the last gas man do it but he was a pro, he knew what he was doing. After doing it the pressure in our boiler always drops as well. Which they usually fix in the same time they come in when my mum tells them about it. This man was straight up telling me tell your mom I won’t be coming in every time something wrong with the boiler or heater as if it’s our fault the things never working. His tone wasn’t angry but it was demeaning. I said “but it is your job to do it.” He just stared at me, and said well I’m away, and left. I said it one more time because I was in disbelief with his reaction. Why did he even come in to fix something when he didn’t fix anything? 
This isn’t the first time he’s been avoiding his job, every day it’s I’ll come during the afternoon, then he doesn’t. You ask him if he’s coming he says he’s coming the next day, this carries on till Friday, when it’s the weekend so obviously he isn’t coming, but he will come on Monday, but then he doesn’t. 
This is more of a rant really, I just want my home to work as it should be. I’m not sure why I have to remind him that it is his job to do so, instead of telling me to go buy the key and doing it myself. 
",AmItheAsshole
 For not calling 911 when someone overdosed at the store I was working and I was the only one with a phone?,"Important context - We actually don't have a store phone where I work, we just use our cell phones. I was the only one with a cell phone today because my co-worker left hers in her car.  
  
So anyways I was at work today with my co-worker (it was just the two of us). My co-worker goes to use the restroom and comes back screaming to me ""Call 911! Call 911! Someone's overdosed in the bathroom!!"". I say to my co-worker ""Okay, hang on a second"". I walk over to my purse and grab the Narcan that I keep in there and go to the bathroom. I see the woman who is on the floor in the stall. I go into the stall and do a quick sternum rub (no response) then I administer the Narcan. Thankfully she responded very well to the Narcan and woke up, however, she was \*pissed\* (\*which I understand). She storms out of the bathroom and out of the store. Meanwhile, my co-worker is still screaming at me ""CALL 911! why are you letting her walk away ??? she needs medical attention"". I explained that 911 would have just done the same exact thing I did, only we would have had to wait on them. Also there's nothing else left to do, she already left the building.  
  
So now my co-worker is pissed off at me for not calling 911. I think she wants to report me to our manager for not calling 911 when there was a medical emergency. I'm so stressed about this now and can't get it out of my head, I'm worried she's going to tell our boss what happened and that our boss will side with her.",AmItheAsshole
: Wearing the same color Prom dress as my friend,"Hey guys! I’ve never posted on Reddit and I am hoping I do this correctly! Here’s my dilemma: So I am a 18F going to Prom with 17M and our friend group 18F, 18F and 18M. So there are 3 girls, two boys. Backstory is that I met a guy (17F) and this friend group at a church event and became super close with them. I am currently going to a school in which I am the only senior (small sports academy with &lt;100 students). I knew I wouldn’t have the chance to probably go to Prom and I was so heartbroken. But, the 17M I am going with now promposed to me about two to three weeks ago. Although extremely excited and grateful for the opportunity to go, now the hunt for a prom dress started and the real issues begin. 

One of the 18F in our group demands that we all are wearing different colors about a week ago. I at first was okay with this as I thought there would probably be no clash with colors until I learned the same girl had bought a purple dress (which I was looking for too). I was at first upset but looked for another color to avoid any drama. But after looking for weeks with a smaller budget (200-300 dollars) and a bad selection, I thought I was at a loss until I found a dress today. It’s a purple dress (not the same shade or style but it’s purple). I loved it on me and I felt so beautiful. I felt like a princess. 

I texted 18F asking if this was okay since the dresses were drastically pretty differently style wise and shade wise but still purple. After that text ensued a huge argument in which I am told “this has happened to me before” (a prior event where her BFF at the time wore the same EXACT dress to HOCO) and “we are going to clash”.  I offered to not be in any group photos after she says “she doesn’t care but she won’t do a group photo because it will make use blend together” but that wasn’t helpful. 

I ended up buying the dress because I feel like I am being walked all over but maybe I am wrong? I feel so sick to my stomach right now and feel regret for buying the dress I really love. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 yelling at my father after he broke my $350 headphones and won't let me exchange them?,"My F15 father M45 have been having quite a few fights over small petty stuff. 

But yesterday he got into a fight with my mother, (this was dumb) I tried to get in the middle to stop him and get him to stop yelling at my mom, he took away my gaming laptop that I bought with my own money after I didn't want to leave after failing to get them to stop fighting.

 this afternoon after I got home from school I did my usual stuff leaving him alone. He comes into my room and starts to talk to me while I'm in the middle of painting. He lectured me for an hour about our bad family dynamic then started to make me do my sisters F17 chores as I get up and start to do her laundry he rips my headphones off my head (I had an ear out that he could see) and they fall on the floor and they brake.
 I start to cry and panic because my school is in the middle of state testing so we have a 2 hour class periods and I don't want to go to school without them. He tells me we can return them and I check the exchange policy and I could return them and get new ones! He then decides when my mother gets home that we will go tomorrow after school when I try to refute him and tell him that it's open till 8pm (at 5pm) and we could just do it now and I won't have to worry and not go to school without them. And he repeated was he said about doing it tomorrow and that it's too much wear on our car (that runs perfectly fine) to go and do it tonight, I offer to take an Uber he says no and then I get frustrated and say 
""why the f*ck can I not go return them tonight when it's still open and I don't want to go to school without them?!"" 
Am I the AITA for getting mad? ",AmItheAsshole
 for having boundaries around how much support I can give others for mental health and bad times?,"If someone is having a rough time, without invalidating what they are going through…

WIBTA if I told them I have too many of my own problems that I can’t adequately take on anymore capacity to be people’s emotional support, and they might have to go speak to their parents or a councillor instead? 

I’m just honestly going through a really bad time and going mental myself, and any negative or stressful conversation right now can actually give me a heart attack and lately I’ve felt like an emotional punching bag. Would it be insensitive if I told people I can’t help as much as I used to anymore? ",AmItheAsshole
 for snitching on kids vaping in the bathroom.,"

Hello, I’m a senior in high school and I’m also very pregnant (34 weeks). Before I got pregnant I didn’t really care, I don’t personally vape but to each their own. 

My issue is now that I am very clearly pregnant and when I go to the restroom and all the stalls are occupied by three or more girls vaping I get irritated. I don’t mind having to wait a little longer and usually when they see that they made a pregnant girl doing the peepee dance wait they apologize, but today the only open stall didn’t have toilet paper so I was waiting for a different stall and one of the girls blew smoke on me. I don’t know if it was intentional or not but I still do not appreciate it or anything like it, I really considered pulling my phone and taking a video of the group of girls and going to the resource officer, I didn’t, but if it happens again WIBTA? 

I don’t want to be a snitch but at this point the smell of vapes or pens makes me literally gag and now they’re blowing smoke on me as well. I just ahhh.



",AmItheAsshole
 for shooting my bfs idea down?,"my(23) bf(30) has had a history of ""get quick rich"" scams. a lot of shady business and a lot of ""half baked"" projects. he just don't follow through with any of it.  he also grew up without a lot and had to resort to dealing to pay for basic necessities at a very young age. he just recently got financially stable via a regular day job. tonight he told me he needed to borrow my expensive camera to start filming ""courses"" on Udemy. he wants to teach classes on real estate and flipping houses... the issue? he's never bought, sold, or flipped a house. he's just talked about it with his uncle who is a realtor. my bf does actually have a real estate LLC but again it's one of his ""half baked"" projects he never did anything with it after getting it registered. 

So after he finished explaining this all to me, i asked him if he wanted my honest opinion. he said yes so i told him that i think courses are already an over saturated market and most people who make money from online courses already have a social media following. i explained that i thought it wasn't the best idea because he doesn't even have social media to start off with. 

he then responds ""people like you piss me off. like that actually got me heated. i'm so mad right now."" 

i apologized and tried to explain that i wasn't trying to hurt his feelings or anything, i just don't want him to fall into one of these get rich fast scams again. 

he said he was going to the gym and he'd talked to me later then hung up.

I feel like an asshole but i also feel he's old enough to know these scams are either going to hurt him or someone else in the long run. i just want him to make his money the safe and legal way and not dealing or scamming. aita?
",AmItheAsshole
 for having to take care of my family and making my partner upset?,"My mother was diagnosed with stage 4 colon cancer about year ago. It was right after I met my partner, I'll call them Amy. Now me and Amy are in a long distance relationship. And though it's been hard since her day is my night, she was there with me through it all and I've always done my best to return the favor. 

I tried to keep a schedule with taking care of my mom in the day and talking to Amy at night. But I've been struggling with it since I have to wake up early to feed my mother and Amy always gets upset when I go to bed early. So I haven't been getting enough sleep. I've talked to Amy about this and I tried to get her to understand how difficult it is for me and how exhausted I am while reassuring her the I love her and I want to talk to her as much as possible. I ended up making a schedule where since Amy wakes up around 7 pm for me, I'll talk to her after I lay my mother in bed until it's 11pm. 

Amy seemed fine with it at first but then she became colder towards me and then soon after, ghosted me. After a few harsh days she ended up texting me and we got back together, but she was still trying to get me to stay up until 3 am. Every time I refused she would claim I didn't love her and I didn't care about so I agreed to stay up a little longer. 

Yesterday morning my mother had some medical problems which required us going to the hospital. I didn't know we were going to be staying overnight so I didn't have my phone charger and I wasn't thinking straight to text my girlfriend what happened and my phone died. Once we got home I charged my phone and saw all the texts from my girlfriend. 

She was saying how she was going to leave and was saying goodbye, then sending me depressing tik toks. This isn't the first time she's done this so I know she's not going to leave, especially since she's continuing to send me stuff. I haven't texted back, I love her, but I'm so tired. There's no one else to take care of my mother since I have no close family and my father passed 4 years ago and I also have to cook and clean the house and take care of my grandparents too. I'm also a minor so all of this has been hard. Am I not giving my girlfriend enough? Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for more money while pet sitting ,"I am currently looking after a dog that is 17 years old. I had previously looked after him a year ago and everything was fine there was no issues. I now have my own dog that I share with my brother part time and when this family asked me to take care of there dog I wouldn’t have mine so I agreed. Little did I know that it hasn’t even been a week and this dog can not control when it needs to poo or pee. We were told it should be able to be okay from 10-12 hours. And the first day he peed all over my carpet and liked inside his own bed. I take the dog out 3 times a day in the morning, afternoon and before bed.  There has been very few times where the dog has gone potty outside rather than inside my studio apartment (he’s also gone in the elevator). I am cleaning up this dogs waste all the time and it’s worse than training my 7 month old puppy. I have talked to the owners  and they said it’s very unusual behaviour and that they are really sorry about this. They are also away for another 12 days before I give the dog back. All together I’ll have the dog for 17 days and I’m getting paid 600$. But honestly this wasn’t what I was signing up for and I made sure to asked questions about his health before agreeing. I’ve had to throw about my carpet and use a lot of my cleaning supplies that I use with my own dog as well as my dogs poop bags because they didn’t pack any. The dog additionally stinks. Which is so frustrating cause I only live in a studio apartment so I smell it constantly. All in all it’s a super frustrating situation and I don’t know if I should ask for more since I would have never taken this dog knowing how much worse he’s gotten. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my dad's gf to our wedding so my fiancee can be comfortable?,"My dad has been with Sammi (36f) for 12 years. My fiancee Megan (25f) has a bad history of her mom flirting with and trying to hook up with her and her older sister's boyfriends. 

Because of this Megan is very uncomfortable with Sammi and some of what she does, for example paying adoption fees and supplies when I adopted a new dog, dropping lunch off to me when she takes lunch to my dad, hugging me, baking my birthday cake, making things I like when we go to my dad's to eat (she does it for Megan too), not a whole lot older than us, isn't wanting to marry my dad. All that makes Megan sometimes think Sammi is trying to flirt with me or is interested in me. It makes her panic, stressed, and depressed. Fwiw Megan is going to therapy for her trauma.

We want as much of a stress-free wedding we can manage so Megan can enjoy our day. She's worried stress and nerves will make her read too much into Sammi so we decided to not invite her. My dad got his invitation on Friday and it was addressed to only him. I may be an assh*le here when he called to RSVP for him and Sammi I had to tell him only he was invited and why. Dad said he would have to rethink coming. I guess he called my mom because she called me soon after to talk about it and thinks we just did what we had to do to make my future wife happy and comfortable at her wedding. My dad's reaction has me doubting myself though so AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not punishing my daughter after she told my sister that she (sister) smells?,"I (35m) have a daughter ""Kelly"" (8f) with my wife. I also have a sister ""Dina"" (33f) who has 2 kids (7m and 12f). Our houses are literally across the road from each other. Occasionally we babysit kids for each other, however the kids have to stay at our house since my daughter is allergic to dogs and Dina has 2.

Both me and my wife were attending a work event last week and have asked Dina to babysit our daughter in advance which wasn't a problem as the kids wanted to watch some cartoons together anyway. However half way through the event I have received a call from Dina saying I need to come home now as she is leaving over what my daughter said. I was very confused so me and my wife left the event early, thinking something horrible had happened.

Upon returning my sister was furious and said she will never look after our daughter as she has an attitude. I have asked Kelly what happened and she said she just brought my sister some towels saying she can take a shower if she needs to as well as  there are some ""feminine products"" in the bathroom because ""there was an unpleasant smell coming from the auntie"". I came closer to my sister and could also smell a rather sharp unpleasant odour from her so I could understand where my daughter was coming from.

Dina demanded I punish my daughter, but I refused and said she didn't do anything wrong and me or my wife would possibly approached her in a similar way in this case. Dina called me an asshole and since then would bring her kids home not allowing them to play or talk to Kelly, which is upsetting. My wife thinks my sister is being petty and unnecessary cruel over an innocent comment and our daughter wanted to be helpful.",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to tell my GF that i might need to change plans,"for Context; I (26m) currently still live with my Mother unfortunately, and i see My GF (25f) 3 or 4 days a week. Her family have monthly games nights where we have dinner and then play card &amp; Board games, I am always invited to these.

My mother has, as of a few hours ago, asked me to look after her dogs in a week and a half's time (3rd-7th of may) while her and my step father go away for the bank holiday weekend. I has told her that I believe I have plans for at minimum one of the days within this weekend and I will have to let her know what I can do.

I have then contacted my GF to let her know of the situation and that, I still have every intention to come to the family games night but i might not be able to spend the saturday night (Games night) &amp; Sunday night round her house as I will need to be at home to feed and be with the dogs.

  
My GF has then started to yell and have a go at me saying that ""this is a piss take"" and that ""she is barely going to be able to see me this weekend"" and acting as this is my fault that I've only just been told and I am now informing her that my Mother has asked this of me. 

I am also seeing her tonight (tuesday) and on Thursday and I do this at minimum every week, and i will still be doing this, this week and next week, it just means that i might not get to spend as much time with her this weekend.

She seems hellbent that this is my Fault and is continuing to tell me that ""I need to deal with my Mum"" and to ""tell her you already have plans"" She also says that ""she isnt able to stay round my house during the other days of the weekend because she has clients on during the early morning and evening"" (she is in animal care &amp; dog walking)

so Reddit, please let me know if I am in the wrong or if my GF is over reacting OR if its my Mothers fault??",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to spend two weeks' vacation with my bf's family?,"My bf is finishing up his Masters in a couple weeks. His parents will come to stay with us at our apt for a few days, and then the four of us are going to drive down to a timeshare in SC for a week before they drive us back up to our apartment in NYC. I was grateful for the invitation his parents made, but I had also planned a trip to Puerto Rico as his grad present since my mom has a house down there she said we could stay at (we will have the house to ourselves). Our intimacy has suffered a lot since he's been focusing on his studies, and I was really looking forward to going to the beach, exploring, spending time together, etc. It's tough for him to take lots of vacation time, so I figured it would be nice to split our time evenly(ish) on this trip. I told him we could spend nine days with his family, and then fly to PR and spend four days just him and me.

Now it turns out his brother, SIL, and 2.5yo nephew are also coming on the trip. I told him I understood because his family is very important to him, but I didn't want to take my first vacation in a year with a whole family and a child. Also, the last time we were all together (brother, child and SIL included) was Thanksgiving, and my bf kind of just tucked away by himself and read, napped, etc and left me alone with his family because he says he was ""decompressing"" and because he thinks I can hold my own (which I can). But he didn't really hang out with anybody, or me for that matter, until dinner time. It felt like I was left alone at someone else's house, with someone else's family, while my bf got to chill and do his own thing; we didn't play board games, or spend very much time together that entire week. I also didn't have time for myself, because everywhere I went the little boy followed me to play, and then the mom followed the little boy, and then grandma followed... That didn't feel very fair to me, and I don't want to do that again. I don't have anything against any of these people, I just want to be able to have a vacation and not a family trip.

Last night, when I asked again about what he wanted to do (I need to coordinate with my mom about keys and some stuff before she goes out of the country until November), he got kind of quiet and avoided the convo. All he said was he wanted to spend time with his brother. I told him I understood, but I didn't want my first vacation in a year to be dictated by his whole family, and if he didn't want to go to PR that was okay but I wasn't going to come down with them to SC. That way, I don't have to take time off work, and I can spend some me-time in NYC. I'm not trying to cause problems or make him ""choose,"" I am trying to establish a boundary of how I want to spend my free time with my partner. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying I don't want my aunt in my car? ," A bit of backstory, my (f21) aunt (fLate40s) has done a LOT of awful things. My family always excused it because she had a bad childhood. She has no relationship with her kids as she didn't even raise them for the majority of their lives. When I was 17-18 she would take me out to eat to 'spend time with her niece' but every time she would dump all of her problems on me. She was a bad influence and tried to get me try smoking stuff behind my parents back as soon as I was 18 (I said no). She had my sister (F16) try a sip of her drink without asking my parents.
 My uncle (not blood related, uncle through love) and her used to date. Those times she took me out to eat was with his money as he is decently wealthy and she used that a lot. Their relationship was very off and on again (by her choice). He always took her back no matter what. We told him many times that she was using him but he didn't listen as he loved her. 
 There was a time where he asked her to marry him and she said no because she was seeing a married man. That man left his his wife and kid to marry her and they divorced a month later. My uncle still took her back.
 A few months ago, about Januany or Febuary, she had come to visit and my uncle was with her. She rode to Sunday night church in my car with me and my sister since my parents car was full. At the time I still had a decent relationship with her but we weren't close. On the drive back home she told me and my sister that she was planning to leave my uncle in March as she didn't love him. When we got home there was a moment she sat on his lap for a minute and kissed him before walking off. I was pissed but she asked me not to tell him. I was being forced to choose him or her and didn't know what to do. I wish I had told him.
 She was living in my uncle's home and he caught her using some harder stuff again. He kicked her out but she refused to leave. It took at least a week to get her to leave and she stole his tvs.
 A month ago it came out that my adult male cousin (her son) was doing bad things to my 7 year old female cousin. She defended him and and helped him run from the cops since she believed that he didn't do it. As soon as I was told this I went no contact with her.
 A few days ago she called my dad (she has used my parents many times but my dad is a pushover) and I heard him say something about a car. My parents were borrowing my car while theirs were in the shop. I told my mom I don't want her in my car. She claimed that I was being spiteful because I was mad but I don't think so.
 My mom hates that I cut people off now (I'm learning to set boundaries) and always says that I'm spiteful for it. I don't think I'm in the wrong for not wanting her in my car but AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom I can’t listen to stories of her partner’s abuse?,"My mother, aged 51, has been trying to get out of an abusive relationship for the last year. I am proud of the progress she has made and she is currently in the final steps of breaking ties with her partner. That being said, this has been a hell of a year. My mother has, at times, been homeless. She has lived with myself and my sister for periods of time, and we have supported her financially. Generally, she has deeply struggled with coping with what has happened to her. Luckily, she has been able to start seeing a therapist, which I think has helped her a lot in making the decision to finally leave her partner.

For more context about my mom, she was severely abused as a child, had both me and my sister at a young age, has struggled with prescription pain med use, and has been a more chaotic than stable presence in our lives. She can be incredibly melodramatic; she often seeks attention through her struggles/illnesses and has been known to lie about them. She is the perfect example of the phrase ‘misery loves company’. (To be clear, I know she is not being dramatic or lying about the abuse.)

After a childhood of being my mother’s emotional rock/support system, our emotions have become very entwined. Basically, I spent my childhood worrying about her constantly, and I can’t stop as an adult. There is no one that can make me more anxious or neurotic than her. Speaking with her, especially when she is having a breakdown, is incredibly emotionally draining. She has always had trouble controlling her emotions. She is incredibly reactive and can mostly only think in black and white. She also is a person who will wallow in her suffering. I often have panic attacks after speaking with her and have had to seek therapy to help with our relationship.

Yesterday, my mom called me and told me about a recent altercation that had occurred between her and her partner. I let her talk for ~35 min about very explicit descriptions of abuse, her self-hate, and other very fatalistic topics. Finally, I felt like I couldn’t breathe and told her that I can’t listen to this stuff anymore. Of course, she took this very poorly and told me I don’t care about her. The thing is that I deeply care about her, but I can’t handle being her child and therapist, especially for such intense issues. I don’t know how to tell her that I’m here for her but I can’t handle everything she throws my way.

Am I the asshole, or in this case, just a bad son for setting a boundary in this scenario?",AmItheAsshole
 if i ask my sister about her past relationship? ,"she dated this kid she went to high school with a few years ago. i’m now working with him. i don’t know how their relationship panned out, she was always super private about that stuff, and i didn’t even know they dated until they were already broken up for about 6 months. but during the timeframe that i suspected they were dating, she was the most depressed id ever seen her. 

he seems nice, but i know everyone does at first. that’s how they get you. my sister is one of the smartest people i know and i really look up to her and trust her judgement, but i would like to know what really happened in their relationship and decide myself how close im comfortable being with him, because he seems to want to get close to me. 

he’s invited me out multiple times and i’ve always declined as politely as i could, and id never do that to my sister anyways, but would i be wrong for wanting to ask what happened with him that had her so depressed? 

she’s in a happy relationship now. id hate to put her in a bad headspace over something that honestly isn’t that important. ",AmItheAsshole
 for giving an animal away after promising it to someone else?,"I'm going to be a bit vague on some details that might give my identity away. I raise reptiles and amphibians and sell them, but quite often I also do dealings with zoos. I've sent my animals to zoos all over the United States.   


I ended up with a pretty rare animal a few months ago. An acquaintance that I'd had a few good conversations with over the last few years messaged me and told me that they wanted the animal for their private collection. I told them I'd let them know if I planned on selling, but I wasn't sure. Ultimately though, I did tell them that if I was going to sell her, I'd let them know before anyone else. At some point we corresponded again and I told them I was ready to sell. I didn't get a response back from them. (Or so I thought)  


Turns out, I missed the message completely and thought they ghosted me. I didn't reach out again. I didn't want to be pushy.   


I waited a few months for a response (not knowing I had one in my inbox) and then got an offer with a very big zoo that wanted the animal. I drove her out and delivered her, only to get home and realize a few weeks later that...whoops, I had actually been the one to ghost the acquaintance.    


I reached out, apologized, and offered them their choice of ANY of my other animals that I had for sale. I also told them that I would be getting a few more animals very similar to the one they'd wanted. For a while, they continued to talk to me as if they weren't too upset.   


Then one day, I was talking to them about some animals that I was breeding...and they blew up. They told me that they were very upset that I had given ""their"" animal away after promising it to them. I tried apologizing again, but they told me that I should never ask them for anything, ever. I should never speak to them again. And then they blocked me on all social media.   


It's left me wondering if I'm the asshole. It was a mistake and it was definitely my fault for not reaching out again after I thought I was ghosted. But does that make me the asshole or just an idiot?   


Am I the asshole for giving away the animal to a zoo instead of the person I originally promised it to? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom her parenting suggestion was messed up and outdated?,"I (30f) had a phone call with my mother (71f) yesterday to catch up. Since she's much more actively social than I am, talking to her is usually a good way to get updated on the family as a whole.

While talking about my youngest niece Lana (fake name, about 18 months), mom mentioned that Lana had been biting her teachers at daycare. She then went into detail about the technique to stop biting she had learned in her child psychology class in college: take an all fabric doll and have the child bite the doll over and over until their jaw starts to hurt and they can't bite anymore. When they cry, explain in plain language that this is what will happen every time they bite someone.

I was pretty horrified. I said to her that it seemed like an awful way to make a kid stop biting people. She insisted that it works and that it had been used in the daycare her college ran (apparently, anyone in child development classes was required to put in hours working there). I came back at her that I while I don't doubt her observations, she took this class in the early 70s when they barely had ethical standards for psychological research, and this sounded like the kind of thing that would ""create the next Ted Bundy.""

She was very upset with me and said I didn't know what I was talking about. She said the professor of that class was an expert, while I don't even have children. I apologized for being snarky and for upsetting her. We switched to other topics, but I could tell she was still angry and felt insulted.

In hindsight, I'm starting to feel badly about my reaction. Maybe I should have left it alone or not defaulted to sarcasm, but I stand by my belief that it doesn't sound like a physically or emotionally healthy way to teach Lana (or any child) not to bite. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to give my son his birth photos?,"I tried to give my son his birth photos and now he’s upset at me / won’t talk to me. 

Context: I (64F) have one child (31M) who I admit we spoiled…. We gave him everything- food, birthdays, paid for every activity and vacation. On paper, he’s a perfect son: did well in school, never got into trouble, visits often, sends flowers on my birthday / Mother’s Day. He even pays for a lot now that he’s working.

Still, he’s always acted extremely ungrateful considering all we’ve done for him. I can tell he keeps me at a distance- calls maybe once a week at most, doesn’t share very much about his life when he does. When he visits, he’ll do things like demand I turn down the TV if he’s doing something for work / studying not realizing this OUR place not his. Last year, my husband and I took him and his GF to a cabin for the weekend and, even though I paid for everything, he asked if he could take the larger room. The reason was he has a severe cat allergy (asthma) and that was the only room not covered in cat hair. Sure it made logical sense but it still seemed extremely rude since I paid for the whole trip.

Story: so he visited again for a week on his vacation which was nice but things soon started going south. For starters, he slept in EVERY morning. He preferred to sleep than spend that extra time with us. Great. He’s a medical resident and so I get he works a lot of hours but it still seemed very selfish. The second to last day he was here, my husband tried to wake him up around 6-7am to see if he would go with him to see his new workplace. My son basically just said no and went back to sleep. I was furious. He can’t even do this one thing for his dad who is proud of his new job? 

When he finally got up around 9am, I was very upset. He asked me why I was so angry and I told him. He got extremely defensive saying that he could just try to visit later in the day and he didn’t see what the big deal was. He just didn’t get it. It wasn’t the timing, it was that he didn’t seem to care enough to sacrifice his “precious sleep” to show his dad he cares. 

I got so angry that I went upstairs and got all his birth photos together and gave them to him in a plastic bag saying that I don’t want a son who is so ungrateful and can’t do the bare minimum for us. I kid you not, he basically laughed in my face and refused to take them saying I was overreacting. I was furious. I could tell he was also upset and he just said he couldn’t believe what I did (hello what about what YOU did?) and didn’t talk to me for the rest of the visit. He’s never behaved this rudely or talked back like this before. 

It’s been a month now and he’s still barely responding. I get that I maybe lost my temper but in my defense (1) they’re photos of him, (2) he hasn’t really shown us he appreciates us, and (3) it’s not like I was angry out of nowhere. My husband agrees with me. But my son still maintains what I did was wrong. AITA?

—
Edit: I am VERY surprised by the responses so far. Trust me there are far more examples of how he’s been ungrateful and disrespectful in the past but I won’t bother since it seems like I’ve been judged. 

—
Edit: I want to clarify a few things based on the comments. (1) I was NOT saying I deserve a medal for FEEDING my child. My point was he has never wanted for anything and I have objectively been a good mother. This generation is sad because few of you appreciate that this isn’t always the case. (2) I am VERY proud of my son. Obviously he deserves to rest. I wrote this while angry and I see how my post came off as uncaring. But TO BE CLEAR: I DO NOT MIND he sleeps in. However, waking him up ONCE for something important is NOT abusive. If that’s what you think, I’m sorry but you have no idea what abuse is. (3) There’s a part of the story I should’ve shared at the beginning. This started two years ago. He was on vacation again and we were visiting my mother who I had spent all day taking care of. FINALLY at around 1am I had a chance to do some sewing with my portable sewing machine. Not even time for myself, I was fixing something for the house. He comes out and demands that I put it away because it was waking him up. This is after he spent the ENTIRE DAY lounging and only helped with dinner. Not only that but after I calmly said no, he insisted I take the sewing machine somewhere else. Except unfortunately that area was the only one with lighting that worked for me. He just couldn’t let it go. He got incredibly angry and told me I was being unreasonable. He was a bully and I’ll never forget that. Maybe I overreacted in telling him I was disowning him this time. Fine. But this has context and like I said this was NOT the first time he has bullied me into getting his way. 

Fine. I was an a**hole this time. I will take your advice and apologize for overreacting but I still think the MAJORITY of you did not understand the situation. ",AmItheAsshole
 for struggling to interact normally with my niece and nephew,"I'm 25 F and diagnosed with autism (aspergers). My niece and nephew are 1 and 4 years old. I struggle to interact with them, I just freeze up and can't really say anything. I'm generally like this with everyone, people have to initiate conversation with me first for me to respond and in these situations I can mask okay, but not for long periods of time. As kids generally need you to approach them first I've really struggled with this. I've never interacted with kids before, my sisters kids are the first. I'm incredibly socially isolated, rarely leaving the house.

  
It's my nephews birthday and when my mom asked if I want to go to the party I said yes but I don't want to spend several hours there as I get exhausted from intense social situations (my mom always stays all day and more when visiting them). My mom has just spent the last hour shouting at me for being selfish and horrible. She revealed to me that she thinks my behaviour is disgusting and that she thinks I don't have autism and i'm just using it as an excuse. I realise that what I do looks incredibly rude but I really do just freeze and stare blankly. I wish I wasn't like this. After this conversation I do feel like TA. 

  
For context I spent 1 year in hospital at age 11 and was diagnosed with autism in there. I also dropped out of school due to being unable to be in the classroom as I was overwhelmed with anxiety. I tried to go to college on 4 seperate occasions but was kicked out due to lack of attendance. I did distance university incredibly successfully however. I'm unemployed now. I did one job and struggled with face to face meetings, it was exhausting and I did freeze up at times.

  
My mom uses the fact that I am intelligent and have a long-distance boyfriend to argue that I am actually normal and just being selective about who I like to spend time with. Basically that I use autism as an excuse. My boyfriend is someone that always contacts me first and leads me nearly all the time. I do sometimes struggle with him and he has negatively commented on my passivity before. 

  
My mom says that I hate my niece and nephew but I really don't, I just don't know how to interact with them. I can't help but feel I am TA and I should try harder or something, but when the time comes I freeze up. I'm worried what my sister and her husband think about this too as my mom said they must be so heartbroken about how I treat their babies. AITA?

  
In a nutshell: I have autism but I appear as a normal person. I have difficulty interacting with my niece and nephew and end up blanking them out.",AmItheAsshole
 if I refused to clear my mom's debt leaving her and my siblings homeless?,"My mother got herself into an MLM scheme last year despite my brother and I warning her against it. She quit her job because the MLM scheme people told her this was her chance to become an entrepreneur and independent. My dad is supporting her financially now and my four younger siblings, she pretty much gave up on the oils after selling them to everyone she knows. She still has a lot more left to sell but now she wants to do something else because she doesn't feel like she's her own boss under this MLM company.  
  
She overestimated how many people want to buy her product and now she's thousands in debt. She won't get a job and my dad can't afford to pay it off without selling the house and his car. My brother has 3 kids in private school, he doesn't have much money to spare. I'm on maternity leave and the amount she needs will wipe out my savings and I'd have to use my husband's money as well to cover this debt which I don't think is fair.  
  
Especially since she doesn't want to get a job after this debt is cleared because she's ""an entrepreneur at heart"" and ""working for someone's company is soul crushing"". She wants to open a food truck even though they aren't popular in the town she lives in and always go out of business. My mom isn't a bad cook but she's competing with professional chefs and I'm sure she'll give up as soon as it gets hard.  
  
My dad says he plans to sell the house and his car and move his tenants out of the apartment he owns. My mom called me crying because she loves her neighbourhood and has lived here for 35 years, she says I'm selfish and evil for not paying her debt because she'll pay me back when she expands her food truck business...She doesn't understand why I don't just use my husband's money ""since he won't notice it's gone"". My mom has threatened not to allow me to see my younger siblings who I’m close with and to have me exiled by our entire family. WIBTA if I refused to clear this debt even though I could because my mom’s threatening me?",AmItheAsshole
 for not reaching out enough?,"okay so let's give an introduction I'll call myself Em (female 18) and the other people we will call D (male 17),  E (female 16) and N ( female 16). 
so ill start from the beginning, this all started about a year ago. I met N and E last year, we became friends then got even closer throughout a span of 3 months. In late November, E and D started talking which is when I had already been talking to this guy who we will call T (male 20) for 2-3 weeks. Anyways they became official a couple weeks later after T and I had been started dating.
It then became my birthday week, which was good for the most part excluding the fact that most of my friends were grounded and couldn't go to my birthday party that Saturday (day right after my birthday). E had to go to all her classes that week in order to go to my party, but decided to miss 2 classes in order to go have sex with her boyfriend D, she told one of our friends about it. The following day after my birthday two of my friends came over N who I already mentioned and C (female 16). C told me how she had talked to E the day prior and how she ditched her last classes to go with D. When i asked E if she would make it to the party she said she has to do chores and random requests her parents asked of her, an hour later I called and asked if she would be making it, she said she couldn't. 
Still haven't told her I know because unlike her I don't go and talk shit about friends. Anyways there's been a couple incidents that have been really bugging me, and idk how to handle them.
1 st incident was she got caught with my feen, her mom took it whatever couple hours later E decides to steal it from her mom's safe, as well as her feen. Early in the morning E's mom came in found E's feen but not mine. A couple days later I ask her mom if she found my feen (never did, I asked her mom a month later when I went over next the same thing she said, ""go ask your little friend where she put it."" which my gut didn't like.
2nd incident the same week I went over I had been asking E for a shirt of mine back that I had been given my bestfrined who lives hours away and got it for me years ago, she ended up handing me a whole different shirt then tried to lie and say it's the same one. I didn't back down, so I kept asking where tf is my shirt? she ended up saying this girl who she knows I don't like or talk to (we'll call K (female 16)) had taken the shirt out of E's backpack. when we left C had said that she saw E hand K the shirt and how she is lying to my face about how K took it without E's permission. 3rd incident a couple days ago which its been a month since I saw E, I texted her and asked how she's been doing whatever she sent her ""feel bad for me and my life"" message. I let her know she's always able to come over even with all her lies, and shit talking. she said her mom wouldn't let her go anywhere especially mine, I asked why that is and she replied with, ""Idk she said that she doesn't want me hanging out with you.""",AmItheAsshole
 for thinking I don't need to pay for gas when my friend is visiting me?,"My friend from another state in the country visited my husband and I recently. She stayed at our place for 4 days. She hired a car to get around (we don't have one). My husband and I took days off from work to spend time with her. She wanted to do some sightseeing in the neighboring cities. We drove about 700 miles in those 4 days. And she divided the gas bill between the 3 of us. So my husband and I paid 2/3rds of the cost while she paid 1/3rds. Mind you, my husband and I have already visited these places before, and we only accompanied her to give her company. Also, we didn't ask her to pitch in for accomodation and home cooked meals. We spilt bills at restaurants, and the only thing she paid for entirely were her flight tickets (2hr flight), and the car rental 400$. 
Btw, we already paid her what she asked us to pay, but I'm just wondering if me feeling slightly taken advantage of is called for.",AmItheAsshole
 if I ( m25 ) come clean and tell my girlfriend ( f21 ) that her parents hate me?,"
I’ve been with my girlfriend, I’ll call her Sally, for around 6 months and things have been going great. She’s extremely sweet and gentle, absolutely adorable and just the most though and caring person I have ever met. When we first started getting to know each other, I found out that she was quite innocent, in the sense that she doesn’t understand most innuendos and has a hard time getting those kinds of jokes. She also dosen’t smoke, drink, have tattoos. She has never gone to a bar or a party, and has never gotten in trouble in school or anywhere. At first I thought nothing much of it but I did find it interesting that she liked me in the first place, considering that I drink, have a few piercings and tattoos, just the opposite of her really.

Everything had been going great until I met her parents a few weeks ago , Sally asked me if I wanted to meet them and I agreed. I was excited to meet them because I figured that if my girlfriend was such a sweet person then her parents must be like that too since they raised her after, well I was wrong because her parents are nothing like her, at least not when she isn’t looking. When I first met them they were really nice to me and were asking me a few questions about myself, but they switched up immediately after dinner when they asked me if I could talk with them in private. They werent so nice anymore and told me straight to my face that they didn’t like me and wanted me to leave their daughter alone, I was so confused and when I asked them, they said I wasn’t a good influence judging from my appearance, like I said before I have a few tattoos and piercings, but it’s only a few ear piercings on both ears, one tattoo around my neck, one on my right arm , and one on my shoulder but they couldn’t see that one. 

I told them that I treat their daughter well and that what I did with my body was for myself and had nothing to do with my influence on their daughter, but they just interrogated me with a bunch of questions like a rice purity test and it was so overwhelming. They spent a few minutes just berating me on my life choices and that they want me to stay away from my girlfriend. I told them I wasn’t going to do that and asked if there was something I could at least do to prove to them that I had no I’ll intentions but they just kept berating me. After awhile it got awkward and all three of us just got quiet, and I kid you not, her parents go back inside to where my girlfriend was waiting and start acting sweet again. I just stayed quiet throughout the rest of the night because it felt so awkward, Sally noticed and she asked me if I was alright and got really worried, but i just told her I was tired. 

Now I can’t stop debating whether or not I should tell Sally about what her parents said to me, I feel terrible keeping this from her and a part of me wants to tell her, but another part of me thinks it’s best to stay quiet and keep the peace and just try to make her parents like me over time. ",AmItheAsshole
 Friend or client?,"I connected with a new friend last year through social media, they seemed to have the same interests and eventually I had met them in person too. Seemed like a very nice individual, but they were also trying to sell me some kind of expensive vacuum cleaner and I had told them I'll consider it as this thing runs for about 3000. I told them no thank you in the end and they became annoyed with me and told me to be upfront next time concerning this. Anyway, long story short they sent me a text message last week asking me how I am and so on and so forth. I genuinely thought that this person was trying to reconnect with me and that whole vacuum business was left behind although, later in the week they asked me if I was still interested in the vacuum cleaner. I declined politely and told them that I couldn't afford it to which they replied that the weekly payments are still quite affordable. Am I wrong to think that this person never valued me as a friend and also what the fuck?",AmItheAsshole
 if I take my daughter off the team,"My daughter is 10. This is her 3rd year playing softball. She is a great player and works her butt off. She plays any position asked, even though she has her preferences. 

Our community has an underwhelming little league softball following. So our 9u, 10u and 12u girls (ages 9-13) are playing on a team together. The coach is a local middle school teacher who asst coaches the softball team. I help assist, along with 2 other parents. 

His daughter is the pitcher. My daughter is taking pitching lessons and when I mentioned she wanting to try pitching he said “there’s no way she’ll be ready to pitch this season. It took my daughter a full two seasons before she got on the mound”. We felt this was a little unfair because lots of rec teams have new pitchers, no one is expecting perfection. (And his daughter is frequently walking players). Today he told another girl who hasn’t been pitching she could try it if it’s ok with her dad (dad is coach’s friend)

So we shrugged it off. 

He asked my daughter to play catcher. She got into it and looked forward to it.  So she was catcher for all the practices up to the first game.  First game comes and he tells the team that a girl who hasn’t even been going to practice (but is a middle schooler and his daughter’s friend) .. will be the catcher. Never lets my daughter touch the gear again. 

Again. My daughter took it and kept her chin up and didn’t complain. 

Today at practice, we both didn’t feel well. In retrospect, we should have just stayed home… but the coach insisted everyone show up because it’s our last practice before 3 upcoming games. My daughter (just turned 10) struggled with her batting today and the catcher (age 13) told her “how many fouls balls are you going to hit”. My daughter was already feeling embarrassed by her performance, in addition to us dealing with our sinus gunk, and got really upset with this. 

I approached the coach and told him they didn’t need to be shit-talking. And he replies, “it’s not shit talking. It’s a question”. To which I replied “it sure felt like shit talking”. And he said “it’s not”. I told him we weren’t feeling well and we were going home, I turned around and my daughter thanked me. And we left without another word. 

My daughter doesn’t want to play for the team anymore. She feels like the older girls/middle schoolers are being favorited… and I can’t really disagree with her. 

She’s also playing for a travel team where she feels appreciated and heard. She’s feeling like the older girls get preference. 

AITA for taking her off the rec team after this? Normally we would tough it out and use it as an experience to prove ourselves. (She is one of 4 girls on the team with actual experience). It will definitely hurt the field performance of the team and reduce the player number, which they’re already struggling to fill. 
My kid feels undervalued and struggling to find joy in it anymore. 

ETA: thank you all so much for the comments. I obviously want to protect my kid and make sure she knows her worth.. but hate our decision will disadvantage the good parts of the team. She and I have been talking a lot about it tonight I’m going to support her 100% if she decides to quit. I’m letting her take the lead and make the decision.. and we will leave our guilt of the things we cannot control behind us. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not giving my relatives back home a dime after staying over at their house for two weeks? ,"Last month, I went to my home country to visit family and just travel and reminisce about my early childhood. I stayed over at my relatives' house for about two weeks and spent the next two weeks traveling around the country.

Now, I come from an Asian country where blue-collar workers are not respected well, to the point where you’re looked down upon if you do work such jobs. I’m a blue-collar worker myself in the US, I work as a heavy equipment technician for my city’s transit agency. I thought they knew that was my job because they always talk to my parents via phone, but turns out they didn’t. One of my aunts asks what I do for a living, I told her I work as a heavy equipment technician and she giggles for a while. Until she realized I wasn’t joking and said “oh ok”. Later on all of them asked why I decided to be a manual laborer and not go to college/university. And how I’ve wasted my opportunities in the US to work a “filthy low wage job”. They actually had an intervention style shit because I dared choose a career in the trades.

Just a reminder, most of them are unemployed and rely on my remittance to live a comfortable life. I was absolutely stunned to even react negatively, and I packed my bags the next day and just booked a nice hotel until my flight. It’s usually customary for a family member who lives in 1st world country to leave extra cash gifts worth about $5k-10k for his/her family who’s left behind. I had the cash with me ($15k). But I told them via note that, I didn’t want to insult them by thinking they need money from a coolie (that’s what they called me). My parents kept calling/texting me via messenger to reconcile because we’re a family blah blah. But I just told them I’m done with these “family” members",AmItheAsshole
: My girlfriend talks about her dead sister too much,"My gf (30f) talks to me (28m) about her dead sister too much. (For the sake of story following I will just refer to the dead sister as Kim). My gf is a great woman and treats me wonderfully, but she has the tendency to relate every convo back to Kim if there’s even the slightest connection she can make to her and it’s kind of draining. 

Some background- her half-sister (Kim) died over 3 years ago in a tragic manner. My gf went through a lot of grieving (naturally) and moved away from her hometown 2 years ago to develop her own life, but she’s still close with her parents and biological brother who are still alive.

My gf and I started dating 6 months ago and I remember on our second date she brought up the story of how Kim passed. I was glad my gf felt comfortable enough to confide that in me but over the course of our relationship I noticed she brings Kim up in almost every conversation we have. We could be talking about a shirt, or going to the gym, or something random and she will regale me with how it relates to Kim and how it’s so meaningful to her, or how it brings up certain emotions related to Kim. I always respond with “that makes me happy that you had that with her” or “I know that’s tough, you are really strong for going through that”. But lately it’s been kind of getting on my nerves and I want to gently express that. I feel bad for feeling that way because at the end of the day I can’t relate or imagine what she’s gone through. But it always just makes our conversations so awkward for me and turns a lighthearted vibe into a serious one. So WIBTA for telling my gf it makes me uncomfortable she constantly brings up her dead sister?

It’s just always awkward when you’re having a conversation with someone and they bring up a tragedy like that but it’s everyday for me. I know something as tragic as that can take a long time to heal from but it’s been a long time. It’s like she’s looking for things to connect to Kim just for the sake of talking about it. It kind of feels like it’s my girlfriends entire personality and it’s turning me off to her. what are your thoughts? WIBTA?? ",AmItheAsshole
 for considering to stop being nice to my bf?,"Me F(29) and my boyfriend M(32) have been dating long distance for 5 months , in the beginning of the relationship, he would write me long paragraphs telling me how much he liked me , bought me gifts, flowers and overall was all over me and he was really sweet to me
So I fell in love with him and proceeded to do the same thing. I would buy him gifts (because that’s my love language as well), when he would tell me he had a bad day I would even order him food from his favorite restaurant and so on .
But I would get nothing in return and I know that isn’t exactly right because I shouldn’t be expecting anything in return because I did out of free will . But I can’t help but wonder.
He came to visit me a few days ago ( we are from the same hometown) and I will give him my car so he wouldn’t have to Uber everywhere to do some work related stuff , I even paid for some of our meals and before he left he told me that I was the best girl ever and he had absolutely no complaints about me and how nice and perfect I was .
The day he left he told I was going to get something delivered to me next day and it never happened.
something doesn’t feel right, I feel like he may be taking me for granted because he knows I love him, I don’t feel him being as nice or romantic or cute as he was in the beginning.
Maybe im overthinking, but it occurs to me that if I pull back maybe he will step up. 
is there such a thing as too nice?AITA for expecting more ?

Btw English is not my first language",AmItheAsshole
 for my dog pooping even though I picked up after him?,"I was dog sitting the other day for my family that was out of town (I grew up with that dog though before I moved out, so I've walked him plenty of times before). He's a medium sized dog, and I was talking him for a walk around the block. My family lives in a typical suburban residential neighborhood, plenty of other dogs getting walked too.


He of course likes to sniff everything, trees, random spots in the lawn, light posts. Like dogs do, so stopping and sniffing is not 100% a ""I need to poop"" sign, but down the street, as he was doing that, he squatted to poop while he was on someone's lawn. To be specific, this wasn't in the middle of the main part of the lawn or anything like that. This was in the smaller grassy area between the sidewalk and the street (not sure of the specific word for that), and pretty close to the sidewalk. As I took a bag out of my pocket to pick it up, a guy who was standing behind me in the driveway, that I didn't notice and I've never even talked to before, started complaining.


I don't remember the specific words said, but he more or less said ""Come on, don't do that here, get out here"". It was not in a very polite way. I replied that I am picking it up, but he didn't accept that. ""Well I play ball with my son, don't do that"". And I said again, but I'm picking it up. ""Where do you live? Down the street? Well, then they do it there"". I more or less said, I'm taking him for a walk, and he had to go, I can't help that, what am I supposed to do? (I didn't say this to the guy, but FWIW he did already poop before- he went a second time just then, and that's pretty typical, he often goes multiple times). At this point I had picked it up and I just walked away, crossing the street as he went inside.


Now, if I didn't pick it up? 100% I would be the AH.  But, I did pick up, and I think that guy was going too far with that reaction to me. It's not like I specifically took the dog down the street to poop on that grass, and he could've talked to me more polite about it if he had an issue anyways, since he saw *I* do pick up after my dog. I can understand not being happy about it, there's some stray cats in the area that go wherever and I have seen random poo piles before on lawns, but, that's still not me doing that. (And another guy across the street who must of seen what went on asked if that guy complained to me, and when I said yes, he called him a AH).  I told my family to avoid the dog going at that specific house in the future. But, am I still the AH because my dog pooped there in the first place?",AmItheAsshole
 if I forced the issue on spouse de-cluttering sentimental items?,"Hey all,

Coming here to vent, but also curious to hear people's thoughts, especially if you've dealt with something similar. My spouse and mother in law have a bunch of containers of things of sentimental value. At our previous house we kept most of these things in our (wonderfully oversized) garage, when we moved we wound up putting these things into a storage unit, and when the storage unit jacked up the rates on us I pressed for getting out of the unit, which we did. The good of it is we stopped paying the expensive monthly fees on the unit, the bad of it is now a small room of our house is essentially a storage unit and is now otherwise useless. It has also begun accumulating other clutter in addition to the contents of the storage unit. 

My spouse and MIL have indicated their intent to go through these things and greatly consolidate them but have not followed through on it. I have also made it more than clear that I would help them go through these things when they decide to, or if they would like to do so privately I would plan something for our children and myself that would get us out of the house and give them the whole day. Relevant info - MIL lives out of state, and while she does visit frequently this always winds up getting pushed off to the next visit. If it was just a hodge-podge of random things, I would have no problem reminding them that they need to go through that stuff and make decisions on it. If that were the case, I'd offer to do the work myself. 

Here is what makes the situation delicate: The containers are mostly (80%) items related to my spouse's two siblings, who tragically passed away in separate incidents a few years ago. I have always held firm that it is not my place to tell them what they should or should not do with those things, nor is it my place to decide when enough time has passed for them to deal with those items, but we are a growing family and will need that room in usable shape relatively soon. Our house is not large, but absolutely does have the space to meet our needs as a family. When we purchased the house we had a specific vision for that room and it wasn't ""storage unit."" 

Lastly, our garage is already over-capacity and is not an option for these containers, and even if it were my spouse does not wish to keep them in the garage where there isn't any climate control. 

We plan on having another child relatively soon (house purchased with that in-mind), and I have a bad gut feeling that if we don't address those items before we get pregnant again then that room will remain useless indefinitely.

So Reddit, WITBA if I really forced the issue and tried to get them to commit to a timeline to go through these items and consolidate them as they said they would do?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to give my mom a supplementary credit card?,"I (25F) am just starting to build my savings and credit score. I'm fortunate to have multiple credit cards with limits double/triple my annual income. I never max out my cards and ensure I completely pay off my monthly bills to avoid interest charges.

My mom (57F) is unemployed and earns income from a property rental she owns. She's been asking me for years to give her a supplementary credit card under one of my accounts. I'm 50/50 about this because I think she has poor spending habits. My aunt gave her a supplementary card a few years ago (still active) which she continues to use yet never been able to pay it off fully. 

I let her use two of my cards - one for an installment for a treadmill she doesn't even use and the other for groceries. She never pays in full, complains whenever I ask for payment, and claims she doesn't even spend that much. 

A new card with good perks just got delivered to me today. She wants to use the card for herself and demands I give her the supplementary. I'm afraid she might overspend and the debt will be under my name.

AITA for dismissing her whenever she asks for the supplementary card?

Also!! I am Asian so family respect is a big thing and I live with my mom (dad owned the house, I am one of the heirs to the property) so she shames me for being ""selfish"" 

",AmItheAsshole
 for making my daughter shower in PE?,"Throwaway account for personal reasons.

I (F45) have a 14-year-old daughter, who I'll call Mikaela. Mikaela has barely hit puberty and is less developed than the majority of her peers, which I believe is something she is self-conscious about.

Last week, my husband and I received an email from Mikaela's school saying that because it was approaching the summer, it would now be mandatory for all students to shower after PE. I understand the logic; Mikaela does PE before lunch and if she doesn't shower, she'll be sweaty for the rest of the day, which I don't believe is hygienic. The school requested that we pack a towel and any shower gel for the next PE lessons to ensure the students were ready.

When I mentioned this to Mikaela, she said she would refuse to shower. Since the showers are communal, she told me she did not want to be naked in front of everyone else and would just get dressed. I told her she couldn't do this as the school were enforcing it, plus I felt it was healthy for her to shower. Again, she asked me to email the school to say she wouldn't be participating, but I refused to do so.

On Friday, despite many protests, I managed to make Mikaela go to school with her towel/shower stuff packed. I felt like I was doing the right thing. However, when Mikaela got home, she'd been crying all day saying how she'd had to get naked in front of everyone to shower and she'd never been so embarrassed because she saw one or two of the girls laughing at her. I told her how sorry I was and that teenage girls are horrible and that she's beautiful, but for hygiene reasons, she still has to shower. I suggested bringing in a swimming costume to wear to shower in, but she said that would bring even more attention to her. She begged me to email to school to not let her shower, but I said I had no good reason to, and I'm sure all of the other girls feel the same.

She told me she hated me and has barely spoken to me the rest of this weekend. My husband feels I should send an email as it doesn't hurt and Mikaela is clearly bothered, but I don't think it's a big deal, she will eventually get over it, and it's important for hygiene reasons.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mum to pull my brother out of school?,"I’m hoping you can help my mum (59yrs) and I (32yrs).

My brother (16yrs) has been skipping school. His education has been a massive issue for my mum and it’s causing her a lot of stress. She’ll ask for proof that he’s in school and he sends her a photo of his desk looking down at his laptop but she can’t tell if he’s in class or not. 

It’s a unique situation for my mum, as myself and my other 2 siblings (m27, f29) never had issues with schooling and we grew up respecting our teachers and parents. We’re not against going into a trade or dropping out of school.

He doesn’t take school seriously at all, and he used to go to a local private school where mum was paying $26k a year for him to attend. He failed the last 2 years of school, but because it was a private school, they cared more about taking her money rather than his education.

He’s a pretty arrogant teenager, he thinks he knows more than his teachers and even attempts to ‘correct’ his tests. He definitely got on the wrong side of a few teachers at his old school. He was ‘bullied’ there and asked mum to transfer to the local public school which is in the town centre.

Mum got an email earlier in the year that my brother had been skipping school and she confronted him and he said he’d just been wandering around town instead of going to class. On Friday, mum got another email from the school again that my brother hasn’t been in one of his classes for an entire month. We’re assuming that’s the case for all of his other classes as well.

My brother has no respect for my mother and doesn’t take any notice of her authority. She’s tried everything to punish him without crossing any lines. He’s completely unmotivated to do anything other than play on his computer. His laptop is his entire life, but we can’t take it off him because he needs it for all of his classes which post everything online.

Mums used the money she would have for the private school to pay for tutors for him, she’s given him her credit card to pay for lunches. She hasn’t noticed any purchases on it that aren’t food. She’s spent a lot of money recently on his schooling. For me, it feels like theft or financial abuse.

Last year, the three of us started organising a Euro trip for September, I’ve suggested that my brother not be invited anymore. I don’t want mum to ‘reward’ him for this behaviour.

Mum called me and asked for advice and I told her all of this, it’s not like he’s interested in school anyway. I am wondering though that if he did get a job, would he even turn up? 

My brother is going to go crazy when mum tells him about all of this and because it’s my suggestion, I’ll be the one baring the brunt of the anger. I am wondering if I was too harsh in what I’ve told mum to say to him.

AITA for suggesting that mum take him out of school, disinvite him from our holiday and get a full time job instead and take his laptop off him?",AmItheAsshole
" for refusing to pay for half of my ex-girlfriend’s flight that she can’t use because we broke up, and now possibly not even mine?","My girlfriend (F24) and I (M25) broke up about two weeks ago. It was more her call than mine, but we both knew things weren’t going well for a while. So, I was sad but not surprised. We ended things amicably and said we’d still be friends, whatever that means. 

Anyway, we did the exchange of things in each other’s apartment a couple days after the break up and then didn’t talk again until two days ago when she texted me. We had been planning to go on a trip to the Canary Islands this year. The plane tickets were about $800 a piece and the AirBnb was like $1600, so we decided I’d just pay for the AirBnb and she’d pay for the flights. 

The flights were non-refundable and we’re already past the date that I’d get any meaningful refund from the AirBnb, so I decided I’d just get a friend to split the AirBnb and go anyway. 

I had been planning on telling my ex that I’d pay her for my ticket so she didn’t lose the money, but she texted me about it first. On Friday, she offered to pay me for the AirBnb minus the cost of my plane ticket, because she was still interested in going with a friend. I told her that I was actually planning on going with a friend, and I was going to pay her for my ticket and still go. 

She said OK, but I actually needed to pay her for my ticket and half of the cost of hers because she can’t use it now. Basically, she says that she agreed to buy two plane tickets under the understanding that we would both go to on the trip. And I agreed to pay for an AirBnb under the same understanding. But since that’s not happening, we should evenly share the lost costs. Since I’m still using the room and my ticket, the only lost cost is her $800 ticket. And we should each bear $400 from that. 

I told her that I didn’t think that’s fair at all. First of all, it was her idea to break up. So the reason we aren’t going is on her. Second, there’s no reason why she can’t use her ticket. She should just get an airbnb and still go with her friend. I even said I’d sit in her friend’s seat and let her friend in my seat so they can sit together. Whether or not she uses her ticket is on her, and she bears any cost of that. 

She said she didn’t want to go at the same time as me and also the good AirBnbs are taken for that time. Anyway, we went back and forth and she even threatened to cancel the tickets even though she can’t get any money back. So I said, “You know what, go ahead cancel them, get whatever refund you can. I’ll just buy my own ticket and not pay you back anything.” She said, “I’m not gonna talk to you if you’re being a dick. Let’s talk about this later when you can be mature.” 

That’s where it is right now. My friends are divided. Most say I should at least pay her for my ticket. Which I’m willing to do if she doesn’t cancel it! But some say I should pay for half of hers as well. I’m sticking firm that I won’t pay for half of her ticket, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for insisting my cousin shares the water she ordered with me,"short note i‘m the cousin with the water but she does not have a reddit account and we wanted this settled lmao

Hey guys, last Sunday my cousin (female 23) and me (female 24) were sitting in a café to celebrate a friend's birthday. 

My cousin joined us a bit later but when she arrived the waitress asked us whether we'd like to order anything else so she ordered water and I ordered an espresso. A few minutes later, they brought her a bottle of water (0.25ml) and I received my espresso but it was served with an empty glass. 

Assuming that an espresso is always served with water, I was wondering where my water is but then she just poured the entire bottle of water and proceeded to drink it without sharing it with me at all! When I tried to mention that the bottle might have been meant for the both of us she got entirely defensive and insisted that she ordered the water and that it was solely meant for her. 

As far as I know, an espresso isn't server without water at all so I assumed the water was also meant for me and tried saying it was probably meant for me too but then she said go ask the waitress for another glass of water and shut me off. So am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friend to give me my money back which his brother spend.,"Hello all, i am quite new here so i'm not sure how this works but let's just get into it, it's gonna be quite long and i'm sorry for any formatting issues.

I (19m) live alone, almost a paycheck to paycheck because i quite frankly and stupidly spend it on my car which i like to work on, ofcourse on my free time. My friend Mark (fake name) m20 asked me to help him babysit his younger brother 7m, because he did not want to be alone for almost 6 hours watching him. I said yes and we were talking on the dinner table about what is going on in our lives and his little brother asked if i have any games on my phone. I said yes, he asked if he can play and i gave him my phone to play, i showed him what he can play.

He then downloaded a game i was not aware of this and he did spend over 60 euros on it. I had 95 euros on my account for the rest of the month. When i noticed it the next day, i messaged Mark. Mark said that its not his problem to pay for that kind of things and i should have been more carefull with what i let his brother do. He also said that i was acting like an asshole for asking him to pay like that.

 I am a bit conflicted because his brother is a young kid so he might now have been aware of his doings. So am i the asshole?

Edit/update. I'm not sure how to answer to people in the comments really so i'll just answer on this for most. I took your advice and contacted the google play stores support and the game support. They will not be returning my money as it has been ""over 3 hours of the purchase"". 
I did contact my friend's parents and had a talk with them, they were not really understanding of it at first but did realise the mistake and paid me back the 60 euros. Thank you all for your advice and i have decided based on some info to not continue the friendship with Mark. I appreciate all of the advice. Oh and my phone which i use to pay my bills has my password on ""already selected"". I will not give any child my phone in the future in any of these kind of situation, thank you!",AmItheAsshole
 for asking for space?,"
Soooo okay man. I have just directed my own show along side my best friend, and my partner has helped out through the process as a stage hand. This whole week I have slept at my partners house because models who live out of town have been using my bed, but we are quickly running into an issue of how much of my time I owe them.

(1) Earlier in the week I asked for some time to myself because I have been working/directing/corrrecting/mingling etc etc. with very little sleep, and they were with me all day. So I asked them if I could sleep on the couch. They said “no, take my bed I’ll tuck you in” then proceed to get in the bed and make excuses as to why they should sleep with me and I shouldn’t go out to the couch. 

(2) This morning— the show  was last night, my parents suprised me from out of town, I didn’t get to speak with them after the show due to all of the commotion, so we planned to get breakfast. So after I wake up and cuddle with my boyfriend, I start asking to be off of work and simultaneously do a few routine tasks for my job so that I’m not behind . As this is happening my boyfriend is behind me burning holes through my head watching my phone as I do everything waiting for me to chat but, I can’t because I have to meet my parents in 20 mins on the other side of town, as I do work and change to leave, so all I could do was cuddle with them. 

(3) Now, we have spent the whole afternoon together at the venue so my best friend and I could clean, talk to the venue director about another show, and bond. My boyfriend came and had a good time, he gets along with them both really well. They wanted to sit and cuddle with me in front of the venue director but I said “no” and they were very offended. We all finally part ways and it’s 1 oclock in the morning (a common occurrence trying to put on these shows). 

So when I get home they call me, hurt saying I need to find time to hang out with them one on one, I should have them be more involved with me and my best friend on the back end of the show building process, I should post them on my instagram more….so I basically said this sounds like it’s getting codependent, I have to focus on this new thing in my life and I need space, am I the asshole?…. I’m seeing my therapist Thursday lord jeezus please help til then *hahaha",AmItheAsshole
" for ""inconveniencing"" my uncle by taking my mom away from her post as nana's main caretaker?","So, I (31F) am the older of two. Baby bro decided to go backpacking 4 years ago and is doing fine, but not home. Mom (55F) has issues with her knees, so she no longer works.

Nana (79F) has always been abusive. She isn't actually disabled, but acts like she is, expecting mom to act like a kind of personal slave, does Nana want a tea but her favorite show is playing?, she will get angry if mom doesn't rush to get her said tea, refuses to believe mom is in pain, saying she's just ""too lazy"".

Nana views mom as some sort of secondhand thing just because she never married, and was a single mom. Nana's golden child is uncle Dan (51M), and will always compare him with mom, even though he went LC with her long ago and will just send her $60.00 to ""live on"" (doesn't need it, Nana hoarded a good sum of money when grandpa passed, and is always forcing mom to buy her shit, thus spending her disability and the money I give her).

Now, there is me, I don't cook or do chores, I work at home and take care of the bills, give mom money for her stuff and do my best to spoil her. That's our arrangement. She loves cooking so I buy her whatever she needs for her recipes (delicious food that Nana will find a way to find disgusting), she will bring me coffee or snacks to my desk, will braid my hair daily, and just spoil me rotten.

My fiancee Eric (35M) knows this, at first he was shocked when he saw the amount of attention I get from mom, but slowly started to crave her food, getting used to fresh lemonade when he comes in, and overall being babied, with a smile, because she likes doing so. So when I talked about the situation to him, he suggested we took mom to live with us when we marry next year. To say m was happy is too little, she's excited to move in with us and already planning her daily routine and what she will cook for us. Eric, on his side, has decided he will also give her a similar amount of money as me, in exchange of her care.

The only one unhappy is my uncle, he has been outraged ever since I called him to let him know he has to do something about Nana as she will no longer have my mom to slave away for her, trying to change my mind because ""his wife dislikes nana, and he is not going to ruin his marriage by bringing her to live with him"". On his desperation, he asked me to meet today for breakfast, when I arrived to the place, he started berating me for being ""selfish"" and trying to ""harm his family by imposing them to care for Nana"", he also accused me of ""being lazy and treating my mom like a servant"". I said I am not changing my mind and he left in a huff, now the whole family is blowing my phone, asking how can I be that heartless towards a ""sweet old lady""

Sweet old lady my ass. AITA here?, mom is scared, and I certainly don't think leaving her is a good option",AmItheAsshole
 for asking children to stop soliciting cars to honk for them?,"I'm somewhat sleep deprived, so I defer to Reddit's judgement.

I (37F) live in a residential neighborhood with a fair amount of kids. My house is only 3 down from an elementary school and playground. 

For the last week or so, a small group of children (5-8 kids, my guess on ages is 7-12) have been congregating on the sidewalk corner of the cul-de-sac directly across from my house. While there they encourage every vehicle that passes to honk for them. They do so by yelling ""honk"", making the truck honk gesture, and most recently by holding up signs.

This first happened on a Friday evening and there were 5 kids. The street I live on is the main one in the neighborhood and connects to 2 major roads in town, so it gets a lot of traffic. By my unofficial estimate they were able to get 2/3 to honk. I want to point out that these children are not running a lemonade stand, aren't selling anything, aren't promoting anything, aren't affiliated with any group/cause. They just like getting cars to honk.

The first time, I was annoyed. Mostly because I work swing shifts, including 3rds, so I was trying to sleep when they did it. Also because I have a 1.5 y/o dog that I'm still trying to train (specifically on barking, he's trained on most other things). Not only does he start barking but he also just seems confused and anxious with the frequent honking. While I was annoyed, I had zero thought to say anything or try to stop the kids, as I figured it was a 1 off situation and they were just being kids.

However, since then they have continued this activity. They also scream and shriek at loud volumes, and other children have now joined the original group. The cars have gotten so used to it that they almost always honk, some doing an extended lay on the horn honk. The kids usually start around 4pm on school days and will stay anywhere from 2 hours to until it gets dark which isn't until like 9pm. (It's not constant, they go in for a bit for dinner, and sometimes they get caught up in playing some other game, but 8/10 past days they've been soliciting honks for 1-2 hours at the very least.

I use earplugs when trying to sleep during the day but car horns, especially since they are honking right in front of my house, still come through. I'm missing sleep. My dog has regressed with their anxiety. Part of my job is providing care to people and with how foggy my brain has been due to lack of sleep, I'm worried I may make a mistake that could be harmful to my clients.

I'm working close to 50 hour weeks and averaging 4 hours of sleep a day right now.

WIBTA if I approached the kids and asked them to please stop requesting cars honk for them? I would try to be as polite as possible and explain how/why it's impacting me. I get that this is such an innocent thing for children to do and I feel like a grumpy old lady trying to police their fun, however, it also feels excessive and is seriously messing with my well being and my dog.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband &amp; daughter to rehome our dogs?,"I (32f) live with my husband (32) &amp; our daughter (11). We currently have 4 dogs, a 10m  boxer/pit mix, a 4m boxer, a 2f lab/gsp mix, &amp; a 2f  Belgian Malinois. I never wanted more than the one dog (our 10m). When we got him, he was over a year old, house trained &amp; very well behaved. The 3 we've accrued over the past 4 years were my husband &amp; my daughter's doing, despite me telling them no. Ever since the other dogs have been brought in, my house has been destroyed. The 3 are all high energy &amp; get destructive when bored. One has a habit of refusing to use the bathroom when she's let outside &amp; then pee &amp; poop in the house. Since he brought the girls home our boys decided to start marking the furniture. So we've gone through 4 couches so far b/c they shredded them &amp; peed on them. We just got a new couch and the boys have already peed on it once &amp; the girls have tried to tear apart the cushions. Our baseboards, doors &amp; stairs are chewed up &amp; anything that was ever left in their reach has been destroyed.

My husband &amp; daughter don'tt clean up after or take care of them. If the dogs poop or puke, I have to clean it. They shed everywhere so I'm constantly having to vacuum &amp; constantly mop from the mud they track in. Their solution to everything is to crate them when someone is not with them to watch them, but if we did that then they would be out of their crate maybe 1-2 hours a day. That is not a life. I told them if they won't take care of them to rehome them. They say I always make them get rid of their animals but it's not true. We had 32 chickens at our old house that we had to rehome when we moved into town b/c our city doesn't allow livestock. He brought home 3 cows that needed to be bottle fed but we work full time so it wasn't possible. He brought home 12 freshly hatched turkeys while in our current home. Since the turkeys were so small we kept them in the house &amp; I took care of them for 2 months until they were old enough to live outside on a farm. He bought a skunk on a whim that I also took care of. We had him for 4 months until he bragged to the wrong person &amp; the game warden was called b/c it's illegal to own them where we live.

They refuse to help or train the dogs &amp; I'm sick of constantly having to clean up after these dogs along with all the other housework. I'm tired of my house and furniture being destroyed. I'm embarrassed to have people over anymore because of how torn up the furniture is &amp; the pee stains on all of it. And before anyone says anything, no I can't just leave, neither of us can afford to live on our own. I've tried talking to him and he just says I bitch too much and he's not getting rid of his animals (that he rarely interacts with). So AITA for telling them they need to rehome the dogs?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my gear touched?,"AITA for not wanting my gear touched?

My friends and I were fishing on a pier that was owned by the hotel we were staying at. We were on the end of the pier. The end flairs out in a T. If I were to guess id say it is about 25 feet across.
There was three of us. Myself and one friend on the right side and another friend on the left. Our takle and bait were stations on one of the 4 benches on the inside of the t facing the shore. We had been out there for about 5 hours. 
At around 12 midnight. A group of 3 or 4 had walked to the end. It was dark. No light at the end of the pier. At the same time my friend on the left was rebaiting. We exchanged pleasantries with the group and they took the bench on the left were my friend was sitting and started setting up. Shortly after another group of four walked down male, female, 1 teenager, and a large dog. Nothing was said when they arrived. Im on the right side fishing when i hear my takle box being closed over on the left side of the pier. I look over and can see the male of the second group closing it. I say out to him ""Id appreciate it if you did not touch my things"". 
His responce, ""I closed it because it looked like it was falling out. Then you barked at me so now im barking back.""
Me ""it wasn't falling out they had been here all day and never moved. If you wanted the spot to sit you could just have just asked if this belongs to anyone and i would have said it was mine and moved it.""
The male ""I'm dont know why your are making a big deal and antagonizing us we are just trying to fish.""
I then relent put my takle box and bait box near me on the other right side. I then realized that i left an item on the left side and get up to go get it. As I reach down to grap the item their dog lunges at me and starts barking. I say to the male.
""Wow, sir you may want to have better control of your dog. My dogs at home dont bark like that at random people if they approach me.""
The male ""well maybe thats because your dog is a pussy""
I dont respond and my friend tells me to calm down and that we should leave as we have a lot of fish to clean anyway. 
We decide to leave. 
As we are cleaning the fish at the start of the pier
The second group of 4, the three people and the dog walk back from the end of the pier. 
AITA for not wanting my gear touched?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to host my friend anymore?,"Will keep it short and to the point. 

My friend and I both live in different cities and I bought a house a year ago. I invited my friend to come stay with me for a couple of days since they've never been to my city and I wanted to see them anyways. My friend and I have always been close but this is the first time we've ever spent this much time together so I was definitely surprised at some of their behavior...some of the things that happened on their visit:

* We planned to drive to another city around 11:30 am, I know that sometimes they can take a while to get ready + they asked me to wake them up around 10 am. I try to and they're DEAD asleep, like shaking them and yelling won't wake them up. Shake the bed and they finally wake up, they tell me they took ambien at 4 am (they have sleep issues) and I'm like no worries, let me make you some coffee. I make coffee and go back to their room, they're out again. I go back to getting ready and try waking them up again at 11 am. End up shaking the bed again and telling them I'm gonna leave without them unless they wake up, they finally do and the whole time complained about being tired.

* I always ask my guests to take off their shoes in my house, it's just something I've always done growing up and I do in other peoples homes. Our house had just gotten cleaned and my friend ended up wearing their shoes and walking all over our just cleaned rug. Not a huge deal but I'm slightly annoyed.

* They broke my towel rack...bathrooms were recently renovated and we have one of those towel racks where one end is in the wall and the other end is just floating, meant for like small hand towels. Don't know why but my friend hangs one of those expandable toiletry bags to the end and now it's warped. I told them about it and they said it should be easy to fix.

So anyways, a year later and they mentioned wanting to visit again. We're still friends obviously (I just think they're an airhead) but I do not want to host them again and go through all of that. I suggested maybe we get a hotel in another city and do something fun there, but they asked me why not stay at my house. I tried to skirt around it and finally admit that I'm not happy about how they acted last time they were here. They're now upset and not talking to me. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my son he needs to lose weight?,"I have three kids with my ex. They're 8, 12 and 16. My ex wife has a decent body, I'm 180lbs and my oldest and youngest boys are thin. The 12yo has always chubby but not fat. Like Chunk from the Goonies. 

My ex and I were discussing this and agreed that he should lose weight. The thing is that my ex, me and our youngest and oldest just have metabolisms where we could eat what we want and not really gain weight plus we are physically active. Our 12yo cannot. We don't want him getting fat.

We told him we would buy him his own groceries. So instead of Oreo ice cream, he gets Halo Top. Instead of Dominoes, he gets thin crust DiGiorno. He balked at this idea. I told him then he needs to do swimming or some other intense exercise so he can burn some of those boy calories. Either play sports or change your diet.

As far as sports goes, he doesn't like to compete. There's always going to be a level of competition in any sport.",AmItheAsshole
 for talking to a stranger's child?,"Hello Reddit, first time poster here. I (26M) was visiting a Go-Kart track in my city for the first time and took advantage of a holiday discount offer. While it was in no way cheap, it was still more affordable than regular pricing. In turn, it meant that there would be more customers.
The process to get racing goes like this: you get in line, get let in and take your kart and can start once the employee gives the group the go ahead. Then you drive for around 10-15minutes until you are to drive back in the pitlane and a new group of racers can take their turn rinse and repeat.

With all this backstory, now to the incident in question.
During my second run, i got stuck behind the child (Maybe 9-10years old?) in question. I couldn't overtake him given that he tried to use racing lines but also veered off, blocking the chance to overtake without crashing into him in the short track with many twist and turns. At the 2nd lap of being stuck behind him, he got the blue flag, the signal that someone faster is behind him and that he should slow down and pull to the side to let them pass.

He did not do that. So instead i got stuck for around 3-1/2laps behind him until the race was over and we had all had to get back into the pitlane. There I approched the kid and told him ""Hey kiddo. Just a reminder, if he (the employee) swings the blue flag, it means someone faster is behind you and you're meant to let them pass.""
Afterwards i waited in the lobby for the current round to pass to join the next and last one again.

Now, as I chatted with other people at the bar (non alcoholic) the kids father approched me, looking ready to fight and asked me what my problem was for me to talk to his son like that.
I really didn't understand cause i saw nothing wrong and told him as such, leading to him to explain that now, the child who was until then having a great time, was now feeling sad and defeated. After leaving, the other people who also took part in that race didn't understand the problem either.

As i wanted to join for the next round, the employee stopped me, telling me that it wasn't my place to reprimand other people, let alone children on the rules and that continued behaviour would get me banned.

With all that being said, i have heared both that IATA and IANTA and would like reddits judgement to but my mind at rest.",AmItheAsshole
" for not waiting for my wife at the next subway station after I got on the train, and the doors closed before she got on?","So basically, wife and I were in a rush to catch our subway train to go to a brunch with my parents at our favorite restaurant. We were already 10 minutes late, and my parents are always super punctual and I didn't want to keep them waiting any longer for us.

As we approach the escalator down to our subway platform, I can hear our train approaching. So, I tell my wife that we need to catch the train, and we both hurry down the escalator, me in front of her. When we got to the bottom, I heard the subway door chimes, indicating that the doors were about to close. So, I rushed into the train at the last moment, but my wife was left on the platform of the other side.

I thought, okay, well this sucks that I made the train but my wife didn't. But it's not really a big deal because we both know exactly where we are going, and it's only 5 stops away. I will just meet her at the restaurant. (I don't get any cell service underground, so we couldn't communicate with each other)

So I arrive at the restaurant alone and greet my parents, who immediately question me about where my wife is. I told them what happened, and they didn't really seem to think much of it. But when she gets there 20 minutes later, she is all angry at me for not getting off the train at the next stop and waiting for her there, then getting on that train and continuing together. It made for a bit of an uncomfortable brunch, because we could all tell there was tension. After the brunch on our way home, she explained why she was mad and then became all short with me and pretty much gave me silence the rest of the way home.

My position is that we both knew where we were going and she knew my parents are easily irritated when I arrive late, so why would I have gotten off the train to wait for her unnecessarily?

So AITA?

Edit: Wow, so many people here just assuming New York is the only city in the world that has a subway... I've never even been to America lol.

Edit 2: Yes, everyone, I am acutely aware that my judgement is I am an asshole. Thank you for all your contributions! I have apologized to my wife profusely and came home with flowers for her. Clearly even before writing this post, I apologized numerous times to her.... At the restaurant, on the way home, and hours afterwards. I'm usually a passive person and I don't like having conflict, so I literally apologize just to avoid conflict, even when I think I am correct (and I know in this case I am not). You can all make your judgements around my marriage and how I am undeserving, but you've read a few sentences on the internet to make that determination.

Edit 3: Well, sorry to those of you rooting for my wife to divorce me. As much as you all probably think you know about me, my wife and my marriage by reading only a few sentences, we've resolved the matter and are laughing at all your comments together (well, it's more like she's laughing AT me). ",AmItheAsshole
 for not knowing my friends name?,"I (17M) have this dude in my class (17/18? Idk I just know he's a senior) that I speak to on occasion. I mean he speaks to me sometimes but the conversations are usually one sideish and I usually just nod and awkwardly chuckle because I don't hear him most of time. BUT I do know he knows my name, I just don't know how. 

Our teacher doesn't even call the roll anymore and I hardly speak in that class unless spoken too.Today we were in the carpool line and friend asked me why I wasn't in class today because he missed me and so I just explained why and then my brother had arrived not long after to pick me and our cousin up and friend called out to me to tell me bye when I was getting in the car. 

He does this often tho but he usually tells me bye when I'm next to him. When we started driving off my brother asked me who friend was and I just told him that that was friend. He then started questioning me more asking me why I never talked about him and stuff and then had the audacity to call me friendless (not true)? After a while I guess he got aggravated with me calling him friend and asked me what his 'real name' was. 

I told him that I honestly did not know and friend just started talking to me randomly one day. He got upset with me for not knowing his name and asked me how I didn't know. I told him that it was because he knew my name which was weird. I told him that I didn't want to ask him his name because that would just be embarrassing which is why I started calling him friend as a nickname and friend doesn't mind so he shouldn't either. 

He asked me if friend knew I didn't know his name and I said that I wasn't sure, prolly not and then he just got madder. He pissed me off cause he knew my day was already ruined and he was just making it worse trying to degrade me for something that doesn't involve him. He told me that he just finds it rude that I'm not taking the time and energy to learn friends name when he did that for me.

 I told him that I would have done the same thing but the difference was he didn't introduce him self or anything he just started talking to me like he knew me personally and that's why I never asked him. He then started saying that it was my fault and that I should try and engage more in class. I told him that I tried to get our cousin to ask him his name but she didn't want to do that because she wants to pray on my downfall. He still didn't care and kept throwing insults at me which just hurt my feelings. I feel like he's blowing this out of proportion and I feel like my brother doesn't like me in general so I don't know if he's projecting or not.",AmItheAsshole
 for almost calling my brother a fat*ss,"I (17M) have only one brother (19M), he always taunts me, saying it's playful, but it comes off as verbal bullying to me. He always talks about my weight, calling me a fat pig or using roasts he unoriginally found online, from either Google, CaseOh clips, or other sources. My ""comebacks"" use the same concept, but I think of mine originally. Even still, I weigh far less than him. There's around a 60 pound difference between us.

One example of a roast he throws and a ""comeback"" of mine:

  
BROTHER: ""You're so big you could sell shade.""

ME: ""If F=ma (force = mass\*acceleration), for you, F would be 0, while you sure have the mass, you don't have the acceleration.""

BROTHER: ""That's so stupid.""

Anyways, he used one of those unoriginal ""roasts"" at my dad's house once (my parents are split) and started messing with me, untying my shoes, and even chasing me around like in a horror game, but throwing insults. He's still a bit taller than me so I just run because I fill with adrenaline when he moves closer to me. Eventually, I got sick of it, the insults, the chasing, just the experience, and the word almost slipped out: ""GET AWAY FROM ME YOU BIG FATA--"". I paused. Even though we were teenagers, my brother being an adult, we still aren't allowed to curse in front of our family, due to a rule they set when we were 11 and 13 years old. 

Even though I was sick of it, all the insults and chasing, I still think I could be the a-hole. He never used curses in the insults and said he meant it in a playful manner. He seemed really hurt by it, and I could tell because he went silent. but I didn't care in the moment. I was sick of it. However, that's up for judgement.",AmItheAsshole
 for talking about being a Dad in front of people trying to have kids?,"This event happened a few months ago but I was reminded of it over the weekend. It was my birthday and I (31M) organized for me and my partner (33F) to go out for dinner with all our friends. 

Now, my partner and I were basically the first ones in our friend group to have a kid. Our son is two, and now most of our friends are starting their parenting journeys. 

We were getting towards the end of the meal and everyone was chatting when one of my friends across the table asked me “what’s been the best thing I’ve done over the past year?” I responded that being a dad to my son was my favourite thing I’ve done, which lots of people loved. 

After the dinner, my partner said that was a potentially hurtful thing to say given two couples at the table were actively trying for babies but hadn’t succeeded. I responded by saying I thought it was a fair answer to the question and that I shouldn’t need to censor myself at my own birthday dinner. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for “bailing” when “something better came up”?,"Last week, my roomate was telling me she had a really expensive car servicing she had to get done and she had to Uber there and back and it’s 25 mins away. I told her I could drive her that I’d be home all week. She seemed surprised and was like thank you so much blah blah blah. She’s leaving right after to go out of state, so it’s not like we had plans to hang out or do anything. I was happy to give her the rides because I’d be home. 

This weekend, my boyfriends parents just said he has to work in New York all week, and for my birthday invited me to come with them. We’d leave Wednesday morning. Wednesday is the day my roomate needed the rides but I forgot in the moment and was excited to go to New York and said yes.

Although, looking back even if I remembered in the moment I feel like I would’ve asked if it was alright if I did that instead of give her the rides. I don’t think I’d have really been willing to stay home all week alone (boyfriend and roomates would all be away) just to give someone 100 minutes worth of driving time for free that they didn’t NEED. If i was already home I I wouldn’t mind and would be happy to do it for her. 

Also, to clarify, if she wasn’t able to/planning on ubering, and if she didn’t have that budgeted for I would have made sure to keep my word. I just felt like I offered to make her life easier by giving up almost two hours of my time for free, and now that it doesn’t work out I feel bad but not as if I’ve betrayed her or ditched her for something better. I’d never have ditched her just to hang out with a friend, but this wasn’t something I could reschedule. 

Today she let me know very nicely that she’s really hurt that I bailed on her once something better came along and needs to know that I won’t do that to her in the future. She says she would’ve been fine if I never offered, but thinks it’s inconsiderate/rude to offer and then bail when something better comes up. 

Am I in the wrong here? She was ubering in the first place, it’s not like she was looking for rides from others and I bailed last minute. I feel like I offered to do her a favor and now that it doesn’t really work out, I feel bad but I don’t feel like I’ve done something wrong. She feels that it was really inconsiderate of me to say yes to my boyfriend’s parents after offering her a ride last week. 

Also, any advice on how to avoid this situation or how I could’ve avoided it would be helpful. I never would’ve expected them to offer me last minute to come with them and I wasn’t looking forward to being alone so many days. I was excited at the opportunity. I also don’t feel that offering to do someone a big favor justifies saying no to an entire trip that someone offers. I never would’ve offered if I thought that was a possibility. 


Edit for clarity: I would not have cancelled to just hang out with someone else. This was a trip that could not be moved and was a surprise for me and I told her as soon as I knew. She was next to me when I got the offer. We were not going to hang out after, she was leaving for the week. I had offered because I’d be home, and if I were home I’d absolutely do it. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my daughter to grow up and get her priorities straight,"
My(43f) oldest daughter(24f) and sil (23m) have 2 young children both under 3 with another on the way. 
They recently had a fire safety inspection on their rented property which resulted in the landlord giving written instructions that they would be carrying out monthly inspections due to the conditions in which they were living.

 It all came to a head last week when I finally managed to see for myself how bad things had gotten. To say I was disgusted and ashamed is an understatement. But we rolled our sleeves up and we got on with making the property as good as we could in 48 hrs before the initial return visit of the landlord. The property is still far from an acceptable standard, especially with young children living there but the landlord was satisfied with the progress that has been made and is planning to return next month. There is sill a lot to do and it's going to be heavy going but we can take it at a steadier pace now.

 So imagine my surprise when I get a message asking me to babysit tomorrow so that she can go get her nails fixed,  because she broke one of her gels whilst cleaning. I was flabbergasted,  I love my grandchildren and i enjoy looking after them when she has appointments etc but I just spent 2 days emptying filthy rubbish, building furniture,  cleaning, and making her home a safe place for them all to live in and we still have a list of jobs to be getting on with but she wants to pay a professional to redo her gels because she doesn't want to be walking around with broken nails. Apparently she made the appointment weeks ago and if she cancels with such short notice she will still have to pay so she's literally backed me into a corner so that if i don't babysit it will cost her more money.

 I lost it and told her that this is the last time i will look after her children for anything other than essential appointments and that if she wants to waste her time and money on that nonsense then she can do it when her husband is around to look after his children i explained that right now her appearance is the very bottom of my priorities and as a stay at home mum with a house in that state it shouldn't even be on her list of priorities rn. I told her she needs to grow up, get her priorities straight and start putting her kids first.

 My husband (her dad) says I went too far and that it will be my fault if we lose contact with our grandchildren. I told him that if they don't all wake up the kids will be heading into care and then none of us will have contact so please tell me AITA?


Update:

She has cancelled the nail appointment and is currently not talking to me, she is still messaging her dad though so I'm not overly concerned by that atm

I have explained to my husband that my priority is the safety of my grandchildren and whether he likes it or not I will always do what I believe to be in their best interests and whatever it takes to ensure that safety.  Even if that means reporting suspected neglect. 

He is not happy about it due to his own family history but accepts that if we do nothing then we are complicit and they deserve better than that. 

A couple of people have mentioned discussing the situation with sil family, unfortunately his parents have a very low opinion of me and my husband ( as we were young parents) and even less respect for our opinions, on the few occasions that I have tried to raise concerns with them it has not gone well and I feel it likely that any concerns I try to raise with them now will fall on deaf ears.",AmItheAsshole
 only looking for my own needs rather than my brothers?,"So I have long covid since around 18 months, just a few months ago in December I asked my brother for a few things. Amongst it was to have a Christmas eve altogether with my parents because Xmas means a lot to me and to make me a promise to go on a holiday trip to a certain mountain once I am healthy again so I can have something to look forward to. This was a huge deal for me because asking for help is something I do not at all because of my fear of rejection.

Unfortunately both of my wishes were not granted. At first he did tell me that he will go to that mountain with me, just to see him telling me that he will ""most probably/maybe"" do it with me. I saw a promise being reversed. And we did spend Christmas separately (me and my parents and my brother with his wife and child) because of some reasons within the family.

So we talked about it a few times in February, but realised that I needed some time on my own to process it, because it was a very painful experience for me and felt like being let down by him in a difficult time. I kinda broke off the contact to him for a few weeks.

So yesterday I talked to him again, and basically asked him if he is willing to put in some more effort into our relationshi ans to talk things out a bit more because that i would need that in order to move forward. Its mainly because I realised that I have some suppressed emotions and was very unhappy regarding a lot of things in the last few years, and that i need to let that out of my system. He said he needs to think about it and that it's not his way of moving forward, saying he'd wish that we talk in some kind of normal way again so that this would not be so hard all the time.

I need to say that we had a very good and super close relationship in the past. He is actually a very kind person, and has helped me a lot in general. But I had quite a realisation a few months ago, that I was not living life based on my terms and my values. Since I am starting doing this ans actually asking for stuff, the relationship to my brother has been falling apart.

Now my question: Am I being the asshole for saying I would need that kind of specific effort from him? And even more not looking after his needs but rather for my own right now?

 ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my mother in law why she brings meat to a party?,"It was my sons first birthday party which was meant to be celebrated with both sides of our family. We decided to have cake and Barbecue and everybody was contributing which was really nice (instead of presents). 
We bought grill cheese and organic meet. I asked my mother in law for cheese and grape sticks and a vegetarian soup. I also explained to her that we wont have mass produced animals on that day of joy. (I'm vegetarian for 11 years now)
I struggled with a flue and fever the whole week and my sick son too (he needed inhalations).
My bf was attending a wedding while I was cleaning the whole house, taking care of my sick boy and 10 guests that allready arrived at the day before the party.
In the evening when I just put my son to bed, my mother in law came without announcement with two grandmas and her husband.
She gave me the snacks. But no cheese snacks, she made cheese and meat snacks mixed and I was really annoyed. I asked her why she did this when I asked her for something else? She said it's meat for those who want it. Of course not organic. I said but we talked about it. She got mad, took the snacks and left the house without a word.
I called 20 min later and apologized for my annoyed voice. 
She was so upset on the phone and said she doesnt know if she can come to the party and that other people are also struggeling. On the actual party she and her husband didnt show up. I think I could be the AH cause I seem ungrateful and I was. I should have said just thank you. But for years my nutrition was ignored by her (12 years now) and I never said a word.
Am I the Asshole?",AmItheAsshole
[MI] is there anything I can do or did I just screw myself ,"Okay so long story short my (20F) husband (22m) has a brother (29M) who he never really knew due to brother growing up in foster care and later adopted they only met about 2 years ago.
Well me and husband moved to our 1st actual house in May 2023 and his brother started messaging both of us after we posted on FB about new place saying house hes homeless (hes been homeless since 20) and he can't live like this anymore ect and tbh I felt really bad and wanted to help him get back on his feet, get a job, a car, a place of his own Ect.
So I sadly let him move in with us. 
It's now April 2024 almost a full year he's had 8 jobs and hasn't lasted more than over a month at ANY of them. He spent his last $20 on beer and cigs....
He doesn't even contribute to all the food he eats he's smoking in my house when 1st I have a toddler 2nd I have asthma and I'm in pain a lot just being in my own house he steals money for beer he will literally jump up and down and throw a tantrum like a baby if when I come home from work (at noon) and close the door to loud and wake him up
I tried but I can't do this
I'm renting and was told anyone living in the house has to be put on the lease so he's on the lease......
I haven't talked to any actual lawyers but I've seen that roommates can't evict roommates... 
Is there anything AT ALL I can do without moving I really like where I live and honestly I'm scared he'll destroy the whole house and cost me thousands if he finds out we're moving and he's not coming with...
",AskLawyers
[PA] Do I Have A Law Suit At Work?,"
Backstory:

I (23m) began working for a union labor paper mill in 2022. The first 6 months I was in the warehouse, nothing special happened, and then I got an internal position in a better department in the mill. I have been here since October of 2022. There are about 40 men in my department, and we are all split into 4 crews: A crew, B crew, C crew, and D crew. During my first 8 weeks in the department, I was not assigned to a crew because I was training on the machines to learn how to operate them. So, I got a chance to meet everyone. Throughout the 8 weeks and getting to know everyone on each crew, they started letting me know the ins and outs of the department and who is a good working crew member and who is not. There was a black gentleman that was notoriously mentioned by every single employee I talked to about the department. They told me he sleeps (which is a zero-tolerance offense), he smokes full marijuana joints at work out back (again, absolutely zero tolerance in any workplace), his machine downtime is consistently underperforming when compared to other operators working the same night, and countless other infractions that lead to immediate dismissal and termination. They told me this gentleman was on A crew, and lo and behold, I was put on A crew at the end of my week training. My very first night shift on A crew (6 pm - 6 am), I observed this gentleman go out back at 6:30 pm and come back at 7:20 pm, reeking with the odor of marijuana. He then went into the “booth” (a small enclosed security booth-style structure since we work in a very dusty and loud environment) and covered his eyes with his hat and proceeded to fall asleep for well over 4 HOURS. The other operators that have been working alongside him for OVER 20 YEARS not only allow him to sleep on shift, but when his machine is down or jammed, they will go reset it and start the machine for him, effectively allowing him to be paid to sleep. This occurred every single night until PRESENT DAY. There are no repercussions for his actions even though they are extremely well known and acknowledged by every operator and manager. Truthfully, despite this gentleman’s work ethic and his decisions while on shift, he and I became friends and would talk every single time we worked. There was not one shift that we did not sit and talk for hours since we sat in the booth for however many minutes during our 12-hour shift. Even other employees have noted that they thought we were “good friends” in quotes.

Situation in question:

After a year and some months of working for this department, around Christmas of 2023, I was talking with some of the operators on D crew, and they informed me of an ongoing situation with this black gentleman and management about how he felt he had been screwed out of overtime at work somehow. After about a week of hearing the gentleman talk about this problem while working on the crew, I came to learn that there was some sort of miscommunication and that when it was his turn to be first up to get any overtime, they called the wrong operator first, and he answered the phone and accepted the shift, meaning the black gentleman now missed that day of overtime pay. In fairness, that is a mistake that even I would have taken to the union myself to get resolved as no one likes losing money. Though this gentleman became persistent in the fact that all of this was somehow a plot to make him lose overtime and that all the operators and management were out to get him fired for being a terrible employee when in truth not only do we not openly voice our opinions to corporate, some operators even cover for him, so I’m not sure where he got this notion. In light of all of this, it was brought to our attention that this black gentleman had taken action to prove that “black men were not the only ones doing it” and so he had submitted NUMEROUS photos of 7 WHITE/CAUCASIAN OPERATORS, all from various crews, including myself, performing “unsafe” or “non-job related tasks” or “sleeping” or “vaping” (vaping on premise is also another zero-tolerance offense). He did not submit these photos to the union; he submitted them to corporate. This is equivalent to when mom (union) finds out you did something bad and she says “your father (corporate) is gonna be pissed when he gets home.” Corporate is a no bullshit by the book entity while the union is more of a let’s see what we can do type of entity and much more lenient when it comes to troubling situations. Now when I became aware that this gentleman had taken photos of me in early December of 2023, I had completely avoided talking with him after that. I had felt betrayed that a man I considered a friend would have betrayed me in a way that could result in me losing my job, and all the while, he smiled and pretended to be my friend while taking pictures of me. It was honestly quite violating. From the time we found out in December of 2023 to the time corporate had officially made us aware of some sort investigation was almost 30 days in late December/early January. This day in early January, a union representative had come down to my department and came up to me and asked me to follow him to the corporate offices upstairs because they had an issue they needed to discuss with me, so I followed. When I got into the room, the union president and the representative that escorted me to the room sat me down and closed the door and explained exactly what other operators had told me the month before, that “an anonymous employee submitted pictures of you being unsafe at work.” None of us knew what the pictures looked like, so we were just going to be presented the pictures from corporate, and then they would give us time to sit and write our “explanation for my actions” on paper. A few minutes later, the corporate leader that oversees my department and the HR union relation employee came in holding a stack of papers. They sat down and told me that “someone submitted photos of you at work performing questionable actions and the optics just don’t look good.” When they finally revealed the photos of me, picture one was a picture taken from an iPhone zoomed in very far in which I was sitting in an office chair on the floor with a hoodie on “sleeping”. Picture two was a picture of me laying inside a large bin we use for waste paper about 8ft long x 4 feet wide x 4 feet deep. This is unsafe, and I remember doing this action because I had dropped a tool to the bottom of the bin and had to retrieve it. I distinctly remember that night, the black gentleman took out his phone and took a photo of me in the bin. Truthfully, I thought nothing of it as we were all just bullshitting at 3 am standing around and just thought it was funny and snapped a pic no big deal. The third picture was a picture of me standing by the clock-out clock about to clock out, and I have open-toed shoes on (slides and socks) and gym shorts on and my work boots and work pants in my hand waiting to clock out. This picture was taken from behind, very creepy. The strange part about the third picture is that I had slides and shorts on, and this conversation was taking place in January. Additionally, my corporate department leader was in the room during the meeting , and he had agreed that he told me many months ago to not wear those shoes again, and I never wore them again after that. I pointed that out to him in the meeting, and he agreed that he had told me to stop wearing them a long time ago and also agreed he had not seen or heard that I had worn them since that day. This means that photo was taken at some point within my first few months in the department; this guy was plotting against me for a very long time. They left the room, and we wrote down our explanation for the pictures and turned it in to them. They said they would contact me and let me know the decision after they talked with all operators involved in this, and I went back to work as normal. Four weeks later, and many restless nights of not knowing if I will have a job come the morning, they finally got back to all of us and told us that we are not getting because the pictures were “inconclusive”. Following this, about a week later, they bring every crew in to the meeting room one by one for a “refresher on company policy”. This was insulting to say the least, considering the man who smokes weed and blatantly sleeps at work is the reason 7 well-regarded operators were almost fired, and the entire department now suddenly needs a refresher on how to follow policy. Since then to present day I am still working with this gentleman; they will not move me to another crew no matter how high in the chain of command I go. Everyone refuses to acknowledge this gentleman is the one who submitted the pictures, and to add insult to injury, I have to relieve him for his breaks at work and assist him when his machine isn’t running well.

Sorry for the long post.

Is there any sort of discrimination case or something I can do? At this point, work has become less of something I look forward to and more into a place that just causes me to feel uneasy and threatened.",AskLawyers
[NH] Will he lose his license again???,"My fiance had a DUI back in June of 2021. 

He recently got a type of fine for wreckless driving around October of 2023,  He did not NEED to go to court and he didn't get arrested either. He just needed to pay the ticket off.

Will he lose his license again?  
Sorry this is probably a dumb question.
- New Hampshire.
",AskLawyers
[TX] [LA] Criminal Case Advice,"Someone I know is incarcerated in Texas and has a probation motion to revoke in Louisiana... 

1. Would this person be able to get paroled with the motion to revoke detained? 

2. Could Louisiana go ahead and revoke and give credit time served? 

3. Or what if any advice/ suggestions does anyone have moving forward. 

Thank you in advance for any insight. ",AskLawyers
[CA] moving to AL,"CA moving out

Living in CA moving to AL

Moving out of state

I live in California with my mom, daughter and granddaughter (3.5)

My mom has purchased a home in Alabama for the 4 of us 

Here us my possible problem 
My daughter is in the process of getting  a divorce. My SIL is a homeless, drug addicted schizophrenic with no job. He is also violent and threatening to my daughter, this often happens in front of my granddaughter and it affects her. He is not on the birth certificate though he and my daughter have some paperwork that says he is the father. 

My daughter is concerned that she will not be able to take my granddaughter out of state without his permission. She will have a stable home, food and childcare in Alabama.  If she is unable to move with us she will either be homeless also or in a shelter if there is any space 

Can my granddaughter be moved",AskLawyers
[IL] Guardianship ,"

My Uncle is mentally disabled and lives at a home for developmentally disabled men.  My brother has guardianship, so it's up to him to approve medical treatments and our Uncle's SS money.
The home has contacted me and asked that I take over guardianship for several reasons.  How do I go about this?  ",AskLawyers
[WA] Non permitted housing,"Second post as first post received zero replies. King county, Washington state. Rented 5th wheel travel trailer from our boss. TT was parked in her backyard. Vacated last month by mutual agreement after explosive and erratic behaviour by our boss. Boss now threatening us with collections as 2 months remained on our lease. Are we liable to pay her those 2 months rent on this against county code, unpermitted housing?",AskLawyers
[OH] How to get Juvenile Record expunged?," We live in Ohio. Our daughter is 18. When she was 16, she was in an at fault accident and also has a hit and run (Hit Skip). This all happened within a few months. She lost her license for 6 months and got them back about a year ago (we hired an attorney).

How would we get her record expunged? What would be the benefit of this? Would this help us with her car insurance rates, which are currently killing us?

She's 18 and after a mental health diagnosis, she is doing MUCH better now.",AskLawyers
[IA] Do I need a General Lawyer?,"So to start off, I am a physician. I hate how physicians are portrayed on television as these all around doctors that they save a kid in the emergency department, go to the ICU and make a rare diagnosis, head down to the OR to perform a surgery, and wrap up the day driving the ambulance to a save the community from a disaster.

I imagine lawyers can be portrayed in the same, but someone from the outside looking in, there is always a line of ""you will hear from my lawyer,"" or after they get arrested, ""I want to talk to my lawyer,"" or any other variation. Even, ""that sounds like a good business idea, let me run it by my lawyer.""

So my question is, is this just television BS or do people keep a general lawyer on constant retainer or someone they have hired and is there lawyer? If I need a lawyer, am I stuck with a public defender or do I have time to get a lawyer that is excellent? Basically, should I get a guy? I figured I would ask a bunch of lawyers. I am not in hot water now, I just want to protect myself and my family long term. ",AskLawyers
"[WI] Neighbor's dog got out and attacked ours on a walk, can we sue for vet bill?","My wife was walking our dog (on leash) last week, on the sidewalk. Walking past neighbor's house their dog got out and grabbed and attacked our dog. Result was a broken femur. Vet bill was over 8k.

Immediately after my wife called to tell me what happened I left work to meet my her at the vet. Stopped by neighbor's house (where it happened) on my way home to get info. I was able to talk to them, they were cooperative and apologetic; gave me contact info (phone number),  name, and said they would do whatever they needed to. They also said it was ""their fault"", as well; and stated they knew attacking dog had an issue with ""little dogs on leashes"" and that they had tried working on it in the past, with classes and training, etc. I recorded the conversation.

I'm generally a trusting person and want to believe neighbor will follow through. They have been responsive to my texts and checking in on us, up until I informed them of the cost (we got the final bill when we picked him up, 2 days after the attack happened).  Just wondering what our options are, if it comes to litigation. Hope we don't need it but whether or not we have any grounds for suing will kind of inform any future conversations with this individual. Any advice is appreciated!

**---EDIT 1---**

Well, first, thanks for the overwhelmingly helpful and well thought-out responses. I wasn't really expecting this to blow up like this so I'll try to address the most common questions:

1. Yes, I called police shortly after it happened. We were already to the Animal Hospital by then so they waited until we got back home to take a statement. I will be obtaining a copy of the incident report.
2. It is looking like homeowners insurance is probably the best way forward at this point. Individual got back to me and like someone here suggested, they were basically just in shock. I am being sympathetic but firm and suggested the HO Ins route, and they are going to talk it over with their parents.
3. No, I'm not looking for damages from emotional distress / hardship, etc. I just want to have at least the majority of the vet  bill covered. I get free therapy / counseling through work and both my wife and I plan on utilizing that to help work through the emotional aspect of this. Increasing someone else's suffering won't help ours.

**---EDIT 2---**

Small update since things are ongoing, but there are positive things happening. Our little guy appears to healing so far. He's eating, sleeping, pooping, and starting to use the leg, all of which are pretty good signs. We will probably have around 10-12 weeks of my wife sleeping on the floor on a mattress with him (we don't want him sleeping on the bed because of risk of falling) along with heat therapy, range of motion and other rehabilitation.

The other dog's owner is being cooperative and looking into filing a claim. Right now I'm just trying to let them know that I appreciate the cooperation and hoping to work towards the best outcome we reasonably can. They still seem like a decent person at this point. Trying to not be a dick but also getting stuff to happen is a delicate balance.",AskLawyers
[MO] TW child has told details over 2 years later of SA,"Child was taken to ER and checked and found ‘no evidence’. Also interviewed and was too young to be able to talk full sentences. Fast forward 2 years later when they’ve been through a year of trauma therapy for children and more therapy, the child admits fully in detail what happened. Do you take it to the police? Will they believe the child etc or will it lead to only more trauma for child and zero charges? The predator lives in another state and was visiting at the time",AskLawyers
"[AR] aside from amending, how would you correct mother’s name on birth certificate ","There is not an option to amend the mother’s information on an Arkansas birth certificate 

They have a DNA test saying they are the mother and they’ve had their child their entire life. The birth certificate says the wrong information in the mother’s area on the birth certificate. This seems unheard of. Need answers. The only thing anyone can come up with is legally changing the name as if child was adopted. They were never adopted. The birth certificate says the wrong name and information for mother. What can be done? The state is Arkansas. Also missing father’s information. So only the wrong mother name is listed",AskLawyers
[IL]My license has been revoked since 2015 for too many points (had 3 speeding tickets in a short period of time). Do I 100% need a traffic lawyer?,"Long story short I was an idiot and 2 of those speeding tickets were going 90 in Wisconsin, and 1 was going 10 over in my town. I paid the tickets but never went to court or traffic school. I sold my car and moved to the city when this happened and honestly just haven’t really needed a car.

But I’m planning on moving to the suburbs and yeah I’ll need a car and license. Since it wasn’t a DUI and also almost a decade ago, is this something I can go to the circuit court on my own? Or should I just bite the bullet and get a traffic lawyer.",AskLawyers
[NJ] Can I legally be denied child visitation over a single dog bite?,"Five years ago I became a widow when my husband’s life long battle with addiction took his life. Earlier that year, I fought my own short lived battle and in voluntarily seeking treatment on my own accord, was reported to DCPP. I completed everything required of me, but my husband overdosed two weeks before the case was set to close, putting me back at square one in the eyes of the Division. They IMMEDIATELY granted my in-laws temporary physical custody of my two young children.

After a three year legal battle, completely depleted from grief and the stress of the situation, DCPP and my in-laws finally strong armed me into relinquishing physical custody to them. I retain joint legal custody and consented only with specific stipulations that ensured I could not be denied access to my children so long as I maintained my sobriety. 

The order states that I am permitted unsupervised parenting time in my home every other weekend, provided it is in suitable condition.

I recently moved into a new apartment with my current partner and his two dogs. My in-laws came and approved of the home, met my partner and thought the dogs were just the sweetest.

During our second weekend visit here, the male dog unexpectedly bit my son (12) while I was kneeling down to leash the female. This was out of character and I still cannot believe he did it.

All precautions will be taken to both ensure my son’s safety and rectify the dog’s behavior. 

My father-in-law will not hear of it and refuses to allow my children here again. 

Do I have any legal recourse?",AskLawyers
[CA] Can employers cut an emoloyees hours by half without notice,"
I had an injury that they couldn't let me work with and I was out of work for a month with a doctor's note. The day that I was supposed to be back they told me that they didn't put me on the schedule until a moth later.They finally put me on but only part time only full time hours when someone calls out. ",AskLawyers
[IL] Rapist confessed on video,"My rapist (ex) and I had a long abusive relationship, early-ish on in the relationship he confessed over video to raping me and this is corroborated by texts years later throughout the relationship. Recently, when I was leaving and moving things out, he raped me and I became pregnant. I continued to pacify him to some degree for 2-3 weeks before cutting all contact once all of my things were removed and the lawsuit he brought against me to try to reverse the adoptions of the older two children had seemed to go through (he lost - he voluntarily waived his rights to them over a year prior). He is suing me for sole custody of this third baby. I turned in the rape tapes and the texts to the police as well as what happened and supplied them with witnesses to the events where he admitted to raping me in front of them. What, if anything, can I expect? This person is a family medicine physician.",AskLawyers
"[VA] I have a court date on Wednesday, April 3 and need advice/ pros/cons of accepting the resolution offer or pressing on the counter offer before the court date. TIA.","An old lady keyed my car for no god damn reason (I don't even know her and we literally live across the street), which got caught on video so there is no doubt she is guilty. A police report was filed immediately after the incident happened. The car has been fixed and cost $2000. We went to court. Because of her income, the court appointed her a public defender for free and scheduled another court date for tomorrow Wednesday, April 3. I do not have a lawyer to represent me. Before the court date, her lawyer reached out to me via email and offered to pay the full $2000 to set before court date. However, the incident was reported on my CARFAX. I spoke to an expert appraiser, who told me the diminished value is around $1200-$1500. I counter-offered her lawyer requesting her to pay for the diminished value. Her lawyer responded that she does not have income and can't pay diminished value but her family is willing to pay the cost of fixing the car.

All of this is new to me, so I'm seeking for advice whether I should take what the lawyer offered and be done with it or continue going to court to let things run its course and not having my own lawyer. I prefer to continue pressing her to pay for her crime but I'm worried that I'm underrepresented and because of her having zero income or assets, I might not even get paid the $2000 out of pocket that I paid to fix my car.

The video clearly shows she committed the crime so I have no doubt I will win. I'm just worried that even if I win the case, she will not be ordered to pay because she has no income.

Any advice or information to help me make this decision today will be greatly appreciated! 🙏🙏🙏",AskLawyers
[OR] - Will my brother-in-law go back to prison?,"My BIL has been going down a really bad path the past 5+ years. He's had 2 restraining orders against him, both for DV. Then he attacked another gf and ended up with 4 felony/3 misdemeanor charges for DV... assault, strangulation, etc. and was put on probation. He broke probation by dating someone when he wasn't allowed to date and then assaulted her, almost snapping her hyoid. This landed him in prison for 4 years. He's been out of prison for 100 days and just got arrested again for assault in the 4th degree with yet another woman. 

I feel like this creates a very high likelihood he'll go back to prison again, but am curious how long he's likely to go away for.",AskLawyers
[TX] Rent Increase question,"I live in a house that I have been renting for the past three years. Recently, my landlord's daughter contacted me and told me that at the end of the current lease, my rent would be going up, and I would receive a new lease. However, I have not received a new lease agreement with the new monthly rent payment. My question is, do I legally need to pay the new amount or am I only legally obligated to pay the amount I have been paying?",AskLawyers
[ID] overpaying on property taxes. Pursue reimbursement or count my losses for now?,"ID - overpaying on property taxes. Pursue reimbursement or count losses?


Local lender sold my mortgage to Flagstar. I have 3 exemptions for my property taxes in Idaho; homeowners exemption, timber exemption (X amount of acres of forested land gives a properly tax break), and 100% VA veterans tax exemption.  Spoke to the lender and was told it is my responsibility to send my property tax assessment annually. Spoke to county assessor and was assured that they send my property tax assessment to lenders annually.  Flagstar website even specifies this, so the first person I spoke to at Flagstar seemed to not have a clue.  My property tax assessment also has all of my exemptions noted on the form that got sent to lender. Flagstar website also says to let them know if I have any questions exemptions on property taxes, but again, they are noted on the form so I have never contacted them about it, I figured If my assessment notice spells out my exemptions then why would I need to (I did not see this part of their website until I started looking into my overpayment).   I’ve been over paying on my property taxes because of this. Legally, will Flagstar be required to reimburse my over payment?  It’s several thousand dollars and I think if I pursue legal action (if it comes down to it) then the lawyer fees will eat up the money that I would essentially be reimbursed. I’m just wondering what to expect, if they will try to fight me on it, etc.  Or if I should just count my losses and make sure I have everything covered for the future.  Waiting to hear back from Flagstar.  ",AskLawyers
[NY] How difficult is it to prove gender discrimination in regard to the employment?,"First thing, I don’t plan on suing anyone, at the end of the day I know my worth and know I can do better with my own shop later in life…

Anyway, there’s a coffee shop chain that gets involved with colleges and universities that allows students to pretty much completely run a coffee shop on campus. I was pretty excited about this and I have real relevant work experience doing similar things.

My interview for this position was a whole 13 minutes. Couple weeks after they said I didn’t get it, oh well, learn from this and move on.

Now they didn’t announce the student who got the job for my school yet, but scrolling around their Instagram it seems that with the exception of 4-5 people every other student CEO is women, which amounts to at least 15-20 from a cursory scroll.

This can’t be legit right, am I just being bias?",AskLawyers
[TX] I won a frivolous lawsuit and was awarded attorney fees. How can I make sure the other party pays,"I won a frivolous lawsuit and was awarded attorney fees. The fees are substantial, enough to buy a condo. I intend to get them back because a) they're owed to me, b) he's a narcissist who thinks he's untouchable, and having to pay the fees might get him off my back because this is the first loss he'll see from years of harassment. My concern is recovering the fees. What tools do I have at my disposal to ensure he pays?

Can I get financial records of his assets to know what he has? Can I get a lien on his house so he can't refinance to take out equity? I know I can do wage garnishment, but concerned he'll leave the country before letting that happen hence why I'm curious about a lien. He's a dual citizen. Can that be taken into consideration? I'm expecting him to appeal. What can I have in place to protect me during the appeal process.

Also, how likely is it for someone to overturn the attorney fees on appeal?

Edit: Thank you everyone for your responses. They've been very helpful. One more question, is the relevant jurisdiction in the county I reside in, where he resides, or where the decision was granted? ",AskLawyers
[Ny] My mentally ill grandpa refuses to claim benefits ,"He shows signs of undiagnosed paranoid personality disorder, but refuses to leave the house for any reason, including to see a doctor and get officially diagnosed. He wont claim the benefits of his retirement from the airport where he used to work, apparently its as simple as signing some paperwork but he will not leave and also does not want to sign. The reason this is so important is because my grandma has a few more years of mortgage to pay off, but she has to work very hard even with her advanced age to cover the mortgage, while his retirement benefit would essentially cover it. Is there any recourse to “force“ him to take the benefit? 
Without him getting a diagnosis ( he refuses to go) is there any way for my grandma to be able to take over and sign for him? Thank you!",AskLawyers
"[CA] I was raped two years ago, do I have a case?","
Now to start this I want to say I got the rape kit done. When it happened I had two rapists but
The problem is that the police did get involved. I was heavily manipulated by my rapists and could not go through with it due to building guilt and manipulation. I fear I ruined my case there’s nothing I can do. I’m just curious if I could ever do something about this. ",AskLawyers
[NY] Appeals Process,"In recent news, Judge Canon is said to be ""leaning towards"" Former President Trump in his documents trial. At the same time, industry pundits are noting that her recent decisions are ""very unusual"" whatever all that means. Let's say, for the sake of discussion, that Judge Canon sides with Former President Trump and that the case is appealed by prosecutors. How would an appeal work if she is found to have erred in this scenario? The Appellate court instructs her to change her opinion? The case gets retried? Something else? What is to prevent her from siding with him again in a new and interesting way?",AskLawyers
[MI],"So Im currently on felony probation, long story short, allegations were made from almost a year ago and I got a warrant for it. Went took care of the warrant, got arraigned and ultimately the case got dismissed because of lack of proof/ other party not wanting to press charges. I recently got a call from my probation officer telling me they issued a warrant for those allegations but as I said previously, the entire case got dismissed and thrown out but she wants me to turn myself in to the jail, for basically nothing. I have never violated my probation before as I have heida and 5 months left. I continued to check in for probation and go to my classes that were given to me for probation. I just would like to know can they issue a warrant for a dismissed case with no proof and anyone wanting to press charges? If not is there any legal action I can take against my Po and the Washtenaw county court system? Thank you in advance. ",AskLawyers
[CA] Notice to Vacate,"I live in California. I emailed the letter in and they sent me this form back that they want signed and noterized. I am gonna have trouble getting my lease partner to sign this document let alone get it notarized so I want to know, do I have to? I’ve never filled a form out like this before and usually the letter I created is sufficient.",AskLawyers
[GA] Can my sister prevail against her neighbor?,"My sister has a rental property with a swimming pool on the side of the property in back.

The new neighbors moved in next door after their dad died, and obviously inherited big. New cars, renovation, etc.

The view from her pool area is the farm and pastures behind and down behind the neighbor's house. Tree line beyond to the west and northwest for nice sunsets and the view.

Last year when she was out of town, they built two large sheds 5 feet from the fence (legal), but nearly 18' high (illegal). They did not get permits to build, and no permits to connect power, but did both. They're about 12'x20' each, spaced 3-4' apart.

The city came and fined them for the no permits, but won't make them move or remove them.

They got paid, so they're good.

These barns sit next to one another, and loom over the pool area. It absolutely ruins the view and feeling of the area.

Where once, you could enjoy the pasture and sunset, now it's like a house blocking all view.

The damn thing is, they already had one smaller shed on their back property line, up against a pasture other the other side of the property.

The farm house is about 120 yards away, and it doesn't bother him at all. They could move them back there, they'd be handy, and much less visible to the pool area.

They store junk in the yard, and their carport that faces her house looks like something from an episode of hoarders.  It's been neat as a pin for 30 years.

I know I've seen cases where someone ruins another's view with a house or trees, and prevails in court citing quiet enjoyment.

Will a lawyer be inclined to take her on and try to force these morons to move the barns?",AskLawyers
[TX] Difficulties with other attorneys office Advice?," \[TX\] This is going to be a bit long. I currently work for an attorney. I must get court dates for people, and a few cases have been challenging to get with only one other attorney. The other attorney is known for getting their way and putting stuff off. Whenever I talk to their office, I am given the run around on dates, and they refuse to provide me with one. So today, I went to the court coordinator of the judge to see about getting a court date, and I was told that they would be staying out of it and not giving me a court date since this is a dispute between our two offices, not theirs. I am at a loss. I have been working on this case for four months and have not even gotten one court date, so I have been frustrated. Everyone is saying my emotions are too involved, but I am just tired of getting the runaround, and when I talked to the attorney I work for about the dates, he told me to let it go. Do Any other attorneys have this issue? If so, what did you do, and do you have any advice on where to go from here? I am tired of the runaround from that one attorney and the court coordinator. If this was in district court, it would have already been solved and had a court date, but no. So that you know, the attorney I work for is dating the other attorney's paralegal. She hates me because she was supposed to get the job, and I got it instead, so this dispute will never end, or at least it seems like it, but I am not putting clients at risk of never having court dates. I am trying to be professional and do my job, but their office needs to do it. Also, another note: she has a court order from one of the judges saying she is not supposed to be a paralegal in the town, but she still works, and everyone ignores it. I live in a tiny village where the judges push everything under the couch. ",AskLawyers
[NV] What attorney do I seek to help me in my situation?,"I was offered a job and was given a
employee contract for a year as a legal
assistant it states l'm a employee. Part
of the contract was to cosign for my
housing because I has to relocate for
the job and my credit was a issue. And
it states they acknowledge I have no
experience. I am the only employee at
the lawfirm it's a PLLC. They are also
aware that I'm a Professional Dominatrix
And that they will help me with some
dental issues and I will pay them back
in sessions. But while in the office the
problems started to occur when me
being a Dominatrix was brought up by my
boss a Lawyer at work. We had two other
lawfirms that shared the office space
I would address that it was humiliating
and to please stop. And it started to be
very uncomfortable in the office. And if
I did not comply with sessions he made
work unbearable. When my daughter
was sexually assaulted I asked to stop
sessions yet he continued to ask and
the only way to end where I would feel
ok at work was to have a session. Which
he would hold against me and often not
credited it as paying him back. He started
to deduct my pay without telling me.just went deeper in debt with him and the
bills were confusing. He would ask me
to live with him and threatened me that
if I didn't do a good job that would lead
to him reaching out to management and
removing his name off the lease which
would lead me to eviction. Which was
telling me that's the consequences of
not having sessions. He told me in Sept
he was going to just say it was my teeth
and wrote it off as a bad investment. But
I have proof I paid.He stated he would
give me a w2 to our terms and we orally
extended it until October when he fired
me. Then requested and demanded I
do work for him. Or I'd lose housing
He took payments out of my other job I
also have with him which is 840 a month
and he takes out the 50 dollars for car
payments. So it's 790 and you can see
the deductions. And then I ended up with
no car and he tried to change everything
and say I could now rent the car. He
wrote to take his name off the lease. And
he used a business card to pay for my
deposit and moving and added me as a
user before I moved. I had asked him to
put 30k on my tax form and he put 35k.
So I admit I was wrong and I have triedto reach out to him to fix this. And I was
afraid and not getting help from anyone.
I was facing eviction and wanted to go
back home. But my pay is completely
wrong and he gave me a 1099 when it
states I was a employee and the last
email complies he will send me a w2 that
complies with our agreement. When I
asked for proof of what I was paid he
gave me his bank statements totalling
4k . Which I did reach out to them and tell
them we know the amount is wrong and
classification and to please fix. But we
had a agreement for 40 hours a week at
$20 a hr for 52 weeks. Holidays and sick
pay. We talked in emails about insurance
and in texts I have documented as well.
And they garnished me whole payment
of that other job. even though it states if
'm terminated I am able to keep working
my other job I have through him. And I
can verify I have worked since 2018 with
them for him . And the reason was I owe
him money. And he did that after he put
me in housing eviction kept the car and
gave me false tax forms and wouldn't fix
them. I'm facing eviction and they knew I
was. And now I could lose everything and
be stuck in a state I have no friends or family. I will lose my dog is viable to my
ptsd I suffer from and have since I was
a teen. I have always paid bills on time
and I have gotten myself off ssi and got
a job due to my dog. Iwas able to have
the confidence to be around people and
not hide. This has taken over my life and
have tried to seek help in my situation.
didn't in detail explain this to The Bar and
they said it was a civil matter the EEOC
replied but it doesn't fall under Federal
law and I didn't explain the financial part
But I do not know what to do. Any advice
would be greatly appreciated and yes I
nave documents to support everything
I was paid via zelle or cash app but it is
linked to there account.
",AskLawyers
"[IL] Domestic/family lawsuit, multiple questions, Which Motion is Most Appropriate?","Hey everyone! I am a first semester paralegal student who has taken on the ambitious task of pro se representation in a domestic/family lawsuit which was filed against me by my daughter's father &amp; counsel for co-guardianship (06/2023). My daughter's father did not tell his counsel that our daughter is a respondent in a concurrent juvenile case which has been ongoing since 05/16/2023, so the domestic lawsuit has been on hold per the domestic judge, and is still on hold until 05/14/2024. In the time between the last domestic suit court date (01/23/2024) and now, I have: 

* filed a Motion to Dismiss Due to Lack of Jurisdiction;
* An Amended Motion to Dismiss Due to Lack of Jurisdiction (I used an improper ILCS in the first MTD);
* My daughter's father incurred a plenary order of protection by our daughter's guardian. Our daughter is listed as a petitioner on the order and he is unable to see her until 03/2026;
*  My daughter's father's counsel filed for Motion to Withdraw on 03/26/2024 from the domestic lawsuit and again for MTW on 03/27/2024 from the juvenile case. They have yet to be approved.

Now, from my understanding, I have used up all of my Motion to Dismiss cards. Correct me if I'm wrong about that because I feel like if I filed MTD Due to New Evidence or whatever concerning the order of protection, the judge may consider it. 

Everywhere that I have read, though, says that you can only file MTD twice and that the next best motion to file would be Motion for Summary Judgment. MfSJ just seems like kind of demanding and serious and final to me, and I anticipate that if I file that particular motion I will not win a lot of points with the judge. On the other hand, MfSJ also seems very condemning and concluding and like it would, if approved, but this whole disaster lawsuit in the garbage. My daughter's father probably will not even show up to the May court date because his attorney wants to withdraw. I feel like since she filed for MTW I have more control in this case, but I don't want to make the next move incorrectly. 

Any suggestions, comments, discussion is very appreciated. Thank you kindly. ",AskLawyers
[FL][SC] Legal options,"On Thursday I noticed an unauthorized charge for $598 on my debit card. The charge was for something tax related in South Carolina and I live in Florida. I'm planning on filing a police report because I'd imagine for a specific dollar amount the county could give the police the name and address of the thief. If I were to do so, and the police are able to locate said thief, would I have any legal recourse?",AskLawyers
[OH] Rights of an 18 year old student. ,"

 
 Hello, a little back story here. This question is for my stepson. When his Mom and Dad divorced, mom was given custody, dad got weekends and one evening per week. Son turned 18 in February and will graduate high school in May. He has a very good relationship with us, not as good with his mom. She has been very controlling and manipulative.  Son has expressed to us over the last year that when he graduates he wants to move in with us. But he has been afraid to tell his mom these plans. His mom would not take him to get his drivers lisence so when he turned 18 he asked his dad to take him. We also bought him a car.  His mom got very upset over this and said it was illegal since she still has control over him. Is this really illegal, and what rights does he have as an 18 yr old? Can she take the car away from him?  We are also taking him to a college visit that is far away on ""her weekend"". She doesnt want to let that happen either. Understanding that he does need to still follow her rules while living in her house. She has him so manipulated and brainwashed that he doesnt want to defy her. I am going to call the family court and ask them as well. Thanks for any advise here! ",AskLawyers
"[FL] I was robbed last year and now served a subpoena, what’s next?","I was robbed and served a subpoena, what’s next?

January of last year myself and 2 other people (one being the owner of the store and other my coworker) were robbed at gunpoint at my place of business. They took everything but our car keys. He tried to steal my bosses Jaguar but couldn’t figure out how to unlock it (figures). Funny thing is (not very funny) these guy went viral on the internet for robbing an Amazon truck and was served a warrant and soon arrested. (Look up florida man robs Amazon truck and you will find it) 

If you are still reading, between the two people that robbed us, they share over 85 felony charges and 11 convictions as per reports. How are these people still in the streets??? Do people do these crimes solely to go back to jail? 

Anyways, it looks like the two cases were consolidated and I have to testify in a few months. I’ve never done that before so what can I expect during this process? I honestly forgot this happened to me last year, I soon quit that job and forgot all about it but after being served this subpoena I’m thinking about it again and it’s honestly quite traumatizing in reality 

Thank you!",AskLawyers
[NY] Is this harassment? What can I do?,"We have a neighbor in our complex that has been a problem for a while now. We keep to ourselves and have never done anything to bother her. She is constantly targeting someone; calling the police on them and/or making complaints to the landlord. Now for the last 3 years, she has been targeting us. She has called CPS on us 3 times- all for false allegations and all allegations were unfounded. She has called my job multiple times trying to get me fired, written letters to the landlord in attempt to get us evicted, and now claims she is trying to sue us for HER “distress” because we called the police on her to see what our options were because now she has started recording my kids whenever they are playing outside. The cops claim none of this is harassment and don’t want to do anything about it. What can we do to get her to stop? She’s threatening my children’s stability, the roof over their heads, and the job that provides for them. There has to be something…. ",AskLawyers
[FL] How much money can I be expected to make as a Financial/Corporate Lawyer?,"The title basically, but I want to know down the line how much opportunity there is. I’ll be frank, I want the highest paying field and to be able to make millions a year. Ambitious, I know, but it is my goal and want to know how possible it is. Would it be more lucrative to open my own firm? ",AskLawyers
[LA] Article 9 of the UCC and the Louisiana Civil Code," 

# Greetings,

I am researching about the 'security interest' in Article 9 UCC and the other 'security' in Louisiana's Civil Code. Except from the 'pledge', the 'mortgage' and the 'privilege' from the Civil Code is seemed to be almost indistinguishable from the Article 9 'security interest'. So, I would like to ask:

1. What is the difference between Article 9's 'security interest' and the Civil Code Art. 3138 'mortgage' and 'privilege'?
2. If there is no difference, thus the Civil Code 'mortgage' and 'privilege' can be a Article 9 'security interest' and vice versa, how to determine the applicable statute for the two identical security devices?

I would be extremely grateful to receive any clarifications. Thank you in advance for any help as I'm in a burden of a legal research in law school.  
Thank you so much.",AskLawyers
[OH] Roommate Friend Damaged Products - Vintage Designer Bags ,"Hi everyone, 

I am a senior in college in NE Ohio who recently started a small business in sourcing/selling vintage designer bags. 

My roommate threw a party in which two people went into my room without permission to have sex. They threw 42 of my products which were on my bed on wire metal hangers into a giant pile. I had a photoshoot that day and left for the weekend, no time to put away products. This caused AT LEAST $6k in repairs due to major scratches, holes, and some bags are misshapen. 15 bags are damaged. 

They both admit to entering my room but the female party said she didn’t touch or see anything. She has blocked me and my roommate. I have texts from her and my roommate saying the guy confirmed he did it. After I confronted him for damages he also denied everything, stating this is a dispute I should have with my roommate. He hasn’t blocked me though because he is an international athlete for a local university and I contacted his coach to respond to me after initially ignoring my messages. 

I have filed a police report. However, I think for at least 1-2 of my bags there is major damages(multiple holes in rare vintage print) that I will not be able to get repaired. I really tried to handle this amicably. I didn’t want to get either party in trouble legally esp as one is an international student. 

I don’t know whether to file a small claims charge(only up to 6k) or hire a lawyer to help me get the full cost of my damaged products back. Who do I even charge in this case? What would you do? Is my roommate responsible? ",AskLawyers
[CO]Boss could be stealing my(21F) benefits PLEASE HELP,"Some context: I’m a body tech apprentice. Went to school for it and already was at a body shop, but they weren’t good. I found this really cool job down in Denver/Aurora, I get paid 22/hr and I’m on flate rate, if we complete car quick the more hours we get. But I only get 25% of the hours.
It’s an hour, hour and a half away from me, depending on traffic. 
But in the beginning of March I had plans on the first Friday to pick up a new puppy. I asked mid February because it’s common to ask two weeks before hand right? 
NOPE. 
For future days off I need to ask a MONTH before hand.
Cool whatever. Both my mentor and manager said it was okay. 
Then that following week or so we had a bad snow storm for two days that made where I live, difficult to get out with a FWD car. It also didn’t make sense to me to take 3hours or so to get to work, then leaving before 3-4 so I don’t get trapped in really bad traffic or weather. But both my bosses think I should’ve went in on those two days. Then I took a sick day on this past Monday because last weekend I had a BAD stomach bug and was still going through it on Monday. 

My Problem:
After all that both my mentor and Boss think that I should back pay, pay out of my OWN pocket: my mentor for all the days I missed EVEN WHEN ITS PTO/PSL(paid sick leave that Colorado gives us AS A BENEFIT BY LAW)
We get around 320-350 hours from the cars we get. So I’m putting in work and so is he. 
I barely make $1200 a paycheck. 
He makes A LOT more but still choosing to think that I should pay him on ANY type of leave. 
I think it’s a violation because I don’t get any time or money from my right of benefits. 
I also think it’s cause I’m a woman, because I’m the only woman apprentice in the shop. 
I asked around and no one does this. Even the ones that missed a day or two out of the week. 


I’m so stuck and confused on what to do. ",AskLawyers
[CA] dui revoked my license and I got stoped before i could get things fixed,"I got stoped tonight as I went to get food, my tag were expired and my car was impounded.
In the process I was informed that my license was suspended. I have a DUI that I’m working on getting fixed but I didn’t know that my license was suspended. He gave me a ticket with a court date. What will it happen now? And I have to go to jail?",AskLawyers
[CO]  sister and I are trying to simplify what needs to be done when she is gone. ,"My sister is 16 years older than me and is in poor health.  We have been talking about what needs to be done when she passes, however, I would like to know what I need to know/do when the time comes. 

This is what has been done to date:
1. She has a will stating I am to get everything. I am beneficiary on all of her money accounts, bank and retirement.  I also know where all this info is kept. 
2. She has pre-paid for her funeral.  We have also discussed where and what should be on her headstone. 
3. I have all information for her credit cards (she rarely uses them and when she does she pays them in full immediately. So this will probably only require me to close the accounts. 
4. The only property she owns is a car and household goods.  I am on the car title with rights of survival. 
5. I know that I need to contact Social Security and her widow's pension to report that she is gone. 
6. We have gotten her a living will and do not resuscitate filed with her Dr's office and both have copies. 

What other things will I need to know or do when the time comes? ",AskLawyers
[WA] rent drop ,"Got a notice from our landlord (mostly only business talk type), 2 months ago our rent would drop 250 dollars. Letter had our names, our exact unit, and her signature at the bottom on it. Now she sent me a text after the fact, saying it was meant for a single unit she mistaked for ours. Should I bother filling a suite for this, or just suck it up and look for new places. 
Note: we are at the end of our obligated year long lease, and it goes month to month after. Where it is stated our rent would've gone done. Which is also the month a year from where we started our lease. Makes no sense this would be an honest mistake.",AskLawyers
[CA] Erasing my Criminal Record,"
Over 20 years ago, already an adult, I was
arrested for possession of a controlled substance and under the influence. I was given DEJ and started going to rehab classes. I was arrested a second time for possession for sale and a dumb one for carrying a dirk or dagger(it was a cigarette lighter). My first felony was brought down to misdemeanor once completing a program. I also filed for expongement which went through. My record still comes out when I do fingerprint scans. I want to remove it from my record permanently, for many reasons, but mostly for good jobs, volunteering at my kids school, purchasing firearms. I have been a clean and productive member of society since 2002. It's all in the past. What are my chances of removing from record and how can I get an attorney at low cost. I'm live about 30 miles from DTLA.",AskLawyers
[OH] Is it legal to displace a disabled person &amp; their family? ,"My old landlord sold the house I (f51) and husband (m63) have lived in for the past 7 years on a month to month basis. The new owner bought the house on a Monday and on Wednesday her lawyer posted a notice that we have to vacate the property by April 15th. My husband is retired and disabled. I suffer from severe anxiety, depression, bipolar 1 and chronic PTSD. All of this makes it difficult for me to keep employment. We have been looking for a new place since we got the notification. BUT we had 2 F3 tornados go through our area at the same time and damaged 133 homes. Now there is nothing available to rent and our credit is the best so we can't buy a home. We were not directly effected by the tornados, just by everything being rented out or rent elevated so high we can't afford it. My question is... Since we were effected (indirectly) by a natural disaster, is it legal for our landlord to displace us? We have asked for additional time to find a place further out if our area, but have not heard from them yet. FYI new owner wants to gut the house and do a total rehab.

TIA
Almost Homeless &amp; Anxiety Ridden ",AskLawyers
[GA] court case coming up,"

This isn't about me but someone close to me. 
The person got arrested the week of Christmas for driving on a suspended license. ( for what idk ) and in an uninsured car. 
The court date is coming up. 
And im curious/ worried what the worst outcome could be. 
Any insight from a lawyer would be nice. Thank you in advance !! ",AskLawyers
[NY] Rear ended in my driveway ,"I share a driveway with my neighbor. As I was leaving my apartment with my family to do some shopping my neighbor was getting dropped off by a friend who parked in the driveway. 

As he was going to back out to let us out he rolled into the back of my car. Then instead of reversing he was in drive and made it a little worse. 

There was some yelling, and I asked for his insurance info. He was clearly intoxicated and ignored me and stumbled into the neighbors apartment. So I called the local non emergency police line.

An accident report was filed by that officer, and I will need to go down to the station to pick it up in the next few days. I don't know how he wasn't arrested. He must have denied hitting my car at all or being behind the wheel. I'll have to find out from the officers report. 

The damages are cosmetic, and under different circumstances I would have just let this go. 

I would be inclined to be petty and get insurance involved after his behavior, but not to my own detriment. My understanding of the NY no fault insurance rules is my insurance company would be covering my damages, meaning I'm still subject to my deductible and a potential increase to my coverage at renewal. 

If someone would be kind enough to weigh in on if I understand the likely outcome of this situation correct I'd appreciate it",AskLawyers
[OH] Got My 1st DUI any tips?? What should I do when I go to court??   ,"
 I just got my first DUI (yes I know, smart fuckin move) but I’m really struggling with what I should do I have people telling me to plead no contest but my father is telling me to plead not guilty, but I have no clue what to actually do. Honestly I just need public opinion.",AskLawyers
[IL] How to get a public defender ,"Update: I got it figured out. My husbands attorney was able to get us court for this Thursday, because it’s a DCFS case I will get a public defender (per my case worker, sons GAL, soon to be ex-husbands attorney, and I called the public defender’s just to be sure) Thank you all for the great advice, even the negative Nancy’s. A lot of you gave me amazing resources and I will always be grateful to you wonderful strangers XD

I am a first time mom. About 3 weeks ago my husband of 3 years dumped me because I told him I was struggling with postpartum depression. I was living with him so I effectively became homeless. (I am a foster kid and have really deep issues with abandonment) I made the stupid decision to attempt to take my life. My 5 month old son was sleeping in his nursery and I overdosed on otc medication in the master bedroom. My soon to be ex-husband called 911. Because there was a minor in the house, DCFS got involved. My husband was on anti-depressants so DCFS took our son. My husband went to court 4 days later and was awarded temporary full custody of our son. I did not appear at court (as I was hospitalized due to the suicide attempt) and the judge placed a 2-25 order of protection on me since I did not appear in court. I am now out of the hospital and staying in a hotel until I can get accepted into a homeless shelter. I cannot see my son until I appear in court. I cannot afford an attorney. I was told I can’t get a public defender until I apply to see the judge but I don’t know how to do that. I have applied for outside legal aid but I am struggling with getting help. From what it sounds like, I just need to appear before the judge and then I will get supervised visits until I complete therapy/take my medication’s for a specific amount of time. During the determination of my son’s custody, the judge made it clear to my husband that I could not become homeless due to the protection order. But I also can’t live at home with the protection order in place. I’m very confused on what to do.",AskLawyers
[OH] Can traffic police have black tinted windows? (And other sketchy behavior),"I live in a small town in Ohio and about a year ago, our small town police switched from their marked vehicles to:

-unmarked
-black tinted windows (completed obscured)
-they often drive at night with no front lights

For context, our police department has no actual employees. They rent out cops from other jurisdictions to hand out parking tickets, and they only hand them out to non-residents. (Meaning if they pull you over and your license has our town address, they won’t give you a ticket.)

Is any of this against state regulations? If so, how would one go about reporting them?",AskLawyers
[NE] Lost 2022 tax refund no one will take responsibility. ,"Long story very condensed.  Lmbc we have been looking for and tracking down my bf (58) 2022 tax refund since April of 2023. This was when he realized it had been long enough and started to get concerned. So.. started with IRS they said it was sent to the account and routing number on the 1040 that was filed.. that is a CAshapp account that uses Sutton bank for the account and routing numbers. Supposedly neither has access to the other information regarding ownership of the account. So unless you know the cash tag or email or phone number that was used to set up the account then you have no access to any of that information and cash app will not budge on this at all. (Account may be an old one of his or the person he trusted to do his taxes was doing some shady stuff, we still don't know for sure). After much leg work on my part this is the story we have put together IRS sends $ to TurboTax so they can get paid for the e-filing.  This is done through their bank (green dot bank). Green dot claims to have sent the refund -turbo taxes fees to the same account and routing numbers on the 1040... They claim it was deposited on 02/23/23!!!! Oh but NO cash app will not even tell us if those number have his name attached to them or if it is someone else's . We don't even want the name of the other person. We just want the refund found and put into the correct account. .. fast forward to October of 2023 yes been working and emailing and calling every few days all that time. Cashapp FINDS the refund !!! But won't give US access or transfer to his current account, but they claim to know where it is and they are working on the problem. After many more weeks of back and fourth and all the BS you can imagine. (My bf and I had split up 2 times  over this stress and B S ). Cash app now claims to have found it and sent it back to the IRS ... It's doesn't have it and have put yet another trace on it ... There is a ton more to this just know I have used every channel available some not so legal (but harmless)  to try to help... How do we go about holding someone responsible for his loss??? The refund is larger then small claims court top amount and I would like to put the hurt on CAshapp for their horrible business practics and customer service( they will hangup). CAshapp has even gone so far as to reword and change some of its own policies that oddly have an association to this whole issue. Also have not gotten his state refunds either  #cashappishorrible..",AskLawyers
"[TX] Just finished up probation. Not really hoping for an OND, but I'd like to know if it's possible","Let me start by saying that since I committed the act over two years ago, finally got a court day over a full year ago, and finishing probation a months ago, a lot has changed. I've got a haircut, lost 50lbs, got a new car, increased my credit score 70 points, got a girlfriend, kept my job through all of it and actually got promoted (effectively twice). I'm so happy and grateful to myself for not giving up, facing the music, and coming out a better person. And I'm eternally more grateful no one got hurt. 



Now, you're not here for my advice. I'm actually here your your advice. However, my advice would be to all of you to
1. Not wait until *after* you total your car on a pole and get arrested with a little over .2 BAC (class A misdemeanor DWI in Texas) to get your life together
And 2. Even if you already fucked up, *do not give up*. 



Anyways, my perspective at the time was that the plea deal wasn't that bad. Fines, fees, and six months jail that could be substitutes for a year of community supervision. Probation includes monthly visits to PO, more fines and fees,community service, and an interlock on my car, and for that you guessed it: more fines and fees. After all of that, it still sounded like a good deal even if it almost bankrupted me. Even then, I kept my job and quit drinking, so it's not like I couldn't swing it. 



The only thing I regret not looking into at the time is seeing if a future Order of Non-Disclosure was possible. A DWI on record isn't exactly flattering, but it's by no means an all-exclusive Scarlett letter. I know I'll never win everyone over, but I don't care to. Some people will look at me and think I'd be better served rotting in a ditch, but I don't care. I know my worth and potential, and I've demonstrated it. By no means will I be unable to find peace without the OND. 


After all that, I would still really like to pursue one of it's available. I understand this is very unlikely, but does anyone know if I can have ordered an OND after the case has been closed on a Class A Misdemeanor DWI conviction in Texas? ",AskLawyers
[non-US] My father broke his arm,"Hello, my dad and I,(Romania country)went to a cafe, sitting on the terrace, and when he sat down on the chair, the chair being next to the terrace steps, a bit of the step cracked and he fell with all his weight on his hand. He broke his hand and has it in plaster. How can I resolve this dispute? Can I sue the cafe for negligence on the terrace? How and where do I start, thank you for your time, have a nice life ahead.",AskLawyers
"[WA] L&amp;I Workers Comp Claim Denied, can a lawyer take my case? ","Hi all,

I received an electrical injury at work back in January. After notifying my employer that I was injured and was going to seek treatment, I went to a hospital and was evaluated with an exam and EKG and was discharged same day. During my visit I filled out a workers compensation form. 
I have now been notified by Washington state L&amp;I that my claim has been denied due to them being unable to verify if the injury occurred on the job and I have been given a nearly $1,000 bill. According to them, the paperwork they received did not include the physicians notes about if my injury was workplace related.

Should I attempt to retain a lawyer for this, or just eat the bill? Thank you for any and all advice. 
",AskLawyers
[IN] do I need a name to file a small claims case?,"I live in north west Indiana. September of 2023 my neighbors dog killed my dog through our fence in a pretty brutal way. He ripped his tounge off through the chain link fence. I won't go into all the gory and sad details but a dog cant eat or drink without its tongue. So we had to put our dog down.

Before the incident that would lead to my dogs death we had other incidents of his dog attacking mine. He agreed to take steps to have a schedual set where the dogs would be let out at different times so they wouldn't run into each other. I also put up a privacy fence liner in hopes it would stop them from interacting but both dogs ripped up the liner. We kept with the schedule and he did not ultimately leading to the night in question. 

I want to take him to small claims to get some sort of compensation since we spent almost 7k on treatment attempts before my dog was putdown. The problem I'm running into is I don't know his name only his nickname. He doesn't own the house next door and he doesn't really interact with other neighbors. 

I tried to dig though his garbage a few times to see if I could find a letter or something but it's been 6 months and no luck. It's like he never gets mail or he just hoards it in his house or something. Getting a PI seems silly since it would probably cost to much and basicly take most of any possible winning to pay for one.I was wondering if any lawyers know if I can still sue him under John doe?",AskLawyers
"[FL] I want to create a fun meme cryptocurrency, what are the legal/tax implications for me?","The coin would be for fun and kinda like dogecoin or Banano.

Just need to know the legal implications of it all.
",AskLawyers
[CA] Advice: Non-Compete Clause in Job Offer - California Law Query,[CA] Advice: Non-Compete Clause in Job Offer - California Law Query,AskLawyers
[OH] what is the age of consent?,"As far as I’m aware, age of consent in Ohio is 16 due to ORC § 2907.04, however I am afraid I might misinterpret it’s actual meaning and I just want to make sure I won’t get in legal trouble if me and my girlfriend sleep together (both 16)",AskLawyers
[MD] Pornhub bans crossing state lines,"With states putting bans for Pornhub, how is it legal when those bans start spreading into states with no ban?

Example: if you’re a resident of Maryland your mobile carrier can route your connection through Virginia and you would see a “Sorry Virginia has blocked Pornhub” message even when you’re far far away from Virginia.",AskLawyers
[DC] Question about US bill process,"Imagine that parliament wants to pass a new law, but head of house of representatives, head of senate and POTUS doesn't want this law, so they refuse to sign it or begin the voting process.
How many members of the parliament shout vote in every voting to beat 3 vetos?",AskLawyers
[TN] possible wage theft?,"Long post.. please bear with me. I’ve been bartending at a college bar in Tennessee, recently the owners went on vacation so one of the other bartenders was doing the checkouts. One night, we use toast, we all noticed that there was the owed to the business amount which subtracted the cash in hand ( we don’t have cash in hand we use a bar drawer) and the total tip amount, the main owner always goes by the owed amount which sometimes would be same as the total tip, sometimes could be a couple hundred dollars less. We brought it up to the owner ( who also will work and add herself in the tip pool, which may be a whole other issue in itself) and she had just brought up the previous shift where the difference was only 24 dollars. Proceeded to call us greedy for making 1000 in tips collectively but then wants to complain about 24 dollars, which isn’t the point of 24 dollars it’s the fact it’s our money that is being taken no matter the amount.  They also recently starting putting on a 3.29 credit card fee which yes I understand, but the first night they added it on it was 10 percent of our tips and nothing was brought up again why so much was taken out that one night, which would have been 60 dollars they took from us that night. She told us that if there was an issue with the money we should have brought it up before signing the checkout, which isn’t that easy because I did with the 10 percent and she literally said she didn’t know. I still work here, because it’s hard where I live to get a job in the summer, but what can be done about this? Especially since I guess we agreed to the money from signing the checkout. They act like they did nothing wrong at all.",AskLawyers
[FL] Does this constitute fraud by a college?,"
I’ve been having some issues with my former college going back almost a full year now that mainly relate to their inability to communicate with me about anything, but that story takes up more words than Reddit allows in a post so I’ll do my best to distill what I believe constitutes fraud on behalf of my former university. I have two dates I believe these occurred on. 

Date 1:

In November of 2023 I filed a formal grievance with a public university over their general mistreatment of me over a 4 month time span which had resulted in me choosing to drop out of my chosen program and seek alternative educational arrangements. 

It was finally answered in December of 2023. 

On my official grievance paperwork it shows an attempt was made to contact me on 13 December and then the grievance was closed on 15 December. The problem here is that contact was made with me twice on 14 December and it is not notated anywhere. Now a reasonable person would see this and conclude I was never spoken to, but this is not the case. However, I would need to see other grievance forms where contact was made to have proof if this is document falsification or not. 

I was also not notified as to why my grievance was closed as resolution had not been reached by the end of the second phone call on 14 December. 

On 14 December I was assured that my grades had all been changed to shown “Withdrawn,” that my academic advisor had been changed, and that members of the ADA office would be reaching out to me through email as my work schedule did not permit me to make phone or office contact as they were only open at what was essentially 2am for me. 

Date 2:

A different member of the office of the provost made contact with me in January of 2024. I stated what I wanted for resolution given what I had been speaking about with the previous provost who promised to contact me by 16 January. 

They left a voicemail on 18 January stating they were unable to make changes to my grades. 

This struck me as odd given that a whole month earlier I had been assured this action had already occurred so I logged back in to my student portal only to see that not only had none of my grades been changed, but that I still had the same academic advisor. I have also never been contacted by this college’s ADA office.

 It is now the end of March and despite reaching out to the office of the president and the college’s legal counsel the only contact I have received from this college in the past 3 months is a phone call telling me I owe them $800. 

I’m fairly certain a school representative blatantly lying about services rendered constitutes fraud and I want to either be able to sue them for it or at the very least write a strongly worded email to the state department of education about this.

",AskLawyers
[NJ] My father's will is missing.,My father passed and the will is missing. My stepmother insists there never was one. I am his only child. My daughter and two of my cousins physically saw a copy of one when working for him. His current lawyer sides with my stepmother because he never did one for him. How do I go about trying to find it? Or contest the deathbed video will she made? He died very unexpectedly. We thought he would get better and come home. He was having problems with his kidneys. Was in the hospital less than 2 weeks and on morphine after week 1 to make him comfortable. ,AskLawyers
 [TX] Wife’s parents my in-laws have threatened to take our son from us. ,"So my wife and I have been married for 1y now and we have a some who’s 1y and 4months in April. Her dad and Mom have threatened us on multiple occasions stating they’ll take us to court and take our son from us. First it was if she didn’t leave me and she didn’t so they called a lawyer and sat with him and we didn’t hear anything from after that. 

Second they threatened to take him again because I told them they weren’t allowed in my home because they keep disrespecting our relationship and don’t respect us. 


Third my wife and I had a falling out but we fixed it and she returned with me and once again they threatened to take us to court and take our son from us. We haven’t done anything bad to him. I work 40+ hours a week for my family and my wife is a stay at home mom right now. We don’t do any hard drugs. I smoke weed and they’ve threatened us on that too but I never do it around my son and don’t even keep it in the home.  

Can they take him from us? 

EDIT: To everyone mentioning the weed. I know it’s not a problem because my brother had CPS go to his house because people were saying that he was doing hard drugs and his drug test was only positive for THC and the CPS agent said they can’t do anything about it due to most states legalizing it and that sooner than later it’ll be legal in Texas so they don’t bother with it anymore. ",AskLawyers
[CO]I (F21) think my bosses are trying to take my benefits,"Some context: So I work at a body shop in Denver as an apprentice, I went to school, had a job at another shop didn’t work out. But I’m on flat rate, and I get 25% of what ours we get every two weeks. I make 22/hr and he makes 28/hr give or take. 
But w/ our hours he makes A LOT more than me. I’m barely getting $1200 a check. While he’s getting around $4k AFTER taxes. 
I digress. 
Only been here for a few months. 
Mind you I live an hour away(due to traffic). 
I missed a couple of days in the beginning-ish of march because I got my puppy and I didn’t know you have to ask a MONTH before hand for time off. Cool, whatever, both my mentor and my manager said it was fine. 
But then like the next week we got that snow storm and I couldn’t make into work for that Thursday and Friday because I was scared for my safety and it makes NO sense for me to go out of my way to travel 2-3hrs for work because of weather conditions and traffic. Then stay there and maybe get trapped in. 
Then I took a sick day not that long ago because my fiancé gave me a nasty stomach bug that I was dealing w all weekend and called off that Monday using my paid sick time that Colorado gives us AS A BENEFIT.  


The main problem is: Both of my bosses wants me to pay my mentor any time missed. EVEN if it’s sick time and/or PTO. So if I take sick time or a PTO, I have to back pay my mentor for the day(s) I wansn’t there. But my mentor has the right to take a week off in April. Which means I’ll be doing all the work. While he gets most of the pay for MY work. But he doesn’t need to reimburse me?? 
Also none of the other apprentices in the shop that are male have to do this. 

I think it’s because I am a woman in this industry and isn’t the first time a shop tried to come at me and make me look stupid. 

I’m so confused. I called so many employment lawyers. None has gotten back to me. I need help. ",AskLawyers
? Planned a weekend away for my husband…,"Husband is turning 31, and I last minute planned a weekend trip for him, myself and our two little girls (2) and (1) to a farm stay. 
Initially we spoke about planning a ‘adult’ weekend where we leave the kids with the grandparents and have a weekend to just chill out. Or, try and round up our friends to go out for a drink in the city however, that is harder nowadays as we all have young children.
Anyway, I didn’t get around to asking grandparents to baby sit and I thought a cute family trip would be a nice way to celebrate. I found a really nice farm stay with lots of activities to do.

When I told my husband I had planned that, he seemed disappointed. 
He said yeh, sounds fun for the kids…implying that it isn’t really for his birthday.
I feel down because he doesn’t seem excited by it, but I also feel annoyed because I still feel like it is a nice way to spend a birthday….
I feel like addressing it with him, but it will lead to an argument…am I an asshole or is he being a sook about it? 
Should I bring it up or just push forward and make the most of the weekend with our little family and hope he makes light of it at the end. 

——&gt; update
Overwhelmed with responses that IATA. I see it now, and I will be more attentive and approach this differently for next time. 
Thanks to those who saw this in the lens that my intentions were good. 
To those saying I should have just call up the help, there’s such thing as hyper independence that I struggle with, something I need to learn to work through. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my sister to knock before entering out shared room?,"Me and my younger sister live at home at my parents house in a shared space. I have recently become slightly insecure and wanted a bit more privacy. So I decided to ask my sister if she could knock before entering the room out of politeness. She was outraged by this and got very angry. She said that we were both girls and it didn't matter if I was changing and if I was worried about it to stay behind the door. Mind you the space behind our door is small barely enough room to move and she has stuff all over the floor there. We've had many fueds over our small shared space, she likes to read out loud and late into the night or listen to podcasts and I like to play on my phone or listen to asmr to sleep. She wants light, I want darkness, she wants to sleep in. I want to get up early. It's gotten to the point where we fued every night. As the eldest of 5 children in a 3 bedroom house I'm great full for the decent space and what privacy I do have but I've become rather frustrated over this privacy issue... am I really in the wrong for asking for more space?",AmItheAsshole
 for flirting friends while on dr*GS ?,"I am on mobile and it's a throwaway account, english isn't my first langage. 


Everything began two months ago in techno parties in my city. In those parties all my friend's take m*lly, we all kiss each other and never judge any of us for everything we say or do on those parties because we know we are on drugs. So it was a safe place for me. We said to eachother that if we do something wrong, we should talk about it right away so we know the limit we should'nt cross. 


I started going to these parties with my best friend Eduard who intruduced me to his group of friends, including Lana with whom I became really close, she is a really good person.
However, at the last techno party, I've said many things to Saïd, Lana's boyfriend. And as I heard, I' ve told many things to Lana and her friends too. Apparently, I suggested threesome, showed my flipside with sexy pictures to Saïd and things like that. In a previous party she said if she wasn't with Saïd she would be with me, she kissed my crush and me and other people because that's what we do in those parties and I'm totally fine with it. At the moment, everything was doing well, everybody enjoyed the party and we all came home together. I've talk to Lana many times after and it was fun &amp; fine.


After this party I talk to Eduard about what I did about the flipside thing and he said I shouldn't do that again but it wasn't a big deal.
I went on a trip and thought I should talk to Lana about that when I come back. 
Before I came back I recieved a text of Lana saying that I'm sexually devious and she doesn't want to have anything to do with me ever again, that nobody in the friend group want to see me again, that I crossed the limit.


I really regret but I don't think it's fair to call me sexually devious. 


So Am I The Asshole ?",AmItheAsshole
[ID] I have court this friday. What do I do?,"i’m a minor, 16, and i have to go to court this friday because i am a victim of CSA and the guy outed himself. i have severe anxiety, and i wholeheartedly do not want to go and be practically torn apart by defense lawyers. can i deny going up to the stand? how should i act in court? could i be vague with my answers in court? 

edit: thank you for all the wonderful advice,, although i don’t have energy to respond. i am taking a good portion of it (if not, all) to heart. truly thank you all for your very kind words. &lt;3 will update when court is done.",AskLawyers
[NY] Do i need permission from my producer to remake my song with a new beat (a new producer),"Lets say me and a producer made a song and released it. 50/50 split i claim the “lyrics” and he claims the “music” 

Could i re record my lyrics onto another producers beat or would i need permission to do that? ",AskLawyers
[GA] Possession Question,"Asking for a family friend. He bought a car through Carvana and sent them a check from Navy Federal for the vehicle. Carvana never cashed the check and once the check was past expiration Navy Fed refused to issue a new one without a total reapplication process. The title for the car came through the mail in my friends name. Carvana wants the car back so he told them where they could pick it up. It’s been 12 months since he took possession  of the car and has been carrying insurance on it but hasn’t been driving it. It’s been in the same location he told Carvana to pick it up at. What do you do in this situation? I feel like this is a screw up on Cavana’s side and even if they get the car back, they are the ones who abandoned it for 12 months while he’s paid to store it and insure it. Carvana’s “lawyer” reached out in January asking him to send photos of the car to determine if Carvana would be willing to “accept the car back”.

Any insight is greatly appreciated! ",AskLawyers
 for asking my partner to wait and take language classes with me? ,"Posting on mobile - edited format / English not my language 

My partner and I (early 30s) have been together for 5+ years. We recently moved to a new country for his job. I was a bit sad, but it was an exciting opportunity to move somewhere new together and [specifically] learn a new language - we were both really excited about this and started on Duolingo as soon as we learned of the move, with the plan to take group classes so we can get more practice and make friends at a similar language level. 

The issue is, we both work (mostly) remote and are really busy at the end/start of the year. Until about two weeks ago, it was really hard to get outside for anything but basic necessities. After almost 5 months in this new place, we’re both still basic/ A1 level.

When my busy period ended two weeks ago and he encouraged me to start lessons right away so that I could “do it all” when we do go outside. I decided to wait for a few reasons:

1) We’re starting this life here together and it would be fun to learn and practice together. I also want us to be equally capable of navigating external interactions (e.g., communicating with landlord, going to the post office, ordering at restaurants, etc). Instead of over-relying on one of us

2) It would be nice to make new friends together. At home, we had completely separate interests and friend groups and never figured out how to socialize our relationship outside of each other. We would hang out with our own friends or each other, but never really with each other’s people. I’m happy to have a life outside of him, but this feels like a good opportunity to make some shared friends. 

So anyway, his last big deadline was yesterday and he’s really keen to get started on lessons.  Yay! I signed us up for placement exams at the local school for later this week but suggested we keep Duolingo-ing aggressively till June when I’m back from a work trip. The school has some intensive short courses, but all of the courses I can afford are three months long and already in progress.

In response, he says he really wants to start ASAP, and is planning to do the expensive intensive courses until and while I’m away, basically ensuring that we’ll never be in classes together at the same level. I didn’t say anything, but looked a little disappointed. He got annoyed and said…
- he had encouraged me to get started sooner, and I made the decision not to be practical 
- he’s been consistent about wanting to start ASAP, and doesn’t want to wait for the sake of romance
 - its okay to have separate things
- suggested I am being competitive about him getting better than me

I told him I understand and share both his desire and the practical need to learn the local language. I wish we could do it together but I’m not going to hold him back. That ended the conversation, but now he’s annoyed that “ I put a rain cloud over lessons” as something he was really excited about. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 if I get a small discreet tattoo of my moms unborn child,"I F23 have always been an only child so I’ve been told.
We went to a spiritual fortune teller as a family and when it was my moms turn, the fortune teller took one look at my mom and says “you have a boy following you.” My mom slowly nods and she says “did you lose a child, years ago?” And my parents confirmed they lost a baby during the first trimester. Initially, or until the fortune teller said, they had no idea it was a boy as it was too early to identify.

The fortune teller tells us that he has been following my mom but protecting the family but mostly me and my mom.

This would’ve been my younger brother &amp; 20/21 y/o today. I never knew until the fortune teller revealed it. I just feel so sorry for him because I didn’t know of his existence(spiritually) yet he’s been looking out for twenty years. My parents were able to ask him if he’s stuck or if he’s choosing to stay and turns out he’s chosen to stay all this time. We asked if he’d like to move on and he said yes and we said thank you we are fine and so he did move on. No one knew but them, not even family as they had not even made an announcement since it was the first trimester.

My parents never told me. They always said it’s been their intention I’m an only child. The way my parents lost it was pretty traumatic. I don’t blame them. I thought it was just a typical bleeding out miscarriage as that’s pretty common for fetuses/fertilized eggs to not make past the first tri. What happened was my parents did weekly scans and he was developing great, even stronger than me but my mom had an ectopic pregnancy and suddenly one day she was in a lot of pain and bleeding. They went to the emergency and did scans. My parents were extremely hesitant to let the baby go but seeing as my mom was critical, the baby couldn’t make it, and it could permanently damage my moms fallopians tube, they followed the doctors advice. What was so sad for them bc this fetus was currently alive and well, just in the wrong place and wouldn’t last long. My mom was rushed to emergency surgery to get the baby removed.

I want to get a very small tattoo located in an area covered clothes to dedicate it to my brother who chose to stick around for 20 years but idk if it would be rude for my parents. It would be something small like a single letter or wings maybe in my inner arm by my armpit/elbow. They’ve tried to push it to the back of their minds for years and my dad said don’t bring it up to my mom it’ll make her sad. I still have this guilt that I should acknowledge his existence and all he’s done. They’re not supportive of tattoos in general and they’d disprove of any tattoo.",AmItheAsshole
 for getting upset when someone was talking on the phone while I was trying to sleep?,"Hello. So for context, I invited someone to join me for a weekend music festival. I paid for the tickets and accommodations and did not ask to be paid for it. On the last night of the festival, we got back to our hotel very late (or early morning), and we had to check out by 11am the following day. We both wanted to sleep as much as possible as we had a few hours drive home.

We had two separate beds in a single hotel room and we both laid down in our beds. She complained multiple times of the light shining through the window and she got up to adjust the curtains. I was scrolling through social media, as I do every night before bed, as it helps quiet my brain and tire me out. I ended up accidentally clicking on something with music and I quickly exited the post because I didn't want to disturb her, but she turned around and said, ""you're keeping me up!"" So, I actually put my phone away and tried to sleep so I wouldn't bother her. Five minutes later, as i was just about to drift off to sleep, she complained about the lights again and asked me if it was bothering me. I ignored the question, as I was on the verge of falling asleep and didn't want to ruin it, but it startled me anyway and I endedup laying there for about an hour trying to sleep.

In the morning, at 9am, she got a phone call and answered it. I was not ready to wake up yet as I hadn't slept well. I asked her if she could have her friend call her later, but she ignored me and continued to chat while I was trying to sleep. The second time I said, ""I'm trying to sleep"", and she ignored me again. The third time, I called her name, and once again she ignored me. I got up (visibly upset) and said, ""fine! It's too late now, I'm up!"" I was not loud at all, as I was mostly talking to myself, but making it clear to her that she woke me.

She quickly ended her phone conversation and got up and began yelling at me about how she is allowed to have a conversation on the phone if she wants to and emphasizing that her conversation was only 6 minutes long. I told her that it is rude to talk on the phone while someone is trying to sleep in the same room, but she persisted with her point and I basically ignored her and began packing to leave, so she did the same. 

We didn't talk about it the whole way home, but then when we got home, she agrily brought it up again and said that what I did in the morning wasn't cool. I told her that I didn't do anything and that what she did wasn't cool and it was just rude. Then we parted ways. So am I the  a-hole for getting upset that she woke me and ignored my pleas for sleep?
",AmItheAsshole
 For Getting Mad at My Autistic Friend?,"I (24M), recently got into it with my friend who is diagnosed with anxiety and mild autism. It happened over them canceling plans last second due to an episode. This is the 3rd time they have canceled on our plans to hang out for “mental health issues” and I literally dont know what to do. Im frustrated because I feel like i’m putting in more effort than them when it comes to planning- even weeks in advance to accommodate their schedule. Cleaning my entire house and getting myself dressed/ready for their company is also time consuming. They are mad because they dont think i take their health seriously enough to count it as an actual reason to bail on plans. They also hate i use the word “excuse” when i confront this behavior as they dont see their actions as an excuse- more of a valid reason. Im torn because I really love this person but I dont enjoy that they’re not meeting their promises. I dont feel like they are putting in the same amount of effort. 

What would you say/do in this situation?",AmItheAsshole
 for letting my dogs wander into people's yards?,"To preface, I'm a 15 year old boy living in a pretty standard residential area. I've had dogs for my entire life, and currently my family has a labrador and a great dane. For the past 4 years or so, either me or my sister have been walking the dogs, twice a day, around the neighborhood. 

The layout of our area is pretty dense, in that we don't have any nature strip (think that's what it's called), so basically it's just people's yards, the sidewalk, and then the road. Most people don't have fences. I've always thought it was just accepted for people to let their dogs wander into people's yards, since it's the only actual grassy area for them to go on (I've never really seen dogs that want to explore/sniff/potty on the sidewalk or road). I've always done this, and I've seen multiple other dog owners do the same, with their dogs either on or off leash. I always leash them, but use a pretty long retractable leash.

Both my dogs are male, and quite territorial. The dane in particular will pee in probably 15-20 places on a walk, and I'm usually pretty laidback in letting both of them go where they want. Of course, if it's a man-made structure (like a garden gnome or a mailbox) I'll move them on, and I don't let them anywhere near yards with signs or fences, or ones that look particularly well cared for. But if it's your standard yard, I don't mind letting them wander and potty. I always pick up the poop, 100% of the time, and always have spare bags since sometimes they'll surprise me and take multiple dumps on a walk. 

This morning I was walking past a house at the end of my street. The dogs were probably 10 feet onto the property, and just having a sniff around, when the owner came out of the house. On cue (unfortunately) the lab popped a squat and began to empty the tank, but I didn't really think much. I just offered a friendly 'hello'. The owner didn't seem to impressed, and told me to 'get my dogs the f\*ck off his lawn'. I was a bit gobsmacked, as I hadn't really expected his reaction to be like that. Another dog owner who was passing by (with her dog off leash) told the man that he was a coward for yelling at a kid, and the man just told her to 'mind her f\*cking business'. 

I quickly ushered my dogs along and left as quick as possible. I'll avoid that house from now on, but I really didn't realise this was a big deal. My bedroom desk faces the window, and I've seen so many neighbors letting their dogs sniff, pee, and poop in our yard, and I've never batted an eyelid. It just seems to be the norm. Was I an AH for letting them do that? ",AmItheAsshole
 for referring to my brother’s ex as our baby sister?,"One of my dad’s best friends died when his daughter, Amelia, was 3 so my dad stepped up and has been playing a fatherly role to her ever since. My brother started dating Amelia 4 years ago which was super weird at first. They broke up 5 months ago and so Amelia isn’t around as much as she used to be which is sad.

My brother is seeing someone else and I was telling her a story which included Amelia. I clarified Amelia was our baby sister because that’s how we refer to her all of the time and his girlfriend said she thought Amelia was my brother’s ex so I confirmed she is. His girlfriend made a weird face but didn’t say anything else about it. A few of his friends were there too but they all know Amelia and our dynamic so none of them said anything, except for my brother who told me not to call her that and said she wasn’t actually family which upset me because she absolutely is.

He was annoyed already but things got worse because his best friend made a joke about how Amelia was a hot little thing so he wouldn’t have considered her as a baby sister either which made my brother angry and he told him not to talk about Amelia like that, which caused his friends to make fun of him for the big brother act.

After everyone left my brother told me Amelia was never our sister and I should stop pretending she is. I told him to fuck off because he doesn’t get to ruin my relationship with her because he was a shitty fiancé. My sister also agrees with me but my dad, of all people, thinks I should’ve left it alone.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I skip a family gathering because my dad's parents will be there?,"A little backstory. I (20/F) am not my parents' bio child. My mom (37/F) is technically my half-sister and my dad (37/M) is her husband. My bio parents are both addicts and have been in and out of prison for most of their lives. My parents got custody of me when I was 2 and I was adopted when I was 5. They are my real parents and I love them more than I can describe in this reddit post. 

  
My dad's side of the family  also has history of drug abuse and because of it my dad aged out in foster care, and has had no contact with his parents since he was about 15. That was until last year. His parents got clean about four years ago and last year they began to make amends with family. My aunt (my dad's sister) was the first to have contact with them after which she told my dad that they had truly turned their lives around and deserved a second chance. Eventually, my dad gave in and we had a nice family reunion. Everything was going relatively well, until his parents began making comments about my parents not getting any younger and how they'd make ""cute babies"" (I'm their only kid).

  
My dad laughed it off and made a joke about being a happy empty nester since I left for college and will not make the mistake to start over. His parents didn't get the hint and kept on going about how lovely it would be to have more children in the family and how they wish to become grandparents one day. Their wish came true and my aunt had a beautiful baby boy last month. I've already met the baby twice but my aunt will have a gathering to celebrate the baby's first 40 days of life (it's a thing in the baby's dad's culture). I haven't seen my dad's parents since that first gathering. Up until now I always had a good excuse to avoid them but this time I know it's a big deal for my aunt and I'd like to be there but the idea of hearing their comments again makes my stomach turn. My dad told me to come and he'll make sure that his parents keep their mouths shut but I don't want that sort of tension around my aunt who just had a baby. I honestly don't know what to do.",AmItheAsshole
 If I don't buy my father anymore gifts?,"Long time lurker, I'm a big fan of this sub. Also, english is not my first language, so excuse any mistakes.  
  
Anyway, I (27F) have always gone all way when gifting my beloved ones in special dates. It means Christmas, bdays, Valentines, Mother's and Father's day, all that. I set a budget, look for things they might like months before the date, and alwyas buy something pretty cool. As such, I also like to receive gifts in said special ocasions.  
  
My father (66M) never remembers the dates. When I was younger, he would give me the money to buy my mother's bday, chirstmas and even aniversery presents. When I grew up and got my own cash, this stopped and he usually bought a cake or dinner for special ocasions.  
  
Thing is last year my mom almost died. She had a severe infecction, stayed 21 days in ICU and 20+ more on the hospital. She arrived home just in time for Christmas. I know it affected everyone in our family, but I still tried to manage Christimas so we could have some sort of ""normality"" in our family.  
  
Between staying at the hospital with her, maitaining my own house and managing two sick dogs, I bought gifts for everyone. I knew mom wouldn't get me anything (She ended up giving me one of her perfumes she hadn't used), I was certain I would get something from my dad and my husband. Hubby got me three books and dad didn't even get me a Merry Christmas, because he said due to mom almost dying, Christmas was non existent that year.  
  
This hurt like hell, because it's not the first time. I alwyas put a lot o effort, he likes it, I know because he goes around bragging about what his daughter got him, but never reciprocate it. He also says ""Don't buy me gifts for special ocasions, buy something if you see it and think I'd like"". Now to the point. His bday is coming up, and I really don't want to be made a clown again. WIBTA if I simply not buy him anymore gifts for special ocasions?",AmItheAsshole
 for never asking my wealthy in laws to invite my siblings or immediate family on our big vacations?,"My wife and I have been married for about 8 years now. I had a pretty generic middle class upbringing while her family would be considered ""Old money"". I have no idea how much wealth they actually have but its multi-generational and needless to say they'll never worry about money.

They never give us cash outright, but for each of our kids births they set aside 100k in an interest bearing account for their college and they have been extremely generous with the vacations they've taken us on. My wife and I both have pretty good jobs and while we have the security of knowing if we ever needed it, they'd help us, we are able to support our not very fancy lifestyle ourselves.

This July were going on a trip with our kids and her family, including the nuclear family's of her two siblings and then a few family friends of theirs. MIL and FIL are paying for everything including the flights, villa were staying at, and various meals and activities. This will be the 5th vacation like this they've taken us on. Not including our honeymoon they paid for. I never imagined being this close to that kind of wealth before but I have to say they've been nothing but welcoming and generous with me. Even offering me high paying jobs I probably dont deserve and offering to pay for my grad school if I choose to go.

My sister recently asked me what my summer plans were and if I had any trips. I told her about this one and she got noticeably annoyed/jealous. She asked me why Ive never asked about inviting her and her family since other friends of the family get invited often to these big trips. Some have had 10-20 non family members there that they hosted/paid for. TBH I never even thought about asking to include my relatives in that, but I feel like that'd come off a little greedy so I just dont. I told her that, and she thinks Im being selfish. I think a lot of it is just jealousy which I can understand because she's complained about never being to Europe and its splurging for her to just go on a regional vacation. I do feel like that is kinda totally unrelated to my situation though.",AmItheAsshole
 My sister had a daughter and I don't want to take care of her,"My sister had a daughter, she is six years old. At the beginning, when she asked me to babysit her from time to time, I said yes. But I realized I didn't feel comfortable taking care of her. It made me anxious being responsible of a child, I didn't know how to react when she behaved badly (which didn't happen too much, she's cool). It's just that I decided, as I said, I don't want to be responsible of a child. I've always said I don't want children myself and I'm very firm on that. Well, my sister and my mother are very disappointed with me, they recriminate my decision all the time and it's affecting our relationship seriously. I feel they are injust by not respecting my decision. But, am I the asshole? 


I have to add, some mornings my sister has to ask members of the family to take her to school in the morning cause she works some days early, a big recrimination is that me, that have a lot of free time, I'm not at dispose. ",AmItheAsshole
 for parking in handicapped spot in this specific situation?,"This happened few days ago and I still don’t know how to feel about it. I picked up some food and decided to eat at my car because well I was alone and I don’t like eating in public when alone. So I parked my car but the sun glare was so bad it was shining directly to my eyes and I have sensitive eyes. I saw the handicap parking spot was empty as it’s almost always is, and I know that spot is shaded, so I parked there and started eating. 

I was halfway through my meal and some random lady came up to my window saying she can’t see a tag on my car. I explained my situation. She was together with a wheelchair user person and he seem understanding but she immediately started acting offended. She give me a rant on why I shouldn’t have park here, in the end she said because people like my they have hard time finding spots. I said there is an another empty handicap spot here plus I’d gladly move my car if she kindly asked me to. She then demanded I empty the spot now. I said I will and started moving my car. I didn’t apologize because of her attitude . 

She shouted “wow not even an apology” as I was leaving. I then stopped and said “I’m sorry you seem really frustrated but you can’t take all your anger on me. She cut me of saying “I’m taking my anger on you?”  I said “yes because I explained you why i parked here in the first place and now I’m moving my car as you wanted me to. I feel for both of you , being caretaker must be hard as well but you don’t have to be so hard on me” she cut me off again saying they are a couple, I’m such an asshole asshole, it’s not that hard to give a proper apology, she can’t believe how entitled I am etc she kept complaining. At this point I knew there was no point replying to her because she was clearly looking for a fight, so I quietly left. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my boyfriend to come visit my family?,"I (24F) and my boyfriend (26M) are getting more serious. I met his family a couple weeks ago, they live about an hour south of the city we live in, and he visits them frequently. My family lives 6 hours away and will come up every now and then or I’ll drive down to them. 

My sister suggested that I bring my boyfriend we’ll call Dan down with me to visit sometime. My family is very conservative and religious, and I know if I bring Dan with me they will make us stay in separate rooms, make us go to church with them, and just generally make me uncomfortable with religious and political topics of conversation. I told her that if I ever did bring Dan down I would want to either get a hotel or have a talk with my parents about the situation.  My sister acted like I was being terribly unreasonable, and that I was “the only one making things uncomfortable.” She said she’s never felt like that with her boyfriend there, but he also lives in town and never has to spend the night. She went on about how it’ll make my parents upset if I don’t stay at the house with them, and I always make things into a whole ordeal.

I don’t try to make a scene, but it always ends up that way because I don’t have the same values and beliefs as them. I don’t mock them for going to church or argue with them about politics. They can do whatever they want, I would just love to be left out of it and not berated. 


TLDR: my family and I have different values, and I don’t want to start an argument about it by bringing my boyfriend in town 

",AmItheAsshole
 For Refusing To Help My Sister Take Care Of Our Wheelchair Bound Mother,"My mom(59) has never been a responsible person at any point in her life. She is abusive, narcissistic, bipolar, alcoholic and a drug user. Dad passed when I was young.
My sisters both moved out asap. I was left alone with my mom. 

My childhood was highly abusive &amp; neglectful. 
My mom would often skip town with her new boyfriends &amp; leave me completely alone at 10 to fend for myself for weeks sometimes months.

I got a boyfriend at 13. his mom saw how neglected I was and took me in. 
My “mom” didn’t talk to me for 5yrs after I moved out(at 13!!!!

Fast forward to today. I’m 25.

My two older sisters Katie &amp; Melanie (42 &amp; 39)refuse to see our childhoods as abusive or neglectful. They say our mom did the best she could….

I’ve often vocalized my disdain toward our mother-
 “I don’t feel comfortable calling her mom she’s never been a mother to me” 

That’s all the backstory. 
I’m gonna try to make this as short and concise as possible.

December 2023 my grandma whom “mom” was living with passed away. 

Mom’s brother got the house in the will kicked mom out. Gave her $20k from will money. 
mom has no where to live,no job, she spends her disability checks on meth &amp; alcohol. Her health has also taken a turn for the worst she’s wheelchair ridden. She blew $7k of the money on drugs and scratch tickets already.

getting random calls from mom needing things from me? Mind you I don’t have any sort of relationship with her. This is the first I’m hearing from her in years and it’s only because she needs things from me

I ignore her calls.she lies about what she needs so she can get drugs. she sounds so out of it on drugs when she calls that I don’t even know what she’s asking for.

————————

My sister Melanie(37) is constantly sending passive aggressive messages 

“You need to visit mom it can’t be just me”
“Are you gonna help with Mom? I can’t keep doing everything.”
“Uncle says you guys need to help me.” 

I want to attach photos of our messages but I guess I can’t on here. 

I have a knee injury that needs surgery I’ve been waiting for 2yrs for surgery. I can’t drive, or walk for extended periods of time 

I live 45min away from “mom” 
Melanie is 15min away. 
Katie 4hrs away. 

Melanie taken it upon herself to care for mom. I never asked her to do anything for her. &amp; I’m sick of her guilting me into doing anything. I’ve said I don’t care if she ends up in the homeless shelter. 

Melanie also took it upon herself to take mom’s money to hold onto
 So of course she’s gonna be bothering her 24/7 💁‍♀️

I’m so upset at Melanie it feels like she doesn’t listen or care about anything I say just like mom. I’m injured and waiting for surgery… and hate mom.
Me and Melanie don’t have a relationship outside her talking abt mom.

*when Covid happened I lost my job and apartment Melanie said 
“we all need to find our own way.” 
&amp; mom couldn’t care less. 
I lived in my car and no one cared when they all had houses with extra space. 
",AmItheAsshole
 telling coworker she should be flattered?,"I (34F) have been employed at my current workplace for a few years now and work in a team of 10. Most of us are over 40, i’m one of the younger ones. 

Last year, we had someone transfer to our team, Clara 29F. To add context, she is East Asian and comfortably passes for someone 19 to very early twenties, definitely not older than 24. Clara worked for a different company prior and has a lot of knowledge that’s very useful to us despite only working with us for less than a year. This experience makes her one of the most knowledgeable people in the team and authority basically. If anyone has a question, we ask Clara about it and she’ll help us out.

A new hire, Emma 40F, joined the team a few weeks ago and she and Clara don’t really get on. I’m close to Emma since I helped with her induction, so I pressed since the atmosphere in the office is awkward at best. Clara told me how she feels Emma does not take her seriously and it’s disruptive to workflow since Emma will ask anybody and everybody but Clara for help until she gets redirected to Clara to solve her issues. I have seen this happen many times and will admit it is disruptive. It upsets Clara that she is not taken seriously despite being the one with most experience and Emma was explicitly told that Clara is team lead. 

I tried to chalk it up to Emma being embarrassed about needing help and that Clara shouldn’t get too worked up over it. Then Clara started on this tangent about how it’s always followed her wherever she goes (previous workplaces, past relationships, university) that no-one takes her seriously because she looks very young and she felt it was repeating in this workplace too. She asked me to back her up a little more and tell Emma to directly go to her instead of asking all the men in the workplace first (there are 3 women in our team). 

At this point I didn’t really know what to say because she was essentially accusing Emma of being sexist despite knowing her for a few weeks so I tried to lighten the mood by telling her she should be flattered about looking so young and we’ll all look like we’re 60+ before she even turns 30. Apparently this was the wrong this to say because I received an email from HR today asking for myself, Emma and Clara to have a meeting with a higher up present to sort matters. So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for snapping back at my verbally abusive friend by mentioning his weight?,"I feel pretty terrible for this because I never lose my temper, but one of my friends has a big tendency to make fun of me for things like my voice, my tastes, my weight (under), anything like that. 

I can tell he thinks it doesn’t affect me even though I’ve talked about it before but over the course of this week it’s gotten pretty bad— the other day he mocked something i said in a group call and kept repeating it every single minute until I couldn’t take it and had to leave. And yes I told him to stop and we had a talk about it the day after. 

Today I get a text from a mutual friend saying “____ told me to tell you (insert phrase he mocked)” to continue the joke and after seeing that that i got so irritated that i replied “tell him at least my BMI is normal”. He is severely overweight and breaks a lot of his diet plans, that’s why I feel that he takes his insecurities out on me, because he knows I’ll never clap back at him—  but I have never brought that up until now. I feel bad snooping down to his level but I couldn’t take the verbal abuse anymore and snapped. Should I apologize?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to park on the pavement despite a neighbor's request?,"I recently moved into a new home with my fiancé where the parking is on a first-come, first-served basis. The front of the house is preferable, but when it’s full, I have to park at the back, where the road is narrow and often double-parked.

This situation happened a few months ago, but I've only just got round to sharing my story.

One morning, after parking at the back as usual, a neighbor knocked on my door. He was polite and asked if the small car at the bottom of the street was mine, explaining that it was making it hard for other cars to get by. Understanding the concern, I agreed to move it since there was now space in front.

As I was walking to my car, a woman I hadn’t met before started berating me. I'm not sure of her relation to the man who knocked—maybe his wife or mother—but she scolded me for not parking on the pavement to leave more space in the street. Here’s the thing: parking on the pavement isn't only illegal, but the curbs are unusually high, which previously caused me a flat tire.

I tried to explain that I’m a new driver and still figuring things out, including the best spots where I can legally and safely park. She was very aggressive, even saying, “When you parked there last week, I could have throttled you!” which I found rather threatening.

I moved the car, but the whole ordeal left me shaking and nearly having a panic attack. It’s made me doubt myself: AITA for not parking on the pavement to ease the street congestion, despite it being illegal and having previously damaged my car?

Looking forward to your thoughts.",AmItheAsshole
 for being disappointed and that my BF is planning a holidays trip without me,"A bit of background... My SO of 2 years and myself have been planning on moving abroad to the UK this year from a developing country to improve our quality of life somewhere else. I will however be the one who is the main applicant to emigrate due to better qualifications and experience. 

Currently I am saving as much money as I can and as much leave days from work so that we could successfully make the move - even if it meant me going there first on a trip taking time off from work to potentially get some interviews lined up and hopefully get a job to officially make the move. Doing so has me very stressed out and approaching burnout. 

So because of this any leisure trips is unfortunately not possible for me due to the priority goal for us is to emigrate, and to do that I need to save my money and leave days. 

A few months ago my SO was away on an overseas holiday trip with her friend and I had to stay behind due to the limitations. And now again in a few months he will be going again on the same trip while I make sacrifices.  

He discussed this with me and asked if it is okay with me, and I said realistically I can't say no because that would make me and AH. I also said that  I am disappointed and it isn't great to be in this position making all these sacrifices and being left behind. The consensus was that it is okay for him to go but I am feeling an imbalance in pressures to make this work. It has also been brought up before that I am severely stressed out from work and due to not taking any time off from work for saving my leave days I am also burning out. 

AITA to feel disappointed in my SO for being insensitive to my situation, and/or WIBTA to expect my SO to bear an equal amount of pressure to make plans of emigration work?



 

",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting anyone to my main wedding?,"So my boyfriend and I have been talking about marriage for as long as we've been dating. He wants a tiny wedding with only us, I want to make sure his parents and the rest of our respective families don't hate us. 
So we came up with the idea of having 2 weddings, the main one with just us and the bigger one with everyone else.

The thing is, if his mom finds out about this, she'll raise hell; he's her youngest son and she wants to be there at his wedding. 
She also already doesn't like me much, so she'll accuse me of trying to take her son, my boyfriend, away from her.

My boyfriend and I are in agreement about this plan, but would we be assholes for going through with it and not letting our family/friends witness our special day? (The idea is that only the first one will be counted by us as the real one)
EDIT: My family is Catholic and wants us to have a church wedding, I don't really want to, but they can't acknowledge our marriage or attend the wedding if it isn't in a church, so the second would also be for that as well.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to buy my daughter the dress she loved?,"I (38M) have a 14YO daughter but am no longer with her mom (34F).  We have not been together in 9+ years and have 50/50 custody.  Since my daughter has been in middle school, I have spoken with both her mother and her about wanting to be involved when it comes to school dances, and it would be nice if the parent who will have her the night of the dance was the one who got the dress and helped her get ready.  But every dance, her mom has gotten her dress and then insisted because she got the dress she be the one to get her ready - interrupting the time my daughter is scheduled to be with me.  She has even gone as far as to refuse to let my daughter come over the weekend of a dance, even if it is my time.

My daughter is now coming up on her last middle school dance.  Again, she is scheduled to be at my house for this, but again her mom took her shopping without talking to me about it.  The dress she “fell in love with” fits the Under the Sea theme, but is $400, which I think is too much for a middle school formal.   I expressed this to her mother, explaining once shoes and make up and other things are factored in she will be spending well over $500 and it seems excessive for the occasion and sets unreasonable expectations.  Her response was to say I never want to pay for anything and it’s worth every penny and I have no business giving her a hard time about wanting to make our daughter happy.  AITA?

Some notes:

* she did ask me to contribute and I never said I wouldn’t.  I did tell her I would only contribute what I consider to be a reasonable amount.
* I pay a small child support, but we have a 50/50 split and I have had to ask her mother to stop bringing things to my house (like water bottles) for her because I am more than capable and willing to provide for her when she is here.
* When other expenses come up, like school trips, I have helped pay toward them.  I am in now way trying to get out of supporting my daughter.

\*Edit - yes there is an issue with who has her what time.  Thats a post for another day.  Also to clarify, I guess the real issue isn’t AITA for not wanting to buy the dress, but AITA for expressing that I thought it was too expensive.  At the end of the day, I can’t/wont contribute more than is reasonable, and I know if her mom wants to get it I can’t stop her, but I didn’t think it was unreasonable to say I think this is a bad idea and we should encourage her to look at other options because we should be teaching reasonable expectations and responsibility, I didn’t feel as though I was giving the mom a hard time, and I don’t know how it got turned into a “you don’t pay for anything and I’ll never ask for another dime.” ",AmItheAsshole
 for agreeing that my wife has put on some weight?,"AITA for agreeing that my wife has gained some weight?

Short backstory: A few years ago, my wife was distant and our sex life was none existent.  Many conversations and arguments later, I received an sms telling me ""you're right, I'm not attracted to you anymore.  You're fat, the weight you've gained repulses me.  You have choices.. stay with me as is, lose weight and see where it goes or leave"".  

I chose option 2, lost a lot of weight (over 30kg).  It broke me, it devastated me.  But ultimately, she was right.  It wasn't healthy and it wasn't attractive, I've always maintained that while the message was right the delivery left a lot to be desired.

Recently, my wife has gained quite a bit of weight.  To be clear, I like it.  It doesn't put me off sex, she's still just as beautiful as always, just differently beautiful.

The other night she said 'I've gained loads of weight'.  I agreed, because, well, she has.  I did iterate that she was still beautiful and it happens, especially with the change of pace she has had etc.  She blew up and insisted I should've 'lied'.

Now, the mirror doesn't lie.  Your dress size doesn't lie, why should I?  Again, I told her that I still find her attractive, she is still beautiful, it's just a change.  But, I can't and won't lie, she destroyed me and I listened, I changed.  If I lie, it'll be the same situation in reverse (I think)

So reddit, AITA for agreeing?  Should I have lied?",AmItheAsshole
 for getting my phone Brocken,"So basically I (15M) got a brand new iPhone a few months back, and I really liked it. But about a month later I was in class with an immature boy who liked to act mature and distract everyone from their work in class. (I think he had adhd or something)

He was making funny faces and stuff at me and acting all immature. And I was doing work so I was annoyed about it because he kept distracting me. So I went way too far and made a comment on his appearance. He seems to have kyphosis or some back condition because he has a very noticeable hump/hunchback on his back.

I told him “your literally real life Quasimodo and your head sticks out from the rest of your body so much it looks like it’s resting on a shelf.” He then looked really sad and offended when I told him that so he went out of the chair he was sitting in to switch seats, and while he was doing that I was sitting in my seat far away from the table close to the wall. He then pushed my chair into the table while I was sitting on it very aggressively and my phone got damaged in the process. I don’t think it was his intention to break my phone but he did anyways. He then told me that it was an accident but I knew that it wasn’t.

When I got home I told my mom about it and she told me that it’s my own fault because “i can’t just Insult someone and expect them to say excuse me or wait for me to push my own chair in. Of course they’re gonna bulge past you and push you into the table. And that I should have said something like “your so immature” or “stop talking so much” instead of comment on his physical appearance that might me something he’s insecure about or something he was born with and is really insecure about.

Aita? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my parents in my house?,"I am moving to another country in a few weeks and I’ll admit: I’m behind on packing. My parents have offered to come to my apartment and help me pack as I only live ~an hour from them now. 

The issue is that I have a strained relationship with my mother to say the least, and after much discussion with my therapist and(now ex) boyfriend (who I am still in good terms with and live with) I have come to the decision that it is best for my mental health to stop trying to be close with my mother. 

My Dad came up to help me pack a few days ago and was a bull in a china shop. He was very frustrated by me trying to wrap my things in bubble wrap and insisted things don’t needs to be organized or wrapped as they are just going into storage for now. While this is true for now, the idea it to have my things shipped to me at my new place in the coming months, and it would be easier to just take the bins out of storage and ship them than to open them up and reorganize/wrap things to prevent breaking. He doesn’t see it that way and insists I just throw everything in the bins and sort through it later. 

Today my parents got together (they are divorced) and called me, to let me know in no uncertain terms, that they will be at my house on saturday to pack my stuff and they would prefer if I wasn’t there to slow them down. I had made a promise to my ex boyfriend/roommate that I would not allow my mother to be in the apartment without me before he went away on business (he’s still away) 

While I can see it would make the most sense to just be here when my parents come up, I really don’t want this to happen at all. I can’t see this going smoothly at all and I want to feel safe in my own home, that would not be the case with my mother here, and my Dad helping made me want to rip my hair out. As much as I appreciate their wanting to help, their refusal to take “no” for an answer makes me even more uneasy. I don’t have a choice though, they’ve made it clear that they will be here on saturday wether I like it or not. ",AmItheAsshole
 for being a friend to hang out with me and my friends but my best friend doesn’t like her over an outfit issue in 2019? ,"I had prior plans to hang with the girl on 4/20 , let’s call her Hannah, but the festival plans flopped. My best friend and I were gonna hang with some other friends later in the evening. Hannah heard after we both flopped plans to the festival and asked to come. I didn’t see the harm in it and and asked jana the one who’s house we were going to if she was valid. Fast forward a bit and I told my best friend that Hannah was also coming. This is where it went down hill. 



Now long story short we’ve argued since and she claims I forced her to be around a person she didn’t like. I was trying to understand why this is such a big deal, over a silly outfit. She also claims it’s not just that it’s the fact that I’m dismissing her feelings and made her go through that but I apologize for hurting her feelings but I don’t apologize for wanting to kill 2 birds with one stone. I told her it’s ok for us to agree to disagree and again I apologized for hurting her but in no way shape or form was this on purpose to hurt her. I also expressed that we are two different people who handle and see emotions different. She’s more sensitive than I am and I often find myself always coddling her emotions. I tried to make her realize that I understand some parts but not all of is and that’s ok bc we are humans that will never see eye to eye on every single thing. I expressed that we should also have space bc if we are constantly hanging out how can I make time for other people? But she told me that it seems like I hate her and that we shouldn’t be friends then… 




I don’t understand why how she feels towards that girl is my responsibility. And if it’s the fact that I’m not seeing her pov as SHE wants me to then that is also not my problem. We can’t force people to view things the way we want them perceived. Idk am I buggen? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for letting my little brother drink coffee?,"It was my(18m) little brother(13)’s birthday. Our dad came over, and we also had many guests, including my brother’s friends.

I cooked pork fried rice for the guests, two of whom said they like it. My mom said ‘I’ve taught you well.”

My dad then said ‘Cooking was the only thing you were good for.’

Awkward silence. Then mom’s reply ‘That sort of attitude is why I left you.’

The other kids’ parents took them home once it escalated into a full on argument. Mom told me to take my brother to a cafe or somewhere.

I took him to a cafe.

He wanted to try coffee. Our parents never said that he can’t have coffee but I wasn’t sure if it was a good idea. But then he said he wants to try it and it could cheer him up after what happened. So I ordered iced latte.

He only took a few sips before saying it’s too bitter.

When we went home and mom found out, she was upset at me and said that my little brother is too young for caffeine.

UPDATE : Mom has cooled down and said that she was still angry at dad, hence why she lashed out at me. She apologized for it and I told her that I understand why she said what she said.",AmItheAsshole
 for not going to my stepdaughter's birthday because they disinvited my son?,"My fiancé male 33, and I female 34 have been together for 5 going on 6 years, I was there for him for his drug addiction and raised his daughter while he was in jail and homeless and in rehab. I have a son from a previous relationship (15 male), and we have a son together (2 male).

This last weekend was his daughter's 13th birthday and the day before he messaged me to say that his daughter doesn't want my son at her birthday because her boyfriend is coming, my son and her boyfriend get along very well, and she feels like she will be left out.

So, I messaged my fiancé and said I would stop by and give her, her gift but I'm not staying as my son was excited about seeing his sister on her birthday and he was sad that he wasn't invited anymore. My fiancé then got angry that I was making a huge deal out of it saying she's allowed to have whoever she wants at her birthday, which I agree she has every right, just as I have every right to show up because my son was upset about being uninvited, he knows I will always have his back.

His mom called me to find out what was happening, and I told her what he had said, she told me that his daughter never said that she didn't want her brother there and that we must come, but I said no because my son was upset. I did not tell my son that my fiancé was the person who uninvited him, but he figured it out and asked me if it was my fiancé, not his sister who didn't want him around.

I ended up taking my son to the movies and the arcade but when he saw his sister at the mall, he decided he didn't want to stay any longer and we left.

Am I the A\*\*hole for being upset about this whole situation?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to attend my sister’s wedding? ,"Preface, I’m on mobile so I apologise for any mistakes. 

Earlier this month I came to the realisation that I have been acting very reactively to my family. I’ve been diagnosed with Borderline Personality Disorder so I make sure I try to really think about appropriate responses and reactions but despite my best efforts lately I’ve definitely been slipping. 

A couple of weeks ago, I texted my mum and sister on the family group chat asking for some space because there were instances, intentional or not, that left me feeling hurt and abandoned by them. I tried to communicate that this space was for me to think about whether this is how I actually felt or if it was my BPD brain. I reassured that I didn’t mean to hurt anyone. I communicated that I knew how much they did for me and I wanted to right by them. 

My sister got really angry with me, and weaponised my relationship with my boyfriend and my want to regulate against me. She texted saying how much she’s done for me and doesn’t understand why I would need space. I agreed with her saying, I didn’t want to hurt anyone. She ended up getting angrier with me and uninvited me to her wedding. 

Now my sister and I have not had the best relationship. She’s done some things to me growing up that have resulted in me being unable to trust, not being able to be comfortable in normal, consensual relationships and just overall be a anxious, angry and sad person. I try not to hold it against her, she was a kid too, but it gets difficult. I am trying to sort out the feelings through therapy. 

My sister has apologised through text, and I have also communicated boundaries through text. I don’t forgive her though. Life is easier without her and I don’t feel a loss when not talking to her. My mum and my grandma want me to attend the wedding and be the bigger person. They are want me to just move on, when I can’t. I can’t even figure out what I feel. I don’t want to attend the wedding, not because I’m being malicious but because I don’t want to be sad and pretend everything is okay. I’m tired of being the bigger person. 

",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my sister to my wedding?,"I (26F) am getting married. It was a last minute decision on the venue and it’s a micro wedding so very small guest list. Due to this my fiancée (26F) and I decided not to invite my sister (28F), we’ll call her Damsel. We’ve always had conflicts and recently we got into an argument and Damsel hasn’t spoken to me in months since. I’ve tried once at a party we both attended but I later learned Damsel didn’t even acknowledge my fiancée was there. Ignoring me is one thing, but pretending my partner wasn’t there hurt me way worse.
I thought not telling Damsel would be better until after the wedding. Well she found out and called our mom to hyperventilate and cry while driving causing our mom to cry and try to calm her down. Damsel hung up then wouldn’t answer our mom anymore so mom called me asking if I could calm her. I said Damsel isn’t invited regardless and this isn’t helping. Damsel called our older sister (32F) who proceeded to ask me if I’ve talked to Damsel and she’d give up her husbands seat for Damsel. I said no because I really don’t want to, especially now and she’s still not going!
Damsel ended up being called by our dad. Which hurts more because he hasn’t spoken to me in 2 years after I came out. Now I guess they’re upset about the wedding together?
I thought I was right about my decision and my fiancée still supports me but with the push back from my family I can’t help but wonder AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for going to my friend’s party that happened to have random girls present and not tell my gf?,"AITA for going to my friends party that happened to also have random girls present without telling my gf?

Last weekend, my friend (I’ll call him Steve) invited me to a little party his girlfriend (Stacy) was hosting and I had just gotten off work so I went home and relaxed for 2 hours. Then one of my other friends texts me let’s go so I said pick me up and let’s go. It was about 11:45 when we got there. I said hi to Steve and started having some drinks. Since it was Stacy’s party, her sister invited 3 of her friends. I’d say the guy to girl ratio was still 10:5 because that’s what it actually was. With a ratio like this, the fact that I didn’t even know any of these girls except Stacy, and that I just didn’t think it was that big of a deal I never told my gf I was here. (She doesn’t like me drinking anyway and I didn’t want to upset her). 

At some point in the night, I got my phone out to take a picture of me and Steve. Then Stacy jumped in and said wait for me. THEN a random girl which was Stacy’s little sister’s friend jumped in as well. That made the picture from left to right go, Steve, Stacy, Random Girl, and me. Well the next day Steve posted this picture and my gf got super pissed at me. I mean super.

The next day I went to her house and I was starting every sentence for the first 45 minutes. Then she finally brought it up “you had fun last night.” She basically was pissed the entire time I was over and I tried to explain I didn’t even know this girl and she was just Stacy’s sister’s friend who wanted to be in a picture. She wouldn’t listen and thinks that we were cheating or something worse. The next day at school she didn’t even look at me when I tried to talk to her in the hallway.

To me it sounds like she is over reacting a lot and it kinda makes me upset. AITA for not letting her know I was at my friend’s party with other girls also there?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my roommate have her “boyfriend” over at my house anymore because she won’t let him help me? ,"I (26F) have a roommate (26F) who I’ve known for over a decade and we are also now coworkers. She’s been here for about half a year and ever since she moved in she’s always had a boyfriend that stays over (practically lives at my house half of the days out of the week) which doesn’t bother me enough to say anything about, but at the end of the day it is another person being over at my house all the time. 

The issue that’s recently sparked up is that I messaged her and asked if he could help us take some things from the garage to the dump so we can clear it out since my garage is filled with both her and my stuff. In my head, he has a truck and is a guy, so he would be able to help move heavy things and usually guys love helping women with this kind of stuff so why not ask, right? 

She responds with “I’m not going to ask him to do that. He already does enough for me and it’s not his responsibility”. Now I’m not an unreasonable person. I understand that it isn’t technically his responsibility and I never insinuated that. I do feel like it’s a fair thing to ask of him since he stays over at my house rent free.  It makes me feel a bit uncomfortable and unliked/rejected having people live in my house who don’t think I’m worth helping with things. Yes, I plan on having a talk with her about this but I just wanted to get outside perspective to help me see if im being rational about this before I have the talk.


Edited for resolution: I asked a friend of an old friend if he would be able to help me move the furniture from my garage into my truck and unload to the dump. He said he’s happy to help and offered to use his truck since it’s bigger ☺️ I will be buying him lunch since he’s doing it during his lunch break. 

As for the roommate situation I have decided to stop expecting friendly favors and will discontinue being lenient on the amount of rent paid and will no longer tolerate late payments. 

Thankyou to all who helped me see where I was in the wrong and to the people who showed empathy toward me and were able to see my side of things as well. ",AmItheAsshole
" for offering to loan my sister £11,000 to completely wipe away her debt?","I (27f) have always tried to do right by my family. If they need a dog and/or babysitter, I'm there. If they need someone to vent to or confide in, I'm there. If they need to borrow some cash, I'm there. Anyone in the family who has owed me money (Which has only been either my mom or brother) in the past has paid me back in full, and without any grief. I have always been happy to lend them a helping hand.

Well, this time didn't go so well. My sister (28) is not much closer to paying off her debt then when she started a few years ago. She owes £11,000, which is about $13,700. So, it's pretty bad. She pays £400 a month which only covers a little bit extra than the interest rate alone. I'm not sure how long it'll take her to pay that off.

The only source of income I recieve is benefits due to my health condition. The only reason I have as much money as I do is because I recently received compensation for damages. In fact, what I recieved was just enough to cover my sisters debt. I don't see myself needing that kind of money anytime soon, so I thought I'd help my sister.

I offered to pay off her debt as long as she gave me the £400 she usually pays per month. So her debt would go to me, but I would be more lenient when need be. If everything went smoothly, it would take just over 2 years to pay me back, and I was fine with that. The only other conditions I laid out was that I be assured that her impulse buyimg days were over, and she close her credit accounts as soon as everything was paid off. She said ""No, thank you,"" and I respected her decision and didn't bring it up to her again.

The next day our dad dropped by her house to get something, and she was being all pissy. He asked her what was wrong, and she was mad at me and said I was ""babying"" her.

My friend ""Sarah"" came over last night to hang out and she said something about my sister and I told her what happened and I also told her that I was pretty hurt over the ""babying"" comment. Right away she agreed with my sister. She said I was in fact ""babying"" her and it was ""condescending"" of me for basically saying she can't take care of herself and also I was being ""controlling"" for wanting her to close her accounts if she accepted my offer. I tried explaining my side more clearly, but she kept interrupting me and she raised her voice until she was almost yelling at me. Sarah said that I should trust my family and give her the benefit of the doubt, and if I didn't trust her then that was my problem and I should think about why. I said to her that £11,000 was a lot for the ""benefit of the doubt"". Especially when that's almost everything I have. I love my sister, but that just seemed like such a crazy thing to say. Sarah then called me a dick for wanting £400 a month even after I told her that that's what she's paying now. It's not like my sister is starving. Money is a little tight but it's certainly doable.

I honestly thought I was just helping.",AmItheAsshole
 if I refuse to help my friend?,"Throwaway acc. I’ve (16f) been friends with this girl (also 16f, I’ll call her Jane) for about 4 months now. We go to the same classes and eat lunch together. At the start of our friendship she would ask me to do little favours for her, like asking me to share homework answers or asking me to bring food to class to share with her. 
Didn’t think much of it at the time, felt like it was normal things I myself would ask my friend from time to time. Nowadays, Jane would often ask me to share homework answers (almost every assignment) and would constantly disturb me during lessons when I’m trying to pay attention. (Mind you it’s exam seasons for us) Whenever I ask her to share homework answers, she would refuse saying that her answers were probably wrong anyways. Jane also often takes ‘unglams’ of me without my consent and would zoom in on my face and just laugh at it. She’d post it on her instagram without my permission sometimes and refuse to delete it. (I have acne, glasses and braces, the whole shebang so im v self conscious 😭) I’m honestly sick of her and thinking about just refusing to do anything she asks me to. Am I just being petty and overthinking?",AmItheAsshole
 for grounding my daughter because she cheated on a test?,"My daughter (10F) and me (26F) have a great relationship. My daughter just started her period and thought it would be a good idea to cheat, because she didn’t have a mind to do her test— so I grounded her.

I found out 2 weeks ago at her sisters graduation, When she got a C+. I was proud! I took her to skyzone then fir a little icecream but then when I went to the parent teacher conference, I found out she cheated.

How I found out she cheated is when I was in the back of the classroom table talking about how she is. Her teacher (23F) is living and kind and is never a snitch. But she this accidentally this time. And I thank her! She accidentally told me that my daughter cheated on the test and I was horrified. When I got home for dinner my family was sitting at the table all ready for me.

I told to my daughter mid-wat eating “so explain, why did you cheat?” She nearly choked on her food and explained. I wasn’t having it so I grounded her and she was raging and called me a disgusting and horrible mother and so her father added to her devise taken. She then called me a pig mother who doesn’t care about her children and stormed away.

So am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to let my dad touch me (affectionately not inappropriately),"AITA for not letting my dad touch me? My father (42 Male) has always been physically affectionate because it’s one of his love languages. He cares so much about having a close relationship with me and my younger sister and about being present in our lives. But I don’t like it and it really hurts his feelings. 

When I (14 non-binary) was younger I had long, naturally curly, hair and I didn’t know how to keep it from getting tangled. When my dad would run his fingers through my hair (kind of a petting thing) he’d snag tangles then try to pull them out. This really hurt, so I’d push him away or tell him to stop but he told me that refusing it made him feel hurt and unappreciated so I cut my hair short in 5th grade. 

After realizing that I like many aspects of the style I kept it and haven’t had long hair since. When I mentioned a while ago that I cut it to get my dad to stop hurting me he got really upset at me and told me a little more about his childhood and how his parents never cared and why he tries so hard with us. I felt awful. We had a great conversation and I apologized, but then he moved in to hug me. I put my arms in front of me and said “no” kind of panicked tone (this was a knee-jerk reaction, not conscious) and then my dad left the house angrily and slammed the door.

When I’m emotional, my dad offers me a hug and I’m supposed to take it, even if I feel worse, because my dad really wants to comfort me. My dad has explained how his parents were super removed and unresponsive and he said he never wants us to feel that way, because he is a super great dad.

After this I reflected and realized how much I hate it when I’m touched. Since then, I’ve tried to set boundaries with my dad, but I can’t tell him not to touch me at all, obviously because he’ll ask why and I can’t tell him it makes my skin crawl. When I try to set boundaries like ‘don’t touch me when I’m emotional’ or ‘tell me before you hug me’ those boundaries aren’t respected. 
So I’ve started saying “no” or “don’t” clearly when he tries now. He’ll try to ask for specific boundaries but he ignores them within the hour, and he’s equally offended when I remind him of a boundary as when I set one. I know it’s hurting him because he’s told me, and I know how much he cares, but I’m doing it anyway and I know I’m probably overreacting; so AITA.",AmItheAsshole
H for bailing on dinner,"I (32 M) bailed on a dinner that my oldest friend (32M ) had talked about for a few weeks. 

Context: my buddy lives out of the city for the last year coming back once in a while. He and i talked a lot about going to Kbbq on one of two days wednesday or tuesday, when he and i were free. Leading up to the tuesday/ Wednesday it was seemingly set in stone we were going to do kbbq with one other mutual who i also spoke to/ see weekly for rock climbing. The three of us were down. On the sunday, they both start to suggest other food, monday, they say, maybe korean fried chicken, but i was pretty adamant i wanted kbbq since it had been a month since i had been there, and more than 6 months since i had been with ny boy. On tuesday i mentioned it again around 5 pm asking if we could just do, but one of them didnt respond, and the one that did saying “the timing just doesnt work out” 

No big deal. 

So my friend and i went to my usual kbbq spot. I reach out to my best friend who is staying close by woth his parents and let him know i was at our spot with my friend and he should come. As i send it he says he is getting kbbq too. And another mutual smacks me on the back, asking me if im on a date. I was a little shocked to look over and see our friend group at a table (6 people) with my two buddies there eating. So i went over and was like “is this why you guys didnt wanna do kbbq?!?” They were like “noo its not that deep” and i went back to my table.

The rest of the evening i just felt awkward as hell. Didnt know how to address feeling left out. And at 1 am my best bud messaged me to see how i was feeling. Saying “yea i figured you would feel some type of way” 

After that convo, which i decided to drop. I told him i would be down to grab food tomorrow (Wednesday), agreed on skewers. Which was all good.

Later in the day he mentioned that all the people he was at dinner the night before and him were going to go rock climbing before dinner. I had sprained my ankle at the start of the year and have had been openly staying away from it to avoid injury before jobs. So i declined climbing. Around 7pm get a google maps location text from my boi saying be here for 9 pm, a location about 25 minutes from me. I told him i have to work at 6 am next day, so i was hoping we would be eating around 6/7 and that i couldn’t make it.  I was also a little salty about the night before and hate that after all this delegation location changed again. Still feeling some type of way.

I feel like i was being an asshole for cancelling dinner. But as i type this i guess it still happened just not with me.
I feel like the AH because my buddy just shortened his trip to go back home a week early because his girl needs help with their new puppy back home. So i actually wont get to see him for another few months. I feel guilty i didnt make the time for him while he was here. I feel petty as heck.

So, AITAH for bailing on dinner or am i just being a sensitive b-hole? 

",AmItheAsshole
", the TV  bracket","AITA ? 

Sorry for long essay but need it for the context


 He's putting up the tv bracket to go on the wall and I'm helping here and there but no too much as he doesn't like being interrupted or in his language, doesn't like me asking any kind of obvious/non obvious questions!

Cut story short, towards the end he's screwing the bracket into the socket. Tbf the screws are quite thick and we don't have anything appropriate to tighten it. He managed to do it with a wrench I believe but not still can't get it tight

.In between all this, I'm asking him questions here and there. To him they are stupid questions and I'm asking obvious question to him purposely! So he answered, rudely in my book, saying that he's not f* stupid, he knows what he's doing. I told him that I really don't like your tone. (Just to mention that I'm only trying to help him and asking him the maybe obvious   question thinking why do we have so many parts left?)

Anyways, i went to my study and left him sort it out. He goes through the cupboard to check some other tools. Silly me, dared to ask him again that why there are so many different washers and some of them aren't even used?

Guess what, he reacts as above again!

This time I just walked off to bedroom, left him to it without saying anything. He then ends of cleaning himself the mess the drilling made.He then came upstairs good an hour later, had shower, etc, and watched what I was watching on Tv. 

I showed him the socket wrench from amazon and ordered it to be delivered next day. I then asked him, just before he was goingbed that I really don't appreciate the tone he used. He could have answered me simply without blowing his top off.

He said i was asking obvious questions and bothering him, don't trust him. He didn't need my help then, but only for putting the TV and marking the wall for screws.

Afterwards, he says I didn't even come down to help him clean the mess!
I said you didn't need my help so why didn't need me help cleaning. So we ended up arguing with each other and he blamed me that I don't let him sleep when he's travelling for work in the morning. At that point, I just left the bedroom, thinking he totally gaslighted the situation!


AITA for overreacting????
",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to pay for my flight ticket?,"I (25M) was planning to travel with some friends to Paris during our Easter break. One of my friends, John (fake name), already has an account with an airline booking site that gives some discount and offered to book tickets for the 3 of us, which I gladly agreed.

  
Fast forward 1 week later, John told me that he made a typo in my name when booking the flight. I checked the airlines policies on name typos and generally they allow a change if a few letters are incorrect, but even then, it can be quite difficult to get a change as they’re quite strict about it. But it turns out, John actually input a completely different name when my booking my flight and instead put someone else’s name (a mutual friend of ours who he previously helped booked a flight for but was not travelling to Paris with us).  
After some back and forth with the airline, they did not allow for a change in my flight ticket since the name was completely different so it’s not considered a “typo”.

  
John initially offered to buy and cover another ticket for the same flight for me, which was now at a higher price. But he later backtracked and instead suggested to buy a cheaper ticket that landed at a different airport than what was originally planned. And I would have had to take a separate bus to reach the same location as before. Furthermore it would reach Paris 6 hours later than originally planned so my original plans on the first day will also be affected.

  
After airing my concerns with him, he bought another ticket for me on the same original flight, but now the flight ticket was nearly double of the original price (which I had already paid for). John later sent me a request to pay for half of the new flight ticket, despite originally offering to pay for it. I understand that mistakes can happen and eventually chipped in to pay for the new flight ticket.

  
But I feel that this whole situation could be avoided and also the way he handled it felt like he wasn’t sincere in correcting his mistake. It was only after I shared my concerns before he eventually decided to get another ticket. So AITA for feeling like I shouldn’t need to pay for someone else’s mistake?",AmItheAsshole
Update:  for not going to my brother's wedding after a late invite,"[Original Post](https://www.reddit.com/r/AmItheAsshole/comments/1bgoqzx/aita_for_not_going_to_my_brothers_wedding_after_a/) where I asked if I would be TA for not going to my brother justin's wedding after a late invite. the late invite came because my other brother, Evan, who was not speaking to me and refused to be the same space with me after I slept with his ex, was invited and not me.

firstly, I would say that I really did take into consideration a lot of the comments that said I've been punished by the family enough. Evan has the right to still be mad but after this length of time I think it's time the rest of my family start treating me as an equal member again.

I did fly home for the wedding. the friend who I was on vacation with was very agreeable to me going. I know the judgement was that I would not be TA for skipping, but I was just too scared to lose Justin too. Yes, I wanted to have the conversation about him treating me equally now, but to do that I first needed him to be speaking with me.

Unexpectedly, Justin actually picked me up from the airport. he was immediately apologetic for how he talked to me and the position he put me in in forcing me to fly home, and recognized it wasn't right or fair. he even offered to pay the cost of my tickets. I accepted his apology, but told him we could talk about it more later, it was his wedding day and the focus should be on him and that.

we drove to the hotel where he and my parents and the other groomsmen, including Evan where you staying. Evan came to my room shortly after I checked in. It wasn't a happy movie scene where we hugged and all was forgiven, it was really awkward, two people on eggshells. we just sorta agreed to have a good day for Justin, and talk at some later point. in the end I am glad I went to the wedding, as unfair as Justin asking was, it was pretty clear that having both me and Evan there that day meant a lot to him. I flew back out the next day to meet my friend.

since I've been back Evan and I have been talking and have met up. I've apologized again, but also he has forcing me out. he was (understandably) mad at me, and said he just could never seem to move past being mad, and it became easier to stay mad. but he missed me, he's wanted to call and then backed off doing so. we are slowly working on things. it's awkward, but getting better. I've met his gf and been to his apartment.

I did talk to Justin more about how unfair it was, and he agreed. as Evan is no longer demanding it be a 'him-or-i' choice, the conversation with Justin was easier. I would say that I was planning to man up and tell him I would no longer agree to that situation, and I hope I would have actually done so. but the situation no longer exists. he also did try to pay for my ticket again when I came back, but I didn't accept his offer.

hopefully the year continues on this positive direction.",AmItheAsshole
 for parking in this peticular spot on my side of the parking lot,"I (M29) moved into my apartment last year in May. My apartment is on the first floor in the back of the building with access to a side parking lot that is between mine and another apartment building of the same complex.
   Since the side parkinglot is less than 5 feet from my bedroom window and the closest spot to my front door, I parked my car there. There are covered (paid) and uncovered (free to use) spots. My side of the lot where I parked is uncovered and available first come basis. 
   A resident (elder man) from the building on the opposite side of the lot parks his car on that side of the lot (covered parking). Last year when I parked there (my side of the lot) the first time, he came out behind my building yelling ""who's car is this?"" Which lead to a convo of him asking me not to park beind his car on my side of the lot, claiming he has neck issues and needs to back across the lot, Into the spots on my side of the lot then pull forward to turn out of the lot.
    I've personally seen that this is not always true and he tends to pull out fine without using the spot on my side of the lot. Until now I've parked elsewhere but now that it's summer I want to park there again. 
    Today when I parked there, he left me a note on my window in all caps saying ""please please don't park behind black ford"" 
   So.. AITA for wanting to park in this spot that I am in my right to park in? ",AmItheAsshole
" for Not Paying My Friend Rent for a SLEEPOVER?
","Me (18F) and my Friend (19F) lets call her Shay, have been friends for two years, since high school, we would have sleepovers all the time, which might seem a bit strange for some people our age we still found it fun! But it was always great!

When we were first friends we both lived with our parents and we would make plans around going to each others houses. Every time Shay would come over to my house for a sleepover she would bring food of some kind, a treat of something for us to share, no matter what she would bring something even if it meant going to the store and coming an hour late.

I would try and bring snacks when I could/remembered but I most of the time just bought stuff for the both of us if we went out instead. Recently Shay started renting an apartment with a roommate who I have only really seen once, but we still decided to continue with our sleepovers.

While she was moving in we had most of the sleepovers at my place while she unpacked, but then we finally had the chance to have one at her new apartment! I went over and had a sleepover as normal just having fun and goofing off watching movies and all that. I did not bring any snacks to this sleepover, nor did we really go out and buy anything. I thought it was fine.

It was a long weekend so I stayed two nights, It all seemed normal until I started to leave and say good bye. But then Shay came up to me and asked me to pay for rent during the time that I was there. I was shocked, it was a two night sleepover!

She wanted 50$ for while I was there, it was because I ate her food and spent time in her apartment, her roommate paid rent and so did Shay, and because I stayed there I would need to help too. I instantly said no, and that it was crazy. I barely ate anything and she would come over to sleepovers at my place all the time, and before I never had to do anything like this.

I asked her why it was different now and why she doesn't pay me too! But her argument is that she brings food every time to my house and its not my house, its my parent's. That this is her own place that she has to rent during university and she can't just keep free loaders on her budget. If someone stayed here it was their responsibility to help pay for the water, electricity and food used.

I said I wasn't going to pay and stormed out. She still hasn't messaged me back and wont respond to my calls. I feel bad now, and I think it is kind of silly to get in a fight over 50$ especially after such a long friendship. True 25$ a night isn't bad, and I could pay for it... But it's the fact that she didn't tell me before I slept over!

So... AITA for not paying? Should I go back and apologize for getting upset and just give her the money and have sleepovers only at my place now? I don't know if I am in the right or wrong here, my sister says that I should just pay her and keep the friendship instead of having it strained over something dumb... What do you guys think?

",AmItheAsshole
 for not attending my friend’s graduation?,"As graduation season approaches, I've found myself caught in a bit of a bind. I (21F) am graduating college next month. I go to a large university and we have multiple ceremonies depending on which college you’re in.

Recently, my friend, who is also graduating (22F), expressed disappointment that I won't be attending her ceremony. To give some context, we're both graduating on the same day but at different times—her ceremony is later in the day, while mine is earlier. On that day, I've already made dinner reservations with my family to celebrate, coinciding with the time of her graduation.

I explained to her that I can't cancel my plans with my family to attend her ceremony, but from her perspective, she was hoping I would be there. I think there might have been a misunderstanding because we hadn't really discussed our graduation plans in depth before this. Now, she's upset with me, and some of our mutual friends are siding with her, arguing that attending each other's graduations is expected. However, some of them won't graduate until next year, which makes it easier for them to attend multiple ceremonies without their own conflicting schedules.

I feel stretched thin with everything going on, and with my family visiting, I want to prioritize celebrating with them. Plus, I'm not sure what they would do during her ceremony, which could be over an hour and a half long—I wouldn't want to leave them alone, especially since they've traveled a long way to support me.

If I had more time, I would love to be there for my friend, but realistically, it's just not feasible to do everything in one day. It's my graduation too, and I want to make it special. Unfortunately, I can't change my dinner reservations either, as most places are already fully booked during this busy time of year. It feels like a lose-lose situation.

So, AITA for not attending my friend's graduation?",AmItheAsshole
 for feeling fed up with my adult kids?,"I have 2 adult kids, one in mid 30s and other in late 20s. I am in my mid 60s and still working full-time, partially to be able to support them, To be fair: They both struggle with mental health issues and one with substance issues, possibly disabling.  One lives with me, the other within 3 miles. Also, I adore them and set up this dynamic thinking it was temporary.  I try to reflect back their best selves to them, and so have set up their expectations of me.

So, It’s now 5 years in of this dynamic:  I provide financial support to both of  them. For one of them, I frequently drop everything to provide emotional support (middle of the night, anytime) for one of them. No matter how exhausted or how much work I have the next day, I am there. I want to be there - nothing is more important to me than them.

Neither ever offer to help me with anything and both expect I will handle their hard things (that other adults handle) for them. If I ask for help and they agree, I cannot count on it. They often cannot follow through for one reason or another. Neither ever asks me a single question about my world or life. It’s literally been 6 months since the last time one of them asked me a question or showed curiosity about anything about me. If we do make plans they mostly  cancel them, even for the last 3 years on my birthday, because they are too tired or not feeling well. Sometimes legit, sometimes exhausted from staying up all night before. They might get me a birthday present but more often buy some cake or something that I eat alone or with my life partner, at most.  When my mother and exhusband (their father) died this last year, neither helped with any of it - I had to clear out all the stuff and handle everything. I am currently paying to store my exhusbands stuff because they can’t make themselves go through it.

I am feeling heartbroken. I don’t feel as if either care about me at all and I am starting to question whether they feel any love for me at all (they say they do, and I think they believe it). I love them deeply and want to take care of them, but AITA for continuing to do that instead of saving for retirement or having fun? On the other hand, AITA for being hurt, sad, and fed up? If I say any of this to them, they will rage, deny, and probably cut off contact with me for a while.   AITA but for which part ?",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my mom's boyfriend to my wedding?,"To start off, I love my mom and want her to be a main part of my wedding this weekend. Her boyfriend of 2ish years is mentally abusive, a drunk, cheated on my mom with his ex-wife, and stole over 500 of my aunt's boudoir photos. 

I don't want him anywhere near me, but she's saying she won't come at all unless he's allowed too. She even went as far as to say ""Grandma no longer has a spot, so he will be taking hers."" My grandma (her mom) passed away less than 6 months ago. My grandma was a huge part of my life, and I'm devasted by her passing. 

My mom has become an alcoholic and has multiple DUIs she doesn't know I know about. I won't stop her from dating someone (toxic for her or otherwise) but it doesn't stop me from voicing my opinion of him. The rest of my family also disapproves of her relationship with him because it's simply not healthy for her. She's never been a good judge of character. My bio dad doesn't know I exist because he supposedly tried to beat her stomach while pregnant with me to force a miscarriage, and my ex-stepdad has been in and out of jail my whole life.

So AITA for not inviting him to my wedding for family only? She also has had no part in the planning or payment of anything regarding the wedding itself. She hasn't even seen me in my dress.",AmItheAsshole
 if I didn’t split the lottery “evenly”.,"I was out with some friends and we were talking about how the lottery jackpot was over a billion. I on a whim decided to slap down $20 for my first ever lottery purchase. My two buddies then get up and buy $6 and $2 tickets.

While we were then talking about how we’d spend our hypothetical winnings (which is the only actual fun part of the lottery), my friends said “we’d of course split it 3 ways”. My response was basically “what? No.”, we would split it proportionally. There are 14 tickets, and I bought 10/14s of them so that’s how the payout would go. You can spring the “even payout” rule *after* we all buy different amounts. i was then shouted down as being the unreasonable one, and that of course you always pool and evenly split.

To be clear, we did not win the lottery (shocker), and if I did win the jackpot id probably split it evenly anyway (it’s an ungodly amount of money and a few million difference wouldn’t actually change its affect on my life), but if I won a smaller jackpot of $100,000? I’d probably be more inclined to split it proportionally

I honestly cannot tell if I am being the unreasonable one here.

Edit: Just to be clear, there was/is no real anger or spite over this. It was more on of those friendly debates you get into with good friends.",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my best friend out of my surprise proposal?,"My fiancé Mark (30m) planned a surprise proposal for me (28f) and invited all our family and friends. Among those friends is my best friend, Melissa (28f). Three months ago, Melissa ended her relationship with her long term boyfriend and has been pretty down since. I bring this up because I think it is relevant as to why she acted the way she did.

Anyways, they were all there and Mark proposed to me and it was wonderful. Of course I said yes, and we popped open a few bottles to celebrate. Drinks were flowing, and everyone was happy for us and congratulating us.

While we were talking to Melissa, she made jokes like ""if you hurt her, I'll come for you."" Just things like that. Whatever, we were all tipsy and having fun so we didn't think anything of it. Melissa then pulled us aside and hugged us and cried. She said that if she hadn't broken up with her ex, she would have been in the same position as me. She told us how much she loved us and then turned to me and said that when we got divorced, she will still be here for me. Mark said that that was a very inappropriate comment to make and Melissa doubled down and said that it wasn't inappropriate or irrelevant because divorce happens all the time. I could tell that this wasn't a joke anymore and Mark and Melissa were serious.

At this point I got angry and I told her she needed to leave. She protested but I got her an uber and made her go home. The next day she wrote to me a long message about how I am an ah for kicking her out like that. She said that she is happy for me and was only making a joke, and also that she is going through a lot and me kicking her out only made her feel like she's lost everyone. I feel bad because I know that she would not have acted like that if she hadn't just broken up with her ex. Should I just have been patient and let her stay? Aita?

  
i would like to add that Melissa and Mark have an okay relationship. they get along well but really are only friends by association through me. they have never had any problems though.",AmItheAsshole
 to expect reimbursement from my SO. ,"So (30f) and I (33m) 4 years dating. 

Significant other recently unfairly lost her job. We both make low six figures, and are new to this income, both having this pay for around a year; our savings are low. 

We are about to move out of our place to a new one with a new lease. We've begun a large argument.  She believes that I should handle the rent and moving costs because she will burn through her savings. I was willing to do this, but I feel she should, when and if she has the means, pay back into my account. 

She thinks this is wrong, that if I care about her, I should support her without any expectation of reimbursement, or that it shows a lack of trust to expect her to help pay me back. That she has friends whose so's are holding down costs in similar situations with no expectation. 

She says, ""I would burn through my whole savings."" Which is exactly what I will have to do if i pay for everything. But that's not what I'm asking her to do, I'm saying I will pay, and she can reimburse when she can, if she can. 

This move will cost a lot, and we have two months of rent to pay in our current place still. I'm saying, I will pay, just when you are back on the wagon (in likely a 6 figure job (and likely very soon)) pay me back when you can. 

 I feel like the idea of me paying 15k over the next two months and her getting a job and thinking it's wrong to pay me back, or that I'm a bad person for thinking she should, when and if she can is unfair. It feels completely reasonable to me to expect this. 

And too, I had lost my job a bit back, and she maintained hers, and I continued to pay rent and bills fairly. There was not an offer from her to take on the demands. 

I feel like I understand the position of, well aren't we going to be together? What does it matter? But then feel that is a flippable position. If we're going to be together, it shouldn't matter to reimburse into my account. 

I am pretty much dead set in my position. I can't understand how she would think it's fair that I take the burden with no expectation to reimburse, which I think I have fairly laid out as, when and if able.

AITA",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to go swimming with my brothers after they were 2 hours late?," I (17F) am currently staying in Jamaica with my immediate family, including my older brothers (26M, 28M), and we're staying with our grandma. Today, we planned to go swimming, and they told me to be ready in 4 minutes. I promptly got ready, packed everything I needed, and waited patiently. However, minutes turned into hours, and despite my attempts to reach them, they didn't respond. Finally, after two hours, they said they were ready to go swimming. Feeling frustrated and ignored, I told them I no longer wanted to go. They became furious, arguing that they took time out of their day to show me around. Now, everyone is upset with my decision, but I can't shake off the feeling of being disregarded and disrespected. So, AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 for yelling at my class,"I'm in high school, easily overstimulated, introverted, and shy, with ADHD , general anxiety, and social anxiety. Today, in bible class, after the class concluded, a few extroverted girls who had taken to me started asking me and I started talking about the group project we had to work on. I've told these girls multiple times that I have things against people touching my things, and was freaking out about the project in general because it's a religious interview (that requires me to ask sensitive questions to random strangers). I'm getting stressed about it, and it didn't help that these girls were also trying to force me into saying the name of this guy across the room. (It's become a bit of a running joke that i can't remember anyone's names for the life of me. I don't like the joke, but I can't really get them to stop and don't have the courage to. Additionally, the boy's name sounds weird in my mouth, and I really don't want to say it. I'm not sure why.) Several things lead to another- people asking me what school I came from (I'm new), about why I was so stressed out, about my boyfriend- the list goes on and on. I continuously tried to hide behind my computer and put in headphones to show I didn't want to talk, but the two girls kept tapping me (I hate being touched) to get my attention. On top of the interrogation, one of the girls decided she wanted to listen to what I was listening to and tried pulling my headphones out of the jack so she could listen after I told her no. I was listening to Insane Clown Posse at the time, and I closed the music app before she could expose me. I told her, no, I didn't want her listening to it, because I knew it would scare her and go against her morals. They insisted. I changed the music to a more tame playlist, but I was still incredibly stressed out and needed space. I eventually stood up and told the ENTIRE CLASS ""I don't want to talk, please stop asking me questions.""

The questions did not stop. The final straw came when the girl from before leaned in too close to me, trying to eavesdrop on what I was listening to again. I freaked out. I stood up, slamming my laptop shut, and yelled ""DO YOU PEOPLE NOT KNOW THE MEANING OF BOUNDARIES?! LEAVE ME ALONE!!""

The teacher called for me, but I left the room. I'm safe now (principal's office. They're giving me a period to cool off) but I feel like I was in the wrong. Should I have just put up with it? Put on a smile? Let them listen to the music? Was I the Asshole? Because I feel like I was.



UPDATE! I talked with my therapist about future solutions to this problem and am also waiting to speak with the assistant principal about consequences. wish me luck, this isn't gonna be a fun conversation.",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling my roommate that I wasn’t going on vacation?,"So I won’t keep this too long, but this happened today and I really don’t know how to feel about it. 

For some context, my roommate is also my best friend that I’ve known for years and years, and we’ve done and been through a lot together and we’ve supported each other through a lot of problems in our lives, and moving in was the option for the both of us to get out of our life situations at the time, and it’s worked out very well so far except for today. 

 About a month ago, I planned to go on vacation for a few days for a camping trip, and I told my family and friends I was going, but I neglected to tell him (even though I thought I did, either he must’ve forgot or I must’ve not told him). Last night, we were playing games, and before we went to bed I told him “Yeah we’ll play some more tomorrow”, and that was the plan until I decided today to leave a day early so I could get there and enjoy the few days I have off work. 

I told him of this change, and he became quite upset at me since he wasn’t sure about my plans and he was expecting to play games. I told him I was sorry and I should’ve clarified, but then he sent a long message about how I’m never home, and he’s dependent on me to be there for his plans at night. He told me when I’m not there and he’s waiting, he’d rather go to bed since he’d rather not stay up sitting and waiting for me to come home so we can have fun. I feel bad for him, but I told him straight up that I’m my own man and I have my life to live with my own things to do and what I want to do, and he has yet to respond. Am I wrong for saying that? Or am I in the right? ",AmItheAsshole
 For calling out my MOH?,"This happened a few years ago, but it still kinda weighs on me. 

   I got married to the love of my life in 2021, and I had asked my best friend, who basically was my little sister, to be my MOH. She'd accepted and was all about helping me, until she wasn't. I had to plan EVERYTHING. She didn't set up my bachelorette party, my mom did. She didn't go with me to pick my dress. My mom and aunt did. She didn't set up my bridal shower, my mom did. She would have regular freak out episodes weekly, where I would tell her ""Hey, dude if this is too much for you you don't have to do it I can ask someone else I'm legit not mad,"" repeatedly, but she'd insist on doing it. Nothing got done, I had to do it all myself, or my mom did what she could. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

   The day before the wedding was the bachelorette party, which was low key and just me and my girls playing games and drinking at a hotel. She was there, got blackout drunk, and left the hotel to go meet up with some hook-up she'd just met on tinder or something. She didn't show back up until 5am, and passed out. We were supposed to be up and getting ready so the photographer could do the pre-wedding photos of us doing makeup and hair... She spent the entire time in the shower, so I got maybe three photos total before we went to the venue to finish getting ready. She didn't show up, instead she had to go to the corner store to get razors cause she needed to shave her legs, instead of helping me get into my wedding gown.

After the ceremony, we did photos, and when it came time for the food and speeches, she was nowhere to be found. She'd gone back to the hotel room, with the boy from tinder, and had sex with him on the honeymoon suite bed, and left it dirty; she left the do not disturb on the door so nothing was clean or replaced and it was a disaster, the sheets were  crumpled behind the door and everything. I know she did, because I found the condom wrapper in the trash. 

I let it go for the rest of the day, and honestly for the week while we were on our honeymoon. When we got back, she kept trying to call and message me, and I hadn't found the words yet to tell her just how angry I was. I finally did, and told her that I never should have asked her to be my MOH. Ever. I honestly should have just asked someone else after the first time she'd called me crying about how she didn't think she could do it. She'd vanished, and ultimately tried to sabotage what was supposed to be the best day of my life. She proceeded to call me a narcissist and selfish (because I wanted MY WEDDING DAY to run smoothly).

WAS I THE ASSHOLE?????",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to pay my car off after I totaled it? And I can’t drive it because of a salvaged title ,"AITA I just totaled my car and I have it through my dads name in his credit, I recently found out that we can’t fix it and I thought that I we would give the car back and since I totaled it the insurance would pay it off, but my dad is expecting me to pay 318 dollars every month for a car I can’t drive, do I have any way to sue the bank for this outlandish nonsense? I mean the car is totaled wtf they still want me to pay for it?",AmItheAsshole
 for not keep mentoring my friend in her new position?,"Ok, so my friend \[37F\] and I \[33M\] were running for the same position at another company without each-other's knowledge at first. She and I have been friends from some years now and I was her boss in our previous company until I got a position in my current company and she got promoted to another department.

We always were so professional at work and never had any personal issue there. Then, I got my current job a few years back and she stayed in our previous company but in a new role in other department, she was so excited, and we remained friends even after that, great friends to be honest.  
Thing is that without we us knowing, we both applied to the same company and the same position, for me it would have been a horizontal move, for her it was definitely a promotion, she had never had a leadership position so we both were excited for each other, it wasn't matter which one of us got selected.

Well, she got the position, I don't. I was bumped at first but at the same time truly happy for her. We got to celebrate, and things were good. I talked to my boyfriend that since this was a position two levels above her previous one, I was afraid she couldn't meet the initial expectations of the company, but I was there to support her as long as I can.

Thing is that first month and she already texted me daily, almost during the whole day. There is a lot of things that she knew how to do as an Analyst, but she didn't have the experience as manager to build from scratch, so she was getting a hard time. Initially I was happy helping her, but now I'm so tired, I feel like I have two jobs (and one of them is ad-honorem). I talked to my friend about this and told her that she either hired me as a consultant/mentor or please keep consulting as low as possible since it was so tiring for me; she got mad and said that I was just being jealous of her getting the position instead of me and that I'm not being a good friend by denying her ""this little help"" (she said) and that if money would've enough to get more energy, then I'm just being ambitious and I want to make money at her expense, that since she is older and she hasn't have the opportunity of a managing position I should considerer her needs instead of thinking about money.

Things escalated, now she is walking in a thin line since she might be fired for not meeting the expectations and that would devastate her; my boyfriend says that I should help her a few more, but I can't get off of the feeling of being taken advantage of. Is not that money would give me a whole new set of stamina, but I would feel that is a fair compensation for all the hard work I would be doing.



So, AITA for not keep mentoring her?",AmItheAsshole
 for gatekeeping my recipes from my one upper DIL,"So my DIL has a habit of one upping people, at the beginning I don’t really notice it but it is obvious now. Everyone in the family has something they are good at and it’s like their thing. For example my daughter was really into making pies. One day DIL ( I’ll call her Kelly) asked for the recipes. My daughter gave them and started to bring pies to every family event, kinda kicking my daughter out of her thing. Then pushed for the family to compare them. My daughter wasn’t happy.

The big one which made me really notice what she was doing was when she one upped my youngest. She was 14 at the time and when they all the kids hit high school, they were responsible for getting gifts for events. My youngest wasn’t hiding the fact that she was giving me a knitted scarf for secret Santa. She was 14 and was very obvious about it. The whole family knew.

So on Christmas DIL got me a very nice scarf bonus gift, and gave it to me right after my youngest gave me hers. So that wasn’t okay. I had a conversation with her and she denied doing it, my son also told me he can’t see it.

Every since then more people have been noticing it and even my husband sees it. It has happened to almost every women/girl in the family at this point.

This brings me to the point of this post, I have really good Italian recipes form my mom. I bring them to events. My DIL asked for the recipes and I told her no. This started about why. She accused me on not giving her family recipes since I don’t see her as families and I told her it is due to her behavior. She called me a dick.

My son is also on my ass about it saying I am gatekeeping recipient since I don’t like her.



",AmItheAsshole
 for stalking a guy I was talking to on social media?,"Ok so I met this guy on tinder and things actually seemed to be going pretty well. We talked about past relationships and he said his last one ended 6 months ago. 

He followed me on instagram and when I looked at it he had one post with one comment from a girl who had him in her profile picture. — edit: comment was from March which is why I was hyper aware of it. 

So I looked her up on Facebook &amp; she was posting about how proud of him she was a month ago. So I asked the same question about when his last relationship was and then asked him not to lie. He knew I saw his Facebook and blocked me (his reasoning was to try to be funny and show he “caught” me). 

He today brought it up again and was saying how uncomfortable it made him and I said I wouldn’t have had to if he didn’t lie about the timing of his past relationship. I told him that there was no way in hell I was going to meet a random guy in person without doing a solid background check on whatever the internet had available about them &amp; he still claimed it was weird bc I talked on the phone with him. I was extremely sarcastic and unapologetic since I still really don’t see anything wrong with looking at publicly available information prior to meeting a complete stranger…. But that leads me to my question - AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for throwing a party for my daughter?,"my daughter(15) hates being second best at something. I think it's because she is always second at everything. a few days ago she participated in a table tennis match in our province and of course she became second. she was sobbing the whole way home.

so to cheer her up we decided to throw a surprise party to celebrate it. when she entered the party she was standing there for a moment saying nothing then she burst into tears and asked if we are mocking her. I told her that we are not. we are celebrating her success. she yelled at me that ""I lost. what is to celebrate?"" I told her that she only lost ONE game. she yelled that ""I lost THE game, it wasn't just any game. I'm a loser would you celebrate it if I was 10th?"" I told her she was not 10th she was better. she yelled that ""yes I'm a better loser. a better loser is still a loser"" and went to her room crying.

now my ex thinks I was an asshole for throwing this party when I knew she wasn't in a mood to celebrate",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my mother live me me? ,"This is going to be long. So my  Mom (Debra 63f) and I (Jacob 46m) am being called a asshole because I will not allow my mother to move in with my family. A little back story my parents divorced when I was 15. I feel like she leaned on me a little too hard when she went through that time more emotionally than anything else. 
So our relationship wasn't terrible but she certainly wouldn't have been my first call for help. Fast forward I am married and have 4 wonderful kids 20f 17m and 5 year old twins. 20f is out of the house. So my mother has had some health issues come up and along with that it was found out she was a heavy alcoholic. She hid it well. 
When covid hit she was able to changer her work to work from home so she lived alone working in front of a computer and pretty much drinking. Her job was pressuring her to come back to the office well with the alcohol related health problems she said she couldn't. Well with no savings what so ever she just quits her job and can't afford rent. 
While all this was going on my 17yr old was diagnosed with epilepsy and I was recently diagnosed with cancer. We really have way too much going on not to mention not wanting the alcoholism in my house with young kids.
 My mom's older sister pretty much said if you won't take her then I will. So she moved in with her sister a couple states away. A couple months into this arrangement her sister calls me to come and get my mother as she cannot handle her. I told her no as my situation has not change and she couldn't live with me. ",AmItheAsshole
 for sharing texts between my sister and myself with my two closest friends,"For context my sisters husband has anger problems and has cut out both my parents because they brought up his behavior to them and how it affects my nephew. I was chatting with my sister about it yesterday and she refuses to take accountability that what he did to me was wrong and what led to the altercation between my parents and him and the role she and her husband played. My two closest friends are like my sisters since my sister and I do not have a relationship, and my parents live overseas so I don’t have anyone in my family to talk to about this situation. So, I decided to share screenshots of what I said and what my sister said to my friends and my mom told me it was completely out of line and a violation of my sister’s privacy. She said I was completely wrong and I needed to delete the screenshots from my texts with my friends. I coldly said “do not tell me what to do” because I’m 25 years old, I’m not a child. lol she knows this I don’t need to explain that part and she blew up on me and is refusing to speak to me now. I’m at a total loss of what to do and don’t know if I should apologize to my mom or stand my ground this time. (My mom often displaces her hurt with anger) it’s confusing to me. Am I the villain lol

CLARIFICATION; the screenshots were short and partial because my sister didn’t say much, I was going off on her so it was villainizing myself if anything there was NO private info about her in the SS. Her responses were generic “I’m sorry you feel that way” etc ",AmItheAsshole
 for suggesting someone’s connection to a school helped her get in?,"
I got to a small public school. Most people who go to college go to state schools. 

There’s a girl in my class, Sam, who’s pretty smart. Her family is not from here, and one of her parents attended an Ivy League school where she has two relatives who are professors, and her other parent also attended a very prestigious school. 

Today was our college decision day, and Sam was wearing a shirt for the school her parent attended. A teacher in one of our classes asked her about it, saying “it’s not too often that someone from here goes to [that school]”. 

Sam is smart, but she also had an advantage to get in. I responded with “it’s not too often someone here is so connected with [that school]” as a lighthearted joke. Sam got annoyed and told me that I was being rude. Her friend told me I was downplaying her achievements because I was jealous(which I wasn’t). 

Our teacher had to tell people to move on. I didn’t mean it in a rude way, just that it was easier for Sam to be accepted than the average person. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for setting a 6 month ultimatum to my brother to clean up his mess room after 2.5 years of moving out our parents home?,"My brother John (20ish) has moved out of my parents house to study around 2.5 years ago to a uni around an hour away. We are three siblings.

John left his room (let's refer to it as the Room) as a big mess with a lot of trash, old empty takeaway boxes, boxes filled with school paperwork and a dirty mattress on the floor. Basically half the floor is covered.  
He has promised several times to clean up the Room and hand it over to our parents.

Me and my sister have the okay from our parents to convert Johns old room to a guest room.  
So far John has not cleaned the Room and handed it over to my parents. They asked him several times since moving out, but he never committed. We have even arranged storage boxes that John can organise his remaining stuff easily and store them in the basement. John has used the Room several times to crash there, when he was on a birthday of his highschool friends. After starting uni, John was half a year on an exchange semester in a different country.

Me and my sister + her bf live far away and visit family from time to time. If two parties visit, one has to sleep in the Room. We and our parents think that the Room is disgusting.

WIBTA for setting an ultimatum to my brother to clean up his old room within 6 month and hand the Room over to his parents? Otherwise me and sister would bring his stuff to the bulky waste and convert the Room to a clean guest room.

Edit: Me and my sister left at a similar age. We both left basically empty rooms behind.",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to get my roommate evicted ,"Get ready because it’s long. My roommate (23F) and I (20 F) moved in to a small two bedroom last fall. We were randomly matched, it was my second year in college and I didn’t really have all that many friends. We had met before we moved into the apartment just to see if we got along and we told each other a bit about ourselves. I told my roommate (let’s call her Lucy) that I had a dog and was moving in with him, I’d paid all the fees and rent to keep him there and found out she was moving in with her dog too. 

 We move in together and the dogs meet and immediately get along. About two weeks into living together I was still so anxious of letting my dog into the common area that I would leave him locked in my room when I would go run an errand or leave to a class. Lucy would keep her dog in the living area when she was away because she didn’t want her dog to ruin any of her things and I didn’t think much of it until I heard a loud crash outside my room where my dog and I were settling for a small nap and I come to see her dog hiding behind the couch and my tv shattered on the floor. Her dog had been chewing on the table runner I put over the plain grey console to make it look cute and tugged it too far. 

Lucy was working part time at a cafe and was a full time student in her senior year. She would also spend the night some nights with her boyfriend and leave me with her dog after politely asking and being reassured I was ok with it. After all, I wanted to be a good roommate since we were still acclimating. She was busy and stressed and didn’t pay that much attention to her dog, but when I told her about what happened and showed the pictures to prove it, she wanted to give me her smaller regular tv. After a small argument she finally agreed to replace my tv. 

Lucy’s dog only became worse at chewing. She would jump onto the kitchen counter and grab my food when we were away and would eat it, destroy toys and leave messes. She also shed a lot, so we would constantly have to pick up after her. Slowly, Lucy stopped being so apologetic and a lot of things came into light for me as my patience wore thin. 

I’d had enough. I took all of my things and hid them in my room, Put all of my groceries in my mini fridge, stopped helping clean up after her dog and no longer made myself available to dog sit. I would avoid her under the guise of being busy but still was polite to avoid any further conflict.

Lucy ended up getting depressed and had her mom move in with us for a week. After the week, she left with her mom without a word and didn’t come back for 6 months. Now, she came back and brought back her dog and had her new bf stay with us while she settled in. I’d made myself at home with my decor etc and they’ve been really disrespectful of my things. Again. She left yesterday to go to an air b&amp;b with her bf and left her dog at our apartment for the next five days even though I told her I wouldn’t take care of it. AITA for trying to get her out? ",AmItheAsshole
 if I ask a girl that I am seeing to not sleep over at her guy friend's house?,"I (28M) am currently seeing a Jess (24F) and are currently in the ""talking phase"". Recently we just went on our first date and everything seemed well.

The problem is that recently one of the friends within our mutual group is coming back from overseas temporarily, and she wants to spend more time with him. This coming weekend, she wants to stay over at his place to play some games and then sleep over at his place for an event the next day. I wouldn't be thinking too much about this if the friend has multiple rooms, however he is currently staying in a one room studio.

She does have another option of going to another mutual friend's (Sam) place as he does have an extra room for her. However she wants to spend as much time as possible with the returning friend and also it would be less of a hassle to stay there instead of switching locations in the middle of the night.

Obviously I'm not too keen on hearing this, however she has known this mutual group of friends for a much longer time than I have and I have only recently entered this circle through Sam. In this case, I trust Sam more than the returning friend as I know him well, so I would prefer that she go to Sam's instead. At the same time, we are not mutually exclusive so I don't wish to make my feelings known on this matter. She did ask for my thoughts and I replied that if she feels safe with him, then it's her choice as she knows him better than I do.

With all this in mind, WIBTA if I ask her to not stay over the returning friend's place?",AmItheAsshole
 if i confronted her?,"I (16F) started a new school this March (southern hemisphere). i switched due to bullying and other motives. When I started I was really nervous but luckily these two girls who have now become my friends spoke to me and we get on wondefully. The people in my class are usually very nice although occasionally weird and bad mannered but i suppose ill get used to it soon enough. 

On the first day of school i saw this girl, who we will call Katie. Katie walked in kind of late and she bumped into the teacher and that got a small giggle from the class, she seemed nice and automatically made me think of Kate from 'Alexa &amp; Katie'. Anywho, she seemed nice but I never really had the balls to talk to her or anything. Throughout March i noticed some 'passive agressive' signs from her to me. 

She constantly looks at me with a rather mean look, she yelled at me when I said something she had already said (i didnt hear her since shes on the opposite side of class that me) and everytime I walk near her she turns and giggles with her friends and starts whispering. I honestly dont know if its just me being paranoid or what but I'm losing my mind. Is she being  mean to me in an undirect form..or is she just a rbf girl? 

I want to confront her and ask if shes got a problem with me but Idk if thats too much. WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
H after being offered at being called inferior?,"My (f25) sister (2f9) is a Physical Therapist (PT), and a fucking good one too. 

I cannot tell you how proud I am of her, and and work she put in to get where she is today. But, throughout her long and turbulent study years, she has had to deal with Occupational Therapists (OT), which she has complained about, degraded, said as useless to the world, and on numerous occasions stated that the only reason they are studying OT is because they didn't get into the PT program, understandable, it's a hard course and took my sister 3 tries before she could get in. Me, I didn't have luck with the whole school thing, and have been working off and on for a while, looking for a permanent job to get out from under my parents feet. 

The other day, while we were having Sunday lunch at my parents, my sister, once again complained about the OTs in her ward at the hospital and how stupid they were for not realizing something or the other (can't really remember what). We all listened and agreed on what was said, and oohed and aahed as she explained what they did wrong and how to do it and how she fixed it, you know normal stuff. 

We moved on, and my sister said that she needed to create a thing (can't remember what exactly) to help a patient regain mobility in her hand. I listened, because even if I have no idea what the hell she's talking about, I am still interested. I gave her an option on a toy she could make with pipe cleaners and large beads to help regain mobility and flexibility in the patients hands. 

My sister said it was a great idea and said that maybe I should go and study OT. 

I was quiet for a moment, hoping that she would gather what she just said, and when she didn't I called her out on it: ""That's pretty f***in rude"".

My sister didn't seem to understand what I was saying, and when I brought up the numerous times she trashed the OTs, and how stupid they all are, she told me I was over sensitive and that she didn't mean it like that. 

I told her it doesn't matter what she meant at that moment, her past outbursts at the selected field made her opinion very clear. 

My parents didn't agree and called me sensitive. 

I haven't apologized to her yet. 

AITAH?",AmItheAsshole
 if i decide to not call one of my ex bsf to our mutual friend group gatherings?,"I (17F) have another friend Zoe (17F).
Zoe was my best friend before it all went down the drain, because of her. I will be brief about what happened and why we aren't friends anymore.

Zoe has had crushes on her friend's crushes, including mine, she has also flirted with other guys when she was dating someone else which eventually led to their break up. So naturally when I broke up with my ex i asked her to maintain distance since she's my best friend i expected her to understand, and i know they were friends but her and I have been friends way longer than I had even dated my ex. 

She did not listen despite me telling her multiple and i mean MULTIPLE times, not to mention she wasn't there for me when we broke up because her ex that she cheated on had moved on and was dating someone else, and to cope with that fact she said and i quote ""i need male validation bro so I'm gonna hang out with XYZ since he has a crush on me"", so she was never there for me either. 

But despite all this I still gave her a chance and i would ask her to hang out, she obviously declined because she had other male friends to hang out with. I gave up and stopped talking to her, we fought, we ""sorted"" it out, she put a story about me on her insta saying crap about me and blocked me. 

I did not care because why should I. So recently I called my friends to hang out and did not invite her  because 1)she has me blocked so i couldn't contact her because I did decide to call her, 2) none of my other friends except 1-2 like her. We had a bunch of fun and she saw that since one of our friends called her downstairs to meet for a bit. She saw this and approached us and talked. She later texted everyone asking them to call her next time and that our fight (mine and her's) shouldn't affect their friendship and that she doesn't hold a grudge against me anymore and she regrets the way things went down with us.

Well now yesterday one of my friend's saw her story which had a reel saying ""once upon a time came from a bitch that would backstab friendships for a boy"" and she wrote ""peak (my name) behaviour?"". Obviously this pissed me off because we still have mutual friends that follow her and it won't create a good impression but on the other hand she always does things like this so I don't really care because people don't believe her.

So my friends and i were planning to go to the amusement park and i was wondering if i would be the asshole if I decide to not call her to such a big plan?

",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to view my roommates art?,"I have a roommate who I love and adore in most ways. They’re a great artist, however they can be quite demanding of me when they want an opinion, viewing, or critique of their art. Over the years, it has became a serious mental drain on me when they’re always asking me to look at their work. 

Today, we were in a common space in house. I was on the phone responding to messages, to which they asked pretty abruptly if I had an interest in viewing their art. I expressed that I was busy, somewhat annoyed as I was focused on the tasks at hand. They proceeded to guilt me that I am always busy, and that I don’t care about their art. 

I do care about their art, and I think they’re very talented, but I often feel like my boundaries that I have expressed are constantly ignored. This has led me to disinterest and resentment when they ask me to view their work. 

Today’s conversation turned into me educating them about how their behavior is not appropriate. In this case, I had indicated that I was busy, and they reacted in a way to make me feel guilt. I want to feel respected by them, but they always refute that when I say “no” to viewing their work that I am “always busy”, “don’t care about them/their art”, etc. 

I feel hurt by this behavior, and they refuse to acknowledge my point of view. They state that I am selfish, and an ass hole because of my boundaries and asking for them to be respected. 

Am I the ass hole? ",AmItheAsshole
 For blocking my neighbors car in after they do it to me?,"For context, I'm living in an apartment complex with no assigned parking. There's plenty of room for everyone, there's always empty spaces. 

Each unit gets one parking space, no more. If you have more, or a visitor they have to find street parking. 

I have a car and a motorcycle, my landlord gave me verbal permission to park my motorcycle and car in the same space. To make things easier to get my bike out, I parked next to a walkway, so I don't have to move my car to get my bike out. 

A week ago, I get home and my bike is parked across the back of a parking space, and my neighbors car is parked in front of it. I ignored it the first time. 

Today I get home from work and they did the same thing again. So I left a note politely asking them not to block my bike in, because they're parked so close I can't get it out without possibly damaging their car. 

My argument is that if it was a small car they wouldn't do that. Its not cool to block someone's vehicle in like that. 

My plan is if they do it again, pull my bike out and block them in, since they're okay blocking me in. 

WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
 for arguing with my mother?,"I (18M) recently got into an argument with my mother. To add some background, yesterday morning my mom was driving me to school and as we were getting there she told me she had to speak to me about something. I asked about what and she went into a slight rant about me and how I spend my time outside of school. 
My schedule consists of waking up at 6:00(I wake up early for reasons I won’t specify but they are for reasons my mom enforces), go to school from 8:30-1:30, get a ride back home from a friend from 1:30-2:00, wait for my mother to drop me off at the gym and stay from 2:00-4:00, get back home at 5:00, eat until 5:30, rest till 6:30, apply for scholarships or hw from 6:30-7:30, shower 7:30-8:00, and rest until I go to sleep at around 11:00 or 12:00.
My mom said that she dislikes the amount of time I spend on my phone (somewhat understandable I do honestly want to read more), the time I spend on video games (only played like an hour or two weekdays cause of scholarships and only on Wednesdays when I play with a friend or the weekend), that it does not seem like I actually care about my future, and that I don’t pressure my dad enough to fix her old car for me (don’t have my license yet). 
She also got annoyed that I chose another individual from my fathers side to be my godfather for my confirmation since my first communion godmother was also from that side (I’m just getting confirmed so that my future wedding and spouse do not have to wait for me to do that and unlike some of my family on my mothers side I know my cousin doesn’t care that I don’t believe in God and loves me the same). Finally she said all my “problems” would be fixed if I just believed in God and that he would give me a purpose. I know some people believe and live fruitful lives, but even when I believed I had the same problems so it doesn’t matter.
Forgot to mention that I am the president and founder of the Super Smash Bros club at my school and every Tuesday I do that instead of the gym. I practice at home when I can and take it to school every day. When she saw me put it in my bag she looked at me with the slightest look of disgust, and asked me if I really was “going to take that again today”? I’m not slacking either I’m in the top 4% of my class and never play during class time.
Anyways, I got out the car as soon as we arrived to school and didn’t really speak to her until today. Before I went upstairs my mother asked me if I was mad; I told her (in an angry tone but NOT screaming at her) that of course I’m mad because she said that unless I’m in school or applying for scholarships I’m just wasting time. I then left for my room to which she chased me to and said that if I felt that way it’s probably because I should reassess my life choices, that I was a spoiled child, and to never speak to her like that again (not once did I scream at her). I just said fine and shut the door when she left. So AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to contribute to an farewell gift?,"I (22M) in 4th year of my law degree with about 15 other people. Whenever there's a festival , celebration , etc. for someone, a batchmate will pass around a card for everyone to sign and put money into as a group gift.
Yesterday, the card was going around for a senior's farewell gift. I declined to sign or put money in. I don't really know this senior well, and I feel like contributing to gifts should be optional, not an obligation.
One of my other batchmates made a snarky comment about me being cheap. Another told me I was being rude by not participating. I think farewell is an important event, but I don't feel I should have to give a gift, especially money, to someone I barely know.
AITA here? Or are my batchmates the unreasonable ones for acting like contributing is mandatory?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my brother's boyfriend that my brother could do better?,"My (26M) baby brother ""Zach"" (13M) apparently has a boyfriend who I don't like.  This kid ""Rory"" (14M)  is a complete bully. Like one of those  jock bullies you see on tv. Him and a few of his football teammates are little a holes. Zach has had issues with bullies before and a really softspoken and kinda insecure kid so idk why he would pick someone like that.I' started as teacher last year at their school and I've seen him first hand  and  have had the pleasure of sending him to princpals office or stopping him from tormenting some other boy several times myself. 

I didn't even know about it till about a month ago when I saw  Rory's bike in our front yard. I thought he was messing with Zach but no I found them kissing in our old tree house. Rory embarrassed just kinda ran off and Zach refused to talk about it.  Lately I've noticed how Rory will bring him flowers.  they're almost always  only around the house and  how they kinda sneakily hold hands at school. But I also seee how Rory treats others and  how he flipped out once when Zach tried to hold his hand.

I tried to leave it alone figuring maybe the kid isn't out. But Monday I  saw how he had this one boy terrified and he hid in my classroom for lunch just to avoid Rory. I intercepted Rory at the door same day when he came over for Zach.  Zach was out with our brother Matt (16M) getting food so I took the chance to have a talk with Rory. I told him that he cant expect to act the way he does and come around this house  and Zacn. I told him he  either apologized to the student from earlier or not to come back over. He got mad and told me I couldn't do that and I told him my could do and deserves better than him. He teared up and ran off.

Zach got and practically ran in the house yelling at me about an 1hr and half later. Yelling at me that he couldn't believe I said that to Rory and I needed to take it back right now.  I told him I wasnt and it was my job to protect him. He yells at me that I'm not mom and dad. Which I respond back with the fact that our parents are dead and both he and Matt are my responsibility now. I told him I didn't understand why he would like a guy like Rory and he yells at me that I never gave him a chance and I don't know anything about him. Was I the A hole?",AmItheAsshole
 for begging to stay home sick when I actually was?,"I’m (13F) very sick and I asked my mum (42F) through text if I could stay off today but she didn’t respond in time and my dad (52M) was telling me to hurry up so I started crying and telling him I couldn’t go but he made me get in the car anyways but then told me to go back inside to get some tissue for my eyes and nose because I was crying, I went and got back in the car and he asked if I felt better and I said no (I had thrown up that morning aswell) and he told me to get in the house angrily and so I did, I took my bag inside and locked the door seen as he had to go bring my aunt and cousins to work/school. My mum phoned me but I ignored it because my dad said I was not allowed any devices and that was my excuse, (I didn’t want to talk to anyone) I also feel really bad because me and my mum were meant to go swimming today at a really cool indoor pool but now we can’t because it was meant to be a treat for my attendance being so good, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to clean the kitchen during my lunch break,"I (28m) live with my roommate (30f) in a 3 floor apartment we each have a floor and the entry floor is communal space. I'm on the top floor and work from home. I will generally go down to the bottom floor at lunch to make lunch. I will wipe the counters after and put the dishes the sink but wont pack or unpack the dishwasher, clean the stove if there was a small mess, etc at this time as my lunch breaks are limited (30min). I will generally work till 5pm then hangout for an hour or so before going down to clean the kitchen of anything I might have missed at lunch. 

Recently my roommate has been cleaning the kitchen when she gets home from work at 5pm and leaving me passive aggressive notes on the fridge and stairs that I'm not following the house rules. When we moved in together the house rules were discussed and agreed to however due to a change in circumstances those rules are now no longer valid. 

The rules were she would clean and I would cook the rest of the house work is split and each floor is our own responsibility. She wasn’t working at the time, and I covered 90% of the rent. Once she got a job the food rule changed, and we agreed to a fend for yourself agreement. Now the issue is she often leaves dishes in the sick overnight and cleans in the morning which I have no problem with it just feels hypocritical that I cant leave my lunch dishes till the evening. 

AITA for refusing to clean the kitchen during my short lunch? ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my roommate to apologize after she attacked my character?,"Okay, so my roommate's cat ran away the other day. We found her, but I got blamed for it because I was at a party across the hall. My roommate has two cats, and she is never home (she's always at her boyfriend's). She will leave the cats unattended for days, sometimes more than a week. She changes the litter box once a week and only feeds them dry food. Anyways, I said it couldn't have been me because I made sure the door was shut when I left. We have another roommate who was there the whole time too, but they are good friends. Besides that, she said she wanted to have a roommate sit down, but just with me. I said that if she has a problem with what I do to send me a list of everything so that I can fix it, as I would have if she had told me at the time(s) of the occurrences. I said that, given you only want to talk to me, that I don't have the time or mental capacity for drama or a misguided ambush. To that, she responded calling me inconsiderate and saying that I don't care. She has asked me to do two things: clean up the kitchen when I am done cooking and make sure that there isn't hair in the drain after I shower. I do both of these things every time and I said that. Now she's saying that there is always hair when I'm done in the bathroom. I know for a fact that I always clean the hair from the drain. It's a bathroom, there will be hair. I said I don't see what the big deal is if there are two hairs in the tub. She said that I also talk loudly on the phone and slam the door, which she has never brought up before. I said that I will work on all of these things but that I don't see how they are such a big deal as I always clean and do chores, which our other roommate barely cleans. We have lived together for almost a year and she has never told me any of this. She said that the things themselves are not big deals but its the culmination that ""pushed her to the edge."" That seems to be her problem, not mine. To all of the things she said, I was extremely respectful and calm, stating that I would work on them and for her to let me know if I do anything, as she put it, ""unacceptable.""

Today, I messaged saying that ""I thought about yesterday and the way I spoken to and treated was not okay. I was calm and respectful yet was not given that same courtesy and deserve an apology."" She hasn't responded yet. I'm fine with her asking me to clean or be quiet, but none of those things warrant an attack on my character, especially as I have only ever been nice to her. I'm trying really hard to not be petty. If she thinks it's okay to speak to someone as she spoke to me AND neglect her cats, it seems that that speaks more to her character than me speaking loudly on the phone sometimes. ",AmItheAsshole
 for almost killing my sisters new dog?,"Hello, apologies for any mistakes I was suggested to post here by a friend and dont really use this app at all.  


A little background, my sister 27 recently got a new dog with her long time boyfriend. they were super excited to show off their dog to the rest of the family. so I decided to throw a BBQ sort of family get together for us to meet their dog and for their dog to meet my dogs.  


This happened over a week ago, but my head still hurts just thinking about it. On the day of the get together everything was going fine, everyone arrived (almost) on time and  everything was going smoothly. Till my sister and her boyfriend decided to start drinking quite a lot and not really watching their dog, he wasn't aggressive or anything like that but he was still new and getting used to new people. (I've been told he came from a pretty bad home) I went inside to grab a few more drinks for guests and to grab the food to cook, while I was inside my sisters dog jumped over my gate and ran onto the street where he was hit by a passing car. He miraculously survived and with surgery and time to heal he will be fine and back to normal.  


All of me and my family left with my sister to comfort her and make sure she's okay, I was a little late to arriving since my car is recently out of commission and i had to wait for a taxi. When i arrived at the emergency clinic my sister blew up on my that it was my fault her dog jumped the gate and as i was hosting i should have been watching and its my fault the gate wasn't tall enough.  


A little more background, my dogs are both very small dogs. I have a smaller then average gate but my dogs could never jump it even if they tried their best. My sister had sent me no photos, details, anything about her dog so i had no idea how big he was or anything like that. i also didn't know he was really scared and would sometimes try to run away.  


My sister blamed me for everything and my family agreed with her, I apologized many times and i tried to explain to her why i didnt know he would do that but she simply said i was horrible and my parents called me an asshole for saying its her fault (i never did). fast forward to today when she told me that because its my fault she  wants me to pay all of his medical bills. I cannot afford this, I told her no and now she is getting all of my family members to attack me. I honestly dont know what to do, am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 For not going to my cousin's graduation out of state?,"I (28 Female) told my cousin I would TRY keyword TRY to make it to his graduation out of state, but now that it is coming up soon I don't think I can make it. We are relatively close in the sense that his dad usually brings him and his siblings down to visit with us once or twice a year, and when they are here, I am usually with them in some capacity every day and I will take him and his siblings to do fun things and it'll be just us. 

I really would like to work out going, but my schedule is insane (I work two jobs, own a home, am a full-time student, have two dogs, and am in a relationship) and I have a lot of debt and don't want to add to it to go.   


Here is where the issue lies with me: travel. It is an 11-hour drive and the closest major airport is about 4 hours away and my uncle has already told us that he will not come to get us if we fly in there. My mom only wants to go from Thursday-Monday and neither one of us wants to drive our cars (I have a valid reason - my AC does not work, my mom is just being difficult about using her truck). So my only options are driving 11 hours and wasting a shit ton of money on gas and a rental car, spending $500+ on flights to a small town airport, or flying into a major airport and still having to rent a car and drive. None of which I want to spend the money or time on for a 4-day trip if I am being honest. 

&amp;#x200B;

The other issue is that my mom already told them that we were for sure going to come, but I told her about two weeks ago that I was not coming. She apparently spoke with my uncle recently about this and he told her that they were not initially going to plan a graduation party for him, but decided to throw one since we were coming. My uncle told my mom to tell me to strongly reconsider coming because of the party, but I am already on stress level 10 with school this term and work with my full-time job. I really just don't want to go. AITA for not going? 

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for swiping right on my friend's hookup?,"  My friend, Sam, and I met through meet me years ago, dated briefly, but it didn't work out. She was bisexual and I was experimenting with lesbian relationships. Sam was also way out of my league. I ended up realizing that I was straight, and we agreed to stay friends because we got along really well.

  Flash forward a few years, and we're both in our ""hoe"" phase. We would show each other the guys that we were hooking up with and talk about how things went. She showed me this extremely handsome guy and told me that he was incredible in the sack. I asked Sam if she'd keep seeing him, but she said no because he was too arrogant. We moved on and didn't talk about him after that. About a week later, I'm swiping on Tinder, see him, and swipe right. I honestly just swiped right because of my own insecurities and wanted to be validated by an attractive man. We matched right away. I was really swept up in him finding me attractive, but I wasn't sure how Sam would feel about it. 

  Sam and I had planned to hang out the next day, so I just waited to talk to her about it until then. She had texted me that night worried about groceries, so me and my grandma got together a truckload full of groceries for me to give to her the next day as well. I didn't have a car, so she came and picked me up and I loaded the groceries in her car. On the way to Sam's place, I told her what happened the night before and asked if it would make her uncomfortable for me to sleep with him. I already knew that it was a huge betrayal to sleep with a friend's ex, but I wasn't sure about hookups. She immediately said that it was weird that I would even ask that. I apologized and told her that I wouldn't do anything to jeopardize out friendship, and would block him. She asked me why I matched with him, and I was honest. She told me that I was worth more than that and that I shouldn't seek validation from men. She said that she wasn't upset, and acted like everything was fine once we got to her apartment. 

 Her apartment was on the third floor and you could only get there by an outdoor stair rail. I brought in the groceries for her, but it took about four or five trips. I was exhausted by the time that I finished. When I'm bringing in the last of the groceries, I go up to her in the living room to tell her that I'm done, and she's loudly talking about me on the phone to her friend. Calling me a dirty hoe and a skank. She didn't even stop when she realized that I could hear her. I called a friend to come and pick me up, and when I got home, she had posted all over social media about being a girl's girl and sluts breaking girl code. 

 I was genuinely confused why she reacted like that. I didn't sleep with him or even meet up with him. I would have never done that without making sure that she was okay with it first. Also, why did she act like it was cool until after I finished busting my butt for her? This happened a few years ago, but it still bugs me sometimes. 
  
  ",AmItheAsshole
 for not giving my sister any money towards family gifts?,"my (24F) sister (chloe, 22F) is horrible. she skips work regularly, is disrespectful to our nan that she lives with, loses friends and partners because she takes without giving, you get the picture. she also has a problem with taking accountability for her actions, for example, she had a party without permission and trashed my parents home then blamed her punishment on the family friend who saw her IG stories of it all and told my parents.

chloe has no interest in seeing the family. she is happy to text them and ask them for money and gifts though, which bothers me. my family are enablers and will let her act the way she does with no consequence just so they don’t have to deal with her. 

our cousin lily’s 3rd birthday party came around and she claimed to be going to a friend’s birthday. this excuse has been used so many times that i know she’s lying. my aunt and uncle specifically asked that no-one outside poppy’s grandparents and them get her presents as they have way too much for her as it is, they’d rather everyone just be there.

the day before the party, chloe called me saying that she was going to get lily some presents. i reminded her what our uncle had said, which i told her is why i hadn’t got anything. she said “well i’ve already got her some clothes, toys and a book so you need to send me some money for it”. 

i was shocked so i asked why she’d say that and she said she had put my name in the card so it was “only fair”. i said that i never agreed to it beforehand so she can’t just expect me to owe her money. she told me to just send her £10 and be done as it’s “not much money”. i told her that the money isn’t the problem, it’s the expectation. she is employed and makes an okay salary, about 75% of her earnings go on whatever she wants so she isn’t struggling for money.

day of the party, i was sending chloe snapchats of our cousin at the party. she was replying with pics of herself just sat in her room for the entire day. i told my nan that chloe had obviously forgotten the lie that she told about going out for her friends birthday. my aunt and uncle were upset that chloe assumed she could just get gifts instead of turn up to see my cousin.

after the party, my nan questioned chloe and how her friend’s birthday went and my sister said that she had been out for a meal, something we know to be untrue because of the snapchats. my nan and i agreed to not mention it now because she is ridiculously illogical and can not admit to anything, even with proof.

since the party, chloe has asked me multiple times for money towards the presents. she said that she has “lowered it to £5” and again i said that the money is not the problem. today she has asked for a screenshot of my internet banking. i assume that she can’t fathom the idea of me not wanting to do something for the family so she assumed it must be that i have no money.

i have no intention of giving her anything, not even 2p, but she won’t stop asking. WIBTA for continuing to refuse?",AmItheAsshole
 if I didn’t let my dad do “father things” at my wedding and excluding 2 siblings,"Update: We have only been reconnecting for 3 months now. I am in no way trying to hurt anyone but I feel as though  my father hasn’t lived up to his role and want my grandpa to walk me down the isle as he stepped up when my father let me down. Also I have never once met my dads step daughter or my half sister because his wife won’t let me. I have seen her a few times when picking my brother up and she is nothing but rude to me, my sister and my mom. She has flat out told me that she hates me and wishes my dad would just leave all 3 of us behind. She even hates that my brother still goes there as “he takes time away from the family”. I do not wish to hurt my siblings feelings as I understand they are just kids and none of this is their fault. But Is it really fair for me to invite people I have never met (or been allowed to meet and trust me I have tried many times) to my wedding especially when trying to keep it small and already not inviting some people to keep with our limit? Especially when one is so young and won’t remember? I have tried to ask about going over to meet them and my dads wife threatened to call the cops saying I was trespassing. I have also offered to take them out for the day to hangout and get to know each other and again that was not an option

I (19F) am engaged to my fiancé (21M) and we are trying to plan our wedding. We have decided that we want a small child free wedding, but will make an acception for our siblings (14M, 15F, 15M and 16F).
The issue is that my father and I have been estranged for over 7 years now because he was an abusive father so my sister and I cut him out of our lives. My brother is the only one who stayed in contact with him. I recently purchased a home that’s a fixer upper and my brother told my dad. My dads dream was always to buy a fixer upper and make it his own home, so he decided he wanted to help with the house. I reluctantly let him as I did not want to have anything to do with him at first. Our relationship has slowly improved but not into a “father daughter relationship” if that makes sense.
Now while planning the wedding, I have decided I want my grandpa to walk me down the isle and do the father daughter dance with me. He was the one who was always there for me and he was my “father figure” growing up. My brother found out and thinks it’s unfair to my dad as we’ve been reconnecting. The next thing is that my father has a “new family” with a step daughter (10F), daughter (4months) and a new baby on the way. Even though we made an exception for my siblings I don’t see these siblings as my “siblings” and so I do not plan on inviting them as well as his new wife as we have never gotten along, she hates me and I’m fine with that.

So WIBTA if I invited ONLY my dad as a guest and not the rest of his fam?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to keep rent the same throughout the summer?,"Hello, I (f18) am rooming with two girls, one who is a friend, the other who is friends with my friend. We are entering our second year in uni.

We've had a lot of issues about subletting and renting. But for some background information, one of the girls is coming to the place with her friends for 2 weeks and 1 last week of the summer. None of us live in the area.

Though we talked about subletting before, she recently brought up that she doesn't want anyone else there while she is there. So I asked my family friend who I am subletting the room to, if that condition was okay, they agreed. My other two friends also backed out of subletting.

Now there are four rooms. One is used for storage. Two are massive. And the final room is around three times smaller than the massive ones. I agreed to take the smaller room since none of them wanted to. We agreed they would pay $50 more each month, meaning I would pay $100 less.

Now one of the girls wants me to pay the same amount throughout the summer since none of us are living there even though one of them is staying there for a bit and I am subletting my room. Is this fair?",AmItheAsshole
 for gatekeeping hockey to a friend who only likes what I like,"I (24F) have been a long time hockey watcher and recently got roped into being a fan just this season because the team that I was rooting for finally has the potential to win the cup. Hooray.

 Okay, so I have a friend J (26F) who used to be my coworker and lately, she has been getting on my nerves.

I'm not sure if it's because she recently got back together with her ex (23M), who she cries over every time, or maybe I'm just a hater because ever since I started sharing my interests with her, she starts claiming she likes it too. It's really confusing to me at first because I used to invite her to watch the games with me and she always refuses and says, ""Not my thing."" She claims sports weren't her thing at all. I was cool with that, she likes to go on concerts and I like to watch hockey. 

This all started when I brought her to a game at the end of the regular season to cheer her up, because she was really sad at the time since she broke up with her ex. I wanted to take her mind off of her ex so we watched the game together at the arena. The whole time we were watching the game, she keeps taking videos and pictures (I didn't mind it) but I couldn't watch the game properly too because she wanted me to take pictures of her and with her. 

The next day however, color me surprise, now she's a true fan, is what she claims. (I was so confused but I was starting to feel irritated)

I told her I'm glad she enjoyed and thought, that's the end of it. Now, she keeps posting in her Instagram stories and buying jerseys as if she understands the game. She doesn't even know how many players are on the ice for fuck's sake. 

Then, she hits me up saying she got back together with the guy who constantly makes her cry because according to her, her parents wanted them back together. 

So now it's extra frustrating.

Because to me, I wanted to support her decisions but at the same time, I can't support people who don't make grown adult decisions. Like what the hell do you mean your parents still make decisions for you? I don't know if I could tolerate more of this drama to be honest.

It's so annoying. I feel guilty because I shouldn't be annoyed? I don't know. I feel like I'm a bad friend. I just want to go back to how our friendship was before, where she likes what she likes and she can leave me alone with what I like.

I feel like she's only using hockey for clout because it's the playoffs right now.

I want to talk to her about how I feel. Get this off my chest. pls I need your advice-",AmItheAsshole
 for wearing headphones at work,"So I have PTSD and that comes with hyper vigilance. In order for me to concentrate on my work in my busy shared office, I wear bone conductive headphones (which leaves my ears open so I can hear what’s going on around me while I’m wearing them) and listen to white noise so that my brain isn’t constantly listening to ever conversations that’s going on in the building trying to find the threat (that isn’t there). Part of my hiring involved disclosure about my headphones, a doctors note, a meeting with all upper management and a second department wide meeting to tell everyone why I get to wear headphones and they don’t etc. etc. 

The problem come in that my coworkers keep standing behind me talking about non-work related thing. I ignore them cause they aren’t talking to me or about anything I need to contribute to. Then they suddenly decide they want to include me in their discussion but they don’t do anything to get my attention beyond directing a question in my general direction. They don’t say my name, they don’t raise their voice any, they don’t tap my shoulder, or even wave in my peripherals. Then they get mad because I’m ignoring them. I’ve been here since January and already different people have filed 2 complaints against me for ignoring them. I’ve explained multiple times that they just have to get my attention before they start talking to me, that I can hear them just fine, and that I’m focusing on work. 

My coworkers are saying my headphones are creating a barrier for them to do their work (they just want to talk to me about their weekend) HR and upper management 100% has my back but my direct manager and most of my coworkers are saying my headphones need to go. 

I just want to keep my head down, do my work, and go home at the end of the day. I’m not at work to socialize and make friends. Please help?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my friend to eat?,"A little background here. I used to have (and am still recovering from) a pretty severe eating disorder. My friend also had one, but not as severe and she’s recovered completely from hers and simply forgets to eat sometimes (she has ADD and genuinely just forgets). We tend to argue on again off again with there usually being a mutual understanding of what we individually did wrong, lately it’s all been pushed that im the one in the wrong. 

Flash forward to tonight. she mentioned being hungry several times and naturally I offered to make her something or go heat up some leftovers for her since she had a long day. She tells me that no, she doesn’t want anything we have at the house. i once again offer her something we have at home and she again says no. I don’t have a lot of money right now so ordering out for us isn’t an option.

 I get a little upset at this, explain how im feeling,  and grab the leftovers we had in the fridge to go heat up for her as i know that she’d forget to eat if i didnt make something now. I bring her food back to her and she tells me to set it down, and then asks me why the second we get home i have to ‘jump down her throat.’ I once again repeat why I’m upset about this (being that her saying shes hungry and refusing to eat anything we have is not okay or healthy) and I leave to my space.

 She begins texting me about how I ruined her night and how I should stop doing things for her flat out. I argue back that I dont see how me wanting her to eat something we had at home ruined her night, and she starts yelling at me that im an asshole and i ruined her night and that i should just stop doing things for her. 

All I wanted to do was help my friend out, am i the asshole?

EDIT 1: She has texted me again telling me to go fuck myself after I left the house to go to my quiet place and calmed down, she knows where said quiet place is and so far has made no motion to come speak to me in person. ",AmItheAsshole
 For Using a Cushion for Chronic Pain?,"Obviously, I don't actually think that I'm being the asshole from how I phrased the title, but I was hoping to get some perspective because I'm losing it at this point. If there is some other POV where I am being the asshole, let me know.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, about six years ago I developed chronic pain in my coccyx (tailbone). All doctors agree: there is nothing that can be done. After all the injections, creams, and physical therapy in the world, I have found that something that helps me is sitting on a circular cushion designed for people with this pain. It's a small, black oval that I carry with me everywhere.

&amp;#x200B;

My mother has grown increasingly strange about the cushion. Whenever I see her, she'll make some snide comment of ""still need the cushion?"" Or, if I sit next to her someplace, she'll say things like ""how are you going to live if you can't sit comfortably?"" I remind her that the other option is, well, not living, but it never seems to bother her.

&amp;#x200B;

This all came to a head recently. She picked me up from the train station, and I was making conversation about the play I saw (we both like plays, so I thought she would be interested). People at this play refused to sit down when it was supposed to start, and the ushers were not having it. The show started twenty minutes late , and by then the ushers were literally screaming at the patrons to sit down. I have been to a ton of plays, but I've never seen anything like this.

&amp;#x200B;

When I finished this, she unloaded on me. She said that these people weren't sitting down because I need the cushion to sit on, and that it was so incredibly rude of me to still use it since I blocked their view. I was shocked. The people who were standing were all in front of me (everyone behind me was sitting down happily). Also, my cushion collapses when I sit on it, I slouch when I sit to make up for it, and I am not the tallest person in the world, so while I suppose I do sit an inch or so higher than I would without the cushion,  I'm certainly not the tallest person in the theater.

&amp;#x200B;

What really got me, of course, was that she wasn't at the theater. She had no idea why people were refusing to sit down, if my cushion was too high, or whatever. It was clear that she had been thinking about this for a while and just exploded. Then, it dawned on me: she must think that I don't need the cushion, and I'm pretending to have chronic pain for attention. This is particularly disturbing to me because she has seen me struggle for years, gone to doctor's appointments, etc. 

&amp;#x200B;

So, this is clearly one of the posts where the poster doesn't think they're the asshole, but is there something else I'm not seeing? I would like to have a good relationship with my mother, but if she is going to behave this way, what am I supposed to do? In the fall we're supposed to be going on vacation to a foreign country together, where I will obviously need to use the cushion a lot for things like the plane and the tour bus. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting 2 people in my friend group to my 16th,"I am turning 16 in a couple of months, I chose not to invite two people from my friend group, Sarah and Jason, because they've been spreading rumors about me.

Here's the backstory: Sarah and Jason were once close friends of mine. We shared secrets, laughed together, and generally had a great time. When they started spreading rumors about me. These weren't just harmless rumors; they were hurtful and damaging, and they caused a lot of drama within our friend group, such as me attempting to steal jason away from sarah and making moved on him ""I did none of the sort"".

Despite their toxic behavior, Sarah and Jason are still part of our friend circle. But I couldn't bring myself to include them in my birthday celebrations. It's supposed to be a day of happiness and joy, and I didn't want their negativity to ruin it for me.

My mom supported my decision and said I should surround myself with people who bring positivity into my life. But now, I'm worried about the repercussions. Will our friends understand why I didn't invite Sarah and Jason? Or will they think I'm being petty and exclusionary? 

AITA for not inviting Sarah and Jason to my sweet sixteen because they spread rumors about me?",AmItheAsshole
 for not allowing my daughter to go to Disney world,"
My daughters 1/2 sister ( Maddy 18) asked if she could take my daughter (Ella 13) to Disney World in June for 8 days + 4 driving days. Maddy said she is paying for this hole trip wich is around $10,000. Maddy and her other 1/2 sister ( Megan 14) are the only other people going. Maddy and Ella have only met about 4 years ago because of the adoption and have grown close. Disney is about 17 hours from where I live. I feel wired letting her go that far and long. Maddy promise she would take the best care of them, that they could call when ever. Maddy did talk to me alone about this. But my daughter over heard and was so excited.  Then I told her she could jot go she was devastated. I have 2 step kids (f 14) (m 14) I told her it would not be fair to them if you. She is very mad at me an won't talk to me. So AITA? Do I just let her go? Do I stand my ground?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my cousin to use his brain?,"I work as a chef (30M) and gave my cousin (22M) a job in my kitchen. He had worked at his family’s restaurant before, but the environment there was more relaxed and I told him from the start that he would have a lot of catching up to do to work in a more professional setting. One of the things he hasn’t yet learned is to use his left hand for flipping pans. This is something I and everyone in our staff have mastered, and it speeds things up since our dominant hand remains free and useful. 

So I asked him to practice using his non-dominant hand for flipping, but he was having trouble with this, so I said: ""come on, put the other side of your brain to work, is not that hard"". After our shift was done, he came to talk to me. He felt humiliated by my comment, as I was calling him dumb or something. But I told him it was a light-hearted joke and I wasn’t implying anything about his intellectual ability in any way. AITA here?",AmItheAsshole
" if I refused to ""break the ice"" over a minor spat between me (30F) and my bestfriend (31F)","My best friend and I have known each other for about 7 years and speak to each other nearly everyday. We have had a couple of disagreements before, but nothing that we couldn't work out by the end of the day.

We both work office jobs, however, she has more experience in the corporate world than I do. Because of this, I often ask for advice in certain situations or ask her to proofread some emails before I send emails.

Last Thursday morning during our morning chat, she expressed to me she was in a poor mood because of her colleagues. I responded saying I could relate because my director had annoyed me that morning. I then sent her what happened. She then messaged me saying ""you're both wrong"", to which I responded ""well I'm not asking who's wrong"". She then replied ""Hey don't give it to me lol"" then a separate message saying ""damn"". Knowing her, I know well enough that she was being passive aggressive. I text her back saying ""my god"" and ""yeah damn"".

However, I was slightly annoyed because of her response, so I text her saying her response was bitchy and unnecessary and that I know she was in a bad mood but I did nothing to deserve an attitude from her. She read the message and never responded.

I did not ask for her advice, I did not ask who was wrong, I didn't ask anything. I assumed we would have a laugh at my directors ""stupidity"", talk a little shit, and get on with our day.

Now, I don't expect flowers and an apology card. As I mentioned before, this is a minor spat. However, I did expect some sort of dialogue from her...a ""no I wasn't being bitchy wtf"" or a ""yeah my bad, I'm having a shit day, I'll talk to you when I'm in a better mood"". That's how we usually communicate. Instead I haven't spoken to her since then.

I don't feel that I should be the one to break the ice, nor would I even know what to say. So WIBTA if I maintain this mindset and not reach out?

  
EDIT TO ADD: I see a few people saying I changed the subject to speak about myself. However, way before I sent the screenshot. I told her I was sorry she was feeling that way and I agreed that her situation was indeed annoying, then I asked if she got a previous work issue figured out. There were a few unrelated messages back and forth, then I sent the message.

We both are supportive with each other and ask about each others feelings when the other expresses they are upset about something. Which I did, then followed with the screenshot.

Also, I know people can not read tones in text, but for the love of everything right in the world...the mean girls comment was a joke. Please don't take it so serious, as I am sure a good amount of you have shared stories of colleagues blunders with friends and had a laugh. 

ANOTHER EDIT!: I removed somethings that I have been notified are NOT GOOD AT ALL in a legal sense.",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my roommate have her friend sleepover?,"I (19 y/o female) have a rocky relationship with my college roommate (We'll call her Sophie), to put it simply. We are not big on communication, rarely talk face-to-face, and are incompatible (we were randomly assigned). Today, I received a text from Sophie asking if it was okay for her friend from home to come over for an upcoming weekend, the same week finals start.   
After thinking about it, I told her I did not want her friend sleeping over. I have two finals, the first on the day her friend arrives and the second the day after she leaves. Additionally, I will leave immediately after my second exam and have to pack up my room over the weekend to move out.   
I have little faith that she will be quiet or respect my sleep as she rarely does, which will likely only worsen if her friend is over. I told her truthfully if she asked any other weekend, I would have agreed, but I have two difficult finals back-to-back and need my rest.   
Sophie responded that we didn't need the other person's opinion, as discussed in our roommate agreement. Our agreement states we need to check with the other person, but I feel it is common sense to have the other person's permission before inviting a friend to stay in our shared space overnight.   
Sophie told me her friend would not sleep over like they had planned and added, for some reason, that she would still be coming for the day and wouldn't be in the room. I feel she is simply trying to guilt me, but I can't help but feel I am in the wrong for not allowing her friend to come over. So reddit, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my friend a nickname he didn’t like? ,"Today during lunch I (15f) had rehearsal for a band concert 

I have a lot of friends in band but I have 2 best friends which we will call H and Jaiden(also gf and bf) and I have a boyfriend (15m), my boyfriend and I are both friends with them. Me and my boyfriend were trying to find one of our friends (Jaiden) but we couldn’t. I told my bf to look and see if he’s in the hallway and he was! My bf said Hi and used the nickname that Jaiden didn’t like and I did too but at that time Jaiden only heard me say it. Jaiden then yelled “Don’t call me that” and then I replied “But I thought you like that nickname and everyone used it”. Jaiden said “I don’t care don’t call me that.” I said I’m sorry and then started to cry because I am a very sensitive and empathetic person (also on the spectrum). I asked my bf if Jaiden would be mad at us and he said no but maybe he was trying to make feel better. At the end of the rehearsal me and my bf gave Jaiden a hug and Jaiden said hi and he was calm.

To be fair, me and my bf did not know that he didn’t like to be called that and I heard others say it too so I thought it was okay to say it. I already texted him and apologized, but I am still really upset about this because I really really look up to Jaiden and I don’t want to hurt his feelings ever! I am thinking about text his gf (H) and asking if he is still mad at me. So AITA for calling him a nickname he didn’t like. 

tl;dr me and my bf called my friend a name he didn’t like and didn’t know. 

I had to change the letters that replace names  to actual words ",AmItheAsshole
 for not cooking everything at the same time?,"So, Saturday morning, I made my family breakfast. I try to make everything at the same time, but sometimes I don't have the bandwidth or willpower to do it. It is my perogative after all.

After all, it's my house, it's not like I'm a short order cook by profession. And I was doing this to be nice, not because I had to. In other words, I'll cook it however I please.

My wife comes in and sees that the bagels aren't in the toaster and I haven't started the eggs and starts DEMANDING I do it her way. I kindly ask her to wait in the kitchen and everything will be ready in about 5-10 minutes but instead she starts taking over and telling me to do it her way, insulting me, calling me ""dumb fuck"" and saying ""this is why you keep losing jobs.""

OK, the fact that I've lost a couple jobs this year is not relevant in this context. I lost jobs because the economy is less than stellar right now, but I'm on the rebound now.

Also, just because I move slower when I'm on my own time is not an indicator of how well I perform when I'm working.

On the record, my plan was to put the sausages on the warmer when they were finished, scramble the eggs in the same pan and toast the bagels while the eggs were scrambling so there was less dishes to clean.",AmItheAsshole
 for stealing my friends jordans,"Me (14m) and my friend (14m) have been friends for awhile and since I've known him he's had a habit of losing his Jordans and on numerous occasions has asked me and my other friend to help me look for them. Sometimes I don’t even help him because he always laughing at me or making fun of my “Walmart” shoes and it can get annoying. He acts especially weird about his Jordans around my girlfriend, (14F), he always talks about how expensive they are and how someone keeps stealing them. Me and her think that my friend is hiding his Jordans for attention. Yesterday I was at PE with my friend and I realized I had forgotten my water bottle so I left halfway through to go get my water bottle but when I came back to the class I saw his shoes and they looked so cool I just had to take them. Once we had gotten back to class he had no idea where his Jordans went and started making a big fuss about it and even pulled up the security cameras. Honestly, I don’t think I did anything wrong, he had it coming for him and if it wasn’t me they would have been stolen by someone else but what do you think? AITA??  
",AmItheAsshole
 if I reach out to my estranged grandfather?,"So my (F22)  grandfather (75?) left my father’s (55) life when he was a toddler. 
For some reason I’ve been obsessed with tracking him down. 
I ended up finding a Facebook group about the area they used to live in. I found a man with the same name, who is also friends with my grand uncle. His hometown is listed (which I know is where he met and married my grandmother) and his linked in profile says he went to their high school at the time they would have met. 
My grandfather seems to be happily married with his current wife and children (who seem to be ~30 with their own kids) across the country. 
So would I be the asshole if I sent him a friend request/message?
I don’t even know what I would actually say to him. I’m just worried about butting into a life I have no right to butt into at this point since he’s been nonexistent for 50 years. 
My father has told me I’m welcome to track my grandfather down and connect but my father doesn’t want to be involved at all. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I told my parents I know I’m adopted?,"Hey people. 

This is a long story, but I’m going to try and condense it as much as possible. Basically about 9 weeks ago my maternal cousin and I both completed an Ancestral/DNA test through one of the popular brands. 

My parents are very against these DNA tests (I thought) because they don’t like the idea of giving your DNA to these companies and so have forbidden me from doing them in the past when I brought up the idea. Though, I now know the real reason they were against me doing it. 

My cousin (James) got his results first and matched with loads of people saying my mother’s maiden name, as well as other names known within my mother’s family line. 

I got my results about a week later and not only did I not match with my cousin, I didn’t match with any of my cousins matches nor did anyone share my mothers maiden name. My dad (and I) have an extremely common surname in my country -think “smith”- and I did match with a few people who shared that name but none were close matches, 3rd-4th cousins being the closest. So I’m just assuming it was because it’s a common surname. 

James’ family know he’s done the DNA test and he’s shared the results however I have asked him to keep what he knows about mine between us for a while. 

I learnt this about 2 weeks ago and have since come to the conclusion that I am adopted. At first this made me feel really upset, and I thought maybe the DNA tests were faulty but after researching, no I don’t think they are. I think I am just adopted. I have two younger brothers who are 11 and 9 who aren’t adopted because I remember my mom being pregnant with them. So I can’t understand why I was adopted.

I want to know tell my parents know about being adopted, I want to in some ways confront them and ask why they’ve lied to me for so long. But I also want to say I still consider them my only family.  James thinks it’s a really bad idea, he says I should just keep it to myself because if I tell my parents I know I’m adopted it could have negative consequences on my relationship with my parents and also could get him into trouble with his parents because he bought me the DNA test and he is very close to my parents. 

I’ve said I’ll just tell them I bought the test myself but he says they’ll know because he got his test so recently. 

WIBTA if I ignored my cousin and confronted my parents about me being adopted anyway?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to babysit my wife’s brother’s movers soon after major surgery?,"I (46m) just had a colectomy last week. I can’t drive or return to work for two weeks (doctors orders), however, I will return to work remotely in the next couple days.  My wife (43f) has been super supportive and has taken amazing care of me the entire time. She took time off work to be with me the day of, and the days following, even though it was bad timing for her. She’s been my absolute rock!

Her brother (41m) moves around a lot for work and happened to live in the same city with us for about a year. He’s moved on to another gig, and he has already moved there. He’s staying in temporary housing until his new employer can come get all his stuff. He and my wife had a conversation about the movers and he asked her if she can meet the movers to let them in, watch them package everything for a cross-country shipment, sign for it, lock up after, and turn the keys into building management. I wasn’t part of this conversation but at some point she agreed to it but requested it be on a weekend when she doesn’t have work because she can’t take anymore days off work. I got all this one evening when she told me about it. I wasn’t being asked to do anything at the time, so it was just informational. Evidently, her brother did try to schedule on a weekend but that was impossible because they’re too busy. 

So, now I’m being asked to take care of it and I’m unsure I should take on this responsibility right now. On one hand, I have quite a bit of free time on my hands and I’ve been doing great in recovery. Technically, I could Uber there and do all the things he asked.  On the other hand, this isn’t exactly the kind of activity I should be doing right now. It’s an apartment so it’s not a house full of stuff, but I know from personal experience when they pack stuff up to ship cross-country, it takes a good amount of time to dutifully package even the smallest of items. We don’t have an estimated time it will take the movers, but if I had to guess, I’d say 2-4 hours, but regardless I’m stuck there until they’re done. It’ll be 10 days after my surgery and I can’t help but feel like she’s asking a lot of me. She seems to act like it’ll be no big deal and I’ll be fine. She said he has no one else to do it. 

I didn’t flat out say no when we discussed it yesterday. I aired my concerns, she didn’t see an issue, and we left it there. Part of me felt like that caring, nurturing, “don’t get up”, “be careful” every time I get up person vanished in blink of an eye. 

So what say you, AITA for not wanting to take on this responsibility so soon after major surgery?

Edit: Thank you everyone for the sanity check! I thought I was being crazy for a minute lol. It very was helpful to get everyone’s perspective so I can focus on getting better. Many thanks!!",AmItheAsshole
 for not accepting a gift from my brother?,"I (33f) have a birthday coming up. My brother (36m) and I live in the same state about 30 minutes away from each other. We used to be very close, he’s the reason I moved out here in the first place. But ever since he and his wife got pregnant with their first child, he’s become very pompous and acts like he’s better than everyone. The two of them have been shutting me out over the last couple of years to the point where we only talk once a year around the holidays. 

Last year for my birthday, he drove all the way to my house just to give me a fountain pen (with no ink) as a gift for my birthday. It wasn’t wrapped or anything. He admitted to me that someone gave it to him and he didn’t want it so he just pulled it out of his pocket and gave it to me. He invited me out to his house for Thanksgiving while my parents were visiting and he and his wife ignored me the whole time and hardly said a word to me. At that point I just decided to go no contact and would no longer be participating in their family events. 

Well, I was talking to my mother and she asked if I had heard from my brother with my bday coming up. I said no. She told me they had news to give me, and as such had a “good gift” to give me and that I shouldn’t “blow him off” like I have been. I was able to guess that they’re pregnant again with their third child. My mom wants me to pretend to be surprised when they inevitably come to tell me.  

I have not been involved in the lives of his children so it means nothing to me that they’re pregnant again, and honestly it feels a little weird that they’re going to use my birthday as a way to announce something big for them. 

WIBTA if I just refused to let my brother visit to give me my bday gift and tell me their news?",AmItheAsshole
 for pointing out the favriotism?,"AITA for pointing out the favriotism towards my brother? I am 15 F and have to siblings 5 M and 17 M this involves the 17 year old we will call Chris he is the favriote child ,he was marked as a genius when younger ,and now has fallen off. For example he doesn't do his chores, failed his early college program ,almost had to repeat a grade twice now,and might not even graduate now because of this I've started noticing the obvious favriotism more and more it has been noticeable over the years but not like this. It started when my grade dropped to a B- in math he was failing college at this time and got asked to leave my parents did not punish me meanwhile I got Mt electronics taken away for a B-. There are many more times of this same instance. There are the multiple times that I do 90% of the chores while my parents beg for him to do them and when they need anything im the only one they ask while he sits around. At this point he has figured out he can get away with a lot if it's just my parents but when it involves someone else he never does so he has resorted to blaming me or others for his own mistakes and problems that he caused. Overall he has caused enough problums in both our lives where I've lost friends and people hate me for his faults. He so was the popular kid and would use that to bully me and cause others to bully me. But on to the fight, I was very stressed out with finals coming up and having to write my final essay so I've been doing that primarily when I don't have sports. The other day my mom told me to go do his chores while in the middle of studying time I was mad and snapped back how he isn't doing anything important and they should stop favoring him being a useless person in general I obviously got introuble for saying that and have been avoiding him since of it same with my parents. ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my roommates if we can share the garage parking space ,"I took over someone’s lease and now live with three girls. We have two parking spots in the garage and the two girls that were already living in the apartment “took” those spots because they were the only ones with cars. This left me with no parking spot when I moved in, so I have to street park every day (I live in a very busy neighborhood). I think it’s kind of an unspoken rule of “first come first serve”, so I never really asked if we can share the parking space.

One of the roommates confronted me today and asked if I can contribute more to the house chore, specifically taking out the trash/putting the trash cans out, bringing them in. I told her, “Of course! Then can we all share the parking space and take turns street parking?”. She looked confused by this and said that has nothing to do with it. If we’re all trying to be equal with chores, shouldn’t we be equal with parking privilege? I thought I was being reasonable but her confusion said otherwise. Note: the two garage parking spots are $25 a month, so they do pay for it.
",AmItheAsshole
 For Skipping Mother's Day With MIL This Year?,"My (34 F) Husband (41 M) and I are about to have our second child, and I've had a horrible pregnancy. It turns out I have a complication where I'll need to be induced early, about 2 days before mother's day this year. Because I've had such an awful time with this pregnancy, I really don't want visitors at the hospital, or at home for the first couple weeks. 

The problem is every year mother's day is a huge ordeal. My husband and his mom (69 F) don't really get along, so he rarely wants to go to her house for mother's day (though we always get pressured into it anyway).  I lost my own mom as a teenager so mother's day is always hard for me, but when I've expressed that to my MIL her response is usually along the lines of ""but it's my day too"". She and I do not have a bad relationship like 90% of the time, so when I had my first child she did make an effort to celebrate me too. I just still don't enjoy mother's day, and don't like celebrating it because it reminds me too much of my mom. 

The major complication this year is that my husband's younger brother died late last year, so this will be my MIL's first mother's day without him here. My husband and I both hate the idea of her being sad on mother's day, but I genuinely cannot handle being around anyone 2 days after I give birth following a pretty traumatic pregnancy (almost especially because I've had to go through this without my own mom).

I'm dreading the conversation with MIL because I know it won't go well. My husband has no issue having the conversation with her, but she often doesn't respect him or his boundaries, so sometimes things have to come from me for her to take it seriously. 

WIBTA for telling her we are not going to celebrate mother's day at all this year/don't want visitors at the hospital even though it'll be a hard year for her? ",AmItheAsshole
 for pulling back emotionally?,"I(34M) am in a relationship with girlfriend(30F) of 6 years. She has severe health issues involving her uterus, as well as ongoing depression. A lot of this has been a thing for at least 3 or 4 years. Recently it came to a head. She's been the hospital several times recently, and I've been there with her every time, but it's been one of the worst months of her life.



She often wants to vent for like an hour or 2 when she's extremely stressed or depressed. I try to listen and be there for her but it's absolutely exhausting when it's almost daily. She'll keep repeating or rehashing the same issues. If I try to point out the upside and say things will be okay she gets annoyed and says I don't know that. If I try to provide advice she wants me to stop trying to fix things. I've tried just listening mostly quietly and she says ""Is that all you have to say?"" or that she's not feeling comforted.





I ask her what she wants me to do to comfort her and she says she doesn't know, but to do something. I try to hug her but often when she's depressed she doesn't want to be touched. She also doesn't like me looking at my phone, even though sometimes she'll be processing stress for hours, expecting me to do nothing but listen.  
She often snips at me when she's stressed, or insults me calling me an asshole or a robot(I'm autistic and don't process social cues well). She's even admitted that if I treated her half as bad as she did when she gets angry that she wouldn't be with me, but that the hormone issues and medications she's on means she cannot control her emotions.





But I'm the \*only\* one she lashes out at. I point this out and that she doesn't lash out at anyone else in her family like her mother who she vents to like 10% of the time, but she says it's not a competition. She has very few friends and only talks to them every few months so I'm like 90% of her support network.





I finally told her that I can't be her emotional dumping ground. I'm willing to listen and be there for her but not for hours on end, or tolerate being insulted. I refuse to believe that someone can't control their emotions. She's woken me up several hours before work to vent for 2 hours and then gotten snippy at me over stuff, and I told her she needs to manage her emotions better and stop unloading on me when I'm not capable. She's only \*just\* now after years looking to start therapy. She did 4 years ago but dropped it pretty quickly.





I do try to help her as much as possible, but I also tend to need a lot of alone time, though I make clear it's not because of her but just that I get overwhelmed. So I'm not as receptive as I should be, but I also pretty much never insult or lash out at her. Me being geniunely insulting is like a once a year or 2 occurrence. For her it's like every 2 weeks, with lots of snipping and agitation almost every day. Hell, she gets annoyed if I or ask her to repeat herself.",AmItheAsshole
 for giving money on TikTok without telling my boyfriend?,"A couple of days ago , I gave money to someone’s Tiktok live. I’m not sure how he knew about this but he knew. He came to me saying did you send money to *** I replied hahaha yeah I did. He became really upset and told me How much? Why didn’t you tell me sooner? I don’t believe you. What’s TikTok money etc. I told him the truth which is I gave about $60 but he’s still frustrated that I didn’t tell him about it. I don’t know how to feel in this situation. Maybe I am wrong and I should have told him what I did or maybe ask im if he’s ok with me doing it. 
I feel like I don’t need to tell him everything I do but also maybe I have to tell him before spending money. Please help

Edit : we’re both 22, almost 2years in the relationship, we don’t live together ( but we are planning to), he has more money than I do but I’m alright,  he thinks that I spend a lot. 

I spent my own money, but didn’t tell him and it is a lie to him. He said that he doesn’t trust me anymore and doesn’t know if he still loves me. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my aunt and her family in my house?,"I am female, 34 yrs old, living in a two-story house with my husband that has two bedrooms.

A couple of months ago, I was diagnosed with stage 4 cancer, and my aunt from another state was informed about my sickness, so she wanted to visit me. During these months, I was terribly sick and bedridden, so I couldn't clean the house. My husband couldn't clean because he was accompanying me in the hospital and at the same time had to go to work. My aunt wanted to bring her son and two grandchildren and asked if they could stay in my house. I turned her down because the house was unhabitable, and I didn't want them to just sleep on the couches. She got upset and blocked me on social media. She later on said there's nothing to do on my side of town anyway. I was like...I thought her purpose was to visit me?",AmItheAsshole
 for doing things I don’t remember doing in my sleep?,"My (35M) husband keeps getting frustrated with me (29F) for things he says he’s told me/asked me to do when he’s woken me up in the middle of the night, that I have absolutely no memory of. 

We have a 1-month-old newborn, and as I’m staying home with her and our 19-month-old son while he’s working, I’m the one who gets up with her every night when she cries, but a few times in the past month I’ve woken up in the morning as he’s leaving for work (6 AM-ish) and he’s pissed at me because he says the baby started to fuss in the night wanting to eat, and he’s moved my shoulder to wake me up and get me to feed her, said I told him “okay I’m going,” then said he woke up a few minutes later to her still fussing and me still asleep, meaning he’s had to get up and feed her himself. 

No matter how many times I say that I’m sorry and explain that I haven’t done it on purpose and genuinely don’t remember doing it, he still makes me feel like I’ve done something wrong and kept him from sleeping on purpose. Regardless of how I look at the situation though, I just don’t see how this is my fault, or something that’s anyone’s fault, rather than something that happens when two people are worn out from having a new baby. He doesn’t seem to get or have much sympathy for how tired someone would have to be to apparently sleep through their own baby’s cries, or that it feels awful to start the day feeling guilty for something you don’t even remember— much less how awful it feels that I’ve inadvertently let my baby go hungry longer than necessary.

Realistically, though, how am I supposed to avoid doing this thing that bothers him when I’m not doing it on purpose and don’t remember doing it? Just not sleep at all? Is it unreasonable to feel like I’m NTA and he should give me the benefit of the doubt/suck it up and get up with her every once in a while even though he’s working? ",AmItheAsshole
 for liking another girls posts?,"Hi y’all,

I recently got in a relationship with a girl. We dated for a month but she ended up breaking it off due to needing to heal from a past relationship. We decided to remain friends after the fact and left the door open to maybe one day coming back together. However, when in the relationship and currently she will get uncomfortable when I like other girls photos. These are not thirst trap photos these are like travel collages, graduation photos, etc. The reasoning she gives is that it’s “embarrassing” to be associated with a man who even likes any girls posts on social media unless they are like really close friends or her. I personally feel that kind of behavior might stem from insecurities associated with a past relationship or something else I don’t really understand. For me, I don’t know why anyone would really have it be a problem unless it was some weird thirst trap behavior. Mostly because i don’t see social media as a real tangible thing and i also could care less about other peoples opinions about my life they know nothing about. But, i can understand feeling uncomfortable when it’s a thirst trap or something of that nature. 

AITH for thinking that getting uncomfortable at liking another persons social media post is a red flag? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for venting to my best friend?,"So I (17M) have had a very interesting life so far, including professional motocross racing, growing up in a very well-off family, father who is spec-ops army, etc. 

Recently I’ve been going through some really tough depression, and I decided to vent about EVERYTHING to my best friend Sarah(fake name)(21F), who also happens to be one of only two coworkers. A lot of the stuff is admittedly hard to believe, such as certain things I’ve accomplished during my life, things related to my father (spec-ops/criminal underground stuff) and the wealth of my extended family (the people who raised me, but then had to give me back to mother and stepfather), but a lot of the things I have also given evidence and proof of. 

After I finished venting, Sarah told me, directly to my face, that she didn’t believe me and thinks I’m just being a two-faced liar. I responded that if she doesn’t believe me, that’s completely her choice, but I have no reason to lie to her and I promise I’m being honest. 

After that, I could’ve made a big show of proving some more stuff, and making arguments for everything. but I feel like if she’s not willing to believe my testimony after all we’ve gone through together, there’s no point in trying.

The past few days she has been extremely distant and almost aggressive towards me, and keeps making pointed jabs about how she can’t trust SOME people, and that CERTAIN people have let her down. In any other situation I would just give her space, or even just leave for a bit, but we are coworkers in a very small store and work 8 hour shifts together 4 out of 7 days a week. 

So AITA for venting to her, then getting hurt when she didn’t listen/believe me?",AmItheAsshole
 for getting mad at my sleepy boyfriend for not sharing his feelings?,"My bf (32m) is from a European country famous for being cold and unfriendly. However, he's sweet and very kind. I (25f) am from Latin America, very loving and clingy. We've been recently fighting about the same: Me being too sensitive / Him being too insensitive. We know this is a cultural difference, but it has escalated to a very exhaustive point. He claims my love demonstrations overwhelm him since he's not used to getting that much, which leads him to react dry and even mean towards me. A too long love stare could be overwhelming and be taken as an attack (his words). On the other hand, he also says he loves my capacity to love and he wants me to never change that. I'm indeed a sensitive person, I cry very easily. However, I don't consider myself a ""toxic girlfriend"" kind of woman or even a petty one.

The other night my bf told me he was super tired. We went to bed and cuddled, so I started to tell him how much I like him and how thankful I am for having him in my life. He, falling asleep, answers: ""Thank u, babe. That's sweet."" so I asked him if he could share his feelings too. He just answers: ""I'm really tired"", rolls over and closes his eyes. I'm being left with empty hands right after pouring my heart out, so I say "" whatever"" and roll over to the opposite side. Tears start coming out, so I go to wash my face and calm down, when he yells from the bedroom ""Now what? Where are u going? Are u sleeping in the living room?"" I get pissed and decide I'm actually sleeping on the couch. Next morning we talk about that for a while, but after going many times in circles he seems not to understand the problem, and claims I'm not caring for his need of sleep. We get really exhausted from arguing and try to move on.

Later that day I'm getting ready to leave and I'm being all lovey dovey one more time. I go to say goodbye and hug him. He, visibly exhausted, claims: ""Stop, this is too much!"". I go like ""This is too much what?"". He answers: ""Too much of you"". This is not the first time I hear that from him, and tbh I don’t understand the possibility of having too much of somebody you love, not to mention just bc that little of interaction. I take my bag and try to leave and he goes like ""I'm not getting a goodbye kiss?"" I left very upset without that kiss.

We've talked only once since then and after a long argument he apologized for hurting me, and told me he was just very exhausted both times, and it takes very much of his energy trying to process all my feelings and overreactions. I've talked to friends about the topic and everybody's told me I'm being stupid for staying in a relationship where my love is rejected. I think this must be just a cultural thing and I'm most likely overreacting, but I would appreciate opinions from people from different cultures and contexts. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for holding a grudge against my step son? ,"My (37m) wife (34f) was diagnosed with cancer in November, started treatment later that month, and has just finished chemo. Her follow up scan is next month. 

She has two children from a previous relationship (14, 11), I have three daughters from a previous relationship, and we have no children together. 

My oldest step son (14) has not been around since last January save for a week in July when they went to my in laws house for the 4th of July, once in September when he lied to us about a situation with his friend trying to convince us to let his friend sleep over at our house on a school night, and over Christmas to collect his gifts. We waited until after Christmas to tell the kids about my wife's cancer so they could all enjoy their holiday. When we told the boys, neither of them asked any questions, neither of them said much at all.. but when the oldest finally did speak all he said was, ""I want chick fil a. Take me home before you go get it."" We were out for a drive when my wife broke the news. He then called his grandmother and had her come pick him up, taking his gifts with him despite being told that his new things were for our house.. not for his father's house.

We have not seen my step son since. He has not called, not texted, not visited.. nothing. There have been other issues over the years with him telling outrageous lies to his father and the school guidance counselor that even resulted in CPS visiting our home on more than one occasion - every time they closed the case without incident based on our interviews and what our other kids said/how they acted during the visits. 

A few days ago my wife mentioned that she was upset about her son not being around in general, but that it was particularly rough to have not seen or heard from him while she was/is literally battling stage 4 cancer. I stated that while I am not one to hold a grudge, and I'm not, that this was going to be hard for me to get over and I was going to continue to be frustrated about this for a long time. I have always been frustrated with him for how he treats his mother, but this really was the straw that broke the camels back. My wife then told me that if she is not mad about it, that I am not allowed to be either. 

But.. I am. And I'm not going to just not be mad about this. This is a 14 year old person.. someone far old enough to understand what he is doing and how hurtful his actions are. This is not a young child that doesn't know what cancer is or understand that treatment is hard and that he very well may lose his mother. For a while I did think maybe he was avoiding it out of fear - but he has been refusing to see his mother or anyone else in the family for well over a year because he was punished for lying and his .98gpa. 


So.. AITA for holding a grudge against my stepson? 

Edit: I do truly appreciate every single one of you that has commented with advice or your opinion. I do want to go ahead and say as I should have said in the original post that I have tried therapy. All the rest of the kids are in therapy. My wife and I are both in therapy and I have tried several times with several different therapists and counselors to get him to go talk to someone and I plan on trying again today. You're all wonderful. ",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my friend a jealous bitch?,"I (28 Female) and my friend (23 Female) are new moms. My son was born in January and her daughter has just been born (in April). While I was in labor and delivery, my friend, let’s call her Michelle, came to visit and stayed for hours while I was there. She also visited me while my son and I were on Mother-baby and even while my son was in the NICU. Fast forward to a few days before she is to be induced and I asked if I could visit her. She responded with no and then proceeded to rant that she didn’t want my husband (40 male) Kevin to see her like that- a man who hadn’t changed her diapers. Michelle then continues on by saying that my son has been in daycare and has germs and that she didn’t want our children around each other. There was a joke made about our kids dating and she took it personally and said that it she didn’t feel like that was a joke. Finally, she said that I didn’t need to be asking for updates; that I wasn’t entitled to any updates and that I was stalking her and harassing her. Which is completely false. When I responded, I called her a jealous bitch because I have a husband who is supportive and was there the entire time of my pregnancy and her sperm donor (baby girl L’s dad) hasn’t been around during Michelle’s pregnancy. Am I the asshole or should I apologize and just cut ties with Michelle?

Edit- this all started after I pretty much told her to mind her business after she was trying to tell me how to feed my baby. This was after my husband and I talked to our son’s pediatrician about adding cereal to his formula at about 6 weeks old. Also, she told me that because my milk production was down that I needed to talk to lactation at the hospital, which I’d already done. ",AmItheAsshole
[AZ] What are reasons why Trump would be “unindicted” as a co-conspirator?,"I would like to understand the potential reasons behind declining to indict Trump despite being a co-conspirator.

I understand that we may not definitively know why at this stage, but I’d appreciate a lawyer’s speculation on the legal strategy. 

This is mainly for legal education purposes. Thanks in advance! 
",AskLawyers
 for excluding someone in pictures during a big performance,"I can’t believe I have to ask this here so here goes. 

This girl and I belong to a performing arts group. Long story short, she and a few others in the group got parts in a play recently. She got a small part only while a few others headlined with their faces in the promotion posters. 

Ever since, she had been on a main person syndrome trip. Every time the play is mentioned in our group chats she will insert herself into the conversation and remind people she is in it too. It’s was annoying. 

Last weekend was the performance and I went with some friends. After the show we took lots of pictures with the cast. She wasn’t in any of them. I don’t know where she went at that time. 

You know how it is at the end of shows. The cast will be around talking with friends and taking pictures and we just have to find the opportunity to catch them and quickly snap before moving to the next one. 

But like I said, didn’t see her, don’t care. We left soon after that. 

When I shared the pictures in our group chat, she of course made a scene and send a very sarcastic message about not including her. 

So AITA for not taking pictures with her even though she wasn’t around?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to meet my friends?,"Me (M20) and my GF (F19) have been in a long distance relationship for 1,5 years. I live in Germany and she lives in Canada, so there's a 7 hour time difference between us. And even at that we spend A LOT of time together, we are always on call with one another, always texting each other(longest we'll go without a text is max 30 min), we are able to play for 1-3 hours every night, including spending every weekend together.

Even from the very start she always seemed to get upset whenever I would plan something with my friends, choosing to either ignore me when I brough it up, or get very ""needy"" when I actually went, requiring me to always be on my phone.

Some time in the middle of 2023 she more or less put a ban on me meeting my friends after I went out with a friend to smoke weed at a time when she was ignoring me completely, stating that I was ""ruining the plans she had made for us that night"". After that incident any mention of me meeting my friends was immediately shut down. I was only able to meet my friends 4 times in 2023.

I've only now been able to meet my friend again, but under some very extreme rules. I cannot go meet them any time she has off, that includes her having the day/weekend off, if she is available to call while she's at work,  basically any chance of interacting with her she should take priority. She goes to work pretty late, so by the time she is busy(if she can't call at work) it's already very late for me and a lot of meeting opportunities have already passed.

Under her ""rules"" there is basically zero opportunity to meet my friends, as they usually only have the weekends off. 

To me we are spending basically every waking moment possible together, so on the rare off chance that my friends can meet, I don't see the issue in me going, even if that means she will have to find else to do that weekend.

Keeping a good relationship wth my friends is very important to me.  


So AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to move out of my mom’s house?,"I (27M) have lived with my mom since I was 22. I left when I was 19 because our relationship was strained, but moved back 3 years later because we healed. But it’s been 5 years, and I finally have a well paying job and an amazing girlfriend of 4 months. I’ve been thinking about moving out since late 2021, but never pulled the trigger for many reasons. But now I feel like I’m in a place where I can finally do it. I found a reasonably priced apartment in my area, and my girlfriend and I will be checking it out tomorrow (apartment is just for me, girlfriend owns her own home).

However, my mom is disabled with fibromyalgia and unable to work. She is able to sustain the house because I give her money every month as does the tenant on the 3rd floor. My mother is extremely depressed, and always talks about the pain that she’s in physically and emotionally. My oldest sister passed away two years ago, and it’s had a devastating toll on her. I don’t think she’ll ever be the same and it’s extremely sad to watch.

When I told my mom about the apartment tour, it didn’t go well. She was holding back tears, and telling me that it feels like I’m all she has left. And then my mom starts talking about most likely having to sell the house if I left. It hit me like a brick wall, and is making me second guess moving out, even though I want true independence. I’m not really sure what to do at this point. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for going to prom with a guy my best friend likes/liked ,"I 17F was recently asked to go to prom by one of my guy friends. All of his friends have dates and most of my friends do too so I said yes. I also didn’t really know how I would say no as he just wanted to go as friends- which I explicitly clarified with him when he asked me. I felt as though it would be awkward to say no given that we would be going as friends, and I work with him so I figured it was just one night - fuck it ill go we’re friends it’ll be fun. 

However, my one of my friends is obsessed with him. She started liking him freshman year, up until this year. She has shot her shot in the past and been rejected every time. It’s very clear he doesn’t like her. Additionally, she has started hanging out with this other guy who she is always talking about. Every time i’ve asked she’s told me she’s moved on from him but i’m not so sure how true that is anymore. 

After he asked me I told him right away to not tell any one as I wanted to be the first person to tell her. I told her that he asked and that we’re just going as friends - basically as i had described above. She was mad. She texted one of our mutual friends claiming she was so angry her best friend (me) would think of going to prom with someone she liked for three years. Keep in mind, she has her own prom date - a friend she’s bringing from another school that she’s been talking about for months.

I feel bad because I feel like i’ve really messed up, but all my friends are telling me it’s not a big deal and that she needs to get over it, especially because i don’t even like him. What do y’all think?
",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friend to pay when we go out?,"
My(17f) best friend, “Avery” lost her dad a couple years ago. Since then, her family’s been struggling financially, so every time we’ve hung out, or gone out to eat, I pay for both of us. I don’t mind, because usually my parents will give me 20 bucks and so I’m not actually spending my money. 

A couple weeks ago was our Spring Break, and the language department organized a trip to Europe that cost ~$5000 dollars per person. 

Every time I asked Avery if she wanted to hang out over break, she’d give me an excuse. Over the past couple weeks I’ve seen everyone posting pictures of the trip and it turns out Avery went with them. 

 I feel lied to because she was not honest about why she couldn’t hang out, and hurt that she’s made me pay for everything and then spent several thousand dollars on this trip. 

I decided to be upfront because I didn’t want it to cause any lasting resentment, and I asked her about it. She got defensive, and said I had no right to shame her for how she spent her money, that it was none of my business and that she deserved to enjoy herself too. She does of course but it felt deceitful that she had me pay for everything thinking she actually couldn’t afford it when she clearly could. I asked her if she could start paying for herself when we hang out, and she responded that just because she splurged once didn’t mean she had spare money all the time. She’s upset with me and I feel hurt. 

AITA for wanting her to pay because she clearly has the money to?",AmItheAsshole
 for not rearranging my plans due to a miscommunication ,"So I got my husband tickets for a football match for his birthday. The match is about 1 hr away from my hometown (5 hours from where we live). 

 Now instead of getting a hotel and arranging for my 2 year old to have a sleepover with MIL, my husband suggested that we stay with some of my family and spend an extended weekend there. My dad lives next to a train station so I asked him if he would be up for looking after our two year old during the match. (He has done it a few times before when we’ve both travelled down for work). 

For context my parents are separated and my mum has recently had an operation and isn’t well enough to look after my 2 year old for extended periods of time. 

So I asked my Nan if we could stay at hers for a few nights and let my Mum know we were coming down and if she wanted to do anything. I also asked if there was anything of my Sibling’s that she wanted me to bring up as they now live in the same city as me and my husband. 

Now, according to my mum we had arranged for her to look after my son while we go to a work meeting. I do not recall discussing anything with her about looking after my 2yr old. But I do appreciate that she may have interpreted us coming down and assumed I needed childcare because I had mentioned previously that I got my husband football tickets for his birthday that weekend. 

She’s now called around several members of our family about how ‘I’ve abused her’. I’ve offered to discuss further and I was already planning on taking her to one of her favourite gardens while we were down. So would still be spending more time with her than my dad overall. But she’s declined to speak with me, saying ‘I have treated her like shit’ and asked my Nan to not let me stay over. If I am staying with her side of the family I shouldn’t be seeing my dad at all. (My dad doesn’t have a spare room so we would need to pay for a hotel/camp outside instead). 

I am happy to get a hotel for one night (which is all I can afford). But I don’t want to cancel seeing my dad and not let him spend time with his grandson. Especially as the last time I visited him was for his birthday and I had to cut the time short as my mum had insisted I spend the time with her instead.

",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my son be affectionate with his boyfriend on a family fishing trip?,"My (48M) youngest boy Hunter (14M) recently came out a few weeks ago and apparently has had a boyfriend Derek (14M) for a good minute. We fully support and love him for it. Around this time of year we go on a family fishing trip and visit my parents a town over. Hunter wanted to bring Derek and his brothers have brought girlfriends before so being supportive we said yes.

We also happen to live in rural Missouri though and I know since comming out Hunters had a bit of a rough go of it at school even being a wrestler. My parents town is also worse. We usually do fishing in the morning and then the boys go off on their own into town to do whatever and hang out. Yesterday  Hunter and Derek were already getting some weird looks from local boys for just holding hands while we were at the fishing spot.  Not wanting anything to happen before they went off on their own or with his brothers I pulled Hunter and Derek to the side and told them itd probably be a good idea if they were less affectionate while in town and to tone down. Hunter got this sad look on his face and before I got another word in he just says ok and drags Derek off.
 
As  far as I'm aware nothing happened while they were off by themselves. Except Hunter would barely talk to me when theu got back later in the day. Just kept looking down anytime we were having a conversation. It was still going like that this morning and I just had enough and I pulled aside alone and asked if someone said anything or did anything. He said everything was fine nothing he couldnt handle and so I asked why he was acting the way he was. He gets mad hot and just yells because I don't actually support and that I'm ashamed of him. I told him of course I did  and I go for a hug but he wont let me.

He yells at me through tears that I  basically told him not to be himself yesterday. I  tried to explain that it was for his and Derek's safety nir because I was ashamed but he tells me I'm lying and wont hear nothing I'm saying.   We haven't talked anymore since the blow out this morning.  My wife thinks I shouldve just kept the boys  close and kept an eye out instead of saying what I did.  AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to buy an iPad for my sister?,"So I bought an iPad years ago in exchange for food, I made the deal with my mother because she wanted an iPad to watch movies and I wasn't really using it. The iPad's screen is not working as well and she asked me to buy another one (because I get to buy it tax free). My mom barely uses it, only my sister (4) uses it to watch videos and play. 

My issue with this is that she has grown addicted to the iPad, she spends most of her day on it and is not able to eat or behave in restaurants without the iPad. I've brought this to my mom's attention and she dismisses it saying she's not using it much, just when she gets home from school. Which is not true. I told her at the moment I'm not buying another iPad cause I would just be enabling my sister's addiction to the iPad instead of her learning how to behave. I understand being a parent is tiresome, but don't believe an iPad should be doing the caretaking.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for going to my sisters dream destination without her?,"For context: I 29F and my sister 35F have birthdays 6 days apart. We grew up poor and are mom was an addict so we never really celebrated birthdays. This may be the reason my sister is super weird about her birthday. She always seems to have a problem if I celebrate my birthday. Saying hers is first and should be celebrated first. However I always plan my own parties or make plans for mine, she excepts others to. So if I or someone else doesn’t do something for hers, he gets mad if I celebrate mine. 

Last year she made a huge deal because my friends made tshirts with my face for my birthday but no one did anything “special” for hers. I took her for drinks and dinner.

I’m turning 30 this year on the 30th so I wanted it to be special. I told my sister that we should spend travel to Thailand and Bali. We’ve both always wanted to go. She agreed, this was about 8 months ago.

I’m doing all the planning, she’s agreeing. I sent flights and things seems to be going as planned. When it comes to booking the hotels, she states she doesn’t have the money yet. I say okay no problem, I’ll book and you give me the money later.

A month before I just start getting weird because she still hasn’t given the money, but everytime I mention it she says yes she’s forsure going. Another week passes and she confesses she doesn’t have the money.

I agree that I’ll pay all the hotels and all she needs is the spending money. She confesses that she never even brought the ticket.

She then says I could probably cancel and get credit for the airline. I laugh and say well I’m still going obviously. She gets so upset saying that I’m going to her dream designation for her birthday and how that’s so wrong. 

She gets more upset when she learns our mutual friend sent me some money to help cover since she lied to me right before the trip and I now have to cover everything on my own. 

She keeps replying to all my stories snarky, and calling me a golden child. (We both grew up in foster care, and didn’t have active parents or foster parents). 

I was talking to my brother about it and he said he understands her pov, that she just wants to feel special. He said I should have paid for everything including her ticket as I make more money or that I should have pushed it back so that it’s not over her birthday. Now I feel bad, but I just want to be able to celebrate myself in peace without constantly worrying about offending my sister. So AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to do what I want on my birthday?,"I (24M) am about to turn 25 at the end of the week. My parents (52M + 44F) told me that I have to either go out with them for a meal or have a family get-together at our house.

I don't want to do either of these things. I don't have a problem with my family, just my parents. I hate being in the same room as them because I always feel unwelcome and like they could turn around at any point to lecture me about something or nothing.

But untimely I hate being the centre of attention and they know this, I'd love to just chill by myself but apparently doing anything other than the two choices I was given is ""selfish"" and ""childish"". I don't understand this sentiment, isn't the whole point of a birthday about having a day about me? If so then why do I have to do something that I don't want to? AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 I refuse to go to my cousin’s baby shower,"I have a little cousin who I’ve been pretty close with our whole lives. She even lived with my parents and I while she was in college, so our bond is almost that of sisters. 

We haven’t spoke in almost two years. At that time she was in the beginning stages of a new relationship with this guy who she’d been on and off with since high school. He wasn’t always great to her and even admitted that he was embarrassed to be with her publicly due to her physical handicap. He cheated on her a lot and ended up with herpes. At one point, he didn’t even bother with the break up, just left the state and didn’t talk to her for a few years. For all of these reasons, I’m not this guy’s biggest fan, but my cousin seemed to be happy so I told her she should bring him to come hang out with me and my husband next time she’s in town. 

That was the last time we spoke outside of a “merry Christmas” “happy new year” or “happy birthday” text with no real conversation attached. I found out she married him when I saw all the pictures of their wedding on insta. I was hurt she didn’t even tell me she got engaged and that I wasn’t invited, but I assumed it was a low key affair and brushed it off and told her how beautiful she looked with no response from her.

 About 4-5 months ago, my sister told me that our cousin is pregnant, but she didn’t want too many people to know just yet so I had to pretend I didn’t know. I was again hurt that she wouldn’t tell me, but she’s an adult and given that her pregnancy would likely be a high risk one, I understand wanting to keep it private until it’s safe. 

About a month ago my mom asked my aunt (cousin’s mom) about it and was told my cousin specifically said she didn’t want my mom or I to know and asked her not to tell us. She said we’d never approved of her man and talked a lot of mess about him and she didn’t want our negativity to ruin this happy time in her life. This hurt in a big way. Sure I’d talked badly about him, but it was when I was agreeing with her all those times he’d hurt her.

I’ve never been anything but supportive towards her and I couldn’t believe she’d want to exclude me from her life like this. I managed to get over it and just unfollowed all of her socials so I didn’t need to see the life she didn’t want me to be a part of and moved on. 

A few days ago, she texted me and asked for my address so she can send a baby shower invitation, still not actually even telling me that’s married or pregnant, just that she’d like to send an invite. I told my mom about it who immediately said I should just forgive her and go. I’m absolutely not going. She’s clearly told people that doesn’t want me involved with this part of her life. I think it’s ridiculous to ask me to show up and give her money and baby items for the baby she didn’t even want me to know she’s having. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend I don’t like her boyfriend,"This actually happened about a year ago at this point but it’s bugged me ever since and spiked up as of recent. I was 15 at the time, Friend A was 16, Friend B had just turned 17. Friend B was moving away after the end of the school year, so we were trying to spend as much time with her as we could. Friend A however was working 2 jobs, on top of an AP art class and going into her senior year. We [ Me and Friend B ] tried to be supportive of her busy schedule and understood that even when she had time to hang out, she was exhausted. 

It seemed however, Friend A didn’t mind hanging out with her boyfriend at any time of the day or missing events or etc instead of friend B and me. 

Friend A’s boyfriend was also a total douche. He wasn’t just rude or disrespectful, some of his political beliefs were ridiculous ( he was a Neo-Nazi for example [ CRAZY IK ] ) and was very heavily into his beliefs. For a while we thought it was just a joke, regardless if it was inappropriate, we figured he just had a very fucked sense of humor. Not only that, he seemed to actively hate friend B and me, making snarky comments, being rude and disrespectful for absolutely no reason, shitting on our names, and almost manipulating friend A into hating us. 

The finally breaking point was when he continued to make comments on Friend B’s ethnic food saying it smelled disgusting, looked atrocious, etc. This made Friend B pretty uncomfortable and she started to not eat because of it and sit in the library. after a while, i went to sit with her and we discussed his behavior and how it made us both uncomfortable. Friend A was wondering why we were acting upset and being distant and we told her that we didn’t like her boyfriend, that he made us uncomfortable, was disrespectful and that we couldnt stand to be around him because of that. He made excuses that he was Schizophrenic and his mood shifted a lot

Friend A got really mad at us, saying he was joking around, and regardless it still made us uncomfortable that he would make those jokes. [ for example about the jokes, they would be racist, sexist, he would make fun of special ed kids in his class and gossip about them ] [ he also claimed he could make racist jokes because he was black ]. we started arguing and it led to us cutting contact completely.

fast forward 5 months, i reached out to friend A. friend B had already moved and i was keeping contact with her the best I could and still am. friend a seemed to be okay with becoming friends again only to text me basically saying she felt she would be disrespecting herself by letting me back into her life. needless to say, i was furious and didnt attempt to reach out anymore.

fast forward again 4 months and she has reached out to friend B with a simple “hey” and me and friend B discussed this wondering if we would even want to be friends again with her after all the unnecessary drama. for context: friend a is still with her boyfriend.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for eating the food in my coworker's fridge?,"My coworker (32f) asked me (28f) to dogsit for her for the weekend while she and he husband spend a weekend away. They paid me $150 and I left just this morning. I've been there since Thursday.

While I was there, I ate some of their food. They didn't have much in their fridge, but they had a few pack of frozen vegetables that you can microwave. There was a total of like 8 of them, and the three days I was there, I ate 3.

My coworker just texted me and asked if I ate their food. I said yes, and she kind of started going off on me about how she was saving that food for her lunches, etc. She also asked me to pay her $50 back since she paid me ""extra"" so I could order food instead of eating hers. I feel like this is so ridiculous. I told her I would just buy her some frozen vegetables and she said to forget it and sent me her venmo information.

I see her every day at work. Is it worth it for $50? AITA for eating her food while I was dogsitting for her? WIBTA if I don't pay her back?

edit: while i was there, i didnt eat anything else. i dont eat breakfast and i supplement my lunches with a protein shake. i just had her vegetables.",AmItheAsshole
H for betting with money given to me by a friend ,"Hi I 22m lost all my money recently as I was robbed. I asked my friend  Rodger 70m for money so I could eat as I had no money coming through untill the end of the month. He gave me the money and I accepted and was ONLY going to use that money for food as that’s what I told him I needed it for. However the next day another not so good influence friend convinced me to bet £20 $15 USD on a football game I agreed because I did t want to have to ask Rodger for any more money if i went over the £50 for food. Now Rodger is pissed at me saying I shouldn’t have used his money to bet and I understand his POV but he won’t let me explain and has blocked my number. I want to make amends and he’s a wonderful friend and I know I made a mistake. 
I have promised not to bet in the future 
AITAH?
Edit: I can’t cook so I order in so £50 is really not a lot",AmItheAsshole
 for blowing up at my sister,"I (18F) and my sister (15F) are very close and rarely fight. My sister has some anger issues and we think she's autistic (our therapist is fairly sure to, but it's nearly impossible to get a diagnosis of you not a young child). I say this to hopefully give my sister's perspective a little bit. But into the issue. Our mom laid down beside her one afternoon on her bed to talk and hang out. My sister however was having non of it, and was trying to push her off the bed, and ended up kicking her really hard in the shoulder, leading to causesing our mom to be in terrible pain and crying. My sister did not apologize or even look at her while me and my step dad were trying to get her up and take her to her room to rest. I then went out to the store with my step dad to get her some medicine and snacks. We were gone for about 30 minutes and when we came back I asked my mom if she apologized. My mom said no, that she infact ignored her while we were gone. My mom was really hurt by this so I went to my sister's room to ask her to apologize. Out of everyone in the house she responds to me the best in these situations. I asked her to apologize and she got made at me. Telling me how it wasn't her fault our mom got hurt, and how it was hers for even trying to touch her (our mom wanting to give her a hug), so she said she thought she had nothing to apologize for. I was flabbergasted, I was trying to explain it was no one's fault, it was just an accident, but it would still help if everyone apologized but she said it was our mom's fault. So I snapped and said I couldn't believe she would even say that and I stormed out the room. Obvious the parents got involved and it became a screaming match between my step dad and sister. So AITA for blowing up at my sister and leading to the big fight?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my bf to hangout with his friend? ,"AITA (26f) for hating my boyfriend (26m) friend? We have been on and off since high school, and he met this friend in college. Let’s call him Bob. Bob became friends w my bf in college (we all went to the same college. i picked this college BECAUSE of my bf [im an idiot for this i know]) but Bob annoys the crap out of me. Every time my bf goes out with Bob, he comes home VERY under the influence. I know Bob’s main ex gf, who has told me all the dirty details on the relationship. Bob cheated, was doing drugs (weed and ❄️) , he was verbally abusive, was bad with their pets, and was overall not a good bf to her. Bob is now single and wants to go out in a big city all of the time w my bf. I hate how he comes home late and is always too intoxicated to have a real conversation with me (I’ve never told anyone this, but one of the more recent times my bf was so drunk he came home and peed on the floor). I hate this friend and I tell my bf I don’t want him hanging out with Bob. He states that Bob is one of his ‘best friends’ and it is unfair for me to ask him to stop hanging out with Bob. Since I know what kind of bf Bob is, and because of how my bf acts when he gets home, I thought it was semi-reasonable to try to set a boundary. AITA for this? I never wanted to be the type of girlfriends to put an ultimatum on my partner’s friends, but I thought this situation was okay to do so. I just picture Bob trying to get girls when they go out to bars, and I trust my bf, but I know how it is when friends go out and one talks to some guy, so the friend of the girl has to talk to the friend of the guy. Do I need to drop my disdain towards him and deal with them hanging out every once in a while? Or am I right in not wanting them to hangout? Pls help!! ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my grandpa what my sister said? ,"I will likely have to explain more I comments or message me about it. Also no names are real.

My grandpa is currently dying sadly. He is a Vietnam veteran that was exposed to agent orange. He chose to stay home and die surrounded by family rather than be at hospice. In this recount my grandma is gone the while time untill I say so.

I talked to my sister Kylee a few days before I saw my grandpa. He asked about my sisters since everyone besides them and my mother has seen him. I explained my sister Lori couldn't make it because of college since it was exam time and my sister Kylee wasn't financially available. He was sad but understood. I told him what Kylee told me. That she rather see him alive one more time rather than go to his funeral. 

Side note, my grandpa and I are almost always honest with each other. I was one of the only people he actively spoke about the war to. He always wanted and appreciated my honesty, so something like this said wasn't a shocker. The man made jokes about his weakened state and death to me. I was close to both my grandma and my grandpa. I worked around the house everytime I was there. 

My uncle's kids came in and started to hang out and talk to my grandpa so I backed off. I told my aunt Claire about it and she walked off. I found out later she told my grandma what I said to my grandpa. My grandmother come back home and looked upset so I went to hug her. She moved back and looked at me like I killed a puppy in front of her. It hurt me but I moved back. 

I was confused so was my father who was in the room when he saw what happened. Grandma in a cold tone told me to look at my phone which I did. She told me grandpa wasn't dying (he is) and why did I said that, he was so sad. Keep in mind she just got home. 

I put the pieces together and started to cry and walked out not making a scene as best I could. My father was furious and left as well. I was numb to the whole thing. I ignored my cousin Will and my father's girlfriend try to speak to me. We left after my father got my water bottle inside. 

Ever since I've still been visiting my grandpa. But I've been giving my grandmother the silent treatment as well as my aunt Claire. Claire is over 50 and my grandma is over 70. When I first came over after the incident, my grandmother kept trying to talk to me but I ignored her. I left to go outside for a bit and when I came back in Claire yelled at me ""Don't ignore my mother in her own house!"" My cousin Will shut her up. I heard her say ""She needs to grow up."" I had to hold back laughter. 

I have blocked my grandma and Claire. Claire has always sirred up shit so I'm don't with her. My grandma and I tried to talk but she went for emotional manipulation. Which is sadly normal in my dad side of the family when something does not go their way. I sighed and say this was not going away where and got up to walk away. As I walked she kept calling my name. Halfway down the drive way I was angry in the moment and flipped her off. ",AmItheAsshole
 for abusing my peer,"With a tight 7-day deadline and impending exams, our group of 5 faced pressure to complete a film assignment. I handled editing while YSSI, PMV, and HV managed filming, but PG struggled to find a role.   


After finishing the interviews, I sacrificed sleep to start editing. My frustration over PG's absence and contribution led to an impulsive threat to remove him from the group, sparking a confrontation. He acknowledged his shortcomings and agreed to contribute more, and I apologized for my outburst.  
  
On the second day, I incorporated feedback from the first cut and suggestions from PG into the second cut. After presenting it, the group recommended further changes for a third cut. Despite PG's suggestion to add his online b-roll, it was vetoed due to concerns about the instructor's preferences. As an alternative, I suggested he search for suitable music.  
  
By the fourth day, our final cut was nearly complete. With PMV unavailable, I collaborated with the rest to add BGM and integrate the opening montage. Unfortunately, the music PG sourced didn't match our tempo, so I adjusted it, though it still fell short. We settled on it temporarily.   


Despite forgetting an automated subtitle option, I volunteered to add them manually. PG made a sarcastic comment about my editing efforts, which briefly upset me. However, I later found the automated subtitle feature and shared the updated version. With everyone reluctantly agreeing on the BGM, we felt confident in our progress. PG also worked on a slideshow presentation, though it was considered the easiest task. We were 90% prepared to submit the project the following day.  
  
In the final hours, while away from campus, HV found potentially better background music (BGM), prompting a last-minute change. As I began exporting with the new music, YSSI reminded me to add outlines to the subtitles. However, my laptop started to die, making adjustments difficult. I managed to share the cut with the new BGM before my laptop died. As I traveled back, campus commitments weighed on my mind. However, the version without subtitles had already been submitted.  
  
Additionally, I received an email late at night about another eval for the next morning, requiring me to stay up for three more hours to prepare.  
  
As exhaustion mounted, frustration peaked. This led to a regrettable action on my part. I sent PG an abusive message, expressing frustrations about his lack of contribution. Despite warning him not to read it first, he did and was upset.  
  
We spoke for an hour, during which he threatened to report me. I encouraged him to do so. PG decided not to report me, citing his busy schedule.   


Instead, he asked me to delete and block his contact, which I agreed to do. Reflecting on our conversation, I realize he handled the situation maturely, which makes me feel ashamed of my actions. I would have understood if he had reported me, but it hurts that he had to take the high road.  
",AmItheAsshole
 for taking advantage from my Friend who still have crush on me. ,"Throwaway account 

So I (25M) have a long term friend (Max,28M) . We have known each other for 13 years. When Max was 18 ,  he came out as gay and was kicked out by his parents. He move to another state to live with his uncle , thought we still contact frequently until he confessed to me when I was 19 , I politely declined.  After that he slowly distant from me , we barely talk  to each other until we reconnect 2 years ago . 


About me , I'm single father with 4 years old son , 1 years ago I was fired from my jobs and hardly could afford to pay rent.  He called me and suggested I and my child could moved to his apartment until i found another job and place to live. I didn't have many options so I agreed but informed him. Don't get me wrong , Max is a nice person , he bought my son toys and candy , play with him when I were busy. I try not to bother or annoying him as possible as I could and did most of the household chores  even after I had a new job ,  he convinced me to stay and pay rent to him . 

 In March , Max confessed his feeling again and I was very surprised. (For more context: Back to when we reconnected, I did ask if he still has feeling to me , he laugh and joke that I'm delusional to think about that . He is kind of popular in the town where we live and has date every weekend until now) . I  told him that though I not against the ideas of dating a man , I'm don't want a relationship now especially I still have a kid to rise and I see him as a good brother.  He said I should think again and went to his room. Next morning,  Max said I had a week to consider or find a place to move out . I tried talked to him but he dismissed.   So I quit job and moved back to my home state to live with my mom.

 After 2 weeks , Max texted me said that he sorry and want me to move back . I were furious and block him . Max's friends started terroriz my phone , said that I toxic , ab*se, gold d*gger and many more horrible names mainly that I'm ah caused Max depressed and took advantage of him . I don't think so but I started to have doubt.  So I want to ask , did I take advantage of him ? Am I the AH. What should I do now ? I'm grateful about what he done but I don't think our relationship can come back to normal again? ",AmItheAsshole
 for getting mad at my friend for embarrassing me after i told him to stop?,"Me and my friend have been kind of friends on and off for a long time, he recently started  going to the gym with me and we have been debating a lot of things and some of them are kind of sensitive, such as religion and life and stuff like that. after the gym today we decided to go get food and take a drive. 

On the drive he took us up to a make out spot to mess with people and that’s what he did, i did not want to do that and i told him so. then after 3 minutes of messing with this person i lost it and climbed into the drivers seat to get him to get into the car, and that’s what he did. when i climbed back over i broke the center console and i immediately panicked and started apologizing. 

Then on the drive back i got mad at him for making me panic in a social situation i didn’t want to be in and making it so i did something done. while i do take accountability for breaking the center console, i don’t think i was in the wrong and it really stressed me out. So am i the asshole for accidentally damaging his car out of panic? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friends that I don’t want to go out with a guy but they keep pushing me to.,I’m a 29 gay male and single at the and I’m not upset about it either. I have two friends one of which I live with (we’ll call him Chad and other friend Mark ). The problem I’m having is that one day me and Mark where out participating in a Pokemon Go event and it was just the us until we met a group of players during the event and we asked if we could join them and they said yes. One person in this group is the guy that Mark and Chad are trying to pushing me towards (we’ll call him Dan). Dan is a nice guy and at this point I’ve only met him like three times and yes he’s gay too (I think). My point is that I think he is a nice guy but I don’t really see him that way you know. But Mark keeps trying to get me to go out with him and has even tried to set up a lunch date. I think him for trying but I just don’t see like that. A week later Chad meets him and agrees with Mark on trying to set me up with Dan. I’ve told both of them on and to stop trying to make me go out with guy and said he’s not my type. Chad said that since I barely go out and talk with anyone that I can’t have a type. What pisses me off is that they keep pushing it even now and I feel like I can’t even fight back but I can’t back down. I don’t even feel like being in a relationship right now. am I the asshole,AmItheAsshole
 to use my period as an excuse to not participate in my cousin’s wedding?,"Greetings everyone!  My cousin is getting married this Saturday and asked me if I can be part of my bridal entrance… I am thinking of backing out and using my period as an excuse.  

Cindy (29/F) has a Hindu wedding this Saturday.  We are not particularly close and never were growing up: my grandparents (paternal) played favorites and treated my parents, my sibling and I the worst.  Evidenced by things we heard in the family, stealing our inheritance from our great grandparents, how they treated us, etc.  My mom had enough and moved us abroad and life is GREAT for all of us since we took a step away from dad’s side.  My grandma tried to connect us all again - we were uninterested.  


Years pass, I connect with Cindy in 2015.  We are cordial, however we don’t have a bond or common interest.  Another cousin, Rudy, tells me that Cindy and her sister Annie, talks TERRIBLY about random people and family on Facebook (keep this in mind for later). Rudy and I that that is rather weird and rude. 

In 2023, Cindy is engaged and announces her wedding. For whatever reason, my grandma kept giving me wrong dates multiple times and when I asked Cindy, she mentioned that invites will come soon and just wait.  I asked her for at least a save the date since I started a new job and would like to plan properly and I live abroad.  


The wedding in April and the invite was sent February, received LATE February.   The airfares were expensive and I mentioned to my grandma (WITHOUT THE INTENTION OF ASKING FOR $) that I am going to have to politely decline as it’s both out of my budget and too close for me to ask for time off (4 day wedding).  Grandma sends me $ to the airfare KNOWING I would only be there for the Saturday and Sunday, saying it would be “disappointing if you don’t show up at least to represent your side”. And because Cindy and I were friendly, I wanted to make a good faith effort. Even if I wasn’t attending, I planned to give her $$ as a gift.  Cindy asks me to be part of her bridal entry - I think foolishly, “wow, this is nice. I’m glad we’re good!”

My mother, who happened to be visiting her family, heard from a relative who also distanced themselves from my grandparents and Cindy’s family - that Cindy and her mom speaks EXTREMELY poorly of me and my mother.  Her mother and Cindy both doubt my career as a physician (I can provide proof btw) and says “look at her Facebook what doctor acts like that” (referring to me dressing up and traveling with my partner who is a successful attorney and me being pro-choice/a LBGTQ+ ally/pro therapy to name a few). 

Hearing this hurt me deeply as I believed Cindy was being sincere and I am considering withdrawing my agreement to be part of her bridal entry using the excuse my period is expected this Saturday (day of the wedding and the actual truth too). 

WIBTA for backing out?

Want to add: the person my mother spoke to has NEVER ever met Rudi nor do they have any relation. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for getting on my husbands case for blowing his nose in the middle of the night?,"Last night at 4:30 am my husband gets out of bed and blows his nose loudly in our bedroom on his way to the bathroom. No attempt to make it quiet, get out of the room first, etc.

Obviously, I wake up. I grumble a bit and say did you have to do that, you woke me up.

He flips out on me, claiming he can't help that he needed to blow his nose and I should be 'less picky'/shouldn't nitpick him. 

Obviously, im now really irate and am up until 5:30 fuming silently.

So, AITH? or is he?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my boyfriend that his divorced sister treats him like her man,"My (28F) boyfriend's (28M) sister (38M) divorced her husband last year. She also has a 4 yo child. She is quite spoiled and can't do much on her own, and so she is always asking my bf for help with nearly everything. This includes watching her kid, running errands, helping her wih her small business. He even works with her when he has time.

I don't mind him helping her, but she asks for help for everything and whenever she has any inconvenience she calls him first thing.  
She keeps calling him even when we are on dates, just to ask for stuff or to tell him random stuff. She calls up to 4 times and nearly daily. She is pretty useless and keeps relying on him for nearly everything.  
I feel like my bf feels sorry for her and especially his niece, so his jumps to help them whenever she asks.

Yesterday, we were supposed to go on a bruch date but he asked me to go run an errand for her before heading to the café. I got pissed off and refused to go. He got mad at me and told me that I am mean for refusing and that I shouldn't mind since she is a single woman with a child and the errand would take half an hour. We got into an argument over that and I told him that he is trying to compensate his sister for her ex-husband, and that she is relying on him for nearly everything as if he was her man.

Did I overreact?

PS: sorry for any grammatical errors, English is not my first language",AmItheAsshole
 for body-shaming my friend for telling her her chubby cheeks suits her well,"I (24 F) have a bestfriend (25 F) when I was in grade school, wherein we swap notes almost every hour just because we like it. We were so close back then that we would wait the lther one to go home together. But we lost contact when she was transferred to a different school. 

I tried to reconnect with her recently. I replied on one of her story, a selfie. I asked how she is and that she looks so pretty. She jokes, as normal, that she is fine and that she's pretty as usual. I told her her chubby cheeks suits her well. She then got angry at me for saying her cheeks are chubby. She said she was offended that I body shame her. I explained to her what body shaming is and how my action is not body shaming, and that I am complimenting her. She said I am mansplaining her what body shaming is, and that I should apologize. I told her she should know the difference between barely describing and body shaming, and that I will not apologize since it is not bad, instead she should say thank you because I meant to compliment her. She said she don't need my compliment. Afterwards, i received notifications that she tagged me on a post. She took screenshots.of our convo, erasing her replies to me. She tagged her friends and her relatives saying she is being bullied online. People then started to comment negatives things about me, calling me names, cussing at me, etc. 

",AmItheAsshole
 for disregarding what my wife wants?,"I, 26 m, have been wanting to get a vehicle since I sold my truck a couple of months ago. My job provides me a work vehicle only to use it for company purposes. My wife, 27’ f, did not want me to get another vehicle because she has hers, which we are still paying on &amp; have the capability of paying it off by the end of next year, and we can share it. I explained to her sharing a vehicle wouldn’t be the best because of how opposite our schedules are &amp; other activities she &amp; I do outside of work. Between her &amp; I, we bring in a combined income of just over $8K a month. Total expenses being around $4K a month, maybe $5K at most. The vehicle I’m looking at getting will add an additional $700 payments each month (insurance &amp; vehicle payment). We have been wanting to have another child &amp; since I found this vehicle, she does not want to have another kid because believes we wouldn’t be able to afford having another kid. When we first got together (dating) &amp; talked about having kids, she didn’t want to initially. I told her that was my non-negotiable &amp; that this will not work out. She changed her answer to say that she will stay &amp; have one more kid. Shortly after we married, she told me that she does not want to have kids after 30, which I agreed because it’s harder for women to have kids after 30. Now because of this car situation, she is telling me that wants to have a kid now &amp; that if I decide to go with the car then we won’t have any other kids. AITA if I go with the car &amp; stick to we can afford having a kid &amp; the car?",AmItheAsshole
 Roommate wants to get rid of my furniture,"I'm moving in with a friend (Sara) who's more materialistic and ""aesthetic"" than I am. She wants to get rid of my couch because she said its ugly (it's dark grey and supposedly not pretty enough like famous YouTuber couches are.) I received my couch from a family member who was moving and only had it for a couple years. Not only that but this was the type of couch I have been dreaming of but could not afford (large sectional for more space to sit. $2k+) 

She mentioned wanting to buy a new couch that she likes and has proposed a smaller couch (some popular name brand couch she saw online) which was the exact opposite of what I wanted. Sara said she will pay for it which is not a problem but I've realized I don't want to get rid of the couch. It's big, it's comfortable, we have the space for it and I want to take it with me wherever I go if we decide to part ways. It's hard to tell her things without hurting her feelings or hearing some super long explanation trying to persuade me thus invalidating my feelings (I'm a simple guy. I know what I want and I have my reasons.) 

She also wants to furnish the apartment how she likes it (how famous people furnish homes on social media) which I have no issues because I'm not paying for it. But it is starting to get annoying and out of hand especially when neither of us comes from money. She's a sweet girl with good intentions and I recognize she's excited about moving but AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad a child is wearing my clothes,"   I 21 like the way I dress and buy a lot of clothes I enjoy wearing. I am bigger and wear a size medium - extra large, depending on the item. My sibling 12 is also bigger and wears the same size as me. I am currently living with my parents because we live in 2024 and it's expensive to live alone.

   I try really hard to keep my clothes and my siblings' clothes separate, but sometimes I'll leave a shirt or a pair of pants in the bathroom after a shower. My sibling enjoys my style and likes to copy my outfits, which is fine. The issue is that they will purposefully steal my clothes out of the bathroom or from the laundry and wear them. I've told them several times not to wear my clothes, but they continue to wear them.

   Today set me off because I found them sitting in their little pool in our backyard wearing one of my new shirts. I had JUST worn it yesterday and forgot to grab it out of the bathroom last night when I showered. So not only did they wear my new shirt into nasty pool water, but they also wore my dirty shirt all day. When I told them it was my shirt, they lied and said they didn't know it was mine and that it was hanging in their closet. I know they're a kid but it made me so angry that they wore my shirt, lied about it, and then when I told them it upset me that they wore it they told me to get over it and that it didn't matter. So, AITA for getting mad at them for wearing my shirt, or am I just overreacting? 

Edit: I see a lot of comments about me making sure I clean up after myself, which is very valid, and I will do better in the future. However, it's not like I'm throwing all my dirty clothes on the bathroom floor. I do the same thing every time I shower. I have my clean clothes on one side of the counter and my dirty clothes on the other. When I'm done showering, I get dressed and take everything I used (towels wash rags, clothes, shampoo, ect) back into my room. I usually don't leave any of my things in there, but sometimes a piece of clothing might drop, or I'll miss it. Usually I'll see it in the morning and take it to my room, but this time that didn't happen because my sibling already found it and put it on.

TLDR My 12yo sibling wore my new shirt in a pool and told me I was overreacting when I got upset.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to a party,"I (16f) have been refusing to attend my high school's ""freshman party"", this party has no association with the school itself besides being hosted by senior students. These type of parties overwhelm me with loud noise, lights, a lot of people talking and honestly they're quite boring to me. Despite my discomfort, I usually attend to appease my friends, but this year, I decided to stand up for myself and say I didn't want to go. However, my best friend (16f), that I've known since we were around 8/7, believes I refuse to go because ""Aparently I'm not her friend anymore at least I don't act like it"" and that ""I only hang out with my new friends"".

It's worth noting that my friend and I attend the same high school, but she's a year ahead due to different entry times. Last year, I've always invited her to hangout and spend time but most of the time she was busy studying, and I understood because the school was know for being really demanding from the students. That year I made new friends and grew closer to old ones at a way less demanding school. This year, upon entering her school, my schedule became chaotic, leaving weekends as my only free time. When I invited my friend to hang out, she often declined due to her own commitments, while my other friends were usually more available. As a result, I spent more time with them, unintentionally distancing myself from her. I hoped that at school we would see each other more, but she barely made and effort to see me there, I was the one to reach out many of the times. 

When I declined the party invitation. She accused me of neglecting our friendship, using my refusal as ""proof of it"" and it was in front of everyone, that made me embarrassed and uncomfortable, it wasn't the first time she made something similar and even though she used a ""joking"" tone I knew she was being serious and was angry. Despite explaining my discomfort with the parties, she insisted I attended. I somewhat understand why she's feeling like that specially considering her struggles with mental health and self-worth. While I empathize with her and understand that it difficult, I don't understand why she lashes out at me.

Though our friendship has become somewhat distant because we don't hang out as much and don't have as much time, I still love her a lot, I make an effort to see her when I can, but it's clear that she feels neglected and replaced. Am I being an asshole for not just going to the party just to get over with all this and maintain the peace?",AmItheAsshole
 for going through my friend’s texts ?,"I [17F] was with my friend [17F] while she was at basketball practice, I asked her if I could use her phone to entertain myself because I had forgotten mine. Me and her are pretty close and have known each other for a while now, but she’s friends with other people who don’t like me; and she lets me know when they talk poorly of me. A certain feeling was biting at me so I went searched for my name in her texts and found that she was talking about me behind my back to her other friends, and recently too. I’m on the curvier side but not like bulging with fat, but it’s still to the point where I get made fun of for it regularly and have struggled with an eating disorder she is well aware of. Many of the texts I found were of her making fun of my appearance with others and commenting on my size. I screenshotted everything i found, sent it to myself, and deleted the messages from her phone along with deleting the photos from her library and recently deleted so that I could keep the evidence and she wouldn’t know. I talked to her after practice about what I found and told her how much my deep trust in her was now extremely disturbed. she said she was talking about me in this way so that they would believe she didn’t like me and they would tell their unsavory thoughts on me to her so she could fill me in on those behind their backs. Later she said she was sorry that it was all her fault and that we should stay apart because it’s not fair for me to be friends with someone who treated me so horribly. I told her I’m willing to give her a second chance only if she honestly thought she could change. She said that she still wants to talk but maybe not be as close anymore. does going through her texts still make me an asshole if it uncovered something that was going on behind my back ? Am I the asshole ?",AmItheAsshole
 for agreeing to split the bill on a double date which ended in my best friend being dumped?,"Hi! I (22f) am really unsure here. My best friend and roommate (22f) Amiee had been seeing a guy for two months. She really likes him, it seemed to be going super well. 

Last night, she asked if I’d go along with a blind double date (ie. her and the guy she’s dating, me and one of his friends who is single and looking). I wasn’t keen at first but she insisted, so I agreed. 

We got to the restaurant, just a nice place in our area, and things seemed to be going fine. The friend she was “setting me up with” was cool, but I really am not looking right now and didn’t feel any kind of spark. 

We get to the end of dinner and the bill comes. Aimee chimes in and says “don’t worry, our men have got this” to which I say back, “ah, no I don’t mind”.
We’d had two cocktails each (all four of us) and it wasn’t a crazy expensive place but not cheap. 

A bit of back and forth happened, Aimee kept insisting it is always the gentlemen who pay, so I said something like, “you do you, I’m happy to split”. 

The guys were saying they would cover but both seemed uncomfortable. They paid, then we all left. Aimee and her boyfriend went back to his, I said good night to his friend and went home alone. Later, Aimee texted saying her man is now contemplating the relationship because he doesn’t want someone who always insists the men pay. She told me I ruined it by offering to split and should’ve sided with her, and not made things worse. She’s now saying he needs time and might not want to continue the relationship with her. AITA for this?

Update; thanks so much everyone for your thoughts on this one. Aimee still isn’t talking to me, you could cut glass with the tension in our place right now. She and the guy aren’t talking either. I’m trying hard here, but another week and maybe the friendship has run its course, honestly. Sensing a lot more underlying issues that can only come from communication, but hey.

Update; I’m now not a girls girl because I didn’t back her, without being told I should or given any kind of heads up. I responded that if I want to pay for myself (especially because I didn’t see myself and the blind date friend having a second date) was happy to put in for my portion. Friendship is effectively over, and I am looking to move out

Final update; Aimee is now trying to apologise because she can’t afford the rent on her own or get someone else to move in on such short notice. I feel horrible but know I need to be around supportive people, thanks again to everyone :)",AmItheAsshole
 for casually mentioning to my friend that I don't want to have a pet ever?,"Update 2: I mentioned how he was trying to bite and she went crazy on how I don not understand him. I don't think there is any fighting this. I will leave tomorrow and not intervene in this.  
  
Update: I have talked to her sister, she also shares the same concern as me but she is also shunned. Rach does not want to face the reality that she is not able to handle everything and therefore becomes defensive at even the slightest mention of the subject. We will tackle this slowly.

I(29F) am visiting my best friend Rach(29F) for three weeks, we have known each other for longer than a decade and have been close friends for a very long time. Last year, she adopted a Shih Tzu(Scoob) who was a month old with her flatmate(Anu, 29F). I thought it was a bad idea because A and R are not on good terms and a pup adoption when they are both looking forward to get married in a few years is a bad idea, I voiced it later on when Anu got engaged and Rach agreed with me.

Currently, the pup spends major time with Rach who acts like the sole parent, she cooks, gives him medicines, takes him on walks, doctor's appointments etc. She also pays for everything, including his grooming, appointments and food, arranges almost all the sitting.  
Since he has come in their lives, she does not go anywhere, has sidelined every hobby and interest and barely pays attention to herself. With a demanding job and no time, her place is always scattered and dirty as the pup pees and poops anywhere.  
Recently as the summers started Scoob has stopped eating as it gets extremely hot here, upto 45C(113F), and she does not turn the AC on. I forced her to keep the AC on today and then he drank something. We later also realised that he was bred and trained by a cruel breeder and has trauma therefore has a tendency to get angry and bite.

After seeing all this, I carelessly mentioned that I might not be cut out to be a pet parent. I did not mention the above reasons, I just said I can not understand pets and therefore would not what to do in any situation such as this. I also have a habit of making beds every morning and just clean everything up so I did that at her place and now she is pissed at me for judging her. I love both of them but I do not see how this is a great situation for them.  
I do think she loves him a ton and so does he. Should I have kept my mouth shut, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for having a heart-to-heart with my best friend over his monstrous new lover?,"My best friend (we'll call him Kevin) and I were hanging out at his place today after work. Kevin's hobby is restoring old motorcycles, so he was showing me his latest project out in the garage. Even though I'm not a gearhead myself, Kevin and I have known each other for 20 years, and I can still admire good workmanship when I see it. 

Anyway, when we were almost done, Kevin's new girlfriend (we'll call her Taylor) came out to the garage with all sorts of attitude. It was obvious that she had just gotten home from work, since she was in office attire, and I tried saying hi to her, but she kind of blew me off and walked back inside. Apparently, Kevin was supposed to have started dinner but didn't because he was talking to me. I decided to stop Kevin in the garage for a moment so that we could have a man-to-man discussion. I told him that his ex-girlfriend (we'll call her Kerry) would never have treated us this way and asked what he saw in Taylor. 

Kevin seemed annoyed and insisted that he and Taylor are happy and that she's ""better for him anyway."" Kerry was a bartender and was a lot of fun, but Kevin said that she was ""too immature"" and ""not someone he could settle down with."" I was stunned by Kevin's lack of self-awareness. Here he was, having dated so many women that he could be choosy, while I was here single for the last three years. Don't get me wrong, I'm happy for Kevin, but the man doesn't know how lucky he is. I suggested a compromise and said that if he's so good at getting women to date him, he should dump Taylor for being a bitch and find someone who's both mature and kind. 

Kevin gave me a scowl for a few seconds and said ""I think it's time for you to go."" Kevin had never been so blunt or so rude with me, and I think I hurt his feelings bad. I got in my car and left, but all of my text messages since getting home have gone unanswered. I told my roommate what happened, and he insisted that I was in the wrong. He also said that I should apologize to Kevin for what I said. I think it's such BS that I can't even go over to my friend's place and talk to him without his nasty girlfriend basically blaming me for being hungry. If you really think about it, without Kevin's hobby, we wouldn't have been in the garage in the first place. 

It just seems like everyone around me is all haughty and self-important all the time, and they can't stop and smell the coffee. I just want things to stop being so serious all the time, and I worry that pretty soon Taylor will try and prevent me from speaking to Kevin in her little psycho plot to destroy our relationship. I'm really feeling frustrated and upset by what happened. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting one of my friends be disrespected?,"(Fake names)
Joe- Tasha’s boyfriend
Tasha- the girl
Kevin- guy who openly likes Tasha

I am a college athlete. So I get out of practice earlier and I walk to my girlfriend’s car. As I am walking over there, I see Tasha sitting in Kevin’s car in the corner of the parking lot. I have known Joe for a while now. We’re not close friends, but we are friends. Kevin openly likes Tasha, and has been trying to get with her since August 2023. I send a pic of Tasha and Kevin in the car to Joe, and say “your girl is sitting in the car with another dude”. He responds, thanks me for telling him, and I forget about it. 

Just now, my girlfriend texts me, cussing at me that it’s not my place to do anything about that. I told her that if she was in public with another guy who openly likes her, I would want to know. She says “that doesn’t apply here, he doesn’t love her how you love me”. I said “how much they love each other has nothing to do with me, I’m just not letting someone openly disrespect my boys relationship like that”.

I have talked with a few people about this so far, and all of them believe I did the right thing by letting Joe know that his girlfriend and Kevin were disrespecting their relationship. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for limiting my roommate’s freedom?,"I (18 y/o female) have had tension with my college roommate since day one. We barely talk to each other and primarily communicate through text. Although I was upset by this initially, I got over it and accepted that she was going to be someone  only had to live with for a year. However, as the year went on, more and more little things began piling up, most regarding our differing sleep schedules. 

I am a morning person while she is a night owl. I have no problem with this, my one request is she does not disturb me while I am asleep as I do for her when I wake up early. I am aware that I am very sensitive to any noise or light when going to sleep and use a sleep mask and sound machine. I have been forced to purchase 2 new sound machines as she claims the noise keeps her up (soft rain sounds) and I now rely on a headband that plays sound but is not noise cancelling. 

The noises include letting the door slam in the middle of the night and in the rare mornings I sleep in, making coffee at two in the morning, slamming her drawers, blow drying her hair, typing on her laptop and making phone calls on speaker. I am not a confrontational person and rarely bring these topics up, but when I have (which has been quite a few recently) she somehow twists it on me or claims it is not her fault. For the door, she claimed it was industrial and no way to stop it from slamming. For her coffee she said it was her machine and she had a right to use it whenever she wanted. When she blow dried her hair (after I asked her to do it in the bathroom) she said she only dried the ends.

She has gone on to claim that there is a lot she has given up for me, including “rarely having her friends in the room” not being able to let her friends hang out in the room late at night when I am sleeping, and then claimed that she didn’t like me saying she slams the door because it makes her sound aggressive.

I get up early simply because I have early classes and work out in the morning and am as quiet as possible.

I feel as though I have done everything she has asked of me these past few months and feel somewhat guilty for limiting her freedom so I have to ask Reddit, AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 For asking my roommate for my bench back that I had to leave for a bit when I moved out?,"I moved out of my apartment where I sublet for 2 years, about a month ago. I had discussed with my roommate (who I subleased from) that I would not be taking my desk and that the new roommate could have it if they wanted it and it was a part of the FB listing for the room. There was also a bench and chair that I had made arrangements with friends to come get after I had already left. I was moving out of state and they couldn’t fit in my car. Chair was picked up but the bench wasn’t going to be able to be picked up for a few weeks as my friend was out of the country but the roommate understood that (at the time). 

When I texted asking if anyone would be home so that my friend could  finally pick up my bench, I was met with deference as ‘so much time has passed’, ‘I can’t ask the new roommate on such short notice’, and from the new roomie- ‘I need more of a heads up since I’m using it’.  Also that I had apparently left it with no intention of picking it up (I had multiple friends who knew I was coming back as well as text threads with friends  if they would be able to pick it up), but that my friend could come pick up the desk. While it had been a few weeks since I had moved out and had thought it could be picked up by, I had also not anticipated my roommate giving it to the new roommate or that it would even be an issue as it’s a small 3’ foot Ikea wooden bench that I was attached to. I hadn’t even said anything about the delay in getting my security deposit back (about 45 days  after I moved out).

I was able to have my friend pick it up last week after speaking directly to the new roommate and arranging ample time for her to move her stuff. She then sent a link with another bench as we had spoken about me helping her find a replacement. I had assumed that meant find a similar option. When I never responded, as she expected me to spend $75+ on a bench for her, she sent a whole paragraph about how inconvenienced she was by this and if I wasn’t going to help her that I just needed to let her know. I responded back that this whole thing was a miscommunication and that I didn’t feel as if I was responsible for replacing something that wasn’t supposed to be hers in the first place. She then responded back that it was unfair that she was told it was up for grabs and suddenly taken away and it was unfair, that I had used her room for storage, and that its wild for her to have to replace the whole thing on her own. She then called me extremely rude and inconsiderate to leave her hanging like this. I understand being told one thing and something else happens, but the OG roommate misunderstood and now I am getting heat for this. 

AITA for just wanting my bench back?

",AmItheAsshole
 for nit liking my friend?,"I (f27) have been friends with Cathy (f27) for nine years. We met in college and grew to become best friends over time. Cathy lived a hard life, but that never stopped her from being kind, sweet, honest, and strong. I admired her for that.  


Now I have a dislike for her that won't go away. 

  
Seven years into our friendship, she begins dating Mark (m29). I tried my best to like Mark for Cathy's sake. The more I got to know him and see his true colors, the more my dislike grew.  
Mark acts like those cringe Perky Mr. Nice Guys you see on a Disney Channel show and they secretly turn out to be the bad guy. Deep within that ""niceness"" is backhanded comments and loud mouth entitlement. The only person who's okay with that is Cathy. She likes that he's an asshole to everyone else but her.  
Her family, friends, and I certainly don't.  
If I listed every backwards and intellectually chauvinistic thing this guy has said/done, this thread would be five pages. Not to mention all the times he's emotionally manipulated Cathy into settling for his shit behavior with many ""I'm sorry""'s , followed with tears and his best behavior. Then he's back on his bullshit a few weeks later. The cycle repeats.  
As their relationship grew, the Cathy I knew and loved was changing (and not for the better). She has become rude, inconsiderate, nasty, and an all around stuck up human being.  
The worst part? Cathy is aware of her behavior and how wrong it is. She even said that to me. ""It's who I am."" She's taken comfort in it.  Her behavior and actions are making our friendship dull, dragging, and covertly toxic.  
It has gotten to the point where I made a pros and cons list. 1 PRO and 23 CONS is the verdict.   
I have tried giving Cathy many chances, but I just don't like her anymore. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I set a boundary with my sister?,"Hello, I (19) recently moved into my father's home because of a health decline. My sister(Mel 20) has always been living with one of our parents (she stays with our mom most days and our dad rarely and it is never consistent).  I take care of her dog when she is not here and we both share a room with our dads and we share a bunk bed(it's relevant). I have known that my sister is on and off with her motivation because of her mental health.

But since moving in I have been getting more of the picture because we share the same space now. but she doesn't pick up her clothing when removing them and just leaves them on the floor. She leaves her shoes everywhere and she leaves her makeup and snack wrappers and her stuff everywhere. 

Usually, I pick up after her because I want the space we both share to be clean for the both of us. I have done her laundry and made her bed and I have even put up her dirty dishes.

I have empathy and patience but she is rarely at my dad's and my breaking point was when today I came back from a trip and I saw clothing all over the floor and snack wrappers on my bed because I have the bigger one with more room I am assuming she was staying on it while I was gone. I have no problem with her staying in my bed but I just want her to pick up after herself especially since there's a tiny trash can in arm's reach. 

I just want to encourage her to keep the space clean without her flipping out because I have set a boundary with her. But my health will continue to decline due to treatments and I cannot risk a fall hazard especially since I won't be able to walk after I have surgery. I can understand mental health issues and not wanting to clean but she rarely is here and it seems like she does not even care that she is leaving her stuff on my bed and in my designated space.

I know if tell her to please pick up after herself she will immediately assume I am calling her lazy or a slob but I feel like she needs to hear it. WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling a veteran his only personality trait is Vietnam?,"I’m from a small town in the middle of nowhere. Not much interesting here, but we get a lot of truckers and road-trippers passing through. 



It’s a small village so everyone knows everyone. My uncle is a combat veteran and got a TBI in Iraq. He’s pretty debilitated from it, but as a family we try and get him out of the house and doing shit that he’s able to do. The locals all know him and help us out a ton. Most Saturdays we go down to a family friend’s dinner. These guys know my family well, owners went to school with my grandpa, their kids went to school with my uncles, and their grandkids went to school with me and my siblings. 



Yesterday it was me, my mom, my sister, and my uncle. I go up to the counter, there’s some guys eating breakfast there, whatever, and I pay the bill. My guy hands me back too much change, because he always tries to veteran discount us on every meal and I insist he takes it as a tip at least. 



Dude sitting at the counter, decked out in Vietnam veteran stuff, looks over his shoulder at my family then turns to my guy behind the counter and says, “you better ID that guy.



My guy looks at him and says “He’s a regular. He’s cool.”



Vietnam shrugs and says “it’s your money if you want to loose it.”



I was mildly annoyed at this point, so I said “my uncle is a veteran.”



He looks back again, snorts, and says “that guy?”



My mom was tugging my arm telling me to just sit back down and ignore him. But I said “yeah, that guy.”



My guy behind the counter is saying “I served with him, he’s legit.”



Vietnam holds up his hands in an oops gesture and says “welfare queens will say anything for a discount, you can usually tell by lookin at em.”



So I said “well at least his only personality trait isn’t Vietnam.”



He said “you wanna run that by me again son?”



My guy broke it up and got us both calmed down, Vietnam left, but I was ready to fight that guy. My mom wanted me to stop making a scene and I feel bad letting my anger get the best of me and ruin their Saturday breakfast. ",AmItheAsshole
 for publishing a poem about my mother in a contest,"   AITA for publishing a poem about my mother in a contest. Hello, so for a back story, I 21F, and my mother have never had a great relationship we always had issues. I was kicked out by the age of 14 and I lived with my grandmother ever since. 
      When I was 19 I started hanging out with this bad person let’s call him Frank. Frank and I got very close very quickly. He lived with me for 3 months. He had an issue with his drinking and I started drinking with him it was so bad I barely remember the three months he lived with me. My family cut me off which I understood I was very bad. But when I turned 20 I finally got out of my bad ways and cut Frank off. 
     I slowly got my relationship back with my siblings and my father. I talked to my mother then too. But a few months after my 20th birthday I got hurt. I didn’t start my bad habits again but I texted my mother and she flipped on me. She blamed me for what happened and she called me selfish and a lot more. She disowned me for something I went through. A few months after that I found out she had stolen my Christmas presents from her side of the family and used the money they gave me. I then found out she made fun of me for sleeping in my closet because I was scared to sleep in my room because of what happened to me in my room. She then tried to get my siblings to stop talking to me again but they told her no because I didn’t do anything wrong to deserve that. 
    I truly don’t know what I did wrong ever since I entered a poem I wrote about my relationship with my mother in a contest and I won a chance to publish a book of my poems about my mother since I have a lot I have written about her since I was kicked out at the age of 14. I feel bad because I don’t want to make her seem like a bad person so I ended up posting one on Facebook to see how people would respond to it and my mother saw it and flipped once again on me. I ended up not publishing my book which I regret in some ways but I didn’t want my mother to freak out on me for it. But besides that, I don’t know why she is acting like this. 
    Ever since she has been trying to make my life hard. She refuses to let me go to my sibling's birthday parties she won’t let my dad drive me to places like doctor appointments and stuff like that she also won’t let my dad truly talk to me. He has been hiding the fact he talks to me and when I’m on the phone with my siblings she always talks about me when she knows I can hear her. I just feel like my mother truly hates me for something that happened to me that I had no control over. Help AITA
",AmItheAsshole
 for not going to my sister’s graduation?,"My family lives in NH and my older sister (22F) is graduating next month. I (20F) currently reside in Florida and go to school full time. When I transferred schools and moved down to Florida, it was expected of me to be able to afford a trip back home to attend my sister’s graduation. 

For the first semester, I realized that the only way I would be able to afford going is by relying solely on my refund check as I don’t have time to work as I am busy with classes. With the price of being across the country, plus paying for my sister’s (18F) and my braces (about $310 a month) I quickly realized that I will be a couple hundred dollars short of the graduation. Because of this, I decided to wait on the next check and pay for the ticket immediately. 

During this time, life just happened. I told my family that I have a boyfriend and to my highly conservative mom, that became the topic of most conversations to eventually arguments. My mom was upset that I wanted to continue to go to school down in Florida and it has escalated to the point where my older sister and mom made the decision that I was not going to attend due to the discussions and how we aren’t getting along. So from that point forward, I simply put the money towards the braces bill and casual expenses for living across the country.

In the middle of March, my family and I started to get along and wanted me to come to the graduation. Upon looking at the prices, I saw that they have doubled and even tripled in price. From there, I sent my older sister screenshots of the prices and told her that I wouldn’t be able to attend due to not being able to afford it. I promised her that I would buy her a nice graduation gift and at the time she said it was okay because the prices were crazy. 

Fast forward to today, I have been disowned due to other outside circumstances. I pay for everything myself and my budget is tighter than ever. My mom and my older sister are upset that I won’t be at the graduation, stating that I should’ve had a job, had my boyfriend pay, or not have the braces bill. They are both upset that over the course of time, I haven’t been able to afford it stating that I “don’t care for the family” and that I am “selfish” for not going. 

I genuinely feel awful that I won’t be able to go. As an upperclassmen at my school and the nature of my major, I don’t have the time to do anything really for myself. There were times where I attempted to make some side hustles for some extra cash but it wasn’t successful. AITA for not going?

Edit: I forgot to mention but due to not being able to go, my mom said that I’m going to lose my family and that I will no longer receive any support. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my fiancé's grandparents that I don't put their actions on him?,"I (27f) have known my fiancé for 8 years now and we're getting married next year. He does not have a relationship with his mother anymore and his dad died when he was 6 years old. He had grandparents, aunts and uncles as well as cousins from his dad's side he was very close to and still is today. From his mother's side he only had grandparents that he still spoke to but he was not that close to them. During our relationship they did get closer because they validated my fiancé's bad experiences with his mom and they accepted that she did a poor job after his dad died and had really messed with my fiancé's head. 

My fiancé's mother had two additional children before he moved out of her house. She has a daughter who would be about 9 now and a son who would be 11 I think. I have never met them so I could be off by a year or two. My fiancé does not see these kids, he does not want to see them or have any contact with them. This was always something he was honest about. He never wanted to reconcile with his mother and would never be okay with anyone attempting to encourage that and he also had no interest in getting to know her children either now or in the future. I accepted that. His grandparents said they understood this.

But they were lying. After we got engaged his grandparents invited us over for dinner at their house and who was there? The kids. My fiancé was furious and the grandparents had already told them about my fiancé and the fact we were getting married. His half sister was super excited and had wanted to meet him for ages and was given the idea by the grandparents that she and her brother would be at the wedding. My fiancé demanded to speak to his grandparents and he told them they had crossed a line and could get themselves out of it because there was no way he was inviting the kids.

We left after this and his grandparents reached out multiple times to scold my fiancé and tell him he shouldn't take his issues out on the kids and he should embrace having siblings. His response was fuck biological ties and fuck the idea that he's going to accept any of his mother's additional children into his life because he doesn't care if they have a DNA connection or not.

After enough of these arguments and my fiancé blocking them they reached out to me and asked me how I could marry someone who would reject his own flesh and blood and two kids at that, one who had been so excited to meet him and be part of his life. They told me that should make me hate him to see him crush her the way he did. I told them I don't put their actions (telling the kids, bringing them to the house, setting us up) on my fiancé because he was always clear on this. They accused me of being heartless to innocent children I have no prior bad history with because I defend him. I shook it off but they really didn't like me blaming them and have since said I'm not only heartless but rude.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my brothers gf it's not okay to smoke while pregnant?,"So I (14f) hang out with my brother's (17m) girlfriend (18f) a lot, and recently she stared vaping and smoking weed infront of me. I wouldn't have a problem with this if she wasn't eight weeks pregnant. Everytime I see her she is smoking something either it be a vape/cigarette/weed, and I have started telling her it's wrong and not good for the baby. She always tells me it's okay and nothing will happen, because her mom did that with her siblings. My brother knows but I don't think he's doing anything about it, and everytime I tell her it's wrong she tells my brother that I was being rude and trying to control her. So AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for denying my boyfriend unlimited access to my vape? ,"This is really embarrassing but here we go. I’m 27F, he is 31M. 

My boyfriend and I live together. I pay rent, half of the bills, and he owns the home and pays a higher percentage of the mortgage payment. I also buy groceries for both of us. We both vape nicotine - yes I know, it’s a terrible habit that I am trying to quit but for now, the issue:
whenever I tell my boyfriend that I’d rather he didn’t hit my vape so much, it becomes a huge fight and he begins berating my character because he thinks I should share everything with him unconditionally. I don’t think this is fair, as I share literally every other thing without question, and I think when I use something of someone’s I either offer to buy them more or simply don’t “take advantage” or their kindness and abuse the situation. For example if I use a lot of his face wash, I’ll buy a new one and we both use that one until it’s finished. 

Side note: I don’t think everything in a relationship needs to be tit for tat by any means, I am only saying this because he made me feel as though I don’t contribute enough and should just let him hit the vape whenever he wants to. 

Around October of last year, I quit for about a month and he stopped for a few weeks as well. He purchased dokha (tobacco) to smoke out of a pipe instead so that he would only hit it at home rather than having a constant source of nic nearby. When I started buying disposables again, he began hitting mine while we were at home or out/ in the car together. 

I didn’t mind sharing at first, but I began to get annoyed because he never purchased himself a vape ever again (he also has a reusable that he could buy juice for but anyway). It’s been about 6 months that he will consider my vapes, *our* vapes essentially, and I’ve asked him why he doesn’t just repurchase juice or one for himself. His response: he doesn’t want to do that. On two occasions he’s offered to give me a few dollars to hit it unconditionally but I said no. 

I really just want to feel that if I say no, it can be respected. Things got out of hand tonight when this all came up again, and after I’d said no he asked me if this is really the kind of person I am, and  that he could find someone he “operates better with” and basically asked me to leave tonight. I tried to stay calm because this has happened before and I figured he was just angry and would apologize later. I asked if this is really how he felt and he said yes and that he needed to think about things. 

I waited a bit and then called him while he was out and asked if he was serious about me moving out etc but he doubled down saying that he doesn’t have this much friction with anyone else in his life and thinks this wouldn’t be an issue with someone else. This hurt. We’ve been together for almost 7 years. 

Now I’m wondering if maybe I should just share with him unconditionally. Am I the asshole for not letting him use my vape whenever he wants to? He says he pays more for the house, which is true.

",AmItheAsshole
 for not cleaning my mom’s house after she paid me $200?,"
I (24F) was kicked out of my Moms house last year and have been living with my boyfriend since. My mom is planning on buying the house she’s been renting for the past 11 years which has obviously been a stressful process as she’s coming up with the down payment. She wanted the house cleaned for the appraisal to try to get it as high as possible so she paid me $200 3 weeks ago to clean up the basement I used to live in that hadn’t been cleaned since I was kicked out.
 I agreed to clean and came over on a Friday night after work where I dusted the entire basement, threw out 4 trash bags worth of stuff and cleaned the cat box that was downstairs. By the time I was done with all that, it was already dark out and I had to go home to take care of my dogs and feed them dinner. I told my mom the only task left to do was to vacuum and mop the floor in the common area and vacuum and clean up in my old room. 
I was planning on dog sitting for my mom the following weekend (unpaid) as she was going to visit my sister so I agreed to finish vacuuming and mopping when I came over again. The very next day she called me and was very upset that I didn’t “finish the job” and my mom ended up vacuuming and mopping herself. The rest of the week my phone was being blown up by my mom calling and texting me daily that I “never help her” and that I wasn’t doing enough to help her. The weekend finally rolls around after dealing with her texts all week and I stayed at her house for a day and a half to watch over her 3 dogs and 4 cats and continue to clean. Before I got there I went an hour out of my way to a tractor supply to get dewormer because she requested I deworm the animals. I bought $50 worth of dewormer with my own money for all the animals and got clawed to shit deworming all the cats. While I was there, I fed the animals, cleaned the cat boxes, scrubbed the backyard bricks with natures miracle (since they smelled like piss and she requested I do so) and cleaned out another 2 trash bags worth of shit from her house. 
This apparently still wasn’t enough. This weekend my mom asked me to come over to help move laundry machines from her garage to the street as well as vacuum and clean out even more crap. I was happy to help her out but the entire week leading up to this weekend, she had held the fact that she already paid me and the job “wasn’t done” over my head. 
When I woke up this morning I had a 4 paragraph text from my mom that “I hadn’t finished the job” and that I needed to be at the house before 6 pm. This would have been fine if she asked me nicely. A simple “what time are you coming over?” Would have sufficed but instead she wrote 4 paragraphs stating I didn’t do a good job the first time and needed to make up for it. I told her I wasn’t comfortable with the way she was talking to me and it devolved into me telling my mom I’m not coming over anymore to help her. AITA for not helping her clean even after she payed me $200?",AmItheAsshole
 For Not Sending My Sister Money? ,"My sister has been dating a guy for a while now, both me and my family knows that he is a real shithead. My sister has been living with him for almost 1 year now. We started to notice about 1 month ago that he takes her money. She works full time but still has no money for food or clothes. Now when she askes us to send her money I am starting to feel that it is just money to her boyfriend. So i stopped, and said that I will send more money when she moves away from him. 

Now she thinks that AITA here since I stoppen paying HIM money and she is saying that she has no food. 

In the end I feel really bad since I can see that she has lost a lot of weight and my other sisters are sending her money but it feels like I need to be the first person that sets my foot down. 

We havent spoken in about 2 weeks time. 

  
AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 Grad School Funding,"I’m a grad student in a program here in the US. Each summer, we (the students) have to apply for summer funding. This funding is competitive and is contingent on you not having funding from another, external organization. 

Today, talking to my friend, they revealed that they had been awarded two lines of funding (both teaching and research). They then revealed they also had external funding from another organization and they had no intention of revealing this to our department. 

I was furious. I had been denied funding the week before because I had disclosed that I had applied (and not received) external funding. Now my “friend” is gloating about receiving 3 sets of funding over the summer. 

I was in a quandary over what to do, however, ethically, I felt I had to tell the summer funding coordinator who was pretty concerned. Did I do the right thing here? I feel absolutely terrible now. ",AmItheAsshole
 for thinking my partner is prioritising money? ,"I (F33) live with my partner (M34) of 4 years, we live in the house he owns and have done for 2 years. He works away he's back most weekends usual gets home Friday lunch and leaves again Sunday evening. 

When I moved in I was already saving for a deposit and we agreed that me moving in shouldn't hinder my ability to save. So we agreed my rent to him would cover all bills but not contribute to his mortgage. 

I was in the process of buying a house up until a week ago where it fell through due to survey valuation issues the seller wasn't willing to negotiate on at all. The plan was for us to move into where I buy and he's rent his out. Plan for us to keep our own is because although we've been together for 4 years, because he works away the amount of time we've spent together is alot less than most who have been together this amount of time. So offers us both a level of security we're both happy with. And in this case I'd be happy to manage the rental for him, being point of contact for issues and arranging workmen where needed. 

Anyway onto the issue he's changed jobs and he will be away more and will be away for months at a time rather than just during the week. He doesn't pay for any expenses whilst he's away, that's covered by the company. He feels it's not fair for him to work away for so long and pay a mortgage on a house he doesn't get to enjoy. He's told me he's not willing to wait for me to buy somewhere else, so he wants me out so he can rent the house out now. Which means I either rent my own smaller place or move in with parents until I do buy. 

I always said when I moved in if we needed to amend my rent payments we could reopen the discussion. But he wants the full mortgage being paid off whilst he's away, which if I did, I wouldn't be able to continue to save towards a deposit. The house is bigger than anything I could but myself. For context it's not like he can't save himself with our current set up he saves 30%+ of his take home as it is. 

I told him this makes me feel like he's prioritising money over me and our relationship. He was the one who suggested the rent I pay. I've also helped by decorating, maintenence, getting furniture etc through my time here. I feel like this is purely money oriented from his side. Whereas I feel like this would be forcing me from my home of 2 years, and that I'm being punished for picking a job/career that allows me to live and work in the same place. As if he wasn't going away for so long he wouldn't be thinking about doing this. 

Am I the asshole for telling him he's prioritising money over our relationship? ",AmItheAsshole
 if I threatened my mom with proof of her mortgage fraud?,"Hi Reddit! I’m an amateur poster, so please bear with me. For a plethora of reasons, mainly for my own sanity, I won’t go into a crazy amount of detail on how it happened, but my mother committed mortgage fraud about 17 years ago. Now, that really should be none of my business because I was a child when this happened but lo and behold, she committed felony by buying a house in my name and then failing to make mortgage payments on it, or HOA payments, and getting multiple liens and a foreclosure in my name. 

It’s always been talked about, but I recently using the internet, found actual legitimate proof that this house was in my name. I immediately downloaded all the documents I could find, went onto the county website, and even found her signature, but in my name on lots of documents. My mom has super specific handwriting, so it was obvious it was her signature. 

I’ve kept all this for about two years now as kind of an ace up my sleeve if she did anything I couldn’t handle. As you can imagine, a woman that would buy an entire house in their child’s name, and lie about it for close to two decades is not a rational or nice person. 

Recently, i’ve gotten really close to paying off a massive car loan that is in my name and hers. This car loan was taken out when I was barely 18, for a stupid high percentage of interest, for a car that has quickly depreciated in value and that I don’t really like but that’s not relevant. since the car is in both of our names, she has been threatening to get it towed and take it back to the dealership If I don’t do what she asks of me. She’s threatened to report it stolen, to just go pick it up and take it with her because it’s legally half hers as well. It’s been a lot.  I’m truly considering letting her know that I have these documents and telling her to back off so I can have some peace back. Unsure how well it would work, but I’m desperate and just trying to live my life. So… WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
 for “overreacting” with my mom,"So basically my mom said that we are gonna go shopping to go to the mall and whatnot. And then she said we’re going to go to the gym and I was like ok you should’ve said that earlier but as long as we go to the mall. It is 6:45 when we leave the house and my mom says we’ll be back by 8, even tho she knows it’s not possible. 

When we are done it’s past 8:30 and I got mad because it was not what she promised. I was like can we go to the mall, and I put in the address. And then going, I get mad and said why did you say we were gonna be back at the house at 8 even tho we are leaving the gym at 8:30. She made the excuse that she was talking to someone. 

When I told her my feelings she told me to stop fighting and screaming even though she was the one who was screaming and kept repeating the same thing even tho i didn’t say anything after that. She told me we we’re going home, and when we were arguing she tried to bring up other unrelated points just to make herself look better even tho she knew she was in the wrong. I was visibly upset and somehow crying because she had lied to me and didn’t want to hear what I had to say and gave me the silent treatment. 

When i got home, a few days she said she would give me five bucks if i had vacuumed the house. So i did. and the last room i had to do was her office. It was already messy but I was so mad so i vacuumed the place and made a “mess” even tho she said she would clean the floor today. She saw it and got mad, but I apologized and then cleaned it again. Then she did not give me the five dollars at all. I know it’s not much but it really hurt to not have her listen to what i have to say and i started bawling my eyes out and i don’t even know why. AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 for calling her out? ,"
AITA? for context i am currently 35 weeks pregnant with my 1st child and my mom and i have always had a relatively close relationship but it seems that ever since i became pregnant that she’s no longer really my friend? i am an adult and engaged to be married so i don’t think she’s upset about the baby but every time i try to vent to her it just turns into a huge lecture/lesson. 

for example- my dad is a drug addict and has recently took a turn for the worse (they’re divorced) and my younger sister and i don’t get along anymore (we used to) and i made a comment to my mom about how i wish my sister and my dad could attend the shower and be there for this huge moment in my life and she came back basically saying that i sounded ungrateful for all of the people that are there for me (mind you i never said that i was ungrateful and am so blessed for all of the support that we do have) but i just wanted to vent and she just shut it down immediately and made me feel like my feelings weren’t valid. 


another example and the reason i’m writing this post is because i was pretty annoyed with my husband who was out fishing for the 3rd time this last weekend instead of helping me finish our to do list and i mentioned it to my mom (i will admit that i was pretty upset with him and did send a pretty snarky text to him while he was fishing that i told her about and i understand i probably should have kept our argument private but i just wanted someone to talk to) and she told me that i shouldn’t nag him and when i pushed back and told her that i didn’t feel it was fair that she said that and tried to explain my side of the story she basically told me “you’re probably not very fun to live with” and “keep it up and see how long your relationship lasts” and made comments that i was “screaming” and my husband? and all i was trying to do was just vent. she vents about her husband to me all of the time and i always just offer an ear to listen and let her get it off her chest. 

she also told me today that i am selfish “you’re not the only one in the room and one day you’ll learn that” and that she has more wisdom and life experience than i so she just knows best. i tried to tell her how she made me feel and it just kept turning into lecture after lecture so i just stopped responding. i have been up all night crying and i just don’t know if i’m crazy and just being extra sensitive or what? 

my husband and i aren’t even upset with each other anymore and we seriously resolved the tiff in about 30 minutes and i did apologize to him about sending the snarky text but for some reason she feels very strongly that i was mean to him? he even feels that she is being weird/snarky about all of this and agreed that it wasn’t that serious. 

i just feel like everything that i say/have said this pregnancy she just invalidates by saying things like “that’s tough” or “that’s just the way it is. we all go through it” and i really just want to hear “i understand how you feel.” AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting a collegue come with us to an event,"Hello,

I m28 have had a difficult time lately due to my relationship, which has now turned into a long-distance one, and a serious illness affecting my mother. However, during this period, a good friend w25 of mine, who also works in the same company but in a different department, and whom I have known for more than a year, has been very supportive.

As a token of appreciation, I've gifted her a ticket to an event that we both will be attending, and she's very excited about it. Recently, she went out to eat with a colleague from my department, \~m32 years old. This was the second lunch they've had, and neither she nor I have any personal connection with him. However, I get along well with him since we share similar interests. She told him about the event, and after I returned from lunch, he immediately messaged me asking if he could join us.

I've chatted with my friend about it, and neither of us wants that because we prefer to go alone together, and we haven't even told our close circle of friends about it. Now, I'm very likely going to message the colleague explaining my background and that the ticket is seen as a gift, and I would like to attend the event with her alone. AITA for not letting him join us?

",AmItheAsshole
 For Making My Kids Spend Time Together?,"I (42f) have two kids: 15F Mia and a son 14M Marcus. Marcus *had* a girlfriend (15F) ""Courtney"" who is one of Mia's friends.

Long story short, Marcus and Courtney broke up a week or two ago because Courtney started dating one of my daughter's male friends, who were supposedly ""Barely acquainted"" before they started dating. When my son found out, he started to actively avoid Mias everywhere because he believes my daughter set them up together while he was dating his gf, even though my daughter swears she didn't intervene or was involved in anything.

Up until now, they've still been being pretty hostile to each other, and as any parent, I don't like seeing my kids fight, so I've been considering taking them both out for activities they would have to do together, or be within a 5 meter radius of each other. My husband (who's also trying to solve the issue, but taking and addressing both sides) says ""it won't work"" because it will just pull them apart. And as time passes, if we can't do much about it, the situation will solve itself.

WIBTA? I'm posting for some judgement on my possible actions",AmItheAsshole
 for skipping my best friend’s graduation for an important competition?,"So back story my friend is graduating college in May and had told me the date months ago and I told her I’d be there of course.

I do jiu jitsu and I compete regularly and seriously since I want to one day become a world champion. The world championship is end of May. It is really important for me to compete prior to get more experience and keep up the momentum leading up to worlds.

I have a competition beginning of May but there will only be one fight so it won’t be a good tournament for experience. (Usually there are 4-5 fights at Worlds so an ideal tournament would give me 3 for good preparation)

There is a bigger competition that is 2 weeks before Worlds in the middle of May that I had planned to do I just never checked the dates because they don’t release the exact dates for a while. I checked and it’s the weekend of my friend’s graduation…

This competition would be really great for me because I would get two or three fights. I know my friend will most likely be upset when I tell her I want to go to the competition. But I feel like it’s an understandable excuse. It’s not like I’m just skipping because I feel like it.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I make my friends pay me back,"So the other night me and my friends got super crossfaded and decided to DoorDash. We ordered from a local pizza restaurant a 14” Large pizza, Buffalo wings, and Pepsi. The total after tip and delivery/service fee came to 70 dollars. At the time I wasn’t focused on the price - didn’t notice it and didn’t mention it. It was split between 3 of us. It’s been a couple days and I go to check the price so they can pay me back what they owe. I texted in our groupchat and one of my friends said she didn’t know it was gonna be that expensive. So I’m wondering WIBTA if I made them pay me back $23 since I didn’t mention the price and double check with everyone before placing the order?

EDIT: forgot to mention that when we were placing the order everyone did agree to pitch in to pay",AmItheAsshole
 in this conversation about privilege?,"My girlfriend (26F) and I (28M) are both student researchers. Some background: growing up, I lived with my uncle who was an academic researcher himself while my girlfriend did not grow up around academicians and has worked really hard to be in the position that she is today. 

During one of our conversations, she mentioned to me that a senior PhD student was asking her for guidance regarding a summer school application which my girlfriend had successfully completed last year. In response, I mentioned to her that these applications are very challenging and she should definitely help the senior student. I told her that I recently had to submit a bunch of similar applications and couldn't find many helpful resources myself.

My girlfriend did not like my response and mentioned that these two situations are not the same. She felt that I was being blind to the immense academic privilege I have had by growing up around academicians and that I was simply trying to sound relatable to someone who probably did not have the same resources as me growing up. 

*EDIT: I think it is important to mention that my girlfriend would've helped the senior student anyway even without my comment. I have no doubt about it. The question was mostly about whether I come off as being blind to privilege if I tell her that I faced a similar problem. *

AITA?  I believe I would've definitely been wrong had I said that it's not a big deal and she shouldn't worry about helping the senior student. Because then, I wouldn't be taking into account the academic advantage that I have had. But to me it seems like I was just asking her to help the student and was giving her additional context that even I (someone that she knows, and also knows that I love doing applications) had a lot of trouble with a similar application. 

Sorry if this question is too specific, or if this is not the right sub. I told my girlfriend that I will think more about this situation and seek perspective from other people. Any advice is appreciated :)


",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to give up my bedroom?,"okay so basically I think this is unbelievably stupid but I am being ganged up on in my house at the minute so I thought I'd ask for reddits unbiased opinion. 

I (21M) live in a shared student house with 4 other people. 

the house has 3 floors, the ground floor has the front door (obviously), my bedroom, a bathroom and the communal kitchen and living room space. 

each of the other two floors have two bedrooms and a bathroom. Everyone in all of the other bedrooms has to share a wall with someone else and they also have a bedroom directly above or below them.

I definitely have lucked out with my bedroom, on the floor directly above my room is a hallway so I dont have to worry about upstairs neighbour behaviour, there's no one below me so I can be loud and I share a wall with a bathroom that no one but me ever uses. 

the thing is tho even tho I love my bedroom, the reason why I have it is because I lost a coin toss because no one wanted to sleep on the ground floor or near the communal areas bcs they thought we'd use them a lot more/a lot more loudly than we actually do rather than just coming in and out. 

there's a lot of hostility in my house because my housemates want to take my bedroom away from me and instead want to have a competition every week and whoever does the most chores gets to sleep in the bedroom for a week, which I think is very impractical and stupid. They say its unfair I get the room in the quietest part of the house while being allowed to be as loud as I want, also basically having an en suite because it's right next door and also occasionally I have slept in the communal living room and they think it's unfair I can do that because it's so close to me. also my bedroom is the biggest bedroom in the house, it's only very marginal. 

they especially think this is unfair because they are all doing academic degrees where they have early lectures and need quiet to study and I'm doing an fine art degree where I blast music to zone out while I finish my projects. The thing about that though is the only people they are disturbing are each other and if they weren't so loud it wouldn't be a problem, I'm not disturbing them. 

I've been bribed to give up my room, been robbed of my stuff by my housemates occasionally, been both ignored and yelled at irl and in the house WhatsApp group, had my food in the communal kitchen hidden and chucked away, all in an effort to get my bedroom. 

so aita for refusing to give up my bedroom?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my older brother use my computer?,"So, my (f14) older half brother (m34) is currently trying to apply for jobs because his current job is in his field but not at the level he wants to be at. However, the applications for what he's trying to apply for (a paramedic firefighter position, what our dad did for 26 years) requires the resume to be made and the application filled out through Microsoft word. My brother has a macbook that doesn't have word, and his wife has the same thing. My dad doesn't have a computer and my mom has another macbook. 

But my dad (m58) got me a gaming laptop for christmas and I absolutely love it. I use it for everything and prefer it to using my phone whenever possible so most of my friends (both online and irl) message me through discord and i'm a part of a few servers. because it's a gaming laptop, it runs on windows. So because of this, my dad wants to let my brother use my laptop to fill out his application and resume. 

but the thing is, i dont have the full version of word and only have the (currently unused) free trial available that i've been saving for a day when i need it for a school assignment or college application or something. but him using my free trial isn't even my main issue. my main issue is that when my brother comes over to use my computer, it's probably going to be while i'm at school and cant be sure that he's only accessing that one part of my computer. 

i think it's also important to note that i barely know my brother. he's twenty years older than me and he's only ever lived in the same city as me in the past year. we do not have the same bond as i do with my sister. if it has been her asking, i wouldve just silenced my discord notifications so she couldn't see my texts pop up but otherwise leave it alone. but with my brother i am not nearly comfortable with him to let him have unfiltered access to my laptop and all of my files, search history, texts, and everything else. 

but when i told my dad this he told me i was being an asshole and i needed to let my brother borrow my laptop because he's family and has been going through a rough patch. so, aita?",AmItheAsshole
 if I complained about the neighbor's motorcycle?,"Not sure if I would be the asshole/entitled person/Karen if I complained about the loud motorcycle next door....

For context, I live on the second floor of a 2-family house.  I have a back porch and a back yard.  Next door to me there is a side-by-side duplex.  In that duplex, the closest to me is a family that I am neighborly with.  On the other side of them is a family that owns several cars and two Harleys.  The Harleys have very loud pipes.

When I am in the back yard, the decibel meter on my phone registers 85 decibels, and higher when they rev their engines.  When I am upstairs on my back porch, the dB reading is 75-80.  What bothers me is not the sound when they get on their bikes and drive away - I am bothered when they turn on the bikes and just let them run.  This morning, one of the guys turned on his bike and went inside letting it run for 5 minutes.  Sometimes, they turn on the bikes, then blast the radio so they can hear it over the noise of the bike, and proceed to rev the engines.  The noise is overwhelming.

I know their next door neighbors hate this, and the smell of the exhaust comes in their windows because of the parking allocation.  They are afraid of an altercation so don't say anything.

I don't want to go through another summer where I feel that I can't read a book in the back yard, or sit peacefully on my back porch.  I am considering complaining to their landlord.  Would that be an asshole thing to do?  I know their landlord is responsible and responsive, so it might be a solution, but I don't want to be a Karen about this.

Edited to add....  Definitely feeling like those who are saying I should have a conversation with them before escalating are probably right.  I will try to do that.  Thanks, all!",AmItheAsshole
 for misinterpreting my friend for being mad?,"(Apologies for all the wrong grammar, spelling, and if some parts doesn't make sense in advance)

I would like to put some context before I begin. I live in a country that speaks many dialects.

Recently, I had this friend (lets call them, Wendy's) in a friend group which one would say is an nonchalant type of person. We only met for 2 years and only had been close for 6 months at best. I do love their nonchalant personality, but sometimes it can be quite difficult to distinguish from sarcasm, information, or any type of personality.

The problem started a few hours ago where me and a few of my friends are talking about a graduation ball that was happening.  Another friend of ours told me that one of hairpiece of a costume was perfect for the theme, I told them it very much did. That same friend sarcastically said ""I would wear a wig to that event"" (the friend was talking about a costume wig, the colourful ones). Now Wendy replied with ""Ew"" and ""who wears that kind of wig to a graduation ball"" They meant who wears a colourful wig to a ball that's not costume themed. Now this is the part where it gets a bit confusing.



I replied to Wendy saying ""NO??"".   When I said 'NO' I wasn't trying to disagree with them, in fact I was agreeing with them (Its not the English no, but an agreeing exclamation in my language, that's just how I spell it). Wendy probably misinterpreted this because they then replied why would I agree on something like this. I then tried to clear things out by saying that I didn't disagree with them but in fact agreed. They then argued back saying if I were to agree on something I would say No, adding "" are you okay?"" and ""Nice vocabulary"" . I didn't wanna say things anymore cause to me, it seemed like they were mad, so I just said ""fine, ill say 'right' next time"" and ""why are you mad at such small things"" (kind of a bad move tbh).  Turns out they weren't mad and were just ""clarifying"".  I feel like I wasn't in the wrong since Im confused on the way they texted. It was literally like someone was mad at you. But in the same time I feel like Im in the wrong since I shouldn't have said so much gibberish in the first place. Tbh, I don't know what to say nor do, I wanna be friends with them because I enjoy their company but it seemed like I'm already making an enemy of them.  AITA??

(I can clarify things if there's questions, I don't really know how to put other informations here",AmItheAsshole
 for looking for the person who left their dog in the car?,"To set the scene, the sun was setting, it was 65ish degrees. I know it's not extreme temperatures, but were on a busy street, car was off and windows were all up.  
I did not see who they were or where they went into, I just saw the dog in the car for hours. The dog was pacing around the car periodically, but wasn't in distress to my knowledge. During my shift I called the non emergency line, just to ask them if it was safe for the dog. They said they didn't know, couldn't help. So, after my shift I walk over to the business across the street &amp; ask two ladies walking out if that was their car. they say no, and I explain the situation to them. They go in and ask if that was anybody's car, and a woman comes out. She is immediately aggressive, asking me who the fuck I am, saying they do this all the time, the dog is safe. I didn't get to explain myself, I just walked away because I didn't want things to escalate.  
I just wanted to make sure someone was coming to claim this dog at the end of the day. I work by a busy street, someone could of crashed into their parked car. There's tons of apartment buildings. God forbid someone was going to leave the small dog in the car all night, like they forgot about it or didn't care enough to bring it in. I was worried, I don't know if im the asshole in this situation. I think I embarrassed her and she got aggressive because of that, IDK. AITA? I think I could be the asshole because it wasn't extreme temperatures and the dog wasn't panting or frantic, and I possibly overreacted?",AmItheAsshole
" for getting up and saying ""I don't like you attitude"" when my mom said another girl could have my clothes without my permission?","Hi reddit, this is my first post here, and mind you this just happened (I'm currently crying while writing this).

For context, I (20F) always had clothes that were given to me by others, that really saved my mom (40F) when I was younger, and even when older I never minded having another people's clothes nor giving mine away, but this time it was different...

My mom has a goddaughter (17F) that I always gave my clothes away to, and I'm friends with her, because we have a lot in common and she had my body type, so my clothes always fit her.

Earlier today my mom saw my old denim vests and asked if I would give them away to her goddaughter, I said ""she doesn't have the dripp to wear these"" and I thought she understood because she didn't ask again. The day passed almost too smoothly.

At dinner time the family of her goddaughter came to dine with us, and everything was fine, untill my mom called her to go into the room and asked her if she liked my clothes and proceeded to put my favorite denim vest on the girl and said she could keep it. I snapped, I got up and looked straight at my mom and said ""I don't like your attitude"", she gone ""what?"", and I repeated and said I didn't give her permission to do so. The girl took of my clothes and gave it to me with an awkward smile.

I entered the room where my mom was and she said I humiliated in front of everyone, I told her it wasn't right to just give my things away and she proceeded to tell me she expected me to use those denim vests every day from now on as an punishment. Then she got out of the room and everyone acted as if nothing happened. 

They left our home, and my mom didn't talk to me until my dad brought everything up and gave a speech about respect and how he was sad about how I handled the situation. He was already late for work and said he expected us both to apologize to each other.

I told my mother how much these clothes meant to me, how they were my style, my mark, back in the day. She doesn't get it, she argued that I don't use them anymore and how they don't fit me ( an common topic nowadays, about my weight, I don't have to tell the whole thing, you get it ).

I just started crying and she left the room saying ""I'm done, this is not the first time you've embarrassed me in front of others"" (another whole different story that I already apologized for) and ""I left it alone, and I will from now on, I don't care anymore, I treated you right, I cared about you, and that's what I receive"".

My brother tried to stay with me and understand me, but my dad didn't let him, so I had no option but to talk about it with my boyfriend. And she's there, on the kitchen, talking with my brother, like if I don't exist.

My boyfriend says that I should get another job and be gone from home more often or just move in with him. He knows a lot of what I've been going through, he's my light actually.

I can't face her, I can't afford the courage to apologize now. I don't know what to think or do anymore.

*Edit* If anyone want to hear more about it I'll do an update on my private page. Thanks to you all.",AmItheAsshole
 for not playing sports with my brother?,"My little brother who’s 12 has been bugging me lately, her 17 year old sister, to play sports with him. We live a few miles from where his closest friends live in a rural area. He used to play sports with our dad and would have been 15 year old brother, but they left us from a horrible accident at the end of last year. So anyway, he really wants to play basketball, football, soccer, or anything really. But I have zero interest in sports and I suck at all of them. My brothers would make fun of me whenever I played with them and they would always play rough. 


So he bugged me again yesterday to play basketball with him and I said why not video games instead, since that’s his other hobby and one I can tolerate. But he said I sucked at that too and it’s not fun to play video games with me. My mom told me to just stop being lazy and go play basketball with him. So I go play with him. I told him shooting games only so he can’t be rough on me. He beat me pretty badly in every shooting game and again said I sucked and needed to practice more with him. I said that’s not happening and he should just find some friends nearby to play sports with. He’s kind of shy.",AmItheAsshole
 for yelling at my sister &amp; brother in front of her friends,"Lots to unpack but basically my sister &amp; brother were talking shit in the kitchen to me because I don’t party or “have fun” while I was washing the dishes for them. I do not live with my mom (Their home) but I visit once and a while to see my younger sisters. I basically told her “When are you going to get your head out of your ass? You’re 22 already and still haven’t finished CC and you’re dodging work to party. You’ve also only made a $20 payment on a $1,900 American Express credit card that she’s an authorized user of mine to pay for her festivals or events. I basically ended with telling her “when do you plan on becoming a doctor, when you’re 35 and done partying?”.

My sister works for my ex girlfriend’s dad who is a Dentist and we still talk every once and a while. She aspires to become one and wants to live the boujee opulent live in Orange County. I’m just upset because my sister and brother are the complete opposite of me. They’re both very entitled and my mom doesn’t help. My mom gets upset because my sister literally works and parties and doesn’t clean a thing, along with my brother who has been home for 8 months now since he’s been released as a Marine who you couldn’t pay $1,000 a day to keep the home clean. My mom just lets them slide and be unaccountable. ",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing a coworkers gift of used housewares?,"So I (30F) recently eloped with boyfriend, well now husband (39M). We purchased a home on the lake in a new subdivision and it is truly our dream home. We had closed on our house about a month prior to the elopement so we already had moved our belongings in and purchased anything else we needed and sold any other belongings that we had in each of our apartments since the leases were up or almost up. 

Once some of my coworkers found out we had eloped, they wanted to throw me a shower. I politely told them I was perfectly fine with having a little party to celebrate but no gifts. When asked why no gifts I told them honestly didn’t need anything. Typically in my area when a wedding shower or housewarming party is thrown people gift toasters or sets of dishes etc. Our home is furnished. We both have successful jobs. “No gifts or monetary gifts please. But we would love to celebrate with you. Your presence is the only gift we want.” That was basically the conversation. And it was received well. The party happened and all went well. 

Yesterday a coworker who had not came to the party randomly showed up at our home. I am not close with this person. We actually try to avoid each other most days. Anyways, she arrived at our home with 3 large black trash bags that contained used houseware items from her home. She said she “knew it was hard when you are first starting out” and thought these items could help us “while we get on our feet”. She also made a comment about how she was going to have a garage sale but would rather just give them to someone who needed them. 

I told her I really appreciated the thought but that we were settled and maybe she should take her items give them to someone who needed them because we were on our feet. She said I was just  being modest. She ended up refusing to tell me how she got my address and also refused to take her “gifts” back with her. I told her we didn’t need her items but if she wanted to leave them I would be happy to donate them for her. She said I was being rude. She did leave the bags though and I am taking them to a local consignment store that sells items and uses the money to help survivors of domestic violence. 

AITA?

UPDATE: HR was miraculously able to see me this morning. She also found the address issue concerning. I work in Healthcare and I am also a patient where I work. Everything you access within our system is logged. So when they pulled her access records it turns out my coworker had accessed my medical records 5 times within a week. It was never within her job duties to access my file. She had also accessed 2 other coworkers files. They terminated her employment on the spot. Within our company (and I would imagine most) that is grounds for immediate termination. Her sister in law is also an employee there and she had accessed my records as well. Her employment was also terminated. Now I’m wondering if I need to seek legal action or even get a restraining order? My husband donated the items this morning. He said he didn’t want them in the garage any longer than necessary. I had read him the comment about the items possibly having bugs or being bugged and now we are both paranoid. ",AmItheAsshole
 for cutting contact with the daughter of my ex for my own mental health?,"  
AITA for not reconciling with my cheating ex and distancing from her daughter?  
  
I've opted for anonymity here due to the sensitivity of the situation.  
  
My relationship with Sara (33F) began a decade after our friendship started. She has a daughter, which wasn't an issue for me as I like kids. However, Sara's drinking habits became a recurring problem. Initially, her alcohol-induced friskiness was amusing, but it quickly grew tiresome as it often led to arguments she expected me to forget the next day. Despite this, I saw the good in her, influenced by my parents' belief that imperfections are part of life and relationships.  
  
Financially, I was the main provider, which allowed Sara to manage her own and her daughter's needs. After years of being together and seeing past her flaws, I considered proposing. However, her unpredictable behavior when drunk held me back, despite my own occasional pot use. Yet, I bought a ring, planning to propose when the time felt right.  
  
The tipping point came when Sara went on a camping trip with her daughter while I stayed back due to work commitments. She returned with a newfound resolve to stop drinking, which initially made me hopeful. Three weeks later, as I planned a cruise to propose, a friend from the trip disclosed that Sara might have been unfaithful. This suspicion was confirmed when Sara abruptly admitted to cheating during the camping trip.  
  
Devastated, I sought solitude in a hotel, turning off my phone and disappearing for days. Upon my return, I was met with attempts by Sara to repair our relationship, using her daughter as leverage. This manipulation deepened my pain, leading me to seek professional help. My therapist advised cutting ties for my mental health.  
  
Despite the complexity of our living situation, I attempted to set boundaries, requesting Sara to move out while offering financial support for her transition. The emotional toll was immense, as I still cared deeply for her daughter, but could no longer envision a future with Sara.  
  
My decision to isolate myself, living reclusively in my basement, has left me questioning my actions. The quietness of what was once a lively home now echoes with regret and solitude. Friends reach out, but I remain disconnected, grappling with guilt and the impact of my decisions on Sara's daughter. I find myself wondering if maintaining my mental health at the expense of breaking these ties makes me the asshole. I'm haunted by the thought that perhaps things could have been different if I'd been on that camping trip. Now, feeling more alone than ever, I struggle to find peace amidst the wreckage of a life once filled with love and hope.",AmItheAsshole
 friend talking behind back,"AITA; me and my best and only friend play video games and communicate via discord, he talks on discord and I type because of noise, whenever my earphones run out of battery we both start typing to communicate, but recently on discord for some reason my phones volume would never go to 0 whilst in call so I’ve been able to hear him, this wasn’t a problem before and I probably wouldn’t hear anything and eventually this problem would fix itself so it’ll be fine I thought. Perhaps I was wrong to not tell him I could still hear him talking out loud, but he quickly started badmouthing me out loud to himself in his room unknown to him that this issue was occurring and I could hear him; and it was just petty stuff but he sounded really annoyed. Now the petty stuff was about stuff I’d do in games, stuff which I thought was fine as he did the same to much larger extents which due to not being an issue before I assumed would be fine and I only started doing this petty stuff after he did it repeatedly. It seems overblown to me to end our friendship based on this but it did upset me with how inconsiderately he worded everything and how he seemed very annoyed by it; the very same stuff he would do first and to much larger extents, much more often, and in much more significant ways/ with greater impact.",AmItheAsshole
 for not traveling to my mom’s boyfriend’s funeral. ,"AITA for  not traveling to be with my mom after her boyfriend died? I haven’t made a final decision yet, but looking at flights, it will be very expensive to travel to where my mother lives, even with a bereavement rate. I can swing it, but it will hurt financially. My two siblings live in the same city and at least one will be with my mom for support. I feel terrible.",AmItheAsshole
 for arguing with a neighbour about them ruining our grass and bushes,"I live in a new condo building where we have our own pice of land for flower gardening and part of that land is covered with grass and decorative bushes. 
This little grass part with bushes is situated between our condo building , our parking spaces and neighbouring condo building with their grass land and parking spaces. 
Our condo building HO is paying monthly for that grass lawn and flowers maintenance. 
So the issue is that I noticed that on our part of the land some bushes are now broken and there are alot of empty spots where grass no longer is growing, because some one was walking from neighbours condo building side towards our parking spaces. 
Then i noticed that indeed every morning a-lot of neighbours from neighbouring building  one by one would just walk on that grass field, when there is a concrete road existing parallel to that grass field.

I wrote a complaint in our facebook condo group saying “hei, we have a problem, everyday someone is walking on our grass lawn, we should do something about it”. I offered to put some decorative fence maybe 0,5 meters high, someone else offered to put some more bushes. 
And then, theres this lady commenting my post, saying that we should give all the neighbours opportunity to walk where they wanna walk, because it is much convenient or shorter walk distance between main road and the building and that we should put a concrete road on that grass lawn. 
I figured that main people who were walking on that lawn are from neighbours condo building. 
I replied to that lady saying “hei we do not need unnecessary people trafic because we are too  close to main road, this will attract even more people to our parking spaces who are not supposed to walk there or be there. and there might be situations when people would try to drive trough on that concrete road by passing our parking gates and park without permit for example. 
then the lady replies that I am a bad neighbour for not letting them  walk on that grass. also it turns out that that lady is exactly from that neighbouring condo building. 
i dont know who gave her access to our group. in the end I replied to her that our HO meeting will decide  what we should do with this problem, but not her, because this is our condo building land and she is not part of our HO condo building. 
Now I kinda feel bad for making that post. and at the same time im thinking why should that concrete road have to be made only because she said so. 
but luckily we have to vote before we do anything. and this lady keeps commenting my posts endlessly. it feels like she wants to be the one who has the last word , making her to be in "" the right"" position or giving the right answer to our HO condo members.",AmItheAsshole
 for misinterpreting my bf?,"I 20(F) with 20 (M), we both speak Spanish, but he sends me a screenshot saying, 
""I play with people online, and they're awful at the game, and they're so bad. It makes me question if I'm playing the same game as them.""

I'm a huge noob at a game we play together, and I do a lot of things wrong, and he gets bothered about it at times. So, to me, that screenshot made me bothered and insulted.

Then I tell him, ""Fine, I won't play with you anymore""
He replies, ""LoL, heyyy, I'm not saying it towards you, I'm talking about the others who are online.
That's fine, we won't play anymore. If that's what you want.""

So I purposely said, ""Hmph -3-""
To purposely let him know, I'm still very bothered.

He replied, ""And now you're bothered with me? Why? You see how you are.""

I reply back, ""Don't try to turn this on me, dummy.""

He says, ""I only sent it to you because that's how I feel when I see the people we get when I play with you, bruh.""

And I leave the chat for a bit. And he says, ""Hahaha, you're such a dummy, you see how you like to fight.""
I reply, ""I don't like to fight, I'm just being petty rn.""

He said in return:
""HAHAHA. 
Shut up. 
You're JUST being petty. 
As always. 
🥰🤣""
I reply, ""Ight.""

I honestly felt bothered and disrespected at that point because I didn't feel that any of it was a joke. I work 13 hours a day, and I deal with a lot of shit in my personal life to then hear this stuff. He knows when someone tells me to shut up, I actually stfu because I know no one wants to listen to me if they tell me that. I know he jokes a lot dramatically, but I feel like it's not what he said that bothered me. Well, maybe 5%, but it's the way he said it. 

I proceeded to tell him that jt bothered me, and it went back and forth, and he said, ""It's not for all this drama and worth getting worked up for. I'll be cautious of what I send you next time.""

That honestly bothered me more because it makes me feel like I'm wrong for feeling bothered about such things.

And I just tell him, ""Yk what, yeah, I'm sorry. It was wrong of me because I apparently interpreted it wrong."" His reply, ""Maybe it was the language, that you took it the wrong way.""

And I reply, ""No matter in what language, English or Spanish, it sounds fucking wrong. But lets just leave it at that, Iwas wrong."" 

AITA though?",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my friend out of our dnd party,"Our dm cannot make it to most sessions we organise. He cancels at the last minute and constantly makes the whole group reschedule. My mother has told me to kick him out several times because of how often he makes us reschedule, and it’s getting to the rest of the group too. He’s a good guy and all, he just can’t commit at all. Would I be the asshole for kicking him out?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go to my 67 YO mothers birthday party/meetup/??? On a three hours notice? ,"I (41M) Was just invited to my 67 YO mothers birthday party/meetup. My problem is she invited me with a 2-3 hour notice. This is something that happens a lot with my mother and siblings, I for instance would know from other family members that something is happening, but I always get the heads up the day before or the same day. I have talked about this with my mother and I think she is aware that this is something that gets on my nerves but this keeps happening. Around two local time it got a call from her inviting me for a meetup at 4-6, I got a notification in a group chat an hour before that and I just told her I was not feeling well and would probably not show up. I feel ok. I just don't want to partake in something on this short of a notice and I got the ""I'm letting her down"" Feeling after I hung up. AITA for not going, even though I feel fine?",AmItheAsshole
 Enjoying flexible schedule sucks for others,"Since flexible working, I start my days later.  A lot of my team also starts later.  I wake up at 8:30-9:00. Take my time, answer emails on my phone or take scheduled calls.  Wait for traffic to die down.  Drive to client site by 10:00.  Some team members already there, some come later, some come after lunch.  Work till 6 or 7.  Often not the last one to leave.  Work gets done, no one at work cares.  

But this schedule kinda is junk for my wife.  She works from home.  Gets up a little before me to logon by 8.  She can get lots done while at home like cleaning and laundry and cooking.  I get home by 7 and food is ready.  We watch tv while eating.  Our apartment-mate, who is her sibling, always tries to do the dishes because that’s how they are.  Just considerate hard working and clean people.  Every once in a while my wife complains that I just come home watch tv and eat and don’t do anything.  But I argue it’s not fair to do things first and then complain I don’t do them.  It’s like I have to eat faster, get to the sink and box out the sibling to do the dishes.  

It’s not a huge deal, since I do help clean and always take out the trash and do basically all the handywork which I enjoy doing.  And laundry if the timing ends up on a weekend.  

But sometimes she wants to go walking after work and she doesn’t like to walk alone.  And I think she doesn’t like me coming home after she cooks.  She wants to get dinner ready together.  

But I really really hate waking up early.  

AITA if I keep arguing that later work hours just make me super happy with my life?

I don’t care if we make dinner when I get home late.  Or if we walk in the dark.  It’s just too late I think for her and she rather have the regular work hour schedule.  

I don’t know, just needed to write this out.  Thanks for reading. 

",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to convince my childhood “friend” to not work with me? ,"So I have a childhood friend named Liz right, and starting with middle school/high school we sorta disconnected, but about two years ago we reconnected as our parents are friends with each other and we had Easter together

Liz always been pretty weird, especially since then though, and Liz would be texting my siblings a lot since then which they weren’t really tolerating as they weren’t that close to Liz. I however was the only one who could at least tolerate her, and Liz has been texting me for two years since then. However, I’ve given Liz multiple opportunities to hang out, and she would always come up with weird excuses, such as “I’ll check my schedule to see” and then never reach back to me. 

On my birthday, me and my friends went to a wine festival, and Liz showed up towards the end of the festival with one of her friends, and told me she would “shop around” before meeting us, to which I responded saying to meet us right then because the booths were shutting down and then we can go to the stores. It being my birthday wasn’t as much as Liz’s concern as her focusing on the friend she brought. 

I’ve tried to bring up possibly seeking mental help, as Liz told me she struggles with it, particularly not doing well in school or work, and that her sister suggested she might have ADHD. However, it seems like her pride seems to get in the way of things, because she told me the reason why she hadn’t been diagnosed is that she doesn’t want to feel there’s anything wrong with her. 

Today, Liz sent me a text saying that she applied for a position at the store I work at, and was interviewing tomorrow. I tried to convince Liz not to work there by saying I’m quitting soon, I have friends in that position and they find it stressful, and that she wouldn’t like it. I haven’t heard back, but I know that since Liz has a spotty resume and hasn’t done well at her previous jobs, that it would be a bad look on me if she says she knows me. I’m not actually quitting soon, and the position isn’t as bad as I made it out to be, but I’m hoping this will stop Liz from interviewing or taking a job offer there. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not walking my roommates dog?,"My roommate and I live together with my dog (Arty) and his, which is an 8 month old puppy (Nala) who requires 247 monitoring. My job is completely remote, while his is in person, so on the days he works, I agreed to watch Nala so he doesn't have to dish out extra money, paying for a dog sitter or daycare.

Since he got Nala, I have taken care of both dogs every day that he is at work and since I take Arty on walks everyday, I take Nala as well because it just seems wrong to not, since I'm walking Arty anyways.

&amp;#x200B;

Recently, I've been having to work late so I haven't had the time to take them on an afternoon walk before the sun goes down, while my roommate has been getting home earlier.

Because he's been getting home earlier, he takes Nala on a walk and not Arty (my dog). For some reason this really really got under my skin after seeing how disappointed Arty looks every time, when he realizes he doesn't get to go on the walk. And my roommate *knows* that I always walk both dogs, so it seemed really unfair to me.

&amp;#x200B;

Because of this I started doing the same thing and only walking Arty, my dog. Then the other day, he asked me why I, ""couldn't just take Nala with"" and I told him that he made it clear Arty was not his dog or responsibility, so Nala is not mine. His response was that I had agreed to taking care of Nala and he never agreed to taking care of Arty because he ""can't because his work schedule is so busy"" while I have much more free time before/after work.

&amp;#x200B;

He is right, I did agree to take care of Nala and I do have more free time to do walks every day. Without me walking Nala, she only gets to go on a walk a few times a week when my roommate comes home early.

 I do feel horrible that Nala is paying the price for this disagreement, I helped raise her and care for her very much so I feel like TA. But it also feels like my roommate is taking advantage of our agreement and Arty is paying the price for that. 

I can't come to a conclusion myself so I have to ask Reddit, is my roommate taking advantage of me or AITA for not walking his dog?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying that I think my niece is autistic?,"Throw away account.
Let me start by saying I’m not an expert on autism, but I did take a couple of classes in college about working with special needs adults and children, and I have volunteered with special Olympics and YMCA for years.

I 28F have lived out of the country (US) for 2 years now. About a month before I left my niece was born. This is the first grandchild and the whole family was thrilled of course. I was in the delivery room and got to spend a month with her before I left.

I was gone for two years working before I got to come back to visit.

During my visit I got to spend 1 on 1 time with my niece. This is where I noticed some signs of autism. She’s over 2 yo and doesn’t try to speak, won’t make eye contact, won’t respond to her name, really doesn’t play with toys. More like she inspects them, or tries to figure them out.
Maybe I noticed because I don’t see her everyday.

I brought up to my bro and SIL that I think she might have autism and they need to talk to her dr. My brother took it pretty well (I think he might know deep down). But my SIL went off on me. Telling me my niece was perfect and is just developing on her own., that I didn’t have any right to say she had problems. Etc etc. My mom and dad stayed silent. My bro and SIL took my niece and left. My mom said I should have kept it to myself. My dad has always respected my education and experience and asked me why I thought so. I explained what I saw. He did some googling and now agrees with me. We both know early intervention is important for children with autism and only want what is best for her.

my SIL has now started a campaign in the family that I’m a jealous unmarried spinster, and am making up terrible things about my niece. My dad is taking up for me, my mom and brother are silent, and my SIL is on a rampage.

Should I have just stayed silent and let them and the dr figure it out",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my son he should had done his job and disciplined my younger son?,"My 17yo son Drake is a senior and is only taking the bare minimum three classes for his senior year because he took a lot of online community college classes. 

One of his classes is being a TA over at the middle school. All he does is grade papers and naps. My 6th grade son Mikey is also in that class. The teacher has been on jury duty and they have this weak sub that the kids run all over. Yesterday Mikey got sent to the office for misbehaving.

I got more details and was pretty upset that Drake didn't discipline Mikey. Just sitting there was inexcusable. Drake said he's not the teacher. I said you are the TA and the older brother. You should had taken away his phone after he was playing on it when the teacher told him to put it away. 

As a punishment, I'm not giving him lunch money for the rest of the week. I made sure Mikey overheard us because he knows Drake is definitely going to discipline him.",AmItheAsshole
 if I backed my ex's baby momma in court to get full custody? WTBTA if I don't?,"So long story short, I dated a guy who it turns out was cheating on his baby momma, and then proceeded to cheat on both of us, quite a bit apparently. I haven't had any contact with either of them since October, but today she messaged me to vent and to ask me to write an affidavit about what kind of person he is for her custody battle against him. 

There are things I could share that I personally witnessed; for example he is an alcoholic who would get black out drunk at least weekly, he cheated on me, he told me a lot of things about his BM that she says is provabley false, and a few weeks after we broke up I had someone tell me they found content of me on a porn site, but that was never confirmed. Overall, I don't really think I have much that could help her, but I told her I would tell the truth about my experiences. 

The thing is, I really don't want to get dragged back into this drama. I know she also wants out, and this could help her to get free of him, and I feel like I owe it to her because he cheated on her with me. I also don't know if it would be morally right to do this. He may be a jackass,  but I never had cause to believe he wasn't a good dad. 

She told me all kinds of things about what is going on with him now. She said he is completely changed and she is afraid for her child. But I also did catch three lies that she told in our conversation. I don't know which way to go with this.",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my sisters friend to clean my cats litter box?,"Long story short, due to my apartment restrictions my cat has been at my mom’s house because my apartment wants to charge an exorbitant amount for pets so I have an agreement with my mom I can have her at her house as long as I come back and clean her box which I’ve been doing every other day.

I can’t come everyday because she lives quite some ways. Anyway this would be the second one of my sisters friends who would be coming to live with us due to parental issues. I expressed interest in coming back home due to raising prices and I couldn’t because the extra room was taken.

We just recently moved and my mom got a house where’d I’d get my own room. I’d already begun moving my stuff from storage into my room because I’m paying 100$ a month for it.

However as soon as we fully moved into the house my sisters other friend got kicked out at 18 by her parents and has nowhere else to be. My mom asked if she could stay in my room. I reluctantly said sure if she cleans the litter box since I have to keep it in my room. She said okay. I’m very peculiar with my room I don’t like outside shoes on floor or clothes on my bed or anything. I told mom this and she said okay.

Today my mom was sick so I made my way to her to check and my mom said it’s not my sisters friends responsibility to clean after my cat and it’s not my room. This of course confused me because she previously said okay. I didn’t put up an argument releasing my room. I don’t want the girl to be homeless I didn’t put any rules or restrictions. I just asked for the cat to limit my trips home to save gas and time ( it’s takes about 45 minutes from my job to get home) since she’d be there. Am I wrong? Is it too much? I don’t want to be mean or rude. I just feel like everytime I express interest in moving back home I can’t because one of my sisters friends comes and takes the space. Even when I was living at home I didn’t have a “room” it was a blocked off space with a curtain. 

  
edit: I wasn’t going to say no if my mom had said no. but she said okay during our phone call asking if the friend could stay in my room then changed her mind all of a sudden. I’m not demanding she do it, it would just help me out If she’s going to be in there anyway.",AmItheAsshole
 for agreeing with my bfs dad?,"I 18f have a bf who is 21M and we regularly go over to his dads house since their mom passed away when she was young and his dad gets lonely. Anyways my bf has dark humor and loves making jokes about me which mainly make fun of my appearance but I’m used to it by now. His dad 44M was sitting at the table with us and we were eating takeout.

My bf had made a joke making fun of my nose and me and my bf laughed. But then his dad spoke up and told my bf to stop making jokes like that before somebody else comes and snatches me up. Me and his dad laughed but he didn’t really find the joke that funny.

It got a little awkward after that and I changed the subject to about how I’m doing in college and things like that. But as soon as we left and got into my bfs car he asked me why I laughed at his dads joke to which I explained cause I thought it was funny. He ignored me the whole way back and didn’t even kiss me goodnight or anything. 

I thought we were all joking around. Aita?",AmItheAsshole
 if I post my engagement news after my friends dad just died!,"I recently got engaged whilst on holiday. As you can imagine, we are both very excited. We have told close family and friends the news but we’re going to post the engagement on social media when we’re back off holiday. Unfortunately, a good friend of mine has just had news that their dad passed away. Obviously this is a sad time and they have put a message out on social media letting everyone know. 

If I now post my news, WIBTA? I was going to leave it a couple days but feel bad that they’re going through a rough time. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom she can rent a room in my house?,"Me(M24) and my girlfriend(F23) have been together for about 6 and half years. She moved in with me year 2, at that time I was living with my single mom. We all lived together for 2 years in a 2 bedroom apartment (I was 18-19 at the time and paid half the rent to my mom). Me and my gf decided to move into our own little one bedroom apartment and my mom did the same. When we were in our own apartment, it was ALWAYS clean, my girlfriend would be a clean freak, she would cook every night and she was just generally a lot happier living alone (without my mom).

 Year 4, we decided to move back in with my mom, instead of us paying a separate rent, and my mom paying a separate rent, we would conjoin our rents and get a big house. I quickly noticed that after about 3-4 months of living with my mom at the house again, my girlfriend was less happy, I would do all the cleaning, she would rarely help clean or cook. 

At the end of year 4 I sat my gf down and asked if everything is okay. She explained that she has been unmotivated to do anything because my mom has a very cluttered lifestyle, and everytime she wants to do anything in the house, it overwhelms her. I didn’t  disagree with her, me and my gf both like a minimalistic lifestyle, our furniture is simple and elegant, we like the modern style. My mom on the other hand, well she’s middle eastern, glass china cabinets in the living room with decorative china inside, multiple glass cabinets for displaying stuff, 3 coffee tables for a 3 piece sofa set, overall very busy house. 

This is now year 6, our lease is up very soon, and I talked to my mom about the living situation. I told her that my gf and I are a little unhappy with the current living situation, the clutter is making us not wanna be in the living room or shared areas at all, we usually just stay in the bedroom, and that we are planning on living alone again. 

My mom is in her early 60s, she’s been a single parent for about 16 years, she works a shit ton of hours, I offered her to stay with me and my gf, rent free, because I want her to work less and not worry about rent, but I don’t want any of her clutter in the house, I want me and my gf to decorate the house, and have our minimalistic furniture. I told her she can obviously enjoy all amenities of the house, just not all of her stuff in the house. I told her I’m willing to put all of her stuff in storage for her. 

She started crying and told me that she’d rather just go get an apartment, where she can actually put all of her stuff there, decorate and do whatever she wants. 

Now I feel like shit, I don’t know what to do. If I lean towards my gf, my mom is mad at me and is upset and sad, if I lean towards my mom, and my gf will be upset and sad. I feel like I owe my mom everything for raising me and my other brother all on her own and struggling to raise us, but on the other hand, I’m about ready to start my own little family with my soon to be fiancé. Please help.   ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my aging mother to stop bothering me with her problems?,"To preface- I come from a a very dysfunctional family. I grew up watching my alcoholic father get into (mostly verbal) altercations with my undiagnosed bipolar mother over her terrible spending habits. Eventually, my mother got fired from her job for having a manic episode at work- resulting in the eventual foreclosure of the family house. Not too long after that, when I was a teenager, our family dynamic fell apart when my father died. My mother spiraled into a mental break and was unable to provide for me. In the 15 years since then she has failed to hold gain, or hold, any meaningful employment. She is in her early 60s now and has not worked since she was 49. 

To be blunt- she's spent the past 20 years of her life or so not even trying to find work, planning for retirement, or taking care of herself in the slightest. She's overweight, incapable of walking more than ten or twenty minutes at a time, and would be completely destitute if not for my wife and I literally buying a house for her last year (it's in our name). She doesn't have any friends because she's burned every bridge she's had through just plain being mean and/or a giant emotional burden on anyone who gives her time of day. Every phonecall with her is just her complaining about her life, despite the fact she is completely materially taken care of- almost solely due to my efforts, mind you. 

As she ages, her ability to process the world has declined. Her memory is going. Her emotional control is pretty much completely gone. She's scared of it all, and has no one to talk to it about. She calls me constantly to complain about her husband (also a piece of work in his own right), her medical problems, her interactions with people, and anything else she can think of- and I'm fed up with it. 

I've tried my best to be a good son, but the honest truth is that I don't want to be burdened with her problems. She's made her bed by being lazy, unproductive, toxic, and shortsighted since I was a teenager. I have sympathy for her plights, but I can't help but just keep thinking that this lonely descent into an unsatisfying end of life is wholly her own fault. I can't fix someone who has spent nearly their entire life being a myopic sloth with a mood disorder.

I've recently taken a new approach of telling her that I am not her therapist nor her parent. I don't want to be her shoulder to cry on. I would, honestly, just prefer she accept her aging gracefully and spend her remaining time enjoying the secure retirement she completely did not earn or deserve. 

So, anyways. AITA for telling my mom that I don't want to listen to her problems anymore?",AmItheAsshole
 for being annoyed at my sister in law,"Me and my partner are getting married in 4 months,she is the love of my life,and I genuinely can't wait to marry her.

She has a sister,who will do anything to be the centre of attention,for example,she informed all of us that she was going to wear a white dress to our wedding, because the one dresses that liked were white ones. I politely and calmly told her if she turned up in a white dress,she would be escorted out,and she wouldn't be invited back at any point.

Now she's informed us that she's going to make a speech,not asked us,told us. My partner doesn't see the problem. I've told her it's just another way to take the attention away from my partner,and to put it on her sister.

Now me and my partner are arguing,and I don't know if IATA here,or if I have a right to be annoyed.
",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad at a little kid?,"So, to start, this is being told by my friend to another person, and they got everything in it. I wasn't there for a bit of it but I was involved for most of the drama.  
Some bg info before we start, I'm 14, the friend is 17, I'm a Kemetic pagan and he is an atheist. Now the little kid is a 12-year-old and is Christian.  
""Soooo basically. \*insert user\* was inviting atheists and satanists (those whom she had never met or interacted with, by the way) to her christian group. We nicely declined (I think there were four, maybe five of us?) and she started telling us that we would go to hell, that we needed jesus and invalidating our beliefs and our trauma from her religion. We were all very nice but she was awful about it.  she INSTANTLY started getting defensive and nasty with us, saying that we were ""bullying"" her (we literally were just nicely asking her to please stop pushing her religion on us. We were using smiley faces and hearts and everything.)

But no matter what we did, this kid was RELENTLESS. She would not give up, invalidating our trauma, saying ""Christianity is perfect, there's no way it traumatized you! Your lying!"" (Keep in mind, this girl is 12. She cannot spell nor put up a good argument. Dmetri is 14 and I am 17.) So anyways, it escalated because she just kept saying ""Jesus loves you"" every time we nicely asked her to stop interacting with us, and to please respect the fact that everyone has their individual, unique belief set.""  
That's basically what happened, I don't wanna go full into detail but she was being an asswipe, knew she was being one and went ""well :3 ur bullying me for calling me out""  
LIKE WHAT?! I'm pissed, the people involved are pissed, and I wanna know am I the ass? Cuz it's mixed from the people I've asked, the people saying I am start with I shouldn't have gotten involved, but she started talking shit to me and abt me from our first interaction so, ofc I wasn't going to let her say really cruel shit to me and not respond with something to defend myself-  
OH AND TO ADD RQ She has no mental problems, and we personally think since she's 12, she should fucking know better-  
Anyways, am I the asshole? (I might not respond to everything, but for the most part I'm reading them \^\^ )

  
Quick edit cuz forgot : I have a leg condition that's fairly new, need a cane to walk, she made fun on that so yea :3",AmItheAsshole
 for reporting the apartment manager to my landlord company ,"I live in a small one bedroom apartment that’s on the older side and they do not allow pets of ANY kind. I was fine with this rule and understood why when I first moved in. Early this year my apartment complex was bought out by a management company and they still enforced the “No pets” policy, which again is understandable. 

The onsite manager just moved in, and to my surprise they have TWO small dogs. Normally I wouldn’t have been too upset because emotional/service animals are acceptable but I recently learned that neither managers dogs are emotional or service animals. He leaves them outside for majority of the day and all they do is bark nonstop for hours and hours. I got a lease renewal two days ago and I was reading the no pet policy. Tenants are not allowed any kind of pet (not even fish or reptiles) and if a pet is found in your home you are required to pay a $700 fee and will be kicked out. After reading this I was pretty frustrated with the onsite manager and lack of responsibility for his two dogs that bark all day. So I sent in a formal complaint against him.

I don’t think it’s fair at all, that paying tenants cannot have any kind of pet whatsoever but the manager is allowed to have two animals and leave them outside ALL day. 

I ended up getting some opinions from some friends and some of them think I was an asshole for reporting the manager. I personally don’t think I’m in the wrong here because in what world is it okay for the manager to have pets but no one else is allowed? 

Am I the asshole in this situation? 
",AmItheAsshole
. I’m pushing conversation with my fiancée about our past disagreements/problems so that we can find a way to resolve them,"For the past years it has been nice and quiet. Recently when a disagreement occurred she has become more distant and avoidant of conflict which she has always been, never been the type to wanna solve the problem. When I ask to talk about the problem we had or something wrong I did in hopes of correcting my mistakes or doing better next time, she refuses and tells me to stop talking about it and move on. I’m trying to be better for her but how do I better myself if she won’t call me out on things she find upsetting or pisses her off? Not even a message saying “f*ck you for doing this” or something to let me be aware of it. I receive cold treatment, no talking for days, or tells me to quit asking what’s wrong and talk about other things.

It’s been a month now I’ve been pushing to have a proper conversation. She told me she never wanna argue with me (she calls all disagreements arguments) because she said “you’re either right or we keep arguing.” whenever she wanna quit talking she just say yeah you’re right sorry as a way to shut me up. I don’t wanna be right, most times I just wanna be heard and understand her side so we will be able to see where the other is coming from but again she refuses to explain what’s on her mind. It became a pattern where she says “you’re right, sorry” to shut me up and we move past it. I don’t want the topic to end but she will be calling me out for it saying I’m prolonging the fight.

She said “you’re surprised by the build up you caused and suddenly you wanna take out everything and fix it and organize it.” when in fact I’ve been trying but she’s been shutting me up. I’m not saying I’ve done nothing wrong, I make mistakes as to why I ask her about it. Hence the talks, but to her it’s an argument. She doesn’t say where I went wrong btw. So now I think or assume she’s holding grudges from all the past mistakes I’ve made. Saying she’s tired of it and doesn’t wanna talk about ANY conflict she just wants normal conversations. How can I continue to have normal conversations when I know there’s underlying problems in the relationship? 

I want to fix things because I want to spend the rest of my life with this person. We tackle problems the opposite way. I wanna fix and talk about it head on but she prefers ignoring and moving on from it.

She’s the avoidant type and I’m the anxious type. It bugs me that she doesn’t want to talk. She’s growing colder unless I give her the normal talk and move past the problems. I asked her to meet me halfway many times where we will talk about stuff like this in the future when we’re both comfortable to do so but she says “no we won’t because i don’t want to. either stop talking about it or don’t talk to me at all” 

She’s not wanting to break off the relationship either because I asked her multiple times whether she wants to still be with me, if she’s unhappy, if she lost interest, and if she lost feelings. She tells me to just quit talking about it, move on, and talk to her normally.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to back out of being a bridesmaid in my friends wedding? ,"I feel at a loss on what to do. A little backstory:  I, 27F, was asked to be a bridesmaid in my friend’s (29F) wedding. We were roommates during college in 2014 and have been friends since then. 

This past weekend was her bachelorette party and last night things went downhill so fast. I traveled over 3,000 miles to be apart of her weekend and stayed awake for 40 hours traveling to her. The first night was super fun but things started going downhill Friday night when I ran into an old friend from home and I stayed to catch up for a couple of minutes and I spent $60 on shots to make it up to the bride who was annoyed that I stayed back to talk to a friend for a couple of minutes. She then makes me sleep downstairs alone when the rest of the girls are sleeping in her room upstairs. 

Saturday was the worst day when we went out for drinks and when we started to go to different bars, the bride was already drunk, didn’t have her phone and kept running off in a jammed packed bar in Nashville. Eventually the MOH snapped because the bride ran off again without her phone and we couldn’t find her. The bride just starts having a meltdown saying because she was yelled at, it ruined the night. The bride wouldn’t talked responsibility for running off and scaring us and saying she couldn’t handle her emotions and I stayed quiet the rest of the night. I kinda realized that the whole weekend I felt as if I was walking on eggshells around her because I was afraid of her having a breakdown like that and seeing she was still acting as immature as she was before.  I just started a new chapter of my life and cut off people like that and I just feel very uneased on what to do. ",AmItheAsshole
 for letting my friend stay at my place and then cancel it?,"I confirmed to my ""friend"" that he could sleep at my place, then I cancelled his stay. I live about 8 hours away from him and we listen to the same genre of music. The last two years when I've invited him to any event, he's always made excuses about the project, servicing the car, etc. 

I was at a beer with another mutual friend of ours, where I found out he was going to a show - because he asked him if he could get him some weed.  Anyway, I texted him why he wouldn't call  -he said he didn't call me for the concert because he didn't know he was going and then asked for accomondation. I confirmed the accommodation - I was drunk and extremely nice at the time.  

Anyway, I figured it out the next day - he knows I listen to this type of music, though he didn't have tickets(if this is true because he like to lie - another long story) and had already trying to get weed.

His girlfriend and another friend of ours are also playing to stay with me. He's got a month till show starts and plenty of time to get a place to stay. So I've decided to cancel.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for suggesting brother rehome his dog that I instigated he adopt?,"I live w/son, small dog &amp; younger bro. My dog is well trained but does bark alot when home alone. I thought getting a 2nd dog might be a good thing &amp; would help w/barking issue. So, I sorta started instigating my bro get his own dog. That way if I didn't connect w/the other dog, I wouldn't feel so bad since it not actually my dog. I did offered help w/dog dog when needed.

One day bro found a chiweenie at the county shelter. It seemed a bit impulsive to go w/the 1st dog he saw &amp; it didn’t feel quite right how fast this was. But this was my idea so ok!

He’s a cutie! But chiwee is very territorial so is driving my dog crazy. He’s not housebroken &amp; marks alot. Is reactive to people, dogs, &amp; cars, which is scary cuz he bolts when doors open. He nips at people &amp; our dog but is not overtly aggressive. We've been trying to train but either he doesn't get it or refuses to listen.

But IMHO the problem is not the dog. 

We've had dog for 3 weeks &amp; bro's done very little training. The dog needs let out every 2hrs till he's housebroken but bro will wait 4-6hrs sometimes more. And cuz chiwee marks alot chiwee is actually in dog diapers nearly 24/7. 

Bro said he'd be home more, but leaves for long chunks of time often into late evening. Ie. Yesterday he left at 3pm, didn't get home till after 10. So since we have no idea when bro is coming home my son takes both dogs for walks (since chiwee is reactive that’s difficult) &amp; we feed chiwee. Of the last week we have done this 5 outta 7 nights. The 2 nights he was home, he offered no help to walk or feed our dog in return. He walked &amp; fed his dog only. YES, we offered to help but my son &amp; I pretty much spend more time w/dog then he does. At the very least I'd appreciate communication, not just assume we'll take care of his dog.

That's not even the worst part!

Shortly after bro brought chiwee home, the impatience &amp; harsh discipline my brother’s shown is worrying! Smacks are severe &amp; frequent. He picks the dog up fully from the scruff often. When he bolted out one day I saw bro on all fours tackle this dog, give him full on spank &amp; lift him up by his scruff to bring him inside.

2 weeks in Bro's solution to better deal w/dog? A SHOCK COLLAR! Yes, he nips, &amp; is a pain, but not overtly aggressive at all! To see this 2 pronged box attached to his neck is sad.

Finally had a family meeting &amp; I apologized for instigating. But the right thing to do is take a step back &amp; analyze if this situation is best for the dog. Yes he's been difficult &amp; clearly not gelling w/the family. But it's only been 3 weeks &amp; this dog is in diapers &amp; a shock collar. 

He said he's been thinking of getting a trainer. Now, he has yet to take this dog to the vet since brought home to get a proper evaluation! So I highly doubt he's actually going to get &amp; pay for a trainer.

He said he has no plans to give him up.

I know I instigated this, but am IATA for suggesting he should consider rehoming?",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my mom out of my room?,"I (M16) was asleep this morning, and my mom came into my room to wake me up. when she walked in, she brought an egg and toast for me to have for breakfast, and sat at the edge of my futon and said she wanted to hang out for a  bit while i ate.
i have OCD and im very particular about the way my room is, and i dont really like people coming in my room in the first place, and she began throwing things away/reorganizing my table which made me super anxious, so i asked her to leave because honestly i was just uncomfortable with my mom in my room. i have several GI issues and dont eat in the mornings because it takes me several hours to get an appetite, and she knows this, so i also told her thank you but im not hungry. 
she then got really offended and said that i could just give it to the dog if im not hungry, and then she got up and stormed out while saying something about how i dont appreciate her and im selfish and spoiled and so on.
i appreciate her trying to do something nice for me but she knows that im particular about things like eating in the morning so idk why she acts suprised/upset when i dont want to. same with people being in my room in the first place, it makes me super uncomfortable and she knows, and i dont understand why she gets so upset when i just wanna have some privacy to wake up/get ready in peace lol

i also heard her and my dad downstairs talking about how ungrateful i am and how selfish and spoiled i am. AITA?

tl;dr- my mom was trying to chill in my room, i asked her to leave, she got mad

EDIT- i set my alarm for 9 this morning, for some reason it didnt go off, but normally i get myself up just fine ",AmItheAsshole
 for not prioritising my mum?,"For context my birthday is may 8th, which falls on mothers day every 7 years and is always only a few days out otherwise. 
My friend has a similar birthday to me as he was born on the 6th. As we have grown really close this year we have decided to have a joint party as its his 18th and my 17th. 
We scheduled this party for the weekend after we both have our actual birthdays so on the 11th and 12th so he can buy some ""beverages"" for the special occasion. 
As I only recently found out mothers day is on the 12th so I won't be home for the first part of the day to celebrate.
As soon as my mum found out about this though she's been really angry with me, saying that I didn't prioritise her and that I don't care about her or her opinions anymore.
I apologised almost immediately and said I was so sorry for not taking into account that it was going to be mothers day, but I will not be cancelling my plans for the party and we can celebrate in the after noon with an afternoon tea or dinner if she so likes. 
Shes still really angry with me saying I should've told her about the plans so she could've refused me to go so we could spend the entirety of mothers day together. 
I've tried apologising so many times and even got her flowers to no avail. I don't know how I can make her and myself happy and I truly don't know if I'm still in the wrong here.",AmItheAsshole
 - when can I block someone?,"My father died on 2/6/24 … I’m 50 - this was not a surprise - he has been in poor health …

I have done EVERY SINGLE THING his wife has wanted - fronted her money - paid off his bills (before I talked to an attorney who said I don’t have to pay off all his bills until the estate was settled)

The ONE thing I didn’t do that she wanted was I invited his family to the funeral (who I’m not close to at all - I just think funerals are for the living and they had a right to come) and brought one of my best friends to the funeral and dinner after (I offered to pay for her dinner but to my surprise my dad’s wife decided to spend $40 of her money amazingly - she did use his life insurance to pay for the funeral because I tell everyone who will listen how much I hate the funeral industry - we can get into in the comments if you want - my solution to the funeral would have been ‘what is the cheapest possible way we can get rid of this thing that happens to look sort of like my father?’ But of course if others have more attachment to a physical body they can make the decision - as I let her do)

She also expects me to pay for the house to be cleaned of his stuff - I’ll cross that bridge when it comes …

We used HER lawyer - who may actually be the original Adam - VERY old man - and I don’t mean to be ageist - people maintain their abilities into various ages (I know people my age who I wouldn’t trust as a lawyer) and he should have retired - he created a document that is useless - for $2500 of my money - it’s called a family settlement agreement if anyone knows about that … presented it to two banks - one I know a guy who works at so it took them. 15 minutes to reject it - the other one took 8 minutes to reject …

So I’m hiring my own lawyer to probate the will and she is blowing up my phone and refusing to turn over documents unless we use her retired lawyer  (I have the will) - my lawyer has said that that’s no problem - just a supponea …

Some background about me - I’m Autistic, bipolar, and have severe anxiety disorders … I work remotely for a university … talking or texting with her makes my hands shake and my brain shut off …

One of four things ings is going to happen:
1) I’m gonna end up in the hospital 
2) I’m going to throw my phone against the wall (which may directly proceed #1)
3) I’m gonna get REALLY REALLY REALLY mad and yell at her on the phone (both of my parents were emotionally abusive - I learned from the best)
4) or I’m going to block her and do my own thing with the will (and if it gives her anything wonderful - I’m not going to steal from her - I want her out of my life - but that doesn’t mean I am going to behave immorally)

Autism comes with an inability to understand emotions - and I’m not a bad guy - I had to go to the doctor and got snacks for the guys painting my house on the way home …

Am I the asshole here?",AmItheAsshole
 for not going to my nephew's birthday 6th party,"Excuse the Grammer, this has been weighing on my heart. My nephew bday party was on 4/20. My SIL A and brother Fred is excommunicated from rhe family following some events that happened last year and a few months ago.
 My older sister Diamond died suddenly in June and it was traumatic experience for my older sister Rosie and my mom. Well a month or so later Ally was arguing and she basically said ""you better do this and that's on your dead sister"".  My brother did and said nothing and Rosie was on the phone with her. She never appoligize and doubled own when Rosie blocked and wouldn't allow Diamond's baby to see her. 
Ally calls her *67 (basically anonymously calling since her number was blocked) and started talking shit and DOES IT AGAIN ""that's why you crying about your dead sister!!"" And nasty other stuff when Rosie called Fred he did nothing instead of talking about ""call the coroner, if you coming to my house."" And many other things.
Since then there has been no contact and although my mom still go over there to help out with my nephew, they do not talk at all. So where I come I just moved back and before all this happened I was supposed to crash at SIL but since then I couldn't get over what she said, it was constantly in the back of my mind and nagged no matter how much I prayed for help to forgive her, I couldn't.  Although I did tell her I was going to go I didn't go, I didn't answer the call. She texted me Sunday morning about it but I didn't answer. I just didn't want cause drama. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my LDR Bf to move quicker than what is planned,"My bf (32) and I (33F) have been long distance for 2.5 years and have half a year left. 

He started an apprenticeship the weekend after we reconnected and started chatting and he wants to work for his mentor for 3 years. I've always know the 3 year mark from day 1 as he was always planning on moving here. The apprenticeship was an amazing opportunity but was unexpected at the time.

This evening I started feeling bitter and resentful  because I am missing him and suggested that it's his fault, he put the 3 years on us, not his mentor as the mentor doesn't even know he's planning on moving here in 6 months so there's nothing stopping him from moving sooner. He's mad because I made him feel like an AH, but he understands where I'm coming from, he misses me too.
He points out that I've told him in the past his loyalty and work ethic is one of the things I found attractive and always supported. Well 2.5 years in I'm missing him, I feel alone and isn't it him making us wait?

I'm self employed so when I visit him it's about $1000 between flights, paying someone to watch my dog, cover my shifts and turning away work (I also have a side gig on weekends) for a few days with him and he has told me until he's making more at his job he can't come here as often. 

So reddit, AITA for pressuring him to move sooner and putting the hurt of the LDR on him?

 *backround on the relationship* 
We met while my band was on tour years ago and when I came home I started a relationship with someone else so we didn't continue a friendship. He'd come to a show when my band would tour and we'd hang, there was always chemistry. We reconnected when he was visiting friends who live in the same city as me 2.5 years ago, just so happened we were both single and kept texting after he left. Eventually video and phone calls and more visits and then a year into it I said yes to defining the relationship. He's an awesome guy, we have the same life goals and great communication so no way I'm giving up on this relationship he's worth the wait even though I'm feeling fed up waiting atm.",AmItheAsshole
 for getting real mad about something dumb?,"Yall. I know this is stupid but when I tell you I am shooketh to my core. I absolutely love this man but I don’t know if I can handle this type of disrespect. Lemme set the stage. 

We were eating wings together. In bed. There was a towel down and I just had back surgery, please don’t come for me. 

I took a bite of a drumstick and laid it down for a momentary break from the feeding frenzy and THIS MAN TOOK MY HALF EATEN DRUM STICK AND ATE IT. There were OTHER WINGS. UNCLAIMED WINGS to choose from but this man chose MY WING. 

I was distraught because I am in love with this person and now I’m reconsidering my life plans because WHAT KIND OF MONSTER DOES THAT. When I could finally make words I politely asked him what in the Kentucky fried fuck he thinks he’s doing and he had the audacity to be surprised that I was upset at his chicken wing thievery. He thinks he was being kind by finishing something he thought I didn’t want before starting in on a new wing and I’m just taken aback that I never noticed this man has the manners of a rabid hyena.  

Am I the asshole?

",AmItheAsshole
 because I didn’t wanna do yard work?,"backstory: I 15f only met my dad 43m in June 2023 and 3 months ago moved from London to cairns Australia to live with him. The reason for this is that my mum and stepdad abused me my whole life. Public transport is terrible here- the bus comes every hour if they even show up. So I asked my dad if he could buy me a scooter and I would pay him back. However this was before I found out my visa doesn’t allow me to work but I still intend to pay him back however I can (probably selling art and craft at the market). My biggest fear is being completely dependant on someone which is why I really wanted the scooter because I didn’t like completely relying on my dad. 

Anyway so last week me and my dad planned to do yard work on Saturday however when he woke me up that morning (9am) I was extremely tired (I’d had a really hard week of school and it was the first week back from the holidays), so I wasn’t too enthusiastic about getting up. I don’t like waking up then immediately getting up but I did anyway because he really wanted me to get up. I got dressed then went outside but had no shoes on which he commented on so I went to put some on. He followed me to my room and said he’ll just do it on his own with an attitude and said I’m just like my mum. I put my shoes on then offered my help again and he denied it. So I spent the whole day in my room doing school work. The next morning I decide I’ll be the bigger person and apologise for not helping the day prior so I do and he says that an apology the next day isn’t good enough and that if I wanna ride my scooter from now on then I have to pay $20 everytime, which I think is unfair considering I offered to help twice and he said no. I ignored this and went to my room again for the day to do more schoolwork. Then the next day We had another argument about it with him essentially saying that he was gonna wipe my debt if I had helped him which he’s not doing now so I can “forget that” and that he’s bought me everything I needed or asked for since being here (let me clarify that this is things like clothes because I’ve had to change my dress sense since moving to this climate and a school laptop and money when I go out with friends and stuff. I’m honestly being 100% serious when I say I don’t remember asking for a lot of stuff which isn’t to say I didn’t though). My dad has anger issues and gets mad at me a lot for stupid reasons which he’s even admitted before. Because of my past I have a lot of self doubt when it comes to arguments and stuff so I felt I needed to turn to Reddit to ask… AITA? 

Also just to note i am fully aware that my dad is new to being a parent which I fully understand and am conscious of all the time which is why I don’t complain about him but I’m getting a bit sick of always suffering the backlash because of everyone else’s mistakes",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friends that I couldn’t care less about her relationship issues?,"So I 25m have a friend that I have known since I was 2 let’s call her Jan (25f)

So Jan has been with her Bf 27 m for 3 years and it’s has been hell for me ever since. 

They are the most toxic couple that I have ever met. They fight over the tiniest shit like “ why didn’t you answer me the first 30 min when I sent u a message” or “ I can’t believe your to tired to go out “. I can’t handle there shit anymore. I get that I’m supposed to always support my friend and I have tried but it’s Been the same dance for 3 years and I’m just done. 

Last night when we were grabbing a drink with our mutual friends she went on about their latest argument. About what? They were fighting about where to eat and the way she described it, it was a full on fight about what restaurant to pick. 

For some reason I snapped and just told her I don’t give a shit about her relationship troubles and that if they fight about stupid shit like this then they aren’t meant for one another. 

She called me a jerk and left. My other friends told me that they understand my frustration but I shouldn’t have snapped like that. So I’m wondering, aita?

Edit: just to make one thing clear over the course of their relationship I have urged her multiple times to leave him and even told her that his toxic but to no avail so I just gave up ",AmItheAsshole
 for respecting my parents boundaries and staying home with my puppy?,"I (33F) am an animal person, always have been, but my parents are not. We had a dog growing up and my parents kept it outside in a “pen” 24/7, 365 days a year, for 15 years with no exercise or mental stimulation, and still to this day think it was fine. Since the day I moved out I have had my own dogs, and just got a puppy after losing my boy dog over the summer who was 11. 

My kids (3&amp;5) , husband(33M) and I are animal people. I’ve worked in animal care for 15 years working in dog daycare, boarding, pet supplies, dog trainer and vet tech. My parents have always resisted my love for animals and have always had a boundary that my dogs are not allowed over. For a long period of time that was fine… I lived close by and my dogs were comfortable being left home for long periods of time, so it was easy for me to leave them home and go for a visit. 

Now, I live over an hour away with a 3 month old puppy who can only be left a few hours at a time. I got a different breed this time which is much more people oriented than my last dog and it’s taking longer to build comfort being left alone. I am not comfortable having someone come and pet sit as I also have an elderly dog with specific care that’s needed and lots of supervision is required between the two dogs right now. I would just not be comfortable with it. I also will not send our puppy to boarding/daycare, I am very familiar with the facilities around here and simply won’t use them, plus our puppy doesn’t have all of his shots yet. I am putting some serious hard work into training this puppy to be the best dog he can be. 

My husband is traveling for work this week and my parents said my kids and I should come over for a visit. I mentioned that I would love to, but that I would have to decline because I wasn’t willing to leave our puppy home for that long. My parents got angry, saying I was preventing them from seeing the kids. I said I was respecting their boundary and unfortunately it comes with the consequence of visits being harder and less frequent, but that I am happy with my choice and this is my lifestyle. They also won’t come to visit us because of the animals (two dogs and a bunny). My mom blames allergies but I know she takes an allergy pill to visit my sister who lives right down the road from them, and she has a cat. The conversation ended with my parents saying I was being vengeful and that IATA. 

So, AITA for staying home, even though that’s a choice I am choosing to make to comply with their boundary? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband his gift for his son won't be received the way he wants it to be?,"My husband Rich and I have been married for 15 years. We have two children together ages 13 and 11. Rich has two children from his marriage to his late wife, May. My stepkids are 24 and 23. My stepson is the oldest, stepdaughter is the youngest.

When Rich first found out he was going to be a father he started a scrapbook for his son that had photos and written memories and little mementos added in that he continued throughout the next 25 years. He did the same for his other three children as well. This book documents everything from fun memories to sweet and heartfelt ones to even some more heartbreaking ones, like the loss of May.

My husband has decided the scrapbook will be his gift to his son for his 25th birthday. He included all sorts of family photos and moments in this scrapbook including since we got married and had our kids. But both my stepkids have been pretty clear that they do not have a fondness for me or for their half siblings and they have no trace of us in their homes. When he moved out he left behind photos he was in that included me and my children (his half siblings). And when my husband mentioned he had forgotten some photos my stepson replied he had double and triple checked and had everything he wanted. My stepdaughter was a little more clear and she actually tossed any unwanted photos in the trash before she moved out.

On their social media they post family photos but funnily enough they never have me or their half siblings included. They never acknowledge us online at all.

My stepkids both also said they'd like it if their dad didn't bring us because if he's visiting they'd like to see him and only him. My husband brushed off that comment by saying he could stop by on his own too but they'd never see the rest of us if we didn't visit.

I'll say right here I was not an affair partner nor did I ever expect the kids to forget about their mom or replace her with me. Nor did I expect my husband to. I did not push myself on them. The kids never spoke out against us getting married or brought any issues to me or my husband about us. And we did talk to them. It really only became apparent after they became adults.

So when my husband brought up that he was going to gift the scrapbook to his son for his 25th birthday, I asked him if he was sure and he was like why not, his son would love it and he couldn't wait for us all to go through it together. I told him I wasn't so sure he'd love all of it given his refusal to have photos of me or the kids in his home. He told me it's not like he could remove them. I didn't comment. He asked me what I expected and then asked if I thought he'd rip those pages out or something. I said yes. He asked why I was being so negative and I told him that given the last several years I really didn't think the gift would be received the way he's expecting. My husband told me my negativity was too much and he was unhappy with me thinking of his kids like that.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 For having my own secret honey stash?,"Me 31 (M) and my partner 29 (F) have been living together for two years now. I like honey in my oatmeal. More specifically raw honey. Something about the flavor I just adore. So I always bought it even if it cost a bit more than regular.

But it just so happens apparently she decided this is ""our"" honey at one point last year. The little jar that used to last me two months went out in two weeks of her waffles. I wouldn't mind if we bought it together but I have to order it on amazon because no stores nearby sell the stuff.

I didn't want to seem like a cheapskate telling her to pay me for it so in february the next bottle I got I hid it in my desk where I usually take my breakfast. Yesterday she happen to caught me pouring it into the oatmeal.

She got upset saying it was childish not to share it at that we are adults. 

But is not sharing if she is taking 80% of it and paying nothing for it. 

Today she came demanding honey for her waffles and I told her ""It is my honey"" and like out of the bloody meme she went ""OUR honey"".

That started the discussion again.",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking out my wife’s cousin who’s been at my house for 4 months now?,"My wife’s cousin  is an international student from our home country, I’m a naturalized citizen and already have a stable job and my own home. 

So the Canadian government requires international students to have enough funds (roughly $10k when he came). He messaged me and asked for “show money”, as in he wants me to lend him money so he can prove to the government that he can support himself, I refused. Not outright, I just told him I don’t have funds. Yet he still found a way to get that money somehow. 

He came here last year and stayed with another relative for 8 months, while he was attending his college, he worked a full time job (cash of course 🙄). Something must have gone wrong because all the sudden he had to leave, so my wife invited him over to our house, WITHOUT consulting me. I was honestly shocked and felt betrayed. But I let it slide thinking it was going to be maybe a month before he finds a place of his own, boy was I wrong. 

While he was here, he was sleeping in the living room. It made me extremely uncomfortable having him around. I don’t like it when I come home, I can’t fuckin relax in my own living room because this bozo is using my TV or sleeping. I just don’t like having an extended guest staying over, I can’t be myself. He’s been here for FOUR months already. 

I asked my wife when he’s leaving, she responded with “as long as he needs, he’s going to be homeless!”. I told her “Why the fuck is it my financial responsibility to look after this man? He already broke multiple rules before even stepping foot here. He should have stayed home, I’m not the type of guy who’s tolerant of leeches. Not once has he offered to pay rent. He eats our food and lives here rent free. Most intl students, even scammy ones like him live on their own.” I made the ultimatum, either he stays or I leave. It worked, now he’s leaving next week, I managed to get him a lease from my co-worker who has a rental property. He’s going to be paying $800/months for a room, he complained about not being able to afford it. I told him he can take it or leave it, but he’s not staying at my house for another 4 months that’s for sure ",AmItheAsshole
 for not getting upset or convince the bride after I was uninvited to my friend’s wedding?,"This happened over the weekend but there’s still so much tension. 

One of my good friends, Matthew (26M) is getting married next month to Jennifer (26F). I (25F) have known Matthew since high school. We’ve both connected when it came to video games, especially Minecraft. Matthew has had his fair share of girlfriends over the years but when he met Jennifer 3 years ago, he said that he knew she was the one and they are madly in love with each other and I am so happy for them both. 

Last year, Matthew popped the question to Jennifer and she said yes. Jennifer’s demeanor towards me drastically changed after the engagement. She was distant towards me, she wouldn’t look at me and she would hardly speak to me which was weird since Jennifer was always so sweet and nice towards me. 

I’d still talk to Matthew and meet with him and our group of friends, sometimes with Jennifer and she would still act cold and not speak to me much. I kept my distance from Jennifer. Three months ago, we all received a save the date invitation and their wedding is going to take place at Matthew’s cabin 2 hours away and they were going to keep it small due to the size of the cabin so we were only allowed to bring one guest. That was when Jennifer acted extremely harsh and hostile towards me and said “bet you don’t have a plus one since you are so into my man.” I was taken aback. I asked her what the fuck she was talking about and she smirked and said I knew and to not act stupid. I ignored her remark and told her my boyfriend was coming. She looked surprised and left. I of course told Matthew about what Jennifer said to me and he was not happy, so he made her apologize to me. 

Then, last weekend, I was invited by matthew’s sister to go dress shopping with her and Jennifer. I declined at first because I wanted to keep my distance from Jennifer but Matthew’s sister assured me that she will deal with Jennifer and that our other friends will be there with us. So we go dress shopping and I found a beautiful dress that I thought would be perfect and I took a picture to send to my boyfriend since he planned on matching (I.e with a bow tie) with me. I tried the dress on and it was a perfect fit so I guess I got lucky. Jennifer was angry, called me names such as a whore, a boyfriend stealing bitch, and that I was officially uninvited to the wedding. She caused such a commotion, the employee of the store asked us to leave. 

I told Jennifer I didn’t want to come to the wedding anyway but I was going to because MY FRIEND was getting married. I told her if she didn’t want me at the wedding, fine. I don’t give a fuck since I won’t go to a wedding if the bride is going to be so rude to a guest. 

Matthew and our friends found out and I was getting texts left and right begging me to just come to the wedding. I told them I was happy to get uninvited and I’ll just spend the day with my boyfriend on the day of the wedding instead. They’re all mad at me for not fighting hard enough. 

AITA?

Edit: so my decision is final. I will not be going to the wedding and there’s no changing my mind about it. I will be sending a wedding gift to Matthew the day prior to the wedding instead. I told Matthew and all my friends that I won’t be going and they can’t convince me otherwise. Matthew also called me and asked if we can talk somewhere. I agreed but it’s to tell him in person that I won’t go so that way he knows I’m serious about that. 

Update: I met up with Matthew and brought my boyfriend along. Of course, he begged me to come to the wedding and he said he would beg Jennifer to let me attend. I told him it’s best if I wasn’t there. I told Matthew that Jennifer has a problem with me. Period. He said he doesn’t understand and he did ask her many times but Jennifer would continue to say she was just “stressed”. I got angry and said that’s bullshit and he knows that. My boyfriend also intervened and said to Matthew that he needs to wake up and realize Jennifer is crazy and he can’t keep defending her. Matthew said he loves her too much and doesn’t want to lose her. My boyfriend and I got up and told Matthew to let us know when he has a backbone. In the meantime, it’s best we don’t talk. I messaged all of our friends in the group to let them know I’m keeping a distance from Matthew because of Jennifer. He’s still my friend but at an arms length. I will still be sending him a gift regardless but I’m keeping my distance from Matthew. It seems like he is in denial and can’t comprehend what’s going on at all. He usually is in denial, ever since high school he would have a sense of denial. 

Another thing to mention is that Jennifer is nice to all of Matthew’s female friends. Just not with me. I’ve also gotten a message from two of our friends saying they have dropped out of attending the wedding because of Jennifer and that they are on my side. ",AmItheAsshole
 for “throwing a tantrum” because my family refuses to clean up after themselves?,"I’m a 25 year old male and live with my mom and sister. My dad passed away three years ago, which forced me to come back home to help pay the bills. Currently, I’m the main bread winner, my mom is semi retired (works part time) and my sister is a university student. 

I work a laborious job as a truck &amp; bus mechanic for my city’s transit agency, to keep up with the bills and have some savings, I’m forced to work 50-60 hrs/week. So I’m extremely tired when I’m home and just want to relax. 

The thing is, I can’t because the house is always so damn cluttered and messy all the time. Every week, on my only day off, I clean up the house. And not a damn day later, it returns to its pig sty state. Dishes are piled up in the sink, stains everywhere, dishes left all around the house, clothes on the ground, random Amazon boxes, and crumbs/hair everywhere. 

I tried communicating with them about my grievances, they always claim to be “busy” and point fingers. My mom would even claim that she “always cleans”. My sister would straight up scream and slam the door.

This week is my last straw, I did a deep spring cleaning (with no help, they were literally either laying in bed with the phone or playing games on the computer). I even bought a Dyson and carpet cleaner to get the job done faster and better. Everything looked great, I took a shower and went to bed. I wake up not 6 hours later, to the kitchen with piles of dishes, oil stains on almost every surface (my mom refuses to wash her hands when cooking), tea/coffee stains on the counter and table (my sister), flour on the floor, and the fridge disorganized AGAIN. I had work in 3 hours and didn’t have the energy nor time to clean up again. I was legitimately angry and screamed at both of them, I told them that they were lazy slobs who doesn’t respect my time. I told my mom that I’m moving out and won’t be financially supporting her, after she said “Oh, you’re throwing another tantrum already? I always clean up, don’t blame me…” ",AmItheAsshole
 if I didn't show up at my own wedding because my fiance invited my abusive father?,"I (24f) have been engaged to my fiance Mark (25m) for almost a year now and we've been planning our wedding for late June.

Mark is well aware of my situation with my father in the sense that he (47m) was very emotionally abusive to me and my siblings when I was a kid. I still have memories burned into my brain of my father screaming at us for anything and everything and insulting, mocking, and belittling us.

When I turned 18 and graduated high school, I immediately moved out and cut contact with my father and I haven't looked back since. 

Now comes the problem, I was speaking with Mark about the guest list and making sure everyone had assigned seats and each guest was compatible with those at their table, and he mentioned how he'd invited a ""Robert"" last minute. I asked who Robert was, forgetting about my father entirely, and he mentioned it was my dad. I immediately asked why he would invite my father to our wedding and if he was joking but he wasn't.

Mark argued that my father would become his father after the wedding and he wanted to get to know family and not start off our marriage by hurting his family. I argued that my father wasn't family and he wasn't a part of my life and hasn't been since I was 18, almost 6 years ago. He told me he had talked to my younger sister (19f) about the situation and they had agreed my father should attend, even to stand in the back, to be a part of our special day.

I tried to explain the extent of the emotional abuse but Mark was determined that it couldn't have been ""that bad"" because I was never hit. I also believe my little sister had a lot to do with this, as she was like the golden child to our father and she still maintained a relationship with him. 

I told Mark that I was considering not showing up if my father would be there,  because the emotional abuse changed me entirely and I can't handle seeing him or being around him. Mark told me I was being dramatic and that maybe I should cool off and think it over, and married couples compromise for each other so I should be a little lenient about this issue. He left shortly after and I've been wallowing in my thoughts wondering what to do.

So, WIBTA for not showing up at my own wedding because my fiance invited my abusive father?


Edit: because some of you are asking, I would cancel the wedding ahead of time, not just lead everyone on to believe there's a wedding and just no show. I worded it like that because that was what I said in the moment to mark about wanting to just not show up at our wedding at all because of this, but I would 100% give our guests a heads up and cancel everything in advance.",AmItheAsshole
 for accidentally walking in on my sister-in-law in the shower?,"My wife and I are staying at her parents house for a vacation while we visit them. It’s a big house and her older sister and her older sisters husband are also there.

The bedroom my wife and I are staying in is right next to the bedroom her older sister and husband are in and there’s a single bathroom in that corridor, while her parents have their own bathroom.

Anyway it was around noon during the day, most of the people were out, I went to the bathroom.  Now the shower was running but the laundry washing machine was also running and the laundry is on the same corridor.  So I thought the wooshy sound was from the laundry and not the running shower.

I walked in and saw my SIL completely naked, like completely, shower curtain wasn’t even pulled.  I saw everything and it’s still burned into my mind if I close my eyes. I was like a deer in the headlights and it took me a few seconds to get my composure then apologise and leave. She didn’t scream or anything.

I thought that was it, then later my brother in law had a private “talk” about what happened.  It seems my SIL dobbed me in.  I told him my version of events and he left it at that but I don’t think he buys it.  I told the story to my wife, she supports me and believes me completely.  All my other in laws have been silent with me and treating me like a weirdo pervert.  They think I genuinely was trying to spy on her, like they won’t say it but I feel they’re judging me and suspecting me

It’s not my fault she didn’t lock the door (the door does have like an old type of lock) and I genuinely thought the sound was the washing machine!!!

AITA fir ACCIDENTALLY walking in on my SIL naked in the shower??",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting time to accommodate to a mentally delayed adult at a child's party,"I want to preface this with 2 things

1. I have dealing with a medical condition that  will need surgery and has kept me from a regular qualitative life for several months. I went a little over board with making my child's birthday party special.  I have spent several hundred dollars 

2. My husband's relative is a middle aged person with significant mental delays. They have the understanding of roughly a 4 yearold.  They say incredibly inappropriate things on a regular basis ( including those of a sexual nature), do not understand physical boundaries and frequently touch people even when asked to stop, has put people in compromising positions because any time a new person is introduced to them they hound them until they add them on social media and then call them over and over all day and night, and all around need many accommodations and conversations when participating in public activities 

Now here is where things got tricky.  

My child's birthday has been planned for 3 months and is in less than a week. We have hired both a photographer and one of those princess companies.  I have a Facebook group with all of this so my child's friends parents ( these are 3-5 yearolds) were aware of everything that was going on. YESTERDAY I was informed that my mother in law was planning to bring my husband's ADULT mentally under developed family member to my child's party and intended for this adult to participate in the children's activities. 

I told them this was an incredibly difficult position to put me as I had not set up anything with the actor I hired to confirm they could accommodate to this and I was unable to explain the situation with the other children's parents .  In this specific situation knowing the types of behaviors this person often presents both my husband and myself feel it would have been more appropriate to do so. I offered that instead they come to my child's recital in a few weeks as that is a public space that is accommodating to persons of different abilities while my home and this party are not as I was not given adequate time to make those accommodations. 

His family are now all upset with me because "" this is a tiny wrench in your perfect plans and you are making it all about you"" calling me unkind and saying we are being discriminating against a person with disabilities. I continued to state this is an adult at a child's event. A disabled child at a child's event would have not been an issue but this is an adult they intend to have participating with children at a childs event. 


Am I being unreasonable for saying I should have been given adequate time for making the proper plans and accommodations as well as bare minimum making sure this is something a child's entertainer was able to accommodate to this aswell?",AmItheAsshole
 For Not Letting my Mom Bring her Dog,"I've been with my husband for 12 years now.  My husband has an allergy to cats and dogs and was on medication as a child for their family dog.  Now, as a family we don't have animals and will not for this reason.  My Mom has a small dog that she refers to as her ""child"".  She takes this thing EVERYWHERE.  He has a stroller and when I say he goes everywhere, she will not go to stores, etc. if they don't allow him to enter.  When she first got him, she had two and would leave them home together at appropriate times (eating out, etc.) and now since the one died this dog has morphed, this solo dog into an obsession.  Fast forward, I now have a 1.5 year old son and my husband does not want her dog in our home.  My Mom often tells me how she resents my husband because she is missing out on my son growing up by not being able to have her dog at our house.  I've offered to drop him (my son) at her house and do events with her on a weekly basis, but for some reason this isn't enough.  My husbands Mom watches our son every Tuesday and she believes it be unfair that she cannot do the same. She tells me her home is not big enough for my son, and he will get bored there.  She only wants to watch him at our house, with her dog in tow.  She told me today that because her dog is not welcome now, that when he dies, she will still not come over because of the resentment.  I've told her this is a battle I am not willing to have with my husband, and that this is a boundary that I am not willing to sacrifice.  This is a constant battle with her and she makes me feel terrible that I am making her lose out on a relationship with my son.  She lives 45 minutes away and I drive down to bring my son to her house and invite her to events regularly, of which, we welcome her ""child"". ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to give my nephew a gift instead of cash?,"So my SIL is a new and young mom. She also was kind of raised in the backwoods without many girl friends or friends in general so I sort of adopted her into my social circle. She makes a lot of social faux paus like insisting I’m a large in clothing literally every time we shop and gifting me XXL’s that her very large mother wears because she’s an XXS and I’m XS/S with a booty… And somehow that makes me the same size as her mother… (make it make sense lol) but I chalk it up to her up bringing and try and move on.

So her son’s birthday is coming up and each year she makes another poor etiquette mistake of telling all the guests what to buy. I sense she’s a struggling mom so I again excuse her and assume that’s the reason why but she’s really wanting lavish things like a $8,000 playhouse her mother actually buys. I’m by no means poor but am building a house right now so trying to be smart with my finances. SIL sees me however as the rich aunty. She keeps asking for girls days to hang out, which I agree to… But then somehow I’m spending 3 hours down a toy aisle while she tells me what her son would and wouldn’t love. I see however this fairly expensive education focused toy one day that has great reviews and decide that would be great to prep the kid for upcoming school. It’s also something I bond with him over as I love to read with him and teach what I can so that’s sort of our bond right now.

Well SIL invites me and her brother to go shopping for themed outfits to match the parties theme that she wants all the main family to wear… While there I check the store for the gift but it’s out of stock in our location but in stock in a store right by her home. She offers to wrap the present and buy it and store it there for the party if I just give her the large sum of money to buy it. I agree and Venmo the cash. Next day I show up to the party and no one is wearing the themed outfit she sort of forced me to buy so I look like an idiot with extended family. I ask her where the gift is: she didn't have time but announces to everyone I gifted her that large sum of money. I kind of get annoyed at this point but wasn’t going to cause a scene.

A few weeks go by and I ask her if she had ordered the gift yet. She told me my husband had ok’d for her to just pocket the money instead, even though this was my money and gift as he got something separate. Husband steps in and gets on her butt saying buy the gift or give the money back so we could buy it for her. Starts world war 3 with the flying monkeys in the family and I’m now the monster who took away a kids present… I’m just in shock and honestly don’t know what to do. She gave the money back after blowing things completely out of proportion and calling up everyone to cry about what a monster I was. I honestly just want to go buy a cheap $1 toy and throw it in her face but the kid didn’t do anything wrong. AITA for all this?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to reschedule my cats vet visit due to tardiness in the vets part? ,"I was taking my cat in for a vet visit as he's been losing weight out of nowhere and he needed to get an ultrasound and X-ray to look for possible signs of cancer (he had his annual well visit a few months ago blood results were normal but vet says it doesn't rule out cancer and he lost weight from the year before so just to keep an eye on it. Well it's been A few months and his weight continues to drop so I made an appointment). 

But he acts up for his vet visits so he needs gabapentin (a sedative) so he can be examined, especially for X-ray/ultra sounds without the sedation he'll have none of it. I need to give it to him 2 hours prior to vet visit and I told them they needed to let me know at least 3 hours in advance if the vet is running excessively late so we can reschedule (as he is up against the clock with the gabapentin). Of course they didn't let me know that vet was running super late. 

So the meds were wearing off by the time they got around to me and because he's difficult for his exams without it they wanted me to reschedule. I told them no that i specifically stated I needed to be notified if they were running late and I wasn't and I'm not going to drug my cat 2 or more or God knows how many more times because of tardiness in their part, that the lateness was on their end not mine so they needed to examine him as is because I'm not putting him through this process over and over because they cant be on time. 

AITA? 

EDIT: Should be noted u live in the middle of nowhere, no other vets in town. 

The next one is hours away ",AmItheAsshole
 for being in my granddaughter life by my ex son in law even though my daughter hates me,"I will keep this as clear as possible. My daughter used to be married to Ryan. Ryan cheated on her and they divorced. During the divorce my daughter learned she was pregnant.  She informed me she wasn’t going to tell Ryan and I thought she was joking. The baby was born and she was telling everyone that Ryan abandoned the kid.

I couldn’t do it, even if he was a bad partner my grandkid deserved to have her father in her life. So I told Ryan and he was pissed to be blunt. A huge court custody issue and in the end he got partial custody. My daughter went no contact due to me betraying her by telling Ryan. 

Since then I haven’t really heard from my daughter. Ryan has been in contact with me, he was really grateful that I informed him. My grandchild is now 4 and during his custody time he will sometime visit me. I am very happy to have a relationship with my grandchild and try to be a good grandma.

I got a call from my daughter calling me a dick, that if I had any respect for her I will stay out of her kids life. Ryan informed me that legally she can’t do crap about this situation. So the moral question is am I jerk for being in my grandchild’s lie even if my daughter hates it.",AmItheAsshole
H for thinking my husband cant do everything I can do and vise versa?,"Am I the asshole for thinking my husband can’t do everything I do all day long? 
My husband comes home everyday saying how he wish he could be a woman because he would have the house cleaned, kids fed and ready, etc. 
I am a full time stay at home Mom of 2 kids under 3, I also run a successful cookie business out of our home. 
Anytime I try to say I’m having a bad day, it complain about anything he says he could do it in a heartbeat and how he wishes he could sit around all day baking cookies and playing with the kids. I told him he just couldn’t handle the kids all day long much less running a business as well and he just isn’t giving up that argument. I don’t try and say I can do his job which is physical labor landscaping outside in the heat : cold etc. 
Just trying to get some advice because I’m tired of having this argument everyday. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not opening my hotel door to a stranger?,"I've been travelling around Sri Lanka for the past month, and have had a couple of weird experiences with other guests knocking on my door.

My go to response is to absolutely not answer, but I was wondering if I was in the wrong, or if there was something else I should have done?

For context, I'm travelling alone, and I'm 28/M. 

The first incident was at a small hotel by the coast. The place had six rooms, three on the ground floor and three on the second floor. The ones on the second floor (where I was) were all connected by a balcony and had nice big glass screens on the front to see out. 

During the night, around 3am, I wake up to a light coming through the window. Then some knocking on the window/door too. My first instinct was to pretend I was sleeping, so I did that.

They keep shining, keep knocking, and start talking too. Something like ""Hello. Hello. Hello, I need help. Hello. I need help. Hello, I've lost my key I need help. Hello. Hello. Hello."", with an occasional ""Please open your eyes"" or ""I don't want to be stuck out here all night"".

He was speaking in a very calm voice and that went on for probably *half an hour*, repeating the same things and shining the light in (with the knocking and light shining/staring in my window the whole time). 

At the same time he was calling someone, presumably a number listed for the hotel, so every now and again he'd stop and try and communicate with them. I guess it eventually worked, as someone came to let him in.

I assume he was drunk or on drugs (he spoke like it), and I don't feel bad bout not letting him in. It was a safe area, he was on the phone to the hotel, and there was nothing I could have done anyway. 

What I'm wondering is, if other people would have let him in? Or even reported the incident to someone? I wasn't too scared, but for someone else that could have been a terrifying experience.

Like I understand losing your key on a night out sucks, especially at a hotel with no 24/7 reception, but is knocking on a random guests door at 3am and wanting them to help not insane? Especially when you have a working phone? Even without the phone, just wait in the lobby for a few hours? 

Next incident was a few weeks later, and thankfully less creepy. I was trying to sleep around 11pm, but not having much luck because of some very loud people in the next room. 

Eventually we had a power cut (they were a constant issue in this hotel), and I heard the noisy neighbours storm out of their room and start knocking on my (and another guests) door, saying there was a power cut (like, yeah. What do you want me to do?). 

Thankfully it only lasted a couple of minutes before the owner came over to talk to them.

In my head, knocking on someone elses hotel door is a HUGE no go. Especially not at night. And I will definitely not answer unless you are a member of staff at that hotel. That is the norm, right?",AmItheAsshole
 for paying for all my staff to go to Disney World except for one?,"I run a successful publishing business. We run several websites, publish ebooks, etc. it is all about the content.

Most years, I take my staff on trips overseas, assuming they have met their productivity targets. They continue to get paid, and it does not come off their holiday time. This year, we are going to Orlando. Each staff members gets the trip paid for, plus £2,000 spending money for the 2 weeks. They bring their family.

As I said, I only pay of production targets are hit, and one person failed repeatedly. Low content production, low idea count, low content engagement. I'm talking 30% of the rest of the staff. All staff are responsible for their own projects. She has not been put on the wrong task. She's just not coming up with good money making ideas for content. Just doing clickbait or targeting markets notorious for ad blocking.

I have opted not to fire her, just to see if production increases next year. However, she has not earned enough to justify the trip to Disney world. I'll still give her holiday pay and £1.5k but she can stay at home.

While the other staff agree this is for the best, she and her family are calling me a dick and saying I should take her anyway. I don't think I should . She still has a job and she knew what the requirements to get the trip were. She failed and had plenty of opportunity to suceed.

It's getting to the point where I may need to fire her, not because of low production but I'm feeling fearful of what her family may do  

I'm wondering if I was the arsehole for not bringing her along?",AmItheAsshole
 for getting upset when my boyfriend laughed at/made fun of my singing and called it “cute”?,"I (23F) am a singer as a hobby, but I’ve been in singing classes and choir and such for the vast majority of my life. I love doing it. My boyfriend (21M) is very supportive of this hobby and has always loved my voice. We haven’t had any issues regarding this until now.

Yesterday, I asked my boyfriend for his opinion on what song I should sing for the open mic karaoke even coming up in a month. I texted him my top choices and sent him voice memos of me singing short clips of each song. One of the first songs I sent him was Usseewa by Ado. For those who haven’t heard it, it’s a pretty edgy J-rock song by a girl, with a low voice and growling and all. I am not usually one to sing any kind of rock because I have a hard time giving my voice that edge, it’s too smooth and soft. And I have a hard time expressing anger or intimidation in general because of my forgiving, shy, and pacifistic nature as a person. But I want to get better at doing that, starting with my music. I want to be able to sing all kinda of genres. And I thought I really managed to pull off this song well. I practiced it a lot precisely because I like it so much, the message resonates with me, and it’s perfect for practicing a genre I don’t normally do. 

Well, my boyfriend called me after I sent the voice memo to him, and he was laughing his ass off. Through laughing tears, he told me how cute I sounded “trying to growl.” I was pissed. Not only did I genuinely put hard work into the song, I was a bit triggered because all of my exes have said that to me before whenever I was angry or attempting to be intimidating or cool or edgy in any way. They compared me to a yappy little fluffy dog, or a baby tiger trying to roar but just meowing instead. I hate it. It’s so fucking condescending. I want to be taken seriously as a person, not just seen as some fragile and cutesy little baby all the time. I want to be recognized as the badass grown woman that I am, even though I like being cutesy sometimes. And I want to be taken seriously as a multi-faceted artist. I’m tired of men looking down on me just because I’m a “soft” woman.

Anyway, what was even worse is that he thought I was pretending to be mad as a joke at first, so he kept laughing. Then I went off on him and told him everything I’ve written in the previous paragraph. He tried to backtrack by saying, “I didn’t know you were actually mad,” “Nobody is good at everything,” I still like your voice in other songs,” “You can try doing X song instead,” etc., but it honestly just made me feel worse. He still doesn’t understand why I’m mad. He thinks I’m overreacting. I was already insecure about my singing abilities before, and this made me feel 10x worse. But am I really overreacting? My family says I have a tendency to do that so idk. AITA?

EDIT: I keep seeing everyone saying this, so I want to clarify - I’m not upset about the fact he gave me honest criticism. I have been criticized many times before, by singing teachers, peers, and even my own parents. You can’t do any kind of art without being criticized. That’s just the reality of it. I know I’m far from sounding perfect. I accept their criticism and use it to improve. I respect their honesty. My boyfriend also usually gives me comprehensive feedback on how to improve. The problem this time was that I perceive the way my boyfriend laughed and called it “cute” as being condescending and hurtful instead of constructive or helpful. I have a big issue with people being condescending towards me and not being taken seriously. But again, I feel yelling at him may have taken it a bit too far. 

EDIT 2: I would also like to clarify that my boyfriend and I are both autistic and our poor social/communication skills may be influencing the situation. Also, the open mic is happening at an anime convention. I’m not just trying to be some cringe weeb, the entire place is gonna be filled with cringe weebs lol",AmItheAsshole
 if I do not go through with my cat’s Life Saving Surgery,"My cat Squash, who is 2 years old, had to get a life saving surgery about 10 months ago to remove foreign objects from his stomach because they were blocking his intestines. 

He is extremely food motivated, and we have basically Squash-proofed our entire house to prevent him from eating non-edible objects ever again, but you never know what he’ll put in his mouth and try to swallow. Last time, it was reusable silicone straws, and he ate about 4 of them out of the sink. This time, they found multiple things. It was random small debris  that had clumped up, things like beads and string, as well as another silicone straw. 

We’ve sworn off those straws obviously in order to prevent this from happening again, but my friend came over to my house about 3 weeks ago carrying a cup with that type of straw, and he immediately started eating it as soon as he sniffed it out (I did not know she brought the cup in until after she told me he ate the straw off of it). He is so young and this has already happened twice, and he never learns so I assume it’s going to happen again numerous times. 

The surgery last time was about $7,000, and if we have to get surgery again, I do not know if my partner and I can justify spending that again, and possibly yet again down the road, maybe even the near future. He just eats everything in sight, he’s been like since day 1, and this would completely deplete our savings AGAIN should we decide to go through with this tonight. 

Last night, they gave him fluids, and in about an hour I am going to bring him in to see if the fluids worked or not, but I think they will say he needs surgery. After all this, and the inevitability of it happening again in the future, I am not sure whether I will say yes to the surgery or not. I also do not want my cat to go through the pain of surgeries his whole life, constantly removing things from his stomach.

 I feel like a terrible person, but no one should ever have to be put in this moral dilemma in the first place. All of my friends and family are saying to let him go, too. My partner and I are 23 and 24, new college graduates, and are not exactly financially secure in the first place. We love him infinitely but we are scared that the surgery may not be best for our family in the long run. Is it valid to say no to the surgery? 

TDLR:
My partner and I are considering saying no to a life- saving surgery for our cat because of how it will put us in major debt, also because we have already given him this surgery, and may have to do so again in the future. Are we assholes if we let our cat go because he continues to eat non-edible things and needs them surgically removed? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling my sister about my elopement plans,"Hello! I F25 and my fiancé F25 are eloping this summer in June. We plan to run away and get married just us two. We are not announcing our elopement date, sending out notices or expecting gifts. We just want a simple wedding in the mountains with no drama.

We planned our elopement beginning of this year. \[DISCLAIMER: I was going to plan a reception later in the year, so our families could also have a day to celebrate. Not sure if I will be doing that anymore. \] Anyway, my fiancé told his mother the day we are getting married and his mom and my mom are friends and will talk on the phone every now and then. I was nervous she was going to tell my mom our plans, and my mom would get mad that I didn't tell her beforehand. So I told my mom one week ago our wedding plans.

My mom and dad also eloped in the mountains, so I didn't think they were going to have an issue.  Yesterday, my mom texted me ""Found out your sister has no idea your getting married. Wanna talk about that?""

I do not have a close relationship with my sister. We do not talk except for birthdays and holidays.

My fiancé hasn't even told his sisters, and he talks to them everyday

We aren't really calling people to tell them ""Save the date we are getting married"" because nobody is invited, and we don't want any gifts.

I am not doing any bridal activities. No bridal shower, no bach party, nothing.

I called my sister the second I got engaged and we had a big engagement party where **we told everyone we are  going to elope and not have a wedding.**

My mom then proceeded to say it would have been nice to know its a secret elopement and now I have to deal with the consequences of my actions instead of them celebrating us getting married. We had our elopement planned for months before I even told my mom.  We have very separate lives, I also lived in a different city from my family since I was 18. And again, we are not having a secret wedding, we just aren't announcing it and calling everyone like we did when we got engaged. And of course I would have told my sister after we got married that we eloped, like I did after we got engaged. Please let me know if I should have immediately called my sister to tell her my wedding plans and if I am in the wrong. Thanks.",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to help my daughter with her visa application to study in Canada.,"I live in India and have a daughter who has applied to certain Canadian universities. This is despite us wanting her to study in India itself. She applied anyway and has been begging to let her attend and accepted her offer and saying that she will pay me back when she is older.

She got accepted to some university in Canada in the French part of Canada  (montreal) and she does not even speak French. She wants to study computer science. I feel like this is a big mistake and not worth the cost.  IT is booming in India and there are more jobs here and lots of layoffs in Canada and western countries. India has very good schools for studying computer science and she could live at home and cut costs. 

I am also concerned about her safety as a girl alone in another country and have heard horrible reports about things Indian girls who have gone to study have experienced in the US and Canada.

She asked me for help for the proof of funds for her student visa and I refused to help her. She says she will find a way to pay for it but she seems to have no plan to actually do so. She also still keeps asking me to reconsider and pay for it thus contradicting herself.

She brought up the fact that my son studied electrical engineering in Canada and I had no problem paying for it. However I feel like these are different situations because for electrical engineering, India has less opportunities and he was able to find a job in Canada. I don't think she has the ability to cope with engineering and that is why she is doing science as an easier alternative. And in any case software jobs are plentiful in India. I had asked her if she would consider engineering or medicine and she does not want to. It is also less of a safety issue for a boy and my son also went to the English speaking part of Canada and tells me the french part is quite bad.",AmItheAsshole
", Am I the asshole? Puppy Edition-Roommates ","This past weekend I went on a trip and my housemates stayed watching my puppy. They know that he is somewhat notorious for chewing things, well being a puppy and all, but that being said, apparently they left a collectible hat on top of the couch unattended. How it happened, I come back home to find a hat on my stairs and ask “hey what’s *inserts name* hat doing on my stairs?” With the reply “oh, look at the back of it” and my immediate response was “oh no, why is it on my stairs though? Am I supposed to pay for it?” And they replied “Well it was your dog, and it was only on the couch for 3 seconds”. Now in my mind, I’m just thinking a bunch of things like for example, why didn’t they text me when it happened, or how could it have only been 3 seconds with the whole back end chewed off, and lastly, I wasn’t even here to watch him! I feel like ultimately, it was their responsibility, as they were the people at home, to keep an eye on their things. Why should I have to pay for it? That’s like me watching their dog, and leaving all of my kids toys and my things out and about, and then demanding they pay for damages for my negligence. I don’t know, maybe I would’ve offered to buy him a new hat, if he hadn’t just left it on my stairs (imo that was pretty passive aggressive, or non-communicative) and told me at the time of it happening. I don’t know, maybe I’m just an ass, but if it was the other way around, I’d just be like fuck, my hat! And moved on, cause I’m the one responsible for the dog when they’re not home. Wdyt? ",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting more from my boyfriend?,"My boyfriend (31) and I (40, two kids from previous relationship) have been dating for 4 years, off and on. He doesn't have a car. Because I am a single mom who works full-time, we only have one day a week together. We're both okay with this: I'm busy with my young kids and he's content staying in his apartment and playing video games. We're both loners/more on the antisocial side, haha. We have a lot of common interests for the most part.

However, I go back and forth feeling frustrated. Because he doesn't have a car, I have to drive 25 minutes to him every week. The time spent driving isn't the issue - I'm just annoyed that I always have to go to him or else we don't hang out. When I do drive to his apartment, we spend that time playing video games... Which, again is FINE but I wish he'd have some different ideas. Going places, walks, etc. I've mentioned this before, which usually ends in an argument. I've also said ""hey let's go on a walk,"" but then it's a quick walk around the apartment complex. 

I've also mentioned him maybe getting a car in the future but he says he doesn't have the money. He works full-time as well (making more than minimum wage) and doesn't have kids, doesn't go anywhere, so... Not sure where his money is going. But I feel like that's not my place to ask. He also doesn't show any interest in spending time with me AND my kids. I get it. Kids aren't for everyone but if you date someone with kids, it's usually a package deal. I just feel like I'm reaching out all the time and he's not putting forth the same effort. 

TL;DR: Don't know if I'm expecting too much from a 31 year old I'm dating when it comes to wanting to hang out with me (AND my kids) and eventually buying a car. ",AmItheAsshole
 for snapping at my girlfriend?,"So we were walking down the park with my mom's dog, and I was sending a quick text to my guy friend before focusing on my gf. She then came up to me and did the give me gesture. Was confused as to what she wanted, then she out of nowhere reached into my pocket and took out my phone. I got upset at this and asked her to hand me my phone. She said why should she, and I told her, 'You wouldn't like it when I take your phone, do I?' and she just said 'we're in a relationship. I trust you with my phone, so why are you snapping at me for?' she got really upset for the whole day, and we talked it out. I told her sorry, and that I didn't want her to keep snatching my phone like that, and she said that she feels that she couldn't trust me due to how this was the third time I snapped at her for taking my phone.

 Things are died down now, but I just want to know if I was the asshole for snapping at her

EDIT: The reason she wanted the phone was because she needed the hotspot to use her phone for spotify",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting an apology from my aggressive brother?,"I (33F) and my fiance (35M) left a vacation with my family early due to my brother's hostile behaviour. Earlier in the day my brother ""Steve"" started shouting at my partner for swearing at another driver on the road who was doing something dangerous. I was in the front passenger seat and my brother was in the back. He flipped out at my partner calling him childish etc and became so distressed he demanded to be let out of the car. I cried ""No please, calm down Steve its okay"" My fiance did pull over his thought being maybe he needs to let off steam and relax.

 I should mention that me, my partner and my brother are neurodivergent. 

  
I was so worried for Steve we were about 4 miles away from the holiday house and he didn't have any food or water.  
Me and partner drove back to the house and told my parents what happened and that we were really worried about his wellbeing. My mum was surprisingly nonchalant about it. Steve returned after about 2 hours and seemed fine we spoke about the incident and everything seemed smoothed over.  
We all had fun in the garden together as a family- my partner mentioned how grateful he was to my parents for organising the holiday.   
In the evening, Steve had a LOT to drink. He'd started taking some of my drinks without asking but I was scared to confront him about it because of the outburst earlier. Me and my fiance went to bed and heard Steve talking to himself in the bathroom, he seemed unwell.   
I asked politely for him to be quiet and he continued on. My partner went to see what was going on in bathroom when Steve lunged towards him, hitting and and shouting abuse. My partner was able to restrain him but this made Steve even worse. Then we all went to the living room, Steve continuing to abuse me and my partner and my Mum started defending Steve!  
I was crying hysterically because I felt Steve had ruined this wonderful holiday for no reason and the things they were saying about my partner were untrue and hurtful. I feel complex because it brought up feelings from the past of my Mum being horribly biphobic towards me, my childhood of being misunderstood and my abusive ex.  
They were practically accusing my partner as being abusive which felt like a kick in the face. When I was actually being abused my family did very little to help, now I am finally free and happy they are tearing me down.  
Me and my fiance drove home then and there, we were genuinely scared of being harmed and just wanted to be home and safe. On leaving my Mum seemed amicable, promising to talk it through with us both later.  
However, when I've asked for my brother to apologise to me and my partner, he won't. Now my Mum is calling and texting me saying those same untrue things about my partner and refuses to speak to him. We offered to come round to talk but my Mum said she wanted me to come over on my own. I am scared to do that. Have I been an arsehole for wanting this to be resolved?",AmItheAsshole
H for asking my mom why she would think I would like or use my Christmas gifts.,"To start this off I’m autistic and although this doesn’t excuse my behavior I realize that I do not possess what most people would call a filter (you know that voice in your head telling you when or when not to say something) I also have an issue understanding social cues. thanks for understanding let’s move on.

This starts the day before Christmas me and my family were bowling (I’m on my schools bowling team) and I was in the lead. On the topic of hopes for Christmas this year I just mentioned my basic list some clothes, legos, and a weighted blanket and a curve ball (bowling) this is pretty music all I wanted, and I was pretty specific in what I wanted after all I’m a specific person. This list is important. 

When I mentioned the curve ball my mom said in a tone I can only describe as “your getting this thing I’ve promised you for months” and I was a happy camper! Until the next morning with the rest of my family and I started opening gifts I started to see a pattern, me or my sister would open a gift and a small amount of time later I or her would receive the same gift but the issue I found with this was that these gifts were catered almost exclusively to my sister.

 Like when I opened a hair brush set, I have extremely short hair that can’t even be put in a pony but my sister has long hair. Or when I got a face mask kit I know skin care is good but it’s not really my thing but it is my sisters. This pattern kept repeating except for a few items until me my sister and my brother all open heavy boxes to find that my parents got us all weighted blankets the one big item I wanted and got no matter how much I tried no longer felt special and even with what I got I couldn’t help but cry not only feeling bad for feeling upset over gifts but also over feeling like my parents didn’t even know me.

 My mom saw me crying asked if she did “something wrong in trying to do something nice for me” and I flat out asked her what use she would think I would have for a hair brush set that I won’t use? And she got angry and told me “I thought you wanted a brush set” (I never looked at for myself or told her I wanted anything like that) I replied “if your talking about when we went shopping for my SIBLINGS then yea I looked but that was for my Sister! Not to mention I told you many time during that trip I was only looking for gifts for them not for me” and that’s when my Sister chimed in and stated “stop your being an bratty AH”
And although I know I could’ve been better understanding AITAH?
",AmItheAsshole
 for continuously bringing up my abuse?,"Just as a pre-warning, this is going to be kinda long because I have a lot to think about.

  
I am an 18 year old trans man who, for as long as I could remember, has been abused and neglected by my parents (both 55). 

  
I'll try to provide some key points. I have no other family living in this country. I have been estranged from 2/3s of my extended family because of my identity. The only person who supports me and has ever been kind to me, my 32 year old cousin, lives in Chicago (I am in the UK and my family is Eastern European). 

  
I am physically disabled and have a learning disability. I do not have a job and cannot currently find one due to my health, so this means I obviously can't move out though I would love to. I am starting university next year, though because I'll be going to a school in the middle of London, it'll be incredibly expensive.

  
The main problem with living here is that my parents seem to f\*cking love making my life as miserable as possible. They're both as bigoted as you could imagine, and somehow everything in the world is my fault. They run the whole gambit - gaslighting, threats, guilt-tripping, blaming me for being disabled (yes, really), etc.

  
So, to cut to the main issue. Last month for UK Easter we had our cousins around for a sleepover. And seeing the way my parents doted on them and my brother (the golden child, 2 years younger than me btw) got to me more than it should've. I tried not to say anything but mother still noticed. That turned into a huge screaming match that got everyone saw. I was told that I'm a selfish narcissist for constantly bringing up my abuse for sympathy points, especially when other people are around.   


But like, I can't see it that way. I'll admit that I am looking for sympathy, but not because I'm a narcissist. I just want people to respect what I went through and \*still\* go through. I lost my whole childhood. I never had any friends until I was 17. I get so irrationally jealous of every family I see in public. My best friend's mum gave me a pat on the head once and I had to hide before I burst out crying. It isn't fair that they just get to do this to me with no consequences. They've admitted to my face that they don't regret any of it. So me bringing up my abuse is just my tiny way of getting revenge. I get to grieve my childhood, goddamnit. It's still insanely hard to cope.  


But is it going too far? Am I potentially making the other guests uncomfortable? Easter for my home country is this weekend and we're having a lot of people over so I'm already mentally preparing for that. What should I do? Keep my head down? Not show up at all?   
Thanks for reading.",AmItheAsshole
 for giving wrong information to my stepsister?,"so my(18) dad recently married a woman who has a 17yo daughter. she doesn't have any friends and they always insists I include her in everything and take her with me when I go out with my friends. just imagine how annoying that is.

anyway a week ago it was my birthday and I was planning to go to a restaurant with all my friends. she asked if she could come and I said no. they insisted. I said fine but with the condition that I won't give you a ride as I'm planning to give a ride to a bunch of my friends

she agreed. I told her that we are going to X restaurant at 6.

well we weren't planning to go there. we went to another restaurant. in the middle of the party she called and asked why we are not there yet. I told her we will be late and just wait there. then I turned off my phone.

well I came back home to find her and her mom so angry. they were yelling at me for like an hour calling me a bunch of names but I think she deserved it for not taking no for an answer",AmItheAsshole
H for saying no to my mother in law's visit?,"For background, I get along really well with my wife's parents. We live very far from them so when they do visit, I genuinely enjoy spending time with them, and encourage the bonds they have with our kids. However, over the past year, my MIL has been asking to visit us by herself within a month or two after her and my FIL just stayed with us. Their visits are typically 6-8 weeks and when they leave, we're sad for a few days, but quickly adapt to being a nuclear family in our own space again. 

I'm not sure if it's because it's just the two of them in their home, boredom, jealousy of the time my parents have with the grandkids (who also live very far from us), or a combination of all three, but my MIL has been spending at least half the past year with us and pushing for more frequent visits alone. 

I thought it was just me overthinking things but my wife brought it up recently and asked me if I was okay with her mom being around more frequently. She knows I love her parents but she also gets tired out from the visits because she's the one who has to plan out things for her mom to do while she's here, as she's WFH and is with her mom most of the time. I was honest and told her that it was great to see her mom, but it was getting to be exhausting since it felt like we were more limited with the time we could go on our own vacations or do other things as a family. My wife said she understood and would try and discourage her mom from visiting again so soon. 

I thought this was all settled until my brother in law called my wife this weekend and said their mom was upset because my wife said to hold off purchasing airfare because we had other plans coming up and wouldn't be able to accommodate her so soon. My wife asked why mom couldn't go to visit him instead (BIL also lives out of state from their parents) and he replied that he didn't have the PTO to entertain her. 

Now I feel bad because it seems like my MIL is going through an emotional time and feeling like none of her kids want to spend time with her. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
? I am straight. My gay roommate told me everyone thinks we are a couple,"My gay friend of many years was kind enough to let me rent me his spare rooms after my divorce. He’s one of my best friends and we go eat together, ride bikes and go on walks occasionally, and have a large group of friends. I have 2 teenage children that are my world. They stay with me half the time. This evening after some drinks he said, “you know everyone in the neighborhood thinks we are a couple?” I was taken aback. “No, I didn’t know that, why would you say that?” “Well, we spend a lot of time together and that’s the belief around town now!” I told him I didn’t like this rumor, cause it isn’t the truth and I don’t want this lie putting me in a difficult position with my kids. I have raised them very socially aware and inclusive and tolerant. He was super offended that I didn’t want to be labeled gay, even though I am straight. He called me a jerk for even caring what people think about my sexuality, and I told him it’s my right to care what people think. I feel gaslighted and manipulated. AITA for taking a stance in this scenario?! 

For more context about the situation…I have woken up and he has been next to me in bed without my permission. He gets drunk and flirty and touchy and I have to tell him to please stop. I’ve established boundaries but he pushes them too far and it makes me uncomfortable. This is why I feel like he has feelings and maybe pushing the idea of being a couple, which I absolutely do not want with him! I’m not homophobic in the slightest, but don’t touch me without my permission and don’t assume I want to be a couple with you. I pay my bills, I just want a roommate, nothing more. ",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving friend to go to airport lounge?,I have an upcoming trip and will be flying with a friend. I want to go to the Centurion lounge which I get access to with my credit card but no complimentary guests. I want to go to this lounge since I’ve never been. Would it me an a-hole move if I went to the lounge without my friend during the time we are waiting for our flight? I know they wouldn’t want to pay the fee to go in and I don’t think I should offer to pay for it either? ,AmItheAsshole
 for telling my Dad to divorce my Mom and that she doesn’t love/care for him,"I’m (18F) the eldest daughter of two. Ever since I was 13 I knew my mom’s behaviour was not okay. She pretty much ticks all the boxes for a covert narcissist however she has never been diagnosed officially (since she refuses to see anyone) and I know how hard it is to diagnose NPD in any case but I truly believe she has covert NPD. 

My Dad and I have become closer emotionally over how she is and we would talk a lot about it and things she does. My dad would confide in me a lot and still does. We have each other is what I mean.

Now I’m 18 and realise she will never ever change. About 7 months ago my view of my mom completely changed just naturally and I am done with her behaviour and how she treats people.

Today, I said to my Dad that he should leave her and that she doesn’t care and never will. I was definitely harsh and agressive I think (because I’m so angry myself with how my mom has treated me as well). He looked like he was going to cry and left for the gym.  I feel horrible now and I’m not sure if it was the right thing to do at all. He said we’ll talk more about it when he gets back. I know he still loves her so much. 

AITA?? Should I be encouraging a divorce? How do I go about this? Is it out of my hands? I want to protect my Dad I don’t know how. ",AmItheAsshole
 for saying no when my family asks me to help them,"I (F25) feel absolutely guilty for saying no to my mom and sister today. They asked me to drive them to a city that's 55 minutes away and I didn't want to do it so I lied and said I was busy. 

I feel so guilty because even though they live 15 minutes from me I never see them. So when they ask for favors and I say no I feel even worse. But I find them kind of draining as people and whenever I'm over there they want me to do something. It's never ending. So I see them as little as once a month or less. My boyfriends family lives 2 hours away and I see them more frequently.

AITA for not helping my family out and also never going to visit as well?",AmItheAsshole
 for blocking two people?,"At school T we'll call him was using this one site to find people's information. Now it was fun and innocent at first. We looked up our parents and grandparents. Then later T showed me and our friends a list of every teacher at the school. He plans on filling it all out. I don't say anything. When we ran out of people to search up, he searches up my exes name. All I did was say yeah that's him. T emails my ex his full address. Later that day my ex messages me. ""Please dont give out my address."" I'm pissed when he says that. I reply with. ""I did not give it out. Do not blame me before you ask why he could have it. And if your assuming I gave it out because I was with T. You're wrong. Ask him!"" He then tells me he did ask T. And I tell him what really happened that morning. He seemed to have switched and said that ""Sorry T LIED to me!"" I'm so mad at this point when I get to my next class which has to have T in it. He tried to talk to me. I immediately say I do not want to talk to you. When the school day was over I saw an email by T. I blocked both my ex and T. I blocked my ex because he always defends himself and doesn't know when to just quit. We've had a down spiral since we broke up. He's also a bit older so he thinks he knows everything, and has the biggest ego ever. I know he will just annoy me trying to prove his case. T had lied to my ex, and is a horrible bf to my friend. She has complained so much, and ive seen how hes treated her. So I had enough and blocked him too. I have had enough of everyone, but these two have crossed the line in my book. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I bought Mother's Day flowers for my BM?,"I (39m) have two daughters (19f, 17f) from an ex-relationship that ended about fifteen years ago. If you do the math, you'll see that my ex (38f) and I had our children rather young. The mother of my children and I have definitely had our ups and downs but over the last ten years we have put our differences and (past) bitterness aside for the wellbeing of our children. I see my daughters often and have wonderful relationships with both of them. The problem comes with an argument I had with my girlfriend (39f) about half an hour ago.

I come home from my lunch break, my girlfriend is doing work on her laptop on the couch. I start to make lunch in the kitchen and I remembered that I had wanted to call a local flower shop to preorder some flowers for Mother's Day. I call the floral shop and I order two arrangements: one for the mother of my kids and the other for my mother. After I finish the call I hang up and take my lunch into the living room, where my girlfriend immediately glares at me over her computer.

I ask her what's wrong and she flips. Her argument is the following:

1. It's disrespectful to her, as my girlfriend, to be buying my ex flowers.
2. I didn't place any order to buy her flowers, she is a stepmom
3. My daughters are old enough to where I should not have to talk to my ex anymore

I argued back that I have always bought flowers for their mother on Mother's Day. (This made her more upset because she was unaware, she claims she needs to be aware of any and all gifts I give to my ex). I told her that buying her flowers for Mother's Day was unnecessary because she wasn't a stepmom.

I had this conversation with my eldest daughter about two years ago when I was about to ask my now girlfriend out. My daughter told me then that she didn't want another mom or a stepmom because she already had a mom and felt she was too old to add another maternal or paternal figure into her life. She is respectful of my girlfriend but both of my daughters call her by her name, she is not a stepmom.

I made her cry and that wasn't my intention but I did want to make the boundary very clear that my ex will always be in the picture, we had this conversation before we had started dating. It's not like once my daughters turn 18 we no longer need to speak ever again, we have been through a lot and are completely civil. I want to emphasize that there is NOTHING there with my ex anymore, but we will share the same grandchildren (and children!) for the rest of our lives. I wanted to set that boundary now out of respect for my daughters if anything. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for the way I dealt with a conflict between me (22F) and my (ex) best friend (21M)?,"I met Ben at a college club (he's since left). As we began talking (December 2022), our conversations were mildly flirty. From my POV, he initiated (sending me gym photos, being touchy taking pics of me and sending them into the club group chat, compliments, etc.) and I flirted back. We also cuddled once.

This was over 2 weeks. One time we hung out I asked when his last relationship was. He said he was actually currently in one. Her name was Lily (22F) and they’d been dating for a month.

I was dumbfounded. Friends I'd spoken to about him were shocked too. I told him I didn't expect he had a girlfriend considering how we'd been talking to each other. He said he messed up and apologized for not telling me earlier.

By then any feelings I had for him went away. I didn't like feeling like my emotions were toyed with. We decided we'd still be friends with more boundaries. The next few months were honestly wonderful. He was a great friend and I trusted him. Soon I met his gf.

As I got closer with Lily I realized she had no idea about my earlier interactions with Ben. If my partner was involved in that, I'd want to know. It didn't feel right to keep being friends with him while she was oblivious. After mulling it over I texted him at the end of May and asked him to tell her. I didn't want to invade or be part of the conversation but I wanted her to know. If she was uncomfortable with us being friends afterward, I'd accept that.

He replied saying that he wanted space for a bit. He said he was just gonna focus on some personal stuff he had to deal with. I didn't think avoidance would help but I respected his need for space. After 2 weeks I sent 2 texts saying that I was hurt by him ignoring me and it wasn't helping the situation at all. He didn't reply for 2 months.

Mid-summer, I had a mental health crisis and I was hospitalized. His apartment building was right next to mine so he lived closest to me at the time. I sent a short text saying that I was having a hard time and I needed a friend with me. After no reply I called a mental health hotline. A few days later when I was discharged I got my phone back and saw that he hadn't at all replied to the text I sent asking for help.

By the end of August I contacted his gf myself. I told her everything and sent some screenshots of my texts with him. She was emotional over the phone but thanked me for telling her.

Then Ben sent a few angry texts to me. He said I didn't give him enough space (I waited 2 months?) and the reason he didn't reply was because after I texted him in May he felt weird about us. He said my texts over the summer upset him and that I overly pried this shit into his relationship.

They didn't break up, thankfully. I really didn't want that to happen. I know they were together for at least a year after this.

I don’t know if I did the right thing and I feel like I threw away a good friendship. I think I crossed a line and I still wonder if he's right that I pried this into his relationship.",AmItheAsshole
 for hosting a weekly gathering with my friends?,"I have been hosting a playing cards night (magic the gathering) with my friends for over 10 years. It’s kept my friends together and given us all time to just unwind relax and forget about the daily stress.. I used to have nights like these several times per week up until I got married…

I got married about 4.5 years ago, since then my wife has constantly injected herself into my friends night.. she constantly stresses over the conditions of our house (I help clean and set up everything), cooking (I usually cook something in a crockpot for everyone) I even work from home on Mondays to help make sure everything is up to her standards.. 

She asked me to cut down my friends nights, knowing she was overwhelmed I obliged and cut it to once a week, then She asked me to cut the time down from 6 hours, again I obliged, and now we only get together for about 4 hours which makes for 2-4 games of magic which is good because we can swap up the pods.

 I have 7 friends and they don’t all come every week.. since then she’s asked me to cut it to 4 people per night, I told her no and I explain that 2 pods of 4 or 3 are the best way to play and I don’t want to exclude anyone so we can switch up who plays with who. She asked me to cut it to once a month I told her no because I don’t really have any other hobbies. Now she asks for me to cut it down to every other week… 

 I spend EVERY minute of my at-home life with her, all I ask for is one night a week. Flash forward 2 years and we still have this argument almost on a weekly basis… the stress from it all makes me not want to even play anymore… 

My house isn’t the biggest but it’s the most central location where everyone can get to, and the only space big enough to accommodate all of us, otherwise we have to drive a significant distance and we don’t all get to play together. 

We now have foster children who are with us temporarily, this adds to the stress for her and I help out from the moment I get home to the moment I go to bed.. 

My wife has been unable to maintain jobs due to her disability causing us to rely on my income alone.. This causes us to have severe financial stress… I’ve had to sell significant portions of my collection to just pay bills month to month… I’ve had to cut down to one card of each and sell my most expensive and prized items in my collection in attempts to keep us afloat.. 

I’ve tried to start other hobbies but everytime I want to invite anyone over it’s an argument and there is always an excuse for why I can’t… every time I want to go out and do something else alone, again argument and more stress.. 

So AITA for trying to hold onto the one night per week I can actually do something I enjoy with other people I care about? 
 ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling a kid at the park not to kick over caution cones?,"AITA for telling a kid at the park not to kick over caution cones?  
I am at the park with my 3 kids and wife and while we are playing I notice a pre-teen kid intentionally kicking over an orange caution cone covering a damaged part of the climbing equipment. I am relatively close by so I decide to speak up saying ""Hey don't do that the cone is there for a reason."" To which the kid apologizes and puts the cone back, this is Texas after all where people generally tend to know how to raise their kids right. 

I continue to enjoy the park with my family and about 10 minutes later during a rest we are taking a bit further of a distance away (probably about 50 feet way now) at a picnic table, I notice a different kid, a bit larger than the first, run over and intentionally kick over the same caution cone over and then run a little distance away leaving the cone fallen and exposing a potentially hazardous hole. I had noticed earlier that the previous kid and this now current kid had been playing together, tag or something, and my previous years as a public middle school teacher lead me to believe that this endeavor by the second kid was probably a dare or some other attempt made in jest to either see my reaction or get his buddy in trouble. In what I deemed a fair and calm response I get up out of my seat to set the cone right once again. As I move toward the cone, covering about 10 feet of the 50 foot distance, and coincidentally in the direction of the kid as well, I say again ""Hey c'mon, that probably needs to be there, look it is even covering a hole so other people wont trip."" Before I can move another 10 feet toward the cone a rather large man comes hurtling toward me from his comfortable position behind the steering wheel of his vehicle and mobile device, obviously providing him much more quality entertainment than spending time with own kid, this is Texas after all where people generally know how to ignore their kids right...  


Before I can take two more steps this man hollers at me, obviously acting protectively, ""Hey, don't talk to my kid!"" My previous years caring for and educating other people's children as a career, that I since have escaped from, and yes I pointedly use the word ""escape"", I pause my actions, halt my movement, and wait for the man to get within 20 feet of me to before letting him know I was now the one uncomfortable with his advancement on me, by taking a few steps back. I also then preceded to apologize and attempt to explain my actions to the man. AITA???",AmItheAsshole
 for shutting down any attemp my father has made at restoring our relationship ,"First of all I would like to apologize for any spelling or grammar errors I might make as I am not English.

So I am 14 years old and for as long as I can remember my father has been pretty much absent from my life. He never left our family or anything, but he always prioritized his work over spending time with me and my brother and looking back at my childhood I don't have a single memory of ever spending time with him. I can't remember a single time he has ever complimented me or praised me for something I did and on the contrary, he used to poke fun at my weight when I was a child and after he would say things like ""I'm not laughing AT you I'm laughing WITH you"" to try and salvage the situation, or when I did something he asked instead of thanking me or telling me I did a good job he would scold me about all the mistakes I made and tell me he's disappointed and to ""do better next time"". The important change came around September in 2021 when he was diagnosed with terminal brain cancer. He had successful surgery and got into some treatment program that is supposed to keep the cancer in check, slow down the cancer spreading and delay the inevitable (please don't come for me if you're a professional about this stuff, I'm not properly educated). For a long time after this he didn't make any attempt to correct the mistakes of his past. He still didn't spend time with me, and we actually didn't communicate much at all. If anything I'd say it got worse since with his new found free time he got from not having to work he chose not to do something productive, but rather yell at me telling me to do ridiculous amounts of work around the house and scold me for every single mistake I make along the way and a bunch of more uncomfortable stuff, the details of which I don't think are important to this story. Lately tho he's been making some sort of attempt at restoring our relationship by trying to be nice and talk to me more but I've shut every single one of these attempts immediately by pretty much just telling him to fuck off and I usually feel right for doing so because right after these attempts he usually goes back to being his usual mean and annoying self. But I have been thinking about the situation from his perspective and how hard it must be for him to realize that he doesn't have much time left and that his son doesn't want anything to do with him and since I'm not really comfortable sharing this with anyone else I decided to come to reddit for advice so please tell me if you think what I'm doing is right or if I should give him a chance at building a relationship with me.
If you have any further questions about the situation feel free to ask, I'll be happy to answer.
Thank you so much for reading and I wish everyone a great rest of their day ",AmItheAsshole
 - The lingering ex,"I’ve (31F) been with my SO (33M) for 6 months. On a few occasions his ex from 10 years ago has called/messaged. I later found out they rekindled last summer but he called things off after admitting he was unfairly leading her on. He hasn’t replied but also not told her he’s in a relationship. They are connected on all socials (more than me and him) and her name regularly appears on his notifications.
I’ve explained I feel uncomfortable about how accessible he is to an ex and it could simply be solved by kindly telling her he’s in a relationship. But he won’t. And refuses to remove her from anything. I’m assuming he interacts with her posts and stories to receive notifications about them. It’s becoming a bit of a turn off; especially if it’s just an ego thing. I don’t believe he’d ever cheat but this feels like misplaced loyalties. 
AITA for expecting him to be less accessible to exes and more forthcoming with his new relationship status? He won’t remove his ex from things like Snapchat so is ok with how uncomfortable it makes me feel…",AmItheAsshole
 and selfish or is he controlling?,"I (F37) have been studying for my degree and subsequent post grad for the last 4 years. The first 3 years were a breeze but this last year has been so, so work heavy. I've been at placement 7.30am-5pm each weekday and then I'll usually be back at my laptop working after my youngest (6) has gone to bed so around 8pm-10pm. Son is 15 so doesn't require me as much as the youngest does day to day. When I'm working in the evening, it's always on the sofa with husband (40) so I'm working but still with our programmes on in the background. It's been so, so hard staying on top of work, family life etc but the end is finally in sight!!! Placement has finished, there's only a few weeks of uni left (9am-4pm) so a bit of normality can resume! Pre-placement, I was going to the gym in the evenings once youngest was in bed 3-4 nights a week. I've put on some weight since September as I just couldn't prioritise the gym with workload but I can finally get back to it now things have slowed down. I went to the gym last night (left at 7.45, back by 8.50), I mentioned to the hubby this morning I was going to the gym tonight and he asked me when I got home if I still intended to go. He seemed annoyed so I asked him if there was any issue and we've ended up having a huge argument. He's said I haven't prioritised our family at all as I'm always working in the evening and now I think it's just ok to start going to the gym. He said I'm an extremely selfish person as I haven't even asked him if it's ok to go?!! When I asked if he was suggesting I 'ask his permission' he just exploded and said it's called common f&amp;&amp;cking decency to make sure he doesn't mind?! 

Whilst this isn't a I do this, he does that, I feel it's only fair to point out he's been going to football/rugby 2-3 nights a week plus played in matches 1/2 a day every other weekend and never once 'asked me' but I would never even expect him too. He works from home with his own business so goes to the gym most days during the day, this isn't an option for me though. 

So AITA for not asking him? Or is he being unreasonable and controlling? ",AmItheAsshole
 if I brought up my coworker’s chronic cough with him or my supervisor? ,"I work in a small office with three other people, me and this other guy basically doing the grunt work for our two supervisors. I’ve been working here four months opposite from my coworker’s cubicle, and he has had a cough this entire time. Not a polite, occasional cough, but a full chested wet one that he does at minimum fifty times a day. He also clears his throat about twice as much at minimum, but sometimes that’s a couple hundred times a day.

Sometimes I get maybe 45 minutes without any throat ejecting noises, if I’m really lucky, but there are also times where he is constantly coughing and throat clearing. Like, I’m talking steady background phlegm being picked up by my ear holes for 15-20 minutes at a time on a bad day, and an average day is a cough or a throat clearing every five minutes or so. 

I gotta be honest; It’s getting on my fucking nerves. It’s like Chinese fucking water torture every time he does it. I hear that little “a-hem-hem-hem” and I want to toss a cough drop down his throat. Ok, maybe I’m being hyperbolic there, but it’s really getting on my nerves and distracting me from my job. 

Noise canceling headphones are not an option because I need to be able to hear when the phone rings, by the way. 

Obviously, I would be The Asshole if I had a direct confrontation about this cough, because it’s a health issue, and I don’t want to make him feel bad for something he can’t change. He’s not slighting me for having a condition. But I’m wondering if asking my desk to be moved or just making him aware that I know by offering him a bag of Ricola next time there’s a flare up? Maybe there’s something he can do to make it happen less often that he isn’t doing because he thinks I’m not annoyed?

Or am I just doomed to listen to him cast a layer of mucus onto his computer until one of us gets fired, leaves, or dies? 

Whaddya think, Reddit? 

",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting payment for my time even though I didn't manage to deliver a product?,"So a guy contacts me the other day to complete what seems to be a relatively simple 3D modelling commission that he himself could not manage to do. I accept and offer him a quote, to which he says yes. He has a deadline, so I have about three days to work on this.

(Quickly editing to add: My quote consisted of a relatively low flat rate with an additional hourly fee)

I receive the files and start working on it, only to realise that the files he provided were not suited to the task. (For anybody who knows about 3D modelling and Blender: the one file was an SVG with overlapping regions, and Blender is not a fan of overlapping topology. It had a huge amount of disconnected vertices, overlapping faces, etc.)

I spent at least 10 to 12 hours if not more trying to troubleshoot the file for the guy, spending ages manually reconnecting floating vertices and overlapping topology in Blender, and then also trying to fix the root of the cause, the SVG, in Inkscape.

I spoke to him about the increase in time and he offered me a larger sum of money, followed by a voice note in which he says, while laughing: ""Then again, if you don't manage to do it, you get nothing.""

I took that comment with a pinch of salt as I thought he was joking, he seemed like a nice guy up to that point, offering me future work too.

He was working on this on his side too, also trying to figure things out. I sent him the SVG that I fixed and also a DXF of the one file, thinking that maybe Fusion360 (the software he tried to use before contacting me) would be able to handle it on his end now.

When I started to realise that maybe the file just wouldn't work, I told him and asked if he could ask his client for a better file. Apparently his client is actually working for a client, so he has no direct ties to the creator of the file.

Now, neither of us could get the file to work in the end and the guy's deadline came. When I sent the invoice for my time, he responded saying I misunderstood him, he really meant it when he said he wouldn't pay me.

I really feel like I should be compensated for my time, as I am still relatively young and I need the money to make a living. My whole weekend was spent on this when I could have been doing much more valuable things for myself. I sent him the files I repaired and worked on, and I shared a lot of advice with him along the way, discussing ways we might be able to fix the issue.

I don't know, this whole deal just seems kind of unfair to me... it seems as if he used a joking tone in a way that he could later manipulate it to escape payment.

And he's an adult with a stable job. Because I am still an amateur my rate is super low... even my parents agree that for an adult, the payment is barely a dent in their wallet. I would even be willing to charge half price because I didn't produce a working product, but he seems adamant not to pay.

So, Reddit, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for reporting a tiny scratch on car?,"So I’m waiting in the car with my brother in the bank parking lot. All of a sudden I heard a thud and I was like wtf, turn my head around and notice someone hit our car — not a crazy hit, a paint scratch and a little dent. Then my mom called and I was like “hey so someone hit our car”, and then my dad with a little bit of a temper comes at this poor middle aged lady asking for insurance n shit. I don’t know a lot about cars or how the system works. For some reason I still feel bad tho. ",AmItheAsshole
? I asked for a price adjust,"My friend visited a Nike outlet a couple weeks ago. He sent me a pic of a pair of shoes that I liked and asked if I wanted him to pick them up for me as he was already down there. I said yes, as they were on sale from $150 down to $100. 

A week later they go on sale even lower, down to $60. At this point I haven't seen him yet and haven't picked them up. I called Nike to see if I could get a $40 credit on my account since the shoe went on sale, but they said no because they couldn't see the purchase on my account (in store purchases go on your account if you use an email or phone number at check out). 

Since Nike said no to me, I asked him if he would be willing to call Nike and get a price adjust to save $40 since he has a nike account and it would be on his account. I've done this before and it only takes a couple minutes. I told him he didn't have to if he didn't have time and I would just pay him what he paid initially and eat the $40. He got short with me and called me rude, said asking was out of place, and a faux pas. This was all through text, so I can see where the disconnect could come up. But I didn't force him to or expect him to, I just wanted to see if I could save $40 on a pair of shoes. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I change my mind about resigning lease after someone showed interest in my room?,"My lease is about to end in a month, and I planned on moving out with a friend. We planned this months ago. However, that friend just got some news that he may not be able to move in with me anymore since due to family issues.  

My current roommate has already found someone that will sign the lease in lieu of me a couple days ago. I could easily afford to move out by myself, but I’d prefer to not spend so much.  

WIBTA if i change my mind and resign the lease? I don’t want to be homeless, but i’m essentially ruining some other’s plan.  

Edit: Forgot to mention that the least is up in a month. ",AmItheAsshole
 for breaking all contacts with my friend ,"I (21 F) had a friend Lisa(20F). I broke all ties with her after a few experiences.We took an apartment together for a few weeks to do our engineering project. The apartment was not spacious and crammed. She invited her mother and sister in the apartment to stay with her for a few weeks without even asking my opinion. I went to a trip for one day and was shocked to see the apartment on my return .Her sister and mom were using up all of my stuff utensils,my slippers, pieces of clothing, my pillows etc:- ( I don't mind sharing my stuff but I feel like it's basic courtesy to ask first).They stripped my bed of bedcovers and were using it as a platform to dry their underwear. 

One day when I was sleeping I woke up in middle and found her mom just staring at me with a cold expression.Our apartment is really tiny and it can't accommodate four people.I tried to explain it to her but she is on the stance that I am an incredibly selfish person. Once I bought an instant pizza for me and kept it at my table.Lisa walked in, took it and she and her family helped themselves with it (Again I have no problem in sharing food but ask first). After a few days I discovered that her mom would follow me wherever I went and would try to get a glimpse into my phone. 

Our apartment had a no dog policy.Yet she bought in a dog which ended up barking at everyone and biting two girls. When the owner enquired her she told that the girls deserve to be bit for having evil energy in them. She again started to sneak in multiple dogs after this (mind u one of the dogs had an owner and she was refusing to let it go) .After all these I decided to leave the apartment. Other classmate who is my roommates bestie called me selfish for taking my stuff out of apartment. They didn't brought any things and all cooking utensils and most daily use items were mine. So even though I vacated the apartment I still kept those things in room for them to use because of fear of everyone thinking about me as a self absorbed narcissist. It was also me who cooked when we stayed together.It was me who paid for several things for her and her fam. When any problem takes place she would ditch me and stand with my enemies. She told me that my chronic nausea was affecting her life and she wasn't able to go to night parties because of me.She never like the birthday presents I gave to her, she never cared when I was in deathbed manytimes( once she even refused to give me a glass of water), she never appreciated anything I did for her happiness.Sorry for my terrible English and AITA for leaving the apartment and ghosting her.",AmItheAsshole
 if I contacted my ex's ex?,"I used to be in a small friend group in highschool consisting of a couple (James and Mark) and one other person. I became friends with James and Mark separately before they started dating and stayed friends with both of them until they broke up. The breakup was a little messy so we kinda took sides and the friend group sided with Mark.

A few months after they had broken up (don't remember how many) Mark and I started dating, but honestly there was very little difference between this and us being friends. We had an amicable breakup and are still close friends years later. He has no contact with James currently and doesn't want to.

I was incredibly close friends with James (more than Mark was) when we first met and at the time he was the only friend I had that I felt truly understood me. I have a lot of happy memories of him and genuinely miss him. He had a lot of dickish moments and I won't defend that. He said some horrible things both to me and Mark but he seemed like he was going through a rough time so I can never really blame him. I stayed loosely friends with him after he and Mark broke up, but it was awkward because I felt like I had to pick a side. 

I currently follow James on social media and he follows me but we both barely post. Mark is aware of this and fine with it. 

I've been really thinking about James lately and considering reaching out to catchup and get some closure as we sort of drifted apart awkwardly. 

Would that make me the asshole if I did?",AmItheAsshole
" My gf reneged on our plans, and cost me money","So i started dating this girl and we were planning on going to see a Broadway show later on in the month.  I ask her with the full intention of paying for the ticket but she brings up that since we're getting out so late, would I like to stay the night in the city where the show is taking place. We went back and forth on different dates to see what would fit her schedule ( she's a 2nd year resident with odd hours), and i let her know that there were cheaper ticket dates if we decide not to stay. I made it clear that I was paying for the tickets, but if we were to go on the originally proposed show date and stay the night, then I would only be able to cover the price of the tickets. Mind you, we both ended up agreeing to stay and she said that she would take care of the hotel, even when as far as asking my preferences for AirBNB or an actual hotel. So in all, we agree on the date, the plans and I buy the higher cost tickets 

Well, a few days ago she informs me that she has a paper due the day of the play( she knew about this when we made the plans). And then told me that depending on how the week goes, we may not be able to stay overnight so that she can work on her paper. This is after I expeessed that the tickets were the more ezpensive of our options and that i would only get those tickets if we were for sure going to stay the night, ktherwise i would have been fine with going at a later date with not so great seats but more reasonable tickets ($ 120 compared to $260, which eould have been the price of 1 night in a hotel).

Im going to speak to her about basically reneging ln our plans and not being thoughtful about my money/planning. This would be our first out of town trip together. What would you suggest I do?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my now ex-best friend I would no longer be taking her to a concert? ,"I (26M) bought 2 tickets for my birthday last year to the AJR concert coming up, one for myself and one for my best friend (25F) to go to. We both love AJR, to the point that through most of our friendship (almost 7 years) every time we’re in the car or hanging out at one of our places, one of their albums are playing. So of course when they announced their next tour and we saw they came close by, I had to get floor tickets with the intent of getting there early and in first to get close to the stage. I took care of the entire payment and told her she didn’t even need to pay me back, let’s just have fun. 

Now a quick background. Again we’ve been best friends for almost 7 years. Have taken trips together, pet sit each other’s pets, hung out nightly, etc. and always have fun. At the start of our friendship we pitched the idea of dating, but after thinking it through, we decided to remain best friends for the sake of our career paths and life goals. Now I live 3 hours away working with my job and vice versa, and it’s been great remaining friends. 

Because of this, it’s nice that we can assist each other in dating, offering advice and help when we ask each other about girls/guys respectively. Recently, she’s asked me about guys that she went on dates with and the red flags have popped up like crazy. These range from guys that she’s worked with that spread drama in the workplace, guys that treat ladies with little to no respect, and even guys that have told her they want to use her. I remained supportive through a lot of these, and when she settled down with someone early this year I was so happy for her. This led to me being in less contact and I kind of figured that may happen as well, but again, happy for her. 

The last 2 times I’ve planned to head back and hang with her now, I’ve been ghosted and apologized to the following day, or told that our 1 on 1 hang is now a third wheel hang. I finally confronted her about feeling like I’m being forced to hang with both of them, not just her, and she revealed that they’ve been living together since they first met and started dating (less than 2 months from meet to dating and moved in), so it’s tough to hang solo.

So the tickets? Well I approached her about feeling like this opinion she asks me for is ignored, and although I’m happy for her, I was upset for losing my friend so quickly to a new relationship and how I’ve basically been blown off as her friend overall. I explained how because of this I was no longer going to take her to this concert, and she blew up on me, telling me she would be “buying tickets herself and taking her fiancé instead”. I told her he could be her husband, fiancé, best friend, or whatever, but I bought the tickets and would be bringing someone I could enjoy the night with, and I was immediately blocked on everything. 

This was a month or so ago, the concert is in 2 weeks, and I’m just curious if I’m being an asshole and a bad friend through all of this. ",AmItheAsshole
 for moving back in with my mom because my brother is an alcoholic?,"Me (20m) and my older brother (29) have always had a pretty crappy relationship with our mother, she wasn't exactly the best one out there, lots of issues I won't get into. So when I turned 18 I moved in with him, his wife, and their 3 kids. 

I love all of them, but things have been getting rough with his drinking, and overall his mental state is affecting me and the rest of the family pretty badly for a number of reasons. I've talked to him about it and he refuses to change or get help.

In the last couple years, our mother has legitimately tried to fix herself, we haven't really given her the time of day or tried to fix the gap, and I can tell she's doing a much better job all around than she was before.

For those two reasons, (as well as several other reasons including a pretty bad altercation that happened a few nights ago,) I called up my mom and we talked and decided I'll move in with her in two weeks.

I went to tell my brother I'm moving out, and he was really happy for me, although pretty emotional, and I tried to tell him where I'm going but he just kept going on about how good I'm gonna do on my own.  Eventually, I got another word in, and told him I'll be going back to our mom for a while, and he...  Immediately shut me out, he's been giving me the silent treatment ever since.  Do note that our mother was way worse to him than she was to me, I was the youngest, so he's definitely more...  Emotionally tender in that regard, I guess.

How badly did I screw up?",AmItheAsshole
 for wearing my girlfriends clothes and refusing to change,"I (16M) was at my girlfriend’s (16F) place and she made me try on her clothes as like a joke because we found out that we’re the same size. I tried on a cropped t-shirt and low rise jeans. She told me that I looked hot and told me to keep it on so I did because yeah I looked hot. She gave me the clothes to keep. 

My mum called me and told me to come home because my uncle and aunt was there and I should say hi. I forgot to change so I went home in my girlfriend’s clothes I didn’t think it’d be a problem or anything but my parents were so pissed off. Once I said hi to my aunt and uncle my mum pulled me to the kitchen and told me to go change, she called me an embarrassment. I refused to change because like what the fuck actually? Why does she care so much. That made her 10x angrier and she called me disrespectful and some other shit. After my aunt and uncle had gone my dad agreed with my mum and told me that I should throw the clothes away or give it back to my gf. I said no because the clothes were cool I don’t get why they care so much it’s just clothes. My dad asked me if i’m gay and when I said no he told me that I looked gay and I just laughed at him. Then my mom grounded me. AITA? I feel like they’re overreacting. I’m not getting rid of the clothes though I looked hot idc and my girlfriend likes it that’s all I care about tbh",AmItheAsshole
 for naming my son after my father instead of my FIL,"I (26F) recently had twins with my husband Harry (30M). I love my babies so much but the labour was a nightmare m. It was extremely traumatic for my husband and I, and we’ve agreed that we are definitely not having anymore kids. 

I was labouring for two days and throughout the process we kept our families updated. When they were finally able to visit, my parents and my in laws came to see us. Everyone was fussing over the babies and my poor husband who only had about 4 hours sleep for the whole two days was napping. My dad, however, sat by me first and just held my hand for a bit. When I told him to go get some cuddles in with the twins, he said ‘I’m here to see my baby’ meaning me. It was honestly so sweet and I started tearing up. I didn’t even realise how invisible I felt when my husband was sleeping and my dad was there to make sure I was also being taken care of. He took me down to the hospital cafe and we had breakfast together while the babies were with everyone else. 


I kept thinking about what my dad did for the next few days and I decided that I would give my newborn son my father’s name as his middle name. My husband was totally onboard with this. However, this is where the problem began. We knew my FIL would be pretty pissed at this.

He always wanted a grandson named after him but it’s pretty clear now he won’t get one. He has two sons, my husband and his younger brother and my BIL is gay and currently says he doesn’t want to adopt kids in the future. My FIL is also one of those people who cares about ‘bloodlines’ so I don’t think he’d want an adopted grandson named after him (fucked up, I know).

My husband has a complicated relationship with his father so he wasn’t comfortable naming our son after him, but we agreed to give them the same initials so they’d both be AHD. He accepted this, but when he found out we were switching the middle name for my father, he lost his mind. 

He said that this was something he always wanted and we were throwing it in his face by giving the baby my father’s name as his middle name. I tried to explain why but he cut me off and said that it was absurd to expect someone to check on me when there were babies that had just been born and my father shouldn’t be rewarded for ‘ignoring his grandchildren’. I tried to explain that it was more than just the moment because my dad has been my best friend for my whole life but he didn’t want to hear it. 

MIL is saying we are AHs for doing this because my dad doesn’t care about any grandchildren being named after him but FIL has always wanted it. According to her, we are taking something away from him just because my dad chose to do something ‘unusual’ which to them was ignoring the babies until he was satisfied with me being okay (he did not ignore the kids, he got plenty of cuddles in when we got back from breakfast).  My dad is honoured by our choice, but thinks we shouldn’t have done it because of what it means to FIL. AITA?


Edit: Just a tiny update. We have stuck with my father’s name for my son’s middle name and went back to our original plan of hyphenating our surnames for the twins. FIL is pissed but who cares? Not me",AmItheAsshole
 for causing my ex-sister in law to have a meltdown because I invited my brother and his family to my house?,"Throwaway account

This is a very long, emotional story.

Four years ago, my (27F) brother (30M) admitted to my exSIL (30F) that he had been cheating on her, gotten his gf (28F) pregnant and that he wanted to divorce her. The entire family disowned my brother and provided our exSIL with emotional and financial support throughout the whole thing (as we should.)


My brother married the woman he cheated with. They now have 3 kids together (a son (3M) and twin daughters (both 1F), and are happily married. As mentioned before, the entire family disowned my brother and we didn’t hear from him for 3.5 years.

He reached out to my mom (who is very religious and hates adultery) 6 months ago and asked for reconciliation. My mom didn’t want to talk to my brother all that much, she just wanted to meet her grandkids. Meeting her grandkids softened her attitude towards my brother. Soon, the entire family regained contact with him. My exSIL remained friends with my sister, and she freaked out when she heard about this. As a result, we only talked to my brother over the phone.

The more I talked to my brother and his wife over the phone, the more I became friends with his wife. We would spend HOURS on the phone talking to each other about whatever random bullshit came to our minds. We made each other laugh. It was great.

It was because of this friendship that I decided to finally invite my brother and my new friend to my house for my son’s birthday party yesterday. It seemed like the perfect time to do so. What I didn’t count on was my exSIL coming to the party. I had spoken to her a few days before and she said she wasn’t sure if she was coming or not. Leading up to yesterday she hadn’t said anything so I went ahead and invited my brother and his family.

When my exSIL showed up, it was a shitshow. She yelled at my brother, who was just standing there in shock and when my exSIL realized who the woman next to my brother is, she let out “stop looking at me you Jewish whore” (my brother’s wife is half-Jewish.) 

I had tried to calm her down and talk to my exSIL, but at this point I yelled at her to get tf out of my house. She did, and we all just pretended this never happened. However, at the end of the party, my sister, who is still friends with my exSIL told me that I should have told my exSIL my brother and his wife were invited. It would have influenced her decision to come or not. Not doing say made me an ass. I explained that she didn’t make it clear if she was coming, and that I only kicked her out after she made a blantanly racist comment. My sister was still pissed off about it, but she left soon after. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting my boyfriend to clean,"Am I the asshole for expecting my boyfriend to help around the house without being told exactly what to do? A little background information my current boyfriend and I have been on again/ off again since August of 2021, he is 34 and I am 24. I have a full time job and recently bought a house in October of 2023. He made a lot of bad choices in his past, so is still in the process of getting his bachelors degree (he graduates in May 2024) and then has been accepted to a pharmacy graduate program starting August 2024 which is 2.5 hours away from where I bought my house(no I’m not moving with him). My boyfriend stays at my house typically Friday, Saturday and Sunday night and maybe one or two week day nights, so he’s here fairly often. If he’s not here, he lives with his dad full time. My boyfriend does not pay any bills at my house nor his dad’s house and pays only for his car payment and car insurance (he works part time and maybe makes $14 an hour). So when he comes over he walks the dog and may cook us dinner. I told him he doesn’t help make life easier one night after a 70 hour work week I had. I mentioned to him that he never cleans, vacuums the house, mop the floors, wipe the kitchen counters down, or help clean the bathrooms. He told me I should have to tell him what to do but he doesn’t mind help. He explained he doesn’t notice when things are dirty around the house but I do because of my OCD. He explained I should not expect him to clean the house and it was unfair for me to expect him to take initiative and clean the house without being told what to do.  He explained after a long day at work he doesn’t think about coming home to do additional chores at the house. Lastly, he said he unloads and loads the dishwasher which was “helping”. I told him he is an adult and should be able to notice when the house needs to be vacuumed or counters need to be wiped down and it would help me a lot. I explained to him I do his laundry on a regular basis to help him out but he doesn't do much to make life easier for me. After about 5 minutes of this conversation he said his heart was “pounding out of his chest” and needed some space, grabbed his beer and walked out to my living room and that’s basically where the conversation ended. Sooo am i the asshole for expecting my boyfriend to help around the house without being told exactly what to do?

  
update: we were finally able to talk it out. He explaiend he does not feel like either of us should have to “clean after a long day at work”. He explained he does not want a list to be made up for him as he feels like “I want my cake and eat it too”, he also said explained he would be willing to clean “on the weekend one day a week when we both can equally clean together so it seems equal” meaning we will make a list of everything that needs to be done such as mopping, sweeping, dusting etc. and split it in half so we’re both cleaning at the same time and this seems more equal and fair to him. He explained making a list for him to do is infantilizing him and treating him like a child. I told him we could make a list and both throughout the week mark off what gets done and he does not like this idea. He typically works weekends as a pharmacy tech, and I work M-F as a CPS investigator, with occasional overtime on the weekends. He said I make him feel like my job is harder than his job and all I do is “sit on my ass and if I’m not on a case I’m driving in a car or doing paperwork at a computer, so the majority of the time I’m sitting”; so him being on hit feet all day in the pharmacy is exhausting and he doesn’t think after a day at the pharmacy he should be required to come home and do chores. ",AmItheAsshole
 for eating leftovers after my brother had consumed half of them? ,"I 19F have a brother that's 23M, our parents started dashing a few months ago and supply food for dinners for me, my brother and guests to eat; While my parents are out dashing, I've had to take on a lot of the responsibility when maintaining the house. Every day I clean the house, prep dinner, cook dinner, and recently started more after dinner cleaning as well. 

In the past I've talked with my brother about taking on after dinner cleaning, and he said he would. For about 1-2 months he was helping out, but for a few months he pushes it off or just leaves it for me to do. The only time he helps around the house or cleans his room up, is when someone like a friend or his boyfriend comes over. My parents have tried teo talk with him about keeping his clean more often, he pushes them off to the side as well. My parents have talked with my brother about doing nothing to help around the house, and today my mother blew up on him as we're sick of him not taking any responsibility on. Last night I had a friend 18M over who helped me clean up, prep dinner &amp; cook it. After dinner was done, we sat down and had dinner together, then hung out, we started doing the dinner cleanup, before I had to leave for the gym. Last night, my brother consumed half of the leftovers, and when I started to prep mine this morning,  he came over and expected me to save him more. I didn't and ate the rest because he had already consumed his half of the leftovers, he said that's not fair because I had it for dinner as well, therefore having had more food. For the longest time, we would split the leftovers half &amp; half regardless if a friend was over or someone was out of the house when dinner was made. 

I've talked with my friends about this but, I need other peoples opinions to make the right choice. So, Am I The Asshole? 

EDIT 1: Also, a couple days ago, he made a whole loaf of banana bread for his boyfriend, and I didn't really get any, despite him using all the ingredients that our PARENTS bought. Because his boyfriend had a bad day that day. I do think it's sweet to do that for his partner, I do think it was unfair to only let me have a taste. When the bread was made with shared ingredients that he himself did not pay for.",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my entire family hold my newborn?,"To give context, my fiancé had lost a child from a previous marriage. The child’s illness came from his mother. And my fiancé had to watch his son die and there wasn’t anything he could do to save him. Moving forward. My fiancé is now in a relationship with me and fears that when we have kids our child might suffer the same fate. So in order to ease that fear, I told him that we can limit who touches our baby. He is comfortable with two people, no more. However I have a big family, and even though I told my mom she could hold our child, she is still upset that the entire family can’t. She even messaged my sister and told her that I said that my sister couldn’t hold my baby. Because the other person who will be allowed to hold my baby will be my grandmother. My fiancé said that both could be my family since his family will understand. The problem I’m dealing with is my mother trying to guilt trip me into letting everyone hold our baby. And telling me that everyone will be hurt by us saying no. And I brought it up to my fiancé but he said that the baby’s safety is our priority not peoples feelings. I’ve tried to explain to her that my fiancé can’t handle the fear of something bad happening again. But she said that if there is something wrong the nurses will take the baby. But I told her that even if everything is okay the baby still doesn’t build up an immune system until two weeks. She said that everything went fine with her and that it is normal for a bunch of people to hold the baby. It’s like she doesn’t understand that my fiancé has trama form losing his kid. AITA for saying no?",AmItheAsshole
 if I kept my dog?,"Background: I'm not child-free by choice, but I had to get my reproductive organs removed when I was relatively young because of a genetic condition. I have never been in a stable place to adopt children, in no small part due to massive health events every few years since I was 26.

I love dogs, especially my 13+ year-old puppy, Bella. I got Bella from her litter and she was instantly my soul-dog. I had gotten my father a male puppy, Dash, a month prior, and they grew up as lifemates. My father and I would swap weeks when each of us would take both dogs so they could stay together, even though it hurt when it wasn't my week. When I had to escape a DV situation, I could not find shelter that would let me keep my dogs. I ended up having to re-home my older dog, who is forever since in the wind, but Bella went to my father's house for a few years until Dash got cancer. When he started his final decline, my dad felt too guilty looking at Bella, and I was finally in a living situation I could keep a dog. A few months after Dash died, my dad said he could take Bella back. Bella did not follow him when he called and leaned against my legs to show she was staying with me. My dad acknowledged she had opinions and let her stay with me.

A couple years later, I got cancer. The chemo was more intense than most other chemos, and when I got really sick, I twice missed picking up poos in the yard in areas I couldn't see. The management company sent a letter to my roommate, and she regretfully told me I had to get rid of Bella. My dad had just moved two hours away from the city, but I asked him to come get Bella. More than any of the treatments, not having her support and love broke me. After a couple months, my father called to tell me Bella needed to stay with him and his dogs because she has a happy life out in the country.

I'm in remission now, but I've lost pretty much all joy and motivation in life.

My therapist recently offered to write me a rec for an Emotional Support Animal. I'm currently living in my childhood home, but have been blocked over and over from getting a new dog by circumstance or my mother's fear (she knows I need a dog and agrees I should have one, but has fear about everything and makes up a million excuses not to adopt each puppy I've found). This week, I convinced my father to let me have Bella for a week, as my mother is away and I will be lonely (currently recovering from a broken foot and a respiratory illness) on the property by myself.

I've kept her before for a week or two here and there when my mother travels, but Bella usually goes into my dad's truck when he comes to get her. This past weekend, my father came to a holiday party I was hosting. After the party, he asked Bella if she wanted to go home (to his), and again she refused to follow him and leaned against my legs.

My mom is coming home Saturday, and I'm having a hard time coming up to the idea of giving Bella back to my father, even though she has a great life in the country. WIBTA if I tell my dad I'm keeping her?",AmItheAsshole
 for taking my 50% share of a property?,"Hello, apologies in advance, this is complex.

My mother inherited a property from my paternal grandfather many years ago. It has remained empty since, as she has her own house. 2 years ago, my mother put my name on the deed so we jointly own the property. 

Last year, my husband and I planned to settle in the UK after having lived in the US for a year. In order to apply for a his visa, we had to prove we had suitable accommodation here in the UK. I spoke to my mother and asked if we could live in the house I jointly owned with her, as it was empty, and needed some serious tlc, which we would pay for. Having been empty for so long, it seemed like a no brainer. She said no problem, and signed a document for the visa stating that this would be our family home when we came back to the UK. 

We came back to the UK and my mum told me the house was a wedding gift for us, and we could raise our family in it and enjoy it. I took out a loan for a whole new central heating system coming in just under 9k, and took on all the bills for the property as soon as we moved in. 

 A couple of months passed and my mother said she didn’t want us to change any of the property without her permission. This was the first issue, as the property had no washing machine, an almost non functioning stove and oven, issues with electrics, most things needed replacing. She kept turning up to the house at all hours of the day, it seemed like she was trying to make sure we hadn’t changed anything without her knowing. We hadn’t changed anything, and agreed that we wouldn’t without discussion. 

A few months later I became pregnant and told my mother. She told me that she wanted to take me off the deed, sell the house and use all the money herself to buy a house, as she is not happy in her current house. She now said she only put me on the deed in case anything happened to her. 

We moved out and are renting at the moment, as the place was not livable with a baby. And she wasn’t happy with us changing anything. I have continued paying the central heating loan I took out, and have kept the meter topped up. She has paid the council tax. They add up to around the same each month. 

My mother and I had a great relationship before this, so although I was upset, I kind of just thought in my head, she can have the house, I didn’t want the stress.

However, the issue now is, we are unable to get a mortgage on our own, as we have to rely solely on my income due to my husband’s foreign income. I am also not classed as a first time buyer now, further reducing my borrowing capacity. I have that large loan, and now have childcare taken into account. We have also had to pay for rent here, and moving costs to our rented home, which almost halved our deposit. 

AITA if I tell my mother I want to sell the property(which she wants to do anyway) and take my 50% share? I love my mother, but I have my own family to think about too, and I feel like she has really messed us around with false promises.

",AmItheAsshole
" for allowing and supporting my daughter to calling her step-mom, mom even though her bio mother hates it","I (39M) have a twelve-year-old daughter(Katie) with my ex-girlfriend, Lilly (35F), of whom I hold 90% custody. Lily used to have her every 4 weeks Friday and Saturday during school term and we split the holidays 90-10. I live a few hours away from her so this was the more stable system for Katie. Lilly claims I moved extremely far away the second I had the majority custody to reduce the amount of time she has with Katie, but she is very much deletional.  
Katie attends a private boarding school this year, so a new custody agreement was written. We still have a 90-10 split for holidays with them being longer for private schools. In addition, Katie chooses who to spend the in-between term break with whom she wants. She has spent those with me, infuriating Lilly as she hoped Katie would choose her for those.

  
Long story short, the real issue happened last week. Katie had gotten her period for the first time and was sent to the Nurse's office. She asked one of the teachers to call her mom but had meant her step-mom, Misa. So when the teacher handed her the phone expecting to hear Misa's voice it was awkward. The issue was quickly fixed with the teacher eventually calling Misa, but not without Lilly getting mad.

  
The teacher had informed Lily that her daughter had gotten her period and wanted her step-mom for comfort. Plus, she had accidentally called her instead of misa. Lilly had heard Katie say mom through the phone and put two and two together. Figuring she thought she was talking to Misa when she had cried mom.  
An hour later, Lilly phoned me screaming and in tears. She called me a selfish pig for allowing Katie to call another woman mom. Furthermore, she insulted my wife and threatened to tear her apart if she didn’t stay away from her daughter. Before hanging up the phone, she threatened to teach Katie a lesson.

  
Lily has always hated me since I never paid child support ( maintenance ) and never allowed her to take Katie to see her family in the USA. She lives in a shit apartment and has always been jealous of her daughter. She’s mentally unstable and blames it on me for not providing for her.

Just to make it clear, I have been married to misa for six years. I started dating her when Katie had been born and she has treated katie as her own since day 1.

AITA or not",AmItheAsshole
H Coming home late while out with friends,"Hi. I'm going to keep this one pretty open ended.

Lisa: WFH partner
Scott: Closing shift partner.

Lisa worked their 9-5, came and hung out at the restaurant that SCott works at. Lisa went home around 10pm or so, Scott said they were closing a bit after that and would go get a drink with coworkers.

Lisa goes to bed. At 12:43, they text Scott ""How late do you think you'll be?""

At 1:30 am, Lisa follows up with ""any idea""

Scott says
""Are you okay?
We're at a bar we all just closed out though
Not sure what's next
But are you okay""

Lisa ""Im okay. Alright Ill see you tomorrow""

Scott ""Are you upset""

Lisa ""Im ok. Im literally just in bed trying to sleep. I just kept waking up. Thats all""


At 3 AM, Scott is still not home.

Lisa sends ""How late do you think you'll be. It's 3 on a tuesday""

Scott, 10 minutes later. ""Baby I don't know late, I'm with friends we're hanging out""

Lisa, ""I'm beginning to get concerned.""

At this point it escalated with both people upset.


Is Lisa or Scott being an asshole, or neither, or both?

Lisa thinks Scott is being inconsiderate and evasive and defensive.
Scott thinks Lisa is being manipulative and controlling.

Additional clarity: Scott regularly works closing shifts and frequently goes out after for a few drinks with coworkers. This is not inherently a problem for Lisa in this scenario, although it does happen more regularly on friday/saturday shifts than tuesdays.



edit - slight clarity edit. also just realized that i put AITAH in the title and should have reversed it as I am the lisa in the scenario but I was trying to hard to be objective or something.",AmItheAsshole
 for getting in a fight with my friends and maybe losing them forever (sorry this is long),"Ok so I 13f got in a fight with my best friends 13f and 12f and some other people that in this I’m just going to say friend 1,2,3 and some other’s but it all had started when with my best friend Alex (fake name) had told me and girl friend 1 was talking about me saying I was jealous of her and she had a crush on the same boy that I like so I was mad and the next day I had asked friend 1 and she had told me how she had a crush on him like for a week but then she moved on by the way this was the next day so that night we were all on call me and my two best friends I was telling her how friend 1 was made at her for telling people she liked this boy well she started telling me that a group of my friends were the ones that were talking about the boy and she was mad and had told them that these this girl I know and friend 1 so I was like she’s made at you but the show must go on so I was on a call friend 2 but then his sister friend 3 came in and was like I have drama so I was like tell me and she had told me how Alex was the one to tell him I liked him so I had texted Alex getting made at her for telling my business then she had got mad at me saying all this stuff about it’s ok for other people to lie but when dose it it’s wrong well at the end she didn’t even seem to care me and Alex stopped talking till the next day she had texted me again but I didn’t see it and me and friend 3 where talking about how Alex had texted her cussed her out about how she is a snitch and fake for telling me and I didn’t even want to talk to Alex at that point because she talking about me and was trying to play the victim so I end up not talking with her but this is when my second best friend came in rose(fake name) but I was telling her how I was mad at Alex for what she did well as time moved on I was bothering rose because I was that she had reported a lot of videos of couple things so had was bothering her well she had got mad at me saying to stay out her personal life I told her sorry but she had kept trying to text me and I was like I told you I’m sorry but she was going on about say I need to mind my own business but then said not to be rude so I had ignored the message well somebody was telling her I was talking about her badly when I told only the people in our group in this that I thought she was trying to start an argument with me for no reason",AmItheAsshole
 for not being happy with my sister for stealing my things?,"Hi, so i’m a 17 year old female with an 18 year old sister who constantly steals my things from me when she has a job and I don’t. She always sneakily steals them and then tries to put them back sneakily in the same position, but I always notice. There was one time I was so worked up asking her to give me back my new setting spray I knew she took yet she continued to lie in my face to tell me she didn’t have it, then months later it appeared on my floor, completely empty when i’d never even got to use it. Last year there was a period of time last year where she’d misplace stuff almost every day as her room was such a mess and then message my mum every day saying I stole from her and my mum would constantly send me angry texts when half the time it had nothing to do with me. There was one time she sent my mother photos of my dirty underwear she found in my room because she thought they were hers, they weren’t. My mother told me to never go in or near her room and I abided, but now she’s constantly stealing stuff from my room. She steals my hair straightener almost every day and whenever I tell my mum she tells me that i’ve ruined her dream of living in Sydney and am ruining her heath because all I do it argue and refuse to share. I tell her she never had the same energy when my sister used to claim I was stealing her stuff, and she tells me i’m miserable and live in the past. Anyway, she steals my straightener when i’m awake too but this morning it was 6am and she thought I was asleep so she came into my room, full on ninja mode moving a millimeter at a time in order to get it. I told my mum and when she asked my sister my sister said it’s a cheap hair straightener anyway (which I thought was bad justification because I don’t even have a job and she does and just because my stuff is cheap doesn’t mean she can just take it when she pleases) and that she thought I was asleep and didn’t want to wake me. My mum basically got so angry at me, saying shes my sister and I have to share with her and that it’s just a hair straightener that she only didn’t ask because I was asleep, even though she never asks me when i’m awake. How am I even supposed to share when she just takes, never asks? My mother said most siblings don’t need to ask each other to use their things, and that’s only in share houses, but where was this energy when she thought I was stealing my sisters things? Anyway, my mother just told me I need to share and stop fighting over a hair straightener and leave her alone, but in my eyes it’s not about the hair straightener itself. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for making my grandma cry in an argument over my belongings?,"This has been an ongoing argument for years really. Since I was in middle school actually. She has this habit where she won't like the way I have my things in my area organized or she'll buy me new things without warning.

I always tell her that I like my things the way that they are and I don't want them moved. I struggle with memory so if something is out of sight or it's designated spot I forget about it. I don't know why I hate my things moved so much but it stresses me out to the point of crying everytime. 

Today I came home from school and instead of my regular two drawers I have in my area in the living room I had a new bigger one in its place. Of course this sparks the same argument we've been having forever consisting of me reminding her that I don't like when she does that and her telling me 'shut up you'll be fine.' I will admit I could've said please this time like usual. However I've been so stressed and exhausted from school, graduation stuff, figuring out my future, and a god awful mental state (which I've told no one about if that means anything to someone idk) that coming home to something that makes me cry just made things worse. At the end of our argument, which I've already forgotten most of it even if it just happened (sorry), I tell her 'it hurts my feelings when you ignore what I'm telling you' and she responds back with 'it hurts mine when you don't appreciate the stuff I do'. 

I'm crying while trying to organize my scattered belongings (as she had moved certain things in different spots around the house) this new drawer that I didn't even want. Of course I'm mad too because she didn't listen when I told her that I like my stuff how it is the last time we had this argument. 

While I'm organizing I hear her crying in the other room. I usually go an apologize to her at this point but today I was just so fucking tired. So I waited awhile thinking she'd stop so I caved and went to talk to her. She said she was sorry, that she was only trying to help and I hate her now. I consoled her and told her I don't hate her at all and appreciate her efforts but I wish she would just stop moving my stuff.

I don't know what to do. I know it'll happen again. I'm just so tired.",AmItheAsshole
 for sharing a bed with my ex wife's sister?,"My (38M) ex wife (34F, Tara) and I have been divorced for almost 4 years but we have a good relationship. We are friends and basically never fight. Our daughter (7F) lives with Tara but I see her every weekend. I haven't been with any women in a serious way since the divorce because I don't want to make things more difficult. As far as I know Tara hasn't really been with any man but I don't ask.

Tara's sister (31F, Liz) recently broke up with her boyfriend and has been staying at her place. Liz has always been nice to me and we never had any issue. She seems to have a kinda messy personal life with weird boyfriends that come and go but I never had any reason to think of her as a bad person.

Tara took our daughter to a trip out of town last weekend so I was alone at my place saturday night when Liz called. She was alone at Tara's house and was scared because she heard strange noises from outside. She was afraid because she thought her ex boyfriend might be stalking her. I told her to call the police but she said they wouldn't do anything and asked me to go help her.

After I arrived, she calm down and we had dinner together. I realised she wasn't going to let me leave as she got visibly distressed any time I hinted at it so I suggested I could sleep on the couch. Liz told me Tara wouldn't like that because the couch was new and expensive. She also argued my daughter's bed was too small for me to use.

Liz said she had been sleeping on Tara's bed with her for weeks and it was big enough for the two of us to use comfortably. I realised it was a bad idea but I was tired and she talked about it so naturally that I felt I was going to make things more weird by arguing. She fell asleep quickly and I made sure too stay as far away as possible in my side of the bed to avoid us touching.

I didn't sleep well that night. The next morning she thanked me profusely for staying with her. Tara could arrive at any moment so I wanted to leave fast. The issue is that I casually told Liz that we shouldn't tell Tara about me staying there that night. I thought it was an obvious thing but Liz took it the wrong way. She got angry and said she didn't do anything wrong, didn't have anything to hide and I was ""disgusting"" for insinuating otherwise.

I haven't talk to Liz since. I talked with Tara a few times but she didn't say anything unusual so I assumed she didn't tell her after all. I don't really get why Liz got so mad at me and don't know what to do about that. Also I am still worried about what she could say to Tara and how she might react. Ultimately, I feel I was just trying to do the right thing and I am just a victim innthis situation.

Am I the Asshole?",AmItheAsshole
H for going against my parents and choosing where I live?,"I (19, F) am going into my sophomore year of college along with my bf (18, M). Due to high tuition and housing fees, we applied to live off campus next semester and got accepted.

The two of us want an apartment together and have been looking at places. I told my parents and things got bad. Both my parents (who are divorced) were furious over the fact I may have to live outside of the town my college is in and demand I live closer to campus.

My bf and I have already looked into everything available in town, and everything is senior citizen housing except for one studio apartment which isn’t ideal but is our last resort. 

I told my father this and he snapped at me saying there’s more than just that available in the town. To which I snapped back at him saying the one we were looking at outside of town is the same distance as my sisters work is to her house, so I don’t see the problem. He told me not to yell at him. To which I said “I’m not yelling. If you want me to yell, I can effing yell.” He hung up on me, then we got into a texting argument.

He said he found 20 apartments in my area available for rent. I then went to each one he sent me and proved to him they were senior living or not available at the moment. He’s still so mad at me for trying to pick a place outside of town and trying to control both my living situation and my bf’s.

He ended up saying to me that I can “just live with my parents like most college kids.” To which I’m fighting the urge to respond with “does that mean that I can go get tattoos, a fake ID, and get drunk like most college kids too? Or is it only conditional?”

Idk guys, AITAH for fighting with my dad about where I want to live?? Am I being over dramatic and just listen to what he has to say? Or am I justified in trying to control MY living situation?

UPDATE:
So my bf and I just went to look at the studio apartment in town. It’s not the best, but it’s cute and we think it’ll work. Besides, this will keep everyone happy. I told my parents. My mom was so excited and happy for me. But my dad said I shouldn’t get it and keep looking after insisting that we must get a place in town, and this is the only one available. He’s now trying to pressure me to move in with him without my bf. I’m starting to think he just doesn’t want me to grow up and stay his little girl. But that’s just an assumption. ",AmItheAsshole
 For not wanting to lie to my Step-Dad,"I \[19FTM\] has never had a good relationship with my mother \[49F\]. She's insufferable and always blames me for everything, I can never feel safe to go to her at all due to how dismissive she is of my feelings. The way she handles things is in a petty way. 

Now she married someone who I do not like (There was a time where I used to like him), but he has issues where he would cry to my mom whenever I won't listen to him. The thing is, I don't like him and I don't respect him. My Step-Dad, I'll call him Jon, was never a good man. Just like my real dad he was in and out of prison and when he was in prison I felt more free because my Mom wouldn't jump to his defense anytime he would cry and complain about me. 

You'd think with all the white knighting they had a good relationship? Not exactly. I don't think you see the issue here. They would argue 24/7 usually because of cheating. My Step-Dad is the one who accuses her of cheating and refuses to let her leave the room. The cheating accusations get a little tense and this leads to yelling fits and refusal to listen to each other. 

My Mom would involve me in this arguement but no matter what I said, Jon would not believe me, to put into perspective I am someone with special needs that gets agitated pretty quickly am I not even a good person myself, they would intentionally piss me off just to punish me later. I can never go to them to talk to them for any issues, because they would dismiss me or pretend my issue doesn't exist. 

I must've zoned out yesterday because Jon hadn't returned back home at all, and I think my parents got into a fight under my nose. So this is the part I might be the asshole. My mom came home and verbally abused me before I came to ask where Jon was, she gets snappish at me, and then a few seconds later while I was washing dishes asked me to ""Call him and tell him I didn't come home."" this is another tactic she does whenever Jon leaves. She asks me to call him and tell him she never came home. 

This caused her to get mad at me once I refused, and she accused me of being the reason why HE believes she was cheating on her, I try and tell him that she's not and he doesn't believe me, so I don't know what else to do, AITA for not wanting to Lie to my Step-Dad?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my sister to help pay for new tires on her vehicle?,"Hi, there! Wondering if I am out of line here and ironically enough, my sister tells me over text verbatim, ""ask any unbiased person the question and see what their response would be.""

The relevant info:

My sister lives in New York. Last year she visits on kind of a whim and drives here (to where I live in eastern Ohio) to visit and see me and my son. She stays for 3 days or so and before she leaves, so proposes the idea of leaving her vehicle here at my house so that I can use it in the interim while shes in New York. She cites that having her own vehicle in New York can be really bothersome, which I took at face value for seeing that it has that windshield paint/numerals on the top right corner of it on cars you see get impounded. Also the back driver side bumper/panel is clearly side-swiped, which she says was a snow plow.

Now, she says she'll come get the car whenever she needs it but she hasn't in the entirety of me having it (8 months), nor has she communicated that she even plans on coming to get it/use it anytime soon.

I see this as a win/win because my personal car was an old 2000 model. It was old, rusting and only a 2 door that I had to squeeze into to get my son into the backseat car seat. I felt infinitely more at ease/safer with him in a 2014 sedan.

I come to find out that car insurance isn't being paid approximately 3 months ago and forwarded that info to a mutual family member because they offered to help, which ultimately ended up fizzling out, so I need to investigate that again. She can be difficult to talk to, because she only talks when \*she\* wants to.

I take the car in to get an oil change and find out the tread is non-existent on both front wheels. I decline having them replaced that day so I can ask her to help with it. Its under $1000, but its a lot to fix. I go home and the tire wall blows out within the hour (this coincidence has me SO suspicious of the Firestone that I took the car to, btw). I take the car back and get the tire replaced, because I have to.

I ask her for help via phone call(she answered) and text to help pay for HALF, because it doesn't take 8 months to wear down the tires to nothing, but she takes 19 days to respond, to which she ultimately tells me ""You are driving a FREE vehicle, ask any unbiased person the question and see what their response would be. Completely free? No lease? No insurance payment? Didn't pay to register it in Ohio? Wow what a deal, I think oil changes and 400 dollars once is a pretty sweet deal. I'm working and going into DND mode."" I paid for the oil change, as I should and don't think she should. I replaced the tires and I ask her to help pay for half of the cost of the tires,  - Am I the asshole?

Edit: Added some clarity of a few talking points in the last paragraph.",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to come to my daughters birthday party?,"So I had my daughter when I was really young, I was 16 at the time. I wasn't exactly the best dad, I had addiction issues - drugs, alcohol and gambling. I ended up getting arrested for the first time when I was 19. I've been in and out of jail for the last few years. When I was first arrested, me and my ex decided it would be best if I wasn't in the picture for my daughters safety and I agreed. She got married at 21 to someone else and I was happy that my daughter had a proper family even if I wasn't part of it. 

My ex has been sending me updates every few months on our daughter, how she's doing at school etc which I've always appreciated. She even sent money to me when I was in prison which I never asked her to but I did appreciate it.
A few weeks ago she reached out to me and asked me if I wanted to come to our daughters birthday party, she told me that she and her husband got divorced a few months ago and that she told our daughter about me and wanted us to spend some time together. I told her that I don't think it was a great idea, just because I know I'm a piece of s*it, I know I have anger issues, I know I'm a criminal and I don't want my daughter to follow in my footsteps. We've been arguing about this for the past few weeks and my ex is insisting that I come. So AITA for not wanting to come to her birthday?",AmItheAsshole
 for winning a turtle at a youth group auction ,"So for some background my youth group gave out tickets for being there, bringing a Bible, being nice ect. And you would use these at our auction at the end of the year. So I had alot more then most people and then they put up a turtle stuffed animal and I was kinda thinking about getting it but then this girl who had always been annoying and a bully really wanted it so I waited and as soon as she bid all her tickets I bid one more then her and won it she started crying. I also ended up giving this stuffy to my two year old sister. This girl that lost is mad it me and so are all her friends (she is quite popular) but everyone else thought I was a legend for doing it. So AITA for doing this?",AmItheAsshole
 for talking shit about my best friend's ex when they broke up even though I've never liked them together?,"I made an account just for this I (17F) have a friend, we'll call her Sahara (18F) since we were in diapers. In middle school she started and on and off relationship with one of her friends, we'll call her Lexi. Lexi got expelled in the 6th grade and had to move but her and Sarah stayed in touch but weren't really together anymore. Sahara had some pretty messed up relationships in highschool (like when she was in 7th grade there was this thing with 4 senior guys) back in 2019 Sahara told me her and Lexi got back together, initially I didn't like this because at the time I was pretty homophobic but have since gotten past that. They started seeing each other a lot, hanging out, going on dates, all while Sahara was in the glass closet if you will. Admittedly I had never seen Sahara happier but she did struggle with a lot of self esteem issues and she'd constantly ask me if I thought Lexi was pretending to love her.
The two of them planned their future together, college, jobs, wedding, adopting, ECT. In mid February Lexi broke up with Sahara over text saying that she has been wanting to do that for a long time even though they had just spent a week at Christmas together and Lexi had supposedly not seemed any different than her ""usual cuddly self"" as Shara put it. Sahara has been in the worst place I've seen her in a long time. All she does is go to school and work and her sister-in-law (a mutual friend) says they have to make her eat. She has started wearing more makeup but given the context I don't know if that's a positive? Sahara is one of those people who just doesn't like anything about themselves. She hates her looks, her voice, her personality, you name it. She had started getting a bit better though. 
I called her two weeks ago to check in and she said she had just gotten off the phone with Lexi. They had been talking for SIX HOURS. All she talked about was Lexi. Lexi's new boyfriend, Lexi is going to prom, she's going dress shopping and getting her hair and nails done and all that stuff. Sahara sounded excited but I could literally tell she was crying. When I asked if she had asked Lexi why she broke up with her (because Lexi didn't give a reason) but all she said was that they agreed she needed to work on herself a lot before considering a relationship. This made me so so mad. I acted natural while on the phone but the next day at school I just let out all of my Lexi centered frustration to my friends.
 I admit I said some pretty harsh stuff about how much I hated Lexi. One of our mutual friends told Sahara what I had said and she got pretty upset with me. Basically she told me I shouldn't have said such things while crying and almost yelling (Sahara isn't a yeller) she's been ignoring me ever since and she hasn't talked to any of our friends either and they think I overstepped. Sahara's birthday is Tuesday so I really want to mend things quickly but really was I being an asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband he can’t mow the neighbor’s lawn without asking?,"My neighbors let their lawn get very long and weedy every year. It bothers my husband a lot, so he mowed the ditch line in front of their house without asking. We have never talked to these people. I told him he can’t do that and that it may upset them that he cut their grass. He told me it’s a Department of Transportation right of way and he can do whatever he wants to their grass. I tried to explain that people get upset about things like that and I did not want to start a feud with the neighbors. I went and apologized for him doing it because it was stressing me out. This made him more mad and he said I was belittling him. Am I the asshole for telling him he can’t mow someone else’s grass? ",AmItheAsshole
 for turning down my mother-in-law's trip to Disney World?,"My wife and I had already planned to spend a week in NYC for our vacation this summer, and we already booked a place to stay and got tickets to a show. My MIL just told us that she wants to take our family plus some of my sister-in-law's kids (SIL is in prison) to Disney World conveniently at the same exact time. She is really excited because she says she always wanted to take my wife and her sisters (wife doesn't remember this ever coming up before) when they were kids and never had the chance.

First of all, wife and I are not really into Disney. The kids will watch some Disney content but aren't super obsessed. I feel like getting to see museums and try new restaurants is more enriching than meeting people in costumes and a whole manufactured experience. Secondly, Orlando in the summer sounds awful. Finally, MIL's vacations are never fun. She does everything on the cheap. We would be driving in a rented van through all the southern states in the heat. She will pack food in an ice chest instead of stopping to eat. I'm also not even convinced she is paying entrance to Disney World for everyone, and we will probably have to spend our own $$$ anyway if we want to actually go to the park.

OTOH, I'm sure the kids would have fun anyway, and MIL wants to make memories with them. WIBTA for turning it down due to not wanting to be sweaty and uncomfortable and not really wanting to pay for part of a vacation I didn't want in the first place?",AmItheAsshole
 for denying to buy my (23F) cousin’s (23F) bf (?M) clothes after offering her my help? ,"My cousin recently got kicked out of her parents house with nothing but the clothes on her back, and went to her boyfriends house. They had been dating for less than a month but he took her in, for some reason the roommate kicked her and the bf out and they were both homeless.

They got a placement from a local non-profit, and my cousin still has nothing except some clothes that her aunt dropped off for her. I texted my cousin and asked if she needed anything, like food or clothes (prior to me knowing her aunt brought clothes). She said she needs everything, especially boxers, t-shirts and socks for sleeping. I asked her sizes and said I had some tshirts she can have, and she said she doesn’t think the tshirts would fit, and the sizes she gave me sounded more like sizing that would fit her boyfriend. I told her I can buy her some food and stuff, but I didn’t want to buy clothes because it sounded like they were meant for her boyfriend and not her.

She said “it doesn’t matter who they’re for you asked what I needed help with and that’s what I need help with”. I have met her boyfriend once and the only reason I’m unwilling to help is because he is extremely disrespectful towards her, and was constantly talking over her, and began to raise his voice at her because he thought she was looking at another dude’s Facebook page, when she wasn’t. He also admitted to me that they had gotten into an argument at her placement which could’ve gotten her kicked out. 

She said she doesn’t need my help anymore if I’m gonna disrespect the “person who had been there since she started going through this all” but I  said I will get her some food and toiletries and said to expect a DoorDash at her door at x time. She should have gotten it by now but I never got a thanks or anything, and I’m assuming she’s still upset with me

Aita? Should I have just helped her boyfriend too ",AmItheAsshole
 for being depressed ,"So the title makes it seem weird but I (15f) have a problem I'm in highschool and my friend group (5 girls my age) is in the same class as me. If been friends with sandy ( not her real name ) for about 4 years now and we are the best of friends. Even tough she is closer to me than the others we are all best friends. Now this conflict started a few months back ( it wasn't a conflict then ) I was getting a little depressed ( my home life had sum issues and school wasn't going well ). By that I mean I've been quieter and more held back than usual and haven't been talking as much. My friends were acting off as well wich didn't help. They were talking less to me or planning stuff without me. A little later I was talking to Alysha ( not her real name ) about how I felt left out and she agreed saying she felt left out as well. We decided to talk to the others about it. But we were pretty busy and we wanted to talk once everyone was there. Now about two weeks ago sandy and Abby said they wanted to talk to me. We ent outside and they started saying that they want to take a break from our friendship because I haven't been as happy. The thing is we are going on a road trip with the class for a week and we're in the same room.

I don't know if it's my fault that we aren't friends anymore they ment a lot to me and maybe it was annoying I just kinda hoped that they would ask if I was okay or sum instead of just saying let's not be friends anymore. 

They've started to spread rumors about me ig sum guys were talking and u over heard them saying that they got the info from sandy.

I'm really not in a good headspace rn and honestly don't know if it's my fault or not.",AmItheAsshole
 for not partying with my friend?,"Hi,

My friend is 23M I am 23 F. We are very close friends although since he moved back to his home country after college (which isn't far away) we've often only met during the holidays or whenever he comes back for a weekend.

I am doing a Master's now and I have two weeks until my exams. Also it is in Swedish and this isn't my native language so it takes more for me to process. I really need to revise as well as finish my coursework because some of the modules I find particularly difficult.

I am also someone who when it comes to drinking and partying, the hangover will make me too lazy to study for the next 2 days which in this time is crucial time wasted. He told me he was coming to visit this weekend (not solely to visit me) and i was excited and said we will do something for sure but not clubbing because I have exams next week and these types of luxuries should be a reward for myself AFTER exams.

He said that my behaviour was ""shocking"" and accused me of always being a flake. I then got angry and confronted him and asked ""why does it always have to be f\*\*\*ing clubbing and drinking when we meet"" and said how he should respect I need to focus and can't afford hangovers when exams are so soon.

He told me that he just won't ask me anymore and that I'm boring, and accused me of always avoiding seeing him but he just doesn't understand im not a party person unless im on vacation.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting daughter's Bio mother at graduation?,"4 years ago I legally adopted my Bonus Daughter by her request because her Bio mom is/was a drug addict and had neglected/abadoned her on more than one occasion from Infancy through 10.

 The last straw happened when she was 11 and came to live with her father and myself full time because Bio mom was on yet another binge and nobody had seen her in months. She left Bonus Daughter with her grandmother and went missing. Hubby and I got word of what happened and We went and picked her up, filed for full custody, the whole 9 yards.

3 years later after 0 contact from her she shows up, on drugs of course, and pregnant with a random guys kid. That is when Bonus Daughter asked me to adopt her because as her words "" you've been present in my life more in the past few years than my mom has my whole life"" . Not long after this her Bio mom has the baby, who was taken by CPS because of neonatal addiction and she disappears again. Parental Severance and Adoption go through uncontested. Life is peaceful...

Fast forward to now. Daughter recently turned 18 and is getting ready to graduate.  She asks her extended family on Bio moms side to come to her graduation,  which I am completely fine with since she has maintained contact with them ( they didnt abandon her) . But she was asked if she wanted her bio mom to be there.  She told them she does but at the same time she doesn't because she doesn't know how it would make her feel to see her in person again, but at the same time she knows is still her bio mom so she has mixed feelings. And just for context, Bio Mom is pregnant again with new guy and has been clean for a year, but we all know she could slip again too easily.

I will admit I was quite hurt when I found out she was considering letting her be there. The way I see it, she abandoned her yet again, almost zero contact or anything through the years so why should she share ANY of the happiness and glory that comes from MY DAUGHTER graduating?  I know my daughter is 18 now and I can't do anything if she decides to have a relationship with Bio mom, but it still hurts none the less.

Also, YES I know if it wasn't for Bio Mom I wouldn't have such an amazing daughter, but I also know that if I didn't step up that my daughter wouldn't have had a stable mother in her life.  Bio mom caused a lot of trauma for that young lady that i had to help her work through. I put her in therapy, took her to the doctors, helped her gain weight, I made sure I was present for ALL the big things she experienced, all the 1sts that are important for teenage girls. 1st kiss, 1st BF, 1st heartbreak ,etc. 

So AITA for not wanting her Bio Mom to be there for such an important day in my daughter's life?




P.S. if my daughter absolutely INSISTED she be there, then yes I would grin and bear it, but she has talked with me and is on the fence about it. I am asking on here because she wanted my opinion on what to do but I know I am biased.",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my friends over to my house?,"I (24F) am an intern. I work with other interns at the hospital, and we go through wards and hospitals together. We have 24-hours long shifts together etc.

I am friends with my fellow interns, treat them well, help them out during hard times at work, support them, and all those things. However, I am a private person, and I already see these people a lot and they have personality traits I don't love. Therefore, I do not wish to spend time with them outside of the hospital.

Samantha (24F) and Kate (24F), two interns I work with now, invite me to go out and I say no. Samantha is very persistent. She has said multiple times that I should invite her and Kate to my house so we hang out. I did not want to be rude to her face but always said I don't feel like doing that at the moment (I am going through a lot of things) and thought after asking me 5 times and getting no warm answer, she would drop it. She didn't.

Yesterday she said she felt weird asking for it again but I need to invite them to my house. She said or I could just invite Kate (kate has been to my house once 3 years ago and that was a diffrrent time for me). I said I do not feel like doing that right now. She said I should feel like doing that before our rotation ends (in a month).

I still don't want them in my space. I am a very private person with little patience or tolerance to entertain people and I definitely don't want to see them at my house. WIBTA to not invite them even after them saying this multiple times? I do not want to be rude (we do work together after all) but WIBTA if I just said I do not wish to do after work things with them? Please help me out here I feel suffocated. Thanks",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad at my friend over a drawing?,"Today, I wanted some privacy and I love to draw. So I drew a character design and a backstory. Immediately, my friends started to ask what I was drawing, keeping in mind I was in public. Suddenly, one of my friends snatched what I drew, and I snatched it back. She says that she should be able to see what I drew because I borrowed her pencil. Later, I was doing some work and she said that she would take my drawing and not even look at it while I got back to them. After a little bit, I was done with my work and suddenly I see the two of my friends staring at my drawing. i snatch it out of their hands and say, "" I'll like to have that back, thank you very much,"". My other friend, that also likes to draw comics, makes a comic of me, and I peek over a little. She was labeling me as depressed, mad, and sad, and more things I would absolutely hate to be called. I have now stopped talking to her and she has not tried to resume conversation with me either. Was I in the wrong for doing this over a drawing?

Edit: I forgot to put this, but my friends say that I hurt my other friend's feelings because I have stopped talking to her. I have called them unpleasant to be around because they invaded my privacy. I have now stopped talking to everyone in general. ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my in-laws to not buy me gifts but just pitch in together to buy one?,"- 31F, birthday is coming up, and I'm in a 3 year relationship with my fiance, to be married this year.
- Nobody in his family makes good money aside from us.
- They are EXTREMELY into gifts. I've asked for them to just spend time with me and save their money but they refuse and usually end up (each couple) getting me like $50-$100 worth of random things (all lovely, just not always things I'll use). 
- I have a lifelong skin condition that requires very specific types of products, all of which tend to be pricey ($80+), but they last me a very long time.
- I once heard one of them complain about a friend's wishlist because everything on their list was a minimum of like $100 and I definitely don't want to be tactless.

WIBTA (and if not automatically yes, what is most tactful way) to ask them to just pitch in together, like $20-$30 per couple to put toward one gift that I'll not only love and appreciate, but use nearly daily? Or, since I make enough, should I just buy my own and just ask for something purposely chepa that I can still enjoy? Like wine or a potted plant?

Thank you in advance! The guilt is real.",AmItheAsshole
 for making my boyfriend pay,"my husband makes over 3x more than me, he agreed a month ago he would cover out entire expenses for 2-3 months(rent, utilities) while i start my new job because i didn’t know when i d be getting paid and what i could afford.

 i finally get paid and have extra money i am using not to spend on nice things but my debt and house improvements, he told me if i had money then i can help 50/50 with everything. 

where i said, i am not going to be posting because you told me you would cover expenses for 2-3 months and he can’t take back his word like usual, we get into a HUGE fight and i tell him if he wants to start doing 50/50 for everything to fork over 50% of grocery money and toilet paper, dish soap, random stuff i never ask for money for and he says it’s not fair because i go out of my way to spend extra $$ on dinners to make at home and we can survive off ramen and we can’t survive without a house and utilities 
so i stopped cooking and buying things for him, the past week ive only made food for me and only wash my dishes, took my phone the wifi etc.. aita?? he never pays me half or it takes him weeks to, he always switches up on his word and i’m over it! ",AmItheAsshole
 for not taking an interest in SO's hobbies,"My boyfriend has recently brought up that he feels I don't take enough interest in his hobbies - primarily tennis &amp; golf. We have been dating for 3.5 years and been long distance for the last year. When we lived in the same country we played tennis together a few times but he says I always said no to his suggestion that we play together. I honestly don't remember him asking me that often but feel that maybe he stopped asking after I turned him down a few times.

I have sat and watched golf on TV with him and tennis highlights. I always ask him how his tennis matches go and have since learned loads more about golf, even watching it without him so I can talk about it with him. I have made an effort to learn who the various golfers and tennis players are that he likes/dislikes. He also took me to the driving range once and I loved it and would have been very open to going again.

I am not very sporty and have never previously had an interest in these sports other than watching the Wimbledon final on TV. He only brought up the issue in the last few months and I now feel super regretful that I rejected his suggestions to play tennis/golf when he was around as now I don't have the opportunity to do these things with him regularly due to distance. 

Am I the asshole for not attempting to participate more in his hobbies. I feel that he could have brought it up sooner when I could've proven to him that I would try to put more effort in with his interests. Should I be trying to do more or should he be ok with me saying no when he has friends to play golf/tennis with who share these interests. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my neighbors children to play in my yard?,"My boyfriend (26M) and I (24F) recently bought our first house. There is a young family beside us who has been nice but I am starting to get annoyed that their 2 young girls play in our backyard. We have had some brief interactions with the wife but the husband is not friendly. I often let our dog out at the same time as him and he blatantly ignores me when I say hi. The wife has mentioned getting together for a wine night but she hasn’t formally invited us over. I have caught the girls playing in the leaf pile that took me hours to rake and they also ride their battery powered scooters/cars in our yard. Admittedly, they haven’t done any damage to our yard. Maybe this was okay with the previous owner but I hate that they assumed it would be okay with us. It would be different if the parents were friendly with us and I would probably be joyed to see the girls playing in our backyard. I want to confront the parents and tell them it’s not okay but I also feel silly for getting mad at kids. Is this a boundary I should set or am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my mum to pay for broken computer parts?,"I (M18) live with my parents while I attend university. My mum irons almost everyday at varying times and what tends to happens is the iron will short the circuit that it’s on, being the same one connected to my pc which I’ve spent hundreds on, and despite her telling me when she’ll iron, she never does. I recently came back from an overseas holiday, turned on my computer, and once she started ironing again, the power turned off and my computer wouldn’t turn back on. 

I did some diagnostics stuff and some research and found that both the cpu and the ram are broken, with only half the ram registering and the computer not booting with the faulty cpu. The only thing that realistically could’ve caused this is the constant shorts of power. 

I asked if she could pay for replacement parts and she instantly flipped the blame on me, for not ironing instead of her, and that she is always in the wrong no matter what. 

Is it fair of me to ask her to pay me for the parts she essentially broke, or ask at least contribute to replacing these parts? I recently started a job at maccas and the don’t pay awfully well, so it’ll be a while before I can afford it myself.

",AmItheAsshole
 for threatening legal action against a handyman?,"To summarize, I own a rental property that was almost completely destroyed in a natural disaster last year, and I am in the process of a complete remodel.

Another contractor that was doing demolition work recommended a handyman for some A/C work. I met with the handyman, who we'll call Tom, and had them do a small bit of work on the existing A/C unit. After inspecting the unit Tom said it was very old and needed to be replaced. On 12/26/23 I agreed to have Tom replace the old A/C unit and against better judgement, I paid Tom $2,800 for a deposit on the equipment.

Construction delays ensued, and so the property wasn't ready for the A/C until 4/15/24. I texted Tom to let them know on 4/3/24 we would be ready soon. Tom responded with a simple ""Sounds good"". I texted Tom again on 4/12/24 to confirm. Tom responded again with one word: ""Great!"". On 4/15/24 after not hearing anything else I texted Tom again to confirm. Tom texted back and said they were busy and that it would ""prob be Wed \[4/17/24\].""

4/17/24 no call, no show, no A/C. I texted Tom again, they responded ""Yes sir trying to get caught up."" I texted Tom again for a date certain, no response. I start to get worried. I talked to an attorney, who suggested that I give Tom an ultimatum I and threaten legal action. Another week goes by without a response, so over the past few days I sent Tom several more escalating text messages, culminated by today's text that basically said ""if you're too busy to finish the work I understand but please either text me back and let me know what's going on, deliver the equipment I paid for, or please refund my $2,800 or I will be forced to take legal action.""

About an hour later Tom finally calls me, furious, and basically told me that they will not deliver the equipment, they will not refund my money, but that they will install the A/C unit whenever they get around to it. The logic being they have been waiting on me for 3 months to install the A/C, and now that I am ready for the A/C I am ""rushing"" them, I still owe them some $$$ for a small job they did previously (I agreed to pay them when they finished the A/C installation, which I had forgotten), and have threatened them with legal action. So as a result, they will intentionally delay the installation. Tom also made a vague threat that if I took legal action against them that ""it would not end well for me.""

I feel like I may have escalated things a bit too quickly after going back over the timeline and judging by Tom's reaction, but it's not like they were just sitting home losing money while we got the other phases of the remodel finished, they had not at any point asked to be paid for the previous work (I admit I forgot I owed them for this), and they not been communicating well if at all, and now they are holding me hostage. Am I the asshole for rushing Tom and threatening them with legal action after not hearing from them for a week?",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad at my bestie,"I’ve talked about her before and I just wanted to let it all out. I enjoy being around her, but I don’t have anybody else in school that I’m really really friends with. She’s the only real friend I have but sometimes she gets out of hand

Whenever I make stuff in class, she copies me a lot. Today in class we were doing slideshow projects and I had an idea and she had hers but then she looked at my idea and then changed her original one to mine. Also last time we did presentations I picked a black theme for mine and she had to pick a black theme too but I’d like to think that was just a coincidence. 

I used to think it was just temporary and I just have a bit of anger issues but it’s a bit serious. My favourite number is 7 because of a whole lot of reasons, 1. My last name starts with D so my number in class is always 7 or 6. 2. When I was little I fell off a bicycle 7th times and on the 7th attempt I fell and got a huge bruise. Real stories.

So one day I was bored in math class so I asked for her favourite number and I would put hers and mine together and calculate the average for a cute little friendship number. Im a nerd I know. And she said 7…. I honestly tried thinking that a lot of people in the world have 7 as their lucky number but also I have a big sister who’s fav number is 16 cause her birthday is literally on the 16 and I would say my fav number is 16 when I was little cause I wanted to be like her. Then my best friend had to have the fav number 16.

Also I feel like she’s starting to dress like me, like the things I would wear a lot she would. Oversized Sweaters, black jackets specifically, black boots or white sneakers. I would think it’s common because a lot of people wear like that but it’s starting to get a bit odd because she also cut her hair short when she grew her hair really long since she was a baby because I got really short hair. She even said to me that she wanted the same length as mine.

On top of that, the ways I sit and talk are a bit replicated from her. I’ve once ranted about this before and they just responded with, “she’s probably just looking up to you” or “maybe she’s tying to find things that will suit her” but I feel like like she’s flat out trying to replicate me

It even got to the point sometimes people confused our names but I feel guilty saying this but her personality is a bit weird. When we hangout she doesn’t even talk unless I talk even though we’ve been friends for 5 years. Whenever I ask her something, she says “whatever” or “you can pick” to the point it gets annoying because every choice is supposed to be mine to make.

I’m a bit scared of dogs and I would laugh about my fear and she would laugh back or joke once and that’ll be fine right? That’s what you would think but she instead every time I see a dog she goes like “Are u scared??” And laughs like she’s trying to lock me but at the same time I don’t think she’s trying to and it just crosses the line every single time.

",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my husband our house isn't perfect and to stop being picky.,"My husband (36m) and I (36f) are pregnant and  expecting in a few months we'd been together for two years
He has a daughter (10) from a previous relationship that lives with us full time. 

Our house, he had 10 years before I entered the relationship and had been taking care of solo he has been trying to renovate but being a single dad had struggled to pull together the extra funds to update anything but now we are expecting we are looking for a new place because the current one is only two bedrooms and quite small not even close to being big enough for a family of four.

We can have the baby in our room for a short while but we have a maximum of two years before the baby will be mobile and will start to require a separate room and I absolutely would not expect his older daughter to share a room with a toddler that's just not fair and not an option. 

I've been sending him links to places that are bigger within our price range but he always finds something wrong ""the kitchen needs updating""  or ""the bathroom needs redoing"" "" the area isn't great"" 

I told him that these houses are in better condition than his current house and he can't afford to be picky when the tiles are falling off the kitchen walls and the bathroom has a shower curtain as a door. 

He's huffy at me now and won't talk to me. 

Aita? ",AmItheAsshole
 for giving my friend my honest opinion of her boyfriend?,"My close friend “Becky” recently started dating this guy “Chet.” I’ve known Becky since college and she’s always dated really tall, athletic, attractive, successful guys, so Chet didn’t really fit the bill. I guess nice enough, smart enough, funny enough, and he has a decent job, but he is REALLY ugly and does not seem to have an amazing personality or a lot of money or anything to compensate for his sad appearance. Chet is 5’6” and probably 100 lb, with a flat butt, a weak jawline, and a receding hairline. I don’t know what Becky sees in him. I know I’m close to Becky so I may have a distorted perception of her in some ways, but if you look at the facts she’s a doctor who makes close to seven figures, a former D1 athlete, and modeled part time in high school and college (her appearance has not changed much since college). There is no way that Chet is good enough for her in my opinion. I told myself I would keep my opinion on Chet to myself unless Becky asked me. The problem is, she DID ask. 

Becky told me that Chet wants to move in together, and the idea of taking their relationship to the next level is making her have second thoughts about the relationship as a whole. She asked me to give my honest opinion of Chet. I first asked her if Chet asked specifically if Becky wanted to move into HIS place or if he just suggested they move in together. The latter means he wants to take advantage of Becky’s money, and it was in fact the latter. After that, I told her my genuine opinion, starting with my thought process about them moving in together. I told her Chet isn’t attractive enough to be taking advantage of her money–in fact, he isn’t attractive at all, and he isn’t smart/funny/interesting enough to compensate for his looks or his modest income.

Becky did not take this well. She called me shallow and said I haven’t changed since college. She said Chet has so many good qualities that cannot be measured. I asked her what those qualities were, and she listed a few generic things, like buying her flowers, texting her to make sure she drinks water, etc. I told her she could easily find a successful, good-looking guy who does these things, but if she wants to move in with Chet that’s her prerogative. I said if she didn’t want my honest opinion, she shouldn’t have asked for it. She said she wanted my honest opinion but she didn’t want me to tear Chet apart. It’s been a few days since our argument and I haven’t contacted her because I want to give her time to cool off. She hasn’t contacted me which is strange for us because we normally talk every day. I’m wondering if you think I owe her an apology and if I was too harsh on her and Chet. Should I have been more gentle? Should I have focused less on looks and income? Should I have just lied? If I apologize, should I reach out first or should I wait for her to contact me?",AmItheAsshole
 for being a bit rude to my classmate because I was mad at my bestie?,"For starters, I’m considered the pretty nice quiet kid in class but not the type to be a people’s pleaser. On the other hand, my best friend who has some communication problems is the type to be a people’s pleaser to others and is very shy. 

Today I went back from lunch with her in class and I sat down in my seat since we have assigned seats and opened by textbook. And my best friend stood there awkwardly in the seat next to me because some guys in the class were sitting on top of her desk which is across the room. 

And I just hated how pathetic she stood there, waving her body around because she doesn’t know what to do. I don’t think she means any bad but it really got on my nerves because she is my best friend and she should tell them to move their ass off her desk. She should fucking stand up for herself and not be standing there turning her body shyly and awkwardly.

So then I was pretty annoyed and she kept glancing at me but didn’t even say anything so I stood up and went to the guys and said “Can you guys move out of ((my best friend))‘s seat”. And said that it’s my best friend’s seat and they were very considerate and we’re sorry. I felt really bad because I should’ve of just said “Do you guys mind letting her get in her seat?” Or something along those lines. Because after that, in class they complimented my handwriting too and I feel very wrong.",AmItheAsshole
 for insisting I should be able to take up more room in the fridge than my roommates?,"There are five of us (including me) and 3 shelves in our fridge. When fully stocked, my groceries take up 3/4 of the top shelf. Recently one roommate has been mad at me for taking up so much room. However, I take up 0 room in the freezer. I don’t have a single item in there and never do. This is partly because I just don’t tend to buy frozen things, and partly because the 4 of them have stuffed it to the brim so that if you open it, something’s gonna fall out. Watching them try to rearrange new groceries is like watching a game of Jenga. So I refuted that because I don’t take up any room in the freezer, I should be able to take up a bit more room in the fridge. She also hasn’t even complained that there isn’t enough room in the fridge for their groceries (there always is!) - just that I take up too much room. AITA?

edit: also, if she had said hey, do you mind rearranging your stuff so that I can fit my groceries, I’d be happy to do that. But that has never happened because there is always room. The issue she has seems to be sheerly with the amount of space I take up. ",AmItheAsshole
 for joking about a small accident my friends roommate did?,"Recently me and my friend went to watch a hockey game in Montreal. While the game was going on, my friend received a call from his roommate who while intoxicated wanted to fix some problems with their apartment. Although they had good intentions, they broke the top cover that’s on top of the water storage behind the toilet while trying to put it elsewhere and dropped it on the ground. His roommate was fine and didn’t get hurt but they had that top part missing and since they had a cat they didn’t want it to just stay open like that. So the next weekend since their car didn’t have enough space for a boxed toilet and mine did, we went all together to get them a new toilet.

Now here is where i think I might be the asshole. Across the day, to lighten up the mood of their broken toilet and the fact they broke it i tried making a few jokes on the subject as for exemple: while we opened the new toilet i gave them the cardboard box telling them they were allowed to drop that part or i said that at least if they break the body of the toilet next time they have a spare.

After everything was done i continued to hangout with my friend and they had gone to do their own thing and when we both left afterwards to go out i said goodbye a bit loud since they were in their room and they had said nothing back. At first i juts taught they were listening to something or just didn’t hear me so i left unbothered.

I later learned from my friend that they had found me rude and had gotten pissed off over my jokes and that they were already feeling bad enough from break the lid and they didn’t need to get that from me and that they didn’t respond to my goodbyes for a reason.

I feel bad for this and i apologized and everything is okay now but the more i think about it the more I feel like it wasn’t that much of a big deal and that’s why i post this here for simple curiosity of what everyone else here thinks.

So am i the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for thinking i shouldn’t split traffic tickets?,"So my partner has a bike, that recently went out of insurance, on the day that he got the ticket, i told him a week before that on the weekend we were going to go visit my cat that recently died, he knew of this visit ever since he died cause i told him we needed to go visit. So to visit the place where he is you have to schedule like an appointment, reason why i reminded him a week before we went. Either way, his insurance ran out during that week and when the weekend came, he still risked it, i didn’t push it nor did he say we shouldn’t go or that we should take a bus. He got a ticket today and said to me “how do we do” implying i should pay for him not having his bike insuranced. I felt like i shouldn’t have to pay because it is his responsibility to be up to date legally and it not like i forced him to go either. He could of said no cause he didn’t want to rish it and i would of understood.
Ps. We do live together but handle our finances separately and everything that’s house related 50-50. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not standing by my bf who’s excluded from our friend’s Bachelorette party,"My bf Josh (39M) of 13 years and I (31F) have a common friend called Marie (42F) — who is actually more friend to my boyfriend than mine. 

Just to give you an idea she even made him godfather of her first child and used to call him when she was having fights with her ex for Josh to talk to her ex and help them to make peace. 

Josh also used to help them a lot when we were living in the same city and he was even buying them groceries when they were in quarantine before we moved out. 

**Anyway, Marie’s getting married in September and invited me and not him to her bachelorette party in Vegas for four days discriminating him for being a guy.**

We’re from Europe and this trip of 4 days is a 12 hours flight back and forth so the Bride at least paid for a villa and the tickets for everyone (except mine because I have points and I told her I will get it).

Josh did way more in terms of friendship to her than I ever did, but since we left the city, Marie has been ignoring us, never asking how we were doing, and she even ghosted me when I tried to reach out and organize a trip last summer for the four of us so we could get to know her new fiancé. 

Josh is feeling super salty and discriminated for not being invited because he never excluded her out of anything for being a woman. He also never excluded me from any social group because of my sex/gender and he feels this tradition is super sexist. 

**He asked me to stand by him and decline going because of her “sexist attitude” (his words not mine) but I’m really looking forward going to Vegas with them as I have never been there. And I don’t think it’s a fair request.**

Then the Bridal group was talking on WhatsApp that they needed a photographer and Josh having tons of professional gear and experience I suggested to the Bride for him to be the photographer of the trip which would allow him to join us.

Marie agreed but then the Bridal group who has another WhatsApp group without the bride in it started being against the idea because it’s a girl-only thing and they reached out to Marie to exclude Josh from the dinners and most activities except like 1 or 2. 

I thought initially since Marie was okay for Josh to be the photographer that he could come to the events and even one of the organizers did, so she bought him tickets for the shows and got him a mesh “Bride to be team”. She was very sweet and inclusive and Josh was very looking forward to it.

But nope— I received a message yesterday from another of the girls telling me she spoke to Marie and that Josh would be excluded from most stuffs except 1-2 activities.

Basically they want him just to come to take the videos and pics at the villa they rented and then be disregarded for the dinners and activities and only used when needed without even being compensated for it. He was about to pay for his own hotel room and flight. 

Josh feels terrible, disrespected, and now wants me to take a stand and decline the invitation given how Marie is treating him. AITA wanting to still go?
",AmItheAsshole
" I’m 27, I live at with my parents, my parents took my psych meds and won’t give them back. I got angry at them and they complained I am starting a fight.","(27M) So here’s some back story. 

I used to live on my own but after my fiancé left me, I spiraled out of control using drugs and became psychotic. 

My parents ended up having the police take me to a psychiatry hospital. 

That was 3 years ago, since then I have stopped using drugs, took antipsychotics for two and a half years. I no longer experience hallucinations, delusions, or fixed false beliefs. 

My parents have a history of kicking me out when we have big enough fights. For example when I was psychotic they kicked me out and I had no money. They then called the cops and told them I was a danger to myself or others and got me a board of mental health. 

My parents had guardianship for a while but that was legally nulled after a while. I now have full medical-legal rights. The psych said I had “substance induced psychosis.” 

My parents; however, took my psych meds and won’t let me have them for fear that I would misuse them. They now pick up all my prescriptions. They also have a tracker in my car and regularly check it. They say if I want my meds I have to move out. (They give me 7 days of my “normal” meds at a time but won’t give my any of my trazodone for sleep)

 We also agreed (after my parents found me with Kava and a vape) that they should control my money (at least for the last 5 months). They now have 5500 dollars that they dole out to me on an “as needed basis.” I work 50 hours a week and my checks go straight to my dad’s bank account. They have a history of saying additionally “you have to let us check your bank transactions or else we will kick you out.” 

Today I wanted a trazodone to help me sleep and my dad said “why don’t you just wait an hour and then wake me up if you’re not asleep” 

I told them I rescind any agreement that we had regarding control of my meds or money (I have done this several times but they just blow it off and life goes on). Tonight my mom said “just move out all I want is for you to leave because you’re not appreciative of all that we give to you.” 

I told them I would move out if I had access to my money (moving out has been a topic of conversation for the last 3+ months that is sort of a Cold War at this point). 

Insults were exhanged and feelings were hurt. I have no way of getting my rights back short of calling the police or stealing my stuff back. 

I’m not a neckbeard that will never move out, I lived on my own for 5 years, I have been talking about moving out on my own for QUITE A WHILE. Every time I get excited about it, my parents never give me the money for a down payment or anything.

I get into fights every now and then with the same solutions, we end up forgetting about the fight and “getting along.” I said this is a conflict of whose will gets made and I want mine to be made, my parents scoffed at this and called me immature. I plan to go to Grad school soon (I am accepted into a masters program in another city for fall 2024) so it would be hard to get a lease for like 3 months but I can probably rent a room in someone’s house. 

Am I the asshole for causing so many fights? 
Am I even the one “starting” these fights?",AmItheAsshole
 for suggesting respectful parenting to my mother in law? ,"Due to some tough times, my husband (45m) and I (37f) recently moved in with his folks. It's not ideal, but they've got a big house and we're all pretty close. I really admire my mother-in-law; she's a powerhouse of kindness and never asks for anything in return. A few years back, her niece was struggling with addiction and mental health issues, so my in-laws had to take in her 4-year-old son. Now, imagine being in your late 70s and bam! parent of a lively 4-year-old again

Fast forward to today, and that boy is 9. Living with them now, I see a lot of their old-school parenting: lots of yelling and what they call ""tough love,"" which really isn't my cup of tea. I grew up with emotionally immature parents myself and it took a lot of work to heal from that trauma. Seeing how they treat him, especially when he’s just being a normal kid, really triggers me. He’s likely got ADHD and is super smart—but it’s struggling at school and at home since he is yelled at all the way through homework time after school.

He gets scolded for typical kid stuff at home and school, but when he's with me, he's great because I give him choices and try to guide him calmly. At home, though, he’s often labeled sneaky or manipulative. I've tried talking to my mother-in-law about maybe easing up and trying more respectful parenting techniques, but she didn’t take it well. Not upset, just not open to trying suggestion.

So, AITA for wanting to step in? How can I support him without overstepping? ",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving my friends house early because of how bad it is?,"I (18M) recently visited my friends (18M) house to sleep over for a few nights and while I did initially have a good time hanging out with him I'm leaving a day early because of how asinine being here has been and how unlivable it feels. When I got here they guided me up to the third floor where I would be staying in their guest room. It is a pretty small room with a bunch of clutter on one side of the room and a twin bed. The issue arises with that the lamp is so low and dangly in the room that I keep hitting my head on it. Along with that the door opens up directly to the stairs that go to the 2nd floor and are placed awkwardly so that there's no floor outside of the door so the door to the room im in is just on the side of these stairs meaning if you weren't looking while leaving the room you would miss your step and tumble sideways down the stairs. 

The other issue is that much of the house seems not fully built. For example, the floor in my room is this weird rough plywood material and all the stairs have exposed insulation coming out of it and this weird glue substance. Also, the only bathroom is on the first floor and there are no lights in the bathroom and no sink either just a toilet and shower. The house is filled with clutter and trinkets and knick-knacks and everything about it screams hoarder and I can handle a messy house but this truly somehow got to a limit I was shocked existed. Also on the stairs going from the 2nd to first floor there is a stair cover that is made out of a cheap plastic material that you have to lift up and is screwed into the wall with 2 hinges. 

The bed in the room I'm staying in is also horribly uncomfortable and feels like its filled with hay and scraps of paper. All of this has been affecting my sleep since to go to the bathroom at night they don't allow me to turn on lights so I have to use my phone flashlight and carefully exit my room without tumbling down the stairs before lifting up a plastic stair cover and then finally going to the bathroom with no sink. Then go all the way back up and sleep in the most uncomfortable bed ever.I really have tried to be a good guest but after a couple days of this I told him I'm leaving early and he got upset and said that wasn't what we planned on. I told him in the nicest way I could that I couldn't get adequate sleep but he didn't seem to care and said he's slept on the guest bed before and its fine and I am spoiled and expect to much of him. 

I feel bad and maybe I'm being picky and spoiled but I just cant handle the lunacy of his house. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for not sharing my inheritance with my mom and sisters?,"My(24m) grandmother was not super wealthy, but had a lot of land and a nice house on her land, along with a decent amount of money in savings. She had recently passed away and when we found out who got her inheritance, she wanted it all to go to me. 

She never explicitly stated why she wanted me to have it all but the only thing I can think of is because I was the only one in my family who went over almost every day to see her and to take care of her in her final years. 

This made my mom and sisters furious and demanded that I share with them because she was their mother/grandmother too. I said no because whenever I asked if they could do something for grandma because I was busy with my own child, nobody ever helped out. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for taking my aunt to small claims court?,"So I 26F had a nice car that I bought myself. It was in pristine condition and had lowish mileage for a used car. I had the car for about 7-8 months and my aunt 38F asked me to borrow it for the weekend because her car was in the shop. 

Sunday comes and I call her, she says her car is still in the shop and she needs my car until Tuesday. I then couldn’t get ahold of her after Tuesday. I heard later that she didn’t pay to get her car fixed and  she stopped paying her car payments and they repossessed it. 

She lives over an hour away and is constantly driving up and down the road almost everyday. Fast forward, she’s had my car for 7 months, I ask her if she wants to buy my car, we agreed on a price, she said yes, and at the 1 year mark of her having it, she would have enough money to pay me for it. Until then, the car would stay in my name and I didn’t give her the title. I also mentioned to her that I bought the yearly tag this year, but next year she would need to, since the car is only mine in name. I also told her that I didn’t want to keep paying for car insurance on a car I don’t drive. She gave me her sob story of “no one ever helps me” and that “It’s so hard to get by” and a bunch of other (what sounds like) excuses to not want to pay. My family and my grandma (her mom) all help her out a lot, so I was calling bs in my head. I lowered the plan from full coverage to the lowest premium they had. 

The 1 year mark came and I’ve heard nothing from her. Later on in the months, I heard that she didn’t get the money she was counting on because she didn’t do anything on her part. Since then, she’s borrowed more money from me for her rent, light bills, and other miscellaneous things which I have on record. 

Damage to the car includes (to my knowledge): 
hit a deer which busted the hood and the right front light(replaced), 
had one of the windows of the car smashed out(replaced), 
hit another deer which messed the hood up even worse and took out the left front light(replaced but the hood is horrendous). 
All of the lights are flashing on the dashboard in a way I’ve never seen before, and the interior is destroyed, I’m guessing from my younger cousins. 

I’m trying to be patient &amp; understanding with her because she’s trying to make it, but when she keeps accumulating debt &amp; never pays you back it gets kinda frustrating. And if you don’t help her once she’ll go off saying that no one ever tries to help her or that she’s all alone trying to take care of the kids. 

Back to the title, it’s been almost 2 and a half years since she’s borrowed my car and I get sad every time I see the deteriorated version of the car I once loved. I’ve mentioned to sue for my money only to be asked if I’d really take the car and leave them all stranded an hour away. However I don’t want my car back at this point because she’s run up the mileage and destroyed it, I just want the money she agreed to buy it from me for. 

So WIBTA for taking her to court over this?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend she’s overreacting about a man touching her?,"friend and i (both 22f) went to a mcdonalds after the bar, was incredibly packed and was hard not to bump into anyone. i see this guy trying to get past us to his friends, and while doing so he got on his tip toes to squeeze past and lightly touch her shoulder to get through. she turns around and yells “who the f do you think you are touching me” i was kinda in shock cuz never seen her react that way before. i know nothing traumatic with a man has ever happened to her (shes been in a great relationship for a couple years) and we’ve been in situations where people just have lots of body contact accidentally.

this came up in a conversation way later about men, and i brought up this and said to me it was kinda an overreaction. her response was “well why did he have to touch me. these men need to learn to keep their hands to themselves”. 

we resolved this and understand each other sides, but just wondering if aita for not agreeing with her stance.

edit: we were not drunk and i know for a fact nothing bad has happened between her and a guy (we are like sisters). noticed in the past couple years her disdain for men has grown incredibly, due to stories she hears about bad stuff happening. valid",AmItheAsshole
 for ignoring my emotionally distant father after trying to forge a relationship for years?,"Am I (22f) the asshole for intentionally ignoring my father's (47m) attempts to contact me after trying to forge a relationship with him for years. 

This is a burner account since idk if anyone I know uses reddit, but recently I've been having a lot of guilt surrounding my relationship, or lack of relationship with my father.

For some background, the man was rarely there for me growing up. I have very little memories of him, or rather, not many good ones at least. He was always drunk, fighting with my narcissistic mother, and I witnessed some pretty messed up stuff because of them.

I have a lot of trauma from my parents, but for years I still ached for a relationship with them. I had been taking care of myself independently since around 15-16, and my mother passed when I was 17, opening the door for my father to come back in my life. I was apprehensive since he had been just as, if not more, unreliable than my mother. I had thought since I was still a minor, he would have no choice but to take me in.

Well... that didn't happen. Shortly after my mother passed, he left me to live alone in that house, the same house I saw my mother dead in. Over the years he has done a lot to hurt me, a lot of screwing me over, and I have voiced my hurt and concerns. I can't go into detail due to character limits, but those closest to me have assured me that my feelings are valid (I work in mental health and my friends all do as well, so we call out bad behavior in each other often out of tough love)

Ive been trying my whole life to have a relationship with him, mostly even more from 17-21, but over the last few months, I can't find it in me to even try to have a relationship with him. He takes care of his new wife's kids better than he ever took care of us, and I really can't stomach to be around it anymore. I have struggled with very bad mental health in the past, a lot of it trauma related, and I have found he makes it worse due to him exhibiting behaviors that caused my trauma (something he is very well aware of)

I'm 22 now, living completely on my own, with no ties to him anymore. I have a stable job that I don't hate, possibly starting a new one that will pay me more and allow me to go to school finally. I'm in a healthy happy relationship with a great guy, and have a small but loving friend group. I've been very happy recently.

The issue now comes in with my father suddenly wanting to make contact with me. I haven't answered since he's appearing to be repeating the same behaviors of love bombing after months of ignoring me, and more. I haven't really spoken to him since around last summer due to him ignoring me, and my decision this winter to go NC. 

I feel very guilty over cutting him out, but with all my past experiences with him, no matter how much I try to speak to him about how his behaviors hurt me, he'll never change. Even the thought of talking/dealing with him is bringing me a sense of dread and making me sick with anxiety.

So AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my family im pregnant.,"I (26f) found out i was pregnant at the beginning of April this baby was a complete shock. I waited to tell my family until the 5th i don’t see them everyday so i sent a picture of my other 2 children holding a sign. I thought everything was fine until 2 hours later my stepmom was posting on fb but hadn’t texted me i thought that was weird and  texted my dad. He said stepmom was fine, it has been 3 weeks since stepmom has said a single word to me or even liked a post i have made on Facebook. 
Here’s where i think i may be the asshole. My stepmoms daughter has been trying to get pregnant for maybe 6 months. I told her before i sent the picture to anyone so that it wasn’t a rub in the face moment, but i still added her to the group so she could see the picture i took. I dont think im the asshole but 3 weeks is a long time to not talk to a person. 
Am i the asshole? 

",AmItheAsshole
 if I ignored my mom and didn’t go to college,"I (18m) am the starting pitcher for my schools varsity baseball team(I also play shortstop, second base, and center field), my junior and sophomore year I was all state and this year I was selected for the area code games , and I am nationally ranked in the top 10 I think(if not 10 then definitely top 15) have a few college offers from D1 schools, and I want to go to the mlb. Yesterday I had a meeting with a scout from our cities mlb team (not a good team, they’re one of the laughing stocks in baseball) we’ve  had the meeting scheduled for a few months, he saw me at the area code games basically he told me they saw my tapes and are interested in signing me to a rookie deal when I graduate in June, he said they wanted me to play 2 years of minor league ball, and on the 3rd year be a reliever in the big leagues, and go from there, I jokingly told him “ I appreciate the opportunity, but once that rookie deal ends I’m going to New York and playing for my Yankees.” He laughed and told me I’d change my mind once they made me shave my beard and cut my hair, and asked if I was interested in the deal, I said I was and we shook on it, he told me “on June 22nd you’ll graduate, and on June 23rd you’ll be a [Team name]”. After the meeting me and my dad were ecstatic, my mom was upset, she is an immigrant and moved from the   Dominican Republic after she got pregnant with me so I could have a better life, no one on her side of the family has gone to college, to her education has always been her number one priority, my dad on the other hand focuses more on baseball, he has been the one working out with me, taking me to college visits, and is the one that got me into baseball he isn’t forcing me, baseball is what I love) she said “Sports that’s great, but I am focused on you getting an education. Why not go to one of these schools, letters are coming in everyday, do you know what i would’ve given to get a free education from these great schools? The [team name] will still be there after you get a degree.” My dad told me “you’ve just been handed a lottery ticket, don’t throw it away cause you’re mother wants you to go to college, this is a once in a lifetime opportunity don’t fuck this up.” I thought about it, and I’ve decided that I want to go pro and skip college. I told my mom and she was crying, telling me that I didn’t know if it was gonna work  out, what if I got hurt or failed in the minors, and if I didn’t get an education than she would think of herself as a failure since she moved just for that, not for baseball. Now I’m not sure, WIBTA if I skipped college?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my mom a millennial?,"So I was at a McDonald's with my family and my mother was going on about how the millennials and Gen Z were ruining the planet. She was saying they are the reason for the workforce being so poor. Just on and on. So I told her, ""You are a millennial.""  
She got pissed and was like ""Do I act like one?""  
My stupid ass replied ""Yes.""   
(Technically the millenials behaviors set the stereotypes of how they behave and she was a millenial so no matter what she is acting like one.)

I wouldn't answer how cause I couldn't really define it behaviorly the way she had been so she looked up what a millennial was and is now mad and is telling me and others that I said she was lazy and selfish cause that is what Google translated it to. She threw a fit and was pissy for the last few days for it.

I called her a millennial because she blames everyone else for anything wrong, if you don't agree with her you are wrong, and she likes to take credit for everything. She is constantly acting like she has a disability. She also is a Karen and will scream and cry on the phone at people whether it's her fault or not, though she doesn't do it in person. She holds grudges really well and will not let me talk to any of my cousins or family because, at some point in our lives, they have ""wronged"" us... This is the case with literally all of my aunts, uncles, and cousins. So growing up I have had no family other than my immediate family and grandparents purely just because she cannot forgive anyone for anything, or admit that she isn't perfect.

PS: Not all millennials are bad, most are not, but I feel like my mother fits a 'Millenial' stereotype to a T.

Over all was I the asshole for calling her a millenial in that moment, which was insulting according to her?  
I want to justify it but I feel like I should have kept my mouth shut.

Edit: She was the one who told me I meant it as an insult. I meant it more like a ""Hey, you know you're a millennial too right?""   
I called her a millennial cause she was acting the way she was describing them and swears that millennials are more my generation from 1990 to 2000. She refuses to accept the fact that she was born in gen Y or the millennial generation even though it spans from 1981 to 1995 and she was born in 86 which is definitely in there. ",AmItheAsshole
 for shouting at my girlfriend’s sister ?,"My girlfriend is 22 and I’m 21. Her sister is 13 and is the most spoiled brat I’ve ever met. 

I won’t get into details but basically my girlfriend had a really bad childhood because of her dad. As a result my girlfriend is very quiet and reserved. Whereas her sister is anything but. The dad was out of the picture by the time this girl was 5, and their mother has let her pretty much do whatever she wants since then. This had led to her doing whatever she wants, throwing tantrums whenever she doesn’t get her way and, relevant to this story, throwing out hurtful insults.

One of her favourites is calling my gf a fat bitch. My gf is fairly sensitive about her body which I know, and the last time she called her that I told my girlfriend I would intervene if that happens again, which my gf was okay with.

So yesterday it happened so I intervened and pretty much just shouted at the sister telling her to stop saying what she’s saying and to grow up. Well turns out she recorded that entire thing sent it to her mom and now the mom is saying I can’t do that again while she refuses to punish or parent her. 

I do see her mom’s point I do feel maybe it wasn’t my place to get involved but I’ve been listening to my gf get insulted for over a year and this was the breaking point. Think I just need another opinion so AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom that she never keeps to her promises,"I 16f live with my mom 40sF and my siblings 19f and 20m. My mom is a carer,for the elderly and tries her hardest to provide for us which I respect and understand. Due to our circumstances, I never asked for much as a child as I knew the answer would be that she can not afford it. Typically, I often scroll on the internet looking for things I would like, but are too expensive for us to purchase. My mom  says she will purchase it for me, but due to our circumstances I go for inexpensive items. However, even when I keep it at a low price, my mom says ""On my payday"", ""Next week"" inevitably delaying it although I know she still means it. She also has a habit of saying ""You never get anything nice for yourself"" but even if I asked I would get told we can't afford it and so on.  


Here is the problem, recently I found a pretty watch I like. I was talking to my mom about it, and she agreed to get it for me (I never asked her to.) I asked her the other day if I can order it, but she said the next day. I had an amazon gift card which made the total price add up to £15. Now, today is her payday so I asked for it and she said next time. This honestly upset me, as she never keeps to her promises. I understand she goes through the struggle of providing for me and my siblings, but I feel that I never really get what I want.  


Just a quick thing, please don't insult my mom but give honest feedback because she's trying her hardest to provide for my 2 siblings as they are divorced and my dad is not giving money to us and instead asks my older brother for money to support his other family. I also can't get a job until I finish school.",AmItheAsshole
 for Not Wanting to Attend My Friend's Wedding?,"Hey everyone,  
  
I need some perspective here. My close friend is getting married soon, and I'm feeling conflicted about attending. We've been friends for years, and I genuinely care about her, but there are a few factors making me hesitate.  
  
Firstly, the wedding is in a location that's quite inconvenient for me to travel to, both in terms of distance and cost. Secondly, the date clashes with an important work commitment that I can't easily reschedule. Lastly, there's been some tension in our friendship lately, and I'm not sure if attending the wedding will help resolve things or just exacerbate them.  
  
I'm torn between wanting to support my friend on her big day and feeling like it might not be the best decision for me personally. Am I the asshole for considering not attending, or is it okay to prioritize my own needs in this situation? Any advice or similar experiences would be greatly appreciated. Thanks!  
",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friend to help me with my dog’s medical costs?,"I (51M) met my friend (56F) at the dog park 2 years ago because our dogs fell in love with each other. During a particularly rambunctious play session, her dog badly injured my dog and she now needs surgery which will cost around $5000. She makes a LOT more money than I do and I also provide free care for her dog while she works, look after her while she’s away, and about a year ago, I was really there for her when she was injured by a dog bowling her over and fracturing her knee at the dog park. I drove her to appointments, helped her with grocery shopping and carrying stuff. Now this woman is stingy. She’s the type of person who wants a banana paid back if I eat one at her house (just one example). She was also feverishly pursuing the owner of the dog that bowled her over for some kind of pay out. However, in THIS situation where her dog is half to blame for my dog’s injury, she doesn’t feel like it’s her responsibility to help me with the vet bill, which I have to go into even more debt than I already am to pay. Am I unreasonable in thinking she should help me, even just a little? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to talk to my mom in the morning? ,"I (18) have never been a morning person - I find it really hard to wake myself up properly and I tend to be very sullen and irritable for about an hour before the day kicks in. My mom gets up an hour before me, and by the time I am up, she is ready to go. 


My Mom always wants to have extended conversations with me in the morning. She constantly gets annoyed with me because when she asks me questions, I give a short answer and don’t attempt to prolong the conversation. I have tried, but I genuinely find it so difficult to sum up interest in anything beyond eating my breakfast. 

I also feel like she brings up issues over breakfast that we could talk about literally any other time (it’s not like we don’t see and talk to each other a lot in the evenings, we do) and sometimes I start to get really annoyed because she tries to get me to talk about actually important things that I simply don’t have the brainpower to consider properly at that time of day (let me reiterate that I am the worst morning person on earth).

I have said to her before that I’d rather we don’t talk that much in the morning because it upsets her when I’m irritable and trying to hold a conversation makes me irritable, so I thought that was a good solution for both of us. She got upset and claimed that I didn’t want to talk to her - which is not true! I tell her most things about my life, and always come home from school with lots of stories to fill her in on.

Today, she and my brother were having a conversation and I was not contributing, just eating my breakfast. She made a comment about how I wasn’t talking, and I said ‘I’ll talk when I’m awake.’ She got upset and said I was making her ‘feel horrible.’ I didn’t think that was fair because I wasn’t ignoring her, just not participating in the conversation - nobody was trying to directly involve me, anyway. She didn’t speak to me for the rest of the morning, even when driving me to school. I didn’t snap or anything when I was saying it, either, so I didn’t really understand.

Am I being an asshole? I feel as if it’s reasonable to like my own space that early in the day, and I don’t see a problem in sitting in silence at breakfast, I don’t find it objectionable or awkward - but maybe she does and it hurts her feelings. I have tried to explain that it’s not that I don’t want to talk to her, I just don’t want to talk to anyone. But maybe it feels personal - I don’t know. ",AmItheAsshole
- For standing firm on my assumption of family?,"I have to add back story otherwise it won’t make sense. Hang in with me for a moment. So when I was 16 my parents got a divorce. At 17 I was kicked out of my moms house for fighting with my mom (I was driving myself and 3 younger siblings to and from our original school district 40 mins away to and from every weekday because my mom moved all of us in with a guy she met 3 months ago.) I lived out of my car to finish up high school while all my sisters had to relocate to new school districts. I tried to commit that year and thankfully failed. Since then I lived with my dad. Well my dad got a new girlfriend an hour away and I was by myself in the house he had purchased.
 I got Covid for my 21st and was abandoned by all to go through a very scary situation by myself. I crawled to get food and water and could not breathe sitting or laying down. After I got better I started to make candles for Christmas gifts and started a fire in my dad’s house. I was kicked out by my dad and moved to AZ to live on my own.
I lived in AZ till I was 25 and really missed family so I moved back. Despite me trying weekly I’ve barely gotten to see anyone in the year I’ve been back.

Main story- so me and siblings were fighting because I was frustrated at a lack of respect or communication when we would try to plan things. I was invited on a family vacation to Disney and I didn’t want to go. My Step Mom/SM begged me to go and I resolved to go despite my internal warnings. Well I ended up being really sick, I had a viral infection. So I asked to go to the nearest Walgreens to get meds the first time I was allowed to go as we (total of 9) had drove down in two vehicles. I got meds without the good stuff and it didn’t work so I asked to go back the next night to get something better.
I was lied to about the both car keys being with SM and that I didn’t need to go out. SM had found out that I brought thc-mints at 5 mg, one for each of us sisters to have the first night to calm tensions. SM decided I was only going out to buy weed. I had already been there for 3 days feeling really sick, running on 2-3 hours of sleep each night. So after begging and begging to get help I put an Uber, plane tickets, and mask on my credit card and went home. Once home, boyfriend picked me up put me in bed and unpacked for me as I slept for two straight days. 
The next time I went to family event I was told I was a lier and a stealer. SM was under assumption that I stole her deceased mother’s blanket. And that they were mad at me for my disrespect during the trip. I found out later SM was upset because she spent over $30000 for the trip and she thought I was looking for any way out. I’ve gone no contact but both my dad and SM want to reconcile and move past this. I understand spending that much and planning for everything only for someone to be sick is hard but it shouldn’t be neglectful. So anyways AITA if I don’t to ‘move past this’? ",AmItheAsshole
H for not wanting to do more chores?,"Throwaway as neither of us wants us use our main for this dispute. Both of us will be reading the responses.

I (F27) live with my bf (M27). We were classmates at uni, both have the same degree and work in the same field (IT). We earn similar salaries (mine is bigger by 300€/month), split rent and utilities 50/50 and groceries 40/60 as he eats much more than I do.  

I never returned to the office after lockdown and wfh while bf works from office by choice. He had a hard time when he was wfh because he is very social and likes chatting with people while I prefer to concentrate and work in complete silence so that I can be done with work earlier (neither of us has fixed hours).  

Our day looks somewhat like this: we wake up at ~7. I grab a coffee and head straight to the computer, concentrate hard and work without distractions. By 12-1 I'm usually done with work and am semi free (I don't leave home and have notifications on my phone in case someone needs me because most of my coworkers start work much later than I do).  

Bf wakes up at the same time, heads to the shower, eats breakfast and goes to work by public transit, which takes him 40-50min one way. He starts work at ~9.30 and comes home no earlier than 19 (more like 20.30 on the days he goes to gym). Eats, packs his lunch, washes his dishes and goes to bed soon after.  

Now, chores. I cook lunch and dinner (different meals) every day. Bf has severe allergies and doesn't eat non home made food. I also do all grocery shopping and planning, laundry and do small jobs here and there (like cleaning the counters or dusting). Bf is responsible for weekly vacuuming, moping, changing sheets, deep cleaning bathroom, deep cleaning the kitchen. I spend 1.5-2h doing chores everyday while bf opts to do all his share on a saturday or sunday. It takes the better part of his day, which he is currently complaining about.  

He wants me to help with his chores so that he could be done with it earlier. He feels it's unfair I get so much free time while he barely has time to scroll his phone or read a book in the evening. I think it's his choice to work from office and I'm not responsible for it. He would save at least 1.5h daily on commute alone. He pointed out he was depressed when he had to wfh, which, again I don't think has anything to do with me or my free time.  

Basically he thinks I'm being selfish by not wanting to help him out. Being together means helping each other according to him. I asked how is it that he helps me then. I previously lived alone and it was cheaper (didn't have to spend so much on groceries because I don't have dietary restrictions and am a tiny person who doesn't eat much). I don't want to spend more time on chores than I used to when I was alone on top of that. All so that he could have it easier than he would if he was living alone. I have the time and could easily help him with chores, but frankly I'd much rather read a book or go for a walk instead. AITA?

 ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friends to pay for a dinner they RSVP’ed to and cancelled last minute?,"Context- me (30f) and a few of my close friends are planning a dinner for a friends 30th birthday. This dinner is at one of our houses and is catered by a guy who does hibachi (sets up tables, linens, etc). We got a head count before hand with a rough estimate of the cost. On Monday we sent out final amount everyone owes, everyone paid except one couple. That couple just texted today that they can’t make it. The caterer can’t change the price of the total and we don’t have anyone else that would come in their place.  AITA for expecting them to pay for their portion? ",AmItheAsshole
 for accusing my aunt of leaving my wedding out of spite.,"So here's a little background I was a single mum for six years my aunt was a big part of my life for that time before that was at uni and didn't have any if much contact. So I have my baby and I start seeing my aunt three times a week, kid goes to school aunt picks her up for me as I am at work. This was her offer. So I meet my future husband he loves me and loves my child as his own.

 He proposes and we start planning the wedding my aunt is still a massive part of my life and I want her involved. so we get to the day of the wedding and everyone is getting ready together I have multiple aunts but special aunt is the only one getting ready with the bridal party. All is going amazing everyone is having a great time.

 After the ceremony we have drinks and pictures the photographer has a list of important people for the photos special aunt is on the list (she was aware of this) Photographer call over myself, husband, child and both sets of parents to have photos done. The other important people  all wonder over on their own as they all know they will be called next apart from special aunt who is nowhere to be found. Turns out she left with her friend because of a broken shoe but didn't tell anyone. I was concerned when she didn't come over so myself and my siblings went looking for her she wasn't there. 

Due to this the photographer had moved on to the other photos we gave instructions for. Due to this I only have one photo of myself, husband and child on my wedding day that is formal. Special aunt comes back after two hours (she lives 10 minutes from venue) eats dinner and then sits away from everyone else for the rest of the day I finally corner her in the evening and take a picture with her, myself and my child which was supposed to be taken earlier in the day however she didn't smile in any of the five shots that was taken.

I was very upset when I saw my pictures and asked her for a reason she left and seemed unhappy and no response was given other than there was a broken shoe that needed to be fixed right then even though there was a three hour gap between ceremony and formal dinner. I was not happy with this and it turned into a argument, she became upset with me because I distanced my self from her which she doesn't understand I tried to explain why I was upset and she kept brushing it off like it wasn't important.

I think she left because she didnt get called with the first lot of important people,  she likes to make out that she gets left out of things and is not part of the family even though that has never been the case so i feel she left to make me feel bad on my wedding day. I can't let it go and it has affected the relationship to the point of nearly no contact. So am i the asshole for being upset with her for leaving my wedding without saying anything.
",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to be compared to my sister,"I 16 female and I have 6 siblings, 1 brother and 5 sisters. The folders kid is 18 and the youngest is 3. So, all my life I have felt that I wasn't as important as my older sister we will call her Zoe(not her real name). 

I would always be compared to her by my mom. What ever I did wasn't as impressive as what my older sister did. And this has lead to a lot of arguments between my mom and I. I have tryed to tell my mom how it makes me feel. I'll copy the text I sent my mom down below:

the text: maybe try spending one on one time with just me doing the things I like and I wouldn't constantly be a brat to you. all you do is hang out with Zoe and take Zeo everywhere and I get left out. then you buy me things to "" make it up to me"", just stop doing that. its more insulting then nice. its like saying ""oh, I know I could hang out with you and love you as much as I love your older sister but I don't so here have this"". and another thing, I'm not independent, 

more text: its just the fact that I can never compeat with Zoe. no matter what Zeo says or does you always choose to take her everywhere, I'm always going to be second to her, in birth and in life. that's all you care about. "" oh, go grab chips Zeo, no Zero we don't have the money for that, oh Zeo look at this book, no Zero you can't have that."" the only reason you even buy me thing is because you end up thinking that it will make it all better, IT DOESNT IT MAKE ME FEEL IMPORTANT, IT MAKE ME FEEL LIKE IM WORTH NOTHING. and the only time you apologize is when you see that what you have done has hurt me, you keep leaving me home and taking Zeo everywhere. 

and I'm tired of just having this happen to me, so AITA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for prioritizing a cow release party over my friend's birthday party?,"I dont know if that is the right word for it in English but in my country in the spring some farms have a cow release when the cows are release out for summer pasture and these things are major events that you need sometimes to book a spot at months beforehand. I booked my spot months ago. This is rather early in the morning and very far away from my city so I need to get up early and travel far but I think it is worth it for the cows. 

Now my friend has decided they want to celebrate their birthday the dat before I am going to this cow release. I declined because of the cow release, since I need to be up early and their birtday celebration would be late, and my friend got mad at me for pritoritizing cows over them, since the cows don't know me and won't care if I miss it but my friend will. But I booked this cow release very long ago and really look forward to it. Last year I couldn't go due to work. 

  
AITA for choosing cows over the friend since they have made it clear they want me there and gets upset over the cow choice? ",AmItheAsshole
" for refusing to open a digital birthday card sent to me by my parents because it's not a real card, sent by mail?","My parents stopped celebrating most holidays when I turned twelve because my dad would always throw a tantrum over something and ruin it. As an adult I never go home for \*anything\* and haven't since I was 21. I am 33 now.

My mom has always given/sent me a really sweet card she picks out by herself with $15 or so to treat myself to lunch. She's been doing this since I was a young adult and when I was younger we used to go out together and get breakfast, or something like that. It was so special to me. Since we can't do that anymore, as an adult the card itself is the stand in for that. 

Last year, possibly after talking to my dad who never has been involved in this, she said she will no longer be sending me a birthday card in the mail anymore. I asked why and she said she thinks they're silly and we live in a world where email is the same thing and it's what my dad prefers. I told her it's not the same thing to me, that I save all the cards she sends me and, idk, it's our a thing, the one thing we have. A digital card where they have 30 choices and is sent the day of to my inbox isn't the same. But my mom was adamant and also asked me to stop sending them cards for their birthdays, mother's day, father's day (which yeah I do send) etc. 

This year I was sent a digital card. I didn't open it. My dad eventually emailed me and asked why. I explained that while I appreciate the effort as I explained last year it is just not the same to me as having one mom picked out by hand, wrote in, and sent to me. The only point of me accepting/opening a card to begin with was because of our tradition and mom/he decided to break it for whatever reason.

To be clear, this isn't an issue of trying to cut back on waste (they don't recycle) nor is it a religious issue, nor is it a frugality issue (they're wealthy) nor have I ever said my dad can't pick out a card and sign it/have my mom sign it in the same way she has. 

They don't acknowledge me really (at all) as a person anymore, and my one wish for my birthday is to just have them pick out a card, write a note in it, and send it to me. Yes, if I called my mom, she would tell me happy birthday and talk to me, and most years we do that. But the card is just really important to me for a reason I can't place. 

AITA for standing firming and refusing to compromise on this?",AmItheAsshole
 for not allowing my gf friends to come over because they hate cats?,"Recently my gfs friends have been coming over and my cat just gave birth so she's super sensitive. My gfs friends are not animal people and keep chasing Tsu my cat from her home. I have explained this to her but she doesn't seem to understand. I love my pets they are my children and I don't like the fact that she doesn't care that Tsu is a new mom.
Edit: I spayed the male kittie as soon as I noticed Tsu was pregnant and my vet told me to wait 12 weeks to spay Tsuzan(it has been 1 week at most)",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my sister to pay me back money when I didn't clarify who was going to be paying for a workshop? ,"Hi all,

This is a fairly low stakes AITA but I'm not sure whether or not I should press it. My older sister is getting married at the end of the summer. We are all adults - I'm in my thirties and she's in her forties - and we generally have a pretty good relationship. My sister, to give a bit of context is a more frugal person than I am, and because I knew that about her, and because I'm an arts and crafty type of person, I offered to help her with her wedding planning and decorating. 

She decided that her theme is flowers, and asked me to take on making a whole bunch of paper flowers that can be used to decorate the wedding location. Honestly, it's going to be a lot of fun, and I'm looking forward to it. Here's where the conflict comes in. Because I didn't know how to make these specific types of paper flowers, I reached out to a friend of mine who makes them and asked her run a workshop for my sister and I and another friend. She agreed and told us the cost was $100 per person.

Now, I never clarified with my sister that she would be paying the whole fee for this, but because I'm volunteering a whole lot of time over the course of the summer to make her literally hundreds of paper flowers so she can have this beautiful exciting wedding event, I had assumed that she would pay for the workshop. However, this morning I got a message from my friend saying that I could e-transfer her the $100 I owe her for the workshop last weekend. I paid, but I'm very seriously considering reaching out to my sister and asking her why I have to pay for this when I'm going to be putting in a lot of unpaid labor over the summer for her wedding. 

Right now $100 can be a lot for me, but isn't as much for her, and so I'm trying to balance wanting to not rock the boat but also feeling a little bit hurt that this is cost that I have to factor in unexpectedly, and also just understanding that I never clarified whether or not we were paying for participation in the workshop. If I had known that I would have had to pay for this, I probably just would have looked at YouTube videos until I figured it out on my own. 

So Reddit, WIBTA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to go out with my girl friends?,"I (23F) am marrying someone out of my community. He (23M) is not accepted in my community, so for the past 2 years I have been excluded from activities with my girl friends (innocent events like boat riding and Christmas parties, where I am not going with men, or talking to men) because my fiancé is too jealous of possible contact with men.

I feel very isolated and I have not been participating in any activities I used to do prior to meeting him. I do understand why he would feel uncomfortable with me going there with girls, but at the same time if he joins it would be a scandal and I would end up never having a social life again.

Yesterday, I had a talk with how I feel isolated because I’m not allowed to go to social gatherings if they are mixed, and my girl friends don’t participate to social gatherings my fiancé approves of. I have been going to book clubs with grannies because it’s stuff he accepts and honestly it’s depressing me. I’m only allowed to go to mixed events if my brother chooses to tag along, but my brother isn’t really interested in outings I’m into. Besides, what would he be doing alone when I’m with my girl friends?

Am I the asshole for asking him to let me go alone, but with my girl friends to those social gatherings? I do understand why he would be jealous, but I’m not going there to socialise with men. I just want to be on a cruise tour ship with my girls in fancy clothing, pretending we are in a movie.

the reason I might be the asshole is because I feel like it would attract men to talk to me, but that could happen anywhere. I’m not going to social gatherings to sit with men. They just happen to be there. He says if a man comes up to me and my girls and gives his hand to shake while introducing himself, to him it is a reason why I should not go. Even if I don’t say more than “nice to meet you”. I don’t know what to say, because when I meet someone and they hand out the hand to shake, I can’t say no for fear of being rude. (I don’t know if I expressed myself correctly here) What do you think? Am I being the asshole? I’m genuinely asking because I feel horrible about it, I want to go out with my friends again but I can’t.

He said another solution would be to be there, 10 m behind me, watching in case a guy comes up to me to intervene. I feel chaperoned, I don’t know if my feelings are valid. I feel very weird about this, because the gatherings are nothing “degenerate”. They are community gatherings And men happen to be there. I’m not asking to go to the club lol and my parents have been sending me to those ever since I was young, so it’s nothing weird 

",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to see my husband on his birthday?,"It’s my husband’s birthday next week. A few days after his sisters. His sister messaged me asking if I had any plans for him this weekend and whether we would like to come and see her and have a “joint birthday get together” (she lives 5 hours away, round trip). I said sure that sounds great, and that I had no plans for him this weekend, but I am doing something special on his actual birthday. I do have something on with my friends on Saturday morning, but this is literally 1 hour and did not impact us potentially seeing his sister at all (this is relevant later).

I spoke to my husband about this, and he said he wanted to do something, just him and I, for his birthday e.g. dinner, spend the day together etc. And we also needed to save for many upcoming expenses (vacation soon, and moving house), and going down to see her would be expensive in fuel, gifts, having to pay for her dinner (she doesn’t pay for anything), etc. I told him I already told her we were free, so he said he would call her and handle it, and make up an excuse that he was seeing his own friends this weekend and couldn’t make it. I agreed to this.

He called her, and then after the call he told me, he had actually told her he was free this weekend, but he told her I was not. And that I was actually going to see my friends. He said his sister was surprised and said “but OP didn’t mention she was busy?”. This has put me in such an awkward position. His sister told him it doesn’t matter if I’m busy, and for him to come and see her anyway. I asked him why he changed the whole story and pretty much threw me under the bus? He said he felt sorry for her on the phone and didn’t want her to spend her birthday without him, despite telling me a whole different story, just an hour ago. And that it was fine if he changed his mind (I do recognise it’s okay for him to change his mind and actually decide to see her).

I feel massively betrayed, it’s like he told me one thing and her, another. I told her I was free on the weekend, and he said I’m busy with friends, making me look like a liar. He said we weren’t going to see her as we were saving up, but then totally flipped on the phone. He called me selfish and cold and two-faced, saying I’m fake to his sister and asking why I have a problem with him seeing her. But the problem is really how he handled all of this and he has pretty much stopped me from going too, by telling her I’m busy. I told him I refuse to plan anything for his birthday now, I’m just so hurt and feel betrayed. I told him I don’t want to see him this weekend, so all the plans are out the window.

AITA?


I answered some questions in the comments, before I knew how to add to this post. Thank you for all the advice and comments everyone 🙂 ",AmItheAsshole
 for not taking the dog?,"Backstory before the story, I have always been scared of dogs and how they jump up on people. This started when I was attacked by a dog at a very young age. Current day, one of my gran's neighbours let their dog off the lead and it attacked another dog. The owner now wants to put it down but my family are wanting to take it in.

My granny and gran dad live together and already have a greyhound which I have grew up with and didn't have a choice. Since I had to grow up with it, I can deal with it and especially because its old and doesn't jump anymore nor bark. My mum wanted to take it in though since the greyhound and the other dog don't get along. My mum told me that it doesn't jump or bark so I said I would give it a chance if on a lead. When I went to the house instantly jump the dog   at my granny and granddad which made me walk back home alone by myself without my mum.

My mum lied to me and said it didn't when it did. I don't know what is going to happen now since my mum isn't home yet. Also I forgot to say that we would take the greyhound until it passes if my mum doesn't decide to keep it. To compromise I can't help being scared of dogs. AITA? (I will update after my mum is home saying what  is happening)

  
(Edit) it's the day after and the dog has went back with the owner. My family have not got any more news from the owner. Something that I didn't add yesterday was that the owner has done some really bad things to the dog before. Such as, let it off his lead and not let the dog come inside of his house. Luckily, the dog knows to go to my grannies if it needs anything so it did. That night me and my mum had to take the greyhound and my grandparents take the dog. P.S the man said he was drunk but that's still not an excuse to do that to a puppy. Although scared of the dog, it's still a living being that deserves to be loved by a real good owner. My family have opposed that maybe in the mer future once the greyhound has passed that they might take the dog in. I have stated to them that if they do and don't train it. I won't be coming to their house anymore. My auntie who also lives in the same town as us, has a dog and it is also one years old. My auntie, someone who I consider my best friend respects my fears and whenever I am over she put the dog in a crate in her room shut with some treats in the crate and some calm music. 

  
Important! (me -14, mum- 35, granny - 54, grandad- 57 i think but they are very healthy) greyhound - 14 and the main dog is 1 anymore questions ask in comments",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my fiancé to shave his head once a week? ,"I (27f) love my fiancé (30m) very much and am attracted to him no matter what. He doesn’t have much hair left, and I personally feel he is most physically attractive when he just shaves it all off. It makes him look younger, cleaner, and more well-groomed. I’ve expressed this to him more than once, and while he does do it, he often lets it grow out a little in between.  Often when it starts to grow out I will remind him or ask him to go shave it. 

He gets offended by this and says that I am being shallow and controlling. My response is that it makes me feel like he doesn’t care that much about his appearance when he can’t do this one thing once a week. It literally takes five minutes. 

I put a lot of effort into my appearance including makeup, hair removal, nails, etc. I do this mostly for myself but also because I enjoy looking my best for my partner. It makes me feel bad that he can’t shave his head once a week without me reminding or nagging him about it. 

From my experience it’s not all that uncommon for a woman to give her male partner some grooming tips. I truly don’t understand why he gets so offended by it. I get that relationships are about more than physical appearance, obviously. It just makes me feel happy and loved when he puts in that extra effort into looking sharp for me. 

So, I am reasonable in my request that my balding fiancé shave his head weekly, or am I being a shallow, controlling asshole? ",AmItheAsshole
 for saying my mom has a bad memory?,"My (16 F) parents have always been pretty great to me. At least, I've never been abused and have always had a roof over my head. however, both of them have pretty serious mental disorders.  
My dad has BPD, and also works a lot, because of this he will often go into long stretches of time where he will not leave his bedroom, and I will sometimes go days without seeing him because he is working.  
My mom was diagnosed with extreme ADHD when she was in high school, and oftentimes has a very hard time remembering certain things, especially when I ask for permission to do something. For example, if I were to ask her if I could join a new club at school, she would often forget until tryouts have come and gone. If I remind her, she gets annoyed at me for nagging, and if I don't, she gets annoyed at me for not following up.  
Regardless of this, my parents work pretty in sync. They usually have to ask each other about anything I want in order to make sure it's okay with both of them. In theory, this should be fine, but with both of my parents' circumstances, It can be frustrating at times.  
Earlier today, I was asking my mom about adjusting my curfew to be half an hour later over the summer, and she said that she would have to ask my dad about it. Now, there have been a couple of these requests that I have gone to my mom about over the past few months that she still hasn't gotten back to me on because she forgot about. At this point, I'm honestly getting pretty annoyed with it. When she responded with ""I'll put it on the list, I have to talk to your dad""  I know that that means ""You're lucky if you get a response within six months"", so I told her that between dad's mental health and job, and her constantly forgetting things, it's really difficult to ask her for anything, even simple stuff, and she flipped out at me and told me that I was being rude.  
I understand that I am a teenager and do say rude things sometimes but I genuinely don't think hat this is one of them. So, am I the Asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for Calling Out my Aunt In Law?,"Hi Good Folks of Reddit!  I'm trying to decide what to do about this issue and really needed some outside perspective.  I married my husband 9 years ago and I never took his last name.  I didn't want to go through the hassle, plus I don't really appreciate the tradition and history as to why a woman is expected to change her name to her husbands.  My husband is fine with this and has never pressured me to change my name.  His family, however....well, they have made little passive aggressive comments about this, which I usually ignore, and their remarks have long since ended.  His family also automatically assumed that I would take his last name, so there has been some clarification that has occurred over the years.  Nothing crazy, just a ""Yep, I'm still a \[my last name\]."" ""Nope, I'm not taking husband's name."" 

Everyone in his family has gotten on the same page and when they mail anything they use my proper, legal last name.  Everyone except my husband's Aunt, who still mails things to Mr. &amp; Mrs So-and-So.  I've sent her many Christmas cards over the years and they ALWAYS have a return address of Husband's Last Name + My Last Name.  I keep thinking she'll get the idea.  Heck, even his 90+ year old grandma mails things using my correct name, and I was going to give that sweet ol' bird a pass because, ya know, grandmas.  This Aunt has also not invited me to family baby showers and I've only found out about them b/c I was on a mass text chain with every female in his family as they tried to sort out group presents.  So, there's that, too.  Which makes me think the Aunt just doesn't like me.

Anyway, here is what I need your help with.  We received an invite to my husband's cousin's ordination and yet again, the invite was addressed to Mr &amp; Mrs. So-and-So.  It just chaps my you know what.  A name is pretty much the most basic thing you can know about someone, and it just feels like she is deliberately doing this as a way to thumb her nose in my feminist-liberal-heathen direction.  The Aunt is very conservative, religious, and traditional (as in, a woman should make babies).  And, well....I am a feminist-liberal-heathen with no babies. So we don't have much in common nor do we see her all that often.  

The invite asks for an RSVP to her cell or email.  Now, here is where I need your help.  WIBTA if I responded via email and also took the opportunity to kindly ask that from now on, to please use my proper name? Or should I just let this go?  Am I reading too much into this or being too sensitive? ",AmItheAsshole
 for wearing swimmers,"Long story short, the wife (Anna 35) said we were heading to her nieces birthday. Hot weather is on the way out here, so it's a pool party.

We are both in our 30s and it's her nieces 21st. The theme is Gatsby pool party. I (35m) found some gold Speedos ( for those that don't know what Speedos are they're swim wear, they kind of look like body building posing trunks). The whole family is going to be there, as usual. The last time we were together was around a year ago for a wake. It wasn't the best gathering and caused a bit of tension between the wife and I so I wanted to just fit in and have a good time at the pool party.

The party was great, food was great but due to the last event I didn't eat anything and just enjoyed cocktails by the pool. Occasionally I took a dip in the pool but spent most of my time enjoying cocktails and making small chat. 

Anna was pretty keen to head home a bit early, so I finished my last cocktail and we left. As soon as we left the street she asked me ""why do you always do this to my family? Why do you do this to me?"" I asked her what she meant and she asked why I wore such tiny gold budgie smugglers that rode up too high, then paraded around walking the pool in circles making weird chit chat. She said the icing on top was that I got changed into swim robe then waited until I was near the pool to take it off exposing my gold budgie smugglers, stretching and then diving in. She then accused me of taking a Baywatch style dip in the pool while everyone was circled around it eating cake. I told her it was a pool party, they're swimmers and I was swimming? I admit the swimmers were on the small side, I bought them online and got the size wrong. I did wear a swim robe and remove it before dipping into the pool, but isn't this normal? I also stretched because I was about to swim, I just don't see how I'm a bad guy for this. She said I should have been more considerate especially since she has elderly aunts that attended and seeing me stand by the pool disrobing myself to expose small gold Speedos, stretching in weird poses and then taking a slow dip in the pool alone making eye contact with people while they're eating was too much. I also should have considered this this was a young girls 21st and it wasn't appropriate.

After the pie incident, and now this, I feel like I can't catch a break. Aita here?",AmItheAsshole
 -coparenting drama ,"My child's father works 2nd shift (3pm-11) and I work 6am-3pm. My job is remote and I'm in leadership so more flexible. Out child is special needs and attends a therapeutic school, 8-3:30pm. 

I typically pick her up from school, and then around 8pm go to his house and leave a couple hours after he comes home and then he takes her to school. I thought this the best schedule for both of us.  Well, he then says he doesn't want us at his house because theres always a mess when he comes home. His house is already messy, and also I'm taking care of our kid. I don't think it a big deal for a couple things not in order. Yes, I don't make a point to clean his house because that's not my role. When he gets home, child is sleep and I leave. 

So bacially he is suggesting,I do everything and he hops in during the morning to take her to school.  How is this fair? Sounds like he wants to just come and go as he pleases. I have tried this route in the past and he never comes on time. Always pops up at 7, or after I'm in a meeting and it's always an excuse (alarm didn't go off, oh you didn't have a meeting anyways, oh, it's 6:25, your meeting starts at 6:30). 

This is new as he has not had stable employment for a while. I take care of all bills regarding our child and we do not have anything with the courts. I said going forward I will just do everything since it's not worth the fight. 

AITA? He says I should just agree to clean. I say, after everything I'm already contributing to something so little should not change his llevel of responsibility and he's using that as an excuse. ",AmItheAsshole
" for telling my overweight friend that I maintain my body through a healthy lifestyle, NOT genetics?","A few years back, 7 of my friends from high school and I decided that no matter where we lived or how busy we were, we were going to meet each other for brunch once a year for the rest of our lives. We don’t have an exact date, but we usually pick a week in June or July when it is warm, and fly/drive to our hometown for bottomless brunch at our favorite spot. Keep in mind that for some of us, this is the only time of the year that we see each other. I, in particular, live 2500 miles away, so I hardly see any of these girls. Regardless, it is always a good time, until recently when one of my friends “Rue” would not stop commenting on my food intake.

For some background, I am and always have been a very active person. I ran track and cross country for our college and I now compete in ultramarathons. For this reason, I eat a lot of calories, and I stay pretty thin. I also eat reasonably healthy, balanced meals most of the time. However, for the one day a year at our favorite restaurant, NOTHING is off limits. I eat plate after heaping plate of cheesy eggs, pancakes, hash browns, sausage, bacon–literally I could eat the entire menu.

Rue has always been on the heavier side. While I don’t really pay attention to someone’s weight changes or eating habits, Rue points it out, so I can’t help but notice. “Every year I eat nothing but oatmeal and I keep getting bigger and bigger, and \[OP\] is over there gorging herself and is stick thin!” “It’s like every calorie \[OP\] eats shows up on MY body!” Soon my friends started to chime in, saying that I was lucky I have such good genetics and can eat whatever I want. This really bothered me in part because it completely invalidated the work I do to maintain my healthy body, but also because I could tell Rue was frustrated with her weight, and I felt my friends were doing more harm than good.

I explained that I do not normally eat like this, and I also exercise very frequently, and that people shouldn’t look at a snapshot of someone’s life and think that’s how they live on the daily. I also said eating salads for every meal and never enjoying a meal out with friends is just going to make her more frustrated, which will slow her progress. I thought this was going to be helpful advice, but my friends all looked at me livid. One of them called me incredibly privileged and said I wasn’t aware of my privilege, and accused me of shaming Rue. The rest of them followed suit and told me to get off my high horse. Eventually I’d had enough. I said I was just trying to help and that they’re only going to hurt Rue (Rue was silent the whole time. I packed up my things, paid my bill, and left.

Now I’m feeling torn because it’s been a few days and none of these people will talk to me. I reached out to the person in the group I was closest with and she said I really overstepped and should apologize to the group and at least to Rue. I had good intentions, but if these people won’t talk to me, maybe I screwed up. Did I?",AmItheAsshole
 if I lie so my mom doesn’t get her driver’s license?,"My mom (72F) moved in with me (47) two years ago to help regulate her health (borderline diabetes and various other health problems). I’ve got her health somewhat stabilized through her medicine (she refuses to change her habits) but she gets absentminded when her sugar levels are off. Recently the DMV required that she needed to renew her license and needed to take the written test again. I took her in and she didn’t pass the DMV eye exam, so she needed a doctor’s approval to move forward to testing.

I took her today and the doctor said she only needs to have one eye that is good enough to pass, which it seems like she does so the doctor passed her. I was hoping she wouldn’t pass because I’m concerned about her driving when her sugar levels are off and she gets absentminded. She’s got a slight gambling addiction, so she would only be driving to the casinos or to the store. 

If I was honest with her and told her I didn’t think she should be driving anymore she would make my life terrible at home and we would blame me and try to get one of her friends to help her get her license. I’m considering just telling her she didn’t pass just so she doesn’t have to go through the written and behind the wheel test (which she probably won’t pass either - English is not her 1st language and she gets super nervous with people of authority), and I’m worried about other people’s safety with her on the road. Her friends currently take her shopping or to the casinos, and either I or my kids drive her around any other time. Would I be the A-Hole if I lied and told her she didn’t pass, to make it easier and safer for everyone, including me?

Follow Up: Thanks for all of your thoughts YTA and NTA. My family has been telling me to just lie to her so that she doesn’t have the opportunity to get her license and won’t potentially hurt other people on the road, but it doesn’t seem quite right and I understand both sides of the thoughts everyone has shared. I don’t care if she gambles, it’s her money and she can do whatever she wants with it (I pay for all of her other bills, otherwise they wouldn’t get paid). My mom is like another one of my kids and I’ve been helping her with her responsibilities since my dad passed away 20+years ago. I love her but when she “has” to gamble, she focuses on it so much that she forgets to take her phone, forgets her meds, or forgets to eat or drink, and I’m just worried about her hurting herself or someone else. She doesn’t listen to my concerns about her health, but I agree she is a grown woman and can decide those things for herself.

I’m decided to tell her that her dr signed off on her form and I will take her to the DMV for her written test, but that I also don’t think she should be driving. She’s stubborn, mean and feisty, and no one else in the family will take her so she’s stuck with me and I can continue to suck it up and deal with her being mean to me if she doesn’t get her license renewed. I’ll tell dmv my concerns too and let’s all hope the dmv does their job thoroughly. Thanks everyone! ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my wife she's lazy and unhelpful,"So I (28M) and my wife (28F) have been together for close to 12 years, I love her to death and she is my best friend but her parents were whatever the opposite of a helicopter parent is. Completely hands off. Which is not usually a good way of parenting. It instilled no good habits and never taught her how to be tidy or organized. 

Now I loved my mother in law (we lost her 2 years ago) she was more of a mother to me than my own. She had known me since I was 16. But ever since we were kids, her room has always been a disaster. It's gotten much better over time but as we became older and gathered more responsibilities I realized that it became better because I had time to keep it that way. 

When we lost my mother in law, we inherited her house, no mortgage and very low taxes (super lucky) now that allowed us to get jobs doing what we like. She works at a daycare school thing (not exactly a daycare and not exactly a school. They teach the kids there but they are 2 and 3 years old). I work in a mom and pop pet shop. It's great. As we work throughout the week, the I notice the house gets progressively messier and messier, now I work 10 hour days and drive her to work in the mornings, so I'm out of the house by 7:30 and don't get back until 8.  She works 8 hour days and is home by 5. 

I asked her to keep things tidy, not scrub the toilet, not polish the silver or some crazy shit, just do a load of laundry and maybe tidy the living room. She can't seem to do any of it. At the end of the week I end up doing 4-5 loads of laundry and throwing away a moderate amount of garbage left in the living room every day. Now my job isn't stressful or hard, mostly boring, which makes me quite tired. 

I'm just asking her for help. Not asking her to do everything. Like for instance I this past weekend I took the day to deep clean the bathroom, the kitchen, finish installing the lights in the kitchen, finish sheetrocking the living room ceiling, paint the living room walls, mulch the front garden, and mow the grass. That's my weekend. 

I just ask her to do those things when she gets home and then she can relax on her weekends. Instead she gets home from work and does nothing and then on the weekends she does nothing. Leaving it all to me. 

I finally got fed up and told her she was being lazy and unhelpful. She didn't like that at all. She told me she understood my frustration and how she doesn't help me but doesn't know why she can't gather the initiative to help out. 

How do I help her help me. How do I ""teach"" her time management and the fact that if you do 5 minutes of cleaning a day it saves you from doing hours of work on the weekend. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I push my bf not to spend money?,"I (22F) am dating (22M), and we have a lot of fun together. However, he doesn’t have the steadiest of jobs, and he can’t afford to do as many fun things like going to dinner or the movies, etc. I tend to offer to do things that don’t require spending money, but he always wants to get food with me, and he’ll mention “splitting a food item.” (But it’s not even an item that can fill one person’s stomach let alone two) I can’t tell if this is a red flag because idk if he’s using me in a way to get the foods he wants. He’s always getting packages of unnecessary things he’s ordered, but he wanted to get a single Chipotle burrito the other day and share it, so he wouldn’t have to pay for a full one on his own. (Sometimes, I have to stop him from buying random things for himself because he doesn’t have the money) He always complains about the prices of things, even if they go up to $4 instead of $3. I can afford some of these things but I turn his ideas down when it involves me not even getting a full meal for myself because he can’t afford his. I pay for some things, but I constantly feel like he’s the one pushing us to do things that cost money when he’ll complain about the prices anyways. If we go to the movies, he wants to split everything because it’s “too expensive,” or he won’t get anything and just seem bummed the whole time. (This makes me feel bad and share my normal amount of food.) I paid for a meal the other day that was $20, so he offered to pay for something for me that was $3 to make up for it. I just don’t know if this is fair, but I don’t want to be a horrible person. He also makes it a point to mention the amount of money he’s spent on me in the past 3 months of dating. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for choosing the zoo over my nephews birthday party,"I (28F) have a sister in law (35F). Ever since finding out that I was pregnant in 2022 she’s been trying to steal the spot light. My sister in law had 3 kids prior to me getting pregnant and never mentioned wanting another. We do talk about these things &amp; message almost daily. When I found out I was pregnant she was one of the first people that I told. Fast forward 2 months later we found out she was pregnant and they started trying immediately because she wanted to have a baby at the same time as me. No worries, but thought that was strange. Fast forward to my baby shower. She asks me the week of if she can do a gender reveal party on the same day as my baby shower maybe 30 min before. Which honestly made me upset because this was my first and only baby so why would I want to share that day? She ended up picking a different day after I said no. Fast forward to this year.. I told my sister in law that I would be planning to spend the whole weekend celebrating his first birthday. I was going to take him to the zoo on Saturday and have his party on Sunday. Sunday is his birthday. I even invited her, my brother and the kids to join us. Well now she has decided to plan my nephews birthday party in the middle of the day on Saturday (his birthday is on Saturday) and is expecting us to cancel our zoo trip to be there. Now if she would have planned it for the evening like they have done for their kids every year, I’d be more than willing to come. But I do not feel that’s it’s fair that I told all of my family in advance this was the plan and now I’m the bad person because I told her if we came we would be late or could stop by her house afterwards to drop off a gift. I also forgot to mention that they do live over an hour away so we would only get about an hour at the zoo if we left in time to come. Am I the asshole for taking my son to the zoo still? 

Edit : I also would like to mention that my sister that I rarely get to see had planned to drive 2 1/2 hours to come to the zoo with us because she couldn’t do Sunday. Which my SIL knew about. ",AmItheAsshole
 for being short and blunt with my boyfriend because he doesn’t remember things?,"Now, I know the title may make me seem like I’m TA but me and my boyfriend have been together for nearly 3 years. Weve had this argument before but its coming to a head now. My boyfriend forgets everything that isnt to do with him and its driving me insane.

It was my 21st birthday a couple of months ago, we were supposed to go out for a few drinks cause I could and my boyfriend forgot to book the day off of work until the last day. He did get it off but it wasnt because of forethought, it was lucky that his work didn’t need him that day. I had reminded him multiple times to book it off, it was a day we would usually have work and he mentioned months before that he wanted to book it off so that he could enjoy himself, so its not like he didnt want to book it off. 

This caused one of our biggest arguments and ever since then I keep noticing how much he actually forgets. Im not his mom and I dont want to keep reminding him of things that are important to me. I even suggested he put a reminder on his phone so that he could actually remember and he said that he would but he still never does. 

I expressed to him about two weeks ago that I wanted to get flowers for a coworker of ours (we work in the same place) because she was leaving and shes acted like a m to us. I couldnt get them for her because we were on the same shift (I work 5am to 1pm) and so does she so I asked him to pick some up because he didnt start until 5pm and he said he would. I couldnt have brought them in with me because we work in fast food and I wouldnt have had anywhere to keep them. So, on the day I waited for him to come and drop the flowers off so that we could give them to her, he didn’t show. We argued the night before but I didnt think he would not do it because of the argument but when I asked him about it, he forgot. 

I went out for my friends 21st last night, which he knew about, and he said he would pick me up to make sure I got home safe and then drive me to work in the morning because I do early shifts and probably wouldnt have been able to drive myself. He forgot to pick me up and forgot to take me to work, so I was late to work because I had to walk (40 minutes). He also said he was going to pick me up from work since I didnt drive, he conveniently forgot again. So I walked home. Ive been short with him since the flower incident but I know hes not purposely not doing what he said he would, he just forgets. 

I know some people find it hard to remember things and I tried to offer a solution and expressed that it hurts my feelings that he forgets things that are important to me but his excuse was that ‘he is stressing about other things’ (his career) which is obviously normal and that ‘we are two different people’ (which we are) but he seems to forget that Im stressing about the same things he is and I still make time to remember things that are important to him but he just can’t seem to try and do the same thing for me. 

AITA for being short with him?
",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my brother that I won't protect him agaisnt bullies?,"First of all, english isn´t my first language. I (17M) have a brother Pedro (16M). He had a hard time at school and then after some time, everything was fine. People started accepting him and he found his own friends. I tried to be there for him, but I am a teenager and I have my own life. 

Last year, he came out as gay/NB to our family and it was okay, I have my personal opinions about that, but it's his life and he can do whatever he wants with it. We are from a village on the countryside, people don't like anything different here, everybody knows that. 

Two weeks ago, Pedro decided to come out on social media, I told him that it was going to create a situation of him being bullied again, and that he should take off the videos about it. We had a little bit of argument and told him that I wasn't going to protect him anymore if somebody wants to beat him. He ended up taking the videos from social media. 

It was too late, the same day, my friends, on a group chat, were talking about it and how happy my parents were because they had ""a boy and a half girl"". I laughed and pretended that it wasn't a big deal, but it was for me. 

Pedro told my mom and she flipped out on me saying that I am worst than the bullies because I am family. I said that I was just being practical, if he doesn't want to get bullied, don't give a reason to people to bully him. 

I ended up grounded for 4 weeks, I had a curfew of 8pm, which is very stupid, I can't barely see my girlfriend because I have soccer practice until 7 during the week. After two weeks of this stupidity, and knowing that I am right, I decided to ask my father to talk with my mom about changing the curfew time for later or ending the ground. 

For my surprise, yesterday my dad called me saying that it as extented for 4 more weeks, in total I'll be 8 weeks grounded, and the curfew is 8pm on weekdays and 5pm in the weekend. I am so angry right now that I don't want to even see my brohter. My dad said ""if 2 weeks have passed and you don't know why you're wrong, then we need to take stronger mesures to make sure you'll get it"". I CALLED IT BULLSHIT. What that even means? All my friends agree with me, I told that to her and she said that maybe I should change my friends then. I asked my brother to ask my mother to change her mind and he said that he can't do it. 

I don't think I am not even 2% wrong here, can you please give me your opinion, am I the asshole for saying that I won't protect my brother at school? 

",AmItheAsshole
 for getting upset because my bestfriend still follows up ex?,"Hey guys, this is my first time posting on here so please bare with me. 

I 21M (Bart), am upset because my (ex) best friend 21M (Chandler) is still following my ex-girlfriend 20F (Maria) on Instagram a year and a half since we broke up. I remember clearly asking Chandler to unfollow Maria when we first broke up, and I placed my trust in him to unfollow her and respect my boundaries. 

  
A couple of days ago before writing this post, my current girlfriend 21F (Chloe) saw Maria on her Instagram discovery page. Out of curiosity, Chloe clicked on Maria's profile and it showed that Chandler and Maria are following each other. Of course Chloe. being the angel that she is, told me. 

I quickly messaged Chandler and asked him if he can unfollow Maria because it makes me uncomfortable. 

(Context, Maria was part of the reason why I succumbed to depression and tried to unalive myself 4 times and went to the psych ward twice.)

Back to the topic, I asked Chandler nicely and calmly to unfollow her because it makes me uncomfortable knowing that someone who's so close to me (I've known Chandler for 7+ years now) still being in contact with a source of trauma that I would rather not be connected with anymore. 

He told me no and that it's rather childish for me to get upset over a situation like this, and that I just need to ""get over this"" situation. He also says that him and Maria share a trauma together and he doesn't want to unfriend her just because of a ""deep seeded hatred I have for her"". I don't by the way, I wish her the best in her life and her endeavors, but I just simply do not want people close to me to be connected such a traumatic past. I was rather upset and I felt extremely disrespected, and acted through emotions and told him that I can't keep the friendship going since he isn't willing to respect my wishes and boundaries that I've placed. 

(More context: I suffer from crippling anxiety and bi-polar disorder, and in the past whenever I would have a mental break down, I would feel like I was a horrible person and cut Chandler off from my life, which hurt him a lot, I'll take blame for that. And during these episodes, while dating Maria, she would call/contact Chandler and they would comfort each other during my episodes. I still carry so much guilt about my episodes to this day.)

I spiraled and almost unalive myself again that night, but my angel of a girlfriend Chloe pulled me out of that loop and saved me. I really respect her and love her for that. 

That next morning after everything has settled down and I was thinking with a clear head, I contacted Chandler. I asked if we can talk about the situation from the previous night. He didn't want to and said that this situation is my fault and that we are talking on his term/time.

He further states that if I ever want him to even consider talking to me about the situation, I need to get back on my meds. 

(Context!!: I got off my meds for about two months now due to the fact that it makes my brain fuzzy and my creative process is stunted because of the meds. I work in the fashion industry)

I just feel so stupid and crazy right now because I'm not sure if I'm TA or if he's TA. People around me are saying that I'm NTA, but the two people closest to Chandler and I are Jason and Jake. Jason and Jake don't want to take sides and give me a decisive answer so I just feel so confused right now. 

Please slap me with reality if ITA or if INTA",AmItheAsshole
 for making a joke when after my girlfriend disciplined her daughter?,"For some context, I'm a 35 year old male, my girlfriend is a 36 year old female with two kids, both under the age of 5. 
Over the past two weeks my girlfriend has been talking to me like I'm one of the kids or that I'm an unwelcome guest in her house. She recently asked me to remove a photo of myself and her from my profile on social media as she didn't want to be laughed at and I didn't ask permission (the latter part would be understandable, if she hadn't already said that she liked it). On my previous visit she told me ""-when you are here the kids are in charge.""
 Today when I arrived at her house she was trying to get her eldest child to get dressed. Afterwards, I made a joke and said ""Oh Mummy! Did you make her put clothes on?"" 
She turned around and snapped at me, saying ""Don't antagonise me or you'll get it!"" 
We then had a small fight and she told me she didn't like to be made fun of. I told her ""I was just trying to lighten the mood instead of getting into a big standoff with a small child.""
I also told her ""I'm not one of your children, so don't try to talk to me like one.""
Truth be told, I really love this woman and I want to make it work. But if this is a taste of what's in store for me then is it worth it?
Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mil that she made her bed and she can rot in it for all I care?,"So I (24m) have been with my gf (23 f)  for a bit over a year. She is the love of my life and the only problem is the witch of a mother she has. 

My gf is very lc with her mom as she is a judgmental, crazy alcoholic. She has constantly criticized my gf to the point of her crying every time she talks to her. Well we are expecting our first child. It was not planned but a welcomed surprise and we are super happy about it. 

My gf told her father as she is very close to him and my mil overheard it. She has demanded that we use the name she wants and that it’s her way or no way. I told her that we as parents are gonna choose what name our child gets and she has no part in it. 

Well as expected she told my gf that either she uses the name she picks or she won’t ever be in our child’s life. And to that we told her that’s probably for the better. 

She then started to cry saying we can’t ban her from seeing her first grandchild. I told her that if she thinks I would ever allow her to be near our child then she must be delusional. She had a meltdown and said we can’t do that to her and to that I told her that she made her bed and she can rot in it for all I care, then we left. 

I told my parents about what happened and they told me that they understand my frustration but that I can’t be that disrespectful to someone and just tell her off like that. My gf is on my side but my parents made me second guess my self so Aita? ",AmItheAsshole
 for disinviting my mom from an event bc she read my journal,"im new to Reddit so please bare with me.

My mom and I (19), have been beefing for the last couple of months since I broke up with my ex bf of 5 years. She was very attached to him and saw him as a son. Well me being single, I started going out with friends to hang out and party.

My mom has always been strict, which results in me being a very sneaky child who lies about a lot of things out of fear of judgement or her telling me no.

Thought I’d provide some context so here’s the story. 
 
I went to a party a couple days ago and when  I got home the next morning, my mom came up to me and asked why I was upset. I was upset because she had been non stop calling me while I was at the party. I ignored her and she said “why don’t you ask me why I’m upset” I continued to ignore her. She then said 
“I know something happened at that party(different party I went to where I smoked/drank) and 
“are you sure you didn’t leave willem (my ex) for someone else?” (I didn’t leave my ex for someone else, he’s just someone I journaled about a few months after the breakup, she didn’t know about him)

I was confused as to how she knew all of this because I hadn’t told anyone. I then got to thinking maybe she saw something on my phone? And then it clicked, she probably read my journal the night I was at the party. 

 I proceeded to ask my brother if he knew anything about it and he was hesitant but finally told me what happened. 

My mom read my journal, that contained very very personal feelings and events that had occurred in my life. 

As my brother told me more, I was in shock because how could you read something so personal about someone out of pure nosiness?? 

I proceeded to walk upstairs where my mom and dad were talking and I yelled,” you read my fucking journal?” Her response: trying to look confused and responding with “it just fell onto the floor and I saw what it said” (this journal was on a book shelf tucked between books, it didn’t just fall out)

I continued yelling at her saying how messed up it was. I’ll summarize some things I said
- I would’ve told you everything that fucking journal said if I felt like I could but I can’t talk to you.
- I’m fucking moving out, I’m done.
- why the fuck would you do that?
And lastly,

“Don’t come to my fucking event tomorrow” 
this event is for school, it’s a baking showcase of things I’ve been prepping for a few weeks now. I invited friends and family and it basically just to show everything I’ve learned in school (I’m graduating with my associates in culinary arts)

I left shortly after I said that and went to my brothers house. Showed back up to my house a few hours later with boxes ready to pack my stuff. As I was leaving my dad said “ I know this is devastating but you should reconsider disinviting your mom, she’s going to be devastated for the rest of her life if she doesn’t go to your event tomorrow”

So Reddit, AITA for disinviting my mom from my event because she read my journal?
",AmItheAsshole
 - for telling my daughter's teacher that her friends Smoke and Drink at School?,"WIBTA -  if I told my daughter's teacher that her 12 year old friends brought alcohol and drinks it at school; smoke weed  at school and chats on line on dating apps?

  
My daughter tells me about this and says she doesn't do it; I believe her. 

I want to tell her teacher about it though. Would that make me an A?",AmItheAsshole
 for picking my dog as my inspiration and not my parents? ,"i was filling out the quiz for my yearbook and i put in my dog as my inspiration because he finds joy in the smallest things and is always forgiving and it reminds me of how short life is and pointless it is to be held up on the things that don’t matter in the grand scheme of things. my mum saw it and she got upset because i didn’t put down her, she said that she always felt that her parents were her inspiration. i told her that she did not pursue the career path i wanted so that’s why i put down my dog instead. she got mad and said i was being disrespectful and selfish. she said i didn’t value her as my parent. Am i the asshole? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting anyone to eat something I bought for myself?,"My girlfriend and I split the cost of grocery shopping 50/50 since pretty much everything we buy is for both of us anyway. Neither of us really eat breakfast but recently I ended up unexpectedly losing a lot of weight so I have started eating breakfast.  
  


Since the food I bought is just for me, I paid for it myself and got it separate from the grocery shop. I bought myself a range of things so it would last and so I wasn't having the same things each day and so it would last me a while. Once my girlfriend noticed what I bought, the next days she started using it to make herself breakfast.

  
  
I asked if she wouldn't use much since I've bought it for myself since I need to gain weight and that it was quite expensive. She said she wouldn't use much but then the next day she did the same thing. I mentioned to her that since she's now eating breakfast, we'll add the food to the grocery shop then.

  
  
She said no since she is only really having it because we've got things in, she doesn't really need to have it. I pointed out if she's going to continuously use the food I bought for myself then the least she can do is contribute towards it. She said she doesn't want to pay for things she doesn't need but I just pointed out she's more than happy to keep using it once someone else has paid.

  
  
I just said if she doesn't want to pay towards it then I don't want her having any more of it since I'm having to buy it more regularly if she's going to keep eating it. She said I was being selfish and unfair but I just pointed out she just expects to be given the food for free.

  
  
I said I'm happy to share it as long as she starts paying towards it but she just accused me of making it all about money. I just repeated that if she's not paying for any of the food then I don't want her having any of it.

  
  
AITA for telling my gf not to eat the food I had bought for myself?",AmItheAsshole
" for wanting my ""guest"" gone?","A 17F moved into my family home during covid lockdowns and never moved out. She was at the time my older sisters best friend. After telling us a story about her family situation (now know it was mostly a lie) we told her she's welcome any time. The odd sleepover became weekends over and eventually she just never left. This girl would totally destroy every room she went into - trailing dirt through the carpets, leaving dirty clothes and dishes for us to clean up, and gluttoning on our food. She would often pull me aside and give me ""advice"" as she sees herself as a good christian girl. Eventually her and my sister left for university. They had a big falling out and stopped being friends. She showed up on our doorstep once again with a new sob story and my dad allowed her to stay. She would sleep in my sisters room, use her seat at the table, and even use her beauty products. I told my dad I didn't like it and he said he wasn't sure how to handle it but couldn't kick her out. My sister was furious and had a massive row with my father over it - they've barely spoken since. People often see the three of us out in public and assume she is my older sister. Did I mention she brought a puppy and took it home where she expected us to take care of it? Yeah well she said she would put it down if we didn't keep it so my dad caved yet again. She doesn't pay for any of the food, hasn't trained it, and would watch and laugh when my dad would clean its shit and piss out of the carpet because she'd never remember to let it outside. She's also just got really weird habits, like getting changed in the garage (which means she has to walk through my room, weird house layout), showering with the door open, using this apple cider vinegar all over her skin (because of exma?) but then just leaving puddles of it in the bathroom which stink up the house, leaving used sanitary products around, her toothbrush in the kitchen... A few years ago we realised we'd lost all the towels and found them in a stinking heap in the corner of my sisters wardrobe. Yet she's always wearing expensive new clothes and drives a fancy car. She's like 22 now and literally has a flat that she chooses not to live in (our home is in a better area near the beach). Now I want her gone. I think the way she has treated my family home, my sister and taking advantage of my dad's generosity is repulsive. I brought it up to her in a kinder way and she basically said ""it's okay that you can't control your emotions."" Am I the asshole for wanting her gone?

",AmItheAsshole
 for not attending my BFs moms second birthday dinner?,In a 5 year relationship with my boyfriend and he comes from an intense Christian family. Sunday was his mom’s birthday so Saturday night we went out to eat and brought his mom a gift and then on Sunday she had her family over again for steak lunch and cake again (I didn’t go - my boyfriend went though) since it was her BIRTHDAY it was all about her after 3 hours eating Saturday/ then going back to their house and having cake my bfs dad wanted to play his moms favorite game and I’m like we should probably get back to our dogs (brand new puppy) and his dad ignores me and starts the game anyways. Then his mom has the audacity to invite us to church by saying “it would be a really great birthday gift if you guys came to church tomorrow.” I felt Saturdays dinner and cake/game was enough and didn’t feel the need to go back there at noon on Sunday for Sunday lunch and cake again for her birthday - seems excessive. I also said I wouldn’t be able to make it when asked on the Thursday before - I only said Saturday I would attend. AITA? ,AmItheAsshole
 for loathing my classmates over a stupid competition?,"I (15) am a teenager in a Southeastern European nation, and today for English class we were tasked with doing a debate about Globalization.
Me and my three friends were doing the PROs of Glob, and the other team the CONs (we let the opposing team pick which one they'd like to do and they begged us to go easy on them). 
We, despite being outnumbered, were crashing them with me and my bestie (14F), using more advanced vocabulary, grammar, we had a better grasp on the knowledge of the subject. Everything, even our English teacher admitted we were probably the best in her classes of 9th grade. 
But we're both sort of outcasted and our classmates aren't very good at speaking English so they ranked us the absolute LOWEST they could in all criteria while judging.
And our teacher admitted it was unfair, but she said she can't do anything about.
 And it sort of made me and my best friend spiral as yesterday one of our teachers humiliated us for no reason and allowed our classmates to mock us and call us names. 
My friend was just crying on the phone with her mother about the months of non-stop bullying and I couldn't take it. 

And basically the thing is, I looked up at the sky and said some pretty nasty stuff out of spite and anger, me and my friend felt like it was petty afterwards but I didn't really regret it. Am I the asshole for doing that?",AmItheAsshole
 for not going to my family's camping trip,"First, I would like to apologize for any spelling/grammar mistakes I might make.

I(16F) am in high-school, and all of my finals are in May and early June. Also, right now in my country it's school vacation time. Now, my family has a tradition of going camping in the same spot around this time(as well as in the summer and the fall). However, I've warned my dad(45M) and my step mom(40F) that it's unlikely that I would join the trip thus year, since I need time to study.

Both of them got upset about this and said that I know about the trip a long time now, and I should manage my time better. So we worked out a solution - I join them for a few days and leave early to go to my moms house.

It's important to note that we don't own a car, so we relay on public transportation, and also that my parents aren't the best with time management. They said we would leave in Monday morning, and I'll go home Thursday morning, but we missed the bus, so they said we'll leave Tuesday night. Then, they missed the last bus too.

My dad wanted to stay at the station and leave on the first morning bus, but at this point, I saw no point in making all that effort of carrying all our camping stuff in the heat just for me to leave less than a day later, so I told him that.

He got mad, and started saying that I don't value our time as a family, that I didn't want to go in the first place, ect ect. I also got mad, started crying, and told him that he has no respect for my time and that I did want to go but not anymore when he's like this, then I just took my things and left, leaving them there. My sister later told me that they did took the bus.

I went to my boyfriends house. Today I got an angry massage from my dad, saying I ruined the trip and my relationship with him, and I'm starting to feel like he's right, and I should've made an effort. Am I in the wrong? Do I need to apologize? ",AmItheAsshole
 For not letting my grandma watch my baby?,"So my husband (25M) and I (21F) are first-time parents to our little girl (1mth). Im a SAHM, and I am with my baby majority of the time while my husband works. She is the most perfect baby I have ever met. She hardly cries unless she's hungry, needs a diaper change, or just wants to contact nap. Here's where the problem starts:

My husband works 10-12 hours every day, 5-6 days a week. This means I am home with my baby alone anywhere from 8-10am to 8-11pm. I have brought my baby everywhere with me so far, even if it's more of a hassle to bring her along. My grandma (58F) has begged to take her for a few hours to allow me alone time or to get things done around the house. There are a few reasons why I won't allow her to watch my baby
1. She smokes in her car/house. Neither me nor my husband smoked, and I've clearly stated I don't want my baby around it either.
2. She has an ankle-bitter dog that snaps and growls at little kids.
3. She disrespected and disregarded my every wish throughout my pregnancy and delivery.

So, a little tid bit of backstory. My mother and I have lived with her since i was 14. My mom was very sick and needed someone to care for her daily. My grandma was that person. I moved out of state when i turned 18 but moved back home a year and a half later.

 My mom passed away last year, and since then, my grandma has tried to be a ""mother figure"" in my life, even though we were not close when my mom passed. When my husband and I got married, my grandma made everything look good and convinced my husband and I to move in with her to save money. It turned out we just recently moved into our own home in January. It cause mine and her relationship to plummet. Never seeing each other even though we are practically neighbors. Only calling.

Since we've moved into our home, and had our baby, my grandma has been calling every day and telling me I ""need"" to let her watch my baby so I can do things I need to do. That I'm being stingy with MY baby. That I need to go visit the rest of the family because their feelings are hurt that I didn't invite them to see the baby at the hospital. (We wanted no visitors, but my grandma invited people without our consent). She is saying that I am the AH and causing family to be upset even though they never called or text throughout the pregnancy. 

I'm standing my ground on my decision, and my husband's family agrees with me, but now my family are all agreeing with her and calling me the AH. So, AITA for not letting my grandma watch my baby?

EDIT:
So I've read every comment. Thank you all for your feed back.
I just want to say that I have offered her to come spend time with the baby over at my house. I've told her she can visit anytime. That never happens. She wants to take the baby to her house to watch her. I've visited at her house multiple times, although I never stayed longer than 30-45 minutes. When the baby was first born, we didn't keep the doors locked to our home as most people would knock right? That's what a sane human being would do. But she doesn't. She tries to just walk into my home without knocking or letting us know she is coming. She says that she shouldnt have to knock. She pulls the ""I'm getting old and feeble"" card every time. 

I'm just not sure how to tell her in a way that she will understand. Every time I tell her something, she gets upset and says that I hurt her feelings. I'm not sure what to do at this point.",AmItheAsshole
" for telling my brother that his ""disease"" doesn't make him speciaL?","I've never posted anything like this before so I hope I did it right.

I 16f have and older brother 17m. He has ADHD, and he thinks that means he can do anything. He's done things before and blamed it on his ""disease"" (as he calls it, not me), and my parents don't do anything about it. The other weekend, while my parents were out and we had a sitter, my brother invited friends over to record a video for his school film class. They said they were going to ""bake something"". I felt happy for him, as he was finally getting somewhere with friends and a social life.

Turns out I was extremely wrong.

They come home with mac and cheese, tuna, avocado, and more random things. They then start recording and mixing all this together, also using a bunch of flour and two eggs (by using a hammer on the expensive counter to crack them btw) to cook up something that they put in the oven. The whole house smelled awful and the counter was cracked. The sitter and I had to open up all the windows and sit outside for hours. When we came back, and my brother went to walk his friend home, there were eggs on the counter, tuna juice everywhere, and something rotting.

It took a lot of nudging to actually get him to clean, and he still did a half-ass job of it. I told my parents about the situation and they said they would handle it.

They get home, he gets a two minute lecture, and they move on. Lectures don't affect him, and he still does things anyway. I thought at the very least they'd take his devices.

My brother decides to show my parents his funny video, and I watch in horror as they contaminate the kitchen's flour, eggs, and a DVD of Shrek (for some weird reason. They didn't cook it though). Parents still did nothing. I started yelling at my brother about how he wasted about $40 of food and how that could have gone to someone in need, but instead it was used for his dumb video.

He said ""Well my disease was kicking in that day, so it doesn't matter"". As the title says, I said ""Your 'disease' shouldn't let you get away with anything.""

My parents say I overreacted, and that it wasn't a big deal, and now I'm in trouble with them. My friends say I was in the right. I need an unbiased opinion. AITA?

  
EDIT: A lot of comments have been saying, ""What about the sitter""? The sitter was my cousin. She's 25. He doesn't listen to her, ever. The only reason he did anything was because his friends were there. We were going out in an hour or so.",AmItheAsshole
 for not attending my grandfather's 90th birthday?,"My (27GQ) gpa (89M) is an adult 2-year-old. Most of my memories of this man have been ones where he is throwing some sort of tantrum, I'll elaborate more on this later on.

The party is in Germany and I live in the Western part of the USA. However, travel costs aren't an issue because my parents and my gpa are offering to pay for the tickets.

Everyone in my family says I have to go, ""it's family,"" while all my friends say, ""fuck your gpa, don't go.""

This is just really complicated and I don't know if all this stuff I'm about to list even validates not wanting to go to this man's birthday.

Here are the tantrums I've experienced with him:

* He yelled at my father (his son) in the middle of a busy crowd because he was tired (4 months ago)
* Got mad at me because I didn't call him on my birthday. (1 year ago)
* Told me that he didn't care if I wanted to be childless but, upon hearing I wanted to be a foster parent, called me selfish and lazy for ""ending the family line."" He also added, ""Those children will never love you and you won't love them as much as you would a biological child"" (2 years ago)
* Told me he may ""forget to put me in his will"" if I didn't call him more. (he has never called me)
* His reactions after my parents put him in a 5-star hotel instead of our house during my coming of age ceremony (I was 13)
   * Purposely came to a restaurant we were at just to walk out when I tried to call him over
   * During that part of the ceremony where I honor him, he refused to leave the bar and had to be dragged up to the stage. He was not drunk, he was drinking water.

Here are some general AH things he does and says:

* He would ask my brother and me what we're doing in life, won’t acknowledge what we say, and goes on to talk about his step-gson who became an actual self-made billionaire. Does this multiple times a day when we're near him.
* Still uses phrases like ""Indian Giver."" My mom, brother, and I might not be Native American but we are Filipino, it's still uncomfortable.
* Questions everything I say and shows visible upset if I do something better than him or any man in the vicinity. (ex: Family was doing archery, he asked who had the most bullseyes with a big smile, my dad said I did with 5 while he and my bro had 0, grandpa's smile immediately dropped, didn't say anything to me or acknowledge what was said)

Things I've heard he's done:

* Cheat on my gma then blame her leaving him on the ""feminist books"" she was reading
* Try to get his mom to sign a change in her will to leave him either everything or most of everything while she was hours from dying and very drugged up.
* Many, many other times of just verbally abusing my dad

Again, I don't know if any of what I've listed are valid reasons to skip out on this man's birthday or if I'm just being petty. WIBTA if I skipped out on the celebration?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my boyfriend to kick his brother out?,"I 21 female my boyfriend 20 male zack have been together for a few months. Since we met we havent spent a day apart until now. I was in an abusive house before I met him and he helped me with it all and has been so amazing. He travels for his work and since I got out of my situation I have been with him, we had a great system. I’ll get the food since he pays for the hotel we stay at. And we both cooked and I’d clean since I love to clean anyways. We never really argued and never bad arguing either. (This is important) 

This has been working for us and we were getting a place until his brother Tyler 24 male  decided to up and leave everything in his town Including ghosting his job. Which pissed me off. We were all supposed to get a place together with Tyler’s girlfriend too but they kept having problems we all were gonna do our own thing, until Tyler decided otherwise. Which I called the same store he worked at to the town we moved to so he could just transfer but he refused making it a big deal then just ghosted everything and had me and Zack come get him. 

My problem is everytime I tried talking to Zach about anything Tyler chimes in and gives his opinion even after me and Zach both tell him to stop. I have a lot of trauma and I can’t let that affect me or get to me or Tyler bitches and says I’m taking Zack from his family and is preventing him from doing anything. That I abuse him, that I’m a hoe, and so much more. I tolerated Tyler until he said all of that. Me and Zach were talking and Tyler kept saying sly comments like he was trying to get us to fight and I ended up snapping.

Now here’s the issue. After that fight Zach told me to just go to my friends. I did and I’ve been here a few days. Zach works out of state so he’s currently hours away from me. We have been fighting and arguing so much due to his brother that I couldn’t take it. I told him I will not be living with him if his brother is there. That I wasn’t gonna put a choice on him and I’ll get my own place close to him. That if he wanted to make a choice it was up to him. At first he wasn’t going to until we talked about how his weeks would look. Outta town during the week then with me at my place on weekends and days off. So I asked him if he was aware he’d be paying rent for his brothers house while he still payed for his hotel for work and everything else. ",AmItheAsshole
 for saying to my grandmother “I thought you used a stove for years do you not know how to use it”,My stove wouldn’t turn on so I went to my grandmother to ask for help and she went on a 5 minute talk about how incompetent I am for not knowing how to use the stove and said to me “you’ve lived here for years do you not know how a stove works.” She then tried to turn it on and when it wouldn’t turn on I said to her “you’ve been alive for years do you not how a stove works” and so my mother came to me and said “you shouldn’t disrespect your grandmother when she is trying to help”. I have had problems with my grandmother for years because all she does is act like she is the only one that matters. This pushed me to my limit. ,AmItheAsshole
 if I made my mom get back something she gave away 6 years ago?,"My (29M) father died from brain cancer 9 years ago. I was just finishing college. It obviously left me with serious emotional scars. My father and I had fought a lot as I was growing up and our relationship was just starting to get better.

Once he died, I kept two rings of his. I wore them everyday. But in 2017 I was approved on a Master's degree abroad. I decided to leave them at my mom's house, where I lived, because I was afraid of losing them. They were inside a box in my room.

When I was out, my mom moved the rings for ""safekeeping"". She then ended up gifting one of them to my cousin, who was close to my dad. When I got back, about a year later, I asked for the rings. Only one of them was there. I asked about the other one, described it to her, she didn't remember what happened to the ring.

She saw my cousin recently and that made her remember what she did. She told me about it. I'm really mad, that wasn't hers to give and now I feel like it's been too long to get it back.

WIBTA if I told my mom she needs to get it back? There's other jewelry that belonged to my dad she could swap it for, but I don't know, it feels... weird. My cousin wears it daily, he was close to my dad too, it would feel wrong taking that from him. But it also feels wrong not to have it.



UPDATE: I messaged him about it, explaining what happened and asking if he'd be willing to exchange it for something else. I also told him it'll be totally alright if he doesn't want to, I understand it has sentimental value to him too and I won't bear any resentment if it's something he wants to keep.

According to him, my mom never gave him anything. He wears a ring, but it's one he bought when he was travelling. I think my mom saw it, got it mixed with the missing ring and made up this false memory of giving it as a gift. Either way, we'll meet up during the week, I'm bringing him one of my dad's other rings to keep.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my cousin her friend can’t have a dog?,"This is a little long so sorry in advance!

To start this out I’ll give a little background. My (21F) dog had an accidental litter of GSD/Husky mixes about 6 months ago and we were able to give the dogs to homes we thought were great.

This happened two days ago when one of the owners contacted me saying she could not keep the dog due to her not having time for her and asked if I could pick her up that day. It was extremely last minute and I did not have room at my house due to having my own pets so I had to quickly find someone to take her. This ended up being my grandparents.

After I got her situated at my grandparents I asked around my family and friends to see if anyone maybe knew someone who would like a dog (after I vetted them of course) and got an answer from a few people. One of these was my cousin (28F) who said she had a friend and she would ask him if he would like the dog that was the end of the conversation. I finally hear back from her and she has been conversing with this person on her own and setup a meeting. I tell her that’s fine he can meet her but I need to be there so I’ll pick her up and she replies back asking why I’m being guarded and controlling. This struck me as odd because as soon as I picked up this dog she became my responsibility and I need to see where she’ll be going.

We get around to the time of the meeting and the dog is very skittish which is odd as she was not skittish at all when I picked her up or towards my grandparents. She is flinching everytime the man comes near her and is letting him pat her but keeps pulling away. After a little while a few people pull up and I can tell she’s getting antsy cause 4 people just flooded out of this car including little kids which she is not accustomed to.

During this interaction, she keeps coming back towards me and eventually she ‘nips’ the child on the hand. She has bitten before but only when she got spooked and she was in a new place so we didn’t fault her. During the whole meeting I just was not convinced this was a right fit they didn’t have the backyard fully fenced,immediately talked about a shock collar and only were talking to my cousin who was there for some reason and not me. It all felt very odd and she also was not feeling it. My cousin kept saying things like ‘she likes it here’ and ‘she gave you a love nip how cute’ while not seeing how uncomfortable the dog was.

During the meeting I mention we have other people interested which I do after the guy says he’ll take her Sunday (I never said yes to this) so he says ‘oh okay let me know then’. The meeting ends and my cousin asks me to come over to her car and starts popping off about how I never told her that and she looks ridiculous to which I tell her I never had to tell her as the dog is mine to decide what to do with. I then walk away and take the dog back to my grandparents. 

AITAH for doing this?",AmItheAsshole
 For refusing to play in my highschool volleyball match,"So for a bit of context, ever since Year 7, I've wanted to start a volleyball club and get into matches with other schools, and today my school got the first match. Even though I was originally the one who made the volleyball club even happen, my friends skill overshadowed my ambition and it was known as ""friend's"" volleyball club. 

I waved this off as I didn't really care but today was the breaking point. Now I'm not the best at volleyball, but am also DEFINITELY not the worst (there are people worse on the team). Whenever the others screw up they get, ""ahhh nevermind bro, next time"" but when I mess up I get the ""bro what are you doing?"" or ""get off the court"" (has happened more than once). 

It was for these reasons that I didn't want to get on the court, despite really wanting to play, the nerves got the better of me. I was literally shaking on the bench. After a while, substitutions happened and I was forced to play. Despite my adamant refusal, I was dragged onto the court and forced to play in a position I'm not even good. And ooooof course, my nerves messed up and I fumbled my very first receive. 

I got the usual but this time even the people who are usually on my side were against me. The VERY NEXT POINT someone made a worse receive into the person's face. All they did was laugh and brush it off... AITA in this situation?",AmItheAsshole
 for not attending my cousin's wedding?,"My cousin is getting married in a few months across the country (literally on a whole other coast) on a Monday night. I'm currently in a very intense grad school program and i found out a couple weeks ago that on the same day as the wedding I have two online finals, as well as clinical the next day. This month has been crazy with exams and also guess what? finals, so I haven't given it serious thought if i could make it work or wanted to tell my cousin yet that I don't think I can come. We aren't extremly close but do see each other every few months and were close when we were kids. I finally decided today I won't attend the wedding. I want to, and i have so much guilt, but this program is already stressful enough.... trying to see if i could take the finals early or trying to take them in a hotel room gives me SO much anxiety. Also, there's going to be a lot of festivities the days before and i wouldn't be able to participate and would be stuck in a hotel room studying. In addition, I would have to miss my clinical the next day, which that also gives me a lot of anxiety using the few sick days im allowed so early in a 2 year program and i'll have only been in clinicals for a few weeks and i feel like that time is so vital to be learning. Anyways i have a lot of guilt and feel bad but I don't want to deal with the stress of trying to make it work somehow. I'm going to tell my cousin this weekend once this semester's finals week is over. Am I the asshole? Is this a legit reason? I'm just ready for the guilt trip from my mom and aunt and potentially even my cousin and feel caught between making them happy and what is best for me",AmItheAsshole
 for treating my dad like a stranger? ,"My dad (m50) has been a provider, I (f20) always had what I needed, financially. But emotionally he never tried to get close, open up or even ask about how my life is going. My dad will talk to me if I need to get something done or if he wants to criticize me, letting me know what I’m doing wrong, for example, he tells me that the dress that I’m wearing looks awful on me, even though I didn’t ask for his opinion.
 Not only that, he will only give positive comments when I’ve done something really big, like the time that I had a big talk at my university and everyone were impressed by it. Only then he simply said that “I’m good because he taught me how to be good” which was super narcissist. Also whenever I post about my accomplishments, he says “I’m happy as long as you’re happy” what does that even mean?!
I’ve talked to him and said how I want to spend quality time with him but he doesn’t even listen to me, when I talk about my day he stares at his phone not even nodding. He knows absolutely nothing about me, this hurts, I have to seek for admiration from other male figures because my dad simply doesn’t care. 
My dad had many bad habits for example drives like a crazy person and plays with my cat VERY roughly. I’ve had my fair share of fights with him but he complains that I treat him like a stranger and I have no respect for him. All these reasons together makes me not want to talk to him again and be disgusted by the way he treats me. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for not helping my friend in their time of need?,"Hi. So, this issue is actually a little old, but I could really use some perspective.

A few years ago, I had a best friend who was going through a breakup from an unhealthy relationship. Apparently the breakup was one sided; my friend didn’t WANT to breakup, but his boyfriend did.
Anyways, said friend (we were long distance) would call me every single day after we got off school, listen to sad music while on call, and just sit there and cry. He would tell me his life was over, he couldn’t go on without his partner, etc. over, and over. This went on for weeks. Watching him suffer was breaking my heart, and I did everything I could to be there for him as much as possible, including setting aside my own issues and schoolwork.
Finally, one day, I had a big issue pop up in my personal life, and I was struggling to hold the weight of his emotions and mine. It was sucking the life out of me. I told him that for the time being, I needed the sitting on the phone in silence while he listened to sad music to stop, and I couldn’t hold his emotions alongside mine. He got pretty upset, and reminded me that I promised I’d always be there for him. I acknowledged the promise, told him I loved and cared, but in order to keep the promise, I needed to help myself first, as I felt like I was already drowning on my own.
Some time later, I let him know that I was doing better, and would be more than happy to help if he needed me. He acknowledged my statement, but proceeded to stop talking about issues. He would pretend to be okay, when I knew he wasn’t. I tried multiple times to let him know I was all good, and ready to help. 
A couple months later, I asked him why he felt like he couldn’t talk to me. He told me that it was because of when I shocked him by telling him I couldn’t hold the weight of his problems. He told me that because of his trauma with women, he couldn’t distinct my “female behavior” from abusive behavior (I’m non-binary). He said he couldn’t trust me just backtracking on my word.
I apologized, and asked how we could fix the issue. Instead of coming up with solutions, he just repeated his feelings and told me he couldn’t trust me. I acknowledged it, apologized again, and asked once more if there was a way we could fix the issue. He, once again, just repeated himself, and even told me i had reminded him of his mother. 
After a few tries, I became defensive. I told him that no matter what I said or did, he was just coming after me. I told him that I wanted to fix the problem, but I genuinely no longer knew how, since he wasn’t giving me anything other than blame.
Finally, I ended up being the one to come up with the solution on my own.

I’m writing this because I wonder if perhaps I was the asshole for asking for some emotional space. He was extremely heartbroken, so maybe I should have just sucked it up and continued to sit in his grief with him. Maybe I shouldn’t have gotten defensive. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling one of my landlords sons I'm holding his dad accountable?,"So, this is a lot to unload. I will try to condense it with all the main details.

We have lived in our rental home out in the country for 12 years now. Our house sits on a county road that has 2 houses and farm fields on it. Our landlord owns all the homes and land, minus the 1 field at the beginning of the road. So pretty much all his fields, homes and a shop where the road dead ends at the canal.

Our landlords oldest son, who's is approaching his mid 40's moved into the house down the road from us about 3 years ago, during his divorce. He has always had drug and alcohol problem, but wasn't a horrible person. He was arrested out of state for drugs in a hotel with a woman l after some sort of fight. His wife chose to file for divorce. 

When he moved in he was just, there. Things progressed and he began bringing some shady people around and getting into harder drugs it seemed. Many fights, screaming and just plain nonsense going on. We had to call the sheriff a few times, one time in the middle of the night, due to a woman screaming help.

The son finally moved out of state. That didn't last more than a month and moved back to town. We have had many issues and confrontations with him and plead for our landlord not to allow him to move back out to our area. Due to the damage at that house he caused, his dad has not allowed him back in there, so far.

So, now he comes out here and brings shady people around and goes to the other property and loads things up, does as he pleases, and recently was doing some very odd things with another person on the road by our place. We called the sheriff's office again. They checked on the them while they were crawling around in the bar ditch and let them go.

Our landlords Younger son came by the next day. I told him about the the current issue and like his dad he just tried to ignore it and sweep it under the rug. Only difference between him and his dad is he don't want his brother around their shop and the properties either. I also worry for the fact he's more and more drugged out and I don't trust him. I told the younger son that his dad never tells him anything and let's him do as he pleases for the most part. Now, I said I will hold his dad accountable for his actions if he won't tell him to stay away.

In closing, I caught a lot of attitude from the younger son for making that statement. He says he can't be held accountable and can't control his older brother. I believe of I'm paying to rent this property and one of his kids is causing problems, he has a duty to at the least warn him to stay away from the area as he has no business out here. Am I being logical? Nobody should have to deal with this, as much as we have and continue to, even with him living in town now.",AmItheAsshole
 arguing with bf about my art,"So I’m 19 and my bf is 21 and we both want to work together making art and selling it.

 He has ideas and he wants me to paint them but I haven’t cus I wasn’t inspired by the sketches he drew because I didn’t relate to it.

 Today someone messaged me about working with me and they make music so my art inspired them and they asked about using a certain piece for a music video and I was totally down because we’re going for the same kinda thing and I’d like more people to see my art. 

When my he came home I told him and he laughed coldly and said something along the lines of “but when someone else wants to work with you” implying him. I said it was just something cool that happened today that could be a new opportunity and I wanted to share and I told him that I just wasn’t feeling the sketches he wanted as paintings.

not to say I wouldn’t like any because there is one I want to paint that he drew but AITA? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for not giving my plus size friend the queen size bed in our b&amp;b?,"I (30’s F) am going on vacation with 4 of my friends (30’s and 40’s Fs). We go every year, and always use a randomized selection tool to help us choose who gets which bedroom. The tool assigns the order in which we can choose. I got 3rd choice, and my plus size friend (Marie) got 5th choice. 

The first 3 of us all chose the queen size beds. The other two got twin beds and had to share a room. Yeah, it sucks, but that’s why we leave it up to chance so nobody can complain. 

Marie asked me privately if we could switch places so she can have the queen size bed. She is plus size, but imo not so big she can’t fit in a twin bed. I personally have lost over 100 lbs and at my largest, was bigger than Marie is now.  I never once asked to switch beds when I was bigger. 

I therefore said no. She started crying and told me I was being unreasonable, and that i of all people should understand. I do understand, but it’s my vacation too and I’ve worked hard to be in a body I’m comfortable in. I don’t feel like I should give up my spot to accommodate her, when she can still fit in the twin bed. 

AITA?


Edit: we agreed ahead of time that the two people who got the twin beds would pay $75 less than the rest of us. It’s just way too expensive to get a place with 5 rooms and 5 queen beds. 

Edit 2: she doesn’t have any mobility issues or other disabilities that I’m aware of.

Edit 3: it’s $75 off of a total of $400 for the whole trip 

Edit 4: She never explicitly offered the $75 back to me, but I honestly can’t imagine she didn’t have that in mind when asking to switch. She’s not the monster a lot of you are assuming she is.


Edit 5: thank you all for your comments. Many people suggested it might be more about her discomfort about sharing a room, and not as much about out the bed. That would make way more sense to me. When I was bigger, I used to snore and was completely embarrassed when I had to sleep in a room with someone. 

Many also suggested I am lacking empathy. It is true, I do not feel empathy. It is a long standing  issue with my mental health, and is why I often post on this account asking for help. I don’t want to be a dick, so I rely on honest people to call me out. So I do appreciate it, even though many people who said these things were downvoted. 
",AmItheAsshole
 For refusing to be a part of my mother’s new family?,"I(17F) do not like my mother’s(38F) boyfriend, Patrick(50M) and his 2 youngest kids(M and F). Before my mother got with Patrick, it was just her, my brother(14M), sister(10F), and I. At the time we were 15,13, and 8, but then she met Patrick who happened to have 8 kids but 2 of them are 9 and 10, the others are grown. His kids are the most hateful, spiteful, rudest, and most ignorant kids I know. they practically bully my sister to the point that she cries and when I bring it up to my mom she says there’s nothing she can do because they aren’t her kids. The minute my sister is rude to his kids, he’s allowed to get onto her with no issue. His kids talk the most shit to people and ask the rudest questions and he thinks there’s nothing wrong with it, when my mother met this man she would leave for days at a time and it left me to having to take care of my brother and sister. Then she came and took them with her and left me here by myself I had no food, no hygiene products, no nothing. To the point that my grandmother had to start raising me all over again, because when I was younger, my mother was never there either. Well about a year and a half later they broke up, so my mother came back. well two weeks after they got back together and this time she only took my sister. She left us in the same predicament as before, except now that Aunt is here we are getting fed, with clean clothes, and have hygiene products to clean ourselves with. the first time my mother got with him she would constantly leave me out. On my sister’s ninth birthday, she left me at home and took his kids instead. She’s been doing this since they’ve been together. Well it makes me uncomfortable to be around him and his kids and she blames it on me not knowing them, but he’s 50 and he acts like he’s 12. I’m not shaming people who act younger than their age but only if it’s a few years. The minute I met him I got this weird and uncomfortable feeling so I decided to distance myself from it. She always tries to victimize herself and make me look bad. Well I told her that when they got married my life wouldn’t change. I would have the same 5 siblings I’ve had growing up and I have no stepdad. I told her to not refer to his kids as my siblings because they are not. I told her not to call him my dad or stepdad because he is neither. I told her they can’t be offended when they aren’t invited to anything of mine. I want nothing to do with his rude ass kids and I want nothing to do with his childishness. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not cleaning up garbage in my neighbor's yard,"I live in a 2 flat with landlords in the other half, so it's important that I be a good neighbor, else I'd just roll my eyes at this and move on. I'm not a huge fan of the next door neighbors and their very loud dogs, but I choose to just not interact with them. 

I have a small container garden, mostly herbs, some tomatoes that do well in containers, and echinacea. Since native pollinators and other beneficial insects live or lay eggs in dead stuff for the winter, I don't clean up last year's garden until I'm ready to plant the current year's garden. I do what I have to to revive perennials early in the season, but last year's dead annuals stay put until I'm planting. As it's not quite time yet, all my annual seedlings are still inside. All that is to illustrate that I never have empty pots left sitting outside. The ugly dead stuff gets stacked up and pulled in towards my door, but it would have to be hurricane force winds for any of it to blow away, since we're talking about large planters full of dirt. 

It has been windy here, as is common in the springtime, and some trash has blown around. A little over a week ago, I noticed an empty pot - not mine - sitting in my neighbor's yard. Their dogs were playing with it, and I figured it was either theirs, or it had blown in and they were letting the dogs have some fun with it until trash day. I was wrong. Turns out, since I'm the one who has a garden, they assumed it was mine and were stewing about it and the fact that I didn't go over there to pick it up all week. Nobody said a word to me. 

Then, yesterday, I was leaving and saw the the empty pot had been stuck on top of one of my pots with perennial exhinacea in it, crushing some of the new leaves that were coming up. It's a hardy plant and will recover, but that was still a rude thing to do, especially when I have stacks of planters full of dead things they could have put it on. My landlords happened to be outside too, and they told me that neighbor is really upset I didn't go pick up my garbage that blew into their yard. They continued that even if it wasn't mine, it has the appearance of being mine since I'm the one with a patio full of planters. Never mind that all my planters match and this one didn't. Never mind that all my planters have enough weight to not blow away at all times and this was empty. The argument is that I should have taken responsibility for the trash planter because I also happen to engage with that hobby. 

For what it's worth, the planter was cracked and unusable. 

So, what do you think? Due to my hobby, should I have grabbed this planter from their yard to avoid the appearance of my stuff having blown over there in the wind, even though that is not the case, to prevent a conflict?",AmItheAsshole
 for moving in with my partner?,"I’m a 53 yr old male. I currently live with my mom as a caretaker. My sister also moved in a bit ago after an exhausting divorce. Mom has cancer (in remission fortunately) and is quite a handful. She is constantly going doctor appointments (not for her cancer) about some ailment or another, mostly as a result of her age (85)…she is also willful, spoiled, demanding and demeaning.

I met someone about a year ago. We are planning on cohabiting in an apartment 10 min from mom’s place. This plan is not popular with my mother or sister, with claims that I am “abandoning” them and avoiding my familial “Duties”. I did set up visiting nurses for my mom to help alleviate the times i might not be there.

I have been told that 1) I and my gf will not be welcome in mom’s house and

2) Once I leave, I can’t ever come back

Unfortunately they also complicated manners further by adopting 2 dogs…which puts a huge burden on all parties

So what you? Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for snitching on my bestfriend to his brother?,"Me (23M) and my bestfriend (23M) just had our biggest fight today. My bestfriend always ends up in money problems and keeps borrowing money from me or others. He always gives the money back but never on time, from days to weeks to even months. 

A bit backstory here, he recently had a debt of 25k dollars and I helped him borrow the money from a third friend. After a few months of him struggling to give back, we all decided that it was best to involve his big brother. We ended up asking for 30k from his brother as he wanted 5k for himself. 

Now he borrowed 1,5k dollars from me and was supposed to give it back 4 days ago. He is the type of person to beg for money, but acts like a douchbag right after he has got the money just cuz he thinks it’s funny. I urgently needed half of it and he said he would give me half today and the rest when the week ends. 

Today he started saying that he would give me half of the money next month as a joke. I got irritated and told him that I would tell his big brother if I did not receive half of the money today. After only receiving 400 dollars. I told him that I would tell his brother to press him. He told me that was fine and that I would make the situation easier, because then I get the 1,5k and he can keep the 1,5k he was supposed to give back. I asked him multiple times if it was okay and he said yes. 
So I went and told his big brother as this was not the first time going to his brother because of his money problems and cuz he legit told me to ask his brother. Now he is angry at me for “snitching” and that I should have known he was joking about me going to his brother. He is super pissed and doesn’t wanna talk to me again. Am I in the wrong here?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my spouse to clean his own office?,"I am an exhausted, chronically ill woman with two children- one is homeschooled due to underfunded school district just giving up on him before his recent ADHD diagnosis. I cook, I clean, I teach, I spend time with my kids, I grocery shop- hell, I do everything except make money. 

My spouse has been laid off. Instead of doing.. anything, he is barely looking for a job and then playing video games 14ish+ hours a day, or sleeping until 3/4pm. He did mow the lawn recently, I'll give him that.

Today he asked me to clean and organize the paperwork in his office, and I finally snapped. 

I told him that while he's fucking off every day during his free time playing WoW from 10am to midnight, I'm goddamn BUSY, and I'm not giving up the little bit of child free time I have to bathe/read/relax because he's lazy. He does this false incompetence bullshit surrounding everything except work, and I'm just.. I'm tired. 

I'm tired of bringing plates to a computer desk to a man who doesn't even compliment the food or say thank you. My CHILDREN do, but he doesn't bother. And then washing those plates he leaves all over the kitchen. Fuck, I bought paper plates recently to make things easier and he even left THAT on the counter for me to clean up.

AITAH? Or am I just an ungrateful hag?",AmItheAsshole
: accidentally spreaded a friend’s business.,"My friend was dating this guy. He's a certified red flag with a fetish, a liar, and is a freshman.

I'm normally not a business spreader, but I was just in such a good mood that day and my friends in my organization knows her asking her how she's doing.

I spill that she's dating someone, but looking back now, I completely forgot that she didn't tell many people. These people aren't going to spread it obviously, but I feel that I shouldn't have told them anything. I want to clarify I only said his name and that she was dating someone, not any of their relationship issues.

Fast forward, another friend of mine tells me all this information about him which is not good, and I simply tell her what she told me. I would want someone to tell me what someone finds out about my boyfriend.

We go to a small college where typically word does get around in groups. We're all weirdly connected.

Now she breaks up with him, but I feel that I was somewhat the cause because of what I told other people. ",AmItheAsshole
H-for telling my roommates to never ask me to help them again &amp; blocking our mutual friend.,"I edited this story for clarification and removed the backstory to it. 

Yesterday, a casual sex partner who we will call ""bi guy"" messaged me saying he wanted to hang out and fool around with me. He then said he was getting a hotel room. But messaged saying he was getting a ride to my place. 


He was going to arrive a few mins before me so I asked my roommate and her bf to hang out with him until I got home. I get home and ""bi guy"" is sitting in the driveway with some chick and tells me he will be right in. I figured he was saying goodbye so no big deal. 

Half an hour later I go looking for him and my 2 roommates (gf/bf) and bi guy and rando chick are all locked in her room. I start talking to them and jt was apparent no one is coming to open the door so I leave. I knew they were doing drugs, not having sex. 

Half an hour later bi guy messages me that he has to go to the store but  will Be right back. I told him he is there with my roommate and not me. He swears he came to see only me and will be right back and we can order food. He made it clear he was there to fool around with me.

An hour later, I go look and they are all downstairs again. I left and came back and they are all gone and are still gone 12 hours later. 

My roommate said that they gave her and her bf a ride to the store and dropped them off at her bf's friends house. (He isn't from here and they have never mentioned a friend). I know bi guy had already got a hotel room because we were supposed to go to it. I imagine that they went to the room to have privacy to do their drugs.

Here is why I am upset: bi guy explicitly messaged me to hook up, I gave him an out on 2 occasions and he said he was there to fool around with me and please don't leave. I sat upstairs for three hours feeling like an idiot.       

my roommate knew that bi guy was supposed to be coming over for sex. And instead of sending him upstairs since that was why he was supposed to be there or telling him to leave when I told her I thought it was disrespectful that she is letting him hang out down there. And she kept me locked out of her room and when I would go downstairs and ask a wuestion they would sit in silence until I came back upstairs. The kicker was when  her and her boyfriend disappeared all night long which they never do. 

She says ""well I can't make him do anything, if he wanted to come upstairs he would have."" Which is true but if the situation were reversed I would tell him you came to see her so go do that or you need to leave out of respect for her. 

Bi guy is just an asshole all around without question in my book or am I wrong ? He asked to come over for sex with me, told me he got a hotel room for us, knew I cancelled plans to hang with him, brought a chick with him, hung out with my roommmate for hours while I sat upstairs waiting, and I even told him to message me a different day but he told me to wait for him because he was there to be with me but then just leaves with my roommate and her bf. 

Sorry this is so long. I told my roommate and her boyfriend to never ask me for anything again. I give them rides since they don't have a car, I let them borrow money, give them food etc since they don't really work. I told them all of that stops as a result of their actions. There are six people living in this house and her and I have had conversations about people coming to hang with one person and ended up with another need to be told to leave because it's disrespectful and she does that exact thing. 

Am I justified or just an asshole??",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my roommate a creep,"I (F19) have been sharing a room with my roommate (F21) since the last six months. When we first met each other we shared little things about ourselves and she briefly mentioned about her crush(M22). Let's call him Max.

As we settled into our new life(we're in med school), she recounted everything that transpired between her and her crush. Just a little info: she met her crush in cram school and he is one year senior to her.

She confessed to him in 2019 and he rejected her and it has been like 4 years since she last saw him and she is still not over him. And I don't have a problem with that. Not everyone gets over their first love so easily. Now here's the thing: she confessed to him on November 24, 2019. And she cried on November 24 and she told me she cries on Nov 24 every year. She knows where he lives and hangs around whenever she gets the chance because she wants to see him (she hasn't yet). She has collected the soil of the locality he lives in and treasures it. She whined everyday about why he doesn't follow her back on insta and why he doesn't reply to her single 'hi'.

Very recently, while stalking him she conjectured that he had a gf. Since then she has been unbearable . She has stalked the poor girl's account, has sent that girl a follow request on insta, is trying to know everything about her. My roommate first asked her friend about her, then her crush's younger brother about the girl and now the crush's closest friend(let's call the friend B for feasibility) She started the convo with B by asking for recommendations for good headphones (a pretence). And then she gradually progressed to B's lovelife and then finally to Max's.She asked B about Max's lovelife. B answered that he wasn't in a position to answer that. My roommate grew furious. She was hollering, crying, grumbling about why couldn't B just tell her if Max had a gf or not. Called B names and just was being imo disrespectful.

Now I learnt that she also had a major fight with her friend because the friend couldn't be bothered with such talks. My roommate asked me whether she should ask B : ""So he has a gf then?"" for confirmation. I being tired of her nonsense spilled out that she is being creepy. She is not talking to me since then, shutting the door very loudly when she goes out of the room and just in general giving me loads of anxiety. The thing with me is I encouraged this behavior initially and now I am stuck with someone who uses me as an outlet for her emotions.",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my friends out of my apartment?,"Sorry in advance if there’s any formatting issues. I’m tired and on mobile. For privacy sake, me is me/I, Al (24m) is my first friend and Daisy (24f) is Al’s wife. 

Anyways, I (m26) took my friends in because their previous living situation was less than ideal. The initial plan was to stay with me for a little while so they could get back on their feet. It’s been 8 months…

I also want to preface what my living situation is; there’s a house and my mother and aunt live in it. I live in a basement apartment beneath them. I pay my mom for the bills and in exchange I don’t pay a set rent. 

To make up for it, i help out with chores/helping my aunt and such, as well as giving my mom a lil extra money when budget allows. 

I should also mention the ‘room’ they’re (Al and Daisy) staying in my spare room that has no windows (which is illegal, because fire escapes are a must if you’ll be sleeping in said room (which they are). 

My mom would be criminally responsible if there were a fire and they die in that room. (Sorry, got a little morbid..) 

Anyways, our (everyone’s) living situation has not been ideal. But what really rubs me the wrong way is Al and Daisy have both been jobless most of their time staying with me (in all fairness, so have I, but that isn’t their concern.) 

And all they’ve been giving my mom in terms of quote unquote rent was just shy of 250$ a month if that. (Not each, 250$ a month COMBINED) and now Al is complaining that he and Daisy are always footing the expensive stuff; yet Daisy is blowing her nose excessively, about 5 times a day and somehow i’m expected to supply toilet paper? 

I barely go through a whole roll alone in a week. She (Daisy) uses probably at LEAST half a roll a DAY. 

I also get chewed out for not buying cat litter often enough to his liking. Even though they have a double income and 2 cats, i’m the bad guy for not always buying the expensive stuff. You won’t find anywhere to rent for 250$ a month, so it seems only fair they pick up a bulk of expenses? 

Anyways, am I wrong here? 

",AmItheAsshole
 for not giving my cats to my roommate?,"So my friend and I have rented together for a little over half a year (rental agreement is month to month) and I have cats that I've had for around 3-4ish years. I've told him recently that I plan on moving out, giving him close to a 3 month notice when I intend to do so. Although it will probably be 4 or 5 by the time I do.

 I travel for work every so often ranging from overnight to all week (mon-fri) and am sometimes not home on weekends. He works from home and almost never leaves to go anywhere. That being the case I ask him to feed them when im not home once a night, along with an automatic feeder I have set up. 

Since I told him that I plan to move out he wants me to give him the cats. I get a strange sense of entitlement he has towards the cats, because ever since I told him I was gonna move out he's giving passive aggressive comments and subtlety trying to guilt trip me into leaving them with him.

 He doesn't make a ton of money and has no means of transportation in case of a vet emergency as well. So overall I have alot better capability in actually taking care and providing for them, the only thing he has ground on is that he never leaves home and can be around them 24/7. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my daughter the truth about her dad?,"I 36f have a daughter 12f with my ex husband. My ex husband and I split almost ten years ago when our daughter was two. We did not split on good terms due to cheating on his part. However, I have never wanted to jeopardize their relationship, especially since she has always been a big dad’s girl.

So to give some background, we have done 50/50 since the divorce, but when our daughter turned 4 he started making excuses. He was going on a work trip, he was sick, he had a stressful week, a deadline to meet. When he eventually took her for his week, she started being more angry at me. More tantrums whenever she got home, refusing to listen to me and telling me that she hated me and asked me why I hated her dad so much. At first I didn’t understand why, but then one time she just started crying after I picked her up. She told me “Mommy, can I please stay at dad for another week”. I texted him and asked, he told me that he didn’t want to. This started happening every time after I picked her up.

Eventually she just asked me why I couldn’t let her spend another week at her dad’s and why I was lying about him being busy. I have never ever told her the truth because when he events has her for his week, he is a fantastic father and she loves him.

The older she has gotten, the more angry with me she has gotten. Last week her dad had her after refusing for 2 months, when she got home she immediately started having an attitude. Telling me that I am a bitter psycho, that she hated me, started throwing her clothes and telling me that she just wishes I would let her be with her dad instead of forcing her to stay here for so long at a time.

After two hours of this, or more like 8 years, I got fed up. I told her that it is her dad that is causing this, that he don’t want to see her. She did not believe me until I handed her my phone so she could read our text. After this she has just shut down, she told me that she was sorry for everything and has been crying asking what she ever did to him. 

On top of this, her dad texted me asking what was wrong with me for telling her this and that I have now ruined their relationship forever. He has sent a few more texts, basically boiling it down to me being the biggest asshole off the time. I feel like a shit mom for causing my daughter to feel like this, but after so many years I just couldn’t take it anymore.

I know it was probably wrong, but I don’t know what else I could have done. He has been telling her for so long that I am the one not letting her see him, and has caused my relationship with her to be so bad that she at days has refused to even talk with me. 

Was I the asshole for telling my daughter this?",AmItheAsshole
H for having my friend leave our vacation early due to her unstable mental health?,"I (33F) and my friend (31F), I’ll call her Hon, have been friends for 14ish years. As we grew older, I moved away but we stayed in contact. About 4 months ago Hon and I decided we should take a vacation together. We discussed how we wanted to get a break from the day to day needs of others. I booked a cabin at a retreat a few hours from home. The first 24 hours of our trip were seemingly normal. We get to our cabin and start catching up. The next morning I wake up, make coffee, and decide to take a hike. When I came back Hon asks to see where I had went so we walk off  together. I noticed Hons speech pattern was off and some of the things she was saying didn’t make much sense, but I chalked it up to anxiety. We stop at the spot and sit on our mats and Hon says she’d want to be with me in a place like this when she dies. I  tell her that’s an odd thing to say and I’m going to go back to the cabin. She starts apologizing and I said it’s not a big deal, but let’s try to stay positive. We stand up and I notice Hon is wobbly on her feet and mumbling nonsense. She says “I didn’t know people were LARPING out here.” No one was there. I’m now alarmed and I just want to get her back safely to the cabin. We get back and I go into the cabin to get her a water and when I come back, she was gone. I yell her name to no response. After about 15 minutes of looking I call her boyfriend to get some insight on what might be going on. He asked me if she was drunk, so I start looking around the cabin and find an empty bottle of gin. He tells me she shouldn’t drink because she has a bad reaction to it and now I’m really worried. About 20 minutes later as I’m frantically searching, I find Hon stumbling through a briar patch. Leaves and sticks in her hair and completely mumbled speech. I help her inside, bring her water and a sandwich. She woke up 2 hours later and I ask her about the things she was saying and she says “Oh, was I hallucinating again? Sorry about that.” I bring up the alcohol and ask why she would drink if she knows it can cause that reaction and she said “This is who I am and I didn’t think you would judge me like this. I thought this was a safe place for me to be myself.” Im baffled at this point, because while I do consider myself a safe person, Hon knew I wanted this trip as a break of being a caretaker. I ask why she would put me in that position and told her she scared me with her behavior. At this point she was really upset and said “ I’ll just leave if that’s how you feel.” I know she wanted me to stop her, but I didn’t. I just went and waited outside as she packed her stuff. I care deeply about my friend, but I can’t help but be upset that she would put me in this position willingly. I can’t help feeling a bit guilty. That’s why I’m asking  AITAH for not stopping her from leaving since she is an adult, it was her vacation too, and she didn’t technically ask me to take care of her during this situation?
",AmItheAsshole
 for agreeing to hangout with my coworker when he’s best friends with my other one.,"okay so context I (15 F) work at a fast food chain and have two co workers we’ll call landon (16 M) and blake (16 M). 

landon and blake have both worked there longer than me and are friends outside of work as well (go to same school) and when i started working there i had a small crush on blake. blake never spoke to me really and then i went on holidays for a while over christmas and came back and started working again after like two months of not seeing him. i come back to work fully over my crush on him and see him as just a friend and thought it was mutual. me and landon are also friends but i talked to blake more at this time. fast forward to march when me and blake hung out on the weekend together for the first time, it was just a hangout to me and nothing more. all my friends tell me that blake likes me but i’m not sure. after that blake has constantly asked me to hang out again but i do not want to and keep making excuses up and trying to hint i don’t want anything between us. now blake has been on holiday for a couple weeks and i’ve been at work and talking to landon recently. landon and i are also just friends and he’s good friends with blake. today landon texted me asking if i was free on saturday to go to the mall and grab a bite to eat. i thought this sounded nice and agreed because he’s my friend. this is the first time we are hanging out outside of work. after we planned what time we were going i left it at that. an hour later blake texts me asking if i am going on a date with landon. i message back confused because i was never told this was a date and would have refused if asked. he said a mutual friend (also another co worker) of his and landon told him and said it was a date. i said again that it wasn’t and asked why. blake then said that he just needed to know if it was or not and wouldn’t specify why. i felt already horrible because i knew something was off so i asked if he was okay. he told me “no yeah i am. if it were a date tho” 

i really don’t know what to do. i feel like the biggest AH and haven’t stopped stressing and crying over this situation. there both my friends at work and i don’t want anyone to be mad at me. so AITA for agreeing to hangout with a co worker when his friend and my other co worker has a crush on me?      ",AmItheAsshole
 for not allowing an unknown step siblings to my sons birthday?,"I, 29 Female, have a 2.5 year old son who I am fighting to get back from CPS. But in 2023, when his second birthday was coming up, I was frantically getting things together and making sure people would be invited. Mostly family and those I trust to be around him. My dad's side of the family have always been toxic to me growing up so I knew I didn't want many of them coming to the party. 
I was very hesitant about inviting my biological father to the party. When CPS was looking for a family member to place my son with, he wanted to be the foster family for my son. Instead of him getting picked, it was my sister in law who became my son's foster family. Part of it was due to me telling CPS I would rather my sister in law to be the foster parent instead of my biological father. Another part is because his home wasn't clean enough and didn't have enough room for my son to live there.
When my biological father found out my sister in law got him, he and his side of the family went balistic. My aunt even called my sister in law threatening to get a lawyer to sue her and so much more to the point that my sister in law backed out. My mom and I had to talk to my sister in law in order for her to agree again.
I was scared that if my biological father came to the party, then he would start problems and ruin the party for my son. My sister in law told me that if he did, her husband would be there to back me up if I choose to tell him to leave. Knowing her husband had my back, I decided to take the chance and invite my biological father and his new family. So it would have been him, his wife, and his 2 new step kids. They said they would love to come.
Well about a week before my son's birthday, my biological father calls and says he invited his wife's step daughter, from a previous marriage, and her husband to the birthday party. This was the first time I have EVER heard of this person. My father had been married to his current wife for 2 years at this point. I only knew about the two younger kids who are now my new step sisters. So it was a surprise to find out that there is another that NO ONE knew about. I had talked about this to my sister in law who was helping me plan this party for my son as well as my CPS worker. They both agree that if I do not personally know this person, then they should not come.
I texted my biological father the responses I had received and told him I even agree with them. He then messaged back basically going off about my sister in law. Saying that she has a problem with his new family and is being rude about it, basically calling her a bitch and that this person is family. In the end, I told him that I have to follow CPS rules if I want to get my son back. He didn't say anything after that. So am I the asshole for denying this unknown person from coming to the party?",AmItheAsshole
 for ignoring my mom when she trauma dumps?,"TL;DR, My mom keeps telling me the same stories about my dad being horrible father/husband. I'm tired of these stories and keep ignoring her when she intiates these conversations. AITA? 

My mother [F58] has an autoimmune disorder and is essentially stuck at home. She has no friends, doesn't really talk with her siblings, and her main person she talks to is me [F19]. I'm the only child who is still living at home. 

Ever since I was little, she would tell me how horrible my father [M60] was. That she wanted to divorce him, how he never cared for her, never helped raise any of us children even though she was physically unable to. When I was younger I was more gullible and believed her. Of course I didn't know it was trauma-dumping at the time and I would cry and beg her to not divorce my father. 

As of recent, I've gotten really close to my dad. I learned how much he struggled to cope with my mom's illness as he couldn't take away her pain. He eventually got stressed out seeing her bed-ridden and often times would go out to relieve his stress. I sympathize with him a lot now, because I primarily take care of my mother &amp; the house (he works full time, so I do majority of the cooking &amp; cleaning). He's told me he's trying to repair the bonds he's broken with my mother, but she won't let him fix them. It breaks his heart and I've seen it personally - he tries to be more affectionate, take her out to dinner, and she immediately rejects every advance. After that, I've lost all sympathy I ever had for her. 

However, my mom can't stop complaining about my dad even though he's trying to right his wrongs. She keeps telling me the same stories about him being a horrible father, having to raise me by ""herself"" (my sisters raised me, not her) and overall trying to guilt trip me. Recently I've been ignoring her because she won't stop talking about the same thing and responding with only ""Okay mom"" or by telling her ""I'm busy studying"". She walks away seeming a little bothered I'm not entertaining her. 

AITA for ignoring my mom when she wants to talk to me, even if it's just her constantly badmouthing my father? 

Edit: she's currently giving me the silent treatment for telling her I was busy. ",AmItheAsshole
 For Telling My Autistic Girlfriend to Just Deal with Toppings on a Pizza to Save Money,"For context, we are extremely poor and have less than $200 in our bank account. 
My wanted to order pizza, so I said hey there’s this coupon for 40% off any large pizza with three toppings. That coupon could save us a ton of money, which we could spend on other things like gas for the car. I told her this and she starts talking about how her autism makes her not like certain textures. I tell her that 40% off is 40% off and that she can just pull the toppings she doesn’t like off the pizza. She then compares what I just said to insulting a person in a wheelchair, as if her autism texture thing is a serious as someone who literally can’t walk. I tell her that we’re poor and need to save every penny and that sometimes we have to do things we don’t necessarily like to get by. She then says that I’m saying this because of my “ego”. AITA for essentially telling her to suck it up to save money?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting family to wait for me for meetings re: inheritance?,"Unfortunately, my (36 f) father passed away at the end of March after living with a bad stage IV cancer for two years. The last couple months were really bad. The cancer spread in a way that affected his competency, so I had to act as medical power of attorney and take him into home hospice, which was awful. At the same time, his symptoms dramatically sped up right around when I was trying to do an IVF stimulation cycle, and while I was technically working full-time, I was busy from when I got up early in the morning until I went to bed late at night handling those two things. I was lucky to have an understanding boss, who was flexible with me as I was mainly checking in to make sure no fires started.

As the dust has settled, and we’ve successfully held a good memorial service, we’ve moved onto trying to get through all the legal red tape to settle his affairs and have the will executed. It’s not a complicated will, and there are only a few beneficiaries, with my aunt acting as executor. Mainly it’s just me, my aunt, and my brother involved. While my aunt is technically the executor, I think my brother has really been the person making decisions and setting up meetings. However, as they have started to really move through the process with some urgency, I’ve had to step back into work and make up for lost time. I’m now working overtime to make deadlines that I couldn’t work on earlier. We’re also starting another stimulation cycle. 

I feel really overwhelmed, and my priority is just to make sure there aren’t unpaid bills or taxes or things like that that might come back to bite us in the butt later. I’m not really that anxious to get into probate and selling assets until things lighten up for me a bit at work in mid June.

So things have started moving on without me and I guess I’m wondering if I’m the asshole for wishing people would wait for me. Because l I know that things like probate and such can take an obscenely long time so it does make sense to get it started as soon as possible and if I’m not able to do it, then someone has to. On the other hand, it feels like being involved in this process is part of the whole journey with my dad, and it feels wrong that I’m not in these conversations. I feel resentment that the reason I can’t be as involved right now is almost directly related to the fact that I was doing so much for my dad right before he passed. Many people helped my dad, but I was the most consistent, and it feels weird to watch others take on a leading role in this part of the process when they didn’t want a leading role in his caregiving.

Is this resentment completely ridiculous on my part?

Update: Thank you everyone who commented. I agree that I’m stepping out of my lane. I hope none of my responses were interpreted too strongly to be denying this or not appreciating the feedback that I got. It’s a difficult time and I’m feeling a lot of strong emotions in general. One of the things I unfortunately learned during this process is that sometimes it’s easier to feel anger or frustration than some of the other difficult emotions that you might feel in terms of grief. Fortunately, I haven’t really acted on any of these feelings, so this has been helpful for me today to make sure that I stay in my lane going forward.

Thinking about this today, and thinking about appropriate roles and such, I do think that I have been asked to do or by circumstances have ended up in being in the position of settling affairs and paying debts more than people who are not the executor would normally do. I do think that if I’m not going to be involved in this process at this moment, then I’m not going to be involved in this process, and I’m going to give back some of the assignments I’ve been given. These are things that others could be doing, probably at a quicker rate, and I have a lot to work through mentally and emotionally around the workload I take on.",AmItheAsshole
 for yelling at my partner for discussing with his parents first regarding his job transfer,"Throw away account due to friends being on this sub.

Apologies for the long read.

I(f33) live with my boyfriend(m35 let's call him Mike) since 3 years, have been together since 5 years. We are Indian.

Mike and i have been having issues due to his parents. 
I don't know if I'm overacting and not understanding but his life revolves alot around his parents. 

Background:
 
He takes advice from his parents regarding everything, to the point that makes me question our relationship.
When we were looking for an apartment, we came across one that we both loved alot(after looking at 10-15 flats). 
But after speaking to his dad, Mike changed his mind. This apartment is in a posh area, has all the things we need yet when his dad told him it's a little further away from work (+10 mins only) Mike wanted to look someplace else. 
We got the agreement/lease done for the flat but this left me feeling undermined. 

While on vacation, Mike would video call his parents frequently whenever he would see something beautiful. This made me feel really lonely as other couples were clicking pics and admiring the places together. 

He calls his mother every morning and evening. 
He cosleeps with his parents when they visit or if he visits home. This is inspite of having enough rooms. He says Indians do it all the time and that he misses them so they all sleep together. 
I'm Indian too but growing up, us siblings had our own bedrooms. We never co slept unless we had nightmares. 

The incident: 

Mike's job requires him to move cities every 6 years. 
Yesterday he received an email regarding the same.
When he called me he seemed to have already made his mind to move to his home city. That's when i knew he discussed with his parents already. 
I asked him and he accepted. He also said that he rcvd the email while he was on call with his mum hence discussed with her.

This is where i would really like your opinion. 
I feel this transfer decision affects me and Mike. Hence he should've discussed with me. His parents are interfering and helicopter parents. They have been trying to get him to move back. I don't want to move to his home city for this reason. 
I feel Mike should've discussed with me first before letting his folks know. It makes me feel like he is putting them first. I feel undermined when his mother's or father's decisions/opinions change Mike's mind.
This is the reason that caused me to yell at him. I unleashed all the pent up frustration and spoke rudely regarding his parents.

Mike says that i took the focus off his transfer for which he needed advice. He says i shouldn't have yelled at him and been understanding, also as per him discussing with his parents doesn't mean they are more important.

So please could you advise if I'm the AH for yelling at Mike?



",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to block my ex after my boyfriend told me to even after I didn't talk to my ex for over a year?,"My current boyfriend recently found out that I didn't have my ex blocked even though I haven't messaged him in roughly a year and I can prove it with receipts. However, I have NO intention of talking to my ex at all. And that is exactly what I said when my boyfriend confronted me on the situation.

He was immediately upset my ex wasn't blocked and when he told me to block him, I said no. Even if I blocked my ex, it wouldn't be any problem at all to contact him on different platforms. My ex is somewhat of a childhood friend and even though we don't talk anymore, it felt weird to block him. After a long argument, I did end up blocking my ex because the argument got pretty bad and it wasn't worth it. This was months ago and my boyfriend brings it up periodically about how he doesn't really trust me too much because I refused to block my ex without a fight.

So, am I the asshole here or is there a middle ground?",AmItheAsshole
 for no longer feeding my BIL,"AITA for no longer being nice to my homeless brother in law. Me 52 female am married to my husband 48 male. He has a brother 62 male.  Brother is homeless.  When we bought our new house, beautiful with a pond on 5 acres, I agree to put a shed in our backyard to let the homeless brother live in it.  The only requirement was he was not allowed to bring his junk here. The brother lost his home because he is a hoarder and his house was condemned.  That was two years ago. Since then, he has brought to my house 4 boats, 2 trucks, 2 dune buggies, 3 cars, and countless other things. Which 90% of the stuff does not work.  The other day, I had enough. I said something to my husband and my brother in law about it.  My brother in law got mad and said some not nice things about me.  Up until this point, I went out of my way to feed and cloth this man.  My husband travels 15 to 25 days of the month and I still make sure I feed his brother. When I said something my husband was very mad, so I swallowed my pride and apologized. Not two day laters, he brought an other car and another vehicle over to my house.  Now, I’m mad. I longer want to be civil to him.  This includes adding him to my dinner plans.  I no longer care if he’s fed or has the things he needs. Am I the asshole. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I refuse to help my husband?,"A little back story I 37 F have been married to my husband 47 M for 16 years we have two kids. I take care of everything all the mental load most the house work, paying bills and what not while working a full time job. 
The issue is that in the last few years my husband has lost a lot of family. I have helped with what ever has come up clean out apartments, attorneys you name it. With the last death I worked for days cleaning and moving items out of an apartment that the family member had died in and sat for a month before anyone found him. It was awful.
 My husband paid himself for all the work and when I asked about me he gave me 200$ I worked like 40 hrs on this project. Way way less than what he paid himself. He also has the mentality that any money he receives from deceased family is strictly for him. Which I am cool with that’s the law here I don’t have a claim don’t want a claim at some point my family members will also move on and I will hold the same position. 
Now to the issue he is asking me for more help with the legal issues on another family member. Is a legal disaster, family sucks in death and money. But I don’t want to. He has other people with vested interests that can help and should help. I know I will end up doing so much of the work on top of everything else I do. I am also starting another part of my business and will be extremely busy. He’s mad at me that I won’t do the work for him but I really don’t want to. He showed me what my time is worth. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to name my baby after an ex?,"My boyfriend and I have been discussing baby names.
We are only speaking hypothetically and wanting to see if we can agree on some, however, my boyfriend mentioned “Anna” (fake name for example.)
“Anna” is his exes name, but it is also his aunts name and in his words he “always thought it was pretty.”
I reacted pretty negatively because I felt disrespected that it was a suggestion. I’m not sure what to think about it.
He doesn’t like that I won’t even entertain the idea.
Am I the asshole for shooting down the idea?
",AmItheAsshole
 for not calling my mom when my(formerly our) cat died?,"When I was 15, my mom married a new guy. He's allergic to cats so mom said she's taking Milo to the shelter. I begged her not to but she said she'll have to do that unless someone else will take him in. So I called my dad. My dad told her he'll take Milo in if she lets me live with him, since he would need help taking care of the cat. That's how I ended up moving in with my dad at 15.

Mom visited until I was 16, then her new husband said he doesn't want her to have any further contact with my dad, and since she needed to contact dad to arrange visits, she just stopped visiting me. 

I'm now 22.

Milo recently passed away at the age of 20. I didn't call or message mom. Haven't talked to her in years, after all. Didn't think she'd want to know. She found out through her and dad's mutual friend, and then called me, saying it would have been nice to let her know. She called me cold-hearted for not thinking of reaching out and telling her that Milo died.",AmItheAsshole
 for reminding my mother that it is her job to take care of my little brother? ,"For context, I am 20 years old, living with my girlfriend halfway across the city by my own means. I work two jobs with athletic commitments and weekly court ordered meetings. Needless to say I lead a busy life.. anyways, my mother makes a last minute call to me every so often to ask if I can take babysit my little brother because they are going out of town for business. They are CEO’s and so this happens quite often. I love my family and my little brother so I have been giving consistent yes’s to taking care of him often requiring me to drop something from my schedule. 

In this current time frame I have been extra busy, and I have multiple mandatory commitments to go to tommorow that require me to have a good sleep if I am to even think of completing them with a positive attitude.

 My mother called and said she is going to Toronto, and asked that I go home to take care of my little brother. I said, “no, I can’t because I have work early tommorow” she says, “just sleep here and send him off to school”. I say, “I can’t because it’s too far and I have to wake up early.” Then she insists, and insists and questions me on what I am planning to do, when I am going, and why I can’t just do this little thing for her? And trying to say that because she’s going to be further away from the house, it only makes sense that I have to take care of my little brother. I am confused and fed up at this point, I say “he’s not my son” and she hangs up without saying anything. From the 18 years I had of living with her, if I have learned anything about her, it is that this is not good news. Either a severe emergency popped up, or she is offended and that is not good news for anybody. Most likely the latter. She will try to punish me in some way shape or form, and try to make me feel her anger and make me apologize. In knowing that this is coming, I sent her a long message of how I have mandatory commitments, I need my rest and that her behaviour is ridiculous, that I love them both but I am not an on-call babysitter, and that if she is going anyways and leaving him alone, I will have to go anyways and I will tell him everything that has happened here. I also told her that if she keeps treating me like this I don’t want to keep doing favours for her. 

She responded “you don’t need to come. I will take care of it.” 

End of messages

I feel like an asshole for lecturing my mother like this, but a part of me feels that it was justified.
",AmItheAsshole
 for what caused my ex bsf and i to stop being friends?,"I was friends with this girl for around 6 years. i considered her my best friend. pretty recently i had gotten out of really toxic relationship. i had asked all of the people inside of my inner circle to stop talking to him and most of them were happy to do so.   
however, two days ago. i found out that the woman i considered to be my best friend had been texting him behind my back, talking and saying horrible things about me behind my back and making fun of the me for the things he did to me. i was heartbroken knowing that someone i held with so much respect didn’t show me the same amount of respect i showed her. i was a crying mess to a few close friends and she didn’t care. she had texted me about something i had said to a mutual friend and told me that i was blowing it out of proportion. 

we had gone back and forth for a while as i begged her to not throw away a 6 year long friendship for someone that caused me unimaginable pain. she was upset that she couldn’t be friends with him and i at the same time. i tried explaining to her how that wouldn’t work and she had to choose. i’m not one to make people choose however it was important to me.

i had later found out after he reached out to me about the whole situation that she had asked him out, made him uncomfortable by making unsolicited sexual comments and gestures to him, talking about me behind my back, and overall trying to make him feel a specific way about her. i do believe it’s important to clarify that the relationship was toxic due to both of our unsolved issues and the need for me to be independent while he is dependent. a few other things happened between us that also caused me to spiral. 

she continued to argue with me until she told me that we should not associate with each other anymore. at that point in time, i was okay with it. i realized how little she respected me and tried to completely flip the whole situation on me. however now that i look back on it, should i have let them be friends and sucked it up? AITA?

UPDATE: today while i was in a public space, she saw me. she stormed over to me and began to scream in my face. she called me horrendous names and continued to scream about how i am spreading stuff about her to friends of ours that we used to share. for context, she was trying to get with a close friend of mines, boyfriend. i told my friend as soon as possible however it turns out that she was lying about it and it never truly happened. that’s why she got in my face because the boyfriend had confronted her. i understand that i maybe shouldn’t have gotten involved but i just wanted to make sure that my friend knew. i’ve known them both for a year now and i know that he wouldn’t have done anything to ever hurt her. which is why i told them just to confirm wether it was a lie or not. i stayed calm while she was screaming and our mutual friends looked at her as if she were insane. all i responded with was “okay.” she then went on to call me a bitch. as well as other things. it was upsetting to see that however i was more angry than anything. i left the situation and i didn’t say anything about her. she had involved someone of higher authority there and victimized herself once more. ",AmItheAsshole
 that i told my husband to stop supporting his adult daughter? ,"I (47F) am very frustrated about this and thinking long hard and want to know if my feelings are valid. My husband (54M) keeps supporting his daughter (27F) who’s a single mom. Currently, the daughter lives with her mom and is asking him for help nonstop. Might it be simple or not. I stopped working for a while due to a very bad accident and is living off pension, my husband earns enough to support us but not to the extreme where he’ll have too much disposable income. Just 6 months ago, the daughter asked for money for dental implants. I happily told my husband to be as generous as he can be since it’s not always the case and she rarely ask for money. After that first time, she kept asking for more. One time it was grocery, next its day care bills, then phone bills. Just a week ago she asked him to pay some of her bills because she doesn’t have a work now. Its becoming a habit and i think she’s too old to be asking him for support and this needs to stop. 

I told my husband how frustrated i am and he was even more upset and disappointed because im being unreasonable he said. Now as of writing, he’s giving her $700 weekly and i just found out yesterday that we are behind rent. I told him how i see him as a really good father but i dont think its right specially when we can barely pay housing and he just shut me off. Its been 3 days since we stopped talking. AITA??

EDIT: I still pay half of our bills as of today. I lost a leg that’s why im jobless now and still on therapy but im still looking for remote jobs everyday. Its not like i want all of my husband’s money when in 12 years, i was the one paying for most of our bills. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not hiring a professional to steam clean the carpets before moving out.,"Hello,

Me and my friend are students who just graduated in Canada we are just finishing our rental term.

We were going to clean the place to the best of our abilities of course. The landlord however, asked whether we would be hiring a professional cleaner as she said “the carpets need to be steam cleaned”.

The contract only says that we need to maintain the premises in a reasonably clean condition.

To us this doesn’t seem like it would be part of our obligations, the carpets seem to be in the same conditions we received them in.

Any thoughts would be appreciated.",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my mom use my Netflix account?,"

So, I recently moved out of my parents' house to live on my own. I pay for my own Netflix account, and I love binge-watching shows in my free time. Now, my mom (48F) has been pestering me to give her my login details so she can watch her favorite shows too.

Here's the thing: my mom has always been kind of overbearing. She used to monitor my internet usage when I lived at home and would often comment on what I was watching or reading online. I felt like I had no privacy.

Now that I have my own place, I just want to enjoy my Netflix account without feeling like I'm being watched. But my mom is guilt-tripping me, saying I'm being selfish and that I owe her for all the years she raised me.

I feel torn because I love my mom, but I also want some boundaries. AITA for not letting her use my Netflix account?


EDIT: I forgot to mention that I don't have a job, and basically my mom gives me money each month to live. I showed her this thread to prove that she is the crazy one, she got really mad and has now cut me of from funding!!!!

EDIT2: OKAY so just to be clear: the reason I don't have  a job is because I am severely disabled and there is no economic support for people like me in my country. My family is well off financially and my mom giving me money each month does not affect her economy. SO STOP JUDGING ME!!!",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to save my friend by singling out my other friend? TW: depression,"I (16,M) have two friends. They’re dating M(16, F) and B(16, M). M has BPD which if you don’t know what that is you can look into it but essentially i think it means that emotions are amplified and that the slightest thing can send you into an episode. You’re either really happy, really sad or really angry. B and M seemed to be doing alright when I befriended them. But every time I went out with them something seemed off. M would have an episode triggered by things like needing to be patted down by a security guard or B waving at someone on the train and subsequently asking him if he was cheating on her. One time M called me desperately asking if B was ok when he was simply getting an eye exam. I was very confused at the time and unfortunately shrugged her off a bit.

 But over time, things got worse. To the point B admitted to me he was extremely depressed with how often arguments were breaking out and how much drama was happening in his life. M frequently has depressing though however B already took these as normal when I met him which upset me greatly. If I had a girlfriend, I wouldn’t imagine her doing things like that to herself.

 But at one point I decided it was enough. B needed one day without M and he agreed with me on this sometimes. He told me he would be so much happier if he took a break from her so I took it upon myself to organise that. I asked for him to come over to my other friends house one weekend just to chill out. But he wanted to invite her and I told him no. Then the argued and I said fine you can invite her if you think YOU will be ok. He acted like I was being an asshole and I will admit that this is singling M out. There is no other explanation. 

But B was getting more miserable by the day. We hung out and it went ok. But today, M told me she was no longer interested in being friends with me because she found the messages on B’s phone. Am I allowed to be annoyed that our private messages aren’t so private anymore? They have obviously had an argument and frankly I just want to leave it to them. I don’t want to be involved anymore. I’ve been their relationship counsellor enough, for half a year. Am I the asshole?
",AmItheAsshole
 - airport edition,"AITA? Was walking along in the airport on the right side somewhat hugging the wall. Large amount of people going in both directions. Middle aged woman was walking straight toward me, I figured she would drift to her right. She didn’t. She played chicken with me. I’m not small, she all but fell over. She looked at me in complete horror as if I intentionally walked into her ignoring the fact she had to walk into me too. Am I the asshole? ",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving a group holiday I arranged,"So I am currently sharing a villa with my immediate family for my daughters christening. A christening my partner and I  didn’t even want but both our parents are insistent we do. We decided to do it at the chapel my husband and I got married in as at least some sentimental value for us to enjoy. It is a bit of a drive for us all (about three hours) so my partner and I said we would make a holiday out of it over a long weekend. The families got wind of it and decided they would as well. A few weeks ago when planning things we were asked about our plans for accommodation and we were just going to get an apartment or something. 

My farther insisted he help find us a place as we were both under a lot of stress at the time and didn’t have time to do much research. We told him what we were looking for and what we would need to help with the baby I.e bath, easy in and out with pram, air con, etc. my dad said he found us an apartment and it’s all in one big complex that Him my mum and my siblings will be staying in as well. I thought ok makes things a bit easier and he said it was 1k which I thought a bit steep but if it ticks the boxes I was grateful for him sorting it for us.

Anyway we have rocked up and it is awful, we are sharing a house, with everyone! not seperate apartments just rooms. It ticks non of the boxes we have asked for and our daughter is suffering because of it. My husband and I don’t want to make a fuss but we have been looking forward to this break and right now we can’t at all. We are sharing a room with our baby which isn’t normally an issue but lately any sort of noise or sound wakes her up which is why she normally sleeps in her own room but there is no option for that here it’s just so cramped and hot (no aircon - we are in the tropics so you do need it). So we are now having to deal with either going to bed at 6pm or trying to make no noise when we go to bed which isn’t easy… so we are wondering WIBTA if we moved out and got our own apartment in the morning and just let them know it’s not working with the baby. They can keep our share of the money and we will just do our own thing… ",AmItheAsshole
 for basically saying no to my spouse,"My spouse(m) and I (f) live in a different state from his little cousin and her parents (BM and BD situation) and they are no longer together but very cordial. Relation is through the dad. Some months back my spouse told me his cousin’s mother has given birth. The lady has another kid in addition to my spouse’s cousin and they are all from different men including the newborn. When he told me the news of the newborn I was not prepared for his next statement. He said “I’m gonna have to go bring my cousin to stay with us so we can care for her because her mother is not gonna be able to care for her anymore because she has a newborn”. I said huh? What do you mean? So just cause she has a newborn she can’t care for her older kids? How many ppl do you know send their older kids away to have other people be responsible for them just because they have a newborn. These older kids are school aged kids elementary or middle school age. So they are school for the better half of the day. When my spouse told me this, there was no time line as to when his cousin will be going back and it sounded like we were going to be her permanent guardians assuming all and any responsibilities(more than likely). So I gave a couple of reasons why we couldn’t take her including her parents being well and alive. And his reason for us taking her in is not a good enough reason for us to take responsibilities of a minor while we have kids of our own and and in this economy? And I asked him why he didn’t send off our older kid to live with someone when we had our second child? Imagine people sending away their older kids to live with other people because they have a new born and they couldn’t be bothered with their needs anymore. So I said no and that was that. Fast forward to a couple weeks ago he brought up the issue again. Putting me on the spot asking if he can go bring his cousin to stay with us except time he’s giving a different reason. And this reason is very specific. Don’t wanna go into details but let’s just say it involves his cousin’s older brother. I haven’t given a straight answer but he’s looking at me like I’m a very wicked person for refusing and if I had agreed to her staying with us, she wouldn’t have been going through what she’s going through. I know he’s mad and thinks I’m not understanding his point. I also think his cousin’s mom should be responsible and care for her kids and make sure they are all good like a parent should . So AITA for refusing to have this little cousin come live with us? Sorry if there are typos.",AmItheAsshole
: For charging my mum babysitting fees,"AITA, I recently turned 18 and want to go out and enjoy myself. My mum had me young (17) and i was an only child for a while then she had my two younger sisters (12 &amp; 13).


Recently shes been “reliving her youth” that she missed out on because she had me and i’m made to look after my younger sisters, my problem is i’m 18 and i want to start going out with my friends and enjoy my life. I pay all my own bills such as my car, car insurance, phone bill etc and the money i have left means i can go out. 

Ive adressed this issue many times now to her and everytime its a big argument resulting in me being “selfish” and “horrible”. I dont mind looking after them for her to go to work or on a night out if im not doing anything anyway at the end of the day everyone deserves a night out once in a while but recently its alot
ive been looking after them. Such as now my mums went on a solo trip meaning im having to look after them everyday get them up for school, take them to school, go to work and then look after them at night also. 

Ive saved her alot of money on babysitting fees just to be called selfish so i brung up the fact of if you want me to look after them all the time im going to start charging you not alot but it means i have extra money to do things i want to do or buy things i want to buy. 

She didnt take this well and again i was selfish and she wouldnt be asking me to watch them again if im going to act like that… then the guilt hit me and ive continued watching them for nothing and not being able to go out. 

So my question is AITA?




",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to get adopted?,"So I (16M) have been in foster care since I was 13 due to abuse from my dad and drug addiction from my mom. I have recently been trying to get adopted and my mom refuses to show up to court so I messaged her and asked her if she would do it for me and she told me that I was taking away the last thing that made her a mother and that if she signed her rights away she wouldn’t be sober anymore and told me that I would win, I don’t want her to think like that and feel like ITA but I just want to be adopted
AITA?
EDIT: thank you everyone for your kind comments, just to clear things up I do have a Guardian Ed Litem (I think that’s how you spell it) and an attorney


UPDATE: I texted my mom and told her that she was still going to be my mom even if she lost her rights and she acknowledged that she was a bad mother for some of the stuff she did but that she had to get me away from my dad and how she hasn’t found a coping mechanism for her pain yet. She said that all it will cost me is walking her down the aisle at her wedding and me continuing to talk to her, I have no clue what to say to her after that, but that’s the update.",AmItheAsshole
 For Keeping My WiFi To Myself?,"Hello. So my father has been staying with me for several months now and it's not been easy on me at all. To start, he has had unstable employment for years now and I've had to do a lot for him. This includes when I had to pay his rent for the room he stayed in (before getting my apartment, I lived in a couple's room for rent. When they found out he was homeless, they told him he could move into my room. I agreed as I didn't want to see my dad homeless, thhough I was upset since it ruined my newfound privacy and our relationship is shaky to begin with due to his drinking issue.)

When a woman in the room downstairs moved out, I paid for him to move into into it so I could have my space back. I managed to move out and into my 1st apartment which is a very small 1 bdr. However, my dad lost his job again and I had to balance paying my own rent while paying his. He began getting unemployment but that fell through, and instead of having me pay his rent he decided to just bring all his things to my place &amp; crash here. 

It took him a while to find another job. He has a habit of joining temp agencies that are notorious for randomly firing workers &amp; other issues. I've tried again &amp; again to help him with finding employment (buying him interview clothes, managing his emails &amp; filling out applications, researching jobs in the area, practically everything. And it's been *exhausting*. I'm often moody at home because I still have rent and bills to pay on top of everything I do for him, &amp; he often guilts me by complaining about my attitude but I can't help how I feel. I can't roam free in my apartment because he occupies the entire living room, we argue bc he uses up things like my food &amp; tp &amp; he doesn't seem grateful at all. My bills have run up double despite me being home not even half the time, &amp; although he just recently started working again he hasn't given me enough $ to cover all that he's costing me.

So, that brings about my current issue. I just recently installed WiFi. My job is okay but as of late, overtime is heavily restricted so I'm not able to make as much $ as I need. I figured w/ WiFi I can cut back on my phone bill &amp; try to find ways to get a second job from home. The WiFi came with a generic name &amp; password, which I changed as prompted by the app. My dad woke up from his nap &amp; asked if I changed the password. I told him that I changed both. He told me I need to send him the network name &amp; the password. I said that I got the plan with limited amount of devices and that the WiFi is for me (I specified this in my conversation with him yesterday). He got upset &amp; said I ruined his day &amp; when I gave him my explanation again he called it BS. I don't feel like arguing and feel bad, but at the same time he's always guilt tripping me. Rarely anything in my apartment is just for me despite me paying the rent and bills and everything else, but I'm doubting myself here. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad at my friends,"Ok I need some advice on what to do. I (F22) am mad at my friends for not sticking up for me. So here’s what happened. I have been friends with my roomate (let’s call her Carrie) for over 10 years. 
One day Carrie decides to move out secretly without telling me. Keep in mind Carries parents are still paying rent for her room at my apartment and a separate apartment that she lives in now. Carrie has ghosted me and blocked me because I asked her very nicely why she decided to move out. She has yet to provide a clear answer on why she moved out and blocked me. 
She is still talking to my best friends (that I introduced her to) and Im just left in the dust. 
Im not sure whether I should be mad at them because she has continuously talked bad about me to them. I am the type of friend that always stands up for my friends and will cut someone off if they talk bad about my friends. 
So cut to today. I receive a text from my best friend that Carrie wants me at her birthday party. Of course I say that I would rather not go and would like to protect my peace. My best friend invites all of my friends to Carries birthday party (me included). 
My best friend receives a text from Carrie that everyone else is ok to go to her birthday party except for me. All my friends are considering going even though I was uninvited. 
AITA if I am mad at my friends for going to a birthday party for someone that has uninvited me and has talked bad about me?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend my honest opinion,"Burner



I'm 29F. My friend A, is gonna get married in a few month. She's from a euro country, but her boyfriend is from here.



They're gonna have a mixed traditions wedding. I am a bridesmaid and i've been fully commited w/ organizing and planning.



She was looking for the perfect wedding dress, she went to lots of salons. She had 3 final picks and brought us to the salon to hear our opinions.



She asked me and the other bridesmaids to give her our honest opinions, she wont get mad. She picked the dress, and we moved on.



She had told us in her culture the bride changes into a traditional wedding dress at midnight, and her hair is braided and stuff like that.



I thought it's gonna be an actual wedding dress. Then she sent us the picture of dress last week and it's a hot mess.



It's short, RED with flower embroidery, it has a weird matching headpiece w/ pearls. It's honestly inappropriate to a wedding. Especially since she's gonna wear a normal wedding dress before that.



I also think braiding her hair cuz she's a ""married woman"" is outdated and misogynistic from the time women were treated like properties. There is no reason for a woman to that in 2024. So the whole thing is wrong IMO.



At first i said it was nice, but then i remembered how awful it's gonna be for her to show up in that circus costume. It's short as i mentioned, I am against sl.t shaming, but i believe people should wear appropriate dresses (including the bride) to a wedding.



Since she had asked us to be honest, I called her and told her the dress is not fit for a wedding, and the midnight tradition is lowkey misogynistic. I told her i do not mean to be rude, but it's gonna be ridiculous in a normal wedding.



She told me it's a beautiful dress and they've been doing this tradition for centuries, and the change is about the women entering a new phase in life not about the men.



I told her traditions are pointless and we follow old dead people's beliefs with them. and regardless of what she believes it's gonna look like a circus not a wedding.



She called me cultureless and told me to use my energy on real feminist issues and called me a fake feminist.



Things got heated I told her ugly things too and I hung up.



I hadn't heard from her but my intentions were not to offend her or her culture, i just really think she is gonna make her wedding ridiculous.



She hasn't responed to me and now I am conflicted if I was too harsh.



AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for cancelling my step-daughter's birthday party for insulting a classmate?,"EDIT: To clarify, the teasing words were ""Hannah loves you! First comes love, then comes marriage, then comes baby in a baby carriage!""

\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_\_

I have a step-daughter, Hannah. She's 17 years old.

She had her birthday yesterday &amp; asked me for money to buy gifts for her classmates. I agreed but said that she had to buy things for everyone.

She bought chocolates. I was picking her up. She had not given it to all of her friends yet, and she distributed it to some others.

Two boys were nearby, and one of them said ""No chocolates for us?"" She said ""It's only for *special* people,"" and then gifted it to another boy. The others began to tease him because he was one of Hannah's ""special people.""

She told one of them ""Didn't your father abandon your mother when she got pregnant? You deserve it completely.""

I was absolutely shocked. I asked her to apologize but she refused. I cancelled the party she was going to hold later in the evening.

My wife's mad at me, and so is she.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to help after I promised?,"I (25F) promised to help my mother put up some curtains today. Beforehand, she came across some old couple counselling homework that she and my father did some decades earlier, and this led to her explaining she wanted counselling because she felt there were issues under the surface of their relationship, but my dad apparently said her issues were her own, and he was only being a tool because she was smoking while pregnant with me and he didn't like it (I'm not meaning to paint him as a saint here. He was smoking as well, and in her presence. He just found something to absolve him of all fault and responsibility and used it as an ace up his sleeve). 

I was shocked by the revelation that she had smoked while pregnant with me, and naturally had some follow up questions. I asked her 'did you just say you smoked while pregnant with me?'

Mum answered with 'it was a different time back then and we weren't as aware of the dangers. But I did cut back anyway while pregnant. I was only having about four a day.'

I was floored by her definition of a 'cut back' amount of smoking and repeated 'four a day!?' I was about to ask her for how much of the pregnancy did she smoke, but before I could, she honestly exploded and shouted in my face, 'I'm not doing this with you!!!'

I understand that she probably felt a bit defensive and guilty because now we know how bad smoking while pregnant is, but I was so upset by how she snapped at me, when I believe I was well within my rights to be shocked and have questions, that I refused to speak with her after the way she shouted at me and I walked away (she wanted to continue our conversation about the counselling, but I wasn't having it).

I honestly don't want to help her now. Not because I'm horrified by her smoking when she was pregnant with me (I'm perfectly fine, so clearly she/we were fortunate) I'm just so peeved by her reaction that I don't want to be helping her at the moment.

So AITA for not wanting to help her now because I'm upset with how that conversation went. I feel guilty because I don't think it's fair to punish her for how she reacted to a clearly sensitive subject. I think I'll help her later on for the sake of decency, but AITA for being mad at her and not wanting to help?",AmItheAsshole
 for sharing the details of our anniversary dinner?,"My wife and I recently celebrated our wedding anniversary with a trip to Paris. Being big food enthusiasts (aka ""foodies""), we had booked a number of very fancy dinners as part of the trip. 

While catching up with friends after the trip, my wife's sister-in-law was asking about what we did on the trip, and we talked about site-seeing and then the dinners. I showed some pictures from our highlight dinner, and the SIL commented on how it looked expensive. 

I said it was on par with a typical Michelin experience. Then I shared, ""And we splurged on the wine for the night. Going with the 500 euro bottle was actually less expensive than the pairing.""

I didn't get the reaction of the SIL, and she asked, ""What's a typical Michelin experience?"" 

So I rambled about how it was a 3-star restaurant, and the tasting menu was about 300 euro per person, but you can go to a place with few stars and pay less, etc. 

The afternoon went on as normal, but my brother-in-law (wife's brother) pulled her aside at the end of the event. My wife told me that I had made his wife feel stupid and inferior because she wasn't aware of Michelin, nor of the cost. 

They aren't poor, but my wife and I are much more well off, and apparently it's always been an issue when we get together. My wife has now asked me to never talk about money, what things cost, or anything financial around her brother and his wife because they get embarrassed for not being able to afford our lifestyle. 

AITA for talking about our anniversary dinner?",AmItheAsshole
" for skipping my friends birthday without warning because his gf calls me ""THE typical gbf""?","Miles and I have known each other since we were 2 because our parents are best friends.

Now I would not say miles is my best friend. He is a good friend and we do hang out on occasion but see each other on all major holidays because of our parents. 

We are in our early 20s.

The problem started because of a dumb childhood memory. 
When we were 8, we had a wedding play on school after care. I played the bride and miles the groom. It was a play. With horrible songs and uncoordinated kids.

Obs our parents made pictures and videos of that. And we each have one picture on our family picture walls.

Miles is dating Lindy. They met 3 years ago and started dating last year. Lindy does not like me.

So every time we concide at a celebration, she makes a comment about me being the typical girl best friend. She one time said that I secretly wanted to sleep with Miles. 

I have no clue where she got that impression from. Miles and I have different friend groups and schedules. Besides the monthly catch-up over food, we didn't really meet that much.

Things got worse when Lindy saw the wedding play picture.
The comments just got more. She even started DMing me on Instagram saying ""she knew what game i was playing.""

I talked to Miles once about this, and he told me to give her time.

So his birthday was on Saturday and I was invited. Lindy  wrote me saying something along the lines that she was going to supervise me. This was their first birthday as a couple, and I was not allowed to take up his time. 

I was honestly just fed up. I tried talking to Miles once more, but he said the same thing.

So I just skipped out. When the party started I wrote a quick sorry I can't come and told him my mother was going to bring his present.

Now he is upset with me for missing his birthday
 Lindy is mad that I made it all about myself, and my parents are upset I missed a ""family function""

Aita ?


Edit: I didn't show anyone the messages because it didn't want to make more out of this than it is.

I didn't want to poison anyone against Lindy, especially not if she is a new fixture in Miles life. That would make both our lives more difficult. I hoped that just talking about it might be the more adult thing.

My parents are not mad at me or blowing up my phone. Ala reddit fashion. They and Miles parents were just bummed out  that this was the first birthday that I ever missed.

As to why she is jealous. I have no idea. Neither of our parents ever wanted us to get together. There were no jokes or anything about it. I think they also never would want that.

The wedding play picture is in the living rooms because they loved the picture and it was our first play.",AmItheAsshole
 for being annoyed at my Mum for eating my gluten free snack?,"I (31F) have multiple medical conditions which mean I can't work full time. I do receive disability benefits which allows me to pay for all of the bills and charges that my parents get on their flat that we all live in together. They're living with me at the moment temporarily until they go back to their normal house in a different country. I'm also attending uni at the moment in the hope that I'll be able to work part-time once I graduate in the field I'm studying.

I am intolerant to gluten and I am currently waiting for a biopsy to confirm if I have coeliac disease or not. Recently, my favourite childhood snack has come out in a gluten free version and I was so excited that my Dad bought me some. I really liked it so he bought me some more yesterday without me asking him to. That's when I noticed my Mum (59F) was eating the gluten free snack and I got annoyed at her. She insisted that because this is her flat and she bought the food with her money that she should be able to eat them too. I said that's unfair because we have the normal non-gluten free version in the cupboard that 1. aren't as expensive and 2. she has the luxury to be able to eat, but she said she doesn't care because she bought it.

I have a limited amount of food I can eat in the house due to my intolerance and I try not to ask for too many things because I am grateful that my parents are letting me live in their flat and paying for most of the food. I tend to eat things I'm really craving out of the house with my own money so I don't financially burden them.  
AITA?

(Also, I have offered to pay for my gluten free stuff so that this doesn't happen again and my Mum told me I'm being ridiculous and possessive)",AmItheAsshole
 for being a double agent in my parent's fight?,"This started a few weeks back when I saw a suspicious number of transactions on my father's phone to a Bar/Pub. I told my mother thinking nothing of it as he works in accounting and may have been bringing clients there for a chat. She hates stuff like this especially because my dad is overweight with lingering medical issues. She had screamed at him before for accepting our neighbor's invitation to drink. Contrary to what I expected, she didn't confront him right away.

Fast forward to 2 weeks ago, she asks me if it's possible to track someone's phone without them knowing. I said it is and asked why. She said that she needed to track where my dad is going. I responed saying that I could track him rn using google. I pull up his phone's location, which showed the same Bar/Pub. She then proceeds to ask if I could take her there right that moment and I agree, not having a valid reason to refuse. We reach there and his bike is parked outside. We go up to the Hotel then to the Restraunt and Pub but can't find him. The only place left was the Bar and the Transporting service in the same building. We ask the security to call the administrator and she tells us the Bar was male only. She sends me to see but I reason that I won't be able to get in cus im Underage. She tries calling him and he gives the excuse he always gives that he is at ""Uncle's House"". Now Ive been hearing that all my life and never pried cus i thought he didn't know his name or something. My mum goes to ask the Transporting service if he worked there and at the same time he comes up the stair. He gestures to me asking 'where?' and I point to the direction of my mother. At this point, the gears in my head click that if i snitch the situation gonna get worse and I didn't tell my mum that he came up. We go back as security starts to get sus of us. When he returns, my mum is asleep, and I tell him that mum knows you were there but doesn't know where in the building. I go to sleep after.

Now, last Saturday, I was up studying when my mum started conversing with him. I overhear something about how he apparently hugged our maid who was crying, and she responded with 'Stop, the kid is watching'(the kid being my little sister) which prompted my mum to think he was cheating. She also confronted him about going to the bar. He denied it all but my mum was not convinced.

And Day before Yesterday, he didn't do anything for their anniversary.

AITA, for playing a double agent role in their fight and how can I help make amends?

Edit: I was never involved in the cheating nor did i know about it until recently.



",AmItheAsshole
 for Sharing Too Much Information With a Friend?,"So, this happened a few days ago, and I can't shake off the feeling that I might have been the asshole in this situation, but I need some outside perspective. I (28) was driving with my friend (27) in the passenger seat when I got pulled over for speeding. Now, I don't know about you, but getting pulled over always makes me a bit nervous. And, well, in that nervous moment, I got a random boner. It happens, right? I wasn't exactly thrilled about it, but it wasn't like I could do anything about it at the time. The cop gave me a ticket, and after we drove away, I told my friend about the boner situation. I said, ""This might be TMI, but I was hard that entire time."" I thought maybe sharing the awkward moment would lighten the mood or give us something funny to laugh about later. However, my friend was not amused. They got really upset with me, saying it was inappropriate and that I shouldn't have shared that information. I get that it might have been an overshare, hence why I prefaced it with ""This might be TMI,"" but I didn't think it was that big of a deal. They haven't talked to me in about three days, and we usually talk all the time and play smash bros. Am I the asshole for overstepping boundaries here? Should I have kept my mouth shut about the whole incident or was my friend overreacting?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to talk to my father,"I'm 16f and I don't have a good relationship with my father cause he is narcissistic. Recently I have got my final exam results and I scored 86 percent which I think is pretty good but my father didn't think it was good percentage. So he started insulting me and said ""Go sell yourself in streets and become s** worker but you are not even capable of that too"" and this wasn't the first time when he had said those words to me. 

I was very scared of him since childhood and never talked with him for more than 5 minutes. Basically he wants to have control over my life and impose all his interests on me even when I said I don't have any interest in his interests. My whole house including my sister and my mother are afraid of him and the worst part is he feels proud about that. He always thinks he is doing some favour by paying my college fee but never thinks its his duty. 

",AmItheAsshole
 for going out with my boyfriend instead of my coworkers? ,"So it was my (24 f) and my boyfriends (26 m) anniversary a couple days ago. Due to us both working that day, we couldn't celebrate until today. I let him pick the place we went to go out to eat, and he happened to choose a place that myself and my coworkers made plans to go to at some point in the near future. There was no official day planned out for us to all go, but we all like this place and knew we wanted to go together. 

Something funny happened while we were there, and I texted the groupchat I have with said coworkers to let them know about it. They both took offense to the fact that I was there without them. I tried explaining that it was for our 5 year anniversary, I wasnt even the one that picked the place, *and* that we made no official plans to go on a specific day. It was more of just a ""what if"" kind of plan. I thought they were joking at first so i kind of laughed it off, but they both said they were mad.

I can kind of understand why they'd be slightly upset, as at no point before this conversation took place did i tell them it was our anniversary and i didn't ever mention it's a place my boyfriend and I frequent a couple times a month. But they both surpassed slightly upset, and were outright *very* angry at me for going without them. Their explanation was simply that we always hype up how fun it would be for us to go together, and they think it's unfair I go without them after getting them both excited. I think they're both wildly overreacting, but I could be wrong. 

Now they won't answer my texts. I work with both of them tomorrow and I'm worried they're actually very upset with me. I don't know if I gave then the wrong impression or what, but if I did something truly wrong, I'd like to know so I can apologize and try to make it up to them.

I do feel kind of dumb even making this post because it seems like such a non issue, but I care about them both so much that I don't want them to be angry with me for any reason especially something as simple as this.

So, AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to move to Alaska?,"My husband (31m) and I (29f) had our first child a few months ago. He works a decently paid construction job, and I work in a dental office. Unfortunately, my salary is not great. About half of my paycheck is going towards daycare, which is leading me to look into a possible evening/weekend job to avoid paying for childcare. My husband has also been applying to various other jobs in his field with no luck so far.
So about a week ago he tells me he found a job posting for a carpenter that he is qualified for. He says that the pay is so good that I could even be a stay-at-home mom if he got the job. The catch, of course, being we would have to move from the eastern U.S. to Alaska (he has not specified which area exactly). I immediately turned down the idea. Leaving my life, friends, and family behind to move thousands of miles away to a state I, frankly, know nothing about doesn’t seem appealing. 
However, he is much more serious about this than I thought. He won’t stop bringing it up. He’s convinced that this would solve all of our financial struggles. He has even looked up houses the area claiming they are much more affordable than houses in our area. I just cannot wrap my head around how he thinks this is a good idea. Sure the pay may be great, but what about the cost of living, or the cost of moving out there? Could we even handle adjusting to the climate in Alaska? And even if it’s true that I could be a stay-at-home mom, that is all I would be. I’d be leaving everyone else that I care about behind, and I know I would be miserable for that reason alone.
My husband has even gone as far as to say he could move out there by himself and send us money. At that point it wouldn’t even feel like a marriage to me. I told him that him leaving, or us moving that far away is not what I signed up for when I married him. His response was that I’ve always known he wanted to leave our state. Ok, but I assumed maybe he’d want to move a few states away, not Alaska! He says it’s no different, which just baffles me. I know I know next to nothing about life in Alaska or moving for a job. I just don’t believe that the grass is always greener, and that he’s too quick to think that such a drastic move will solve all of our problems. Yet he almost seems resentful that I’m not seeing it his way. AITA for not considering moving to Alaska as an option for our family? ",AmItheAsshole
: for not wanting contact with my mother after her getting a new boyfriend? ,"I am a female (23) who unexpectedly lost her father (58) back in September. He got a heart attack the day of my uncle’s funeral and passed away a few hours later. My mother (51) and my father were together for over 24 years and still married. 

My father’s passing was very traumatic for me. I followed EMDR therapy for it up until 5 weeks ago. My mother was devastated after my father’s passing. She became very tired of life and kept telling me and my brother everything she wanted to do to end her life. She also made me feel like my dad passing away wasn’t that big of a deal compared to her losing her partner. Overall, she was not acting like a mother should towards her children who were going through an equally awful time. She could feel me wanting to put some space between us, but dragged me to spiritual therapists who told me lies about my father and who said my father didn’t want me and my mother to fight after his passing. These sessions really hurt me a lot, hearing weirdo’s say untruthful things about my dad who had just passed away. 

Edit: when my mother voiced she had a hard time staying alive, I slept over at her house for multiple weeks, leaving my partner and own house behind. I tried to get her to go to a real psychologist and went with her a few times. But she didn’t want to hear anything being said and voiced she only trusted psychics and spiritual workers. During the weeks I spend with her, I noticed my own mental health declining because of the whole situation. When I said I wanted to go back home, she told me nobody cared about her. When I went home, I still came over multiple times a week to be with her. She told me multiple times she wanted to harm herself because nobody was there for me and that I didn’t care.

After about 3 months my mom started spending a lot of time with a man. It hurt me a lot and I asked her if they were dating. She kept assuring me she was not dating and that she was not looking for anyone to date yet. Yet she kept being very secretive and going away a lot. All the while saying my dad was her true love and that she could never love anyone else.
I know my mom is still young and I wouldn’t want her to be lonely for the rest of her life, but I was still very much grieving my dad and trying to get over the trauma I experienced.

After 5 months of my dad passing, my mother invited me over. She made me listen to a voice recording of a psychic saying my mom and my dad are real soulmates and were meant to be together. After the recording was finished, my mom said she is dating again. I became very emotional and she said: ‘I knew you were going to do this’. I left the house and blocked her on social media. 

After 4 weeks of no contact, an uncle of mine came over and said my mom wanted to bring her boyfriend over for Easter. But she said I had to meet her boyfriend before Easter, which meant I had 3 days time to meet him before Easter took place. I declined and said I wasn’t ready yet. She decided not to bring said boyfriend to Easter after people telling her that wouldn’t be fair on me. During Easter she kept telling family members that I wasn’t accepting her new relationship while I could literally hear her say it. She also went outside a couple of times to stand next to the window where I was seated to go and cry.

Am I an asshole for not wanting to talk to her? Or should I get over myself and let her be happy? 

",AmItheAsshole
" for cutting the fake grass that my husband installed in my Maverick, bwcause it kept flying up when I went over 40 mph?","We initially did it, to protect the truck bed until I can get a liner sprayed on when transporting lawn and garden supplies. I would have thought that he would test ir out before telling me, ""hey look what I did."" So fast forward to today, Im driving to work and had to pull over twice when the fake grass flew up completely covering my back window.

I tried folding it under the tacked down area, I even tried looking for a rock. So I cut it, rolled it up and stored it under my seat storage.

When I told my husband, he said I couod have gotten a bar and then with a deadpan tone after I stated I didnt see a problem with it, ""its your truck, do whatever you want.""  So AITA? I really don't quite understand and my main thought was avoiding a potential ticket.",AmItheAsshole
 for thinking My Mother is problematic for preventing me from stimming at church?,"I am an Autistic girl, with a pretty big family. And most of the time I  stim A LOT, my mom usually tells me that I need to stop. Whether it's me simply rocking back and forth when at Church, or rocking back and forth while in the car. So she pretty much complains about everything that I do.

Me, my sister, and my mom both went to Church for a special holiday. Called ""Caribbean Day"", so we were sitting at church. And since I was getting overstimulated, I ended up rocking back and forth. My mom got mad at me for it, even though I couldn't help it. And she told me that I can have her phone.

I didn't think much of it, so I decided to accept the offer. The problem was, if I kept on rocking back and forth, she was going to take the phone away from me. So I nodded to that, and while I was on her phone I decided to go on Pinterest. (Which I love going on because I like looking at adorable pictures), I ended up looking up some adorable Felix pictures since I am a Stray Kids fan. (And a Pixie), and when I saw some of the pictures, I proceeded to rock back in forth out of happiness, but I was rocking a bit more than usual. Mostly because I was extremely happy, due to my hyperfixating. My Sister kept on laughing at me, and my mom told me to stop and proceeded to take the phone away. I asked her if I could have it back, and she said if I kept on rocking back and forth she was going to keep taking it back. I genuinely didn't see what was wrong with me rocking back and forth, as someone who is Autistic, stimming is very therapeutic for me. And I feel like my mom should be a lot more understanding, and more accommodating. My mom gave me her phone back and I continued scrolling on Pinterest, again I proceeded to rock back and forth, and my mom got mad at me and started taking me outside of the church. Trying to go on a walk with me, which I didn't want because she kept on holding onto me, even though I did not want to be touched at that moment. I ended up crying, and yelling when my mom kept on holding my hand, and I soon hid in a nearby bathroom due to how embarrassed and angry I was because of what happened. And while the church was having a potluck, I ended up going home with my sister. And she kept on bugging me about it, telling me I'm ""wrong"" for making a display like that in church. Me and sister both argued for a good amount of time. And now I  genuinely feel like I might've done something wrong, so I would like to ask for your Judgement.

AITA for thinking my mom was problematic for preventing me from stimming in church?

-Edit 1: My mom says some very ableist things about me, and she even tries to discourage me from watching Autistic creators online because apparently ABA therapy is ""A Good thing"".

- Edit 2: Also my mom kept on gossiping about me, and what happened, to my brother. In FRONT OF ME, and my brother told her that the best thing she should do is pick me up and restrain me whenever I rock back and forth. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not calling my dad’s mom?,"So for my birthday we went to Disneyland and we were having a nice day with my husband and toddlers. Until my dad sent me a very angry text saying that I didn’t answer the phone to his mom and she’s aaaalways asking about us and praying for my kids. 

So a bit of context, I have zero relationship with his mom.. as a kid she never looked to have one with me or my sisters, she was only close to my other fifteen cousins. Now that everyone is old enough with their families, they never call her or visit her—which I feel sorry for her, but that’s the people she chose to love and care for. She was a total a**hole to my dad as a kid, still as an adult, she treats him like crap and he still tries to get a good relationship with her… but I don’t like her and it doesn’t come from my heart to call her or ask about her. 

Anyway, I told my dad I was at the parks and obviously couldn’t reply and she hadn’t even called anyway (two hours later she called, but I was already sleeping). He told me to call her and don’t be rude, I told him I would whenever I found the time. Two days after that, I returned home completely shattered. I wanted to chill, but my dad wanted me to call her and called me ungrateful brat. I called her twice and surprise, no answer. She never ever answers my calls anyway, but she calls my dad every day to complain that I don’t call. WTF. The next morning, I wake up with him saying I don’t do anything for him and thanks for nothing. And my mom texted me saying that he was so pissed at me that he wasn’t going to talk to me ever again, just like I was doing with his mom. So I got angry and told him that I was not going to do something because he was trying to emotionally manipulate me and that if he didn’t want to talk to me, so be it. I wasn’t going to beg for the love of someone who is supposed to love me unconditionally. He didn’t reply, of course.

I told my sisters and they sided with him! Saying that I have to tolerate it because he is my dad, that I am exaggerating, that he’s going to have a heart attack because of my rudeness, that he has done everything for me and I’m being so ungrateful…. Am I being a total asshole?????",AmItheAsshole
 if I forced these RV people to leave?,"Every few months, an RV parks about 30 feet from my house in a pretty quiet neighborhood. I don't know these people. I believe it is an older couple who drive their RV to come visit their family that lives in the area. They stay anywhere from a few days to a month. The issue I have with it, is that they run their engine on idle from around 5:00 p.m. until 9:00 a.m. - all night long - to keep their electricity running. It's a large vehicle, so the engine is not quiet. It's not super loud, but it can be heard from anywhere inside my house. It's a low rumbling sound that disturbs our family's sleep and gives us a headache. It's about the volume level of a ceiling fan on the highest setting, only low and bassy. 

I want to stress that they are not on my property. They are street parked on a public road. They aren't trespassing. The only thing they are doing that's against city policy is parking in the same spot for more than 48 hours. 

I've politely spoken to them about it. They were polite too, but they made it clear they weren't going to stop this behavior. They get too cold if they stop their engine. I could potentially get local police to enforce the city code and get them to move, but then they'll just park in front of someone else's house and bother them. 

Calling the police to enforce a minor rule seems like classic Karen behavior, but they really are disturbing my ability to enjoy my time at home. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not liking a facebook post my S/O made,"I M25 got into an argument with my S/O F23 about seeing one of her posts on Facebook and not liking it.

For context, I almost never go on Instagram, and when I do its for less than 30 seconds and usually because she tells me she posted something. I usually go on Facebook for less than 1 minute a day and usually to check marketplace for random items, maybe scrolling through a few posts. I ended up seeing her post because i was tagged in it. 

I thought the post she made was a nice update post on her life and left it at that. Now, because I saw it and didn't actually click the ""like"" button it means I don't care about her life updates. I told her that I was physically with her through all those moments and I thought she was posting the update post for friends and family that didn't know about these things happening in her life.

She seems to think that because I didn't like the post, it means I hate her posts, and don't want to be associated with her and thinks she is ugly (I don't, she's beautiful). This has happened before on Instagram as well. I didn't think it was a big deal that I didn't click the like button. She now says ""you aren't caring about liking or seeing what I share with the world"" and ""my partner doesn't give a flying fuck about me"". AITA for not liking the post?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom I don't tell her everything because she tells her husband everything?,"I've (16f) always had some problems. I showed early signs of mental illness when I was still in grade school and when I lost my dad it compounded everything. I was diagnosed with MDD and panic disorder. My mental health improved over time and I'm medicated which helps me too. I attend therapy when I need to and I have a psychiatrist who helps with medications and any other treatments that might be needed.

I was always pretty open with my mom and she was always good with not telling people stuff that I wanted time with or wanted to keep between us. Except when she remarried. I was 11 when she remarried and she hid nothing from her husband. This was something I didn't really like and when I talked to mom about it she told me that's just how it was going to be, because keeping stuff from your spouse is the way to ruin your marriage. She told me I never would have minded dad knowing and I told her it was because he was my dad, but Frank (her husband) isn't and I don't want him to know everything about me. Mom told me that's just how it would be. So I would tell my mom stuff still but not everything. Anything I really want to keep between me and just the person I choose to tell I don't tell my mom anymore.

And she knows this. She figured it out a while ago. But then a few months ago I had something else going on, something that was a lot to handle and I was talking to my therapist and working through it with them. My mom figured some stuff out but she told me she wanted me to tell her and I told her I didn't want to tell her. She told me I could tell her and I should trust her enough to tell her anything important going on. I said telling her means telling Frank and I didn't want that. She asked me why it was such a big deal and I told her because Frank isn't as important to me as he is to her and he's not my dad or a stand in for him.

I ended up talking to my grandparents about the thing going on because my therapist suggested I have someone else to talk to. They're the people I trust most now for this kind of thing. And they were stepping up their supportiveness of me and spoiling me a little, which made mom realize I must have told them. This was last week. She confronted me and asked me again why I no longer tell her everything and I told her I don't tell her everything because she tells her husband everything and that's not what I want.

Mom said I was being really unfair. I told her I was respecting her right to tell him everything but that means anything I don't want him to know, she doesn't need to know.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling mom that I might get transferred to another college?,"I (21F) am a pre-engineering college student. Not a lot of people choose this specific branch of engineering because the college i got to requires a higher score than the rest of the ones that offer the same degree. This resulted in an extreme shortage of students this year in comparison to last year after half my old classmates either were kicked out for failing 2 years in a row or dropped out.

This naturally left about 20 people that regularly attend classes and take exams. Yes, 20. The administration told us that the ones that pass this year have a very high chance of being straight up transferred to another college to persue the degree there because they can't open a class for like 17 people on a senior year in engineering cus it's ""expensive"" and ""not worth it for the number of students"".

To say me and my classmates are pissed is an understatement. We might be kicked out of the best college for our degree to a crappier one because their system is so hard they lose 60% of their students yearly. We're doing whatever we can to stay.

On to the problem: I never tell mom about difficulties I have in my studies because she tends to be... overbearingly stressfull. I already have a lot on my plate due to exams being only 2 weeks from now and being miserable due to the nature of my degree. She would get insomnia whenever I'm taking midterms and call me repeatedly throughout the week to ask about how it went and would get super mad if I say anything other than ""perfect I'm getting a 100"".

I told my brother, who lives abroad, about the transferring problem because i wanted to vent to him. He reassured me and told me everything gonna be alright and I thought that was it. Later at night, mom blew up my phone with angry texts and calls, calling me names and demanding I pick up the phone. I called her back after she wouldn't let me study for my test and she immediately started yelling about how I hide things from her, about how I don't trust her and how stressed out she is about the news.

I told her this reaction was the exact reason why I didn't tell her, that I'm already stressed out of my mind and I don't want to talk about this while she's this mad. She yelled some more which prompted me to hang up. I am gonna give her a couple of days to calm down before I call her to explain things but I'm not gonna tolerate more bullshit.

My brother said that I should call her because she's blowing up HIS phone asking him to tell me to do so, that she's just worried about me. I know she cares and I love my mom, but this is just too much rn. AITA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my girlfriend for gas money from our vacation?,"Before we went on vacation we agreed that we would split travel costs. I didn't mention anything right after because I am a person who doesn't like to nag for money. 

A month after vacation it came up into conversation about money and I asked to get paid and she was mad. I also asked for money for an event that I signed her up for because she wanted to go and she couldn't sign herself for it. ",AmItheAsshole
 For Leaving my Band Suddenly?,"Hey y'all, so a day ago I (F23) sent my band a long text in our gc about me leaving the group. Currently it was myself on drums, our singer (M26, and our guitarist (M22).There were 3 points. They were that a) I had been having some mixed feelings about the group and chemistry, the singer and guitarist were getting into fights about logistics and rehearsals often before our last major gig. I'm trans, and some jokea and comments from our singer have rubbed me the wrong way in the past (nothing major like blatant misgendering, to be clear). Additionally, I had been running into other musicians that have been with this group before (they went through 4 or 5 other drummers before me) and they told me I should be wary.
B) I was realizing that my solo project that I had been doing for a few years before which I had put down for this was ultimately more creatively fulfilling, and I was missing dedicating time to it. 
C) As my plate is filling up, (I also do anti-war and lgbt-activism here in Louisiana) I didn't feel like I could push that aside to make time for band and solo work.

The reaction to the text was very negative, insisting I should have made a call. When I called the singer he called me a coward and a liar for being indecisive/and not making my trepidation clear enough before this point. He also accused me and one of the other queer musicians he played with before that I talked to of trying to cancel him. He said the band would probably be done and that I fucked it all. 

He sent me a message later that day telling me to never talk to him again, even though I tried to be clear in my message I didn't have any I'll will towards them of their music. Today at work, the singer, who is on the same job site as me, avoided me and even hid my bowl and chopsticks I usually use for lunch in the break room from me 

I understand that I didn't make my trepidation and ensuing burnout super clear to them before this message and it probably came as shock. I want to recognize that feeling blindsided and hurt by it is valid. However I'd only been with the band for four or so months and we'd only played three gigs. I was not expecting to yelled at over the phone and harassed at work. AITA and getting my just desserts? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not telling my parents Happy Anniversary ,"Yesterday was my (33F) parent’s 35th wedding anniversary. Normally I am pretty good about sending birthday wishes/ holiday wishes in a pretty timely manner. But yesterday was hectic and it slipped my mind. 

Last night I got a call from my mom while my family was having dinner. She was extremely upset and told me she was seriously disappointed in me as well as a few other things before hanging up on me. 

Personally I don’t understand? I would never expect someone besides my significant other to remember my anniversary or congratulate me on it. If they do it would be a sweet gesture for sure but that expectation just seems to be weird to me. 

But I wanted to ask if I’m the asshole and if I am I would like to understand why so I can prevent things like this in the future. ",AmItheAsshole
 for my response to our cat being outside?,"About 3 years ago my partner and I got a cat. He had been an indoor and outdoor cat in the city but the person who had him could no longer keep him and asked us to take him, and my partner said yes. My partner also agreed to be the one to take him to the vet and clean his litter box since I am allergic to cats. (I am allergic to a LOT so I take allergy meds 2x a day already.)

We live in a very rural, woodsy area with lots of predators and I did not want him to continue being an outdoor cat. I work at it to try and keep him inside. We also have a dog and when the dog was being let out, the cat would run under her legs and go out. Lately, the cat has been very good about not sneaking out, but my partner frequently leaves the door wide open while the dog is out so that she can come back in on her own. I don’t like this since the cat runs out while the door is open.

Two days ago, my partner and I had a serious conversation about them leaving the door open so the cat gets out. They seemed to understand and said they would not leave the door open like that anymore.

Last night, they left the door open again while the dog was out and I let my frustration be heard in my voice when I asked them why they couldn't seem to shut the door. They then \*promised\* they would start shutting the door.

This morning, I was getting out of the shower when I heard the cat meowing outside. I went downstairs to let him in and I was angry. I texted my partner, who was at work, and I told them that I would not forgive them if something happened to the cat and that I couldn't understand why it was so difficult to shut the door when the dog goes out and open it again when she comes to the door to be let back in. There was no name calling or anything similarly disrespectful.

My partner came back at me, angry with me for ""assuming"" and said that they let the cat out on purpose because the cat was sitting and staring at the door and that I ""ruined the day"" by being angry at them first thing in the morning. I said the only reason I assumed was because of historical precedence, as recently as \*last night\* and that they're turning things around by expecting me to apologize for being upset about the cat being outside, yet again.

My partner is now home from work and we are in separate rooms of the house, not speaking, because \*I\* should be the one to apologize.

Edited to add that my partner often says they hate the cat and hopes it doesn't come home one day. This cat is no bother to anyone. He's very quiet and not bothersome at all. Due to my partner's feelings on the cat, I feel strongly that the door being left open is intentional.

So, tell me, am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to help my former teacher with their thesis?,"In late 2016, I (26F) took on a project to help out a teacher who was also a PhD student with the references for their thesis.

The pitch was that as they finished their chapters, I would take their notes, search, and document their references in the right style. I took it on at the time because I was desperate for cash, and it worked out – for a while.

Fast-forward to 2018, when I graduated—they hadn't been able to finish their PhD. There was a lot of back-and-forth, and I kept getting pulled in when they would have an adjustment to make, especially at a difficult time in my life. Still, I continued to help out because I thought it was the right thing to do.

Here's the problem: it's still going. It's been EIGHT years! And as far as I know, they're not finished with their thesis. Look at my age vs when I started. I entered adulthood working on this. I've moved out of my parents' house. I could be married with kids before they're done.

Now, mind you, I had only been paid once for what was basically two years of off-and-on work. I got a payment in 2018 for the prior two years and haven't received any money since. And yes, I acknowledge that I should have spoken up about this.

But at this point, I don't care about the money and can forgo the time I've spent as long as I don't have to look at the APA referencing system ever again.

I just don't want to keep doing this. So I've been ignoring their calls and messages, but now I feel bad. I accidentally peeked at one of their messages, and it looked like a guilt trip for not answering their calls.

It's not like this takes up so much of my time that I can't continue, but I'm tired. I'm sure there's been an important development which is why they're messaging me, but I can't bring myself to keep doing this back and forth.

So, am I the asshole for refusing to pick up their calls and continue helping with their thesis?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing family members loans because they didn’t consult me on budgeting?,"Two scenarios: First my (50F)  brother (58M) ran out of money building his new house because he planned way too big of a house for too small of a loan and did not allow for price increases, over-run on time and material costs, and basically stuff going wrong. He and his wife have no kids and more degrees than I can imagine, but he’s never really worked because he was in a band, and he buys tons of crap all the time. Anyway- he’s uncontrollable and stupid about his spending, and even bringing it up with my husband makes my husband go insane. Plus we have two kids to put through college and our own issues.

Second my mom is at the end of her life and keep calling the ambulance to take her to the ER. So much so, insurance has had enough. And fair enough- mom called the squad when she couldn’t breath through her nose and she panicked - even though she could breath through her mouth. Her husband just looked on in astonishment as the ambulance whisked her away. Sadly she has had some incontinence- I know that’s no fun. But she calls the squad to go to the doctor because she doesn’t want to get the car dirty. Now she and her husband (step dad) are asking me for a loan because insurance won’t pay. Meanwhile they have five cars, a motorbike, a sailboat, and plenty of other things they could sell to pay their bills.

Reddit- am I the AHole?

UPDATE: mom did it again. Got diarrhea and called the ambulance. Went to the ER. They sent her home because there is nothing wrong with her. Her husband let her go in the ambulance because she refused to get in the car for him to drive her. I’m hoping Medicare covers everything becuz she is going insane. She refuses to go into a nursing home. But she’s not actually crazy- what can you do?

My brother is squatting in his unfinished house illegally because it’s not approved under building code for living in!",AmItheAsshole
 for calling out my Mother and Sister for their bad relationships?,"( Ages are different for privacy reasons)  
  
I (17 M) And my Mom (37 F) Have many arguments about different things going from LGBTQ matters to small things around the house. T wo things that I should note I am a trans male in the closet because she is highly Homophobic and I have not gotten a chance to talk about it to my straight (18 M) Boyfriend, the other note is that My mother has been in two failed Marriages with the second one's divorce still happening in court. Both guy's were highly toxic and not good to be around although they were nice before marriage.  
  
My sister (15 F) Has a simular relationship problem, In the last two months she has had over 5 different guy's with very toxic behavior's. I been trying to help her with these ""problems"" Since I been in a Two year (Going on three so far) relationship with no problems. Please Know I am not trying to push anything on her but trying to give her tip's and red flags to look out for so she dousnt end up hurt. She does know about my Gender and Sexuality but promised not to say anything until I have a chance.  
  
The other day I was in a argument with my Mother about some unrelated matter's until she called me a ""Pathetic lonely Fag"" (Not in those words but very close to that). Know that I am Biromantic (And Asexual) but since Im in the closet I do not activly show it, I do dress in a tomboy style but that's the closest I been to outwardly showing my Sexuality and Gender.  
Im not to sure what made me snap but I ended up calling out her failed marriages and how she couldnt say anything about my Relationship. At this point my sister walked into the room and I think it might have been because my brain processed her telling my mother about my place in the LGBTQ Community or probably that she was taking my mom's side about relationships so I accidently ended up calling her out too.  
  
Im usually passive and hate getting into arguments (Despite the many I been in with my Mum) And just snapping at them like that felt really unfair. I probably should have just left the room but something about being called pathetic and lonely along with the slur kinda just made me snap.  
  
It's been about a few day's after this and things are still tense, I mainly been stepping out of the house a lot more to avoid anything although I think I should at least try and make things better.  
  
 So Am I the asshole in this situation?",AmItheAsshole
 for airing out my families dirty laundry to everyone ?,"I don’t know how to exactly write this, so please bare with me… 

My partner (M28) and I (F27) have been together 7 years, we have 2 kids together. 

At the start he was somewhat helpful, but as time has gone on, he’s become less present, less interested about being a dad. He’ll sit in the bedroom playing games for hours, scrolling his phone, doing absolutely anything but be a parent. 
When he comes out, he’ll sit on the couch glued to his phone. 

Recently we found out I’m pregnant again. I was so excited, until he turned around and said “don’t expect any help from me”  now I dread having this baby. I can’t raise a 4th child on my own. Wrangle 3 kids on my own. 

So I’m thinking about Termination. But in comes the resentment. I hate that he can’t be enough of a dad to help out more, to play with his kids, get up every now and then so I can sleep in. I hate that I’m expected to do so much while he sits back and does nothing. 

I never wanted this. I wanted to always be able to keep every child I find out about. But I can’t. Because of him. 

We both work full time jobs, while he finishes at 3pm and can come home to a peaceful house and relax until me and the children get home at 5:30pm. But even then, hes hardly out of the room. He’ll say hi to the kids and then off he goes to the bedroom. 

I’m ready to leave. I think this is my tipping point. I feel like a failure, I feel like I can’t have what I want and long for because he can’t step up enough. Because he’s not man enough. He just expects me to do it all and then some and not complain not argue, but still now down to his every want and need. 

Because of everything. I want to blow this up with his family. I want to scream it to the world. The reason we aren’t having this baby is because of him. Because he’s not supportive enough. Because he can’t step up. I know that would end the relationship but I don’t care anymore. I’m tired. I’m run down. I have a fever and still get up at 5:30am, delirious and exhausted, to get up with the children because he won’t. He won’t even let me sleep in for 2 hours while I’m sick and pregnant. He’s a lazy slob. 

So WIBTA for airing out my families dirty laundry to all parties involved?",AmItheAsshole
 for planning a trip with a close friend who is dating my best friend?,"3 years ago, I met my now close friend Paul when he was vacationing in my country. We met because we matched on an app, I had plans to move to his country eventually, so we bonded over that. After two dates, it was clear to me I wasn't feeling any chemistry or attraction, so I asked him if we could stay friends instead. Paul agreed and we've been good friends since.

Fast forward 2.5 years later, I finally moved to Paul's country, and while I was excited I achieved my dream, in the beginning I struggled a lot. At that time, the only person I could hang out with socially was Paul. To be clear, I've made effort to make new friends and now luckily I do, but first few months were very lonely.

A month later after I moved to Paul's country, my best friend was suffering from a breakup and I offered her to fly out to visit me. One night I took her out for drinks and invited my friend to join us as well. They hit it off and started to date. I was genuinely happy, two people I cared a lot about got together. During her stay, all three of us went to a concert together and at some point Paul and I brought up a trip we had been planning to do for a long time now. Paul's hometown is famous for its Christmas market. We had planned to do a 2 day trip early December and we were trying to find the right dates. While this discussion was happening, my best friend Kate was there as well. All she said was 'that sounds so much fun, wish I lived here as well so I could come with you guys'. She never showed she was angry about the trip.

Fast forward a few weeks later, Kate was back home and they were dating long distance(for a month at this point). Paul and I went out for drinks to catch up and look at the train tickets. When I came back home, I got angry messages from Kate, calling me selfish, immature and that I had no sense of boundaries. That I was an asshole for going on a trip with her boyfriend. I tried to explain Paul wasn't just her boyfriend, he was my friend and we've done a trip together once in the past already, and that of course she'd be part of this trip if she lived in the same country as us. She kept being furious at me, saying I was a drama queen for complaining about not having friends in the new country, that I should keep my distance from Paul now that they're dating. She admitted she didn't even want me hanging out with Paul at all and it wasn't just about the trip. She felt any free time Paul spent with his friends took away from time he and Kate had to facetime. I told her she had zero trust in me and Paul, but she kept insisting it wasn't a trust issue. That it wasn't 'right' to do a trip together.

I canceled the trip and barely saw Paul anymore. Kate was still angry for a MONTH and refused to let me stay at her place when I visited my homecountry (for context, I had rented out my apartment when I moved to the new country and we had agreed I'd stay at her spare room whenever I visited).

Eventually we made up, but i still wonder if IATA",AmItheAsshole
 for being ruthless in a game?,"Every Thursday I get together with a group of people and we play board games. We all have a lot of fun usually. This past Thursday, we were playing Firefly the board game.

I was ahead, by a lot. One of the players had a ship nearly completely full of contraband which is taken away if the galactic cruiser lands on you. He pulled a card which allowed me to move the federation cruiser directly onto him (it was move one space and he was adjacent to it)

This set off a chain reaction of VERY unfortunate circumstances that completely crushed him. By the end, I was so far ahead it wasn't even a contest. Another player was also adjacent to the cruiser, but had no contraband. The unfortunate circumstances were in no way related to me, but kicking them off with the alliance cruiser was completely on me.

Basically, I was winning by a good margin and made that margin so wide that no one could possibly catch up. Which, in hindsight may not have exactly been fun from their perspective. How hard should a gamer go in pursuit of victory with friends? And did I cross a line?",AmItheAsshole
 if I asked my wife to stop talking with her ex-boyfriend?,"We've been in a relationship for 23 years and married for 18 years (2 children - 14 and 7). We've had some ups and downs through the years, but the worst was when she had an affair a few years ago. I started walking away when she admitted it, but she begged me not to go. We went through couples therapy for about three years (in which both of us reflected on how our relationship had been before and tried to fix all that).   
Therapy made our relationship stronger, but after a few years (in which I had - and still have - to deal with some serious mental health problems), we started getting apart. I must stress here that I acknowledge the heavy burden she had to withstand because, for a long time, I had no condition of being either a decent partner or a lover.

Since a few years ago, I have been feeling much better, recovered a lot (still struggling a little), and resumed sharing our lives and taking care of the kids again.

A few weeks ago, she got in contact with an ex-boyfriend that she had not talked with for 30 years. They started messaging each other a lot, and I noticed she talked about some very intimate stuff related to our relationship (I oversaw some screens from her Messenger app). I didn't tell her that I had some idea of their talking, but when I confronted her, she said that she had a history before me, that talking to the guy had nothing to do with us, and that the guy knew different aspects of her and she liked talking about that. 

I am thinking about asking her to completely cut off contact with him because that makes me very, very insecure, and I am getting very anxious about that. Would I be an asshole if I asked her that, or asked her to show all of the talks they are having?  


&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to go out?,"I have lived in a different city from a friend for the past 4 years. In all this time, she’s never thought or attempted to visit me, which is fine. She is coming now to visit another one of her friends who has a special event. She would like to stay with me, which is fine by me, but I am working during 2 of the 3 days she is there since this visit wasn’t arranged specifically during my time off. I actually took one day off specifically for her. 

Anyway, I do feel bad that it’s as though the visit isn’t for me and I just happen to be there, but to me it just means you put as much as the other person is into the relationship, so I didn’t plan anything the way I would for people actually coming to visit me.

I mentioned to her I might not want to go out one of the days because I may be tired from work, and this seemed to upset her. She said she didn’t come to not spend time with me, and that she also needed my help navigating to my house. I didn’t really see the problem since she would still have her friend around. I want to be accommodating but also don’t feel like I owe her anything since I feel like an afterthought to her. At the same time, I don’t want a friend to feel alone in a strange city.

Am I the asshole for declining to go out one of the days of her visit that wasn’t even specifically intended for me? Or should I push myself to join her because she’s my friend and I don’t want her to feel upset? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my dad I didn’t want to watch the movie with him.,"My family are currently staying at a hotel that has a small theatre attached, they play kids movies during the day and more adult films during the night.

Mum and dad let me know they where going out to an art show and would be back late and asked me what my plans where, I said I was probably going to watch the movie that was playing. 
That’s when dad asked me if he could come after the show and I explained that it was an adult film and I wouldn’t be comfortable sitting next to him while it played. He seemed to understand why i didn’t want to watch it with him. 

He wanted to sit next to me and if I had suggested we sit apart he would have said no.

After the show he came over to the theatre to sit with me and have a drink, when I said I was uncomfortable watching an adult movie with him he got mad at me and said he only wanted to hang out with me and get a drink. We had hung out all day so it wasn’t like I hadn’t hung out with him.
I even mentioned that he was ok with not watching it with me before and he seemed to not remember.

He stormed off and is super annoyed at me.

Movie was saltburn if you need to know. Also it was over half way done so he wouldn’t have even understood it.

IF YOU HAVE NOT HEARD OF SALTBURN PLEASE GOOGLE IT.
It’s about gay sex and has some pretty graphic stuff in it",AmItheAsshole
 for ignoring my mom over MY party invitations? ,"(I don't want to give too many personal information but I'll give the details that are necessary) 

I am a senior in highschool, my mom is in her early fourties and we've always had an on and off relationship because I love and appreciate my mom to bits but the shit she does makes me want to go no contact with her at all. This has happened a few hours ago. My birthday is in June and my mom made some invitations on my behalve but sent it to me first to grt my opinion. I didn't like it that much but didn't want to be mean. I complimented her on the idea and writing and told her I wanted to change the format (To which she replied I was being ungrateful because she spent a long time working on it, I went on a rant to explain I wasn't and she said it was a ""joke"") 

After a few hours I remade it, added some yellow and red. (Because she originally had the theme as drama and I changed it to musical theatre. The red reminds me of the curtains and the yellow because of the lights) I called her and sent it to her, at first she smiled before she made a face of disgust/disapproval. She only said it was pretty and cute before she went on and listed many things she found wrong. We ended the call and I started to cry. (The things she judged was like: ""Information should have a capital"" , it wasn't the first word by the way, she also mentioned things like: ""The glow is too bright, you can barely see the picture"") 

She then went on and sent me three paragraphs of things I should change. I just told her to use her original one and left my phone. I have 10 messages and 3 missed calls. At first she apologised and said ""Let's make it awesome together"" before she started to say I was in the wrong. My grandma and aunt is taking my side but I still wonder, AITA here?? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not engaging any further? ,"My friend recently texted me about moving in with her after she's been having problems with her husband. We're friends from way back in college and have stayed pretty close into our mid thirties. I am pretty stable where I am and have declined to do so but asked about her if she's ok and offered to meet up or call if she ever wants to talk. She didn't reply to my texts. She lives almost 3 hrs away from me so it's kind of hard for me to drop everything and just drive to her home unannounced. She called me on the weekend I offered to meet, I missed it and called her the day after, she didn't reply and I went straight to voicemail. The weekend is now gone by this point, I've reached out via text and I haven't gotten a call or a text back. I really don't want to be involved any further as this is a marital problem and they need to sort things out internally, and to my knowledge as I also know him from way back, her husband is not abusive so I don't perceive any urgent concerns, just a matter of differing opinions about what they want at this stage in their life. Aita for not offering more? I am not going to reach out any more unless she initiates something. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling a sales associate that I bought from another associate?,"I have been shopping for furniture. An associate approached and made their pitch to assist and sell me on a mattress. I don't quite pull the trigger on the purchase, but they set up pricing and a quote for me to review and think over. This was the day before their ""weekend,"" so I would not have been able to continue the process until they would have returned. During this representative's time off, I find myself having returned to the store and was looking at mattresses again. Another sales associate comes in looking to help. There is a different mattress that is last item in stock, and it was also the second to last last day of a store-wide sale. I end up purchasing with this new sales rep.  

Now, the next day comes along and the original sales rep contacts me about the first mattress and quote they had set up, and they provide some additional information to the questions that came up during the first interaction. I chose to inform them that I ended up purchasing a different item on their day off, apologized for not waiting, and let them know I would like to work with them on future purchases.  

AITA for not waiting and telling the first sales rep that I bought something from their store on their day off?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my husband to back out of zip lining because I have a fear of heights,"I discovered I had a fear of heights when I decided to go zip lining for the first time with my husband and sister. I was sick to my stomach, nauseous, and wanted to back out but I felt like my husband and sister were trying to talk me into it still. I wanted me and my husband to be last so I didn’t hold up the group but then my husband hopped on the zip line and I was alone with the guide, sick and scared. My husband claims I told him he should carry on without me… and honestly I can’t remember because I was having a hard time. But even if I did, I feel disappointed that he left me since I was counting on him for support. It’s one of those things you say to be nice but expect them to do the opposite. 

Anyways, I hopped on the zipline and was sick for 6/12 of the lines. I caught up with my husband and again told him that I wanted him to be last…and yet he still tried to go before me. 

In hindsight, I would’ve preferred to not do the activity and I would’ve backed out if my husband was willing to sit it out with me. But because he didn’t, I tortured myself 😞

EDIT:

From reading your guys comments I just want to say that I value supporting each other in a relationship. Like sometimes you can just tell what someone needs/ wants without having to say it. I’d feel so cold hearted if I left someone behind.. even if they said it was ok. I guess people of Reddit just have different communication / relationship styles. 

I’m realizing that there’s the “right” thing to do which is what majority are saying here (ie: I stay behind and suck it up, let people have fun) but there’s also the “nice” thing to do. I always thought partners should do the nice things for each other. 😵‍💫 if I stayed back for someone I hope they’d be willing to do it for me.. ",AmItheAsshole
 for adopting a kitten?,"On phone, sorry for formatting.

I have been wanting to get a kitten for a few months - and it’s finally kitten time where I live. Yesterday I went online and saw some kittens on the shelter website - there was one in particular that I thought was adorable and would fit my lifestyle perfectly. When I arrived at the shelter, a couple was looking at the kitten I was most interested in so I went to look at the other kittens and older cats. 

After a few minutes I noticed they had moved on from her and so I approached the cage and started to get a feel for the kittens personality. Everything about her was exactly what I had hoped for; but to be polite I asked the couple if they were interested in her since they were still nearby. They said no, they were actually there to look at dogs and had stopped by the cattery to just pet the felines. They were going to ask to see her in a visiting room just to let her out of the cage, but had no intention of adopting her. I thought “perfect!” I asked to see the kitten out of the cage and after a few minutes of one-on-one with her, I knew she was the one. So I went forward with the adoption. The couple followed up with me after I left the visiting room asking if I was interested in adopting her. I said yes, and they both seemed very happy for both of us. They left to see the dogs and I went to the front desk to fill out the adoption paperwork.

This morning I woke up to a post on the local Facebook page for cats/kittens looking for homes from the girlfriend in the couple, basically saying to “not steal” someone’s kitten when they were interested in adopting. I feel bad because I genuinely didn’t want to “steal” someone else’s first choice. If they had said yes they were interested in the kitten, I would’ve moved on and focused on a different cat or just left to wait for another one that would fit in with me. All the replies on the post were full of rude comments calling the adopter (me) an AH for “stealing” the kitten. I haven’t replied, as I don’t think I did anything wrong. But I figured I’d ask here.

AITA for adopting the kitten?

Please no hate for wanting a kitten - my last 3 cats were all seniors from a rescue or shelter and after losing the last one I decided I wanted a young cat/kitten this time.",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad my (F31) fiance (M31) secretly spent our small travel fund?,"UPDATE: First of all, thank you all for the comments and the valuable insights. I tried to respond to everyone's questions and advice but it became impossible, what with hundreds of comments flooding in which is not something I expected so yes, thank you!

I'm not sure this is how you do an update so I hope everyone who was interested in the update will be able to see this!

First, let me address one thing that I now realize I'd left unclear in my OG post: The fiance did not REFUSE to say where he spent the money. I was the one that clammed him up by impulsively saying I didn't care (I was so upset I couldn't even be in the same room, let alone listen to what he had to say and that's on me).

Secondly, a lot of you suggested he may be gambling or cheating - he is doing neither, thank goodness LOL I can vouch for that.

Now, update!! I got up this morning and woke him up saying I wanted to re-address the money thing. He immediately got up and we started to talk. I told him that I wanted my share back as soon as possible, within this week preferably. I didn't care how he would get the money back and I told him he was free to sell the comics if he needed to. Now, onto the COMICS. He didn't lie about the price. He showed me the receipt and yes, it did cost as much as he had told me it cost. I just wanted to clear that up too now that I also have proof.

Anyway, I asked him about where the money went and here is what he said, (and provided texts for me to see): He started off with an apology and said he'd give me the money back. He re-stated the gift thing. He ordered it in back in February and, as per the shop site, didn't expect it before the end of March (it may sound strange to people from normal countries, but I've waited for my packages for up to 2 months sometimes). He expected he'd get his salary right on time to pay for the comic but this didn't happen as his pay ran two days late (which it was, I remember) and the package arrived on time, so he (in his own words) carelessly took the money with the intention of returning it. I asked why he didn't return it, he apologized and said he wanted to but that wasn't enough for me. The rest of the money went to pay a bill from the apartment he rented prior to us moving together. Long story short, THAT SAME BUDDY I MENTIONED had moved into that apartment when my fiance moved out (and he and I moved in) and the buddy stayed for like a month and left without paying that month's utilities. Instead of calling the police, the owner of that previous flat called my fiance. Since he knew his buddy couldn't pay for the damn bill, he ended up paying it so she didn't call the police on the buddy. I saw the text message exchange. When asked why he didn't tell me, he said he knew I'd be very upset but that he felt it was the right thing to do (to pay for the bill) and that he now realizes just how stupid he was. Kept on apologizing and for calling me an ass for being mad.

I told him my trust is very hard to be earned back and that, should we stay together, I will not be interested in mutual savings or anything similar to that. I gave him a two week deadline to give me my money back and he said he'd give it back sooner than that. I told him I will save on my own and that he's free to do what he wants with his money. He asked me if I could reconsider and start a travel fund again (this time, using a proper bank account, etc.) but I refused and will not entertain the idea.

We have decided to stay together but I am super cautious about going forward. I have suggested couple counseling so we can figure out why in the WORLD he does such mindless things without asking me or even trusting me and he has agreed to the idea, so we will see. There's a lot to (re)build but at least now I know what actually transpired. Still mad at him but yes. Thank you!!

EDIT: Wow I...didn't expect this kind of response and I'm not sure how edits work here and if any one of you who have given me advice will see the edit. Thank you, first of all, for helping me go forward. I will have another serious discussion with Jack and see where the rest of the money went because its not like he flatly rejected telling me, its that i was so mad I just told him I didn't care about any of his excuses so...Hopefully I shall resolve this mystery soon. I will update properly tomorrow so if anyone wants to read more about my drama, feel free to check back tomorrow at this time haha 😅

Hello! Long time lurker/commenter in need of judgement.

A few months ago my fiance whom I will call Jack and I decided to start a small travel fund. I told Jack that, when I was in my 20s, I used to save money for trips and that I never used my travel fund for anything else (like being tempted to grab some cash from it when I really needed it). It helped me save plenty without burning a hole in my pocket once I was on the road and he liked the idea. I made it explicitly clear that this was super important to me because we don't have super high earnings and anything we can save for the fund would be lovely since we were planning to travel to Italy this year.

For 3-4 months we both contributed to the fund and we saved up enough to cover accommodation expenses which made me excited.

A few days ago, I was cleaning up and something made me look into our fund. Now, the fund is an envelope (I know, I know) and I opened it just to remind myself how much we saved, only to see the fund was empty. The money was gone.

When Jack came back from the store, I asked him where the money was and he said he spent a half of it on a gift he recently bought me (it was a hardcover comic book I knew was pricey and was very happy and grateful when I received it). Jack wouldn't say where the other half was. I was livid. Not because he spent the money (though that also upsets me) but because he spent it without telling me.

His excuse is he didn't take me seriously when I said this was important to me. Jack said he would put the money back and that he was sorry and that he didn't think it was going to be such a big deal. I told him I didn't trust him anymore and that the fact he used the money I contributed to either buy my own gift or to spend it on god knows what was a severe violation of trust from my pov.

Jack said I was being an asshole about it and we're still just as upset at each other.

Was I really TA? I'm sorry if this text is confusing, I'll answer questions or make edits if something is unclear. :(",AmItheAsshole
 for not visiting with my out of town relatives directly after my Mama's funeral.,"AITA for not visiting with my cousin and her family who drove from Florida to South Carolina for my Mama's funeral. My Mama passed away in my arms 3 weeks ago after a series of strokes. She had been on hospice and in a care home for two months prior to her passing. My older sister had had knee replacement 2 weeks earlier and I've been taking care of both of them. My oldest son helping feed Mama almost daily to help me. 
The day of the funeral I was very upset; doing my best not to cry hysterically while getting my 3 sons and husband ready. (None of them could tie a proper tie and Mama had wanted them all in suits for the service) I cried while trying to get dressed and we got to the church 15 mins before the viewing. We talked and greeted everyone for an hour, then the service, then our church had a meal for everyone. 
During the meal I sat and talked with my cousin, her husband and sons for a long time. 
My husband left early with my boys. They are autistic introverted and have a lot of social anxiety. I also have mental health issues with PTSD, bipolar and depression.
I stayed and helped clean up and pack flowers and pictures in my van with my sister. On the way home, she says to drive to our friend's house that are hosting my cousin so we can continue visiting. This would be the proper southern thing to do. What Mama would do.
But I was barely holding it together at this point. No spoons No forks and my social battery was dead. I said/agreed to whatever Sister said and left her there 
I drove to the house and cried myself to sleep.
Later my husband got everyone pizza and made me get up and eat something. When Sister got home, she started to yell at me, but husband and oldest stopped her.
Now, three weeks later, Sister is at it again. #1 Southern protocol is write a Thank You card for everything and everyone. So she wants me to write one to cousin to profusely apologize for embarrassing Sister and not visiting with them that aftern. I am also horrible for taking so long to get ready that morning bc we were supposed to be at church at 10 not 1045.
All of this embarrassed her and is just not done. 
I understand that she is deeply entrenched in her Southern rules and protocols and  Sister has all these rules in her head of how to do things (forks and spoons can't be next to each other in dishwasher) Most days, she doesn't tell me things, she thinks she does in her head, but never actually says them to me. And then I'm the bad person for not knowing. (Follow the white line. STOP! why didn't you stop at the door? ... I didn't stop bc she said follow white line not follow white line and stop at door) not a mind reader.
I don't know AITA for getting upset and not visiting with my cousin and her family on the day of Mama's funeral?",AmItheAsshole
 for walking away from my father after he (imo) belittled me?,"I(27) told my father in a heated argument about 10ish years ago that I thought I was smarter than him. I regretted saying that (among other things from that dispute) and apologized a few days later at the time.
Fast forward 10 years of me starting to live alone, college, job, etc., I decided to change direction and started a completely different field of study at university and am now living back home temporarily (till I find a new place). 
Now, I’ve been struggling with my studies as this is a completely new field to me and I am essentially starting from zero. I thought I needed some emotional support so this evening I went to the living room where my parents were at and started talking a bit about university life, me feeling like I am not living up to my own expectations, yknow, the usual stuff when one is confronted with existential dread. 
Long story short, In the conversation I dropped the line “Maybe I am just too stupid for this” without thinking much about it and my father, who during the conversation was constantly questioning my decisions, saying the usual stuff like how I could drop future job prospects, not yet be married, etc., jumped on this one and said “what do you mean you are stupid? I thought you were really smart, no?” which prompted me to just say goodnight and go upstairs to my room.
A few minutes later my mother called me on the phone and told me to come downstairs and apologize to my father since he was sulking because of the way I dealt with this and that I should also consider all the good things he has done for me.
Honestly, I am furious with my mother and almost laughably hysteric about this behaviour from my father, who is supposed to be an “adult”. From my POV bro just fired shots at me for a thing from years ago to which I already apologized. But this whole situation has me very emotionally loaded for some reason, so idk really. Part of me feels like I should apologize but that also feels like obv gaslight is obv gaslight? I refused my mother on the phone saying that I don’t think that I am in the wrong.
AITAH?

Edit: I prob shouldve clarified that my parents offered for me to stay at their place till I found a new one since the uni is somewhat close to their house. Its not like I wasn't looking for places even before they offered. And as I stated above I already finished a degree, went to work for a year and now decided to do something else. I am not exactly leeching off them imo.

Edit2: I know this comes off as petty, but to clarify, the way he phrased it and the way he pronounced it was a direct and intentional reference to this argument we had years ago. And its also not the first time he has resorted to this reference either.",AmItheAsshole
 for not hearing my wife calling for me?,"This morning my wife said she was going to take our kid to the playground after Family Quiet Time (1-2 hours after lunch where we all sit on our butts while kiddo naps/doesn't nap) so I could cook us dinner in peace. This is not an uncommon occurrence now that it's spring.

95% of the time, I spend Quiet Time in my basement office with noise-cancelling earbuds in. She knows that I hear practically nothing except what I'm playing/watching with these earbuds. She knows this is by design. She knows I will typically miss text messages during this time unless I am specifically waiting for them; she is not a fan of this fact, as she almost always texts me if she needs something. I've told her multiple times that I will never ignore her, and that if I haven't responded to a text, my door is always open.. I'm not clinging to my phone waiting for her to message me in our own home where I'm just a short staircase away. 

Today, however, was one of those days I *was* waiting for a text around the end of Quiet Time to say 'kid is awake' or whatever. (This is the job of the parent with the monitor or the kid: notify the other parent the kid is awake so it can be all hands on deck.) Like I was checking my phone every few minutes, and every time I heard something that remotely resembled our kid running or talking I took an earbud out for a moment to see if I was needed, ready to come up at a moment's notice. But no messages came and I heard nothing suspicious.

Then 3 minutes before I was about to come upstairs to start dinner / help get kiddo ready since I assumed the playground trip would be happening soon, my wife bursts into my office and is like ""what are you doing! I've been calling and shouting for you! We're leaving for the playground now and I wanted your help getting him ready! But now it's too late!"" I'm like.. baffled, firstly, because we typically don't holler for/at each other in this household. I explained I'd been waiting for her to text, was just about to come up, and heard literally nothing through *my noise-cancelling-by-design* earbuds. I also reminded her, as she reminds me when I think she's heard me but hasn't, that **if I didn't respond to her, I didn't hear her.** 

(This one-sided communication piece has come up many times. Essentially she puts the onus on me to be a good communicator: if she didn't hear me, it's my fault for not being clear or repeating myself; if I didn't hear her, it's my fault for not listening. Yes we have a marriage counsellor. No she doesn't use any of the techniques we learn in our sessions. Yes I'm aware this is a bad sign.)

Anyway she keeps berating me for being a bad communicator etc.  as we go upstairs. I take a deep breath, trying to figure out what she's really feeling, and decide to apologize for being unavailable and frustrating her. No dice; she leaves with kiddo and I make dinner. She gets back and voila, it's like nothing ever happened. The end.

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
H for snitching on my sister?,"I (19, F) have a younger sister (17, F). She and I have had on and off problems recently, especially around me feeling pressured to prove my love to her by making self sacrifices.

After I moved to college, my sister lost a very important friend of hers. She became very depressed and my bf (18, M) and I have done what we can to make her feel better. But, as a coping mechanism she started to do some questionable things and hang around bad people.

For context, our parents are divorced and my sister and I made a pact to never tell our father anything that could get us in trouble. Well, after multiple of her friends reached out to me expressing their concern for her running with people known to steal from stores and do drugs, and speaking with my bf about ways to go about this, I told both of my parents.

My dad ended up calling my sister after I told him everything and told her that I said she was hanging out with “bank robbers” which IS NOT what I said. My sister cussed me out and told me that both my bf and I are untrustworthy and judgmental.

Honestly I feel like I did what I thought was in her best interest. But it’s been months now and she will not speak with me and even convinced my mom to not let me come back home without giving a warning days in advance. AITAH for snitching instead of going to her first?",AmItheAsshole
 for not pitching in to fix a wall at my apartment? ,"I live in an apartment which I share with 3 roomates. I live in the master bedroom which is pretty big,l. As soon as I moved in I installed my TV in my room since i spend alotoftimethere, the installation, provided by my landlord cost me 30 bucks.  

One day one of our roomies, well call her dani, mentioned that her mom amd dad came  over and that the silence in the living room was super awkward  and that our landlord offered her a TV they had lying around. It had no cost, we just had to assume the instalation cost. When it was installed  they charged 45, when I asked why it was more expensive when he charged me 30 last time, he said that they had to take the TV down from where it was before and it damaged the wall so they charged 15 more for the repair. If we split the cost by 4 we only had to pay 11.25 a piece, not bad.

I paid the guy and told my roommates to pay me whenever they could. Only dani paid, so I lost 33.75,  which I let go of, wasn't gonna make a big deal out of that. 

Now, a few months later, the landlord asked for the TV back, we agreed  since no one was really, using it. When they un installed it, of course there were holes in the wall and also the pvc cable covers peeled the paint so it damaged a bigger part. 

Now they are charging 80 for the repair and they want me to pitch in 20. I disagree completely... I never needed the TV because I have my own, plus I'm already out 33 bucks from the installation.

In my opinion the landlord should be paying for it because he requested it to be taken down. We assumed the $15 surcharge for repairing the installation from the previous home so I feel he should do the same. 

He says he will give 30, and we pay 50. 

Our other roomie, nelly, says she will only pay 10, shes never home cause shes with her boyfriend and doesnt have a job,  so she doesn't believe she has to pay. 

Im telling dani to figure it out, because i wont pay anything else.  I was out of a job three months and am broke as can be. I finally have a job and am paying off a bunch of debt, student debt plus money I borrowed for rent last month.

She paid 20 but says she can't afford more. I'm not budging though. 

Dani is a college student with parents that have money, ive seen her tell her parents she wants a purse, and they pay 150 dollars for it no problem. She always talks about how her pants cost 300 dollars and how she pays 20 bucks to have them dry cleaned.  I think she can afford 40 bucks. 

Am i being an AH?







",AmItheAsshole
 for not lining up my freelance work with my roommate's work hours?,"Just over two months ago, i started my own e-commerce business. My father passed away, so i'm selling his inventory, and there's enough to justify an LLC. It's no huge operation, and since it's not really booming, every day or 2 i go to where my inventory is located, package, ship, and upload new inventory/handle book keeping. Hardly takes 3 hours. I work my regular job as well, which ends at 3:30pm each day, so to keep my routine consistent i do this at 4pm, regardless of whether i worked my main job that day.

My roommate(27f) has been getting upset that i'm not at home when she's on her way home. I've tried to talk to her about why it upsets her, and she got defensive/didn't give an actual answer, so i dropped it. Yesterday, she picked me up from work, and before she got there i told her that i was gonna change at home then walk over to work on the LLC since it's only a 5 minute walk from home. she suddenly insisted on stopping to pick up dinner, and it ended up taking so long that i missed post office hours. i told her no worries, i'd go do it today. 

Today, i started shipping at 4 as usual, and she called and asked if i was at home. When i told her that i was shipping, she snapped at me (""goddammit, seriously dude?!""). I reminded her that i gave her a heads up, and she got angry because she ""thought i'd do it earlier in the day."" When i tried to bring up that i do it at 4 to keep a routine, she cut me off and hung up on me.

She's also been a bit hostile with me over small things over the last few months, which i, admittedly, haven't voiced my upset about. Things like her cutting me off/getting defensive when i try to talk about various things, her going on about her day at work for an hour or so and then not letting me speak about my own for even 5 minutes afterwards without getting irritated with me for yapping, not knowing she wanted me to do things she never communicated, not noticing when we run out of things only she uses, constant criticism over small things etc. She's been my best friend for 12 years, and it's like a switch got flipped and suddenly she gets angry with me over every little thing.

It's upsetting, because i feel unsupported by my best friend. All of the other little things aside, all of the money my business makes that isn't going back into it or my father's headstone costs is going towards paying our bills. It's not like i'm hoarding/hiding money from her, because i'm using it on our shared expenses to take some of the burden off of her because i have the means to do so right now. I'd also like to add on that, while she is my best friend and roommate, she and i are not in a relationship. She has somebody she's seeing, so it's not a jealous lover situation because we aren't dating in the first place. 

I feel like i'm missing some bit of unspoken information that should be obvious but isn't. I don't want her to be upset with me. She's my best friend, i want to make her happy, but i don't know what i'm doing wrong. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for yelling at my BFF and kicking her out after she nearly killed my dog?,"I let my best friend Amy stay at my place for a few weeks while her place was getting renovated ( it’s a rental and she didn’t have much of a choice in timing).
I also have a french bulldog that will eat anything and everything, as much as I love him, he’s not the brightest. Which is why there are a few rules to follow when staying at my place, which I also informed Amy about. Other than not leaving anything on the sofa or in his reach, the most important is to not leave anything on the table and to move the chairs away from the table when we’re not home.
Cut to a few days after her arrival, I get home and my dog looked a bit unwell, I asked Amy if she saw anything and she said he was fine when she got home. I took him out for a walk and as I was picking up his poop I saw a candy wrap in his poop. Came home and asked Amy if she left anything on the table or in his reach and she said no, that maybe he ate something off the street from the previous walk. I explained that it’s very important for me to know if he ate anything so I can take him to the vet, she adamantly said no and told me it’s my fault for not paying attention to what my dog picks up from the street.
Needless to say my dog started feeling sicker and I had to take him to the vet, where they discovered that he had around 8 or 9 candy wraps in his stomach. I came back home and confronted Amy and she finally admitted that she left a bag of candy on the table but that she pulled the chairs away so she thought he couldn’t reach them but indeed when she came back home the bag was on the floor and the candy was gone. I told her that she could have killed my dog since she didn’t come clean in the first place and I wasted precious hours instead of taking him immediately to the vet.
She apologised and said she was afraid I would get angry since she knows how adamant I am with these rules. I started yelling at her and told her to leave, that I didn’t care if she doesn’t have where to go, she needs to figure it out. She is now staying with some friends that live outside of the city but she has to commute 1.5 hours to get to work.
So AITA for not talking it out with her and letting her continue to stay at my place?
Edit 1. I have these rules in place because they work, when I leave him alone at home with the precautions in place he doesn’t destroy the house in search for crap to eat. He has been trained to the best of his abilities, the best I can do is also provide a safe environment for what his limitations are.
Edit 2. It wasn’t a coffee table but a dinning table which for a dog of his stature, he can only climb on top if the chairs are close to the table, which is why I didn’t believe Amy really moved the chairs since there is no other way for him to climb on the table otherwise.
Edit 3. I tried the crate method but he is a very sensitive dog and he got very depressed when I would try to crate train, even with me in the house he would sigh and be low energy the rest of the day. I would rather have some rules in place than have a sad little doggo.",AmItheAsshole
 if I don’t go see a “Friend’s” ailing family member?,"So, there is a person I’ve known for a really long time (since school, about 16-17 years) I never really liked her because of all the negative things she would say and the way she would behave towards everyone but somehow she made her way into our friend group and it’s like we’re obligated to invite her to everything or else she cause unnecessary drama that none of us want. She makes so many out of line comments that I can never forget, when I stepped on her foot once accidentally she said “what the hell, do you know how much you weigh”. There’s a lot more she’s done and said till date. I’ve been just ignoring and just going a long with it but just very recently she said some nasty things to our friend which was not only out of line but she showed her very narrow minded outlook on life, since that day there’s some switch that went off in my head and I just cannot get myself to even exchange a hi or hello over text let alone meet her.
Recently one of her family member has been sick and getting treatment, everyone is paying a visit to see how they are doing. I respectfully decided to not go however, I am always willing to help in any ways shape or form from afar. 
Note: even the family member has said, done things that have been pretty negative and even at one point my mom told me to cut off ties this was back in school but because I was young and that was first time in my life where I had a stable friendship group going that we were a part of, I thought she’s just one person I can handle it but anyways, it’s been way to long to have people like that in my life. I am 33 now and I just cannot get myself to be okay with people that disrespect me. 
AITA? 
",AmItheAsshole
? my bf (M21) told me it made him uncomfortable when I (F20) surprised him for his bday. ,"my partner and i have been together for about 7 months. I wanted to get him a small
gift for his birthday since I know he dislikes big events or parties and things like that surrounding him. so the other day i went out and bought a small gift for him, and figured i’d drop it off to his house after my class ended. 

my class ended, i called him and asked if i could drop something at his house quickly. i could kind of tell he was hesitant over the phone, but i didn’t overthink it. i went anyways, and immediately when he opened the door i knew he didn’t want me there. i gave him the gift, and we chatted a little forcefully about our days, and after i realized just how awkward this interaction was, i promptly excused myself and went home.

 when i got home, i received a text from him explaining that he was uncomfortable because i had “flat out” told him i was coming to his house and had not asked permission before. at this point, i was not surprised that he felt this way considering how uncomfortable he seemed when i had seen him.

 feeling guilty, i immediately apologized. but when i told my roommates about what happened, they told me that this is not a “normal reaction” to what i did, i didn’t do anything wrong, and that i shouldn’t have apologized. I really don’t know what to think at this point. I’m getting a lot of conflicting advice on this. Is this boundary realistic or do I need to push back? Any advice on how I should approach this boundary? After apologizing and then being told to push back it definitely left me confused with how i should approach or even feel about this situation. 

tl;dr - my bf felt i violated his boundary when i popped by his house spontaneously to give him a birthday present. i received conflicting advice after the fact, which led me to question whether or not this boundary is realistic for our relationship.
",AmItheAsshole
 for not helping my sister with car rides because she changed her mind about letting us move in with her? ,"For context, my twin brother 24(M) got arrested sometime in January and went to a mental health rehab for two weeks because a exposure incident in public when he got out of rehab in February all my siblings got together and came up with the plan to help each other and most of all focus on my brother and getting more help like therapy medication and more rehab if needed we also planned to move in with my older sister (26)F when our lease is up next month because I’ve been struggling to pay $2000 worth of rent for the last three months because I have car payments and other bills to take care of. Also my brother hasn’t been able to find work since he got out of rehab he’s had about 10 jobs and interviews last week my sister got her hands on the police report of the arrest and now she’s scared of letting my brother live with them because she has a three year old, which is understandable, but it led me to sell my jeep patriot which I was letting her use for the meantime to cover my rent and now she’s upset because I won’t help her with Car stuff on my behalf, she told me I could sell the car at the end of April, which were pretty much almost there and it’s just been me for the last three months trying to take care of my brother and pay all these bills, the way I see it if she’s just going to cut us off to worry about herself then I have to do the same same even though I would much prefer all of us to work it out together. 
The reason I feel bad is because she’s claiming she’s going to lose her job because I won’t help her with car stuff like taking her daughter to day care. 
Also don’t be quick to judge my brother we had a tough upbringing we experienced with psychedelics when we were 18/20yrs old &amp; I firmly belief that took a toll on his mental health early on with other substances abuse. ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my partner to walk home with me?,"So my partner (f22)  has really gotten into running over the last few months and myself (f22) feeling a bit guilty and envious, have decided to join her. On our last run she was great, pushing me while staying sympathetic and slowing down when I needed her to. 

However, today we were 'doing hills' in the park. We have a lovely 11 year old schnauzer who I suggested we bring along, which she reluctantly agreed to. He mostly slows us down out of his need to pee on everything and his love of sniffing other doggies bums, but it's a small price to pay for us all to have a nice time! Anyway we did our interval training, the last part of which I opted out of as I was tired and could see our dog starting to struggle, so we did a leisurely lap around the field while she ran up and down a hill several times.

On the way home, when we weren't too far away, I asked if we could do a run/walk combo, which she was not happy with and began to run ahead. I complained that I couldn't keep up because our dog kept stopping to sniff and asking if she could hold his lead so we could all keep pace together. She then stopped and berated me in the street that this was important to her and she hadn't wanted to bring our dog along anyway. People passing were giving me sympathetic looks and it was rather embarrassing. I was upset by this because our dog had obviously had such a great time with us, and she hadn't communicated that we would need to run home after the hills prior to us starting. Or mentioned that he was tired from his earlier walk when I suggested bringing him on our run.

She ended up running home without me while I walked to accomodate our obviously exhausted little dog. 

Am I the asshole for thinking she should have stuck with us and taken up a no man left behind mentality? ",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my aunt a 'thing' while making a joke?,"My aunt (51F) and I (30F) have always shared a jokey relationship. During a recent wedding planning meeting with family, as everybody was leaving, my future sister-in-law asks how everyone was related. I go on to say, ""this is my mom's mom, this is my dad's mom, etc."". I then jokingly reference over to my aunt and say, ""and then we have this thing"". It was said playfully, I immediately follow it up with ""I'm just kidding"" and everyone laughed and we moved on as normal. 

However, 2 days later, my mom informed me that my aunt was deeply pissed off by my comment and demanded an apology. My mom says that my aunt is being ridiculous and that she doesn't even remember what the joke was but just told me to text my aunt and apologize. I immediately texted her, apologizing for any offense caused and explaining it was meant as harmless teasing. I told her that I loved her and that I was super sorry. She never responded. 

7 more days go by, and she still doesn’t respond. My mom is over and helping me with wedding decor. My aunt (her sister) calls her for their usual daily gossip session. Since I haven't heard from my aunt and I very much don't want her to be mad at me, I take the phone to talk to her. She immediately starts screaming at me, refusing my apology, berating me not to talk to her anymore, saying how disrespectful and rude I am, and then hangs up. I'm in tears trying to call her back and she just ignores me but then proceeds to text my mom how messed up it was of me to call her a ""thing"" and that she won't get over this. 

My mom and I are just in disbelief at how big of a deal this is being made into. I understand that I could be an asshole for making a joke about her but we have said things &amp; made jokes FAR FAR worse than this and just don't understand what is going on.",AmItheAsshole
 if I move into the apartment complex my bf and his ex used to live at? ,"Me (F27) and my boyfriend (M25) have been dating for roughly 5 months. I have been eyeing a specific apartment complex for the last 3 years that I want to move to. The waitlist to this complex is hefty and the timing has never been right. Like I move somewhere because nothing there is available and then it becomes available but I am no longer available. 

I moved back in with my mom about a year ago and now I am ready to find a new apartment.

My boyfriend has only had one other serious relationship other than me. They have been broken up for about 2 1/2 years. They are both completely moved on as far as I know. She has a baby and lives with her, boyfriend / child’s father.

My boyfriend and his ex did live together for six months , and unfortunately, it was in the apartment that I have been after for the last three years. There was no cheating, just a lot of fighting at the end of the relationship that ultimately ended it. He stayed in the apartment for the remainder of the lease and she actually moved to another unit within the complex.

Earlier this year, I got back onto the waitlist and I just recently moved to the top. My boyfriend seriously does not want me to live there. He says it brings up a lot of bad memories. 

Am I an asshole if I move here? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to split rent with my roommate according to room size?,"Me and my current (between 20-21F) roommate and I(21F) have been living together for almost a year. I am graduating this year and I am considering getting a master's while continuing to live in our college state (Boston) after I graduate. My roommate however is a junior and won't be graduating until the following year. My roommate recently asked what my plans were post-grad and told me that she wanted to

 1. sublet her room to her friend over the summer and 

2. Renew the lease with the same friend post-grad. 



This means that I would have to live with a new stranger over the summer which I don't really want to do. I told her I would let her know how I felt about it. 



Once I told her my post-grad plans she said that she assumed I would be moving out because I was graduating this year. Today she texted me saying that If I stayed on the lease another year she wanted to talk about splitting the rent in an equal way since I had the 'bigger' room. The room I stay in is a 9.5 x 9.5 = 90 sqft room and hers is 10. x 8.5 = 85 sqft. Our rooms are already very small and our rooms only differ in size by 5 sqft! 





Additional relevant information:





1. Our rent is currently $2900 and we split it evenly at $1450. With a more equitable split (if my calculations are right) I would pay $1494.29 and she would pay $1405.71. This would be approximately $50 more. 



2. We signed the lease for this apartment last summer without seeing it in person first. I did not want to do this and we agreed that since she wanted us to sign sight unseen I'd get whatever room is bigger.



3. We live in a two-story apartment and we agreed that since her closet was smaller she would get to occupy the majority of the closet downstairs. 



4. Due to my busy schedule, I am often not at home, and she utilizes the common area most of the time. When I attend conferences or stay at my boyfriend's place for multiple nights, she essentially has the apartment to herself.



AITA for refusing to pay more in rent? 



TL;DR: My roommate wants me to pay $50 more in rent because of a 5-square-foot difference after a year of us already living together. AITA for saying no? ",AmItheAsshole
 for calling the cops to see if they had my boyfriend?,"First off, we are long distance and have been for 2.5 years; 9.5 hours apart.  We have an agreement that since he's had run ins with the cops before, he will always let me know when he gets back to his house at night and is safe (safe, as in, NOT IN JAIL!).  Anyway, last night he called and said he was going to QUICKLY ride dirt bikes with a friend.  This friend is a terrible influence, commonly offering lots of alcohol to my boyfriend, who has a hard time saying no.  

Anyway, he ALWAYS calls me when he leaves his friend's house.  Last night I got tired of waiting, so I went to bed.  I woke up at 1:30am and was shocked that I had not received a text or missed call from him.  He has to get up early everyday for work (like 4am!) so he should have been home.

I began to worry, to the point where I could not fall back asleep.  I tried calling him and did not get a response.  I started to worry that maybe my boyfriend got pulled over on the way home for drunk driving.  Before anyone comments, PLEASE READ THIS NEXT PART!  

This has happened before! It was probably a year or more ago, I could not get ahold of him and something kept saying, 'call the cops' - so I did, to learn that he had been picked up for a DUI.  So now whenever he doesn't communicate with me and I know he's been at his friends, I begin to worry that it's happening all over again.  Most people would learn from a DUI, but since the charge was reduced to ""reckless driving"", my boyfriend did not learn...

Anyway, last night I called the cops and they said they did not have him.  I started to worry that maybe he was in a dirt bike accident.  It was awful and I was honestly just worried! 

Finally this morning at 6am, he answered (he had to go into work later today instead of his usual time).  I asked why he didn't call me on his way home.  He claimed he ""forgot"", which has never happened before.  I asked what time he left his friends and he immediately got defensive: ""I don't know! Why does it matter?!  You knew I was home!""  I went on to tell him that I called the cops because I was so worried and he FLIPPED OUT.  ""You are going to quit calling the cops on me!"" is what he kept repeating over and over.  He would not let me get a word in, just kept repeating the same thing.  I said, ""Okay, then YOU are going to let me know when you leave your friend's house at night.""  Well, that did not go over well.  He said, ""I had enough alcohol to show up on a breathalyzer!  Don't call the cops anymore!""  

So he admitted to drinking too much and proceeding to operate a vehicle on a road where he is not the only driver and not calling me because he knows I can tell when he's drunk...

He's threatening to leave ME over the situation.  AITA for calling the cops to see if they had picked him up?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my husband to speak up to his family ,"AITA I’m just trying to figure out the first time posting on here, but basically I don’t understand how my husband can be OK with how his guy treats him for sister treat him with backstory is basically a year and a half ago my mother-in-law yelled at me for not opening gifts at our daughters first birthday party And basically we talked about it. My husband wanted to confirm her about it and basically told her that she can’t be treating me that way so she went on a ramp and crazy. She cut us both out severely every possible word you could think of her son and and she called our daughter, but with the r word (re*%#^*@). So basically we stopped talking to her and we kind of just kept in contact with the rest of the family. My father-in-law kept seeing our daughter and us my sister-in-law and my brother-in-law every once in a while, but basically every time we hung out my brother-in-law‘s wife didn’t wanna hang out with us, and I couldn’t understand if it was because you couldn’t or if it was because of me so turns out my daughters second birthday comes up and my mother-in-law kept on doing suffering this year and she kept on pushing she kept on doing stuff to us or to my husband directly, but basically we decided where my husband actually decided that we weren’t going to invite my father-in-law and my mother-in-law to the birthday party. 

My father-in-law has stopped talking to us since Christmas, so we decided that he would not be invited so my brother-in-law called my husband and let him know that he wasn’t going to go to our daughters birthday party because he didn’t agree with what we were doing and the fact that we weren’t talking to his parents. So he ended up not going to the birthday party and won’t talk to me or even send birthday messages to our daughter. Anyways fast forward three weeks and now my husband reached out to my in-laws letting them know we were going on vacations and now that he’s reached out I feel that all of a sudden my brother-in-law, text him to invite us out for dinner. 

so my question is am I overreacting over the fact that they will not talk to us until we talk to my father and my mother-in-law and now that we do now all of a sudden they want to hang out and everything’s OK. Am I the asshole for wanting my husband to stick up for us and to say something. Now my other question is am i the asshole because I’m mad at   the fact that my husband hasn’t been outspoken to his brother about how this hurt us or how this is hurting my husband or my daughter. Am I the asshole because of the fact that my husband just wants to let things go and make peace with and that’s it. I just I can’t. I feel like we need to at least have a discussion over how we were treated during this time.",AmItheAsshole
 for sending a friend an invoice after leaving my house?,"About two weeks ago, my (19f) friend “Nellie” (18f) came over for a week while her parents were on a trip. I would pick her up from the hotel her parents were at for their vacation, and she would hang out with me for the week. 

When I picked her up, we went to InNOut because she didn’t have it in her state and wanted to try it, and asked me to pay. I agreed, and she ordered an insane amount of food, ate only half of it, then bitched about how a mid ass burger could be expensive (I know the burgers are mid and expensive, but I love it). We went grocery shopping for the week because I needed to anyway, and she made me buy her about $80 of food that SHE wanted to eat while I would be at work (she knew I couldn’t take time off but had invited herself into my home anyway). 

She made fun of my car because it was old and only about 4k and wasn’t as good as her 15k car that’s only a few years old. She also bodyshamed me repeatedly any time I tried on different clothes, and ate most of the food I had bought while I was at work. She made me cook, and took over half of the entire meal and would throw half her plate away, stating she “doesn’t do leftovers”. 

She also demanded I take her to various other fast food when I wanted to cook, and ordered an insane amount of food, throwing half of it away. Any time I tried to bring something up, she would side eye me and guilt trip me. She also never paid for gas this entire trip, even when I had to drive about 250 miles round trip for us to see another friend. 

And to make things worse, she took and sent nudes in my house while I was at work and bragged about how good they looked and how I should learn to take better pics of myself. 

She criticized the way I drive, along with critiquing how I refused to drive dangerously in traffic and refused to speed because my car can’t handle anything over 80mph. 

When I finally took her back to parents after 9 days (she was o my supposed to stay 5) I sent her a text telling her I felt extremely disrespected from how she treated me and asked to be paid back at least a little bit because I spent about $400 on this week alone. 

AITA for sending her an invoice because she drained my savings and disrespected me?


Edit for some more details: we’ve known each other for about three years, and she knows that historically I have an issue with speaking up in public because I don’t want the other person to look like an asshole, and I don’t like looking like an asshole. And to people asking why I didn’t just say no, every time I have ever said no to her, she’s guilt-tripped me into relenting and made me feel like a piece of shit for saying no to her. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not moving my mom across the state with my truck?,"I (38f) have a small SUV and a rusty 15 yr old chevy silverado with 200k miles. This is the vehicle my husband usually drives to work since his F150 died. My mom decided to move across the state to be closer to my sister and her grandkids (my sister's kids). I recently took on more hours and responsibilities at work, when my sister told me my mom got an offer on her home (after she took it off the market and decided not to move) and then after weeks of searching my mom finally has an accepted home purchase offer. I'm happy she's moving,  but suddenly my sister is offering for both of us to take PTO from work to help her move and for me to drive a large storage pod with my truck. I've told my sister I'm not comfortable hauling anything large for that distance with my old truck but would come out and would haul a small-medium trailer. I also pointed out my work responsibilities changed and I have too many meetings to take off work a day every week (I'm a project manager with a big project launch coming up, my first big project). For reference my sister also has a big truck that is as old as mine but has a newer engine and her family owns 4 total vehicles so if her truck gets damage or wear, she's got others. I do not. I also work two jobs to keep up on bills so I cant afford to lose hours. 
She wants our mom back closer to her children (grandkids) and I don't blame her, but she's really pushed my mom to move. She took charge of the house search and now is taking initiative on the move.  My mom hasn't asked me to help at all, but I recently reached out to my mom and told her I'm willing to help when I can but I'm not comfortable hauling anything large or overloaded and that I'm booked out with work until mid June. I feel like an a-hole after talking to my mom about my limitations,  but I've gotten nearly all information about her moving second hand from my sister who she sees and talks to more than me since my sister has cute grandkids for her and I do not so when my mom makes the drive to the area we live in, she doesn't stop to visit me since she has limited time and wants to spend more with the little kids. 
As an added bonus, one of my sister's older children accidentally broke my hand and it's still not 100% healed so that's another limitation I'm currently dealing with and still in physical therapy. 
So, AITA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for losing it with my friend for cancelling our plans ,"Throwaway as my friends follow me on here. So I (24M) have been extremely depressed lately. I've recently moved out of my parents' house and none of my friends seem to want to spend any time at my apparent as they are always too ""busy"". 

Today my friend (23F) offered to come around and have some drinks and keep me company. I am so relieved as this is the first time in months I will get to spend time with anyone. However, half an hour before she was meant to arrive she sent me a message saying that her mom is in forced custody in a mental health unit and  she would rather stay to keep her brother (19M) company. I responded telling her how selfish this is as she offered and is not considering that I have also been mentally unwell. I also let her know that she really needs to begin thinking about how she treats other people as she did offer and got my hopes up. 

I think everything I've said is valid but my friend has blocked me an a mutual friend (22F) has messaged me saying I am being cruel.

AITA. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I told my friend that her girlfriend is sus?,"I (19F) and Phoebe (20F) met when I joined my college volunteer club. She's my favorite supervisor out of the two. She's the prettiest and kindest person I've met, so I didn't think she could have bad luck when it comes to relationships.

At the start of this year, Phoebe started dating her gf (22F) who used to be a member of our club. They have been lovey-dovey all the time and other club members are all rooting for them.

But, recently, Phoebe has been quite stressed. At first, I thought it was due to our club's upcoming events. Well, apparently Phoebe has been under the impression that her gf has been thinking about someone else romantically. I wasn't sure if my friend is just overthinking or if her gf is sus.

Then, I remember something, locked in my memory of useless information. The incident that I witnessed her gf's suspiciousness was when we threw Phoebe a birthday party. We prepared a scrapbook filled with her photos alone, with us, her shared memories with us, and our wishes to her. It was cute. 

I was sitting next to another girl, who made most of the decorations for the scrapbook, and Phoebe's gf was sitting opposite to me. She was complimenting us, telling us how lovely the present was compared to hers. Then, out of the blue, she placed her hand on my forearm. I was taken aback, I hate my personal space getting invaded, especially if that person is not close to me at all.

I didn't shrug her hand off, nor did I make a scene. I waited for her to take her hand back and I immediately hid it under the table. 

I'm not sure if Phoebe is aware of this incident. But all my friends whom I asked their opinions on this said her gf is definitely sus yet I shouldn't tell Phoebe since there isn't any obvious evidence.

So, WIBTA if I told her my thoughts?",AmItheAsshole
 for Not Wanting My Family to Attend My Senior Graduation?,"Hey everyone, I’m 18 and I'm about to graduate from high school. It's a big deal, I know, but I've been feeling conflicted about something the last few days. I don't want my family to attend my senior graduation ceremony.  
Here's the deal: My family is pretty self entitled. I discussed an ideal list of who I wanted to go to my graduation with an Aunt and she ran off with that and blabbed to my already judgemental grandparents who think they run everything, who then called my Mom and basically yelled at her about it, just to lead to me getting cussed out by my Mom for talking to much on an event that has “nothing to do with me”.  
I know it might sound harsh, but I just don't want to be on display for my family when I’ve already has a stressful year as is. I have had the senior year from hell. I want to be able to enjoy the ceremony and celebrate with my friends without worrying about their basically entitled bullshit (excuse my French).  
From what me and my peers know, all families get 7 tickets for there families so that they can invite who they please. In my head I’m okay with 7 guest, that’s all I wanted if I’m being honest. It’s my family who are throwing hissy fits about hypotheticals and the fact I’ll potentially only get 7 tickets. Therefore leading to my current feelings andmy current dilemma.  
So, am I the asshole for not wanting my family to attend my senior graduation? I just want to make sure I'm not being unreasonable here, especially when they’re trying to claim and divide up the tickets before I’ve even gotten them.",AmItheAsshole
 if I refused to help my partner with her luggage?,"Context: my partner(25f) has a very large roller suitcase, it can fit about 30kg of stuff in it and it’s about a metre tall. 

When we go travelling I use a rucksack &amp;small backpack combo which allows me to move about 23/25kg of stuff(one bag on my front one on my back) while leaving my arms free for carrying extra pieces (hostel linen, tote bags etc). It’s relatively comfortable, and importantly it leaves me fairly free to go wherever terrain-wise.

She does not use this approach, instead opting for the bohemoth roller suitcase and a smaller one. This means she cannot move her luggage over anything but the smoothest of ground(no curb, no stairs, doesn’t fit easily in the boot of a taxi, it’s a pain on buses). The suitcase is a large unwieldy shape and heavy too, airport staff put warning stickers on it. On top of that, as it provides such generous storage space it encourages overpacking, meaning us lugging around gear that is rarely if ever taken out of the suitcase at stops. This all means that it is left to me to get our collective luggage to where it needs to be, the latest incident being up six flights of narrow stairs.

I’m considering refusing to help in future trips unless she gets a more mobile and practical piece of luggage, is that likely to work and would it make me TA?

Edit: Combining the context from a few comments here: 

-We both have shared items in both of our luggage. She has a towel and hairdryer and medicine, I have electronics(laptop,speaker, extension lead) toiletries and laundry in mine. No particular reason for this it’s just the way it ended up. When flying I often have a bag of her liquids in my luggage too(makeup etc).

-We have moved country, and the first few months of moving country is travelling around on fairly low budget. This means a lot of moving. From my pov anything longer than two weeks requires the same amount of packing(eg two months or two weeks I bring the same amount of stuff). Hence why I mentioned being able to move our stuff is important to me.

-Most importantly here, I OFFER TO HELP. She does not tell me to or expect me to move her suitcase. I assume it’s me moving it because I don’t want her to injure herself trying, as a unit the most sensible thing for us to do is leave it to me.

-Finally, thank you for all the comments about not surprising her with this ultimatum mid trip. I never intended to, it was always going to be something I said before our next big trip, as was mentioned in the original text.",AmItheAsshole
 for being honest when pushed why I wasn’t going to my DIL art show,"Edit* DIL ( daughter in law) I didn’t raise her. DIL is 29.


My DIL does contemporary art, I don’t know how to explain. It’s more abstract then anything and I suggest a google. I don’t like the art style but that’s my own a opinion on it. Like one piece with just be colors on a canvas and it has a deep meaning. I don’t get it

She submitted some stuff to the local art show and got in. So this Friday it is suppose to happen and the whole family was invited. The tickets to get in are 30 dollars. Personally I would rather spend that money on other thing. Not to mention that I don’t like the art style so it will be a full day of bullshitting what I like about the art. It sounds miserable so I declined saying I had another event.

She gave me a call along me to reconsider, my response was no and I have plans. That’s when she told me I have to go. I reiterate what I said before. 

She started to argue with me not going. I kept saying I have plan and she kept accuse me on not liking her art. After the third time she said that I snapped and told her yes. I don’t like her art and I think it is a waste of money to go. She called me a jerk and hung up. 

",AmItheAsshole
 For denying to pay extra rent,"I (27M) live in a three bedroom apartment and, when my two old roommates left, found two roommates to live with me. Our lease started in August. In November, we decided to adopt a stray cat who had been living outside of our apartment. It was decided that I'd be the primary caretaker of the cat and, after getting him inside, I asked my roommates if we could isolate him in the living room by closing the doors to it and not using the outside exit to it, in case he would try to escape. They agreed. 

Fast forward to this month (April), and I caught wind from a friend that one of my roommates had been complaining that I was monopolizing the living room.  This is understandable, since I had been sleeping on the couch in there many nights to be with the cat. However, at no point since November, when I requested that the first be kept shut, did this particular roommate initiate any conversation about the rooms use/accessibility. Yesterday, I got a bill from him for a large sum of money for ""living room rent"" (1/4 of the rent) and for a larger sum of the utility bill. I agreed with him that I probably should spend more on heat for the months I slept on the couch, since there is a heating element in there that I could take advantage of, and I offered to pay more on heating for the past few months. However, I declined to pay living room rent, because at no point did be verbally or in written fashion agree to such a thing and it seems very unprofessional for him to drop a bill of ~$1000 on me after months of me not knowing we had that arrangement. The lack of communication in the beginning is what is annoying here. At no point did I say or did we agree that they were not allowed to use the living room, just that we keep it separate from the rest of the house. AITA?

Edit: Apologies for asking for advice. Ignore. New to the subreddit.",AmItheAsshole
 for being overly particular with my roomates things?,"particular isnt quite the word im looking for but i couldnt think of a better one sorry, more like germaphobic, anal, perfectionist etc..

my roomate has a tendency to cook and not wipe down the benches/ space afterwards, to not wash and put away his dishes and to keep food longer than is generally advised and much longer than i would, to leave dirty socks on the couche, rubbish on the floor, grease on the remote and wet laundry in the washing machine etc. etc.

all of this is mostly whatever, annoying roomate get over it kind of a thing but i struggle with ocd and a large amount of the things he does makes me extremely uncomfortable and often panicked, 

which i get is a me issue but where the aita part comes in is ive asked him to at least try to lessen the behaviours that impact me badly (past the use by/moldy food and dirty counter/ stove top as it freaks me out severely about getting food poisoning and stuff and leads to me not eating and/or throwing out new food of mine that is probs perfectly fine but im worried is infected) and he hasnt changed a thing, if anything its gotten a bit worse!

i tried to have a firm but kind talk to him about it earlier- which ended up getting sort of heated and him telling me to just get over it and similar; where i yelled back at him about him being disgusting and selfish and ignorant for a solid 5 mins and he stormed out

thats where my dilemma comes in, am i just being whiny and overactive and did i go too far blowing up at him like that?

tldr; i have ocd, my roomate is messy and i went off like a bomb at him for it 

( apologies for bad formatting )",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friend for support,"A few weeks ago, I called my friend because I was having a shit day and wanted to tell her about it bc I knew she’d validate my feelings in what I was yet to tell her. She didn’t answer the call, but texted later “hey cutie sorry I was in class, is everything okay?” 
I replied that I was sorry I forgot she would’ve been in class, I was just having a bad day and was hoping to see her and get one of her hugs, and said I wanted to rant about poopiness bc I knew she’d say “yeah, that poo fricking stinks” which is nice to have the poop validated as stinky. She never responded. 

I’m wondering if I’m the asshole for reaching out asking for a shoulder to lean on? I mean… is that not what friends do? This is not something I abuse. Last time I reached out for support was back in January when I went through a break up, and can’t remember the last time before that. I feel like these are normal things to go to a friend for once in a while? Or am I treating them like therapists? 

This friend also has a tendency to usually only care about herself tbh, but there’s the odd time she cares about other people and she’s great in those moments. Maybe need some more quality friends, though. I’m still thinking about if I’m going to double text her or not. I don’t even know what to say or if it’s worth it. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to do all the work for our Pets?,"First of, i am sorry for anything misspelled, Englisch isn‘t my first language. 

So I 18 f and my sister 16 f got 5 tortoises about Seven years ago. They have a huge enclosure outside and at First we Both loved spending time with them. But around one Year after we got them, my sister left me alone doing all the work, so feeding them, preparing them for hibernation, making sure everything‘s alright when they lay eggs,…

I always asked her to help out a bit aswell, but Even if she agreed to Feed them for example, and i would check on them later, i noticed she never did and i had to do it again. But my parents atleast told her to help out aswell.

Then, one year ago we got a dog and ever since then, she refuses to do anything at all for the tortoises. She also says, that we should sell them, because she does not care for them anymore. I don‘t want to do that. I love them, but i feel Like it is Not fair, that she can just leave me with all the work, because we agreed to do this together. My mom also wants to give them away and now says, that my sister is Right Not to do anything for them anymore.

The funny thing is, that when her friend come over they often hang out with the tortoises. So it‘s Not Even Like she does Not do anything with them. 

So now i feel Like it‘s unfair for her to just leave me with the work, but she says that she grew up and realised, that she does Not want them, so she thinks i am being unfair. 

So i would really Like to hear your opinion on this, because i really don‘t know if i am in the wrong here. So AITA?

Edit: Of course i will ceep on taking care of them on my own, because i don‘t think she‘ll help out.",AmItheAsshole
 for not seeing my best friend on a visit home?,"This happened a few years ago, but I still wonder…

I come from a very small town. Everybody knows everybody and everything. Lee was my best friend for years. She was MOH in my wedding. I stayed at her house whenever I went home to visit. We were super close. 

I had an unfortunate series of events happen within almost a year. My mother passed away from cancer. It was brutal. My cheating husband decided he was done with me. I was now a single mother with two small children. Emotionally, I was a complete wreck. 

Without warning, a beloved aunt (who helped raise me… almost like a bonus mom) died unexpectedly. I was beyond devastated. And kinda at a breaking point. 

I flew home for a short weekend. There was no funeral. But I went home to support my uncle and honor my aunt. I told Lee I was coming home, but wouldn’t be staying at her house. I wouldn’t be seeing her either. It wasn’t a social visit. I stayed with my sister and we just spent time with my uncle. 

Here is where I may (or may not) have been an asshole. I found out an old friend’s band was playing at a bar right down the street from my sister’s house. I went to see him play. I desperately needed an escape from everything. My sister dropped me off. I sat by myself getting shit-faced drunk and watching the band. Then my sister picked me up. End of story. I flew home the next day. 

Speaking with Lee a couple days later… I told her I’d gone to see the band by myself. She was pissed. “Why didn’t you call me??? I would have met you there!” I tried calmly explaining that it wasn’t a social visit. I sat alone and got drunk by choice. I didn’t have words to socialize and make small talk. “I would have sat there quietly!” For the record? We used to be roommates. Lee has never been quiet a day in her life. She talks nonstop. I love her, but I just didn’t have the capacity for nonstop chatter. 

I told her that I was sorry her feelings were hurt. I meant no disrespect to her. It was a spur of the moment thing. I just needed an escape. She was still pissed. She kept harping on about it. I apologized several more times. I felt bad that her feelings were hurt. But this trip wasn’t about her. I was just trying to process losing a second mother so soon after losing my actual mother. I don’t even drink. That should have been a huge red flag to people who know me. I wasn’t handling things well. 

After several more apologies? She still wouldn’t let it go. I calmly told her “I’ve apologized numerous times. I truly am sorry your feelings were hurt. But I am not going to keep apologizing fifty more times. I am done with this conversation. You can call me when you decide to accept my apology and move on.”

I haven’t spoken with her since. Apparently, she never got over it. Some people say I should have just called her to meet me at the bar. Other people understand that I needed to be alone. I hate that I lost my best friend over this. But I kinda feel that I had a right to grieve whatever way worked best for me. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to let my stepmother be part of talking to my therapist or psychiatrist?,"I (17M) have a diagnosed mental illness. Got my diagnosis formally at 12 and that was a shitty year for me. My dad uprooted us 2 months after my formal diagnosis to live with his then-girlfriend (now wife) and I left behind everyone else I knew and loved and during the move some sentimental stuff got destroyed. The stuff was my moms and dad had put it in the wrong pile after I tagged it so it wasn't handled with the care it should have been. I was pretty much destroyed at that point. I already hated that we were moving and then to lose some of the stuff mom loved the most. I was admittedly a mess and the next couple of years. I took forever to find a new therapist. My original psychiatrist here wasn't someone I clicked with either and it took like a year for a new one and almost 3 for me to find a therapist I could talk to.

I admit I'm not that into Emily. I do hold resentment toward her and dad for the move. She also rubs me the wrong way but I also admit I'm not exactly super open to liking her. She's made comments about it being good that we moved so I can learn how to miss people (which is really fucking insensitive but then she seems to remember that I'll forever miss someone). She has spoken like I agreed to the move (why did you move if you weren't going to try and enjoy it) and when I'd tell her I didn't agree she'd say dad made the decision and I should trust him enough to want this and give it my all. She has complained that I didn't let her family members fill the void of my missing family from here and she has seemed kinda sour that I'm closest to my mom's family above everyone. We also clash over me saying she's married to my dad/my dad's wife to people instead of saying my stepmom. I said stepmother once and she told me it sounded so detached and I told her that's how I feel.

It drives my dad crazy and we discussed me moving in with my grandparents back home but dad changed his mind about it twice. He told me I'm his kid and he's not letting me go and he wants to repair our relationship. He asked me to forgive him for making decisions that I felt were for the worst for me. He said he's trying to do right by us both. This is why he typically respects when I don't want to include him in my therapy sessions.

But my dad is anxious that I'm almost 18 and he wanted to have a meeting with my psychiatrist and therapist about me, but he wanted Emily included and I said no, and I expressed this to both my therapist and my psychiatrist so they won't talk with her in the room. Emily was so offended. My dad was hurt that I still wanted to shut her out and that I didn't trust his decision in partner. I told him she is not my parent and she does not get access to that stuff about me. I told him I can't stop him telling her technically. But I will never give my consent for her to talk to them herself.

They told me I need to let her because she's one of my guardians and it's important for them to be on the same page. Dad begged. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not sticking up for my friend and calling her unreasonable before her birthday?,"So I (18F) had a friend Ari (19F). Her and I are from the same major and have most of our classes together. We initially got along well, but she later started to show her true self. She was snobby and obnoxious, bragging about her designer brands. She started ignoring me , but I eventually stopped reaching out. I realized I was the only one who called her or asked her to eat lunch together, and it was not a big deal to me. I didn't mind it as much as I had my closer friends.

Now here comes the main story:

Since the start of the year, we have been working on various projects and assignments together, with me preferring to work with a small group. However, she has consistently made 0% contribution to our projects. She has been absent from college due to her own dog biting her, a vacation to Thailand, or partying with her high school friends. This semester, we had a coding project and i asked her to write a report. I left messages for her before submission. She responded with a message stating that she was getting her nails done and the report was almost ready. The next day, she worked on the report until the minute before our presentation. I didn't say anything because her birthday was coming up, and we ended up doing fine. The same week, we had another project evaluation for a different class, and her contribution was 0%. She was stressed about not being able to book a place for her birthday party, so I did her part of work and told her not to worry.

The presentation was scheduled for her birthday, and she requested for it to be a day before the class. The professor agreed, but the group had to present together. Due to a university cancellation, the professor suggested presenting on friday or next week. However, due to lab exams, the next week was not feasible. The group members agreed to present on Friday, allowing her to celebrate and enjoy her birthday on Thursday.

Then she private messaged me flipping out and saying she doesnt want to come to college on her bday week since she has like 2 friends there and she doesnt like it in college, then she proceeded to ask me if i think shes being unreasonable.

And I said yes, and explained to her she cannot expect these people to get more stuff on their plate during exam week just because she does not want to come.

Them agreeing on not presenting thursday was too nice in the first place and now she wants them to not present on friday as well just because she wants to party and drink.

To this she had a meltdown and wrote me a huge paragraph saying that i can villainise her all i want and call her selfish but postponing the presentation doesn't effect anyone.

I told her that the matter wasn't that serious for me to villainise her and she should calm down and look at this from a neutral standpoint when she is not upset.

She started speaking to me disrespectfully and showing me a lot of attitude so i kind of flipped out and my pent up frustration came pouring. (continuing in comments)",AmItheAsshole
 for moving out the way that I did?,"So I (now F24) grew up in a strict Christian household, with a. Tightly knit family. Wasn’t allowed to do much outside of school and church. And this continued on until after highschool. I was forced to babysit my siblings for free, and since my parents worked during the day, I had to take night and weekend classes in college to get a degree for myself but still be able to help my family. 

I had scholarships and was able to pay for everything without it my parents help, but my dad wanted me to get a job to “help out” with rent and so forth. I agreed as I did feel responsible, being the eldest of four and all. So my parents and three siblings were living in a two bedroom/ one bathroom apartment, and I worked my ass off in all aspects. I did chores, childcare, worked my part-time, and did college full time. I had no social life because I had no time for it. And my parents heavily controlled my whereabouts daily. 

As I progressed through college my grades started declining, because I was looking for more hours to work and had less time to study. So I decided to drop out of community college and just kept working until I got a full time job that paid well. 

By then my mom had quit to be a stay at home mom, and me and my dad were the main bread winners (although my dad never wanted to give me credit for helping so much). Since I had good credit and work history, my parents were planing on having me buy a house for them to live in, and have me live in the basement until I could “maybe” move out. 

So after an argument I had with my parents about wanting to get a different job and try and move out, I decided to pack my things and leave while they went on vacation with the little ones. And when they came back to see that MY stuff that I paid for was gone, they were furious. They sent me long messages of how I was selfish and inconsiderate, how I didn’t care about my younger siblings, and how I ruined the family. It took a lot for me to leave but it was the right decision, and they were only planing to use me for my money and not treat me as an adult. 

That happened last August, and my parent still text me saying how I made a bad decision, and it makes me feel bad because I did help out A LOT. I was paying my dad $550 every two weeks (since my checks were weekly), I was still helping with chores and childcare, and I always was home. I would help pay for family vacations, got everyone Mother’s Day, Father’s Day, Christmas and birthday presents. They also compare me to my sister who had moved out six months before me (also on “bad terms”), and my sister never helped as much as I did. But all the anger from her moving out, plus my wanting to move as well, made it impossible to live with them. Any little difference in opinion would spark a long religious lecture. Any time I spent “too much time” to do an errand they would question me. I got so tired of the control they put on me for no reason, because I wasn’t a bad kid, I always did what they wanted…


",AmItheAsshole
 for saying sorry on behalf of my friend because of what he did?," (Backstory)Princess told me how arnel created a whole new identity and used a poor guy just to be an admin he formed a romantic relationship with peter the gc owner as I hear about what shameful thing my friend did I started to feel bad for peter because he sounds really sweet he was really hurt when found out about what arnel did  he didn't believe it at first but soon broke up with arnel
Anyways so hear it is 
Since I don't think he's just gonna accept my friend request I decided to use princess acc to message peter saying I'm sorry for what arnel did to you and stuff like that later that night my friend message me why I used her acc I admit I didn't ask for her permission I'm absolutely sorry about hat I already apologize then she sends me a screenshot of messages arnel sent saying why would princess tell peter about his bullshit  she's now mad at me because she thinks I told arnel I was freaking confused because I' didn't tell shit I'm not a snitch all I did was apologize for arnels action at the mean time she hasn't responded to my explination so idk if I'm Gon update or not but I probably will not sure so am I the asshole ",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting my partner to pay me back when they say? ,"My partner makes more money than I do, yet I’m constantly loaning them money or paying for something with the promise of them paying me back. 

They never keep track of how much they owe me, so I do. Often sending Venmo requests. 
They almost never pay me back without me asking, and almost never on the day they say they will. 

We’ve talked about it a couple times and y heir argument is “well I did pay you back didn’t i?” 

Sure I almost always get paid back but it’s rarely on time and rarely without at least 1 reminder. 

And the fact that they make more money than I do occasionally comes up in our arguments, which is frustrating to me because sure you make more money but you ALWAYS owe me money? 

I know they’re my partner but isn’t that disrespectful? Am I overanalyzing it? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not texting my boyfriend on my birthday ,"My boyfriend and I have been together for 2 years and have lived together for 1. We have a pretty independent relationship where we do a lot of things on our own because we have very different interests. For example, I like to go out to the bars and drink and he prefers to stay home and smoke. For my birthday (Sunday) we both took off Friday through Monday. Because he doesn't like to go out, I went to the bars by myself Friday night. Saturday morning I woke up at 9 and he was already out and about for the day. He texted me at 10.30 and said he was out shopping and to text him when I decided what I wanted to do for the day. Me being slightly hungover, I woke up and went to the bagel shop across the street and grabbed a sandwich. He came home at noon and was upset that I didn't tell him I was getting breakfast because he hadn't eaten all day. He then started complaining to himself loudly that he was trying to spend the day with me since it was my birthday weekend and he was trying to communicate and I wasn't. I understand that I could have texted him when I woke up, but I didnt want to text him and tell him a plan when there was not one. I had intended to get my car washed and run a few errands before we headed out for the afternoon. We usually don't go out until about 3 or4. Now he's banging cabinets and in a bad mood and I'm going to have to spend my birthday weekend apologizing to him, and I just don't think that's fair. I'm not a birthday diva or something, and I really don't care about my birthday. I usually just want to spend time with friends somewhere we can connect and catch up. But now I feel like this is going to put a damper on the whole celebration.

Tldr: I didn't text my boyfriend and ate breakfast by myself on my birthday. Now he's mad at me and I've ruined my birthday weekend.",AmItheAsshole
 for saying an 2 versus 1 argument was a “lost cause” ,"Me (21), my cousin (20), my aunt (50+), and my sister (29) were all sitting in the car.My aunt and cousin were having a 2 (them) vs 1 (my sister) argument (argument is written below). Sis was visibly frustrated. 

I can relate, my sis sn’t around all the time. Usually it’s just me, my aunt and my cousin and yes, she raised him so of course they agree on a lot of things. It is what it is. It’s just exhausting trying to prove a point to two people that constantly gas each other up, encourage and validate each other.

I’m sure that’s not their intention, that’s how it feels to anyone arguing against the two. 

I’m a huge person on prioritizing mental health and you know, that’s my sister. So I spoke to her SPECIFICALLY and said “forget it, it’s a lost cause”, after she LITERALLY put her head down in frustration. - I’m sitting right next to her, so my intention wasn’t for the whole car to hear.

Immediate uproar. My aunt , in a strong tone says,  “you’re wrong,  You can’t say that, you’re dismissing the conversation”. Cuzzo is agreeing with her, they’re talking at the same time, so it’s loud.

I’m now annoyed because she just said my opinion is wrong (i’ve bitten my tongue for a lot to “keep the peace” and I made a promise that I won’t do that anymore. it’s dehumanizing.)

I said I’m just speaking how I feel.

They say  “ that’s not how you stop a conversation, it’s dismissing us.” I told them I’m like “I’m entitled to my opinion, why are you yelling?”

She says in a very loud, strong tone “I don’t feel like I was yelling, you’re LYING on my name. You’re a LIAR. I won’t stand here and let you LIE on my name”. She made me look up the definition of yelling and surprise I was right.  

So let’s check in, within a couple of minutes you said my opinion is WRONG and im a LIAR. At no point did I name call.

Side note - I did tell her last year (which she brought up) that she acts like she knows everything and she proved that point. I can’t give my opinion without immediately being told “you’re wrong”. 

I feel I shouldn’t have to walk on eggshells to not hurt your feelings, especially when I was not talking to you in the first place. Why do you even care what I think!!

AITA for saying a 2 verses 1 Argument was a lost cause?


The argument :
The conversation was about choices. Specifically related to crack. My sister said “name a situation where someone's only option is crack.”Someone gave the example of a r word victim. My sister argued that it’s a choice as to what to do after the situation happens.

My aunt misconstrues this and says “so you think getting r worded is a choice ??!!” ( the mental gymnastics my aunt plays)

As a victim myself, I was paying attention to the conversation. Sis’s words were “you can control what you do after that and how do you seek help - UNLESS your threatened, that’s completely different.”

",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my partner to confront my ex-best friend? ,"Best Friend Suddenly Ices Me Out, Partner Still Talks to Her

During COVID walks with our dogs, I (29M) became close with Stephanie (40M), who eventually became my best friend. We even moved to neighboring streets! Over the summer, things seemed to change. We barely saw each other, and text conversations became scarce. We mainly communicated through TikTok and Instagram, where she'd send multiple messages/videos daily.

By the holidays, the distance was clear. I reached out more often via text, but responses were minimal. It felt weird considering her constant social media activity. Despite this, I dropped off flowers for Christmas and sent flowers her birthday (February), receiving polite thanks each time.

In March, things got stranger. My ""what's wrong?"" text went unanswered, and my call went to voicemail. Since then, Stephanie's completely stopped communicating with me. Here's the confusing part: my partner (39M) still texts her, maybe even met up in March.

I told him I'm hurt and confused. It's even more concerning because Stephanie has a history of mental health issues and is on medication for depression and anxiety. . While I'm definitely hurt by how things are, I'm also genuinely worried about her well-being. Initially, worried about Stephanie, I discouraged him from stopping contact.

But this week, things escalated. Stephanie blocked me on Instagram. My partner asked her directly about it to which she replied. ""Yup. If he wants to see it he can look at on yours"". I didn't see the conversation for myself- this is what I was told.

We had a long conversation about it. I'd prefer him to stop talking to her altogether, but he feels obligated to watch her dogs in July (when she visits family). He's worried her mental health will further deteriorate if he refuses. I suggested reaching out to her parents for help, but he disagreed.

Honestly, I can't shake the feeling Stephanie is still communicating with him to cause trouble between us.

WIBTA for asking her to cut the BS and confront her about it?  ",AmItheAsshole
 if I was disrespectful to my stepdad because he goes in my room?,"
My mom got married in August, and I haven’t really had too many problems with the guy until now. 

My mom wanted to go to away for spring break but her husband, let’s call him Joe, couldn’t come because of custody complications. He got tickets for her my brothers and I anyway, but when we went to the airport, our flight got cancelled. After picking us up, Joe casually mentioned that while we were at the airport he had gone in my room unplugged some things without giving a clear reason. After plugging everything back in, I went to tell him that I appreciated everything he’d done, but I still thought it was wrong for him to go in my room without telling me. He just told me to shut the f up, which pissed me off, but I dropped it. 

Still on vacation, my mom just let me know that Joe is using my room as temporary storage. This is the third time he’s gone in my room without even texting me, and keep in mind, I just moved into this room two weeks ago. (The first time the power wasn’t working in the garage, so he plugged in his car in my room right next to it.) When my mom told me, I told her about the ‘shut the f up‘ incident, and she just said I was being pushy and ungrateful. I feel that she’s being too defensive because Joe’s trying to make her vacation nice even though he can’t be here. I understand that he’s really made her life easier, and done a lot for me, but I still feel he could let me know. 

Would I be the asshole for being disrespectful to him after all he’s done?

Edit: It’s not that I think he doesn’t care about me, but I still find it aggravating that he doesn’t ask me before, or give me a reason. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my best friend's partner play on our mc server?,"Okay so basically our high school friend group has had a minecraft server together for 2 years now, and recently one of our friends has gotten a girlfriend, and ever since then she's kind of just left us in the background.

One day she finally returned to playing with us, and the first thing she says is ""I've given my girlfriend access so she can play with us"" without even asking for anyone's permission first. 

And now, I may have reacted a bit too immaturely, because to that I said no and then I went off about how she only cares about her new partner and how we can't ever spend time ALONE, AS FRIENDS with her, because it's just awkward whenever she brings her gf into everything. To that, another friend that was playing during that time called me homophobic because apparently I can't stand to see two people being happy together even tho I'm bi myself. So I left them to play on that server, and have lowkey only been sticking to the friends who didn't witness our argument. 

Now I don't really have an issue with her girlfriend as a person, we actually used to hang out a lot before, it's just been really annoying me how since these two started dating, they both make their personalities about the other one and it just kept building up until I had enough. So AITA for doing all that and not just letting them do their thing?",AmItheAsshole
 for getting an attitude with my bf?,"Hiya everyone, so let me start with this off with I'm new here so I don't fully understand how all this works. 

Me (20F) and my bf (19M) have been together for awhile, and he's started a business about 2 months ago. 

During this time, some things went wrong, and now he's scared to go outside by himself. So for the past month I've been walking the shops back and forth to either get food and other items or pull money out for him. 

Here's my issue, he gets me to walk up there about 3 times a day. And I'm getting sick of it, I'm about 14 weeks pregnant and I'm exhausted and just want a break. Yesterday was especially bad, I was getting really bad back pain and was struggling to walk and I needed him to walk up to the shops by himself to go get his money out and a few other items but he didn't want to, so I tagged along, trying to be understanding about his fear. 

When we got there, he reliazed he forgot his card so he couldn't pull money out and he needed to apparently give this money to a mate. So we needed to run back up there, but I didn't want to, I was tired and was feeling extremely sick and my back was killing me. When I asked him to do it he got upset with me and started using an angry tone and even though it upset me, I didnt use one back until we got home where he wouldn't let me sit down for even five minutes before he rushed me out the door. 

I got a bit of an attitude with him and he called me a bitch and lazy. I got more upset and just left to go get out his money. When I got home, he still had an attitude with me, and when I told him that I was tired, sick he told me to grow up you gronk (it's an Australian terms for idiot or that your lazy and dirty) I got more upset and used a tone with him again telling to stop. He just rolled his eyes at me and called me a bitch again. That's the end of it, AITA? 

Edit: I relaized I left some information out. He didn't wanna walk back up with me because he was tired and didn't wanna go, and he wanted me to go for him and that this money that needed to be pulled out according to him was really important and needed to be done quickly since his mate was on the way to get it. The walk to the shops is about 30 mintues there and back. And some days he's willing to walk by himself and other days he says he doesn't want to because ""how would you feel if what happened to me happend to you?"" ",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my roommate for half of what she’s paid for a house sitting gig? ,"I (24F) have a roommate (23F) who is very codependent. She got a house sitting gig and she will be paid over $1000 for the 5 days she’s house sitting. 

For context on the codependency, she literally cannot do anything without someone doing it for her or with her. Thats it. Everything. Dishes, paper work, home work, getting from place A to B. She’ll miss important meetings because someone was unavailable to go with her. She can’t keep a job because she’s a stick it to the man kind of person (she can afford to be this person because her parents pay for everything) she gets fired within days. I’ve gone on strike from helping her because she’s a very take take take kind of person who doesn’t offer anything in return. 

Anyways, she got this booking- I took her to the meet and greet in the middle of my work day and we were there for over an hour and I told her hey we gotta go I have work to do and it’s still a 30 minute drive home. So we left and on our way home she asked if we could stop somewhere else and I said no I need to go home and she said “well how else am I supposed to get back down here” and I again said no I have to get back to work. Pissed me off. 

She started her booking and asked me if I can come with her and I said no. And she said well you work from home so you can take it anywhere and you can chill with me for the 5 days and stay with the dogs when I’m at school and I asked her “will I be getting paid?” And she was like “what” and I said “if I’m going to be there for the full 5 days with you, taking care of the dogs when you’re gone then I want 50% of what you are earning” and she said “they’re dogs it’s not that hard” and I was like okay then you shouldn’t have any problems? 

She got angry and asked how I could even ask her that when I know she needs money. I don’t think I’m in the wrong here though? We cross paths in the house obviously but she won’t even look at me. AITA? 

ETA- I just wanted to add that I never went to the house sitting with her, this was weeks ago. I meant we are both at our home now and she won’t speak to me. I have completely gone on strike after the meet and greet. Sorry- I should have been more clear! ",AmItheAsshole
 Don’t talk to him anymore,"
Well, about 3 years ago, my brother lived with his ex-girlfriend and they had a puppy together, when they broke up, she left and took the puppy with her. My brother felt really, really bad about the situation and I, wanting to see him happy, gave him a new puppy. The new puppy helped him a lot, everything was fine again, the dog was his best friend… until this year, he met a new girl, they started dating and she soon became pregnant. After finding out about the pregnancy, my brother got a new house and she went to live with him and his little dog... right away she started fighting with him every day, because the dog wasn't used to the new house and I didn't know the right place to pee. She started freaking out so much that my brother decided to take his best friend to live in a kennel on our grandparents' farm. I was furious with this situation, I never thought he would be able to do something like this. For me, he abandoned his best friend, not only that, the place is dangerous for the dog in some many ways… I ended up having to pay for the vaccines and I will also pay for my mother, who lives in another state, to take the dog with her. I am extremely disappointed with my brother, I no longer answer my his calls, I don't talk to him anymore. All I feel is anger! He's done a lot of things that hurt me, but I found this unacceptable. Am I wrong? 



EDIT 

So when I gave him the puppy, he was looking for one, so yes, he wanted a new dog. Second, he lived in an apt before and he never taught the dog where to pee, even though I insisted countless times that he should teach the dog while he was still a baby… he pees on pads now. Third, I suggested solutions before he took the dog to the farm. The dog is a small Shitzu and is literally in a little house in the middle of the forest, any animal can enter the place, such as jaguars, wild cats, snakes, ticks, etc... he cannot stay at my grandmother's house, which is on the farm, precisely because there are a lot of people in the house and he could escape and it is dangerous for a small dog. Fourth, when the woman moved in with him, she knew he had a dog, if she marries my brother, that means accepting the dog that was with him long before. Sixth, I don't get the dog for myself because I'm living in another country, but I'm paying everything for the dog to be well, even though I don't think it's right because it's not my responsibility. Seventh, an animal is not an object, it has feelings, it feels pain, cold, fear, it was always an indoor dog and suddenly it isn't anymore, he is depressed, not even want to eat. Eighth, two adults, can't deal with a dog peeing in the wrong place? This is ridiculous. The dog doesn't know exactly what he's doing, but my brother and his girlfriend do! For me, they simply decided to do what was easiest.",AmItheAsshole
 for saying my bff has dated a lot of hot men?,"I was hanging out with my best friend, 20M, and his boyfriend, 21M. 

I think they’re really cute together, and I do like his boyfriend and I think he treats my best friend well (as he should.) I thought they were both really emotionally mature and seemed to be in a healthy relationship. 

The only slight red flag is my best friend told me he gets jealous, but in a cute way.

We were talking about a game we use to play, we would rate guys together. I jokingly said it might be weird for us to do that now. He said no, no, but his boyfriend is his only 10/10, everyone else is inferior.

His bf laughed at that. I said “sure, but you’ve always dated hot guys. A lot of your boyfriends were hot. Didn’t stop you from giving other men the 10 rating.”

He looked at his bf and said, “I mean, they were cute, but no one compares to my bf. There’s a reason we’re together.”

His bf awkwardly said “no, it’s okay.” I said “yes, it is okay. Of course he’s not the hottest guy you’ve dated. I’m sure he knows that.” 

My best friend said I was tryna create problems, I said not at all. It’s basic logic, of course you’ll have dated hotter guys. It’s egotistical to think you’re better than everyone else. 

No offense, but my best friend is hot. And I’m not lying, his past bf’s were all really hot. So is his current, though.

When his bf left he said I was acting an asshole and making things awkward. He said he really likes this one. He pictures a serious future and told me to shut the fuck up.

I was thrown off. I didn’t think I was acting an asshole, just pointing out common sense.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 missing a friend's baby shower ,"Tldr; My friend just sent me to an invitation to her baby shower. It's on the same day of a tattoo I scheduled two years ago(and already had to reschedule once). 


My friend invited me to her baby shower. Its on the same day as a tattoo appointment i am very excited about, and booked 2 yeard ago. We have been friends for 10 years and she was in my wedding party. We see each other about 3 to 4 times a year now(live 40 minutes away), so I don't feel exceptionally close any longer (but I wouldn't want the friendship to end at the same time). She got married recently and I attended all the events and gave gifts etc., even hosted and transported a mutual friend of ours there.

I scheduled an appointment to get a tattoo I got 10+ years ago added on to(that I somewhat hate bc it's so basic). I paid a 150 deposit. I scheduled this appointment two years ago. I was supposed to get it done one year ago and had to reschedule when I had some financial problems(car accident during last semester of graduate school!). This is a well known artist who books a year out. The tattoo is a celebration of me, and a symbol of the transformations I've gone through (graduate school and working during the pandemic changed me. 


So reddit, WIBTA if I missed her baby shower?  I feel like a bad friend. ",AmItheAsshole
 if I walk down the aisle alone?,"So to shorten and not tell my life story I had an abusive birth father and that messed me up in the concept of family. I got a stepfather at twelve who I didn’t get along with. As an adult I’ve come to see him as a father figure. (I call him Dad.) The concept of fathers and daughters especially hurts because I never got the proper family experience. I appreciate him so much (He’s awesome to Mum) but I want to walk down the aisle alone when I get married because of the ache in my pain and heart.
But I feel like I may be an asshole if I don’t have him walk me down the aisle. I don’t want to hurt Dad.

So WIBTA if I walk alone?

EDIT: Thanks everyone for weighing in and providing both your opinions and advice. I’ve decided I want both him and Mum to walk me down together. I may struggle with family, love and all relationships but that’s my cross to bear. My BPD and trauma doesn’t get to come before those I love.
I can’t let my pain cause others pain, especially to a man who doesn’t deserve more pain in his life either.",AmItheAsshole
 for not giving up my bus seat?,"I’m on the bus home after chilling with friends, not too tired or anything. This older lady gets on, obviously looks beat, and there’s no seats left. She’s standing right by me and sort of sighs, looking around.

She asks me if I can stand up so she can sit cause she’s had a long day. I just shrug and say, “Nah, I’m good here,” and keep scrolling on my phone. She calls me out, saying I’m being rude and selfish. Some people around us start murmuring, and now I’m feeling kinda attacked.

I didn’t think it was a big deal since she didn’t specifically say she was in pain or anything, but now everyone’s acting like I kicked a puppy. AITA for just wanting to sit after hanging out all day?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to help my wife?,"This morning I refused to help my wife get up out of bed.

For context, my wife is very overweight. I'm not here to complain about this fact—she's been large since I first met her, and I've always found her attractive.  But she has gained a significant amount of weight over the last 4 years.

Shortly before our daughter was born in 2019, my wife weighed in at an appointment and was 428 lbs. This was a shock to me; I knew she had gained a lot of weight since we met, but she is private about it so I never heard a number. Once she and our daughter were home, we tried to take healthy steps to improve ourselves together. She recovered well from her pregnancy, and was set to resume her job in March of 2020. COVID changed that plan. After 1 week back at her job, she was furloughed for 2 weeks. At the end of that period they fired her. Luckily, my job went remote and I make enough to support our family.

For the past four years, she has become increasingly reclusive. When I have offered to take time off to give her a break from the kids, she has declined. We started taking stay-cations in summer 2020, and even once the pandemic was over she has said she prefers staying at home to traveling. Her weight has noticeably increased during this time; I don't have a number but I wouldn't be surprised if she's now over 500. Her mobility has suffered as well—she needs breaks when we take walks, we've had to put wall handles in our bathroom, and the last few months she needs help to get out of bed in the morning.

When I've tried to address this with her, she admits it's a problem, but she downplays its severity. Our marriage is great, she is a great mother to our two children, there's nothing (at least nothing she's shared) under the surface: she says she just likes to eat and struggles to control her portions and snacking.

This most recent incident started because yesterday evening, as we were taking our kids to the park, she insisted that I drive instead of her. Her insistence weirded me out and I asked her about it later when we were going to bed. She informed me that she's begun struggling to fit behind the wheel of our family car. This really freaked me out, and we had a long conversation before going to sleep. She again denied anything was wrong, and when I suggested she visit the doctor to get a better picture of her health she was pretty annoyed. I was upset and told her to think about how she would take care of the kids if something happened to me. It's not safe for her to rely on me for so much. She kept ignoring me and went to sleep. I stayed up and stewed a little bit.

This morning, to prove a point, I refused to help her out of bed. I just went into the bathroom. She was able to get up eventually, but it took a few attempts and she was crying and begging for help. I went in to work in my home office, and since I got off work she has been unwilling to talk to me. I think maybe I let my emotions get the best of me and should've addressed this differently.",AmItheAsshole
UPDATE - H if i ( m25 ) come clean and tell my girlfriend ( f21 ) that her parents hate me? ,"Original post : https://www.reddit.com/r/AmItheAsshole/s/7ylm1HwkRx

After I posted and read the comments I decided to tell Sally when she came over the day after I made my original post, when she arrived I asked her if I could talk to her about something important and she agreed, i then told her about what happened when her parents pulled me aside to talk, some of the comments told me to lay it on her gently so I did that and made sure to tell her that I didn’t hate her parents and knew they were probably just trying to protect her. She looked sad and guilty the whole time I told her the story and all the other stuff they told me, she looked really confused and disappointed and she said she never thought they would be like that because they’ve always been nice to her and the friends she’s brought home. I told her that it might be different cause I’m her boyfriend, not her friend. We talked for a few more hours about it and she kept apologizing for her parent’s behavior and the things they said to which I kept telling her that it was alright and that it wasn’t her fault. 

She also told me that her parents might be acting that way because of her older half sister that started dating this guy a few years back and he ended up being a really bad influence on her sister, she didn’t go into too much detail but I know from what she’s told me that it was really bad and messy. Now I can kind of see where her parents were coming from that night, still doesn’t fully excuse their behavior though. 

Well after Sally went home she told me she had a long talk with her parents, surprisingly her parents didn’t deny it but they thought they were justified in what they did which annoyed Sally, she told her parents to apologize to me in person and after a bit of back and fourth they agreed and started realizing that what they did was unfair to me, so next week I’ll be seeing them and hopefully it goes better than last time. 

I also showed Sally the original post when she came back to my place the next day and she was reading all the comments and realized that her parents have really coddled her all her life which is another issue she’ll have to talk to them about soon. But anyways that’s the update, me and Sally are doing great and hopefully I can form a healthy relationship with her parents in the future. ",AmItheAsshole
UPDATE:  for not speaking Japanese after living here for 6 years,"My original post: https://www.reddit.com/r/AmItheAsshole/s/MeESRljwno

So, we got divorced. 
I think about it more and more and I feel like this 6 years has been hell for me… I am tired of keep on finding any reason to think that he is good for me.

I found a full time job in a Japanese company and started working there from last January. Everybody in my new company said I speak Japanese well. And so far I am doing great! I rent my own apartment and surviving by my own just fine in Tokyo. Albeit my ex husband saying that I would never be able to survive in Japan without him.

I have a crush on other guy, but I take it slowly. 

Thank you for all of your comment to me. i am glad I posted here.

Edit: I use only Japanese in the company I work now and earn almost same amount with my ex husband despite just work here for 4 months. My crush now speak only japanese and we communicate just fine.

I am confident now!


Another long edit because I am surprised that I got so many responses:

Thank you so much for the comments and supports. Just to clarify, of course the reason of my divorce is not only because of the language thing…

I kept saying my ex was a good person (and I still think that he is a good person) but he is not treating me right.

There were a lot of things he had done to me that had harmed me physically and mentally.

Before I was with him, I was also doing modeling for side job. I took good care of myself, but after I married him, he said that my look didnt matter and he disliked me dressing up or putting on make up because thought as a married woman I should not attract other men. I did what he wanted and I kept telling myself “oh this man loves me the way I am no matter how I look…” but then I found out he was following sexy girls on instagram and twitter.

He never chatted them so I let it slide but I kept thinking about it. Especially since he never said anything positive about my look (basically he never said anything positive about my effort except for my cooking) I started to feel unconfident. I got depressed and had to take anti depressant then I gained 20 kgs in 6 years.

When I said he never said anything positive about my look/effort it didnt mean that he always said bad things about me, just he seems to be indifferent about it.

Now, after we got divorced, I dont have to take my anti depressant anymore. And I lost 15 kgs already… I started to talk to some guys until I met my crush right now.

I was surprised because my crush now always said that I look good and nice, he noticed when I changed my hair style or nail, saying I smell nice, and compliment me when I do good thing at work (my crush works in the same company with me).

The other people also said that I look super good now, and I look so much happier.

I want to show you my pictures so you can see the difference between when I was single, married, and became single again, but I know there is a chance some of you might recognize me…. And then would recognize who is my ex husband and it would cause problem for him.

Anyway, how I learned Japanese (and other languages) is by listening to some song, movies, or other people, then when I cant understand some word/phrase, I would find it in dictionary based on how I hear it. Then I have to guess how it is written so I can find the word in dictionary/translator. I prefer dictionary to translator though because when I open dictionary I will see many other words other than the one I am looking for and I may remember those words I accidentally find too…

After I find the word and understand what it means, i will try to make a sentence with that word and use it in real conversation.

Now, I can already read Japanese’s comic book and watch the movie in cinema without much difficulty. :)

Once again thank you for your support!

Please wish me luck for my career and my life ahead. (Also for my crush, hope it ends well)

I also wish all the best for all of you, may you learned something from my experience and may it be useful for you or at least it could give you good feeling when you read this update.

Cheers!
",AmItheAsshole
 Advice on how to handle my Hubbys tall tale which he claims is true!,"AITA Been married a very very long time. About 20 years in my husband starts telling a story about our wedding night that I feel makes him look horrible. He boasts about this story more frequently now and I have no idea why. 

We had a destination wedding. No big wedding party or family attended. It was on an island. My hubby now brags after I fell asleep he left the resort and went snorkeling by himself in the ocean.  He says he was using an underwater flashlight. And says he probably shouldn’t have done it. Now I’m a very very light sleeper. I don’t recall him leaving nor returning. I don’t recall waking up to any wet gear. Also, I never heard this story till 20 years into our marriage. 

First, I am stunned that he would take this risk which could have made me a widow in less than a day and  a selfish act. 

Second, for some reason this really has me upset. I feel it goes along with how little he respects me. It’s really bothering me the more he tells this story. I’m not sure why I am so  affected by this. 

Third,  I feel this makes him look bad and I started calling him out on this when he tells the story. I confronted him tonight by saying “why are you telling people this!  This makes you look bad and embarrassing for me you did this”. AITA for feeling this way? ",AmItheAsshole
" for wanting to share our pregnancy news with my parents, without my wife","Me (37m) and my wife (33f) learned that she is about 8 weeks pregnant. We are delighted but also terrified. It is the first time for both of us.

  
She has asked me to not share the news with anyone until we get to about 12 weeks, when the pregnancy will be stable. So I have been keeping it, even though I really want to share the news with everyone around me. A key detail is that we are currently in long distance: she lives in the same country as her parents, while I am an expat and live alove. She will move in with me and to our new house in one month. 

  
She decided that she would like to tell her parents about her pregnancy before she leaves her home country, so that they can share some of the joy while they are together. This way she can also do one of the ultrasounds with her mother and experience this special connection. This is all understood, and I told her I support her in how she wants to handle the pregnancy information. She did share it with her parents, and they were overjoyed – the house is in a festive mood, they cannot stop smiling and laughing, etc.

  
I am still under an information embargo though.  
(note: I did ask her to let me share with a couple of select people, for my own mental sanity, since I really needed to be able to open up to a friend. She was fine with it)

  
Now to the drama. I asked her if I could also tell my parents, to which she responded that she prefers me to wait for the 12 weeks. By that time we will have moved in together in the country where I live. I said fine, but then she asked me that we reveal the news to my parents together, she and I.

  
I can honestly not tell why, but I would like to tell my parents myself. There are no other grandchildren in our family, and I have been living away from home (like three continents away) for the last 12 years. So, in my mind, I really want to share this with my mom and dad and also have the same ‘joyous family moment’ like she did. 

  
My wife took it badly.  
I think she feels excluded or that I do not want her to somehow be part of my family? Which on my part is absolutely not true. I just feel like I do not want this to be a joint announcement sort of situation. I want it to be intimate between me and my parents, and right after, we could all have a joint video call or whatever. 

  
She is very upset. I reminded her that we did not announce to \*her\* parents jointly. She is saying that I did not express any desire to do so (which is true, I did not even think of it) … but since she is clearly communicating \*her\* desire to me, it is different, and I should hear her. Sure, but I still want this to be my moment with my parents. 

  
When I say it out loud though, “I want to announce our pregnancy to my parents without my wife” it sounds wrong. Somehow it is like I have this righteous feeling of possessiveness over a piece of news/information. I am conflicted. Am I the Asshole? 

  
Note: she and my parents do not share a common language and communicate via translator app  
",AmItheAsshole
 for getting my own wifi due to my words being twisted?,"Am I (25 male) the asshole for constantly doing a bunch of extra stuff every time one of my roommates (50 female) has a problem with anything I do or say? 

For extra info, money has been tight due to a few concerns but I'm set now. 

The issues began a good month or two ago when the wifi bill was behind and her son /  my best friend (23 male) was short on work, I had said ""I would be able to go without it for a short period since a bit of my stuff goes off of wifi but let me see how I'm looking after my bills because I have a few coming up that I can't push off"" acknowledging that I understand what was going on and even promising to throw in some money for the bill,  just asking for her to inform me on when we'd be paying everything so I could budget around what I was caught on bill wise between my car payment, my insurance, and my phone bill on top of the rent and the ever high price of gasoline. 

Fast forward a few weeks later and the wifi is off and I had paid off the rent ($400), car payment ($428) and insurance ($250) totaling $1078 leaving me only enough for gas ($35 for a whole tank)  as I had been picking up the slack for my friend for the past few months as his department at our job had no work and was, in turn, causing him not to have anything to do. 

Upon being asked if I had any to chip in I said I didn't have anything as I had already put enough in for gas for the next two weeks because the maintenance department is still working to fix things in the building for when the busy season comes. 

The bill gets paid and my wifi is still out but my friend is steadily streaming in his room, wanting to be sure I wasn't having issues I asked if he had any connectivity issues to which he said ""No,  that's weird though"". After waiting a few hours I finally asked his mom ""Hey is there something wrong with the wifi? I can't connect for some reason"" to which I was immediately told, ""You said you could live without it so I paused you"". 

It irked me a bit because hate when my words get twisted to something I never said. Being polite I asked how much I'd owe and apologized for being short, explaining my situation that had hit the paycheck I had and the only thing I was told was ""the bill was $520 and nobody helped me"". Two days later I asked my friend how long this would continue and he said ""Until you apologize because she assumed you didn't care"" Not wanting to apologize I called Xfinity and ordered my service, not telling either of them as I only know it'd make me be the bad guy again. I had replaced the door knob for my room as I got tired of people waltzing in whenever they're on a dish hunt which results in their cats getting in and knocking things over.  I had only forgotten to bring a dish out a few times but I always get it out the next morning and clean it as I work nights, I've also told her I'd wash whatever dishes I used and apologized as work has had me extremely tired to the point of passing out the second I touch my bed",AmItheAsshole
 for saying no to giving a birthday gift from my mom to her granddaughter? ,"My (36) brother (38) and I have a tumultuous relationship but are acting as joint Power of Attorneys and Executors of our mother’s (66) Will. 

Our mother has been in a care facility with severe MS and early onset dementia for the last 2 years. I live in a different province while my brother lives in the same city. 

He lived with our mom rent free before she went into care and yet it was my aunts and uncles that eventually phoned me to address their concerns with her health. They even questioned how healthy them living together was. Him and I have never had a relationship for many reasons. 

When she went into care we found out she had significant debt and we sold her condo to pay it off and she now has a fixed amount to pay for her care and accommodation until she passes. What is in her accounts is all that’s left. 

My brother has always been terrible with money. Even after everything she has done for him, I see he pays himself back from her account for say $20 he spends on her soft drinks she requests. Something I find petty. 

My stance is every penny she has is to be used to support herself until she passes. This has not stopped him from asking to borrow money for a down payment, to invest, money to cover stolen tools, etc. all of which I have denied. This last request has me questioning if I’m the asshole though. 

Today he said he visited mom and she wanted to give him $500 for a birthday gift for my 15 year old niece. I immediately said I wasn’t comfortable with this. That in my son’s 2 years of life (she’s not all there so I don’t blame her) she has not given him one gift, let alone all the time and memories my children won’t have with her. When he was born she offered $500 to buy him a crib but I refused. 

I told him I thought it was best if we just leave it, as I didn’t think it was fair to my children and I didn’t think it’s in her best interest to be spending $500 on birthday gifts. 

As expected he absolutely lost it. Yelling at me that they were always close (she was the only grandchild for 13 years), that she’s struggling with her grandma being in the hospital (she hasn’t visited her in years), asking if I wanted to be responsible for not giving her a gift and that I was an asshole because this wasn’t about me and him but about her. I feel like an asshole because I don’t want her to suffer, and the situation is shitty all around, but I also don’t think that’s fair to my children. 

AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not paying my drinks?,"Throwaway account because we shared social media accounts and I don't want him to know it's me... 

I (20f) went on my first date I had with a guy (22m). I met him online and with text we clicked pretty well. I asked him if he wants to grab a drink sometime and he said yes. We went to a bowling hall and I wanted to just have one or two beers. That's it! I didn't want more alcohol. 

When he arrived the click I thought I had, was gone. The way he acted and the things he did were different than trough text and he told me all kind of stories that gave me big red flag energy.

Now here's the deal. On the date he order everything. He didn't even asked what I wanted to drink, which is a red flag in my eyes. He never asked if I even wanted alcohol. He started with a few of shots. I didn't really wanted shots but it already arrived and I kinda feel obliged to drink the shots. But he keep to secretly order shots and after the 5th shot I told him that he needed to stop ordering them. I wasn't planning to get drunk and just wanted to have a great time. He told me he got all that alcohol, because that will give us a great time. I was a bit confused at first but I think he wanted me to get completely drunk. Maybe that's what he thinks is fun or maybe he wanted to do something, but I told him that it wasn't my way of having fun and I won't drink any more alcohol. I never wanted all that in the first place. 

After an our we left the lane and he insisted in paying for today. He said ""next time is on you"". When I told him that I really wanted to pay my part, he refused and said that this one is on him and next time I have to pay. The thing is that I don't want there to be a next time. I have no intention in ever meeting him again. I know that may sound extreme but I just have a gut feeling.

When we were walking to the train station (so he could get home), he offered a second date. For some reason I said yes and now we will go bowling again next week. I wanted to say no, but I think I got scared. 

Here is where i think in the asshole in all this. He went home probably thinking it went great. I didn't say how I felt and that I never want to see him again. I just said yes to the second date. I went home and I messaged him that we had a great time, but I didn't think we matched. He asked me why and said he had a lot of fun. When I told him that his lifestyle may be a bit extreme for me, he asked me to pay my part of the drinks. If I wasn't going on a second date he didn't wanted to pay for me. I refused. I told him I never wanted to drink anything i drank that day so I won't be paying. It wasn't fun for me! I told him that I did offer first, but that he didn't want me to pay, but now all of a sudden he does. It just felt like he payed because he wanted to force a second date in me. I blocked his number now but I think I should have done things differently. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to talk to my mom and not wanting her to come visit?,"Earlier this year I sold my mom a house in the area of my country she lives in. I live on the other side of the country. She has been living in the house for years and I didn’t want the house in my name any longer so she said she would buy it. She didn’t have a down payment so I gifted her the equity of the house( over $100,000) and that covered the down payment. After the sale there was a little over $3000 that was paid to the purchase of the house more than was owing. We used the same lawyer so that lawyer gave her the check that was in my name.

 My mother then told me that the money was an over payment in lawyer fees she paid and wanted me to send her the money after she deposited the check into my account. I knew this wasn’t the truth because I saw the paper work. I was hurt that she would lie to me about the money so I stopped talking to her for a while. 

After a few weeks of me not replying to her texts or calls she asked me if I was mad at her. I told her yes and asked why she would lie to me about the money. She said she didn’t lie and that she had just called the lawyer that day to ask what the money was for. Seems like a pretty big coincidence that she would call that exact day. 

I am not mad about not getting the money I am mad about the lie. I did start talking to her again but I am still angry about it. She recently decided to book a trip to come visit my family and I this summer. I don’t want her to come because I feel like it will be really awkward and don’t really want to see her after that situation. 

AITA for feeling this way and WIBTA if I told her not to come?",AmItheAsshole
 For telling my husband I don't want to hear him constantly talk?,"My husband talks a lot.  Like all the time.  We'll be falling off to sleep and he'll say something like ""if we could move to Mars, would you like to live underground or above ground?""
He does this thing where he reads his emails or articles aloud.  He also does the crossword puzzle aloud.  I asked him to do these tasks silently and he became offended and basically said that if I really loved him, these things wouldn't bother me.  I contend they would bother anyone.
AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my mum not to buy my son more clothes?,"Let's keep this short, sweet, and simple.  I bought my son $600 worth of clothes that he picked out at the start of the year. A nice mixture of warm and cold weather that all worked together. Which my mother was angry at me for buying. 

He fell in love with one outfit and wore it day in and day out. Due to this, my mother was led to believe he didn't have any, so she went out and bought him another complete wardrobe for winter. Now my son refuses to wear the clothes I bought him. 

I wasn't rude when I asked her, but she took offence and screamed at me.  AITA?",AmItheAsshole
" For trying to catch my friend in a lie, if he didn’t lie.","Me (24f) and and my friend (25m) have been friends since we were little kids. We’ve never had an argument, we are really open and care about each other a lot. Our friendship has always been platonic, but we have been through a lot of trauma together that seems to have made us really close as friends. 

For the last 6 months or so, my friend has been lying a lot. It’s always been little lies but it’s new for him. The more worrying ones were about his finances and savings as we were planning on moving out together, and he was not financially able to but pretended he was. I talked to him about it and he admitted he wasn’t ready to move out. I said that was okay and made the decision to move out independently, which he seemed okay with.  

The smaller lies didn’t stop and I encouraged him to talk to his therapist about it as it was worrying and he admitted he didn’t like it. 

Yesterday he made a big lie to a friend. He then lied to me but came clean a few hours later. I told him I was upset with him but appreciated him owning up to it. I encouraged him again to talk to his therapist and he said he would. I vented about it to my mum and she noticed a lot of information was wrong and I think he’s actually lied a lot more to me. 

He was supposed to get a train to meet some people for a wedding event in London, but said to me that the train broke down and he could not afford another ticket. He also said the trains and coaches were not available to London and were too uncommon to rely on. He told his friend that he couldn’t go because his grandad is in hospital, the big lie. I offered him a solution to which he said he’d do multiple times which he didn’t (the lie to me). My mum pointed out that London is a capital city and there are plenty of trains that go there. She also said when a train goes down, a replacement for travel is often made for passengers if possible. 

I asked him today if he got a refund and I’m waiting for his reply. I feel like crap for trying to catch him but I feel like I can’t trust him right now. I’m so angry with him and I’m angry with myself for that. I’m also confused why it matters so much to me when it has no real impact on my life if his train broke down or not. 

I checked the train disruptions for yesterday just now and found no information relating to his train. 

TLDR:
Am I the asshole for trying to catch my close friend in another lie when it has no impact on my life, but causes me anxiety in our friendship as his lying has changed from small to big? Should I just let it go or should we talk about it?

Edit:
I called him and asked him if he lied. He seemed really anxious and said that the train did breakdown. I pointed out that there are a lot of other trains and coaches going to London usually to which he said “Yeah” and nothing more. I pushed it a little and he said the ticket wasn’t transferable which I checked and isn’t true. I don’t think pushing it more will be helpful as he doesn’t seem able to communicate atm and it’s just hurting. I suggested he talks to his doctor about his mental health medication as it could be why he is more tired and having headaches lately, and I said it could be making him more anxious too (as he thinks the lying is a stress response). I don’t think I can do more than that. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friends horse new owners they can’t jump the horse?,"So, when my friend (F17) grew out of her 14.2hh welsh cob she sold it as a dressage pony. This is because the horse has bad hind legs and cant take the pressure of jumping. The new owners said at sale that they will be having this in mind and not jumping him, just having him as a fun dressage and trail buddy. It didn’t end up like that… I (F17) found their tiktok (F14). I took a look and realised they were jumping way too big, way more than what he was supposed to. I asked my friend if I could explain the issue to them, and she said yes.  
I wrote a comment that was calm and forwards telling her the issue, but I was still kind and understanding of why she wanted to jump him.  
I know we have an age gap, but she answered that ‘oh but he loves jumping and i want to jump him’. I was still understanding telling her that the horse/pony would get serious problems if she would still jump it that often (side note, she jumps the pony 1-3 times a week).

She then sent a message to the mom of my friend and the mom (of my friend) sent a quite rude message to me, even though I knew what was wrong with the horse (I was on multiple vetchecks and appointments with a experienced vet so I was there with her when she got the horse’s “diagnosis”). The mom has no experience with horses at all, and my friend is on my side. What should i do next? And am i the a-hole?

To clear up some confusion, here is some information i have on the horse and stuff. My friend wanted ME to send a message, because she didn’t want to come off as rude, as she gets angry easily. I did lease this horse for about a year, but I got another one and then I told my friend she should go try the horse. She tried him and absolutely fell in love with him so she bought him. My friend is very concerned, but as i said, she is afraid to come off as rude and for people to spread a romour that she is rude (she is sensitive to stuff like that). We cant just call animal control and just let them randomly take away their horse. We messaged the new owners and told them they should have a vet look at him. By the videos you can see him struggling more with his hind end than he did before, which is probably from the jumping. Just because it’s not my horse doesn’t mean that i shouldn’t tell them that it’s not okay to “ruin” a horse like that.  
This isn’t abuse (yet) but it will become abuse if they continue. I hope this cleared up for anyone wondering.",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to get my money back after lending it to a friend for her cat’s surgery?  ,"Backstory: I (23M) used to work with a coworker, Jessica (42F), who loved talking about her pets and how they helped her manage her anxiety. I could relate because I have two cats that help with my own anxiety. After she moved states, we stayed connected through Facebook, mainly reacting to each other's posts.

Jessica often posted her CashApp and Venmo details on Facebook, asking for money for pet food, toys, and even rent. Despite having a decent job, she seemed to manage her finances poorly, which I found odd. I usually ignored these types of posts.

The incident: One day, I saw a post about Jessica’s cat needing emergency surgery after a neighbors dog attacked her, costing about $2000. She asked facebook for financial help. I messaged her, suggesting that the dog's owner should cover the costs. She explained the owner was broke and her cat urgently needed surgery. Feeling sympathetic, I sent her $600 from my savings.

I hinted that I expected the money back if her neighbor paid. A few days later, Jessica posted that her neighbor had indeed paid the full $2000, avoiding court. I congratulated her but later asked about getting my $600 back. She seemed confused and insisted it was a donation, needed now for her cat’s recovery and other essentials.

I was shocked. I tried to clarify that my intention was to loan the money for the surgery, not give it away for other uses. She called me a horrible friend and blocked me on Facebook. As a college student, $600 is a significant amount for me.

AITA for expecting my money back, or should I have just let it go?",AmItheAsshole
 for ditching my friend because she yelled at my driver,"I(20F) am a college student and i had a friend in college named Sarah. It was just the two of us in college for a long time until this other girl came along, let's call her Emily. Emily's previous friend group abandoned her, so i felt bad for her and let her hang out with us. Sarah never liked her though but i kept convincing her to give her a chance because i didn't want Emily to be alone. Emily struggles financially and has to take 3 buses to reach home. 

So this one day, she asked me if i could drop her home in my car and i agreed. And she made it an everyday habit which i didn't mind. I dropped her and picked her up everyday for almost 2 years until one day when we were having a silly argument over a ""college project"" and she behaved very rudely with my driver who was just minding his own business. She yelled at him continuously but even then i dropped her home safe and sound and later told her that she's not to come in my car anymore. 

At this point, she got very angry, and decided to punish me for not letting her travel in my car by telling Sarah that countless lies and bad things about me which is completely untrue. Emily's the one that constantly hated Sarah and spoke shit about her. But upon hearing this, Sarah believed Emily and supported Emily even saying she did nothing wrong. With utter disbelief and feeling betrayed, i cut both of them off. 

Also, i forgot to mention, each of us were supposed to present a paper on a topic which Emily failed to do, so i agreed to add her name to my paper and present it together. But after the fight, i turned in sick the day we were supposed to present and Emily deleted my name and presented it as her own. Now i'm the one that's alone and friendless now while the two of them are best friends. Sarah keeps acting as if i'm a villain, and I'm really confused as i did nothing wrong. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I don't pay off my husband's debt,"I am 38f and husband 40m. I am the breadwinner. Since I WFH, I also manage majority of the household n kids stuffs. I am also doing my graduate studies now. Yes, I am overwhelmed. My husband owns a business. He's barely able to make ends meet and I bail him every time. I earn a decent salary and have been receiving big bonuses. Often that's the money I use to bail him. Bailed him so many times, I lost count how much I dumped in. Recently, he said business is good and bought a new car. I thought finally, it's working. Nonetheless, I am so busy, I am often overwhelmed, tired, and clearly no time or interest for intimacy. I am always stressed and just want the day to be over. So many freaking things planning in my head because there are just so many things going on! All of a sudden, everything exploded - husband complained I am not spending time w him, bla bla bla, kids not behaving bla bla bla and the beans spilled. He is financially stressed because he cannot make ends meet, and he has over 10k of credit card debt. It was a total shit show moment. I have paid off his debt multiple times in the past. I could afford to pay it off and let him start fresh - again. But I am also thinking of all the home improvements I wanted to do since many years. I never got to do it because all my bonus money just goes to his business. AITA if I am not bailing this time and instead use the money for other things? I told him to transfer the debt to a lower interest rate account and set aside money to pay it off.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend if she doesn't change her behavior we would no longer be friends?,"I (24 f) have a friend, let's call her Nat (24 f). We've met in high school by our mutual friend and remained friends to this day. There was a time when we were inseparable, we would do everything together, we were going to parties, having a weekly meeting just to gossip etc. Things changed a bit when we went to college. 

  
Since highschool I've lost 20kg, grew my hair out (naturally ginger), started wearing make up more frequently. I’ve also signed up for several photo sessions to build up my self-esteem which was pretty low due to previous bullying. Nat was very happy for me and supportive at first, until I've started going on dates. She always keeps complaining about how she was single her whole life and never been to a date so I started to encourage her to go out, and meet someone. Well....this didn't end well. One of her friends friend asked her out politely and she just blocked him! I was angry at her because what she did was rude and totally immature. When I confronted her about that she just stopped responding for my messages for several days and then just texted me ""omg I'm sorry it took me so long"" (we're texting each other every single day).   
About 2 years ago I've met her best friend from college, Mandy (24 f). She's really great girl and we get along pretty well. Nat was really happy about that. The 3 of us have a group chat where we write random things, send memes etc. Sometimes we're discussing some more serious topics like dating. Mandy has a dating app and started to go on dates and I'm really happy for her. Nat on the other hand is not happy at all because in her opinion dating apps are crap. Mandy's really trying everything just to find a man of her dreams and it's good to be cautious but Nat could at least show a little bit of support. 

  
Nat pretty much started copying me about 3 months ago: started dressing up like me, bought the same clothes. I’ve started talking about getting another piercing and all of the sudden she also wants it. I’ve decided to get a tattoo and guess what? Nat’s also getting a tattoo! And to top all of that she’s really mean to me lately and made some hurtful comments and I have no idea why. About a week ago she had send us link to a concert and asked if we want to go with her. I told her many times that I have a lot of expenses lately and she said she respects that. Also me and Mady are working and studying, Nat doesn’t work and her parents pay for her every whim.  
Yesterday, when she threw a temper tantrum because I didn’t want to spend a lot of money just to go with her to the concert of a band I don’t like, I’ve had enough. I told her that she’s acting like a child and she needs to stop or else I’ll just cut her out of my life. Maybe I overreacted but I’m just tired of putting up with her shit. She's not treating people well and when I try to tell her that her behavior is inappropriate, she gets offended.

So WIBTA?",AmItheAsshole
: Overprotective or unreasonable ," I F(32), myself have been a recovering d*** user for approx 3 years. My S/O M(37) [who is still struggling with add*****n] We have a toddler M(2) together who spends some weekends with his grandparents (S/O's parents) who live around an hr from us. 
This past week my S/O's brother M(39) was released from jail &amp; is now living at my son's grandparents home. He'd been incarcerated for almost 3 yrs so he's never met his nephew (my son). We all used d**** together before he was arrested &amp; he would get really out there. Seeing, hearing things &amp; occasionally become completely delusional &amp; aggressive to where his parents had to call the police on him or an ambulance for every time he overd***d. I know he's used sparingly throughout his time in jail, but their parents (my son's grandparents) do not know this. 
The grandparents wanted to pick up my son for the weekend &amp; I told my S/O no effin' way. He wasn't going to stay there without me or his father being present the entire time. When I told my S/o this he said that's fine, but HE would be the one to tell them that he wanted to wait until we could all come &amp; for me not to say a word. He said he will make up a reason why. 
I don't understand why this is such an issue &amp; why we can't be upfront. &amp; Also why I am vilified anytime I have legitimate concerns? I will not let my son go with his father alone anymore either since he hasn't shown any sign of stopping, but they haven't heard me say this outright. But I can hear the aggravation when they ask ""or do you have to wait for her"" &amp; things similar. In other instances (like 4wheelers for ex) they've told me ""do you really think I'll let something happen to him"" just really upset that I have any concern so I'm assuming thats the same stance they have with everything across the board. 
AITA and I should instead have faith that my son will be protected? I feel bad and wish I could have a conversation with them, but I think I'll just vilify myself further. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for cutting contacting with a friend when I was ill? ,"Me and a girl, I’ll call Kate stopped being friends the end of 2022. In October of that year I suddenly got really ill. I was having up to 40 seizures a day and was in and out of hospital for the next 6 months until I finally got a diagnosis. The first seizure I had me and Kate spoke about it and she was quite supportive. Doctors originally told me it was a one off and probably won’t happen again. 

The very first seizure I had was on the Tuesday. We were due to go to bottomless brunch/a night out on the Saturday. Because I had hit my head and had a pretty severe concussion I was advised not to drink alcohol for at least a month. I told her I didn’t want to go but we could maybe go for lunch somewhere instead. She was moody with me for not wanting to go, so we just left it and I then saw on Instagram, she went on a night out with someone else. 

After about a month I realised that she hadn’t once asked me how I was, if I needed anything or came to see me. I was very conscious at the time that I didn’t want to seem as if I was complaining about being ill and be depressing to talk to, so would try and keep it to a minimum but would tell her if I was back in hospital and ask how she was. 

After about a month I realised she hadn’t replied to a few messages and didn’t seem to really care. I’ll admit that at the time I was very depressed so maybe I should have made more effort? I just stopped making as much of an effort and she never messaged me again. To me it seemed like because I couldn’t go out every weekend and be fun anymore she didn’t really want to know.

Summer last year I decided to just delete her off everything. The main reason was because it made me feel shit everytime I saw her going out because I still missed her and missed being able to do that sort of stuff. Also what was the point if we weren’t friends (I tend to keep social media very private).

A few days ago she requested to follow me on instagram. I messaged her asking how she was. I then said I was surprised she had followed me. She just said “well you stopped following me on everything”. I explained why I had that and she said the reason she didn’t reach out was because she was having a really hard time and was ‘mentally fucked’. I said she could’ve spoken to me abou if she was struggling but it didn’t seem like she was having a hard time an if she was going out every weekend (I get social media can be decieving). She said the reason she was having a difficult time and why she was going out constantly was because people were complaining she wasn’t as fun anymore and wasn’t partying as much?

She said she tried to reach out but couldn’t because I had blocked her number. Which I never did. I changed my number in Feb 22 but still had her on WhatsApp and everything else. So basically there were 7 months where we didn’t speak before I took her off all my social media. I feel like she’s making excuses but am I being the arsehole? 
",AmItheAsshole
"? Roommate is mad I haven't spent much time with her over the past month, and that I spend more time with my new gf than her.","I am 20M in a stressful college major with a 20F roommate. Roommate mentioned a few times that we hadn't hung out recently and she was somewhat sad about it. I expressed that I was extremely busy with my school/research obligations, but apologized and said it was nothing personal.After, I invited her a few times to come and study with me. She declined all of my invitations. This was just after spring break and tensions weren't bad at all, we would talk while in the apartment and catch up daily at the very least. I still had some free time, but spent most of it with my best friend who I don't live with, or by myself to recharge because I am introverted.

\~2 weeks after spring break I started talking to a girl whom I had feelings for my freshman year. We became closer and some of the free time I spent by myself I decided to spend with her. We are in the same classes and she has no problem studying with me, so we also spend a lot of time together that way.

One night I came home and found my roommate crying. I asked if there was anything I could do but she told me to go away. I texted her and said that if she needed to talk or vent to me about anything I would always be available and just to let me know. She never responded to this text. For nearly a week we didn't talk and anytime I saw her she completely ignored me. My thought was that it would be best to give her space if she was angry with me or going through something entirely different, as I had let her know she had my support anytime.

Eventually she texted me back and said she was sorry for not responding and being distant. I told her not to worry about it at all and if she wanted to talk about things I was absolutely available. When we talked she let me know she felt like I wasn't being a good friend. I acknowledged that I had incredibly busy, and apologized that I had made her feel that way. I suggested that we could watch GOT that weekend and grab some food as a way to make up for it. She was happy with this but when I mentioned my new relationship she immediately got mad again and told me I could do way better than the girl I am seeing (who is a friend of her friend).

Later that week, I was hanging out with gf at her house when roommate (who has my location) told me to call her.  She asked if I could bring her a sprite. I was more than a mile away and it was about midnight. I didn't feel like ditching my girlfriend just to bring my roommate a sprite. I told her to try the vending machine downstairs but that I would walk over with gf and grab a sprite if she needed me to. She declined and said we needed to speak alone.

I told her we could have a conversation and the next day when we talked, she started crying and told me I am a terrible friend and roommate and I dont make any effort or reciprocate the nice things she does for me, and she effectively told me she wasn't my friend anymore. I was at a loss for words because I genuinely hadn't felt like I did anything wrong.  AITA??",AmItheAsshole
 for embarrassing my friend's boyfriend and not apologizing?,"Caught up with some friends over drinks and met my friend's new boyfriend. Vibes were great, we got along really well. He asked about my work but didn't quite understand so I explained a little bit about my role, which includes managing physical aggression. He asked how I would do that and I explained my CPI training that involves physical restraint that is only used in the most serious circumstances. I do the refresher every year but haven't needed to actually use physical restraint in the field more than three times. 

He didn't seem to believe that I (gasp, a woman!) could restrain him. I told him probably not, my clients are usually smaller than him and I'm not actually that strong. He asked, for fun, if I would try and restrain him to see how effective it is. I told him no, tried to joke that I'm not on the clock and mentioned something about how I can't be bothered to write an incident report. He kept asking, a couple of friends at the table were egging me on. I changed the subject, he'd come back to it. I joked that he had a weird fetish, but he still really wanted me to try.

So I put him in a hold and he couldn't get out of it. He ended up kicking his legs out and I couldn't hold him up obviously, so he fell on his butt. I helped him up, we had a laugh and I thought all is well. 

Two days later (this morning) my friend messaged me asking for an apology, because apparently what I did was childish and it embarrassed her boyfriend. I told her that's ridiculous, we had a laugh together about it and we continued our night still on good terms. Now she's taken it to our other friends who think it was stupid, and that both me and her boyfriend are both idiots. Some are neutral, some think I did embarrass him, some think he was asking for it.

TLDR - was asked to restrain somebody as a joke, turned out I could restrain them and he's feeling embarrassed (according to his gf)",AmItheAsshole
 for choosing my cat over my roommate’s new puppy? ," My roommate recently brought home a new puppy without discussing it with me. I’ve had my cat, pimp, for years, and she’s very particular about her space and routine. The puppy is extremely energetic and has been stressing pimp out, leading her to hide all day and refuse to eat. I asked my roommate if the puppy could stay with her parents (who live nearby) until it’s better trained, or at least until Pimp adjusts. My roommate is now upset, saying I’m forcing her to choose between her puppy and our living arrangement. Our friends are split, with some saying I’m being unreasonable about a temporary situation. AITA for prioritizing my cat’s wellbeing over the new puppy’s presence in our apartment?",AmItheAsshole
 For ignoring my roommates requests when she ignored mine?,"Anonymous for obvious reasons, to give names, I am I/Me, my partner is Kai, and roommate is Jessica. This all started last year. I started dating my partner a few months before then, and ever since I have had them over more to hangout. At this point, they stay the night over the weekend. The apartment lease states no more than 10 days in a month and 7 days consecutively. We have not broken that rule at all since we started dating.

Jessica starts constantly asking why Kai is over, and asks to sit down to talk about the whole situation. (Context for the next part, she is disgusting. Never does her dishes, leaves moldy food in the fridge, and gets mad when we throw it out saying, ""These are still good, why are they out?"" I wish that was an exaggeration. And she treats the living room like her own bedroom.) So we do, and we work out a deal that has Kai not over 2 days a week. We were fine with that, but on the condition that she start to clean up after herself because she leaves it for us to do every weekend. Well she didn't start cleaning up, in fact it got worse, and so one of the days that Kai wasn't to come over, they started to come over again. The staying the night didn't change, that is important for later.

Nothing changed, visiting and overnights stayed the same. Still cleaning up after her, and our new roommate cleans her own stuff and stays in her room. Kai does a lot of cleaning too as a way to help me even though they don't live there because we mentally can't stand gross common areas. Jessica decided to complain about the way Kai filled the dishwasher, even though it was full. I left a just used spoon in the sink to clean later and almost as soon as I set it in there, she asked why it was there. She had her boyfriend put my Keurig single cup in a cabinet, just to put her never used SodaStream there

She reported me to management, and I got a knock on my BEDROOM door at 8am. The lease says they can do that, but they didn't try to email, call, or text me first. She reported Kai as a ""full time occupant"", that they had been doing all of their laundry there, and that they kept the spare key for the backdoor and the passcode for the front door. They only stay 2 nights a week, only does one set of clothes with my laundry, and we had the spare key together, but never just them.

The management is just as bad. Her boyfriend can stay for 11 nights straight because ""He is out of state, so we make exceptions."" which is not in the lease at all. If the sink is overflowing with one person's disgusting, moldy dishes, all occupants pay a fee. Since Kai and I are in an amazing relationship that looks like we will be together for a very long time, we started to buy things for our future to go ahead and have at the apartment for everyone to also use, including cookware and a TV and stand for it (Cats, don't want them knocking it over.) Since we got a letter saying we needed to move their stuff out, we took the TV out and put some pans in my bedroom. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for being angry with my friend for telling everyone that i asked her to cancel her party plans?,"My birthday is coming up and I was planning on renting an airbnb for me and a few close friends to hang out, sauna, and chill. I want to do it when the weather gets warmer so we could swim and such.
But Ava (not real name) brought up a summer get-together idea for the same friend group a few days ago. I haven't yet told anyone my birthday plans as I'm looking for a budget friendly, suitable option. I privately messaged Ava, asking her to maybe change plans or cancel them because I was planning on celebrating my birthday the same way, around the same time.
I recognize that I'm insecure, but I'm just being honest with myself that her planned get-together will outshine my birthday party. She is quite a bit more well off than I am, hence her budget is much higher, I just don't want everyone talking about how amazing her hangout was when my party would be around the same time, and wouldn't live up to her higher-set expectations.
She refused, telling me that I'm being unreasonable and selfish for wanting to stand out and that I should find other plans if I'm so unhappy with the coincidence. She had gone to then tell everyone that I was trying to ruin our friendgroup's summer plans, and now I'm sort of ignoring her in conversations.

TL;DR: AITA for wanting my friend to cancel her get-together because my birthday was set up the same way and I didn't want her to outshine me?",AmItheAsshole
" for telling my mom that if she wants a servant so bad, she can either hire one, or pay me?","I (20M) still live with my mom (42F). I know it's generally seen as weird to still be an adult and living with my mom, but unfortunately, it's for money reasons. It's a lot easier to live together and contribute to the bills than find a place on my own, or with roommates. If I could, I'd have moved out a long time ago. Anyway, I'd like to start this by saying my mother is incredibly lazy. I'm not saying that in a physical sense, because she works out as much as she can. She doesn't like doing *anything* for herself. I need to bring her snacks, I need to get her water, I need to get her meds, I need to go to the store, I need to do her laundry, I need to do *everything* for her. Unless I'm not at home, considering I work full time, just like her. The minute I wake up, to the minute I go to sleep, I'm basically her personal servant. She works from home. I work during the week and have weekends off, and so does she. I clean every single day, and she cleans MAYBE on Sundays, but she only cleans her room. According to her, I'm responsible for every mess in the house (excluding her room), so it's my job to clean it, despite basically never being home. After work she reads or watches TV, after work I continue to work. I basically have to beg to have a day off to relax. 

I should mention that I do pay expenses too. I contribute $200 a month towards utilities and phone bills. She hasn't asked for more, and I'm sure as hell not offering her more. 

Being her personal servant has taken a physical toll on me. I've had a hip condition since 2020, and the work has only made it worse. All the going up and down stairs, back and forth from her room to the kitchen to the living room, etc. I legitimately get yelled at if I don't come fast enough when she summons me. She invades my room and refuses to leave if I'm too slow. She rarely cooks dinner, it's ever rarer that she'd do something for me if I asked. The only time she took care of me was after my unsuccessful hip surgery, and even then I had to quit my crutches a week early to keep up with her demands. I understand that I'm an adult, but I'm fucking exhausted. Whenever I try to bring up how unfair this is, I always get the ""I'm the mother, you're the child. Its a privilege that you still get to live here"" excuse. My final straw was a few days ago, when she yelled at me for not filling up her water before I went to bed, and she woke up thirsty. I yelled at her that if she wanted a fucking servant so badly, she could either hire one, or pay me the amount she could hire one for. She then got more pissed off, and told me if I didn't like living here, I could leave, and live in my own filth. 

I'm now looking for higher paying jobs so I can start saving up to move out. 

Note: When I turned 18, she gave me two options for continuing to live with her; either work full time, or go to school full time. I decided to work, and go to school later, so I could save up money and not have to take out as many student loans.",AmItheAsshole
 for insisting on a parking spot I waited for?,"I was meeting a friend early at a restaurant with a packed parking lot, so I parked at the end of a row to wait for a spot to open up. I didn't put my blinker on—maybe that matters here, not sure. After about 10 minutes, I saw a couple heading towards a car near me, indicating that a spot would soon be free. Suddenly, a car swooped around from behind me, stopped in front of the couple, and began talking to them. They pointed to a spot just a car-length behind me, and this guy started backing up to take it, so I backed up too.

I tried to reason with the guy, but he ignored me at first. When he realized I was in front of the spot, he rolled down his window and claimed, ""I called it."" I was puzzled—what does that even mean? I'd been there for over 10 minutes waiting. The couple then backed him up, saying he asked first. In my mind, parking etiquette is simple: you park, you eat, you leave—you don't own a spot. Just because I was physically waiting and he jumped in front of me doesn't seem fair.

Eventually, he gave up and moved on. But later in the restaurant, I caught him pointing me out to his friends and painting me as the crazy one. So, Reddit, am I the asshole here? I always thought the unspoken rule was that the person who waits in the area first gets the spot, not someone who just shows up and claims it.",AmItheAsshole
" if I ""force"" my GF to put herself in the situation I'm in because I think it'll be better for us? ","My GF lived with MIL in early '23 and then MIL started the process to sell the house with a month or more of possible homelessness for GF and GFs three cats. 
GF moved in with me, but her cats weren't able to. She couldn't bring her cats to family as the family actively said they would put the indoor raised cats outside. I texted my mom to try to see if she could hold them for a month. My mom cleaned out the ""animal"" room by moving the storage from that room to her room (she sleeps in a separate room from stepdad because stepdads dogs lay on his bed, her losing her room because of animals again is not lost on me). The cats end up there for almost 3 months.
Multiple times my mom has helped me and those connected to me. My first serious girlfriend lived there for a bit before I moved out entirely. When I needed money for groceries mom would spot me $30 or $50, when mom'd come by for a day to hang out she'd get me some groceries, she'd regularly help with rent for me and my sister, and I can't be more grateful for that support. It's more than most anyone deserves. 
Well, MIL offered GF a room at MILs new house a few states away. I was incredibly hesitant, knowing how overbearing MIL was to GF, but I still let GF know I would understand and support her decision if we made things long distance. Ultimately, GF chose to stay by me. MIL sweetened the deal with the room being rent-free, still declined, sweetened with land being put in GFs name so GF could build a house, still declined. Finally, I was invited and it was on the table for the both of us. 
I tell everyone that I will be moving with GF, and I have a going away party with friends from work, and a separate one with family. I get the equivalent of $1500 from my mom in the form of a PC on my way out and a statement from mom of ""If you ever need to come back, just give me a call.""
The second day we were here, after a 13-hour drive, FIL made a comment about rent, to which GF blew up as we were told it would be rent-free. Turns out, MIL didn't tell FIL we'd be rent-free.
GF has multiple times said that she hates it here, that she wants to go back to Florida, and GF has also stated that she hates MIL and would want to create space for a while with LC or NC. I have made it clear to GF that my main goal is to leave MIL and FIL completely and go NC.
I've called my mom multiple times after fights between GF and MIL asking for specifics on living there for me and GF. GF regularly says that she would be wholly against living with my mom BUT that she'd come with me if I ever left. I felt terrible hearing that, letting GF know that I want to make GF happy at my own expense and that her saying that actively disincentives me to leaving to where I have my support system back. 
I feel like saving up to move back is the best way forward, and GF agrees, but I know it would be easier to just stay with my mom for a bit to get on our feet.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting someone important to me to enjoy their time with me?,"I am around this person often and they like sharing their hobbies with me. They are a fan of tabletop games, card games, binging shows, and so on. That is not really my forte, but I love enjoying it with them because of how excited it makes them when I do! It has gave me an interest in those things so much so that I learn about them myself.

I like going on hikes and visiting art exhibits. I like bar trivia nights and corny conversations in trashy restaurants. I also need quite a bit of my own time.

Most of this has ever been shared as it doesn’t interest them and the rest is much less frequent than us doing what they want. When I bring up my feelings about it, They feel as though I’m pushing them to do something they don’t want to and I’m being unfair. This usually leads to me dropping it and feeling like an asshole for upsetting them.

Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying no to picking up DH daughter so he can take her to truck fest?,"TLDR: husband wants me to drive a 4hour+ round trip to pick up his older daughter with our 3 month old baby so he can take her to truck fest. 

So little back story: me (34f) and DH(33m) have been together 7 years, married nearly 3. We are a blended family with my two kids, his two kids and our 3 month old baby. DH is a HGV driver and I am on maternity leave. His ex and kids live about 1.5 hours away if no traffic. 

DH has a ticket to go to truck fest next weekend with work. He wants to take his older daughter (11F) with him and she’s happy to go. Problem is that he will be working the Friday and then needs to clean his lorry cab ready to take up to the festival. He would then have to drive to get his daughter so they can go together and the group of them going will be leaving at about 5am or something like that. His mum won’t help with the pick up and his ex refuses to. 

My question is about me doing the journey. I don’t want to do it with the baby. Normally I would go do it before the baby but she is only 3 months old. I have to take my kids to their dads that evening anyway so it would be at least 4 hours in the car. 

She is exclusively breastfed and feeds around every 2 hours during the day with the odd 2-3 hour gap. During the day would be better but would obviously have to be after school/ early evening. This is also our baby’s grumpy part of the day where she cries more and just wants mummy cuddles and b00b. I’ve said I would do it if his ex would meet me half way but she doesn’t want to. 

I just can’t bring myself to put our baby in the car seat for that length of time (there isn’t really anywhere to stop and get her out to feed and stretch out on the route). If DH does the pick up he would get less sleep before having to do the 2-3 hour drive to the festival in the morning. 

WIBTA to stick to my instincts and say sorry but no? Again I would do it and have done it many times before even when they lived even further away so he could do other things. But I know long car journeys are no good for young babies and she will want feeding and to be out of the seat so will probably have to be left to cry until she wears herself out to sleep for most of the journey. Any suggestions? Help!
",AmItheAsshole
 for not yielding to a car while hauling a trailer,"TL;DR: was accused of running someone off a one lane road when I was at almost a dead stop while hauling a horse trailer and she was speeding towards me in a jeep. Was then harassed by her &amp; her dad as I was trying to go home. 


 A few days ago, I was hauling my horse to my friend’s house to ride. Her house is located in an equestrian community — I have hauled over to her place many times over the years and never had any issues. The roads are narrow, down to one lane, but most cars yield when they can when they see my trailer. I know it’s not a law, but I feel most people know that it is common courtesy to yield for larger vehicles in tight spaces. 

The other day, I had an encounter with my friend’s neighbor (possibly an airbnb renter). I was turning around a 90° turn to get to her road, where the road goes from a tight two lane to one, when I noticed that there was a car coming towards me faster than people normally drive in this area. I slowed down but didn’t have anywhere to yield. I drive very carefully when my horse is in the trailer in general as he is very precious to me, but was going even slower to give this person time to make a decision or even just stop to evaluate the situation. 

She didn’t.

She kept speeding along and chose to put her jeep in the shallow ditch at about 25mph instead of pulling into one of the several driveways on “her side” of the road. As she sped along, she was shouting obscenities at me and accusing me of driving her off the road. I shouted back that I have a trailer and couldn’t yield anywhere, but she kept driving and almost hit my trailer to get out of the ditch. 

I brushed it off, had a great ride with my friend, and pulled out of her farm to leave when I noticed two people walking in the middle of the road with their dog. It had been almost 3 hours since the interaction, so I just took it as some people walking their dog. I crawled along the road waiting for them to notice me, as it was still a one lane road. They moved mostly off the road and I gave them the typical hand still one the wheel wave as thanks, when the man stared me down and I realized this is probably the dad of the jeep girl. He then said “don’t wave at me. You’re the one who ran my daughter off the f****** road” 

I was shocked and tried to defend myself by telling him “it’s a single lane and I can’t pull off to the side with a trailer.” I don’t know why I tried to defend myself, when it was now clear that he was waiting for this confrontation and that’s why he had been walking his dog in the road and slow to move out of the road. He &amp; his daughter both yelled more obscenities as I kept rolling away and I shouted another time that I wasn’t going to yield into a deep ditch or mailbox while hauling an expensive horse in an equestrian neighborhood. 

I talked to my friends, and I don’t feel like I did anything wrong except engage with the people. What else could I have done? I’ve been hauling for years and have never had this issue before.",AmItheAsshole
 for yelling at my best friend after he told me he wanted my girlfriend?,"I(22M) have been friends with my best friend ""Luke""(22M) for 15 years, my girlfriend ""Luna""(21F) and I have been together for 2 years now. A couple days ago, Luke and I were hanging out at my place, we were goofing around, playing games, and suddenly Luke got a serious look on his face, he looked at me and told me that he had had a thing for Luna for a while now. I was shocked, I didn't know what to say at first, I just asked him what he meant. He explained that he had always thought Luna was beautiful, and that he had a huge crush on her before me and Luna started exclusively dating, but once I told him I liked her, he backed off. He told me the feelings were always in the back of his head, but that once I mentioned I wanted to propose to Luna soon, his feelings for her grew like a wildfire, he told me he didn't want to hurt me, but he couldn't keep lying to us and himself about it.

He said he might've even loved her, and it hurt him to see me and her together. After my initial shock wore off, the only thing I could ask him was if he was being serious, he said yes. Anger filled my body, and I began yelling at him to stay away from both me and Luna, how I couldn't believe he was saying these things, and a lot of hurtful insults about his checkered past with women. I yelled at him to leave my apartment, and he did. Later, I received numerous messages from him saying how hurt he was.

I'm normally a very docile person, but I was so angry hearing him talk about how he loved Luna. The messages stopped after a few hours, and we haven't spoken in a few days. I haven't told Luna what happened, but I'm still so angry at him. I know I should tell her, but I can't bring myself to start the conversation. I've been thinking about it now, and I really need an unbiased opinion of this situation.

So, AITA for yelling at my best friend after he told me he wanted my girlfriend?

Edit: A lot of you are saying YTA for my yelling, I would like to say that I don't condone violence, nor do I think it was mature of me to yell. In the moment, I was angry and wasn't thinking. I'm going to have a talk with Luna later today about this situation. Thanks to all the people with the kind words.

  
Update one: A lot of you said that Luke might go to Luna before I got the chance, well the people who said that were right. While Luna excused herself for a smoke break at her workplace (she's trying to quit currently) Luke approached her, Luna told me she assumed he'd been waiting in his car for her to come out. 

To make a long story short, Luna told me Luke completely freaked her out, her words were the following: ""He got out of his car and came up to me, I didn't know what he wanted at first, so I was just making friendly conversation. He started spewing all this bs about how you'd been cheating on me with a girl you guys knew in high school, how you admitted it while you two were drinking. He tried telling me that he would be better for me. I felt like I was in a drama movie. He kept trying to hug me, touch me and get in my face, then he tried to kiss me, so I decked him."" 

Luna told me Luke seemed absolutely wasted, and she didn't believe him for a second. After she punched Luke, he ran off to his car and she called me right after and I told her the short version of what happened and said we'd talk when she got home. 

I explained the whole situation once she did get home, and she was rightfully frustrated with me for not telling her sooner but understood my hesitation. We had a long talk about what to do from there. I also got her full permission to post this update on here. We decided that tomorrow we'd speak to Luke together, and I had a good cry while Luna comforted me. I guess the situation didn't set in until now, after hearing what Luke did, I was absolutely disgusted. I apologized to Luna so many times, and she just comforted me. 

On a happier note, I spoke to Luna about how I wanted to marry her, and she said yes. I told her about how I've been saving up for the ring I knew she wanted. It's not exactly how I wanted it to play out, but I'm just glad I get to spend the rest of my life with this beautiful woman.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my dad I don't want to go on a vacation with him?,"Some backstory for context. 

My (23/F) parents (52/F and 58/M) divorced back when I was 5 months old. At the time of marrying him my mom didn't know that he had 4 more kids from 3 different women that he never saw or provided for. They quickly got a divorce after my mom found out he was cheating on her and so I entered his long list of children that he never cared for (At the time of this post there are 6 of us). 

When I was four, my mom started a relationship with the man I consider my father (47/M). Their relationship lasted about three years but they remained good friends and he continued to be a steady father figure in my life. He's now married and my mom was his wife's maid of honor and the godmother to both of their children, so it's safe to say we're all a big happy family. 

Two years ago, my biological dad reached out to me. I had only seen him a handful of times prior to that and he never seemed interested to form any type of relationship. I'm not angry at him for leaving, I had a great childhood and two amazing parents by my side that I wouldn't change for the world, so I wasn't opposed to the idea of meeting him.

In that first meeting he confessed that he was diagnosed with a heart condition and that helped him put things into perspective and realize that his kids are what matters in this world. I had to stop myself from laughing at this point because all his ""kids"" are in their 20's, and out of the 6 of us, only I agreed to meet him. Anyway, he has been making an effort and calls me every once in a while to catch up which has been fine. 

Onto the problem. My bio dad hates my dad. He never met him, but hates the idea of him and tries to compete with him in the most childish of ways, like getting me a new sofa I didn't ask for after he found out that my dad had built me a table for my new apartment (it's his hobby). Usually it's funny and a bit annoying, but it escalated two days ago when he booked a holiday for the two of us on the exact dates that I'm supposed to travel with my dad to France. That's where my dad is from and every year he takes us all to his parents' house for a couple of weeks. It's a tradition going back to when I was a child and obviously I wasn't going to give that up to go on an awkward holiday with a semi-stranger.  


I immediately refused but he began sobbing, saying that I put ""that pervert"" over my blood and how I should be embarrassed for not recognizing how much he's trying to be a part of my life. I was speechless and left without saying anything. At first I felt angry at him for putting me in this situation but my boyfriend says I'm the asshole here because he's my dad and I should try to make an effort too. I don't know though, I'm still so angry and upset. AITA here?  


&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my bf back to cuddle?,"I had a flight to catch today at 8am (spoiler, I missed it).

Last night we got everything ready for the morning and decided to set our alarms.

It takes roughly an hour to get to the airport, and I wanted to be there 1.5h before the flight there (no checked in luggage so it usually only takes me ~30/40 min) so we decided to wake up at 5am to leave at 5.30am.

Now, we both knew and agreed tho this.

Morning comes, the alarms ring, and we wake up. My bf gets up very quickly and goes out of the room without saying anything. I hear him go to the study to continue setting up a laptop.he started doing last night before we went to sleep. Now, normally we wake up, cuddle, then get ready and leave. So I call to him ""hey, don't you want to cuddle?"" He shouts back yes and comes to bed. We snuggle, all is good. 5.22, I'm slowly starting to get ready (took a shower the night before so I wouldn't have to in the morning) so I just needed to get dressed in my pre-planned outfit, takes me only around 2 minutes
Again, 5.22 he asks me again, what time do we want to leave? And I respond, 5.30, like we said.

He goes to take a shower. I'm.thinking oh this will be close, I remind him what the time is at 5.28 and 5.30, starting to stress out a bit. He keeps saying yes I'm.comkng out, gets out at 5.32 and then gets ready. We got in the car around 5.40, so 10 minutes after we agreed.

Now, 10 minutes is not a lot and usually would be okay, it's the fact that on our way there was a crash and   we were stuck in traffic for forever, not sure exactly how long. I get to the airport with 26 minutes till my flight takes off, run through the airport to get to my gate and be told it just closed, less than 5 minutes before I got there. Its 7.51am. 

Now, his point of view is that even if he didn't get ready late we mightve still been stuck in the traffic even longer. That's true, but I think we would've been at the front of it so I'd still have the extra 10.minutes. 

Another thing is, he's upset im blaming him for driving late. He says, that he did get up at 5 but I called him back to bed to cuddle. I said to him that that's true, but he knows the time we want to leave by so if he wanted to take a shower (which I didn't know about) it's up to him to get up and cut the cuddling short if he knows he needs more time getting ready. I don't think it's my fault just because I asked if he wanted to cuddle, I feel like if I knew I still needed to shower I'd cuddle for a bit and get up in time to shower and get ready by the time we agreed on, however he doesn't see it that way.

I know this whole situation would've been completely irrelevant if not for the traffic jam, but the 10 extra minutes would've been the make or break in this situation for me. 

Maybe im just stubborn and can't see that it is partially my fault for us leaving late, like he says. I just think it's not up to me to make sure he gets up and ready on time. 

AITA for calling my bf back to bed to cuddle?",AmItheAsshole
 for not canceling my birthday plans?,"I (19f) have two jobs, a new puppy, and go to school (online). I used to go to college but after some mental stuff I went online and I live at home with my family. Anyways, I have been very busy.

So all of my friends go to the college I used to go to. They are all men (Ik pick me girl). Before I got my second job and my puppy I would visit them often. They go to a pretentious school and can be flooded with school work. So I would work on my school work with them and when they had some free time we would play DND.

My birthday falls during finals week and lucky for me my school ends before. I cleared my schedule for a few days so I could enjoy my birthday. 

I recently got a text from my friend who runs the campaign. He said that I should cancel my plans for my birthday because they want to play DND that day instead. (The plans are with my family and not them).

They are saying that that is the only time they all can play(There are 9 of them). I asked if they can just play without me, but they said I had agreed to do it weeks before (I didn’t). He also says that he’s spent a long time planning this and I will ruin it if I don’t go (I don’t understand why)? 

I’m more annoyed about this because I throw parties for them, but they don’t do the same for me.

There are 9 people and majority wins, but it is also my birthday…

AITA?








",AmItheAsshole
" for ""judging"" my dad for damaging someone else's property?","So my father \[64\] and I \[m38\] were on a walk in our neighborhood and we passed by this really nice colonial style property with like carriage house and whatnot and a 4-5’ white picket fence along the parameter. Behind that fence are even taller thick privacy bushes. About mid way along that parameter, behind the fence there is a break in the bushes there in 6-7’ high stump of a tree that old weathered and termite eaten and what not but serves essential the same purpose as the privacy shrubs. My father took his walking stick and started poking at and breaking away parts of the inside of the tree, that faced the street, nothing majorly destructive just little bits and pieces. I exclaimed “Dad!” and apparently shook my head as I continued on our walk. 

This prompted my father then to ask a series of bizarre questions about my childhood that he very well knows the answer to, like was I picked on as a kid? Did I have trouble in school, the culmination of which was him asking if I knew why I was so judgmental? According to him me exclaiming “Dad!” and shaking my head is me judging him. I responded that yeah ‘cause I don’t think that its right to damage peoples property or to assume that someone would be okay with me doing so. This is apparently my projecting my beliefs on to other people and that it's okay for him to do that because he decided that it's okay.

I obviously find this to be absolutely asinine but when he asked who says its not okay to do whatever you want to someone else property, the best I could come up with is “the world” partly out of frustration, partially out of just the absurdity of the argument. and how there is no way in hell he would let someone take this stance with him. or if I had ever behaved like that as a kid! It ended up with me trying to end the conversation when he just flat out denied asking a question that I was responding to. so I said I was done, which he continued to keep talking so I turned around and walked away. to which he chided “You’re going the wrong way” 

tl:dr I have the judgmental belief that you no one has the right to damage other people property because they’ve decided that its okay for them to do so.",AmItheAsshole
 for moving someone’s clothes to the dryer in an apartment laundry room?,"My (29M) girlfriend(29F) and I live in an area of townhouse apartments. At the end of the row is a basement with shared washers and dryers. You use an app to activate them and it sends you an alarm when the loads finish. The area also has signs up saying to be on time when your clothes finish. 


Well today my fiancé and I came down and needed to use 2 of the 4 washing machines. 3/4 of them had one persons clothes in them. The timer had run out and the machines weren’t running(they continue to spin for 10 minutes after the load finishes). There has been a large issue of people not getting their clothes in time and management has sent out emails about it. 
We move one load of laundry into the dryer and then use the 2 machines to do our laundry. 


After we load up our clothes and start the machines, a girl who looked maybe 25-30 years old walk in and said ,”Where are my clothes?!” And we said we moved them to the dryer for them since we had no clue when they would return. They said,”I’m uncomfortable when people touch my underwear, that’s weird.”
My girlfriend said,”Girl, you’re in a shared communal space. You have to get your clothes in time, other people need these machines.” Then it started to ramp up and the girl said,”well I need to wash my clothes again! Will you be here to hurry up and take your clothes out????” And my gf said,” Yea because I’ll be here to take mine out when they’re done.” And the girl said,”Well what I want you to do is stfu.” I held my Gf shoulder to calm her down and the girl walked out. As soon as she closed the door we heard her scream something. AITA, should we have done half our laundry and come back later to do the other half? ",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad at a family friend's kid for bringing outside food into a restaurant?,"My mom and her work friend hang out often outside of work, and our respective families tag along so we all know each other semi-well. My mom and her close work friend recently hosted a small business party at a brewery together. They reserved multiple tables at the threshold of the inside outside part of the venue and they got multiple plates of chips pretzels etc. I (20F) was hanging out at one of the tables with my dad when my mom's work friend's daughter Danielle(16F) walked in with a huge paper bag. I assumed this was a gift for my mom or something until she proceeded to pull out two full plates of food and a drink from the adjacent food court. I pointed out the multiple no outside food/drinks signs Danielle had walked past and she said she haden't noticed the signs. I told her she might get yelled at or kicked out for having outside food and everyone laughed it off. 

  
About 5 minutes later a server walked up to Danielle and told her that outside food wasn't allowed. I laughed at her and told Danielle ""I told you so."" Later I noticed her sneak sips of her drink, and when she finished it she left the empty drink on the table. 

This is where I may have been the asshole. When I noticed the empty drink on the table I leaned in and told her that if she didn't pick it up when she left I would ""freak out"", because when I worked as a server I would have to pick up the empty Starbucks people brought in EVERY DAY. Danielle proceeded to tell me that wasn't her problem. I was pretty POed by that, but I just stopped talking to her and chatted with my dad. 

My dad and Danielle's dad were talking about it later and they seemed to think that since this was a party that was bringing in a lot of money to the brewery the servers shouldn't have brought up the outside food. They also called me a ""rule follower"" for bringing up the issue in the first place.

  
I have a lot of customer service beef from work so I am open to the idea that I may have been bringing some baggage into the situation. I do very much need to hang out with Danielle again so I need to work this out on my own as much as possible. Please let me know: was I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for banning my MIL coming to my house?,"  I in my late 30's thru IVF now 8 mothns pregnant, it was roller coaster for us to get pregnant. I had 3 operations, 2 failed transfer, and finally made it. We live with 2 Cats, MIL keep asking to my Hubby if we have plans to have Baby, we just said when time comes, we didnt tell her about the procedure.Every month she comes to us because i cut her Hair so she can save money going to salon, Im not prof. but I enjoy doing it, since my relationship to my Hubby i cut his hair for 6 years now, it really did save us money . One day we  invited MIL for Dinner and asked my Hubby if i can color her Hair, im hesitant due to pregnancy I don't want to inhale Chemicals, i can't say no either so i did it, i just put face mask on. During Dinner finally Hubby informed her that i am Pregnant, she casually says ok and says if we Informed the CATS already &amp; did they allow me being pregnant, she is a Cat mom too, i was speechless she didnt even say congratulation to her Son, then she adds that she hates Kids they always crying and Loud, keep repeating how she annoyed with Kids and don't want near them. My Hubby asked her if she has something good to say after all the effort i made but she didn't nudge. At that point I could kick her out but i keep my cool down and think of my Baby, so i keep quiet until she left, my Husband look at me with horror in his eyes he knows my temperament. I told him from now on I don't want to see her or come to house or he mention her name on me, or even after birth to see the Baby. Every time MIL calls my Hubby either he ignores her calls or he goes out outside to answer to avoid me being upset. My Hubby rants sometimes about his Mom, he's upset also coz he has nobody to talk with over his frustration only me but i get annoyed when it's about her.. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 if I insisted that my roommate share the space in the bathroom and kitchen equally.,"I (20M) have a roommate (20F). She recently moved in with me as my other roommate dropped out of college.

We are both working on campus this summer and have school again next semester.

I had major issues with my prior roommate as he was a total inconsiderate slob and the new one has actually been a lot nicer and we are kind of becoming friends.

However I am feeling a bit of resentment building up because she has encroached on most of the available free space in the bathroom. This is my first time living with a girl that isn't my mom but the amount of makeup she owns seems unusual. She will always wear makeup any time she leaves the place.

She also has loads of shoes (not including the ones she keeps in her room). She has also put a lot of things like appliances in the kitchen cabinets.

Now here's the thing, I wasn't using most of the space before and still have space for my stuff but I am scared that if i ever got more stuff for some reason, I'd lack space. She says I can use her kitchen stuff but it still feels weird since it isn't mine. I barely cook complicated things and usually just buy frozen, microwavable meals. 

WIBTA if I asked her to keep stuff in her room if it starts taking up more than half the available space? Maybe just for the bathroom, I feel like it might not go well for the kitchen and create animosity especially considering she frequently shares meals and baked goods with me that are extra.",AmItheAsshole
 if I take my brothers garbage house job? ,"My brother gets paid weekly by our landlord to take our garbage and recycling out. But he has been incredibly lazy, he hangs out 24/7 and is a stoner but anyways what he does is he will take some of the garbage and put it in a bag or take some of the recycling and put it in a bag. He will never take the entire bag out and put in front for collection. He’s half assing it and it’s annoying, I like to do things in a orderly way. I can get paid and do a good job with the garbage so I was thinking to tell him to give up the job and I’ll take it. Thoughts? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting my future MIL and SIL to my hen do?,"I (31F) am getting married to Tom (30M) in the summer after getting engaged in Jan.

A bit of backstory; Tom isn’t close to his parents and sister. They don’t tell him they’re proud of him or show him affection which is the total opposite of my family. MIL and SIL are also very different people to us which is fine, each to their own but if they weren’t related, they wouldn’t have had any sort of a relationship. At the beginning, his family made an effort with me but after a few months they stopped. We moved in together 6 months into our relationship and still lived very close to our families. We’d invite everyone round often and we saw my family very regularly but his family didn’t make the effort. His parents came round a couple of times for dinner but his sister would ignore any invitations from us (not even a polite, I’m sorry but I can’t make that date) and she never invited us round. We’ve since moved an hours flight away or a 4.5 hour train and the effort has been even more lacking. I invited them all up for Tom’s 30th and they all declined saying they only wanted to celebrate if he came to them. Eventually his parents did come up but his sister still hasn’t bothered to come visit us.

After we got engaged, his family were very excited about it which took us by surprise and they definitely seem to be making more of an effort with him which is nice to see. For my hen, I didn’t invite mums as I didn’t feel like I would be able to relax properly so I did a separate ‘bridal shower’ for my mum, stepmum, MIL and SIL to still include them. I reached out to MIL and SIL in Feb and was told they wouldn’t come to where I live. Fine. Then when I asked dates, SIL told me she was busy on X weekends and when I asked ok what weekends was she free, I was ignored. My stepmum offered to take over organising and  got the same treatment until MIL called my stepmum to say they didn’t have a single day from Feb - Aug that they could celebrate. I’ve not received a message apologising that they can’t make it. In the call MIL told my stepmum, out of context, that the daughter of their close family friend (30F) had had an agreement to marry Tom if they were still single at 27. For some reason they are enamoured with her so it felt like a personal dig. SIL also told Tom (after she knew he was proposing) that the four of them would be ‘forever’ and that me and her bf were just add ons. There’s a lot more that’s gone on but it’s just made me feel very unwelcome and not liked.

Tom’s sorting his stag and gets on with his dad, my dad and stepdad so extended the invitation to SIL’s boyfriend. She saw and messaged my mum and stepmum about whether the bridal shower was separate and it’s weird she hasn’t been invited to my hen do (I’m sure she knew my hen do was already sorted ages ago and she was trying to make a point). I’ve since tried to ask for a phone call to maybe sort things out but, again, she’s ignored me. 

So AITA for not inviting MIL and SIL to my hen do?
",AmItheAsshole
 For Disinviting Friend to BBQ Over My Garden,"Throwaway since some people who know me may be connected.

I'm planning a BBQ for an upcoming holiday, and recently sent the invites. A friend who has been to my house asked if they could bring their SO. I said that was fine. It's important to know that I am an avid gardener and have a vegetable garden along with a pollinator garden in my yard.

Then they said that their SO is very allergic to bee stings (like carries an epipen allergic). I said that was understandable, and we can just eat indoors. I can accommodate the party size inside, and if the weather is nice, I can just keep the windows and doors open (all have screens) to bring the outdoors in.

The response was ""well, I don't want to disrupt your plans too much, and it would be nice to be out on your patio. {My SO} has a repellant spray they can bring to keep the bees away from your patio while we do the BBQ."" I asked them to send me the specs of the spray, and if it isn't harmful, that might be a solution.

It's a pyrethrin spray. Yes, it does have some repellent qualities, but mostly, it just kills most insects, and is extremely harmful to bees. I said that I would not be spraying that in my yard and sent information that it is harmful to bees and other helpful insects. But they're still welcome to come and we can eat indoors with no risk of bee stings (the risk is low anyway since I mostly get bumbles and they're very docile...I have never been stung in my yard/garden, even though I come in close contact with the bees regularly!).

They ended up declining the invite, and apparently told some mutuals that I was being difficult about making the yard safe for the SO I've never met to attend. I've tried to explain to them that I'm not willing to kill the pollinators that make my yard WORK, and that I offered to move the meal indoors, but I've gotten mixed responses. Half the group says I'm fine and I shouldn't bug bomb my yard for one person, and the other half says my neighbors are probably spraying those pesticides (and they might be right), so what harm is one application in my yard going to do. AITA?

Edit based on comment (THANK YOU!). The first move on friend's part was to decline, then rally friends to try to get me to change my mind, and when I wouldn't back down, I rescinded their invitation. Some friends are pressuring me to accept the spray so our mutual friend can come with SO. Friend who was the original invitee won't come without SO in this case.",AmItheAsshole
 for getting upset at work?,"I manage a small office only about 8 employees including myself. I am F/38. Everyone I work with are younger than me all Females range from 23-28. We decided to have a pot luck and all bring in home made food. Pot luck day arrives and everyone is raving about this Agua Fresca that a coworker made. When it's my turn to try it I pour it out of the jug and the lid comes off and the Agua Fresca spills all over the counter, desk, myself, my shoes etc. I was shocked and I ran to clean it. After it's clean we all eat and the 24/F that made it starts questioning me for the rest of the day. 'How could you be so dumb and not know how to pour juice' 'next time you should ask' 'Thank you for ruining our pot luck and our day' 'I didn't even bring the juice for you and you had to ruin it as always' ' I  didn't even make it for you in the first place' ' I stayed up until 11 PM to make this and you ruined it' Mind you,  there is still a full jar left.  I excuse myself to change my clothes come back and they are still talking about me and how I ruined it and I'm getting questioned as to why I'm upset and that it was all fun and jokes. She did end up apologizing but when I asked her what she was apologizing for she said I don't know I just see you're upset. AITA for feeling upset about this and not accepting her apology?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting cancel plans with my bestfriend to spend time with my girlfriend after a fight. ,"Context:

Recently my bestfriend (26F) moved into the same city and she's been going through a tough time recently. She just broke up with her boyfriend (3-4 year relationship) and she was house hunting because she got kicked out of her previous house although she found a new one recently. Considering all this I wanted be a good friend by offering her to use my car to move some of her stuff to her new house. However, my girlfriend is now asking me to cancel plans with her and spend time with her instead. 

Me (25M) and my girlfriend (26F) have been dating for over a year now. We both work in jobs that require us to go on frequent field visits which means there are 1-2 week stretches where we don't see each other and have to keep in touch via video calls, phone calls and so on. This time we had a really bad fight during our time away from each other and now she wants me to cancel my plan with my best friend so that we can spend the day with each other talking about what happened and also have quality time with each other. 

My girlfriend's ex treated her really badly in the relationship and would deprioritise her all the time to go hang out with his friends. So, when I told her that I can't do that because I had made a commitment to help my best friend move into her new house it triggered her. She's telling me now that she would be fine with me hanging out with her on any other day and  the primary reason of asking me to do this is because of the fight and how long we've been away from each other. 

I finally caved and told her that I would spend the day with her but I can't help but feel like I would resent her for making me do this. Now, I also feel really guilty for now ditching my best friend.

So, I guess AITA for ditching my bestfriend or AITA for not wanting to cancel plans in the first place to spend time with my gf and talk about our fight. 


TLDR: My girlfriend has asked me to cancel plans with my bestfriend to spend time with her instead.",AmItheAsshole
 For wanting my fiancé to drink less caffeine?,"Lately I have been concerned about the amount of caffeine my fiancé consumes. While he doesn't do this every single day, there are multiple days of the week where he is consuming a LOT of caffeine (like more than the general daily recommendation 400-600mg). There are days he will start with a cup of pour over coffee or two, then get a coffee from a coffee shop while at work. He always orders the largest size they have with an extra shot. That's his default, regardless of how much other coffee he's had that day. While less common I've also seen him pound two energy drinks like Prime back to back (also after having pour over or some other coffee that morning, even a large extra shot latte). I do believe he has a higher caffeine tolerance...he's 6'4 but not super heavy set. However...

The real kicker is he just had a cousin who was relatively healthy and young (like 35) just die randomly from heart failure. So there is definitely some concern if heart issues run in the family or not. The other part I find frustrating is I feel like he just can't be bothered on this topic. Like I've told him I'd feel a lot better if he just got large coffees without the extra shot, or multiple energy drinks like just not being excessive about it. 

He seems unwilling to compromise. He feels that it's not an issue at all and needs overwhelming evidence that's it's risky and has been finding any medical journals he can that prove ""it's not that risky or not enough evidence to show"". While most basic evidence shows it's just healthier to stick to 400-600mg a day. 

I feel like he's being really stubborn by just not addressing my concerns. He's almost 40 and 10 years older than me. We're talking of having kids in the future I don't like his unwillingness to validate my concerns more than anything. I want him to be healthy and live a long time. Am I being the a\*\*hole by asking for him to reduce his caffeine content a little? Thanks in advance. ",AmItheAsshole
UPDATE:  is told my husband to stop supporting his adult daughter,"
Hello everyone!

Ive shown this to my husband to open up his mind a little and he apologized. He said he needed time to think for days and came up with a solution. He’s cutting his daughter off. She just called to remind him about the weekly allowance and when he said we can’t afford right now she just started crying hysterically and told us how selfish we are. All this while knowing how we are now behind rent.

To those asking, yes she knows about the accident. She even knows now we are behind rent but still blames us as to why she wont be getting support anymore.

My husband used to say i have a patience of a saint and i just cracked now because it’s too much. We need to care for our own son too BUT since he’s still being supportive and everything is being taken care of in regards of our kid i didn’t feel the need to include him in the equation. He’s a good dad and that will never change.

I messaged his ex to know how much she’s charging her for rent so we could do half she was surprised because she’s not charging her anything and is frustrated because all she does is party every weekend. Apparently it’s not dental implants he paid for, it’s veneers and just cosmetic.

Thank you reddit! My husband and I are going to counseling but he apologized and that’s a big step.",AmItheAsshole
 for ruining family vacation plans?,"AITA for ruining family vacation?

Important background: My MIL is 85. She has always been kind to me, and I respect and love her. FIL passed away a few years ago, and she lives alone but stays busy with friends. We live a 6-hour flight away from her and see her 2x each year.

The issue: MIL announced last year that she would like us all to take a 2-week trip over Christmas to have a family reunion in her birth country. She said she and FIL always wanted to do this, she wasn’t sure she’d be able to travel much longer given her age, and she will pay all costs for all the grandchildren. This is a lot of money for her.

I am not enthusiastic. It will still cost a lot of $ for flights for my husband and I, and require us to use most of our leave from work for the year. (We both work full time.) Also, we have a 3.5 yo child, which makes the logistics of the trip difficult; my energetic kid simply cannot sit still and behave for the 15-hr flight, plus another 3-hr drive to the destination after we land. The time zone difference will throw off Kiddo too, and I know that I’ll end up telling my husband to go have fun with his family while I stay behind with multiple toddler tantrums. Then, when we get home, we’ll have to readjust Kiddo all over again, so realistically it will cost more time off work. 

My husband has mixed feelings. He loves and enjoys his family and doesn’t want to disappoint his mom, but he knows this trip will be hard for us. He is a people pleaser, and both his mom and I have strong personalities, so he probably does not want to upset either of us. I told my husband he should just go alone, but he doesn’t want to do that because then he would miss Christmas with his wife and kid. 

He told MIL we’d love to do a family reunion trip closer to home, and we’d pay our own way, but that this particular trip would not be feasible for us while Kiddo is so young. She cried and said she’s already paid for the hotels. He offered to pay her back for our share (although we never agreed to this plan or had a say in the hotel, etc), but she refused. We know it’s not really about the money, she is sad the trip will not be happening as she hoped. 

My husband then called his sister to tell her that we are not going, and his sister said that if we are not going, then her family (husband and 2 older kids) will not go either, as it is too much of a $ and time commitment for what will not actually be a family reunion without us. She lives near her mom and plans to tell her mom this weekend. I know this will devastate MIL. 

I think I may be TA for causing a generous older woman who has always been kind to me to cry. And for inadvertently causing others to pull out of her dream trip, too. AITA for not sucking it up this time, and inadvertently being the domino that caused my MIL’s whole family reunion dream to collapse?",AmItheAsshole
 FOR NOT SHARING MY EARNED WORK PERFORMANCE BONUS WITH MY WIFE,"I've been working at a company for 5 years now and occasionally when we have outdone ourselves we are awarded points that can later be redeemed for prizes such as gift cards.

I recently pooled my points for a $500 cabelas card and my wife opened it when it came in the mail. She was mad that I had no intention of letting her spend it or choose what we bought with it as I said it was something I earned and won and deserved to spend on me.

 We have a joint account so my salary and money is our money and I get a generous bonus at xmas which I give 100% of to the families needs or wants. 

Her issue is she doesn't work for a company that gives points or gifts so it's not fair that I get something like that and she doesn't. She claims it should be ours not mine and I should want to share it. 

I strongly disagree and am wondering if I am the selfish one and if I am the A-hole here. 

In 5 years of working with this company I've received a $1000 card card which was for me a $1000 home depot card which I used for the house and family needs and now a 500 cabelas card. ",AmItheAsshole
" for telling my mom to leave after she said my husband is obviously a better dad than my daughter’s dad, in front of my daughter? ","Sorry the title is so long and confusing. My husband and I are both in our 30s, we are expecting our first child very very soon. I also have another daughter who is 8, with my ex. We were together for a few years before having our daughter, but then he met someone else and decided to leave. This was when our daughter was only two, so she doesn’t know much about what happened. 

My ex didn’t really want to very involved in our lives or co-parenting because he wanted to “start over”, anyways I didn’t want my daughter spending so much time with someone who didn’t even want to. So he got to see her a weekend a month. His new wife treats her politely and he always makes an effort to have fun with her and ask her about what happened since they last met. They are obviously not as close as ideally a dad and his kid would be, but it is alright. 

My mom was very angry about the whole deal because she told me when my ex and I were dating that she didn’t think this would end well. She was right and I fully accept that. She thought it was very unfair that her grandchild would not have a good relationship with her dad, at least the kind of relationship she would have wanted her to have. (That is a horrible sentence. Sorry.) 

Anyways, the current situation: my mom is staying with me for a few weeks because my due date is very soon. Yesterday I heard her tell my husband that she knows he’s going to be a much better dad than my daughter’s dad is, because he obviously loves his child a lot already. My daughter was also there and she said no, my dad loves me too. I was upstairs but I was trying to come down because I didn’t think this was headed anywhere good. My mom told my daughter that she shouldn’t lie to herself, what kind of a dad only wants to see their kid once a month. My daughter ended up crying almost all day.  I kind of lost it and told her I don’t want her staying for the birth, she was also angry and left, and now I feel guilty. She means well, and maybe she’s right that I shouldn’t mislead my daughter about how much her dad cares. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom I won't pay for babysitting?,"Last Mother's Day I took my son to my mother's to spend time with her. As soon as we walked in she complained we didn't bring flowers. (I had told her years ago I wasn't going to exchange gifts anymore in what is a whole other story). 
A week earlier my son had asked her if she would be watching him over the summer. I wanted to go a different route because of the stress she brings me but was willing cause it's what my son wanted. She wanted me to provide her with lunches which was fine. 
But on Mother's Day she was complaining that my brother, who is 55 years old and lives with her, was working but not paying rent. She said ""your brother's not paying me rent so you'll have to pay the babysitter"". I said ""We'll go a different route."" 
The next day she texted saying how upset she was. I said it was wrong tonask me for money because of my brother. We've had very limited contact for the past year because of it. So am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for falling asleep with my sister?,"So yeah this is basically as ridiculous as it sounds. I'm a 25 year old guy, I live with my 23 year old girlfriend. Right now my younger sister (16) is staying with us for a few weeks as my mom is in the hospital. I was never very close with my sister, I moved out when I was 18 and I only came home on Christmas for a few days. But when my mom went to the hospital she asked me if I could take care of my sister until she's back and of course I agreed because we don't have any other family apart from our grandparents who are both disabled and in a care home. 

Having my sister with us has been great, at least for me. I finally have someone to watch shows on netflix with, play board games with (my girlfriend hates them). My girlfriend and my sister don't really talk to each other, they have completely different personalities and interests and they don't really get along. 

But anyway, two nights ago I was watching a movie with my sister in her room (our guest bedroom), the movie ended at 1am and I wanted to go to bed but my sister asked me if we could watch something else as she wasn't really tired. So I made us some popcorn and we ended up watching another film. I don't even know when but I fell asleep during the movie. I woke up at 9 so I went downstairs for breakfast, my girlfriend was already up. And that's when the fighting started. She was extremely angry at me for not coming back to bed, I told her that I just fell asleep but she kept yelling at me. We ended up having a pretty big fight and she's been giving me the silent treatment ever since and she told me to sleep in my sister's room from now on. I think she's being ridiculous, so does my sister. But I wanted to get an outside perspective. So AITA here?",AmItheAsshole
 if i stopped talking to my dad?,"My (16f) dad (49m) lives in another country because of my parents divorce, so our only means of communication is through calls and texts, sometimes visits if my mother allows it. And recently, for no apparent reason, he started threatening to take my cat away. I’m a straight A+ student, and he knows that. I haven’t done anything wrong, at least to my knowledge. But lately he’s just been insufferable to call. Always mentioning my grades, and only talking about that btw. If it’s not about my grades, it’s about my cat. Yesterday, I sent a picture of a water fountain for the cat, extremely cheap, and I was gonna buy it with my own money but I needed my step mom, who’s an experienced pet owner, to see if it’s good. And he replied back with saying ‘I’m not buying anything for the cat, only the food.’ And I said ok, didn’t argue with him because if he says no, it means no. But then he kept saying, enough, keep talking and I’m taking the cat away. I have no clue what’s going on with him, or if I’m being spoiled and over dramatic. But WIBTA if I cut contact with him?

(Dunno if I explained it well enough, or if this is the right subreddit. Also for more context my dad was supportive of the cat and paid for its vet visits. And it’s not an issue of me taking care of it since I’m extremely careful with its health and such.)",AmItheAsshole
 Am I selfish for asking for things? ,"Am I the assh0le?

I am 16 F. I have asked my mom we will call Star if I could see a therapist (which I have been asking for for 2 or 3 years now). I have also asked her if I could see a dentist so I can get my retainer fixed and if I can see an eye doctor because my eye sight is slowly declining ( I have been asking for 5 months).  Star says this is really stressful and that I am being selfish. I also asked her last week if she could take me to get my nails done with my own money. I am trying to keep myself in good health mentally and physically, and I feel kind of bad for asking for multiple things. My mom works night shifts, and so she often forgets the things I say because I see her when she just wakes up. Which I try to be understanding about. My mother is kind at times, but maybe she is too stressed. I also have a father who helps my mother. ( My parents are open about their financial situation with us) My parents are paying for my medical stuff. 

Background info
 My brother 15  is sneaking out at night, and it is also adding to the stress. She is claming my 11 year old brother is verbal abusing her in the morning causing her more stress. 

Am I the asshole for asking for so many things?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my mom she is a dummy?,"My dad, my mom, my brother, my grandma, and I were all in the living room having a good time, making jokes and roasting one another. We were all so joyous until I had to come in and ruin the mood by making an evidently hazardous joke. To add context, the question my brother was answering was things at a football game, where he answered with dummies. I made an off the cuff joke without thinking and blurted out, ""But Mom’s not  at a football match."" Almost immediately, the mood in the room shifted and everyone shared how they felt that what I said was not nice before my mom began to cry and started heading back to her room. She came back later to talk to me where she reminded me about her insecurity that she had about being told she was dumb because she was told that all her life and as a kid as well as that it hurt that it hurt that it was *her son* telling her these things. my dad came in later to tell me that it was rude because of how directed it was towards.

I have realized that I may have made a mistake in speaking before I thought and so frivolously and not recognizing/remembering my mom's insecurities. The biggest thing I think I goofed on was forgetting exactly what ""dummy"" meant, not really realizing I was calling her an idiot. I do think I should've chosen someone else, though I did just reach the hand om my mind into an imaginary hat and pull out a random name which happened to be hers.

TL;DR: I called my mom a dummy as a joke which hit an insecurity I didn't think of and that it hurt to hear that from her son.

Edit: I should mention some of the other jokes that were said. I called my dad a vegetable, hinting that he was brain dead which nobody had a problem with and my brother called me the forgotten son which I and nobody else minded.

Edit 2: another thing to add is that she even called us all dummies at the beginning of the round so that might change some things",AmItheAsshole
 for quitting the show right before tech week?,"i (18f) have been doing props for my high schools senior show. so far i have done nearly all of the work and have received very little help or communication from the director(17nb) let’s call them jack. they have not told me how they want things done until we’ve already done them and according to them we’ve done them wrong. they have ignored all of our texts and attempts to communicate. finally i have decided to have an in person conversation with them and brought along 2 of my friends to help me articulate as well as to have witnesses to the conversation. we had a productive conversation and resolved our communication issues. after our conversation jack went to our teacher and stage manager (18m) (let’s call him chad) and told them we were ganging up on them. later i have tried to bring it up to chad but he completely ignored it and defended jack as well as yelling at my friends who were present at the conversation. now they are giving us a silent treatment. my friends and i decided that we have had enough and told jack and our teacher that we’re quitting. now they’re saying that we should stay as the tech week is next week. i feel like jack and chad don’t really care about our wellbeing, they just want us to do the work for the show.  so am i the asshole for quitting with so little notice?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to share my birthday with my partner’s family?,"We see them twice a year which is holidays and during the summer which so happens to land on my birthday for the past 3 years. This year seems to be no different as there are talks of them coming down again. We live farther away due to my partner’s job so a visit from any of our family is a whole ordeal as they are over for at least a week to make the trip worth it. They originally wanted to come down for one of their grandchildren’s birthdays but my partner will be away for work, and they naturally want to see both of them if they plan to fly. 

My partner’s job makes it difficult to request time off - and so he chooses birthdays/holidays months in advance to prevent a deny and to save his time for special days. He has requested my birthday off already and we are waiting to see if it’s accepted. I have stated - for the past few years (including this one) that I do not want to share or entertain anyone on my birthday. I want my gift to be some alone time with him as he is gone a lot because of his type of work. As my partner only takes birthdays or holidays off, mine has been the most convenient for visiting. 

I understand we live far and family never gets to see us. I do not mind them coming to visit if it was any other day. They are nice and have taken me out to do things on previous birthdays (but we go out irregardless when we see them). However, my partner is making me feel selfish or unreasonable for not wanting them to come down for that week. He keeps stating it’s our opportunity to have a babysitter to go out (which we never do), and we will have alone time and can get hotels for the special day. I don’t think we have that type of money to go out with family and also pay for hotels just for some time for ourselves. I’d rather have alone time with him when the kids are at school. 

So am I the asshole for being upset that I have to share my birthday with my partner’s family who we only see twice a year as they want to visit on my partners days off which usually lands on my birthday as it is difficult for him to take time off?",AmItheAsshole
 if I tell the neighbours kids to be quiet?,"I (28F) live in an apartment building in the centre of town. The apartments are nice with a mixture of couples and families. Each floor has 2 apartments, the apartments sharing the hallway/landing area. A new family moved into the apartment across from me a few months ago. They seems nice, I don't speak to them much but when I see them on the stairs they are friendly. They have at least 4 kids, I say at least because I'm not sure I've ever seen them altogether at once. 

The kids make a lot of noise, and the walls in this place are thin. Bad enough they making noise in their own apartment, but they seem to enjoy playing in the landing, aka, right outside my door. They play with trucks etc, kick a football, shout etc right outside my door. 

For months I said nothing about this, even said nothing the multiple times I've had to dodge tripping over small children and getting a football to the head on my way in or out of my place. I figured ""kids will be kids"" and I also don't want to be the mean bitch next door.

But it's been months, and I'm working a lot lately, and I'm tired and I want to take a nice little nap but all I can near are kids shouting and a football hitting the wall. It's taking everything I have not to tell them to piss off and give out to their parents for letting them play in the hallway.

But if I do that AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not quitting my employment to go to my best friend's graduation?,"My (26/M) best friend (26/F) lives in my home country, I moved to the US a decade ago. I visit my country every year or two. She's graduating this May and I had planned to travel to attend her graduation ceremony but my vacation time at work was not approved. She's upset and telling me to quit my job so I can go and ""just find another one later"". 

 I saved up for the trip, but I obviously need my job to pay my rent, food, etc. I don't even have that much money in savings so as to survive while I job hunt without eating up my small emergency fund if I were to take the bad decision (in my opinion) to quit so I can go.

I get graduations are an important event but it just didn't work out for me to attend. Since I couldn't go I opted to send a nice graduation gift and flower arrangement to congratulate her. This feels like a dumb question because I don't think it's reasonable to ask someone to quit their job and impact their livelihood, but she's so adamant that I'm being a shitty friend that I'm self doubting my reasoning. 

AITA? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to go wedding dress shopping with my sister?,"So my sister Hannah (27f) and I (25f) aren't close and yet she invited me wedding dress shopping with her. She says she wants this to be the start of a better relationship between us and she wants me by her side for this process because she trusts me. I don't want to go with her. Even with a slightly better relationship shopping for any clothes is a very hard no for me with her. So I told her I appreciated her wanting us to be closer but I didn't feel like I should go wedding dress shopping with her. She asked me why exactly, she told me this was her extending the olive branch and trying to fix the issues in our relationship.

I told her our history, which includes recent history of as early as 3 months ago, is not good when it comes to her and me and appearance. When we were kids I was bigger. It happened very suddenly while I was still very young and my parents were concerned but doctors dismissed it as bad eating habits and not doing enough exercise. I was very self-conscious and my sister mocked me for it a lot. Our parents were furious when she'd open her mouth about it. She called me gross and even took some of my clothes to show off how humongous I was. She'd use the nickname others had given me ""Hallie Hippo"" and was really not kind about it. She made it even harder to be like that. Her relationship with our parents was super bad for years because of it.

I was 20 when I finally got a doctor to listen to me and explore why the sudden weight gain happened. I ended up needing surgery to remove a mass which made a huge difference to my appearance. 

And then I went in the opposite direction and my thyroid made me too skinny. Around the time this happened, Hannah gained some weight. Not a lot. She's not huge by any means. But it made her crazy jealous. She would make snide comments about being super skinny and how unfair it was that I lost all that weight without doing anything. I didn't see her often because our relationship was so bad. But the times I did she'd make me looking good sound so negative. She'd say I didn't deserve it. A couple of years ago we were both shopping with some cousins and it was just insane how angry she was at me. She called me ""the luckiest bitch in the world and you don't even like it"" because I was so tiny. The concerns about being too small being bad for my health were waved off.

Three months ago she told me I look smaller every time she sees me and how much she hates me for it. She told me I didn't deserve it.

And now she wants me to go dress shopping with her. Which again, is why I said no. But she hated that I ""brought up the past when it's in the past"" and she told me this is the fresh start she's offering me. I can't see her not making a lot of nasty comments about dresses and me. Especially because I know she feels self conscious and I can't say I care about her enough to be reassuring. She told me to stop being a dick, stop being selfish and to give us a chance or else I'm an asshole.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for being mad at my parents for giving my bed away to guests?,"so i 16f sleep in a bunk bed, the bottom bunk is my bed ( im physically disabled so its more accessible for me whilst the top bunk is not impossible but my disability isnt rlly relevant tbh ) , i have 3 sisters and 2 share a room whilst one sleeps with my parents ( shes a baby )

so the top bunk is also my bed but is empty, we also have two couches, one that reclines fully and fits 2 people comfortably and there is a blow up mattress in the cupboard.

however whenever my parents have people stay over or family they always make me strip my bed and take all my belongings off of MY bed for them to sleep there and for me to sleep on the other bed even though they could literally sleep elsewhere? and its not even like they ask me, they TELL me to clean my room and sort my bed out because ""xx is staying over"" around 5pm and i have to sort everything out before ""xx"" wants to sleep and im never told how long they are staying or why they are sleeping over especially in my bed?

and if i get annoyed or ask my parents for them to sleep elsewhere or why they have to stay over especially in my room and nobody else has to change where they sleep im shouted at and told to 'get over it' or 'we gave xx permission we dont answer to you', 'you dont need to know why' or like 'theyre family we are doing something nice' and often i end up getting blocked after messaging them about it or shouted at.

keep in mind i have literally 0 say and im not asked or told prior to the day and i just have to give up my bed even if they dont knoe how long they are staying or why and even if these are people who im not comfortable staying in my room or people i dont like

so AITA for being annoyed that my parents just give my bed away to anyone without asking or telling me beforehand",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to move into my dads when Hes offering it to me for free?,"My dad (m65) 7Is a real estate investor, he has many properties in southern ontario which he uses to rent them out to students. I (23m) recently became a fixed operations manager at race car facility nearby and I am trying to relocate out of southern waterloo. He was very abusive growing up but I was too nice to say anything. Nothing sexual or anything, just physical and emotionally immature. He would also cause my mom a large amount of stress.

I am planning on relocating south and I would like to stay at property he owns. He says I can move there but not with my dog it girlfriend of five years. He is old schooled Christian so he is not supportive of our relationship. He also does not like dogs because he thinks they are smelly. He also said that he wouldn’t charge me anything, but I explicitly told him the only way I I can move there with both of them and i told him I do not care about how much rent is I will pay anything, I will be paying enough money to make sure he can pay off the mortgage. 

He declined  obviously, and now hes mad because I refusing to take his offer.  I thought it would be a good considerating most of these students come in and out, so by having me his mortgage would be paid and having a consistent flow of money. At the moment I will be looking at places elsewhere that would accommodate my family’s needs. So Now I turn to reddit.",AmItheAsshole
 For yelling at my dad after he disappeared again?,"I, 19 F, and my dad, 43, have a rocky father daughter relationship. A little background, the first four years of my life my dad was perfectly fine until two months before my fifth birthday he disappeared, and I found out that he left because his mistress went into labour with my half sister. Keep in mind my mum and I never knew he had a mistress until the mistress herself posted a photo of them together while hold my half sister in her arms, while the caption said first time parents. And I haven't seen him since, and my mum kept telling me good things about him as I was younger but as I grew older I started to hate him.

Back to now, my dad came back into my life saying he's sorry and he would be there for me from now on. But not even after a week he disappeared again, but before he did he gave me his number, this is where I think I may be the asshole. I called him and when answered I yelled at him saying, ""After 15 years you come back into my life and you disappeared on me again? I never want to hear from you again!""

And now after the phone call I'm starting to feel guilty at what I said to him, so AITA?",AmItheAsshole
H for not mentioning this straight away?,"I feel like I’m totally mad but last year I started subletting office space from a woman who was renting two units and only using one. She later found out the rent would be increased and couldn’t afford to stay, thus meaning I’d have to find a new workspace too.

While I was still working there the owner came in to show prospective new tenants around and I suddenly thought maybe I could chat to him about staying on and renting it myself, so I did - unplanned, very spur-of-the-moment.

I also happened to ask him how much the rent would be now and it was actually less than what she was subletting to me for.

When he left she rushed in seemingly kind of flustered and I didn’t mention my conversation with him as I was still processing it and didn’t expect her to come in so suddenly.

That night at about 11pm I got an email from her suggesting I’m duplicitous and scheming for going behind her back and taking the studio from her that she was kind enough to sublet to me. Also that I should have told her I’d wanted to stay on. I explained I hadn’t thought about it before and it only came to me since he walked into the studio.

She has continued in this way - I bump into her frequently as she walks her dog near the studio. She is still apparently angry about the way I dealt with this over six months later and confronted me in the street today. I tried to remain calm but everything I say gets shot down and argued with.

She is convinced I’m a cruel and scheming person and I can’t help but question if I am? Though no one else in my life would say this about me!

Any thoughts? Was I in the wrong here? How could I have approached it better?

  
Edit: thanks so much everyone for the kind responses. I wish I’d asked this here earlier instead of binge eating a whole pizza! haha",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to book two restaurants?,"This is going to sound petty. My girlfriend and I are going away for a night next weekend. We were looking at were to go for food on the evening so we could have a restaurant booked. We both wanted different cuisines and neither of us wanted to change our mind.

  
I suggested we just book both and that when my gf is at her restaurant, I can just get a drink and maybe a side and then when we go to my restaurant, she could do the same. She refused this because she said it's weird to sit in a restaurant and not actually order a meal. I just said I don't see any issue with it and that if she didn't want to, she could go somewhere else while I was eating and I'd just meet her afterwards.

  
She refused this and said we should just pick one place but wouldn't consider anywhere except the place she originally picked. I pointed out she was just expecting me to go with what she wants since she's already refused to go to the place I want to go. 

She said it would just be easier and that I was making things more awkward than they needed to be but I think I offered a perfectly reasonable compromise. She just repeated that it was weird and rude to go to a restaurant and not order food.

  
AITA for suggesting booking two restaurants?",AmItheAsshole
 for not going on Christmas/holiday vacation with family instead of my friends,"OK so my family has gotten into the habit of going on vacation every December since 2019, and of course they want me to go again. However, They ALWAYS want to go to the same location (Disney World), and every single time I try and convince them to try something new, I'm met with a lot of resistance from my older sibling. I keep explaining to them there are a lot more locations to see and go to. Even in Florida there are more theme parks or family attractions. Now my parents are up there in age and I do it more for them, because it's always been their dream to travel as a family everywhere. 

We've always been a low middle class income family so we never got to go on many vacations before. I've been trying to convince my older sibling to explain it to my parents and his wife how much better it would be to change it up a bit. Of course I am met with resistance and they have just fallen in love with the whole Disney park and food schtick. So my friends are visiting and they told me if I wanted I could go to FL with them, and go to Universal and other places. I know if I chose this route deep down I'd feel like my parents would be sad the whole family isn't on vacation. On the other hand, I've tried for 3 months already to talk sense into them. I'm at a loss here and I have to buy these tickets and flights in advance soon.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to do chores on Sunday instead of Saturday? ,"My boyfriend and I live together. He's the super clean organized types while I'm a lot messier. On weekdays, we are too busy for any chores. We have someone cook for us every morning and he picks up any small errands that come up during the week because I'm working full time while he is preparing to start training in graphic designing.


The issue is that since I have WFH on most days of the week and he's also busy researching, finding out about institutes, etc, neither of us can clean up much. This causes the house to get VERY messy during the week and by the time Saturday rolls around, he is itching to clean up and organize because of how much the mess bothers him.


It bothers me too but honestly not as much as him. I still understand that he wants a cleaner space and I'm willing to help out. But I wanna keep these chores for Sunday, not Saturday.


My argument is that I spend 5 days a week working and I'm burnt out by Friday evening (it's very common to put in extra hours after the regular 9-6 hours plus I also try reading up/planning for my agency during my free time). I would like to keep Saturday to recover before we get to cleaning.


He argues that it's better to get everything out of the way on Saturday so that we have Sunday for relaxing and gear up for the next week.


It's Saturday and he's deep cleaning the house. He tried to get me involved with small tasks because I was exhausted but I just gave up. I don't know if I should just force myself to clean up on Saturday or what.


AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for dancing with a teacher at my prom?,"My class had a prom recently and I (18f) initially didn’t want to go. I didn’t have a date and I wasn’t really interested in the whole thing, but I still went because my friends persuaded me.

Our class invited our history teacher, I’ll call him Mr. Cooper here (fake name for the sake of privacy). He (48m) is an amazing teacher and honestly an amazing person too. He is very supportive and would always encourage us to learn more about his subject. We aren’t close outside of school and there’s no ulterior motives going on.

Anyway we had a slow dance to the “Careless Whisper” song. I didn’t have a date, but I wanted to have a slow dance experience and so I asked Mr. Cooper to a dance. He laughed a little, but accepted the invitation and we had an amazing slow dance together. It was fun, very elegant and honestly it was the best dance of the whole event. My friends said we were amazing.

After the prom everyone went home and everything was okay, but some of the girls from my class declined to start some drama. They said that the fact that I had a slow dance with a teacher is iffy and that I was trying to steal the spotlight and paint Mr. Cooper in a bad light. I had a confrontation with one of them (she tried to harass me over it) and told her to mind her business and that if she is so jealous I had an amazing dance, she should’ve asked him for a dance first instead of going with her date. She said that what he did was unprofessional and that I was hitting on him. ??? I literally wasn’t, and even if I was my chances would be low because he’s married. Now since the drama escalated and everyone at school talks about it, I’m wondering if I was the asshole for dancing with a teacher.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to confront roommate about bf staying over a lot (again)? Complicated by rent situation.,"Basics: Rent is 3k. We pay 1800 and roomie pays 1200 with utilities split 3 ways.

~2mo ago I had been wanting to talk about her bf being over a ton for a while because I don’t feel comfortable in my own place. I feel like I need to cover up a bit more and am hesitant to being in the kitchen because I frequently hear them having loud sex. We don’t really use the living room because her dog makes it hard (not his fault, we are allergic to him. Does suck tho because that rly limits the space we share). Both of us usually work 4a-2p. He is over in the afternoon and usually sleeps over fri-sun. We addressed it when she asked us to continue our lease (done soon) with a month to month contract. To me, this is a yes or no question. Never did I say I want to adjust anything about our current lease, but if she wanted to basically ask us to continue being her roommates, I said I’d only consider if we paid rent more evenly. She could’ve just said no, but instead she decided to call us names and accuse us of being shitty, shady, and extorting her for money. She had recently stated she was moving out and got flyers from other complexes - assuming she felt she and her bf hadn’t been together long enough to cohabitate. We decided since she’s moving out, we could swap her out for our new roomie. Note that this isn’t a secret process, she’d have to sign off. She asked what our plans were and we said staying here with a roomie (also, my fiancée had told her this the week before) and she got upset and said we betrayed her and we’re awful for deciding this bc she thinks she may now want to stay with bf - after going back and forth I conceded and said “not worth arguing, you guys stay. Love y’all and happy things are going well”,  she replied “no, I’m not going to stay I’m going to move to [state] like I’ve been saying forever, just needed the push.. love you guys.”
In between of all this we were talking about her bf, and how he’s over a lot and we feel the way I stated above. She replied aggressively and with “what do you expect me to do? Ask him for rent? Not happening” etc. I said “idk? That’s why I wanna talk about it, but yes maybe contribute something?” Again, a bit annoying because her entire argument for us paying 600/mo more for a slightly smaller space was bc we’re two people, but she’s completely against contributing more even though I feel I have another roommate. She later suggested that they could stay a bit more at his place. This lasted maybe a week(?). All of the bf stuff got mixed in with the rent discussion so I don’t think she took it seriously.
 
FINALLY the present: Bf is over a lot again, and she stated that she IS staying with her bf here. Annoyed because she bitched us out and really hurt my feelings and essentially bullied us out.. and even though we only have a couple of months left, I feel I’m confined to my room even more because I feel uncomfy talking to her for how much she insulted me (and us)/she works from home. What do I do? AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting the nice room in my house?,"So, I’ve been living in this large female house for two years now. There’s a basement with 3 rooms, a bathroom and a kitchen. And then upstairs there’s two rooms a kitchen and a bathroom. And then there is this gorgeous attic space that has lots of windows, is the size of the two smallest rooms in the house and has a 1/2 bath. Keep in mind the basement is much smaller, and slightly less nice than the rest of the house. 

I’ve been living in the basement for two years, and gave up the chance to move into the attic last year because one of the other girls living in the basement expresses to me how much she would appreciate the attic space given it was going to be the hardest year of her schooling, so I gave it up to her and told her it would be good to save money anyways(the attic being more expensive).

now, my friend from high school who moved in last year wants to move into the attic. Initially, I was going to move into another place because 1) two of the girls that have lived here two years with me are going abroad next semester and 2) I was tired of living in the basement and 3) I’m going to have a very busy year next year, taking 16 credits and working two 12s as a PCT, as well as taking 8 ams everyday  and was nervous about such a large household impacting my ability to function.

However my new housing option fell through, and I was content because I had the opportunity to move to the main level on account of the other girls going abroad. I also could not afford the price of the attic at the time.

However, we were able to negotiate the cost of rent for next year, and it is now at a price I can afford. 

This roommate who wants the attic is upset that I now am expressing interest, even though I communicated before that the only reason I didn’t want it before was due to cost. 

I think she’s also frustrated bc when I was supposed to be moving out she talked privately with other roommates about her getting the attic. In our last roommate meeting(before I was planning on moving out) I had expressed wanting to move upstairs but not being able to afford it at that cost. 
Later in a private conversation with her about the cost, she said that she wanted to pay less for the attic, and I mentioned that at the cost she was proposing, I would also want the room. She quickly dropped her idea. 

Now, due to conversations she has had with other roommates, she’s been planning it all in her head to move up there which I understand makes this frustrating for me to be bringing up.

I just went to talk to her and laid out my reasons. She said we were in the same boat (her taking 17 credits and getting an internship in a lab next semester, however she did not disclose how many hours and had previously expressed to me her admiration for how much I’ll be working and schooling next semester). She also made a guilting comment about how she’s already ordered a new bedframe for the space.

I understand why she’s frustrated, but I also am frustrated because I didn’t think we were making any final room decisions until after we heard from our landlord about lowering the price, but it seems like everyone has been talking amongst themselves anyways. 

Am I the asshole for wanting this space and asking for it in this way? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for saying ok to my sister’s choice of restaurants on our joint trip,"I’m 69 and my husband 75. We’ve been married for 45 years. We are on a trip, meeting up with my 77yr old sister and brother-in-law for the first time in 18 months. We are miles apart physically and also politically. As a result, I’ve been nervous about getting together. So far, so good. Our first morning, we were there alone and ate at the hotel coffee shop. Our meal was cold, and my husband complained that the food was super salty,partly burned and the manager apologized and comped our meal. When our relatives arrived later that day, my husband mentioned the disappointment in the restaurant. The next morning, I suggested we drive to a local place we know and they agreed. This morning my husband woke up thinking about how they’d probably want to go to the hotel place. I was mildly exasperated, suggesting other things he could get there and then came up with another off site local spot. I made a point of being the one to suggest the local place.  Later in the morning, my sister said maybe tomorrow we could go to the hotel restaurant as she likes their pancakes. I said sure and before dinner , mentioned to my husband that she specifically asked to go there. During dinner,  my husband was noticeably quiet and rather sullen. I could tell they noticed and I was very uncomfortable. After dinner, we did some fun things together, but my husband remained subdued. I made excuses that we were tired,which was true, to return to our room. I told my husband I could tell he was upset with me and he said “it’s ok. I’m getting over it”. I insisted he tell me what he was upset about and turns out, he was upset that my sister would put him through eating somewhere he didn’t like and that I had s agreed to it when she asked.  I suggested he get something simple and different than his eggs, sausage meal and he said I always side with them and he might get up early, drive to a McDonalds for breakfast and then just sit with us and have coffee. At that point, I said I thought he was being petty and just looking for something to be upset about,  although we’ve been having fun on the previous two days. I feel like screaming from the stress of feeling my husband is a powderkeg about to go off. Once here, I realize that my sister and bil seem more frail to me and felt the aging process and knowing our time together is limited. Am I the a-hole for thinking it isn’t such a big deal to concede to my sister’s request? ",AmItheAsshole
 for letting someone skip my bachelorette party and not telling them new details that would've changed their mind?,"Apologies in advance as I had a hard time writing the situation in a single sentence. My brother has been trying to push me to get closer to his girlfriend ""Mary"" (together 3 months). I've done my best to get to know her (initiating dinners, trying her hobbies with her, etc.) but we honestly don't really get along. 

I personally think she's a snob (she complimented my designer bag, but took the compliment back when she found out it was thrifted. As in literally said ""yike, I take that back"") while she thinks I lack ""culture and sophistication"" (also something she's mentioned when trying to convince me to do a ""makeover"" with her). 

The issue is that I'm getting married this year, and my brother has been REALLY trying to get her involved. I put my foot down with the bridal party since they've only been dating for 3 months and I don't know her, but he insisted that I invite her to the bachelorette. It was originally supposed to be super lowkey and local. Mary tried to push for something more extravagant, but it really wasn't in my budget. When I wouldn't budge, she told us something came up that weekend and she couldn't go. 

I was later surprised by my friends who had come together to organize a lavish weekend through favors and points (i.e. one of my friend's aunts works for a spa, so she was able to get discounted packages, another used her travel points to book a suite, etc.). I was not told about this, and was truly and happily surprised. 

The issue is that Mary found out when we posted pictures and she was PISSED. My brother is now saying that I deliberately left her out, but she told me she was busy! Mary said that if she had known what the weekend was like though, she would have rearranged her schedule. I feel conflicted because I suspect that my friends didn't tell Mary on purpose, but they're claiming they made these plans after Mary bowed out and didn't reach back out since she was busy. 

My brother still says I should have double checked and made more of an effort to let Mary know my plants, so I figured I'd ask the internet for their thoughts!",AmItheAsshole
 for not explaining to my sister why she was stupid for asking me to share my art supplies.,"I babysit for my sister all the time. She pays me the same as anyone else. But she is a lot more entitled than anyone else. 

My nephews are really good kids but spoiled. They eat when they are supposed to and a don't need to wrangle them much to get them to bed. However they are fascinated with my art supplies. I am not an artist. I just like to draw. I have a few apps on my iPad but I like my paper and pencils as well. I also have oil pastel crayons. 

My nephews wanted to draw with them but I said no. They complained to my sister and she told me to let them draw with me. 

The next time I came by I brought pencil crayons for them. Not good enough. They complained and she said I was being mean not sharing. 

Time before last I just didn't bring anything except a book to read. She gave me shit for being immature. 

Fine I gave up. I bought them them some cheap oil crayons. I gave them to her as I was leaving. 

She called me today. She gave them the crayons but did not supervise them. She has spent the last two days trying to get the oil paint off her couch and carpet. She says my brother-in-law is pissed that I gave them art supplies that are so messy. I forwarded her the messages where she called me childish and mean for not sharing. I offered to send them to her husband so he could know whose idea it was. 

She is mad and demanding that I watch them for free to pay her back for the cleaning. I just said I would not watch the kids any more. She tried to trick me by not having cash when I showed up. I said I was leaving since I didn't trust that she would pay me. Strangely she actually had the cash. 

She did call our mom and tell on me for giving the kids oil paints without warning her. 

My mom wants me to keep the peace and offered to pay me to watch the kids and let my sister think she won. I'm thinking about it. But my sister still thinks I did it on purpose.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my brother and sister-in-law that they don't deserve to have children &amp; asking them to fuck off?,"My brother Ian and my sister-in-law Cheyenne had their child a while ago, but he passed due to crib death (SIDS). I learned about it only a few days later. My wife is Sidney.

They have been distraught over it &amp; we have been as supportive as I could. Sidney got pregnant now.

When I informed them that Sidney was pregnant, he yelled at me. He said that he couldn't believe I dared to have kids so soon after his kids' death (for what it's worth, we'd ""done it"" before we knew about the death). I tried explaining, but it didn't work.

I said ""There's nothing that can be done now.""

He looked mad as he retorted ""Sure you can. Get your bitch to the doctor and get that terminated.""

I was... shocked. I did not know what to say. And then I yelled at him himself, and in the end I said ""No wonder you have kids with that attitude."" My sister-in-law was present there as well.

Everyone who knows about it is calling me the asshole. They said that as they're grieving, I should've just stayed silent and listened to whatever they said, no matter what it was.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to cook for my wife's pregnant sister and telling her she has a husband who could do it,"I've (31m) been married to my wife Sage (30f) for 6 years and we have two kids together. I'm a chef and I love to cook but generally we take turns cooking so neither gets burned out or feels like it's a chore (this is especially helpful when we host others because allergies are big in both our families). When she was pregnant, though, I cooked for her all the time because pregnancy was not easy for Sage and I wanted her to be able to relax and enjoy food instead of being too tired and sick to eat, which is how she was in the very early stages of her first pregnancy. Everyone knew about it but Sage's sister Gwen (34f) brought it up an excessive amount and said she couldn't believe Sage was getting waited on during her pregnancy and that ""a dude would do that for his wife"". It was a touch annoying how much she brought it up.

Now Gwen is pregnant with her first child and she called up out of the blue after her pregnancy announcement to say I should cook and send meals over for her like I did for Sage. At first I thought she was trying, and failing, to be funny, but nope, she was as serious as a heart attack. I told her I wasn't cooking for her and brought up how random and inappropriate it was to ask like that. She told me we're family and she's pregnant and I should want her to rest as much as I had wanted Sage resting during both of her pregnancies. I told her Sage is my wife, so it's different and I told her she has a husband to cook for her if that's what she wants.

She told me her husband would never and I should try being a good BIL. I told her BIL doesn't equal spouse.

Gwen tried to talk Sage into convincing me but the two of them were never close so Sage just rolled her eyes and told her where to go. Even she couldn't believe Gwen is for real.

Gwen's reaction to being told no by both of us was to run to her parents and tell them I refused to help her out and she told them she was struggling and had just wanted help. They asked why I couldn't do it occasionally since Gwen's husband is too much of an ass to do it. I told them it was a lot to ask and we weren't that close to Gwen.

When Gwen realized her parents hadn't convinced me or convinced Sage to convince me, she called back up and said I was an ass for not helping my family and for rubbing her husband's lack of consideration for her in her face.

I'm starting to feel like this will become such a huge deal and now I'm doubting myself. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
? Choosing Daughter over Husband?,"My husband (m,64) and I (f,65) have been married for 20 years.  He has two sons, Jason and Craig both married (m,41 and 39).  I have two daughters Jenna and Kiera both married (f, 38 and 37).   All of our kids are independent and living on their own.  His boys have families but don’t live anywhere near us.  My girls recently received an inheritance from their grandfather of close to 1 million each.  They are being responsible with it.  One is saving a big portion of it for retirement and her son’s education.  The other doesn’t have kids and doesn’t live near us.  So this is about the one who lives close to us and has a pre-school son, Kyle. 

My husband has gotten very upset lately about the help I am giving Jenna with babysitting Kyle before pre-school and in the afternoons 2-3 days a week.  He is a good eater and likes things that are driving up our food bill maybe 40-50.00 a month.  Husband resents me not getting paid for the food and to a lesser degree  my time.  He says it isn’t fair to his grandkids that they are not being treated fairly.  I suggested he send the grandkids’ parents money for treats each month.  He wants me to charge Jenna and then not have to give his grandkids anything.  I don’t want to charge Jenna anything.  I don’t think that grandparents should charge for childcare or food. 

He gets aggravated if he sees a new colouring book or markers here. He seethes with rage at times if I invite Jenna’s family for a meal.   He thinks Jenna and to a lesser degree Kiera should be helping us instead of hoarding their money.   He also gets very agitated about me not telling him if Kyle is going to be here.  He says that he doesn’t feel like it is his home and that I make all the decisions.  He is threatening to break up our marriage over the disparity and unfairness of the situation.  

Some info on our finances: Money isn’t plentiful but we both have pretty good pensions. After our bills are paid we have between 2 and 3 thousand a month to spend on groceries, gas and other miscellaneous expenses. We have very minimal savings.   He travels to see his grandkids maybe 2-3 times a year.  One he flies to see and the other he takes the train or drives.  Averages out maybe 500.00 a trip.  I don’t travel at all.

He thinks I am  the AH because I am willing to risk our marriage over this.  If we divorce we will have to sell our house and neither one of us will be able to afford to live to the standard we have now.  AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to become a full time carer for my father in law?,"A bit of background here, my husband had a pretty messed up childhood, he didn't get to meet his father until he was an adult, they are on speaking terms but they never really had much of a relationship.His Dad has been having major health issues and after a fall a few months ago he was moved into a nursing home for respite care.I have been cleaning out his house (it was in a bad state) so it could be sold to pay for his nursing home care. Since he has been in the nursing home, my husband has been visiting him three days a week and they have finally been getting to know each other.

His father would really like to come home, but he has complex health needs and needs full time care.  He is terminally ill, diabetic and a double amputee - it really would be a full time job and a lot of responsibility.  Initially I agreed to this on the premise that my husband would be helping out whenever he can, after all it is his parent.  I know this might be the best chance they have to spend time together before it's too late.

Since finding out he might be coming home, I have gone into over drive trying to get the place ready.  I am scrubbing walls and disinfecting things,  I am making lists of equipment we will need etc I am taking this very seriously and know we have a limited time frame to get the house ready in time so it is safe and clean for his father.

Unfortunately my husband doesn't seem to be interested in participating in this process. While I clean, he sits and watches T.V. While I scrub, he drinks and smokes. The more I do on my own, the more I recall how he did nothing when the kids were little, how he does no housework at home and never picks up after himself or fixes anything that needs maintenance. Unless I ask repeatedly or supervise him like a child, he does nothing and leaves it all to me.  It's tiring having to be the adult in the situation all the time.

I'm honestly not sure if I can handle this situation on my own. I have more than a sneaking suspicion at this point that all of work is being left to me and this will only continue if his dad actually does come home. I will be taking care of his father 24 hours a day and unable to leave him on his own because I don't trust my husband will actually take proper care of him when I am not there.  I don't want to compromise my father in laws health and shorten what little time he has left.  

I would have to quit my job in order to make this happen and it would be unpaid.   My husband isn't exactly generous with money, without my own funds it would quickly degenerate into me constantly asking him to put food in the fridge and buy other stuff that we need.  I am having visions of being constantly broke and trapped in the house taking care of his dad without any help from him. 

This afternoon after another day of inactivity (public holiday so it would have been a great opportunity to get things done) I told him I've had enough. AITA for not wanting to be full time carer for my father in law?

 

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for reporting my teacher for fat shaming a student.,"I 16F take a DT (design and technology class). In the class, there is around 20 other students. The teacher is a 60S?? year old man who is specialised in this study. However, there is one student in my class 15/16M who is overweight. My teacher tends to make fun of this about him, claiming that he will break the chair and other horrible insults.  


I saw this happen many times which led me to report him to the head of department and safeguarding, which could potentially jeporadise his job as he already got a warning. I told my friends about this and they were very angry at me, as we have exams coming up soon and if he gets fired they will fail this course due to no teacher. I told the boy and he was grateful, but I turned the whole class against me just for reporting the teacher for the hate comments. 

My question is am I in the wrong for this, since I don't want to leave the class without a teacher and potentially cause everyone to fail.",AmItheAsshole
 For telling my friend his wife deserves better?,"One of my friend's (M) has been married for a few years now and I always thought he had a beautiful marriage. He recently told me how he was talking to someone simply for an ego boost. He approached this girl at the club, got her number and exchanged calls and messages for some weeks.

I was shocked and told him he's cheating and needs to stop what he was doing. He acknowledged it was wrong but didn't consider this cheating because he was just simply exchanging texts and was never going to see the girl again. It was all just a temporary thing

I asked him *how would YOU feel if your wife did this behind your back*. I was shocked that he didn't understand how serious this was. Frustrated but genuine, I told him his wife deserves better and he needs to tell her, he was offended. We haven't talked since

*EDIT &amp; Update---*

I really appreciate the responses and sound feedback here. I decided I'm going to reach out to this friend again, explain my reaction, and also get the confirmation that this stopped and he's working on himself the way he needs to (intend to do this all in person)

Edits --  
I haven't used reddit much before so forgive me for doing this incorrectly. Addressing some things to give more clarity 

* One of my friends (M) .... and **I (F) -**--&gt; there was a reason I started clarifying this but hastily posted without double checking. I am a female and straight, and for that reason not trying to sleep with or in love with my friend's wife 
* Some folks asked to define talking --&gt; To start with, he definitely flirted with this girl to get her number...I feel that's obvious. After that from the messages he flashed when i asked him show me what he meant -- it was stupid and just straight conversation (part of the reason I responded the way I did). Messages like ""hey how are you""... ""what have you been doing"", etc. 
* Time ---&gt; the messaging wasn't consistent for weeks but it spanned over a few weeks at the time he mentioned it (a week ago). Meaning no daily calls and texts but scattered calls and texts across what im guessing was two weeks before he mentioned it to me (which regardless is equally terrible and stupid whatever the timeframe here)
* My place ---&gt; Yes, I dont know every detail of their marriage and I think that's the case in general BUT since he didn't mention established boundaries when we had this conversation, I can guarantee they didnt exist 
* I have not shut out my friend on my end. Instead, he has been avoiding me and I agree with the folks who think its simply out of embarrassment and shame. I agree with folks here -- I hit him with a harsh truth that he needed to hear. I'll give it a few more days, maybe the weekend, but I do intend to reach out",AmItheAsshole
 for talking to my ex girlfriend in front of my girlfriend when I met her at the grocery store?,"I met my ex gf at the store after 10 years of not seeing her or talking to her (we were together 10 years ago; I was 14 and she was my first serious relationship, and we were together for 2 years). My current girlfriend was with me and she walked away during conversation, because me and my ex were talking for about 15 min (we were talking about her newborn and just generally catching up). 
When we finished talking, my girlfriend was pretty angry. She said that it's not normal for someone to talk to an ex ""for so long"" in front of their current partner. 

AITA for talking to my ex in front of my girlfriend for 15 minutes?
",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to chaperone my daughter's overnight field trip?,"My daughter is in 7th grade and it was an overnight trip to a for 2 nights, 3 days.

At the beginning of the year the school has parents sign up for one of four categories for chaperoning field trips:

1. Yes Please! I want to chaperone everything!
2. I'd love to chaperone, but check with me first, don't assume I'm a yes.
3. I'll only chaperone if there's literally no one else or it's an emergency.
4. I'd rather the trip be canceled than be stuck chaperoning!

(Obviously this is my own embellishment of the categories)

I'm a category 3 parent. I'm busy. I travel for work off and on and don't have a lot of agency to just take the time off, but I also felt like it would be an asshole move to check myself into the ""nope, not me"" category.

The lead teacher called me up a day and a half before the kids were to depart saying that another chaperone backed out and they were in desperate need. She said that, because my daughter signed up for a gender neutral trip group, they needed a male chaperone to step up. This piqued my curiosity and I asked if there were any female chaperones from category 2 above and she said yes but that the school policy was that groups of mixed gender sharing a sleeping area needed one male and one female chaperone and I was ""the only male parent on any list"" in my daughter's group. She gave me a whole guilt tripping rigmarole about how if I didn't agree to come she would have to completely reorganize everyone's groups to match up chaperones and that ""none of the kids would be with the groups they wanted as a result.""

I told her that that was a stupid policy, since if parents agreed to gender neutral groups they obviously wouldn't give a damn if the group had two female adults, but since it was the policy and I knew she couldn't change it I would come. Of course I said yes. I took the days off work, and went on the trip.

The trip was fine, it was at a science center with sleeping rooms that fit 12 people. My daughter and 4 other girls and 3 boys plus myself and the mom of one of the other kids in the group shared it. We rode travelled with our group, were with them the whole time, etc. I really didn't see why there was any reason for me specifically to be there. Like I suspected it was literally just kids who liked each other well enough sleeping in their pajamas in a room together. There was no reason for a male adult to be there just because 3 boys were in the room. I added nothing a woman wouldn't have, just a second adult.

The lead teacher was saying things to me the whole time with ""we're *so* glad you came"" and ""aren't you having so much fun"" type comments. It was obvious that there was tension and discomfort from her about me being there.

I didn't think I was being an asshole about it. I feel like my gripe about needing to be there because I was male was a legitimate gripe. The teacher walking on eggshells and being uncomfortable with me has me questioning if I was just being an asshole about it.",AmItheAsshole
 for not watching my step kids every weekend?,"AITA that I don't want to watch my husbands 2 kids since both he and bio mom (BM) work Friday and Saturday nights? The BM is moving and she will no longer have her roommate there to watch them (really it's just their 9 year old daughter, they  have a 15 year old son but he doesn't need a babysitter) so she basically just TOLD my husband that the custody dates are changing to every Friday and Saturday instead of every Sunday and Monday. For more information- When this custody arrangement was made (after divorce), she had a normal 9-5 job and he has had this same schedule for years, even when they were married. 

My husband and I have an 11 month old but I tend to go to my parents house on Friday nights to hang out with them and they can see our baby. Husband is not thrilled at all with custody schedule but feels he would rather them be at our house, even if I won't be there all of the time, than alone at her house. Plus their 9 year old daughter doesn't really have a bed time on weekends/summer so it's not even like OK well I just have to do this until bedtime. There are times she will probably (and has in the past) stay up until he gets home. I have told my husband this is the hill I will die on and I have actually slept the last two nights at my parents house. The BM does not allow me to have a more ""bonus mom"" role, we get yelled at anytime I try to correct her (ask her to say thank you, etc). 

Sorry, I know this is all over the place but I just don't feel like it's my responsibility and the fact that he and I weren't even asked we were told is not OK. He just doesn't feel like dealing with standing up to her because she will scream and cuss etc. They have gone through mediation for child support which lists what the custody right now is (the Sunday and Monday nights.).",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving my friend to find her own way home?,"I (23M) am only one of two people in my circle of friends who drives, which means any event or get-together requires me to pick up people and drop them off home. I don't mind doing it but my one gripe is that for occasions like parties, it's a huge pain trying to corral all the passengers when I'm leaving; it sometimes takes 30 minutes of me repeatedly telling my friends I have to leave before they start taking me seriously and start making their way to the car. It drives me nuts because it makes me feel like I'm being taken for granted and that my time isn't important enough to be considered. 

This past Friday, I went to a house party downtown (all of my friends and I live uptown). I picked up 3 friends, my other friend who drives picked some people up and the rest made their way on their own. After I picked up the last friend and as we were on our way, I told them all that I was putting my foot down starting that night: I was leaving the party at 1, I'd give them all a 10 minute heads-up and whoever wasn't in the car by 1 on the dot would be left behind. I had to work the next day at 7 and after dropping everyone off, I wouldn't be home until 2, so I already knew I wasn't going to get much sleep but what little sleep I could get, I wanted to maximize. They all agreed to my one condition.

When we arrived, one of my friends (I'll call her Jane) who had made their way to the party on their own came up to me and asked if I could drive her home too. I wasn't thrilled since it meant I'd get home even later and she sprung it on me at the last minute, but I still had room for one more and Jane and I get along pretty well, so I said okay but made sure I told her the same thing I told my other friends: I'm leaving at 1 with or without you. She said okay. 

At 12:50, I started telling my passengers that it was almost time. My plan was going pretty well, everyone was getting their coats, saying their goodbyes and making their way to the door. Everyone except Jane. As I was putting on my shoes, I could see her still chatting with someone, drink in hand. So I walked up to her and quietly reminded her ""You have two minutes, then I'm leaving"". She gave me an annoyed look and said ""Okay, relax"" and turned back to the conversation. I left and walked to the car with everyone else. When it turned 1, I still gave her an extra minute; as much of a hardass as I was being, I still didn't want to leave anyone behind so I figured I'd give her an extra minute of grace time. Even when I started driving, I checked the rearview to see if she'd suddenly pop out (I still would have stopped at that point), but nothing. 

5 minutes later, Jane called me, asking me where I parked (this was on speakerphone since I was driving). I gave her the news and she proceeded to chew me out for the entire car to hear, calling me an AH among other things. I'm not proud of the fact that I ditched someone, but I'm also tired of being taken for granted and I gave her enough warning. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 : I'm not willing to spend my Annual Leave to see my brothers newborn. ,"My brother hates my parents and moved an 8 hour flight away to a rural place on the other side of the county. He's a teacher in a rural school and gets nearly 16 weeks paid leave off per year and expects me to spend $2000 on flights and $2000-$3000 on accommodation to see his newborn. My issue is that I don't get much time off. In a year I'm lucky to get maybe 4 weeks off MAX but we rarely get to take it in one chunk, it's more like a week off here, and maybe 2 weeks off there. 

I'm also in a relationship and my partner lives in another country as he's taking care of his mum. This is probably going to be the case for a few more years as his sister is studying abroad. Because of this I usually travel to his country and stay with him a few weeks a year. 

Apparently I'm an AH because I don't want to take time off work and spend money I don't have to see my brothers newborn who isn't even going to remember me. I've pointed out that he's more than welcome to come see the whole family here and he'd have free accommodation at my sisters or we could meet half way somewhere nice for a vacation, but I'm not willing to travel to the middle of nowhere just to see a baby and pay an insane amount to do so, it's not only the cost but it means I won't get to see my partner if I'm using the time to travel to see my brother instead. 

It's gotten to the point I've stopped talking to him because every time he calls he's rude and brings up that I've made no effort to see his child and apparently it's all my fault. I'm planning on seeing my partner in a few months and I know if he finds out from family, he'll lay into me and it's making me feel guilty but at the same time I'm an adult and I have my own life and he hasn't made any effort on his end. I mean, he's even said I'd have to pay for my own accommodation to see him. 

I feel horrible since I'm now not answering his calls or telling him my travel plans but I feel like it's the only way since he won't even try to meet me half way, literally. Am I the AH?",AmItheAsshole
" for calling my dad ""mom""?","I (22M) have a best friend (23F) who recently came out as a trans woman. I'll call her Dee. We've been friends since I was in 2nd grade. Last month she asked me to meet her for lunch, she had smth important to tell me. I wasn't sure what it was and wondered if she’d found a man (up til now she’d identified as a gay man) or if smth happened in her family. But when I showed up and Dee was in a dress with a full face of make-up and the hair she’d been growing out was in a nice updo, I knew. I wouldn't say I was blindsided, there’d been signs. Things I’d brushed off as ""that's just Dee."" While I do understand that boys/men like feminine stuff, as I saw her sitting there all the puzzle pieces fell into place. We spent hours talking about how she realized, what she might change her name to, how her family and our other friends might take it, and everything that comes with transitioning. She was glowing. I am so happy for her, she seemed so much happier than I've ever seen her before. 

Here's where I might be the asshole. Last weekend my parents had me and my sisters over with some other family. My sisters and I were catching up and they asked how Dee was. Dee had given me permission to tell her news to my family so I shared that she’d come out. My sisters were happy for her and as we were discussing what this meant for her future, my dad walked by and heard what we were talking about. He was confused and asked who we were talking about so I explained. He scoffed. He said smth derogatory about trans people that I will not repeat and said he would never refer to her as a woman because ""he is a man and always will be.""

He’d never said anything trans/homophobic before and I was shocked and disgusted. My sisters laid into him as I found my words. I told him if he refused to refer to her correctly then I would show him how it felt by referring to him wrong. That he’d be ""mom"" until he came to his senses. I spent the rest of the night using she/her pronouns for him. My sisters joined and he hated it. He was pissed. Mom found out halfway through the night and chided us to stop but we told her what happened and while she didnt take our side, she didn't tell us to stop. The night ended with my sisters and I saying ""good night moms! We love you both!""
We've been keeping this up, and he's still pissed. I got a call from my grandma (dads mom) saying I'm being immature and I need to respect my father and drop this. When I explained what happened she said smth similar to what he said that night. She doesn't have anything over me, I'm fortunate enough to be able to support myself. My younger sister however is still in college and she's threatening to pull her contribution to tuition if we don't drop it.

I don't think my father is ready to admit he was wrong but I don't want my baby sister to miss out. Am I the asshole for starting this? And even if I'm not, should I stop so my grandma keeps helping her with tuition?",AmItheAsshole
 for yelling at my mom because she ate the food that I bought with my money?,"
Our fridge is usually close to empty. There’s always condiments, eggs and some sort of shredded cheese but that’s it. Usually cream for coffee too which I sometimes use for cereal. The pantry is full of dried pasta, Cheerios and granola bars that are strictly for my sister. My dad locks away all of the good food for himself and wears the key around his neck like fucking Zoey101.  So there’s nothing to really make besides scrambled eggs, cereal or pasta. Yeah I should be grateful that there’s food at all but I’m sorry I can’t just live off of those things. Plus I have a really sensitive stomach so a lot of dairy and gluten will destroy my stomach.

 Yesterday, I bought my own food and left it in the fridge. Starved myself all day for as long as possible so I could eat towards the end of the day to not go to bed hungry. I got a big enough meal to eat half last night and half tonight. I don’t make enough money to buy solid meals for myself all the time so I was really looking forward to not eating the same old thing yet again. I opened the fridge today when I was hungry to the point of vomiting and the majority of my food was gone. Maybe a bite or two left but nothing I could actually get full off of. So naturally I got pissed because I’m starving, I paid for it with the little money I have in the first place and my mom didn’t even ask. So I walked into her (home) office and asked her if she ate my food. Her argument was that she thought it was old from days ago when she literally knows I came home with it last night. I even got her something too which she ate for dinner last night!!!!Then I got even more mad saying I’m starving and haven’t eaten anything in over 24 hours. She started bawling her eyes out and my dad started screaming at me for being over dramatic. Then she dramatically left the house saying she’s gonna blow off work for the rest of the day to go and get me the same meal. My dad ran out and took the keys from her before she could leave then came inside saying she’s crying. 

So not only did she eat my food, she guilt tripped me and made me feel like I’m the reason why she’s not gonna make any money today. Because she ate my food that I starved myself for. I think I feel extra guilty because we get along well but this isn’t the first time it’s happened. When I told my sister she sighed and rolled her eyes because this has happened to her too with the same excuse. All I know is that I’m mad, feel guilty and have extremely low blood sugar so I might just sleep it off or something. Am I the asshole for reacting the way I did? ",AmItheAsshole
" for ""punishing"" my boyfriend after he called me a slut in front of people","This happened the other night, we had a small party at our place with a couple of his friends and my step sister so I had someone to talk to other than just my boyfriend and he's friends. They were drinking and smoking weed while me and sis just smoked. 

Smoking makes me want to cuddle so I asked if i could cuddle up to him while him and hes friends continue their talks over beer. After asking he pulled me in and said ""come here slut"". I dont mind a bit of dirty talk but i absoloutly hate it in front of anyone and dont like the fact he would call me a name like that in front of people. 

Maybe I over reacted but i just packed a bag and me and my sis got an uber to her place where ive been staying a few days. Bf is saying me staying here is unfairly ""punishing"" him because hes already apologised everyday since. Im not trying to  punish him, i just want my space to cool off over it. AITA since hes already apoligised?",AmItheAsshole
 for not sending my nephew home,"I am new to all of this so please bear with me. I’ve read a couple posts to see how it’s done. Will fix something if it’s not right.

I (old enough to be a curmudgeon) was surprised yesterday when my oldest nephew Joe (alias, aged 17) texted me to ask if I could come get him from school because he was not feeling well. I am on the list and can/have picked up Joe and his sisters before on occasion when needed. To my knowledge the school had already informed his mother (my sister, “Amy”) that he was unwell but she couldn’t get him for a while.

I got him and he had been getting sick through the day, even had to pull over once on the drive to my house. He crashed on my couch and slept from about 10:30 AM until 3, then took a shower and went back to sleep. At about 6 his mom called me and asked me to either drive him or have him walk home for dinner. I told her he was asleep and probably didn’t want to eat. She said she needed him home by 6:30 so she could take one of his sisters to her school event and she needed him to watch the other two girls.

I felt a little uneasy. Joe and I don’t get to see each other too often (partly my fault and I feel terribly for it) but when we do he’s always the babysitter. Not only that, his sisters (ages 12, 10, and 7) are very loud and physically clingy which I’ve gathered bothers Joe very much. I told her I didn’t think it would be a good idea for him to watch them at that time.

I told her she could bring the girls to me so I could watch them without waking him, but she said it would be too much hassle and they wouldn’t get to the event on time and she didn’t want to make extra stops. I stirred Joe and told him what was up but he went immediately back to sleep. I texted her this and asked again if she could drop off the girls. About 20 minutes later, my sister comes banging on my door. She tells Joe he needs to come home, he gets up and goes with her after thanking me but not saying much else. She said I was an AH for wasting her time and not sending him home, saying that the fact he got up and went with her meant I was exaggerating and just not wanting to bring him home myself.

A day later she is still angry with me.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for threatening to take my ‘best friend’ to court,"I (23 F) have been living with my roommate/best friend (21 F) for over a year. Things were good until she started dating a new guy. He was nice at the start, but then began staying over 3-4 days out of the week and bringing his dog (5 year old pitbull) with him for the duration of his stays. I’m a big animal lover and have a cat, but his dog was tough to live with. We have a small apartment and he is a big guy, and he can be very aggressive (the boyfriend said he has bit people before). He also was not potty trained and would pee EVERYWHERE. He did not clean up after him, and after about 2 months of him basically living here, the place began to reek of dog pee. I started gently throwing out solutions to help, which were always met with excuses of why it wouldn’t work. 
Well, out of the blue last week, she texts me and my other roommate (26 F) that she is moving out with her boyfriend and we needed to find a replacement for her on the lease. We asked to have a roommate meeting to clarify things and get some details hammered out which she reluctantly agreed to. We were kind in our approach so she wouldn’t feel attacked, and asked if she could get the carpets cleaned before leaving as it would be hard to sell the room to someone when the place smelled of dog pee. We also told her we hadn’t had any luck finding anyone on such short notice to move in in less than 2 weeks, but had someone who could move in June 1st. We told her she would be responsible still for Mays rent, because that’s how a contract works. She said no to all of this. 
This, however, was not my final straw. My final straw came this weekend, when she moved out the majority of her things and in the process, stole several of my possessions, including a set of vintage glass goblets I had inherited from my grandmother who basically raised me when she passed away, and broke some of my things. So, yesterday I sent her a text saying that I had tried to be kind and civil and I had let a lot of things slide in the past but now if she was going to be evil I would be too. I sent her screenshots of the lease where it said no guests could bring animals, as well as where it said guests couldn’t stay more than 5 nights within a quarter year without being on the lease. I told her if my things weren’t returned I would take her to court for all of this as well as her unpaid rent and my stolen items. 
She did not reply, instead her boyfriend snap chatted me that I needed to ‘grow up’ and that i wouldn’t be getting my stuff back, and then blocked me so I couldn’t reply. 
So, AITA? Because they certainly think I am! ",AmItheAsshole
 for not paying for the damage on my bosses new car?,"So I work for a fairly large company, not a huge corporation. We have roughly 30 locations in our state. I was driving one of our box trucks and my boss was behind me. I went to back into a parking spot and didn’t see that he had pulled into it first and backed right into his brand new car. 

The damages come out to like $1200 and he wants me to pay it out of pocket. I feel like he should file a claim with our companies insurance because I was on the clock and in a company vehicle, he disagrees.

AITA for refusing to pay the $1200 in damages?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my husband’s married friends to move in?,"So my husband has told his married friends (24m) &amp; (24f) that they could move in with us &amp; our kids without having that conversation with me first. They also have a 2yo son. They are late on their rent and have a court date for the eviction coming up and they have had 1/2 of their vehicles repossessed. A few reasons as to why I don’t want them moving in is;
1. I enjoy the privacy we have (whenever we can get it)

2. His married friends are in a very toxic relationship for example; they both talk bad about each other in front of us, he was going out almost every weekend to strip clubs (this is a big reason imo why they didn’t have money to pay their bills) &amp; would be out past 5am (I only know this bc he would ask my husband to be his DD which he did twice but I put my foot down with that. I am not comfortable with my husband 1 going to strip clubs and 2 being out that late. If he wants you to ruin his marriage that’s fine but you’re not gonna drag mine into the flames too. 

3. I get really weird vibes from his wife. Idk she talks bad about her husband in front of him &amp; when mine is around she is just bubbly and weird imo. And if they were to stay with us my husband &amp; she would be home while I work. 

4. His wife disciplines different when it comes to her son. I really wouldn’t want her treating my kids that way. 


S/N I am very upset that my husband has made this decision without my consideration. When we had a conversation about him making decisions (especially big ones) w/o speaking with me, he said he is working on his impulsivity. That was about a week ago when we had that conversation. I thought they had gotten their situation figured out when her husband got paid however, I just found out that is not the case as he invited them over and the wife was talking about what all she could help out with if/when they move in. 

Am I the asshole for wanting him to tell his friends they cannot live with us &amp; need to figure it out on their own?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking neighbor to leave my packages alone,"I (32F) sometimes miss deliveries so truck drivers typically leave packages by the front doors (Two family house). My next door neighbor(landlord) would take my packages and put it inside his house. His reasoning was for safe keeping and not to entice package thieves which I understand but I prefer my packages just to be left by my door. Plus there is a ring camera at the door and it’s a safe neighborhood so theft really isn’t a huge concern.

First time I asked for my packages to be left by my door it seemed to upset him. He listened a few times then either started bringing my packages inside his house again or knocking on my door to hand them to me. Thing is I don’t want to be forced to interact each time I expect a package. I’m not trying to sound overly dramatic here but dealing with him is starting to ignite some negative emotions. I think he knows it too and enjoys it. Last straw was a day I was home he knocked on my door for each delivery which was a total of 4x. I am so annoyed by his knock and hearing his ring hit the glass that I sternly (slightly yelled) through my window for him to just leave the package at my door. AITA here? I don’t know why but it feels like a control thing camouflaged as a good deed.",AmItheAsshole
 for not sharing with my pregnant sister,"AITA 
I (24F) and my (30M) husband have a toddler (1F). We are planning to have another child and talking about it since we don’t want a big age gap between them. My sister which is pregnant right now texted me “i know you have a breast-milk pump that you are no longer using and will not use” then asked to “lend her a breast-milk pump that i have”. Since we are planning on having another child i wanted to keep it to myself since i know i will need it and if i lend it to her she will use it for more than 1-2 years, since she isn’t giving birth anytime soon. I told her politely that “i will use it in the neat future so i don’t think i can lend it to you”. She was FURIOUS. Told me i don’t prepare for her pregnancy?? That her husbands sister do way more than i do?? I don’t know how can i prepare for her pregnancy if i am not her dad smh. She called me names and that she will no longer ask anything from me. Heads up saying that when she will give birth i was planning on doing a surprise to her (i live in another country) and of course bring some gifts to her and her baby. So am i the asshole for not lending her an expensive machine that i will need in the near future? 
P.s she and her husband are not poor and she can buy a new one but just does not want to do it.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my SIL(21f) that I(24f) can’t constantly babysit her kids?,"I am a stay at home mom to my daughter, Kelly(1f), and my SIL, Amanda, is a single mom to a 4 year old and a 1 year old. Amanda or my MIL ask me to watch Amanda’s kids normally as least once a week. I am completely fine helping out once a week maybe twice, but I’m constantly being asked with little to no notice. I do an activity with Amanda and all the kids one day a week and typically ended up babysitting afterwards for an hour or two. Then I might be asked to babysit some other day every other week for about five hours. 

The problem I have is I’m not typically leaving her house until 5/5:30 and my husband starts getting ready to leave for work at 8. That means we either don’t spend any time together for me to cook dinner, clean, and start getting my kid settled for bed or we order out to spend time together. I also get stuck in situations where I tell Kelly we can go to the park and then I get texts/calls asking for me to babysit in an hour. 

Kelly contact sleeps, so after putting Amanda’s kids down for naps I start trying one for my daughter, but if another kid wakes up no nap for mine. This is also making it difficult to try and train my kid out of contact sleeping. 
It’s becoming a strain on my relationship, my finances, my parenting, and my mental health.

 I am literally losing sleep over talking to my SIL about this because I genuinely feel for her and know she needs help. I get life isn’t on a schedule, but getting little to no notice constantly makes me feel like I can’t plan to do anything or getting any time sensitive housework done such as laundry. I even got told she was working on a new work schedule and I was told she would need me to watch the kids just on one morning a week on a set day, told not asked if I could or would. 

Tomorrow will be day three of babysitting this week which is not normal due to the normal babysitter being sick. I completely understand that and will help, but don’t want this to but mistaken for something I can do all the time.

WIBTA if I told Amanda that I can only watch her kids twice a week and need to get as much notice as possible?

Edit: Thank you everyone for making me understand that I am not being dramatic, and this is actually an issue. It’s hard for me to distinguish if I’m just getting tired easily or if I’m overdoing it. I am definitely going to talk to my SIL about the babysitting. ",AmItheAsshole
H for telling my bsf of 10 years that she’s a horrible person?,"I 18f have been best friends w a girl, let’s call her Leigh (18f.) 
She’s been through a lot and has picked up smoking, vaping, etc. she dropped out of hs, is unemployed and overall has no motivation in life. 
I’ve highly encouraged her to try to gain independence, as she relies on her mother for everything. She refuses. 
(For future context, her parents are going through a divorce rn and her mom is working two jobs.)
I called her yesterday, and she asked me if she could get cash back at Aldi’s. I asked why, and she said “well my mom won’t by me nic and im out. So im gonna take her card, get $20 cash back, and tell her I got food.”

I was shocked and I said “wait… so you’re stealing from your mom?”
She immediately gets super defensive, saying “well im out of nic” “I need it” and etc. as someone who doesn’t use nic, I don’t see the issue. She gets paid about 50 bucks a week for helping her mom clean, so I saw no reason why she couldn’t wait for that. 

I told her that her mom works really hard, working two jobs, trying to provide for three kids. 
She starting going off on me, saying “my mom has money, I know she does. She’s getting money from dad from the divorce” while I know that is 100% untrue. Her mom works two jobs and is never home and is always worried about money. 

I told her that even if her mom does have money, it doesn’t matter. Lying to her mom is still something super crappy, especially when her mom pays for her food, hair care, clothing, and even for ‘fun’ stuff she likes to do over the weekend. 

I expressed that it’s unfair to her mother and super selfish to say it’s okay to steal from her just because “I need to take a hit.” 

She tried defending herself, “I need it” “it’s my mom it’ll be fine” “she won’t know, ive done it before” and I just kept reiterating about how crappy it is that she did that. 

I made sure to specify that I support her, but not that action. I can’t get behind her stealing from her mother for a non-necessity. I’m not the type to go to her mother and tell her, but I highly encouraged her to give back the money she’s taken in the past and to get over it and simply wait for more money in the future that is ACTUALLY hers. 

After like the fifth time I heard her say “well I need it” I got fed up and told her that only a horrible person would do that to their own mother. 

Eventually, she got fed up, told me to block her, and hung up on me. She has since sent me passive aggressive messages saying “well you made me feel bad so now I don’t have nic” and all I say to that is well good.

So basically, my friend is stealing from her mother, I call her out, she gets mad at me, I tell her that she shouldn’t, and she ends up getting mad at me and hangs up on me. 

AITAH? ",AmItheAsshole
H for asking parents to pay their kids?,My kid is having a birthday party at a zoo. We picked a package that will cover up to 10 kids. I usually don’t make people pay for their kids to come. However my friend wants to bring all her kids. We only factored in 3 of them (she said only 3 would be coming at first) she has 6. AITAH for asking her to pay for the other 3? ,AmItheAsshole
 for arguing with my friend after she consistently tried to convert me?,"Throwaway account as my family and friends use reddit.

Yesterday evening, me (21F) and my friend (22F) spend the day ""catching up"" because we hadn't had time to properly talk because of work. Last time I had seen her, which was about 2 months ago, she'd started to go to church more and became more faithful to her religion. I am not religious at all- I am atheist.

When we met up, she immediately asked me if I had converted to Christianity yet, to which I replied no to, and rubbed it off as a joke. However, I became more annoyed over the evening as she kept trying to convert me, and I had already told her I wasn't interested.

At the end of the evening, she asked me why I don't believe in God, so I told her the reason why- that I believe in science and i showed her how some parts of science dont match up with some parts of the Bible. She got offended and acted like I insulted her, and started yelling swear words at me. I told her that she shouldn't have asked if she was going to get offended, then I left.

She sent me several messages that were passages from the Bible, and kept saying that because I denied faith in God, I'd get sent to hell.
Some of our mutual friends called me an asshole for refusing her help as she was helping me ""find myself"", whereas some called her the asshole for pushing her religion onto others.

Aita?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to attend my sister's wedding because she didn't want my children to be present there?,"Indian-American here. 

My sister Parvati is child free. In Indian culture (at least in the part of India I am from), it's extremely rude to invite only one person in a family &amp; specifically say that others should be excluded if you go to their house. What you say is ""I'd be glad if *all of you* come there."" To say ""Hey, \[name\], I want you to come. And I don't want any of your kids to be present"" is *extremely* rude. 

She is having her wedding in a while &amp; showed up at our house. She said ""I don't want your kids to be there,"" when they were present. And to them ""Don't ask to come, either. I am not having vagrants ruin the wedding"" (convos translated to English.)

I told her it was really rude. She said ""Well, it's my wedding. I get to decide who's invited.""

I snapped back ""I am not attending your wedding.""

She got mad at me, yelled, and left. Others in our family, are calling me a huge asshole for ""insulting a guest."" 

AITA?  
",AmItheAsshole
 for changing where I tailgate to avoid an acquaintance's dog.,"My (33M) family and friends and other acquaintances tailgate for every home game of our alma maters college football games.  We have tailgated together for 10+ years.  I own thousands of dollars worth of equipment.  We drink, we grill, play drinking games and watch other football games.

  
Last year, a couple that I know, but not super well, started bringing their dog to the tailgate. They let the dog all over my stuff.  They would take pictures of the dog on my cornhole boards, let it on my camping chairs.   I'm not a dog friendly person so i asked them to stop and not bring the dog next time.  They dismissed me.  I asked one friend, Bob, that I know well and knows the couple well to leave the dog home.  He refused, said most enjoy the dog and sees no reason why it shouldn't be allowed.  It is a public space.  

  
The last game of the year last year, they even fed the dog steak that I grilled.  They were fair game for people to eat, but I didn't want them going to the dog.  So i asked to be reimbursed 20 bucks.  I never got the money.  It pissed me off.

  
I'm looking into moving spots and making things a little more private, and not as public as they used to be.  .  We've had the same spot for nearly 10 years and I think its time to downsize as I get older and less rowdy.  After some feedback from others it was split.  

  
Some friends are pissed.  They don't want to move due to a variety of factors.   I have most of the equipment and its several thousand dollars worth of gear, plus i'm willing to deal with the hassle of moving and transporting everything.  So people are at my will or find somewhere else.

  
I've been called the asshole.  Phil called me and asked me to re-consider.  I asked if they were going to re-consider bringing the dog and pay me back for the steak?  He said i was being un-reasonable.  They said that i'm ruining it for dozens of people over a dog.  My view is not really, people can follow me, I think others are being rude and disrespectful to me.  It was left at that.  But AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to share food I had ordered for myself?,"This week I had a minor examination at hospital that required me to not eat for 24 hours prior to the test. My appointment was also delayed by 4 hours so by the time it was done and by the time I got home it was over 32-34 hours since I had eaten anything.

Because of this I was very hungry and tired so I decided to order some food. I asked my gf if she wanted anything but she said no. My gf said she'd rather cook than order out but I said I'd prefer a takeaway so we can just have separate meals.

She said she'd rather we both just cooked but I again refused and told her I'm ordering myself food. I ordered the food and she decided to not cook and just said she didn't want anything.

Once my food came I was sat eating and she came over and asked if she could have some. I asked if she was serious. I pointed out I asked her multiple times if she wanted anything and she's waited for me to sit and enjoy my food to try and take it.

I mentioned that I've ordered exactly what I was because of how hungry I am but she just said she was hungry too since she hadn't eaten. I mentioned that the only reason she hadn't eaten was because I didn't want to cook for her and that doesn't mean she can come and take my food instead.

I said if she wants something to eat she can either order herself something or cook it but I'm not sharing what I ordered.

She said I was being too selfish and that I have enough to share so I should be fine sharing with her. She said she's not asking for much and that I'm being unfair.

AITAH for refusing to share the food I ordered?",AmItheAsshole
 for yelling at my mother?,"I \[31m\]  have a 9 year old daughter who my wife and I sent to my mother while we went to a fancy hotel. It was very nice, no hiccups, and we got back safely. As I was unpacking, my daughter came to me with the chica chicken plush I bought her recently. She explained that she wanted me to give it to my mom as an apology gift from her. I asked what she was apologizing for, and she explained that my mom had accused her eating the last of the chicken legs they had, and made her stand facing the wall until she admitted to it.

After an hour, my mom found chicken bones in the dog house, and let my daughter off the hook. My daughter scrubbed the kitchen floor and picked some apples for my mom to say that she forgave my mom. This upset my mom for whatever reason, and she gave my daughter chores and the same bland salad diet she put me on for ""mouthing off"" when I was a kid.

My daughter thought she had done something wrong and wanted to give away her toy to apologize. I said I'd take care of it, sent her away and called my mom.

I tried to be calm, but she wouldn't budge in what she did, so I got to yelling, and she snapped back and said I can forget ever getting her help again. My wife also said I was more mature than that. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I said no to taking care of my disabled stepdad after my mom screamed over a bathroom?,"Hi Reddit, I’m kind of conflicted here. Here’s some backstory. My (20F) dad (70m) had a stroke in November 2022 that left him unable to walk. I was living alone until April 2023 where I came home to help. My mom (48f) and I juggle the responsibilities of taking care of me. 

I was recently in the ER this week to get checked out and found out I have some respiratory virus. This week, I’ve been completely knocked out and sleeping a little more than I would like to. That’s pretty much what happened today, I accidentally fell asleep at around 7pm and woke up at around 9:30pm of her screaming that the bathroom isn’t done, that I’m lazy, and that she’s a slave in her own house. I didn’t mean to sleep for that long, I was just so tired and my body just let me sleep. My mom is still screaming. I don’t want to get in her way as she’s screaming so I just stay quiet. 

She comes into my room and screams “The bathroom, OP!” and slams my door. My mom does this a lot and I think I’m just tired. 

Here’s where I might be the asshole. 

I’m moving to a different town soon to pursue my BA. My mom wants to take more solo trips before she’s stuck with my dad until I finish university.
My mom is planning on taking a trip to the east coast for ten days at some point, leaving my dad in my own care. I don’t want to not take care of my dad but it feels unfair that she can scream at me all she wants but I still do this big thing that she wanted me to do? 

I know I probably should’ve cleaned the bathroom when I was more conscious but I don’t know. I don’t want to keep doing nice things for her if she’s just going to scream at me when I’m sick.",AmItheAsshole
 for repetitively requesting to be paid from a babysitting job?,"
I (17F) babysit fairly often as it’s decent money and I love kids (I’m the oldest of 5 and I have a lot of cousins). This past spring break I babysat for a family I know from our country club in my town (nothing super fancy but it’s pretty nice). Between my friends the family is known as THAT family, as in you mention one of the kids names and someone groans. The mom was at the club working and asked if I could watch her kids (4 of them 11-5) for about 2/3 hours. I wasn’t doing anything and one of my friends was there with me so we both said yes. When I say the kids were so bad I don’t even want to see them in public ever again I’m dead serious. They were running around, screaming, jumping off of stuff, distracting and bothering the lifeguards, really just overall being problems to society. They also have pretty bad manners and aren’t very nice. I wanted to be helpful and the mom was going to pay us fairly well so we didn’t think about it too much except now my friend and I haven’t been paid and it’s been over a week. I’ve texted her number a few times asking if she needed my Venmo or if there was a time I could pick up cash and she is ignoring my texts. I have seen her in person and she acts normal (I don’t ask in person because it never an appropriate time). I don’t want to come across as rude but I do want the money as it was not a simple task watching her children. 

AITA for continuously asking to be paid for the babysitting job I did? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not giving the family I babysat my new phone number? ,"I (17F), babysat for my neighbors one time about 7 months ago. They have 4 kids, 3 girls and 1 boy, ranging in ages 3-12. The only reason that they asked me is because their first 2 options of babysitters, Sarah and Maria (fake names), weren’t available, meaning it was my first time watching them. I have babysat my younger cousins my whole life, but never another family’s. 

Recently, I had to get a new phone and number due to issues with my Apple ID. I know most people keep their numbers when they upgrade, but it wasn’t possible for me. I didn’t realize that this would be happening until I was in the store so I only had time to send my new number to a couple of close friends and family. I lost all my contacts and I won’t lie, my neighbors were not the first people I thought to pass my number to. 

I recently found out that these neighbors have been telling parents around town that I’m irresponsible/rude/an asshole for not responding to their messages, and no one should hire me as their babysitter. I’m not a babysitter. I don’t want anyone to hire me to watch their kids, I have an actual job that I put a lot of hours into and I was really just helping this one family out. However, it’s a small town and everyone knows everyone. I have a reputation to manage and so far I haven’t had a bad one. I see them in their yard almost every day and talk to their kids on the bus/in school, is it that hard to just talk to me like a normal human?!

My mom thinks I should walk over there to explain myself but honestly, I don’t want to babysit for them anyways. These kids were more than just energetic- they were constantly competing for my attention, wouldn’t go to bed, and jumped on me and wouldn’t stop touching me. I get it, that’s just how kids are, but let’s just say I’m not begging for them to take me back. But there was 4 of them, and I don’t mean to sound ungrateful, but the $20 an hour they paid me was not worth it.

So, AITA for not sending a flair message to my neighbors with my phone number?",AmItheAsshole
 for not seeing my ex boyfriend’s mom in hospital after a car accident?,"On mobile

I (29f) and ex (30m) have a complicated situation, we live with each other and share a child but are not together. 

Yesterday on my way back from work, my ex called me to let me know that his mom and aunt were in a severe accident and were taken to the hospital. He asked me to take him to go see her. I agreed but one thing he asked of me was to not act petty. 
His mom and myself have kinda gone no contact, I still see her but we don’t talk.

Background:
My relationship with his mom started off ok but there were several instances where she crossed the line when my child was born in 2020 during Covid. She said she hated me and I was a bitch. we did make up and started talking, but then a few things happened between my ex (was bf), caught him talking to another girl in 2022. I tried to forgive him but couldn’t, after the hell I was put through giving birth, caught him having an emotional affair. In 2023, I was depressed and stressed out after losing my job and starting a new low paying job. During this time my ex and I were fighting non stop, where I demanded to break up with him several times. He would decline the break up because we live together, so i was trapped with him.

At my new job I met a client who I started flirting with, we were texting back and forth, I met him about 5 times but nothing more. one late night he invited me over to a movie and I lied to my “bf” about going out. he read the text from him and called me out. That’s a whole other mess, but he told his mom and she began to act distant with me. In the past I told mom on how difficult her son is, how our relationship was not healthy and I wanted to leave with our child but she begged me to stay with him because he’s “misunderstood.” When she found out about my actions, she took his side and would just thumbs up my messages, talk bad about me so I cut her off.

Back to accident:
I drove my ex  to see his mom during traffic hours, in my head I couldn’t process what just had happened I was still taking it in. Hospitals give me bad anxiety because my mom (rip) was constantly in and out of them due to her epilepsy and my experience during labor/birth. I tried distracting myself by commenting about traffic. Once we were told only one visitor at a time, he goes in I stay outside with child. Ex calls to ask if I wanted to see mom, I’m shocked. I tell him I don’t, I don’t know what to say. We haven’t talked in months. He gets very offended, in the car he repeats himself on how disappointed he is of me, that he would do it for my dad. I told him I’d bring flowers and a card the next day for her but it lead into a full blow argument on how I’m still a piece of shit for not seeing her, I was rolling eyes and scoffing. I said I needed a day to think on what I wanted to say, it wasn’t enough for him. Said I’m an asshole, piece of shit, ugly all in front of our kid.  I wasn’t a saint either but I told him to fuck off, get out of my car and that he was an asshole. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for Evicting A Pregnant Woman?,"This is a throwaway because I do not want this being traced back to me.

I (m34) rent out the 2 extra bedrooms in my house to effectively reduce my mortgage. I overheard that one of my tenants (Susan, f 25) is pregnant. Personally, I do not want to live with kids, never mind a baby. I once lived in an apartment next to a couple with young kids and between the yelling, screaming, and stomping, it was absolute hell. I also know just how destructive kids can be and my house is far from child proof. I also do not want to be in a position where I can be asked to babysit. It's simply not something that neither I, nor my other tenant/roommate would be willing to tolerate.

I told Susan (in writing) that I would NOT be renewing her lease; at the time, there was over 5 months left. I also told her that I wouldn't penalize her for breaking her lease early. When I asked her when she intended to move out (during the last two weeks of the lease), she made the following excuses:

1. She was in no position to find a new place as she was heavily pregnant and would give birth very soon (while it's true that the lease end date does coincide inconveniently close to that date, I gave her more than enough time to find a new place, and it's not my fault that she dragged her feet).
2. That she couldn't afford another place (I do live in a HCOL area, and I charge significantly below market rates because I'm not looking to profit. However, that is a kindness, not an obligation on my part. If she can't afford this area, then she can't afford this area)
3. Think of the baby! (Yes, that's literally what she said. For some reason she thinks that my house is a great environment for raising a kid. And ironically, I am thinking of the baby-I'm thinking of how much worse my life would be with a baby in my house and how to avoid it)

When I refused, she blasted me on social media and to all her friends, and now I'm being called a ""heartless monster"" and ""baby-hating freak"" and being accused of ""discrimination"". She's also being unusually (and I suspect, intentionally) rude, inconsiderate, and messy. Morally, I don't see what I did wrong. If any other tenant became unacceptably disruptive, be it directly or by extension, (ie, adopted a dog), I'd want them gone too. I intend to evict her if I have to, but she was a reasonable and considerate tenant prior to this, so tell me, WIBTA for evicting a pregnant woman?

EDIT: I had a lawyer go over my lease when I first drafted it, but I will double check. I'm also not close to her personally so I have no idea where dad is.",AmItheAsshole
" for playing a podcast (Russillo), which my wife hates, all the time?","
My wife and I had been trying for years to get pregnant and it’d been largely fruitless and it took a huge emotional toll on the both of us, especially her. About 3 years ago, my wife finally gave birth to a beautiful baby girl and we’ve never been happier. Or more tired. 

For the first 30 months or so, our daughter would wake up an abnormal amount during the night to the point where we had to consult a doctor. We tried a bunch of things but nothing really solved the issue. It wasn’t great for my wife and i’s relationship either because we were constantly in terrible moods. My work performance absolutely suffered as a result too.

But about 6 months, I was listening to the Ryen Russillo podcast in our living room (sports, NBA, and lifestyle pod) and our daughter completely knocked out. I didn’t think anything of it at first because it’s not like she doesn’t sleep at all. I had been listening to some of his travelogue pods more frequently, along with his NBA coverage, and, without fail, my daughter would pass out within minutes of hearing his voice. 

Now every time my daughter needs to sleep, I pop on the podcast and she’s out like a light. The issue is that my wife has some really visceral distaste for him. He’s a moderate republican (she’s more liberal) but I think she finds him generally to be strange and somewhat misogynistic. I disagree as he’s just some older, single dude that likes sports.. pretty harmless. But she’s under some impression that he’s becoming a subliminal influence on our daughter because she’s hearing his voice so often.

Like I said earlier, my work and relationship had been impacted by her lack of sleep and now we finally find the solution… but she’s hellbent on her not listening to it. We’ve tried other podcasts like Armchair Expert but it hasn’t worked. It’s embarrassing to admit because it’s just some weird dude talking about sports on a microphone but this is now causing legitimate rifts in our relationship. I’m truthfully confused and am worried that I’m causing irreparable damage to my marriage because of some random podcast. I’m not budging on it because I think she’s acting insane, and it works to get our daughter to sleep.. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my in-laws that I found money the government owes them?,"I recently read an article about unclaimed funds held by the state (usually uncashed checks, forgotten investments, etc.) and decided to search my name on my state’s comptroller website. I found a couple of checks in my husband’s name and when he claimed them, our state mailed him a check for $400. We were so excited, we told a lot of people about this program. 

I didn’t find anything in my name, but under my surname, about a dozen or so checks came up in my father-in-law’s name, so I texted to let him and my mother-in-law know what happened with us and how easy it was to claim the money. EDIT: I did NOT go looking for my in-laws info. I typed in MY name and that’s what came up. 

FIL sent my husband (32M) a series of angry texts accusing us of violating his boundaries and stirring up trouble. Right before the pandemic, my husband got into a huge fight with his mother over boundary issues that led to us being estranged from MIL and FIL for two years. MIL and FIL were very controlling and tended to infantilize my husband, which significantly impacted his mental health and confidence in himself. We tried to reconcile and apologized, while asking for an apology and changed behavior. They were not interested and were ultimately uninvited from our wedding as a result. 

In late 2022, MIL and FIL seemed interested in respecting my husband as a grown adult, and we slowly started talking and getting together for dinner once every 1-2 months again. FIL seems to be respectful except when I trigger him. At one dinner I asked “how’s everything going with you?” and he told me I wasn’t allowed to ask him that. MIL recently offered us FIL’s recently deceased mother’s home, which we couldn’t accept for a few reasons (it’s a no dog building and we have two dogs, for starters). When we later asked if they had decided what to do with the apartment, FIL berated us for invading his privacy. (I wouldn’t have asked if they hadn’t brought us into it, but whatever.)

With the missing money, I guess I just thought of it as equivalent to saying “hey, you dropped your wallet.” FIL seems very resentful of the estrangement and doesn’t seem to understand why his boundaries feel less like actual boundaries and more like a revenge tactic. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 because I won’t give my brother daycare for $25/day?,"I (33f, recently divorced mom) operate an in-home daycare with my sister. For the last few weeks, we have been caring for our 10-mo nephew, our brother’s son, with the expectation that my brother will eventually start paying us, including back pay. We have cared for my nephew 14 days so far, about 4-7 hours per day. My brother wants me to charge only $25 per day, whereas we usually charge $60 per day. When I made a case that $30 per day is reasonable, he responded:

&gt;1- I am not a client, I am your brother and he is your nephew first off. When you and \[ex-husband\] were considering selling your home I was going to do 1% commission instead of 3% because you’re family, which roughly would have been about and $8,500 pay cut. \[This was never discussed.\]

&gt;2- I did pay hundreds for a daycare, and I have no problem doing it again. The difference is a daycare I know 100% I can always take my son there, with him going to y’all, we have to figure out a solution using leave hours anytime the house is down with sickness or y’all go on vacation.

&gt;3- I am compensating based on the amount of work you have to do for the 3-4 hours he is there, actually hourly it’s more than compensating. It is not my fault you chose a route where you don’t make a lot of money, but that damn sure doesn’t make it my responsibility to make up for it.

&gt;4- I think your mindset is a little twisted. You have the opportunity to see and build a relationship with your nephew and get paid for it separately where we don’t count toward your attendance. That is either $400-$450 a month for seeing your nephew or if you want to be petty it can easily be $0.

&gt;5- y’all are the ones that said over and over again you wanted to see \[nephew\] more often and wished he would go there. I am not by any means strapped for money where I can’t easily put him back in daycare full time… but y’all wanted to watch him and I knew it would bring some extra money your way at the same time so should be a win/win. Where you have it f--ked up is you think I need to take him there and you want to talk like he’s just another kid or I’m just another client. I’m not the one to be getting in a back and forth with. If you want the money every month to see your nephew then you need to check yourself, or I’ll keep him the rest of this week and he will start somewhere else next week, I’m not here to play “you’re hurting my feelings games”.

&gt;Let me know, but this isn’t a back and forth. I thought it was a good way for him to spend time with his family and to put some money in your pocket, if it’s a problem already, just say so and I’ll gladly make other arrangements.

After that, I responded that I thought his message was entitled and disrespectful, and I think it’s best we do not continue a business relationship. My brother says I’m “entitled,” my mindset is “twisted,” and I should “say less.” AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for walking out when my sister was crying?,"So I (21F) woke up early this morning with a bad headache. I had a bit too much to drink last night while crying to a friend on the phone. Story for another time. Anyway. My headache wasn't major but was painful enough for me to ask my mom (73F) to turn her phone down while getting ready for work. 

When my sister woke up, she almost immediately put YouTube on the TV. I was going to ask if she could turn it down but she did so before I got the chance. So I decided to try and focus on my own thing while ignoring my headache. However, even with the TV turned down, the specific video she was watching had a lot of yelling in high pitched voices which made my head throb. So I tried my best to politely ask, ""Does it have to be this video that you watch right now?"" Thats where it started.

I was going to explain why I asked before she just groaned in frustration. I was confused then she started complaining about everyone hating the fact that she watched what she did and claimed that no one wanted her to just enjoy her free time. I tried to explain to her that that wasn't the case at all. She assumed my reasoning for mentioning anything about it was because I clearly had an issue with it. And she wasn't wrong. But it wasn't in the way she was taking it. But she wouldn't let me get a word in to let me explain myself. 

Soon enough our mother intervened and said it was too early to be arguing right now. And she wasn't wrong. It was around 7:36 in the morning. Which is half the reason I did my best to keep my voice calm and collected while talking to my sister, the other half being my head. 

While yelling at me, she managed to wake up her boyfriend (22M), who immediately expressed how annoyed he was at being woken up so early. After a bit more yelling from my sister, her boyfriend passive aggressively told her not to care about anyone else not wanting her to do what she wanted. And that it didn't matter how anyone else felt about it. But she just got more angry and was about to walk out. 

 He managed to keep her in the room but she just sat down at the desk and began crying. Both her boyfriend and my mom went over to console her. And my mother attempted to get me to come over and do the same. She asked me to speak to my sister. My sister very loudly and pointedly said she did not want to speak to me. But my mom insisted. Now here's where I may be the asshole. 


After trying to persuade me a third time, I calmly looked at her and said ""What am I supposed to say if she herself said she doesn't wanna talk to me? I can't help if she won't let me. So you two can deal with it."" After saying that I stepped out to smoke down my frustration but I couldn't help but feel bad about not staying when I'd clearly upset her. Now its just us three since my mom has gone to work. She's doing better from what I can see but the air still feels too tense for me to even think of anything to say. And I'm not sure she even wants to talk to me right now. ",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my father out after he made “harmless” comments”? ,"My father is a typical guy for his age group. Never lifted a finger to do housework. I can’t remember him doing housework once in my childhood memory. My mom and him both worked and she would do all the housework and childcare. My brother and I were raised by my mom and my dad would hang out with us for 1-2h on weekends before disappearing to his man cave to watch TV. She complained to him a lot about it when I was a younger and he didn’t take it seriously until she filed for divorce the second we were off to college. To this day he claims she gave him no warning and divorced him out of nowhere. 

As an adult I made sure who I dated knows how to do housework and splits it with me. We have a todo board where we list chores and who will do them and time it will take. That way we don’t do the same things and no one does too much. My father came over to visit from another state as part of work and was suppose to stay off. He was looking at the board and asked what it was and when I told him said “you realize it’s not long to last right?” I was like what? And he said it’s just natural that women want to do all the housework and take care of people and if I keep pushing it my bf will leave me. I was like WTF and told him the reason mom left was because he thought that way. 

He got defensive and said “well I make the money so she does the housework”. I pointed out she worked as well and he said “well she chose to work, it’s her own fault”. I was really pissed at that point and told him to leave. He was supposed to to stay over but I said he needs to find a place to stay but he wasn’t coming back. He left and I’m pissed he was so disrespectful. He texted later “apologizing” I got offended by his comments but they were harmless and for my best interest. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my nephew what could happen if his dog swallows a toy?,"My wife and I are babysitting him(9) for a couple of weeks since her sister/my SIL is out of town. His dog recently destroyed her plush toy. Tore it apart and made it a choking hazard.

I quickly gathered the toy and the pieces and put them in a box before taking her to a pet shop to pick out a new one.

When I came home my nephew asked why I had to replace the toy when she really likes it. I told him that if she swallows a piece of the toy it could block her intestine and she could need surgery.

He looked very scared and my wife told me off, saying there was no need to give him the disturbing info about surgery and scaring him.",AmItheAsshole
 for not adding a guest on Facebook?,"In customer service I(27,f) get A LOT of weird  requests. I work in a gift shop, a guest, Justin (45??m) He comes in once a week and tries to make small talk with me. I’m always polite because I’m the manager and he’s a guest. He buys something every time and shows me photos he takes of animals at our local zoo. 

He’s always pleasant and nice but I cannot shake this feeling that there’s something wrong. A few visits ago Justin came in and was showing me his photos and asked my name. I told him my first name. We don’t wear name tags. My name is spelled differently than it’s said. My employees are all trained to give out first names only and not disclose anyone else’s schedules to guests for safety. We’re mainly women over here.

Once he asked me what city I live in, I told him the one I grew up in, not the one I’m currently residing in. He asked me how my vacation was, I was unsure how he knew I went on vacation. Strange things that didn’t sit well but were not alarming enough to say anything about.

The next time I saw him I was running from one location to the next. My heart sank as I heard him calling my name from a few stores down. I reluctantly turned around. He was very excited to see me and rubbed my upper arm in his greeting. In work mode I just stepped back and continued the conversation. 

He asked me where I was coming from and that he was just in my store, I told him I would talk to him next time. He pulled out a business card and asked me to add his photography business on Facebook and add his personal one. I said I would check it out and sprinted into my store then office.

A couple days passed, I forgot about Justin. I did not look him up or do anything with the card. Suddenly I have a friend request from him. My heart sank.

I’m very private online. The only things you can see are my name, current city, cover photo and profile photo. My name is spelled very differently than how it is spoken, my city is different than what I told him, my job is not listed anywhere, my cover photo is me kissing my girlfriend where you can’t see my face, my profile photo has me looking away in the dark, we don’t have mutual friends. 

I have no idea how he found me. 

It was alarming, I did not respond to the request. I saw him in my store, he asked a supervisor if I was there and she said I stepped out. This happened twice. 

The other day I looked in my spam message requests on Facebook messenger and I had 34 messages from him. Tons of photos of animals, him saying hello multiple times, asking me why I’m not adding him back, telling me he’s on his way to my store. 

My cousin said I’m the asshole here for thinking the worst and Justin probably just wants a friend. The manager in me feels like an asshole for denying my guest. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 if I told my neighbor to stop letting their dog use my side lawn as their personal toilet?,"My across the street neighbor’s mom has a little dog that she always walks across the street to let it use my side lawn to do its business. I don’t know if she lives there or just visits often, but it happens a lot. They have Astro turf and their neighbors don’t have side lawns. I guess mine would be the closest. We’ve seen her let it poop &amp; not clean up until my husband said something to her. She now cleans after it. I don’t mind if dogs pee/poo there during their walks, but it’s just kinda annoying that she solely uses MY side lawn only. 
So, there’s possibly 2 options, WIBTA if I was spiteful &amp; took MY dog over to their side astro turf lawn &amp; let him use it as a toilet? Like you do it to me so I do it to you because we’ve had issues with you before. 
Or, other option, what if I just asked her to stop? To take her dog elsewhere &amp; if she complains that she doesn’t have lawn, then tell her too bad so sad you should have thought about that before having a dog and turf. 

So what do you say?

ETA: by sidelawn, I mean the lawn strip that’s in front of my house but next to the curb. So curb, lawn strip, sidewalk, front lawn. 
She has Astro turf lawn strip while I have grass.",AmItheAsshole
 for not changing the activities planned on a trip to ones everyone likes?,"More like are we the assholes. My friends and I, all guys in our early-mid 30s, planned a guys trip for last week. Its been in the works for 6 months. Before anyone asks, yes those of us with wives our wives get to have girls trips and time with their friends regularly.

Five of us have been friends since high school. One guy, Brent, joined our friend group sophomore year of college when he started dating our buddy Mitch. They're still together to this day. I mention them because this is where the issue started. My wife and best bud's wife had no problem with this trip until they learned Brent was going too. At that point they argued that it wasn't fair that they were being excluded when a couple would be going on the trip. We argued it was still a guys' trip, they saw it otherwise. Ultimately we budged and said if they wanted to come, they could.

Our original plan was traditional camping- tents and sleeping bags the whole time. We found a cabin to rent for most of the week at their insistence. We had our activities planned in advance and licenses for fishing. We did do a nature trail walk our wives wanted to do (the kind that has fences, posts, wooden paths) but other than that we told them they could take one of the cars to go do what they wanted or do what they wanted around the cabin while we did our thing. After a few days they stopped asking us to change plans.

When we got home my wife let me know how mad she was and called us inconsiderate assholes for leaving them out. I told her it was a guy's trip they insisted on joining, not a family trip. We have one of those planned for later this summer. She's been curt with me ever since. My buds' wives feel the same way and we're getting it from all angles. So were we assholes for not changing our activities to things they enjoy too?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to wear earrings while my mom insisently tries to put them on?,"I (21F) HATE earrings, i think they are a unnecessary part of fashion. im fine if others wear it, but for me it gets really uncomftable after a while and plus, after i take them off, they are some little bits of gold or silver left over that i clean off.

Today my mom (68F) really wanted to put these cat like earrings (they were the shape of a sitting cat and were silver in color, with some extra details) for the past few days after i almost lost my other set of earrings i didnt want to wear at all (forced) but after i found the lost earring i took off the other and im trying to keep my ears ""earring free"" from that moment on

Today she decided i was gonna wear them, i didnt want to wear them as, like i said, i like my ears clean, but she insisted i wear them. I told her id put them on later, she said ok (i didnt want them to put them on anyway). After a while she tried again and i said fine, and put one on, but then my mom lost the pin

While she was looking for the pin i took it off, i was just that uncomftable with it. She got up, saw that i took it off and was upset that i took it off, but i just told her i dont like earrings and i dont want to wear them. She still wants to put them on while im writing this

so AITA for refusing to wear earrings?

Edit 1: Thank you for the comments! ive read them all and replied to all i was able to

Most of you told me i should move out, which i currently cannot, but if i did i have to account for a lot of things, like a nearby dog park (i have a Maltipoo named Aki), shops nearby, a school if any of my nephews are to attend there and live with me, and a bakery, which my current place already has and i couldnt imagine myself elsewhere. Heck, i basically grew up in that house

Second thing is to get away from my controlling mother, to which i also cant, as i have to depend on her (i have a disability card, have ADHD, and some other stuff) to do stuff, like get a job, or manage my finances. If i did get away from my mom i dont have any roomates to help me around other than my sisters and some of my adult nephews

Third thing is my mom doesnt understand the word 'no' as she said to me a hour ago that she will force everything on me, to which i replied 'no thank you i do not wanna participate in this'

Last thing is that some ppl said this post made no sense, and thats because im not a native english speaker, so i dont know if i expressed myself right or wrong

Thank you again, i will tell my mom of this post and see if we can talk this out",AmItheAsshole
H For wanting to move out of my parents house but they need child care for their younger kids….,"AITAH for wanting to move out of my parents house because I need my own space…..? I am a 20F in my second year at Uni. I have 2 younger siblings who are 4 &amp; 2. I am my parents(mother &amp; stepfather) “nanny”. I get the 4 year old up for school, feed her breakfast and then take her to preschool. The 2 year  is also up at this time so I feed him, dress him and keep him until I have to go to classes 3 days a week. I’ve been wanting my own place since I graduated high school but I have been scolded by my parents and family members about moving out and not wanting to help with their younger kids. Why is this my responsibility? I have done it ever since the 4 year old was a baby!! There have been numerous times I couldn’t go on trips or hang with friends because of their work schedules, date nights etc.! I have been saving for my own place since my senior year in high school, have a great job(I work nights) so I feel I should be able to move out without the guilt of them actually having to pay a baby sitter to help with my siblings. I told my mother I am willing to still help from time to time when they are in a bind but I don’t want to be the sole provider! Part of me does feel like a AH for wanting to leave but another part of me is saying “those are their children not yours, they can figure it out”..any advice/suggestions would be greatly appreciated! I also will add my stepfather is the most narcissistic AH you will ever meet(this is another reason I have been wanting to move). Him and I have had falling outs numerous times….so I guess them telling me I can’t move is just another way he thinks he can control me!? ",AmItheAsshole
 for wearing the work clothes my girlfriend got me?,"I (25f) have been hired by my girlfriend at her fairly successful chain of bars. I'm her assistant, and she got me some clothes to wear that she thought ""fit the vibe"" she wanted. It's a long-sleeve white blouse and a mid-thigh black pencil skirt. I quite like it, and the work is pretty nice. My roommate saw me, looked at me weird, then approached me when she saw the black ribbon choker I put on to add some style.

She said I looked like a pinup girl and I shouldn't  let myself be ""another scantily-clad coffee fetcher""

I said it's fine, and she's being a drama queen. We went back and forth, and I said that short skirts are a mascot of women's rights.

We went back and forth, and she eventually walked off and said ""You are impossible sometimes.""

She's never been so frustrated, aita?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to let my baby to sleep in my MIL’s room? ,"I’ll(30f) start with the fact that I love and adore my MiL(65f). In our culture we live with our parents-in-law after marriage and this woman has made that the most healing and rewarding experience for me. So much so that it even healed my trauma from my own nmom. 

I have lived in this house for the last 3 years and can confidently say that MIL is a decent and a respectful person and always respected my boundaries. She cares for me, cooks for me, won’t let skip meals. If my husband or I ever fight she sides with me and never ever taunts me. Gives good advice. She has taken care of my emotions more than any parent that I have had. I genuinely call her mummy and love her as much. 

But now that I have given birth, I have been living at my father’s house for the last two months(cultural thing). 


My MIL never interfered in my postpartum, always helped with chores, stayed in the hospital when we asked her and gave us space as long as needed.

Now I have moved back into my husbands family home. My MIL is super excited to spend time with her grandson. And last night she said “ can I make him sleep in my room?. I want him to be used to sleeping with his grandma too. 

She didn’t ask this, she hopefully said it, hoping to be approved by me.

I felt it as very very odd. But I said “Ofcourse”. But my husband saw my face… and understood my discomfort and politely declined the request and said that can be done some other day. 

My MIL graciously accepted his word but offers to help us with my son’s night time routine. I am perfectly fine with that

I trust this woman fully and was looking forward to letting my son be with her at home all the time even take naps with her.. But during the day…

I don’t know how to feel about this particular request though… I don’t wanna hurt her feelings..
Will I be the asshole if I refuse to let her take my baby to her room to get used to sleeping with her?",AmItheAsshole
H for telling my Dad I don't care about his company after he accused me of creating a fake Twitter account in his name?,"I'm a 38m and my Dad and I have never really had what I'd call a healthy relationship. Without going too deep into family history, he was mostly an absent father due to drug use and addiction. In the rare instance he was around, he was physically/verbally abusive. Recently, the past 3 years or so, our relationship has gotten to a place where we can communicate without it leading to arguments.

I received a call this morning in an accusatory tone. Mind you, we haven't spoken in months. No pleasantries or how's everything. It started with ""let me ask you a question"". I said ok, it's 7:30 am and I'm half asleep. He asks if I have a Twitter account. I said that I do have one but I'm not an active user. I ask why he is asking me these questions. He said that his social media manager at his company (he's the CEO) mentioned that he had some other accounts listed and we share the same name so he thought it may have belonged to me. At this point I'm too tired to care and he starts feigning interest in my wife and kids. It's my Wife's birthday, which he doesn't mention. I'm not all that concerned but he did spell out the username he was worried about. We hang up.

I kept thinking back on our conversation so I looked up the account. I found the account with his picture as the profile pic and a bunch of posts purporting to be him. The account was also focused around his company and had a bunch of updates claiming to be written by him. At this point I figured out why he was actually calling and I'm really upset that I would be his first suspect as someone masquerading as him online.

I called him back to say that I thought it was really messed up that he would suspect me as the person that created this account. He disputed my findings and said his social media manager brought it to his attention but didn't mention that his pictures and posts were on there. I asked why he would call me without this information and why was it such a concern if it only had his name. A quick Google search would list many accounts sharing our name alone. He apologized but refused to admit he suspected me which I thought was unacceptable. I continued to press him about why he would believe this to be the case and he only kept apologizing. I told him if he refuses to admit that he was caught to just leave me out of it and I don't care about his company.

That made him absolutely lose it and he said I crossed the line. He also said he was a man and he wasn't going to put up with being called out by me. His voice was shaking in anger and I mention that he has always cared more about his company than his family. He kept repeating that I have so much resentment and that I can't stand being called out. I let him know that he was free to say what he'd like and I wouldn't react. He started stuttering and didn't say much of anything that made sense after this. We hung up and we probably won't speak again for a while. We've gone years without speaking before.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my sister she either needs to suck it up and go or not go but our parents will never be disinvited to events,"My sister is no contact with our parents. A very long story short, she needed a loan (50k) and did a deal with our parents. She then refused to pay it back. Then our parents go into some issues we’re they needed the money. They sued my sister for the cash and won. She pays back an amount each month to them. She went no contact after that whole situation.

Personally I am on my parents side since my sister really screwed them over and it wouldn’t have happened it she tried to pay them back at all. So I am still in contact with her still and family events happen all the time.

I bought a house and am having a dinner with all the family. Everyone was invited including my parents and sister. They were both informed and my parents had no issue with it. My sister on the other hand was pissed.

We got in an argument and she wants them to be uninvited for my he events. I had enough and told her she can either suck it up and go or not go, but our parents will never be uninvited.

She called me a jerk and hasn’t talked to me since . So am I the ass in this situation ",AmItheAsshole
 for being aggressive with my wife.,"My wife has trouble understanding when I give her an answer. I will give the example that drives me the most nuts.

She will ask me in the middle of the afternoon if I would like a snack. If I say yes then she will make is a snack or tell me that she would like to go get something.

However if I say no she won't just make herself something or go get something for herself. She will ask me if I'm sure. I am. She will then give me a list of things we could eat. I still don't want anything. Then she will check again. Nope still not hungry. Then she will go to the fridge and start listing random stuff we could eat. Not interested.

I tell her that she could just eat something by herself. I tell her that she could go get something by herself. I offer to make her a snack. I offer to order in. I offer to go out with her so she doesn't want to sit somewhere by herself. None of those is a good enough response.

Then she will go back to checking if I'm sure I don't want anything. By this point I'm done and I tell her very clearly that I'm not interested and that it is the last time I am going to answer politely.

And this is when she says that I do not need to be so aggressive about answering a simple question.

I swear it takes all my self restraint not to lose it on her.

But she still complains about me being so aggressive. It is becoming a real problem.

I don't think that warning her that I'm done being polite is aggressive. I think it's me being frustrated that she won't just accept no as easy as she will yes.

She still tells me that I'm being a jerk when I react so aggressively.

  
#EDIT

  
I used food as the example that bothers me most and is most innocuous. She does this with multiple situations. she does not have an eating disorder. ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my step dad I don’t want to have movie night with him anymore ,"I(17f) have and my step dad(47m) have had a tradition ever since I was little where we would watch movies every weekend. My bio dad isn’t in my life as he left when I was at a very young age. So me and step didn’t have to worry about me going to my bio dad’s house because he didn’t have custody at all. 
            However ever since I was at the age of 9 my step dad had started to put his hand on my thigh, which thigh depended on which side of he was siting at, but usually sat on my right side. Then it wasn’t really that high but as I got older he would start moving it upward. I found this really weird especially when ever my mom would walk in the room/ watch a movie with us he never did it, but since I didn’t know that it was bad I never said anything.
     At the age of 12 I had gotten  through a very traumatic time with some boys at my school which involved them putting their hands on my thighs. After that my Step dad never touched me again until now. He did it again it was basically on “that” area I got so uncomfortable I told him to stop but he didn’t. I yelled at him saying “ I’m not going a move night with anymore if you don’t stop.”
       He said he wasn’t doing anything wrong but never told my mom why I yelled at him, to which my mom called an asshole and I was being a bratty Teenager. I haven’t had movie nights with any of them anymore 
    
        AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not chipping in for my Mom's 75th birthday party?,"My Mom turned 75 years old last week and I got her tickets to watch her favorite Broadway musical. That was my gift to her. However, the rest of the family apparently had this whole grand birthday party planned and asked all of us to chip in. I refused because I had already bought a gift, and it wasn't cheap either. They still kept insisting that I either chip in some money or take care of the decorations. I was initially okay with it until they told me that they wanted something lavish. So I told them they could either do it themselves, or allow me to do it my way. Long story short, they didn't like my decorations and are still annoyed that I didn't chip in and I'll prolly never hear the end of it. ",AmItheAsshole
 for giving my parents the silent treatment for outing me?,"Some backstory before I start, me and my dad have the best relationship, he’s like one of my best friends and biggest supporter in all my achievements, however my relationship with my mum isn’t the greatest due to her own personal issues which negatively reflected on me in my childhood and for that we aren’t as close. Now on to the issue,  In 2020 I came out to both my parents, my Mum was very supportive as her best friend is a lesbian, my dad wasn’t really bothered and said it wouldn’t change how he saw me, however whenever it came to pride things I never really went to him about it just because I knew he probably wouldn’t get it, but that didn’t bother me.

 Fast forward to yesterday, my dad and I were in the car coming home from McDonald’s for our dinner and as we were waiting at a red light I brought up the fact I wanted to come out to the rest of my family (I have quite a large family and only my cousin knew as she and I are very close), and without a pause he said to me “they already know” I got extremely confused and said back “what do you mean? I haven’t told them” to which he said “no, your mum and I told them” at this point I was getting very panicked, frustrated and upset and I was finding it difficult to put my words together, so I told him “why didn’t you ask me? You had no right to do that without telling me” and all he said back was “I’m allowed to talk to family about things” this made me cry because I had never felt so betrayed before. 

As soon as we got home I had a go at my mum telling her “you had no right to tell people my sexuality without telling me” and went to my room. Earlier today I got up and ignored both my parents when they tried speaking to me and I went straight downstairs to get breakfast, when I tried to go back upstairs my dad blocked the door and told me to sit down, he pretty much told me over again and again about how he’s “allowed to talk to family about me” and how “my sexuality isn’t just about me” I was now sobbing sat on the sofa as I just kept repeating “you outed me” and  “you had absolutely no right “ because that’s all I could get out, I was so angry that they had taken something so personal away from me because I now couldn’t come out to my own family when I wanted to, and he had the nerve to say “I didn’t out you, don’t use that word it’s very negative” like I was a child.
My mum seemed to understand my frustration and apologised for taking that away from me.
I quickly got up and barged past my dad and locked the door to my room, I haven’t and refuse to speak to him… AITA?
",AmItheAsshole
 for going to my former mother-in-laws funeral luncheon?,"This happened last year but it still weighs on my mind. Was I wrong? 

My (44F) ex husband Derek (44M) and I were married for ten years, together for 12. Our mostly amicable divorce was finalized in 2022. I was very close to his mother and aunt and I still check in to chat to his aunt monthly. Derek has not expressed any concerns about me talking to her. In fact he seems to be glad that I do.

Derek got together with his current girlfriend Brittany (mid-30sF) in late 2021. She never met his mother.

Derek’s mother passed away unexpectedly last year. It was devastating for all of us. She is sorely missed. Obviously I was planning on going to the funeral. 

I was talking to his aunt and his mother’s close friends at the funeral and they asked me to come to the luncheon afterwards. I was “warned” by Derek that Brittany would be really mad if I was there. I don’t really care about her feelings and in the moment, being asked by these people I really love to be there - I accepted. I sat with the friends instead of family in deference to his relationship and generally stayed out of the way.

Derek was pissed at me. Brittany’s super mature sister shot daggers at me all afternoon and tried to stare me down like we were going to fight in the parking lot. Otherwise, it was very cathartic to sit around the table with all of MIL’s friends and share stories. 

It was a funeral for someone I loved. Why does Brittany get to make the rules? I don’t think I should have been expected to cater to a stranger’s feelings about it. It wasn’t her wedding day, which I can assure you I would not be at if that were to ever happen.

Was I really the AH here?
",AmItheAsshole
 for getting my niece disqualified for a job?,"Disclaimer: I am Indian, we refer to our cousins children as “niece” and “nephew” in our culture. 

I (26f) have 4 aunts. My aunts all have grown children in their 40s+. About 15 years ago, my parents divorced. Might seem  like no big deal, but **this is extremely taboo in our culture**, especially 15 years ago. Everyone in our community was gossiping about it - I remember walking to school one day and 2 grown men walking ahead of me were talking about how evil my mom was for leaving my deadbeat dad. 

3 of my aunts live outside of the country, 1 of them live in the same city, my mom helped them immigrate here in the early 2000’s. My aunt who lives here, has 2 adult children, and 1 of her children “Crystal” (40something) has 2 children herself - a 16M and 22F. 

My cousin Crystal, along with my Aunt, were not really there for us while growing up. My mom was a single parent, working 12-16 hour days, 6 days a week, and had no support from anyone. In our culture, generally aunts and uncles help raise children, it’s very much so like a village. However - my mom had no help. Every time she asked for help or babysitting or anything (never money), they would have a million excuses on why they couldn’t help (they both stayed at home full time, never had any job). They treated us poorly growing up - with my sister and I always the butt of the joke because we were the fatherless girls with no family. My childhood was very lonely, and nothing like the childhood my friends from the same background/culture had. It made me sad when I was younger, but I got over it as I got older. 

Present day - I don’t have a relationship with Crystal, her children, or my aunt. My mom still has a relationship with them, they see eachother a few times a year and talk on the phone every week or two. 

I work for the government, and the area of government I work in is very hard to get into. Theres a lot of “nepotism”, and positions generally go to those who know someone that works there. I joined during a busy time and took a job at the very bottom and have worked up to more senior roles, and now make over 6 figures. 

Crystals daughter “Emma” recently applied to work at my job, and in her application, indicated she knew me and I referred her. When asked by our Talent dept, I said I didn’t know her and did not refer her. I don’t know Emma, I haven’t seen her since pre covid. I guess since Emma lied on her application, she will no longer be considered for any government roles. News got back to Crystal, and she was incredibly angry that I “banned” her daughter, aka my niece, from working in government and is going around telling other family members how could I do that to them, after their family has done SO much (??) for us. 

I don’t think I did anything wrong - but some family members said I should have just gone with it and said I referred Emma because “that’s just what family does.” 

AITA for getting my niece disqualified from a job?",AmItheAsshole
 for being responsible of my manager's new nickname (Peter Pan) ?,"Hello Everyone,  
I 33M (and French), everything in that post happened in french but I'll translate everything for y'all.

Background :  
My company has two offices, one in the US and one in France. I'm the only Social Media manager / community manager / content creator for that company. It's a lot of work but I usually don't complain. When I joined the company, that role didn't exist and it's by creating things on my personal time and showing the results and number growing that the CEO decided to trust me and officially give me that title and the responsability of all the social media for her company. The way my contract was made is that it's Me, Myself and I: I have full creative control and as long as I don't F up, I have a job but if would F up, it's Game over; I pack my stuff and go look for another job. I just have to have a manager due to have the company built.

So, I switched teams and went from being at the bottom of the corporate ladder to join the ""Marketing and Communication team"". And while I have a good / friendly but still very professional relation with the CEO, I can't say the same for the relation I have with my new manager, the chief of my new department. He sees himself, the people working for him and what they do as the ""ELITE"". Everyone has one or multiple degrees, on very prestigious university and cursus (like Beaux-Arts, High Commercial Studies, ...) and he describes me as ""The rotten fruit"" since I don't have any diploma in my domain. And let's also add that He is not the most liked or popular human in our company, even from the point of view of people that are part of his inner circle.

So the issue :  
With the Olympic Games in Paris getting closer and closer, Everyone in the company works a lot more than usual, including me. For me it looks like around 40h of work (my whole weekly hours) done in 3 days, but I still work 5 or 6 days a week. I also need to change my sleep schedule so that I can work with the US and French employees daily.

Monday, we had a meeting, and several people were connected, including my manager, the CEO and other peoples. The conversation was about who should take on a new project. My manager said ""Give it to OP; he does nothing"". I didn't think for more than 0.2s before I said, ""Well, ImaginaryLand it's second star to the right and straight on till morning. But here, it's the reality, and that won't be happening. I'm already at 250% of my workload; so that's a no"" (In the French version of the Disney movie Neverland, it has been translated to something like""ImaginaryLand""). Everyone except my manager and I laughed when I said that.

Several days later, the tail of that meeting spread like wildfire in our company, and now My manager's nickname is Peter Pan. Most People think it's funny (most of them didn't like him before that), but My manager and some people in his inner circle think I've been disrespectful, that I'm an asshole, and I should apologize.

So, Reddit, tell me, AITA ?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my cousin an idiot?,"I (30F) am taking care of a family dog alongside my cousin (24m). We divided the dates and I felt like everything was planned accordingly. I went Sunday and Monday, he was supposed to go Tuesday and Wednesday. I find out today that he forgot. The dog hasn't eaten, hasnt drank water. Long story short, I insulted him for this. My entire family is pissed at me? Like I should have been nicer to him about the situation.  
I feel strongly about being in the right here but because I called him names am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 if I take my sister’s room while she’s at uni?,"In September my (17F) sister (19F) is going to to uni 3.5 hours away from home and will be living in student halls for five years. 

I have always had the box room, which has barely enough room for me. While my sister has a much bigger room, enough room for a double bed and extra space. When September comes, I really want to take her bedroom because I need more space and as she won’t be living here I thought it would make sense otherwise that space would go to waste. A double bed would be really handy for some of my medical needs which I can’t have in my own room and I’ll also be taking care of her pets whilst she’s gone.

My sister is saying that she won’t come back if I take her room. As she believes that it won’t be home if she comes back and doesn’t have her old bedroom.

WIBTA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for not distracting wife's best-friend's new boyfriend?,"OK, this is a bit of a weird one, but my wife and I are still arguing over this.

We have a friend, Bertha, who has been divorced for a few years now. She’s more my wife’s friend than mine. She and her son would come over every other weekend to play with my kids (my wife and her were pregnant at the same time with our first child). She was pretty lonely and it was a nice distraction for her. My wife and her would hang out and I would play with the kids and be expected to cook for everyone. She never invited us all over to hers but would occasionally invite my wife and oldest, excluding me and our youngest because her son was an only child and wanted “alone time” with his best friend. I, obviously, would spend the day with my youngest. I was a bit annoyed about the imbalance, but it wasn’t a big deal and my wife seemed happy.

A few months ago, Bertha got a new boyfriend, Steve. He’s nice enough, polite and really seems to be keen on her. I’ve tried to engage him in conversation or in some activity but he only wants to sit with his new girlfriend, Bertha. The last couple of times they’ve been over we’ve sat in the garden and they’ve spent most of the time touching each other up. The last time, after sitting with them for a while, I left my wife with them and played with the kids.

My wife has been very upset with me and said I should help her out and distract Steve more. I told her that I tried and he’s only interested in Bertha. She insisted that next time I try harder because she misses talking to her friend. I said that it wasn’t my job to a be a dancing monkey. I said that I’ve cooked for them and babysat for them for years with no reciprocation and that I wasn’t interested in babysitting her boyfriend as well, especially when he’s not interested. I said that if Bertha wanted so spend time alone with her, then she wouldn’t bring Steve everywhere they go and it’s not my responsibility for me to stop him touching her all the time. If she doesn’t like it she should bring it up. If Bertha doesn’t like it then she would stop it, but she has not.

Somehow this has turned into something that is my problem and my fault. Honestly, I wouldn’t care if Bertha didn’t visit for a few weeks. I think she and Steve are excited about their new relationship and will probably calm down in a month or two. My wife thinks I should ‘try harder’ with Steve, but he’s like Michael Scott in The Office when he was dating Holly. I told her to wait a while but she somehow thinks I can solve this. I don’t see how I can. I don’t even think there is a problem to solve but my wife thinks I’m being an asshole for not trying anymore. I’ve already tried and I’m not going to force something with someone who is uninterested and is a bit obsessed with his new girlfriend. 

Amitheasshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying I don't see why my sister always has to be included but I don't?,"Me (15f) and my sister (16f) are only 11 months apart but we're really different. She was always the prettier one, the more outgoing and popular one. She was always surrounded by friends and loves all things makeup and fashion. I'm more introverted and shy and I never really fit the way she did. Though I always wanted to have friends. I like video games and baking and reading. I'm not into beauty stuff like she is. I don't really ever wear makeup. So we've never had much in common.

I have tried to be close to my sister but it never worked out. We're just too different. And she resented my attempts for us to be closer. She'd let her friends say mean things about me like calling me a freak, a weirdo, saying I was lame and dumb. Sometimes they'd be in our house and they'd kick me out of the basement, which is set up for games and movies and stuff like that. They'd tell me I couldn't hang out with them and they wanted to watch something. My parents would always tell me to find something else to do. And a few times her friends split up at our house and some were outside and some in the basement so I really only had my room as a refuge. I told my parents about what the others would say about me and they really didn't care. I think once they said they'd deal with it but it didn't stop. My parents just let them kick me out of spaces or tell me to stop doing what I was doing so they could do it and it was never a problem.

When I started high school I finally found a group of friends I fit in with. There's five of us and we're all really close. I even have a boyfriend now. But my sister hates that she's not welcome in with them and the reason for that is before I was friends with them she and her friends were really awful to them and she would mock them or make fun of them for their appearance or for being weird. So none of them like her. My boyfriend is the only one without that history because he moved to town right at the start of high school so never knew my sister before we got close. When my friends are over my sister will try to insert herself and she's tried to do that by making fun of me or pushing me out but my friends actually like me.

The problem is my parents are not okay with my sister being excluded and they said if I want to hang out with my friends, we have to be open to her hanging out if she wants. She has more free time now because her friendship group had this big fight and now there's so many splits and smaller groups and nobody has the time so she's around more and wants to be involved. I tried to stop inviting my friends over but if they even came to our neighborhood to hang out it was a rule my parents put in place. Saturday I got so frustrated I told the three of them that I don't see why my sister always has to be included but I don't. I told them it was clear she's the favorite and everyone in the family thinks I'm just some freak who should be alone for the rest of her life.

My parents were furious. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 For going on my deck at night?,"So apologies for any formatting. I'm a longtime lurker on Reddit but I've never really posted. 

So here's the situation at hand! 

I (24F) have lived in my current apartment for around 3 years. Recently I've began cleaning my deck and laying out the furniture again as a form of ""spring cleaning"". I get all this done during the day while it's still light out. However, I like to go and sit on my deck with the light on during night to just to get some fresh air occasionally while enjoying my new deck furniture and setup. This hasn't been a problem in the 3 years I've lived here; However recently I've had one of the neighbours come onto his deck and start SCREAMING at me for being on my deck. I can say for certain I am not being loud. As a matter of fact I never even speak on my deck or watch videos. Just sit and scroll on my phone or I'll read. During the daytime I decided to test wether I was somehow being to loud and I got my fiancé to sit in various different rooms while I talked, Played videos, slid chairs, etc and he said the only thing he could slightly hear was the chair sliding so I know for certain I am not being to loud. The light also shouldn't be the issue as there is a road about 20 feet away with streetlights and cars passing by at all hours and even without the light on it's very bright.  

Almost every time I go out on my deck after sunset within 5 minutes the neighbour is on the deck screaming at me. He has never once been nice and just slammed open his door and screamed ""Can you GET THE F\*CK OFF YOUR DECK?? YOU'RE BEING SO INCOSNIDERATE AND SELFISH"". He has not been kind or asked politely literally a single time and has only ever resorted to what I call the ""Grand tantrum fit for the brattiest 4 year old"". Because of all this I've decided to continue using my deck as I see fit and sitting quietly with the light on. 

I've recently told a few of my co-workers about this story and although most are on my side and have said that if he's not paying my bills he can't dictate how I use my space as long as I'm not hurting anyone or being disruptive, Other co-workers have said I should be a bit more understanding and maybe he has some issues or something so here I am asking, Reddit, AITA for using my deck at night?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting our “roommate” to move into our new place with us?,"Alright y'all. Let me just start by saying I'm trying to make this as easy as possible for all parties involved, That said I'm not sure how to work this out. For a little background I (29f) got married almost two weeks ago, my husband (32m) and I have lived together for several years, I am the main financial body in the home and I handle all the bills, groceries, finances of all kinds. A friend of ours (35m) in the last several months went though a hard breakup and has been sleeping on our couch, we have just been trying to help him out but not without issue.
He does give us some money here and there to help with groceries/gas/household needs, but he also breaks several of the HOA rules our condo has. He is not on a lease as it’s a private rental for us with a private owner we know but as of the beginning of June we have to relocate because the owner would like to sell the property, he’s been very good to us and we hold no ill will toward him because of his need to sell. We have been on the search over the last two months (he told us we had till June on March first) and with our “roommate” not having a place to stay aside with us we considered having him come along…but as we have lived together over the last couple months my husband and I are finding more and more reasons for not wanting him to come with…those reasons including:
-piles of cigarette butts on our back patio (against HOA) 
- not keeping his space clean (i.e mostly full cans of soda on our table close to the edge and stacked on top of one another, dirty clothes, just general trash) 
- he doesn’t help with household chores, including dishes, taking out the dogs (one of which is his) any cleaning of any kind…
One thing that really gets me is knocking once when our bedroom door is obviously closed and then proceeding to just walk in after the first time…

Now we are looking at places to move to and found one very recently that will allow his dog (an 8-10 year old Pitt bull) but has many other rules, he would not be allowed to smoke on property and would have to walk to the street…it’s not a big complex hit this was a point of contention for him. He would also have to par with one of his animals (likely his cat) because there is a limit of two pets per unit. We would also be parting ways with our cats to follow this rule, he’s complained about having to follow certain rules or leaving his car behind..along with his inability to clean up after himself or respect our space and it’s to the point we don’t want him to come along. How do we nicely tell him we want to live on our own as many married couples do? 

Edit: just to assure everyone we do not plan to get rid of our cats, that statement toward him specifically was because we would have to rehome them with Trusted friends if he did come along. Since he will not be do not worry, all of our fur babies are staying with us ",AmItheAsshole
 if I prevent/deny my aunt from buying a house. ,"I’m 26(M) and working through college and a manager job I got a a coffee shop. I got my residence a few years ago thanks to my uncle (55) and aunt(59)(siblings supporting each other) helping me with the process and been able to apply for new opportunities.   
I’m extremely grateful and been supporting for the last 5 years paying for my part of rent and some bills. In this family I’ve been the only one with a solid legal status till recently my aunt got her residence too.   For the last two years they both asked if I would be ok putting my papers to qualify for a mortgage to buy a house. Last year we tried to and was denied and my Credit score took a hit. It hurt a little but I could recover quickly.  

Right now my aunt wants me to co-sign on a new application for a mortgage and I’m having doubts since I’ve come to realize how much of a responsibility will fall on my shoulders if I go into it, and I’m not sure if I want to get into it just yet.  She wants to buy a home since they have been renting for decades and feel like they have been losing all their money and think owning will be cheaper I feel like the market hasn’t set in just enough to think about buying but they don’t want to wait for longer.  

The past few months I’ve been extra tired from work and the classes I’m taking and feels as if I barely have time to relax. In this time they asked and pushed me to give them my tax and income info to go through the mortgage and I just gave them most of the info without thinking. I recently have been asked to check and allow them to get all my info so they can go with the mortgage and almost feels like the agents are almost demanding my aunt for the rest of my info. Even called my job earlier today. Thankfully my finance superior didn’t disclosed anything and called me to check about it.  

I feel tired of this and want to enjoy my life as a manager/student and improve my skills so I can get a better job and help my family. But I also feel like I owe my family for the help they gave me before to get me to the position I’m in right now and have mixed feelings due to the issues that my aunt and uncle have had for a while regarding him leaving and my aunt using every time she can to just talk bad  about his new wife and other issues I feel like may turn my way if I deny.   

I know I haven’t put all the info yet but I’ll try to come back to add more info but WIBTA if I deny the rest of the process for my aunt?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my step mum strange and obsessive?,"My (F16) dad, Liam (M34) got married a couple years ago to a woman, Tilly (F40). She's not in the least similar to his ex girlfriends, all who were quite fun, lively and usually either modelled or worked in the arts. She works in a pre approved school and likes to act as if I was one of the students there.

Liam used to be eccentric before he met her, he's still usually energetic and funny when she's not around, but she does keep him on a tight leash. He's given up modelling and painting for a conventional job, he gets his haircut into the style that she likes, which is very short and she's practically remodelled him into her ideal partner. Based in how Liam was before he met her, I was raised pretty unconventionally too. We moved around a lot, I learned to be very social, I went to most parties he attended, I'd usually get to miss school to go on little coffee dates with him and whoever he was dating at the time in posh London cafes. I usually dressed however I wanted.

The girl he was with prior to Tilly, Cherry (F33), was his longest relationship. She is my mam as far as I'm concerned. We all lived in her apartment in a lively part of London, so we frequently went out. I was used to Cherry taking me out to get our hair done together, or clothes shopping or for brunch. She'd always buy me the most beautiful clothes. Cherry even managed to get me modelling gigs when I was a kid. Of course, when Liam married Tilly, all that went down the gutter, she out of nowhere started to control what I wore, even how I spoke. She tried her best to treat me as if I was a little kid, forcing me into all these twee, little girly activities and outfits and whatever.

I still speak to Cherry on a regular basis. I told Cherry that I was still interested in modelling and she managed to book me a gig! It was great, Cherry took me out for the day to get both hair and lash extensions put in, my nails gently manicured and get some new clothes, we spent the rest of the day just lolling about her apartment.

When I came home, Tilly was extremely upset that Cherry allowed me to alter my appearance, even though it wasn't altered that much. She started ranting about it and asking me to take my extensions out. I told her that I couldn't, that Cherry had managed to book me a modelling shoot and I can't just ruin all the work she paid for, which set Tilly off. Tilly said that it was a stupid vanity contest and that Cherry shouldn't be encouraging me to do things like that, or allowing me to alter my appearance without her consent. I yelled at Tilly that she was acting super obsessive and strange, that she shouldn't act as if she holds some kind of ownership over me - its a simple photoshoot and literally just the most unnoticeable extensions you could get.

She got upset and went crying to Liam about it, who said that I was acting like a dick when Tilly just didn't want me acting too grown up for my age. Cherry said that she was being melodramatic.",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to talk to my father after he KICKED me out of the house I lived in my whole life?,"Sorry in advance if there are some gramatical errors or weird words, I posted this in a Spanish subredit and translated it because I didnt want to to do it by myself even though I know English.:)

A bit of context...
In my childhood, I had a happy life, parents together who seemed to be fine, a brother and a family that loved me. As time went by, my parents had problems, they divorced, so my brother and I stayed with my mom in the same house where we had lived since we were little. The relationship with my Father at that time was very good but gradually deteriorated because he made his life and without realizing it, he pushed me and my brother aside.

Returning to the present, that house was always being fought over by my parents, on one hand, my mom wanting to leave it at my brother and I names, and on the other hand, my dad wanting to take it away and sell it. In the end, due to problems with the lawyers and a trial in which my mom did not show up because she was never notified, the judge ended up ruling in favor of my dad and part of his family (because they were also behind everything), we were just notified that we had 7 days to leave the house or we would be forcibly removed. We did what we could but in the end, they kicked us out in a horrible way because both my dad's lawyer and those they hired treated us like the worst.

Maybe I didn't give all the context, but I know that despite everything my dad didn't want to hurt us even though he did it in the worst way. He didn't care what we felt, he didn't care what we thought, he didn't care about anything other than his hatred and contempt towards my mom and dragged us in the worst possible way... He wants to fix things but neither he nor his family apologized to my brother and me for what they did to us, somehow he believes it's okay and that ""it was all my mom's fault"" even though he orchestrated everything so the only thing they did was act as if nothing had happened. He says he wants to mend things and fix the relationship with us to the point that he bought me a car and gave us some money but I simply don't see it possible, not only do I have a lot of remorse towards him but it makes me uncomfortable and quite depressed to be with someone who was capable of doing all the harm he did to me just because he felt a lot of resentment towards someone who wasn't me (in this case, my mom).

The wife of my dad is trying to convince me that im being selfish for acting like that. She says that my dad has been very upset because we don't want to talk with him and he cares about us. AITA for refusing to talk to him?",AmItheAsshole
 for re-dying my hair so my dad and I won’t match?? ,"Using a throwaway since my dad follows me on my main reddit and id rather him not see this 

I (16M) recently split dyed my hair black and red. 
Since i’ve dyed my hair, my dad told me he wanted to dye his hair like mine because it looked cool and he wanted us to match. 

I told him i’d rather him not do it since I do not want to have the same hairstyle as him to which he replied that it doesn’t have to be the same colors, and I repeated to him that I would rather him not— long story short, he dyed his hair the same exact style as mine two nights ago, so last night i bleached my hair and dyed it green so we wouldn’t have the same dye job. When he found out he freaked and said he feels disrespected by me doing that and has been giving me silent treatment the last few hours.

AITA?? Should I have just kept my hair the same and ignored it??


 ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my rich classmate not everyone has it financially as good as her?,"I (30f) am in my second year of university. The classmate I called out (""Ellen"") is 19f. I wouldn't call us friends, but we worked together a lot because of a big assignment, and I often spend lunch time with her and the same group of students. Kind of like good colleagues.

Ellen's parents own their own supermarket and are quite well off (think: yacht, 2 vacation homes, 4 cars). I know this because Ellen has a habit of bringing up her financial status on a regular basis. At the beginning of the year it didn't annoy me because it was just casually mentioned now and then and she wasn't hurting anyone with it. But as time went on this changed to her actively trying to turn the conversation towards the topic, often during times where it would be considered ""tone-deaf"".

For example another classmate ""Elisa"" got into a car accident and had to stay in the hospital. As she was sharing her experience during lunch, Ellen said: ""oh I got into a really bad accident too once, on my yacht. I lost my balance and fell backwards. My neck was sore for days"".

The situation where I called her out was this one: Ellen's best friend ""Lydia"" had her backpack and laptop stolen and was crying uncontrollable. Ellen gave her a hug and said: ""you don't need to cry, you can just buy a new one!"". Lydia said that she couldn't, to which Ellen replied: ""oh c'mon it's not that expensive. With the software we need a laptop of €1200/$1280 should be enough"". I replied: ""Ellen not everyone is as financially comfortable as you"".

Ellen clearly didn't like that. She raised her voice and told me that people only see the money but they don't see how much effort she has to put in to get in. That she works at her parents' supermarket every Sunday and that she deserves every coin she owns.  I told her that I didn't mean that she doesn't deserve it, and that it's a good thing that she doesn't have to worry about money, but that she should consider that most of our fellow students have a different situation.

It didn't get mentioned anymore, but the overall mood has been quite cold since then and I'm wondering if maybe I went too far. Both my boyfriend and best friend (both 30's) said that I should have ignored it because ""19 is basically still a kid"" and ""it's not my job to teach her empathy"".

So, AITA?

Edit: I noticed that people focus on the age difference a lot, so let me clarify: the group I have lunch with consists of students aged 19-36. I don't consider Ellen my friend, but I'm not going to avoid her during lunch simply because of age. At my job (I combine work and uni) we also eat with colleagues together no matter their ages and my classmates feel the same for me.",AmItheAsshole
 for throwing out sentimental stuff in an insensitive way?,"My younger sister was decluttering her room and part of it was deciding to get rid of like half her stuffed animals. They weren't really in condition to donate so the plan was to throw them out and I offered to take care of that when my sis was done.

My mom had also asked me to take out the trash from the baby room so I did what I thought was the simplest thing: took the pile of stuffies my sister had okayed to get rid of, put it in with the baby trash and took that bag down to the outside bin.

My sister ended up seeing it in the bin later and she got mad at me for doing it that way. She wasn't supposed to see it that way but my mom said I was insensitive for not keeping it separate. Honestly I don't really understand the problem, but I'm a little autistic so I don't always know what the standard is. AITA here?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to cash in on a group gift,"For context, I am graduating this summer in a class of 7 people. One of my classmates has organised a gift for our teacher, which is a 30sec Cameo from Nigel Farage to our anti-Brexit, anti-Reform, anti-UKIP, etc teacher. I get that it will be funny, and he’ll have a laugh seeing it but I don’t really want to pay for it. 

If they all go ahead with this, it will be ~£10 each which isn’t that steep, but I don’t want to line a politician’s pockets when I don’t side with them or want to offer any support. I know one or two have already paid. 

I want to take a stance and say I won’t pay, but that they could still do it. Much like if I was a vegan, I’m not going to join a burger eating competition for a laugh but I’d still cheer them on. 

However, if I drop out then my friends have to pay more and I’d be riding on the coattails of their gift because I don’t care about my teacher enough to individually buy him a gift. I’d also stick out like a sore thumb if I’m the only person whose not in on the group gift. I’d also see people arguing that nobody is pro-Farage, so why should I be any different saying no to this when it’s just for a laugh. 

So AITA for not joining in on the group gift because it goes against my morals? 
",AmItheAsshole
 for being silent/grumpy during family dinners.,"I (23M) still live at home with my parents, and while I love my family (dad 57, mom 60, brother 24) and enjoy spending time with them, I dread having dinner together. The sound of eating is like nails on a chalkboard for me, making family dinners far from enjoyable, especially when they're spent in silence most days.  
  
I've tried to communicate that it's not their company that makes me uncomfortable during meals, but rather the sound of chewing. However, tonight marked the second occasion where one of my parents had a significant emotional outburst about my behavior during dinner. Their frustration boiled down to accusations of ingratitude because my brother and I don't cook or pay for dinner yet show up looking glum and uncommunicative. While it's true that we don't prepare meals or foot the bill, this issue had never been expressed until now. Our role has always been to clean the kitchen afterward, which, I acknowledge, pales in comparison to the effort of cooking every night and the expense of food.  
  
During a previous confrontation, my mom expressed her disdain for my glum attitude at the dinner table. I explained the issue with sound sensitivity, and we agreed to try listening to music during dinner to drown out the chewing noises. While this helped somewhat, it wasn't a solution for various reasons.  
  
I understand that this is probably mainly about not cooking or contributing financially for the food. I'm willing to take on cooking duties and cover the costs of any meals I prepare. However, I also resent the idea of having to fake enjoyment while feeling incredibly uncomfortable. Home should be a place where I can relax and be myself, not where I have to put on a facade.  
  
Moreover, I'm frustrated by the emotional explosions and the lack of effective communication. Perhaps I'm just dense and can't pick up on subtle signals, but I find it hard to navigate these situations.  
  
As for my brother, I can't speak to why he behaves similarly during dinner because I simply don't know his thoughts or feelings on the matter.  
",AmItheAsshole
 for not moving in with my dad because he won't respect my one boundary?,"Background:

My (21F) dad (56M) is currently divorcing his fourth wife, my step-mum (57F). They were together for a decade, and I saw her as a parental figure, but never called her mum. They separated around 8 months ago and now have their own flats.

For these 8 months, I have been most of my dad's emotional support. He'd call me and cry on the phone, in person, and over text. I've helped as much as I could, talked him through it, gave him advice, suggested finding new hobbies to expand his circle, all while trying to keep on top of my uni work and working part-time. Needless to say, my plate is full.

2 months ago, he told me he wanted to try and get back together with her. I told him that it probably wasn't a good idea, as at this time she had a new boyfriend, but they met up anyway. Apparently it was a very emotional talk and she still wanted to go through with the divorce, but that there was a chance of reconciliation. She told him she wanted to keep it a secret for 6 months to a year if they got back together - telling none of their respective kids. My dad told me anyway and I said that sounded suspicious. She then wanted him to sign papers without taking them to a solicitor, but I convinced him to anyway. I'm not 100% sure of the exact documents, but she lied about what the document was. Basically, if he had signed this she would have had access to his state pension. He said he would ""take her to the cleaners"" for that.

Well, 2 months later and they've blocked each other and ""reunited"" multiple times. They recently went on a weekend away togehter, he gave her his ring, she then blocked him. They're now seeing each other again and she will apparently be coming round to his flat often. Throughout all of this he's been confiding in me, including stuff I, as his daughter, really shouldn't know. I feel very overwhelmed by all of this, and at this point, I'm so tired of all the drama. He says he ""can't give up"" on her - at this point it's cringe-inducing. I asked him a few months ago if I could live with him for my third year of uni since rent is increasing. We talked about me paying him rent, came up with what we both thought was a fair sum, and agreed I could move in by July. All I asked that he let me know when she would be coming round so I could make myself scarce. I have no interest in having any sort of relationship with her after our family was separated. He agreed and guaranteed he would text me if she was coming.

Come to today, where not only does he inform me that she will be coming round without warning, but she will also be getting keys! I said I had one condition. One measly condition that I would have warning of her presence. He told me to ""just chill"" and ""we will come and go as we please"". So AITA for no longer wanting to move in with him? I will post screenshots of our texts if this gains traction.",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my MIL feed the neighbors cat,"My mother in law has been feeding the neighbors cat, to the point where he like never leaves our house.

The neighbors wrote us told us they just want him safe and everything but not to feed him or over feed him because of a blood sugar disorder (diabetes).

My MIL has made this cat plump, they came by to take him to the vet and couldn’t get him 😞

Once I learned that she wasn’t to be feeding him  and of the disorder I took the treats she was feeding him as food and the food.
She’s been angry. Won’t look at or talk to us.
Sent her mom (grandma) out to yell at us basically for taking away her joy… she’s shut the door to her room for days now.
She never ever shuts her door.

When she was telling us that the neighbors asked her not to feed him she was going on and on about how “how can a cat have a blood disorder when they eat no candy? Oh the vet just want more money for food and medicine, they need protein l, vegan protein… blah blah blah.”

Like it’s just very blatantly disrespectful, just blatant disregard for someone’s wishes and boundaries… much like what we go through on daily basis with other situations…. But this is someone else cat, someone else responsibility, someone else’s little kitty to love and she’s just shitring on what they’ve asked her to not do.

What do I do??",AmItheAsshole
 for running a hair salon out my house?,"I (29M) have been cutting and colouring my own hair since I was a preteen (11/12ish). I am not black but I have very thick curly hair and struggled to find people who would cut it properly so I started doing it myself. I started cutting hair for my friends in my teens, mostly my black and biracial friends who didn't trust anyone to cut and style it right bcs there are no black barbers local.

These days as a bit of a gig on the side I cut, style and colour friends hair. I do not charge that much at all, just for my time and it's a bit more if they want a dye bcs I charge for the cost of that as well. it used to be free just for mates and stuff but all my friends starting telling their friends about it and now I'm booked weeks in advance so I charge like £5/£10 a cut and maybe £16/£20 if I dye it as well so definitely not salon level prices. Mostly the people who get their hair cut by me are black or biracial or middle Eastern or have thick curly hair, which the shops near me are notoriously bad at cutting. 

A friend told me in passing she wanted to get her brother a nice haircut as a birthday treat bcs he's always wanted it dyed and no one has ever cut his hair right and I told her that I'd be happy to do the whole thing (cut and dye) for a tenner. mates rates. she got pissed off at me and said that if I was a real friend I'd do it for free. I said I wasn't pulling a number out of my arse and that I cut hair in my free time and literally have a waiting list and a ton of returning customers. She asked me if I was trained professionally and when I told her I wasn't she said that I'm lying to my customers (I make it very clear upfront that I'm not professionally trained and some ppl have decided not to let me cut their hair bcs of that which is fine! but the ppl who I do cut and dye the hair of know I'm not a professional). she also said it was illegal to cut ppls hair for money and that I'm taking work away from the trained hair dressers and barbers. she got really pissed off and hasn't spoken to me since. I feel like maybe it was an overreaction but she's normally very levelled headed and calm so I'm worried I did something wrong so. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not cooking dinner because I'd already done most of the housework?,"I (30M) work from home, my wife (25F) works in an office nearby.

Yesterday before heading to work my wife asked me to hang up the washing that she'd done at some point during the day.

I went and hung it all up, it was an absolute ton of washing that we'd both neglected, no problem. Fair enough.

I carried on with my workday and got a text from her about being hungry and looking forward to dinner.

I took one look at the kitchen and saw a mountain of dirty dishes and pans and stuff and just sighed to myself.

I'm cooking for her almost every day of the week, the washing also gets left for me to hang otherwise it never gets done.

The dishes are also left for me on top of the cooking, so before I can even cook I have to wash everything.

Even if I cook, she won't wash up, which is supposed to be the fair way to do things.

I've tried bringing this up to her many times, gently and more firmly but regardless of what I say she gets defensive or complains she's busy or tired or hates doing X chore.

But then it just means everything gets left to me.

I'm so tired of feeling like all these things are purposely being left to the point where I'm forced into doing them.

I really don't mind cooking or doing my fair share but why am I being left to do EVERYTHING? :(

I've ended up suggesting eating out or just ordering takeaway so many times because I can't stomach the fact I'm doing all the work, it physically makes me feel ill with stress, shame and frustration.

I've had to empty the bins out pretty much every time for the past 6 months too otherwise it just piles up and she starts just letting it fall out the top or even worse just scattering things around the bottom of the garbage can.

I picked up 20! TWENTY! Rolled up tissues she'd used and thrown towards the garbage can, missed and just not bothered to pick up the other day.

Her dirty clothes are all over the floor, so if I don't put them in the machine they'll just stay there until I inevitably have to hang them again.

Reaching my wits end.

Yes I work from home, but I'm working, it doesn't mean I do everything...

She'll come home, eat the food I cooked, go on her phone, sleep for like 12 hours, go to work and the cycle repeats. No attempt to help. I really don't get it.

I've suggested buying a dishwasher and she hates the Idea because apparently we'll also need to clean that or it'll never get emptied or something like that 

She came home last night, woke me up and seemed pissed that there was no dinner.

I told her that I'm not doing everything and if she wants dinner then she can clean the dishes.

She got majorly pissed and accused me of ""counting everything that we do"".

She also said that ""she never told me that I have to do it"".

She stormed off to bed and we both went to sleep without food.

She purposely slept on the opposite end of the bed to me. 

This morning I woke up and it looks like she's cooked food for herself and only herself at some point during the night. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not knowing my parents were planning something for my birthday?,"Some background context. My parents, but especially my mom, have a history of ruining my birthday. Breaking promises, starting arguments, you name it. I have come to dread it each year because of this.

As my birthday is this Saturday I was wondering what this year's birthday ruining event would be, and sure enough today was the day. 

Some relevant context. My brother's band has a gig on Saturday, and everyone in our family is attending. My best friend asked me if I was doing anything for my birthday, and I mentioned that in the evening this is what I was doing, so he asked if I wanted to meet up in the day to grab some food and do some good old day drinking. No one else had asked me if I wanted to do anything, so I agreed. 

Skip to today. My mom mentioned that if I wanted to stay out in the evening after the gig I would have to find my own way home. I said that was fine because I'd be taking a train into the city anyway to see my best friend, because he is the only one who asked me if I wanted to do something on my birthday. (I will totally admit, I was hinting that I wanted my family to tell me they wanted to spend time with me on my birthday.) 

My dad says to me ""you wanted a new laptop, didn't you?"" Because I have been saying for ages that I need to get myself a new one because mine is falling apart, but I'm currently saving for a big move abroad so I haven't replaced it yet. Literally, the screen falls out. How this thing still turns on is anyone's guess, but I digress. I say ""Yes, but what does that have to do with what I said?"" He says ""We were going to take you to get one for your birthday."" My mom quickly butts in and says ""It was supposed to be a surprise."" 

What I don't understand is that my parents decided to straight up tell me what they had planned instead of saying something like ""we have something planned, but it's a surprise"" to waylay my feeling of my birthday being forgotten. They chose to twist the knife in my side by telling me and implying that I'm ungrateful for saying no one else asked me to do anything on my birthday .... Even though they didn't? 

AITA for not having a clue and being upset about this whole scenario or am I in fact an ungrateful brat? ",AmItheAsshole
 Girlfriend always buys festival tickets for me around her Birthday,"Been dating my girlfriend for about 7 years. Every year when she has her birthday it is a weekly event, meaning that she plans something like going to DisneyWorld, going to a music festival, etc. The past few years she will buy a ticket to an EDM festival or something similar and tell me to ask for 3-4 days off to celebrate her birthday. Usually this wouldnt be an issue except I am a bartender and work weekends and there are few if any people to cover my shift because 9 times out of 10 she will pick a weekend to celebrate her birthday. Example for this year her birthday is May 8, but she wants me to take of May 2,3,4,5 for SOLFEST in Vortex Springs, FL. The last few years she does this were she will buy a ticket to the festival and then tell me ""You need to take off days x,y,z for my birthday"". Then I usually tell her either A ""I cant go to said event because I wont have anybody to cover my shift"" B"" Im not interested in this festival and It will make me uncomfortable to be there"" or C ""I dont have anyone to cover my shift, and Im not interested"". Then she proceeds to get mad at me because she already bought the ticket in advance and now has to scramble to sell the ticket. AITA for not being able to take the days off or not wanting to go? Everytime around her birthday I feel like Im obligated to do these things and they just dont work. I dread her birthday time because this is what always happens. I tell her ahead of time that Im not interested or cant get anyone to cover my shifts but she buys the tickets anyway and then uses it as a point of contention saying ""You never want to do anything for my birthday"" or ""Your a selfish piece of shit"". She bartends too so when I said ""May 8 is your birthday not 2,3,4,5(the days of SOLFEST)"" she says ""Yeah but those are the days I took off for my birthday and I work all the other days"". ",AmItheAsshole
 for calling the sheriff on my neighbors for blocking me in,"So, i (23f) live in a neighborhood where the parking is street parking aka public parking. i grew up never dealing with that, it just wasn’t a thing where i’m from. 

so, when my neighbors started complaining (a year ago) for parking in certain places i was really confused. the car would be moved routinely and at the time when the complaints started i worked nights. my neighborhood is a bit sketch and i would just park wherever was available and closest to home. i would sometimes park beside our driveway / in front of our neighbors house which consisted of being in front of both of our mailboxes. 

i ended up getting a ticket specifically for blocking their mailbox which i’m pretty sure they called in. they’ve left a note on my car saying “are you not embarrassed, do you not understand, don’t know how to respect not to park here”. they’ve come out to ask me while i’m in my car to move so they can put trash can bins out on days that weren’t pick up dates. these neighbors don’t use the space. they just want to save the space to have it empty, they used to put out their bins and would leave them their for days till someone else in our neighborhood called it in.

yesterday, i parked where i always do but this time i parked in front of the mailboxes so i was a bit in the middle of the available area rather than the edge to avoid possible ticket. my neighbors ended up blocking me in. they parked both their cars like a cm away from both ends of me. i initially called to get them towed but they said they needed to be issued a ticket first which would give them 24 hrs to move &amp; to call 911. which i called the sheriffs number bc it was what i was given to me. he ended up not issuing a ticket &amp; instead talked to us both separately. i feel a bit stupid, i honestly regret my decision but in the moment it felt reasonable lol. i feel like a bit of an asshole for having a bit too extreme. thoughts?

ps. i just wanted them to be issued a ticket just like they issued me one, i thought it would be anonymous!!!

edit: i didn’t mean that i parked in front of the mailboxes again, i parked in front of them leaving the mailbox space free 

edit: y’all i did NOT park in front of their mailbox again. i parked ahead (?) of it meaning i left that space free for the mail man. however, when they blocked me in it meant that THEY parked in front of MY mailbox bc our mailboxes are right beside each other. ",AmItheAsshole
 for not buying my boyfriends family dinner?,"Me (17) and my boyfriend (16) live between each others houses. (Sometimes we go to his mothers and sometimes we go to mine)

Anyway we both have issues with our families but decided to stay at his mothers because mine is giving me trouble for not going the education path she wants me to, so won’t let me back there unless i do.

My boyfriend stayed at mine for months at a time over the course of a year and my mother fed him 3+ meals a day for that duration and didn’t make him pay or ask him to spend his money in anyway that benefitted her.

Currently we are staying at his and i have hardly had one meal a day because i usually am not that hungry.

Today i bought me and my bf a takeaway from the pizza shop over the road, she is trying to say if i was going to spend (my only ten pounds) my money on food it should be for the 7 people in the house. 

I don’t have a job and currently can’t as i am waiting for my passport which takes atleast a month in the uk. 

She is also trying to say that i eat twice as much as my boyfriend, which i dont, because i only go to the kitchen if it’s with him, and we are out most of the day. 

She also spends a lot of her money on c0k3 and she also gambles too, which means there isn’t a lot of food in the house anyway, which is why i spend my money on it (my dad gave me for helping him clean) 

AITA for not buying everyone food when she makes most of us go without food most of the time???

",AmItheAsshole
UPDATE:  for not attending the wedding of my cousin and my ex-boyfriend?,"Hi, it’s me again. Thanks to everyone who commented in my first post. Some people asked for an update, and here you have it.  
  
I’ve read all of your comments. And I’ve got to say, the ones who gave me tips on how to be petty made me laugh, but after thinking about it I decided to simply not attend the wedding. I’ll also be distancing myself from my parents and extended family, at least for a while for the former, indefinitely for the latter.  
  
I also told my friends about the whole situation. And they were even more pissed off than some of you! I told them about the suggestion that some commenters made about going on vacation during the week of the wedding, and we’ve already started making plans.  
  
Something else happened in the last few days. I received a call from Travis. He asked me if we could meet and talk. I know it was probably stupid of me, but I accepted. We met in a public place, and I told him I wanted to know exactly what was going on between him and Taylor. This is what he told me:  
  
First, he made sure to emphasize that he had never cheated on me. Not sure if I believe him, but I let him talk. He told me that he too felt bad about our relationship’s end, that on a night out he just happened to end up in the same place as my cousin, they started talking, one thing led to another and he proceeded to have a middle age crisis with her. The only reason he’s getting married to her is because she’s pregnant, and he was afraid that she would just run away and he’d never get to meet his child.  
  
After that talk, we went our separate ways. He wished me good luck, and I said the same. As soon as I came back home, I blocked his number. So at the end of the day, I’m left with more questions than answers. But whatevs, that’s no longer my problem.  
  
Anyway, this is it. I don’t think I’ll be posting in this account again. Once again, thank you for your support when I needed it.",AmItheAsshole
 for potentially taking someones role?,"     I (16) F, had an election for a student council today against one other (16) F in the same grade (current Jr.) for president of next year. The other girl was in this council for an extra year, and I only joined recently.

      I had assumed I'd be vice president (loser gets vice role automatically), but to my surprise I won the presidental role. I only had been allowed a short introduction for a speech, and I mentioned starting a large project I thought had been forgotten about that the other girl and a few other people started. I left that day apologizing to the girl because I think I was just as shocked as she was, and she said it would be a lot on her bucket to carry that role anyways.

      When I got home I checked my email to see the day prior the project had been approved and the girl was happy to start and wanted volunteers for a start. I feel like I took someone's position, I feel terribly guilty, and I want to apologize again tomorrow for my ignorance, as I cross paths with her a few times a day. 

     I want to go into the the specific councils purpose for my career, (I don't know about the girl), so this is mainly my way of getting a head start. AITA for ""stealing"" the election? Do I contact this girl and apologize?",AmItheAsshole
"H for refusing to get something from the supermarket during flood for a friend.
","
There was a recent incident of a flood in my city due to heavy rains from a storm. Thankfully, our apartment had water and electricity still running, but we were running out of groceries and food. Day 4 of the flood, I needed some stuff from the nearby supermarket and it had come up on the apartment group chat that I'll be making my trip there. 

As I was about to reluctantly leave, a friend and a fellow tenant asked me whether I could shop for her as well. Initially, I invited her to come with but she refused. I decided I would decline to do so, because of the weight and my recent ankle sprain. She didn't take it too nicely and replied stating that she was disappointed in me.

Few minutes later when I successfully reached the supermarket, I changed my mind and asked her if she still needed stuff. I was ignored. So I dropped it and got my groceries, lugged it across the flooded roads.

Finally, I hear that she got it delivered to the apartment itself (which I was unaware of).

I get that she could be mad with the fact I said no, but I'm honestly wondering whether I am the asshole in the situation when I invited her to come with and she very well knew about my recent sprain.

Edit: just for context, the delivery was free.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my uncle off about not selling my late mother's piano on my birthday?,"I 27 (m) just celebrated my 27th birthday with my brother who also is 27 years old on April 20th and we had a wonderful time. We had immediate family come over and celebrate our birthday before I and my twin went and celebrated on our own. 

I just had cake, cupcakes, and alcohol when the mood of the party took a turn for the worst. 

For context My uncle is someone who is a massive pain in my ass when it comes to my life, he thinks that it would be more efficient to tell my dad how to live our lives, especially when it comes to our house. For context, my dad is having renovation in our house and he’s trying to upgrade the sub-basement in our house to look presentable. I tried to explain my feelings to my uncle who is a male in his early 50s who cannot grasp the concept that we are not a typical family. I am a young man who still lives with his dad because of my autism. 

So how did this connect with my mother‘s piano you may ask? Well, my mother died in 2012 because of cancer and the piano is her last possession and I am very connected to this instrument. It was on my birthday last week that my uncle suggested that we sell the piano for money without even consulting, my father, me, or my brother. he reasoned that she was dead, and I and my brother had to get over that my heart sank Her death was over 12 years ago and I cannot seem to get over the sack that he made the awful suggestion that I have to sell this piano that she spent over $1200 and she would play every single day.

I thought to myself he is an asshole. Why would he make that kind of suggestion, knowing that I was very close to my mother.?

So am I the asshole for calling out my uncle and telling him that I will not sell the piano because it’s too sentimental?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my blind boyfriend to pay for half of the monthly parking cost for my car?,"My (29F) boyfriend (30M) is legally blind and cannot drive. We are currently living in a city which is safe and walkable. A parking spot for my car is included in our rent. We both take the bus to work, so mostly I use my car for errands. I drive us to visit his friends and family that are not accessible by public transit.

Towards the end of our lease, he told me he wasn't happy living in our current city, and he wanted to move to  a nearby bigger city for the following reasons:

* He wants to be closer to work and the train, which he uses to get around and visit friends. In our current city, he has to take a 15-20 minute bus ride to get to the train but would prefer to live somewhere he can walk to it. He hates the bus. Also, if we moved to the downtown area of this bigger city we could both walk to work.
* He feels that our current city is boring. He said there is nothing to do, and the downtown area with a theater, bars and restaurants is too far away (1 mile). 
* He wants an apartment with amenities like a dishwasher, A/C, and an in-unit washer/dryer. It's not always easy to find units that have been renovated with all these amenities in our current city because the buildings are older. In the bigger city, there are a lot of newer buildings. 

I had the following reservations about moving to the bigger city:

* The area he wants to live in is not safe. I would not be able to take a walk in my own neighborhood. When we have friends over their cars will be at risk of break ins.
* The apartments are expensive. We will need to take on a roommate. I had hoped to be done with roommates and I will miss our privacy. Even with the roommate we will both be paying more in rent.
* You almost always pay extra for a parking spot. We are looking at a building where a spot is $175/month.

Despite my reservations, I agreed to move to the bigger city. He is the one living with a disability, and easy walking access to the train means independence to him. If I want to take a walk or visit my old city it's only a 15 minute drive away. I decided that it would be fair to ask my boyfriend to split the cost of the parking spot with me for the following reasons:

* We both benefit from me having a car.
* I'm making compromises on what I value in a living situation to make him more comfortable, spending more money to live somewhere I like less.
* I am only asking for help with parking because that cost is directly related to this move. I've never asked him to contribute to anything else car-related. 

I asked him if he would consider contributing to parking. He gave me a cold look and said no. Immediately, I felt so embarrassed and greedy for even asking. I apologized and didn't even try to defend why I thought it might be fair.

However, I can't shake the feeling that it wasn't such a crazy request. I was thinking about bringing it up again, so I'd like to know AITA for asking my legally blind boyfriend to pay for half of the parking spot for my car?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling out my sister in law for buying and returning books just to make Booktoks?,"My sister started posting “booktok” videos in October of last year. If you are not familiar, it is the part of tiktok where people post about books. People post reviews, lists of recommendations, book hauls, etc. She’s always been a big reader so I wanted to support her in this. Her videos are not super popular and she’s perpetually stuck in “200 view jail” as they call it. 

She decided that in order for her to get more views and engagement she would need to do the thing that gets people a lot of views and post “book hauls” which is just ‘here’s a bunch of books I bought.’ I do not get it, but whatever. 

Well what she actually decided to do was go buy a ton of books and then return them. And she kept doing it too. I was shocked when she told me and asked her why she’d do that. She said it was just so she could get the views. I asked why she didn’t just take videos in the store and she said there was no way to make it “aesthetic” in the store. I told her this was sketchy behavior, and when she said it was from our local bookstore and not the big box one, I said that makes it 10x worse.

She told me I was being a shitty, unsupportive sister and that she is trying her hardest to come up with ideas and break into booktok, that it’s hard because there are already people with 10k followers and she will never get there. I told her that she should spend more time researching and working on her content, maybe she can come up with ideas that aren’t so sketch.

She’s pissed off at me and made a video talking about her unsupportive family. It got 200 views so it didn’t exactly work out for her. Was it wrong of me to call her out for how she gets the books and returns them?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to let my best friend's girlfriend stay at our house?,"My (25M) best friend, let's call him John, has been dating his girlfriend, Sarah (24F), for about a year now. They've been having some issues lately, and Sarah has been staying at my place on and off for the past few weeks.

At first, I didn't mind. I'm close with John, and I want to support him in any way I can. But it's starting to take a toll on me. Sarah is constantly complaining about John, and she's always trying to get me to take her side. I'm also not comfortable with her being here all the time. I feel like I'm losing my own space and privacy.

I've tried talking to John about it, but he always gets defensive and says I'm overreacting. I've also tried talking to Sarah directly, but she just gets upset and says I'm not being a good friend.

Last night, Sarah came over again and asked if she could stay for a few more days. I finally snapped and told her no. I explained that I needed my own space and that I couldn't handle her constant complaining anymore.

Sarah was furious. She called me an asshole and said I was being selfish. John was also upset and said I was being unfair.

So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to give Ex-Mother-in-law MY recipe,"My ex-husband (Jacob) and I lived with his Mom (Marry) and step-dad prior to us getting married and Jacob joining the military. I continued to live there while Jacob was in basic training. Marry and I did everything together at that point because her husband was away at this time too for deployment. 

I thought her and I had a great relationship but I found out that she had been writing Jacob and telling him things like not to sign power of attorney papers over to me, not to trust me... Jacob put her in her place eventually but I never really let my guard down with her after that.

And as you can imagine, this type of behavior from her was not an isolated incident. I managed to mirror her fakeness and we got along just fine for the 10 yrs my ex and I were married.

 Fast forward to last year when I had to take Jacob to court to have the custody agreement changed for the safety of our children. Jacob tried to keep Luke, our oldest, from being a part of the custody case because he was going to be 18 in less than 6 months and was going to be able to testify. Our other two children were under 10 and would not have as much of a voice because of their ages.

But the way my ex-in laws, the ENTIRE family has treated  Luke because he stood up for himself and his siblings makes my blood boil. Mary (Luke's grandmother) and Aunt telling him they couldn't or won't talk to him until court is over because they don't want to take sides. But they continued to visit and talk with his dad. They continue to make plans and never follow through with them even now and court ended in September 2023. Breaks my heart. 

The point of all this is, Mary (my ex mother-in-law and Luke's grandmother) text Luke a few days ago and wanted him to ask me for MY sweet potato casserole recipe. I was originally going to give it to her (people pleaser in me).

This is a dish of mine that is requested often when I'm invited to parties. I've had a few ways I'd like to respond to her request.... ""Goggle it"", it's not gonna be the same but it's as close as you'll ever get again... 

AITA for refusing to give my Ex Monster-in-law my recipe that I tweaked and made my own?",AmItheAsshole
 - Graduation Tickets,"Background - I had a child with someone 17 years ago that I am no longer with. I married my current husband when our child was 3 years old. From birth to 3 years old, my child's father was uninvolved, however his family was VERY involved. He has never paid child support ($100 per month),often avoided employment to not pay, and was arrested due to non payment.

 Although my family (husband &amp; kids) lived in different states due to my husband's job, our child would visit their father for summers and Christmas holiday. We moved back to the same city as him 5 years ago and while he is still unemployed (just working gig work here and there), he sees our child every other weekend and 1 month in the summer. He is able to do that with the help of family and friends (staying with them when the child visits).

Current Situation  - Our child is graduating next month and we only get 10 tickets to split. I have allocated three tickets for him (1 for my child's father, and two more for family on his side that have really supported the child--- his parents cannot attend). The other 7 are for the 5 people that live in the house with the child (my husband, myself, and my other kids), the other 2 are for my mother and father (they are divorced) --- They supported me fully with our child. My child's father is upset that I do not split the tickets evenly ... 5&amp;5. At the very least, he said my mother could go but he wants a 4th ticket for a close family member that would travel from out of town. I told him, "" Unfortunately, everyone that deserves to go will not be able to attend.""  I love this family member and if I had more tickets, they would go. 

The school is small and will likely not be able to allow for more tickets, but I have already requested. I also suggested that my child's father take the child and the people of their choice out for lunch after graduation as I planned to do a BBQ for my family that couldn't attend. 

TLDR - My child's father is upset that he cannot have a 50/50 split of graduation tickets.",AmItheAsshole
 for walking out on my lab partner?,"So, I (20f) am in a biology class at my local community college. We have a random lab partner for papers every few weeks, and this week I have Andy (37M).  Andy is severely dyslexic, so working with him can be hard but not impossible.  
  
So Andy is married, and I am in a committed relationship with my boyfriend. This is important I swear. His wife has come to classes a few times, so she has seen me.  
  
We were working on our papers at the library on campus, and had ourlatops and notes out getting our project done. He had a webcam session oen with his wife, and we were just talking, comparting notes and coming up with the major points of our assignment when his wife would call him. Okay, no big deal right? He goes outside, spends about ten minutes talking to her and then came back in. About twenty minutes later, same thing.   
  
Over. And over. And over.  
  
when he came back to the table again, I asked him if there was a problem. He said his wife was just worried about him being alone with me. He is in the library. With a webcame session open. He has TWO different location tracking apps on his phone. She knows where he is and who he is with.   
  
I finally turned off his webcam session, and asked him was she calling him over and over again because he was with a younger woman in the library. He said yes. I told him if he walked out of the library one more time I was going to leave and he was going to have to do his portion of the project on his own. That would sink his grade if I did that. Not five minutes later his phone went off again, and guess who it was? He picked it up on ring three and walked outside again. So i picked up my laptop and notes, and walked out the library door in front of him.   
  
I know this is really not his fault, but I can't get my part of the project done is we have to keep stopping every 15-20 minutes because his wife HAS to know where he is. And now he has to do his section by himself which is going to be very difficult for him. So, AITA for walking out after I told my lab partner to stop answering his phone? ",AmItheAsshole
 for expecting my bf to help me move?,"Hi all - 

My bf and I have been dating for almost 3 years. We used to live in the same city, but my bf moved back home to save on rent. We've been semi-long distance for several months now (we're a 2-3 hour drive apart).  I'm moving to a new place just a short drive away from my current spot. I've slowly been moving smaller things over (clothes, kitchenware, etc) before the lease at my current residence ends. Next weekend, I will be officially moving out -- this means I'll finally be moving over all my furniture ('the big stuff'). 

Within the past month, my boyfriend has come down every other weekend to help move things which has been great. When I gave him a heads up of my official move-out date, and that I'd really appreciate his help that weekend as well to help with furniture, he replied that he'd ""let me me know if he can make it."" 

I got upset. I value all the help he's given thus far, but admittedly expected him to be around to help with the final part of my move. I would do the same for him. And I *have* done the same for him -- most recently when he moved back home, I helped him haul things.  And despite how chaotic things have been, I've still been mindful to give him his space: I've done plenty of stuff on my own, I haven't depended on him 100%, nor expected him to be here every weekend...it's really just for the things I physically can't do by myself. Like move furniture. 

When I asked him why he wasn't sure he could do it, he said he may need to prep for a job interview. He hasn't yet heard back if he made it to the next round, so it all depends if he gets a call-back. If he does, he'll want to use that weekend to prepare. If that's the case, he can't drive over to help me with my final move. I told him that I felt a bit hurt, and asked if he would consider dividing his time so that he can do both. ie help me one day then prep for interview the next. He said that he doesn't owe me anything. And that we were having a pointless argument (and I was getting worked up over nothing) because he wasn't even sure if he was going to get a call-back for the interview. 

I was left feeling upset that this was an option in his mind. I would feel bad leaving my partner hanging on their move-out day. At the same time, I was left second guessing my feelings, wondering if this was an unfair expectation on my behalf. He's helped on other occasions and I could always hire movers for the heavier things, right? AITA for getting upset? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my epileptic friend to stop deliberately doing seizure-causing things?,"Paula (35F) and I (30F) have been close friends since high school. Both of us are autistic, and Paula is also epileptic. She missed a good portion of high school due to the frequency and severity of her seizures. Despite this, Paula gets super excited and enthusiastic about doing anything that can cause seizures or is dangerous in the event one occurs. 

Upside-down amusement rides are the biggest one: if we’re going to a carnival or amusement park, she’ll ask if there are any upside-down rides, ask if any individual ride I mention goes upside-down, and talk about how excited she is to ride the upside-down rides. She’ll also get really excited to visit attractions with strobe lights, sleep on bunk beds and drink alcohol. Paula is the only person I know of in the whole universe who gets excited over strobe lights. 

The staff of her day and recreation programs will stop her from doing any of these things because it is in her service plan from the state office of developmental disabilities that she should not be allowed to. Paula asked her doctor to take these restrictions out of her service plan, but he refused. As such, she jumps at the chance to do these things when we are out without any  “staff “ caregivers around. The staff also make Paula wear a life jacket while swimming, which Paula resents because she thinks it makes her look like a little kid. Paula perceives all of this as the staff discriminating against people with epilepsy, and I have not been able to convince her otherwise.

I was on Paula’s side for a while because she had been seizure-free for over ten years. I had even given her advice on how to appeal the doctor’s decision. However, she recently had seizures again as the result of playing video games for too long a period of time. I thought this would scare Paula away from doing seizure-causing things, but she did not change at all.

The last time Paula and I got together, I told her either she stops deliberately doing things that are dangerous for people with epilepsy, or I will stop hanging out with her. Paula was incensed, angrily arguing with me about how it isn’t fair that she doesn’t get to do things other people can do, she takes meds to control the seizures, and that she was able to go seizure-free for so long. Paula has gone on upside-down rides and in strobe-lit haunted houses before without having seizures. However, she also spent nearly all of her free time playing video games before without having seizures.

Looking back on this conversation, I realize I may have been an asshole. I’m Paula’s friend, not her care aide. It may not be my place to enforce this. She is ultimately responsible for herself when not in the presence of care aides. I’m also aware that the doctor only refuses to remove the restriction to avoid getting in trouble if she has a seizure again afterwards. Yet I do not want to watch her get carted off in an ambulance, or worse. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 if i told a couple on holiday to parent their child?,"I'm (31m) on holiday with my fiancé (36f) and our daughter (2f) at a family friendly hotel, think kids pool and playground with lots of other families, and there is another couple with their daughter (5f) let's call her jess for the post.

Jess (obviously not her fault) is looking for attention that she's not getting from her parents. Both my fiance and I have politely told her that we are there to play with our daughter and make sure she's safe in the pool as she's only just learning to swim. We've had to do this because the Jess is incessantly talking to us to the point that we literally couldn't get a word in edgewise to encourage our own child. 

At least 3 other families with children have decided to get out of the pool because Jess is in their personal space and simply won't leave them alone as well as a few older couples obviously there just trying to relax. 

In the 3 days we have been here so far, we have not seen her parents spend any time in the pool with her and they seem obvious to the fact that she is getting in other people's way. I HAVE seen the dad in the pool in the deep end whilst Jess was harassing other people in the shallow end. 

Also we have heard her ask multiple times for the parents to join her in the pool only to be flatly refused even though the dad would happily swim on his own.

So yeah, WIBTA if I, politely as possible, told them that if they're going to come on holiday as a family then they should spend some time in the pool as a family? ",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my co worker rude?,"TLDR; co worker called me a diversity hire and that I was only hired bc I was a woman. I told her that was rude and she said ""She's been honest and I need to accept it"" AITA here?

So I work in a very small office. I'm talking 10 people. 9 males; one other woman. This is relevant information. Industry we work in is notoriously male dominated. I just started about a month ago.

I was brought on for part time work and come into the office a few days a week. I have a BOATLOAD of relevant experience and I've known the owner of this company for a long time. I've been looking for a second gig for more money and when I posted seeking more work in this industry he reached out and offered me a job. Basically said ""we need help- we'll start with 3 months see where you really fit within our company and maybe chat full time when that time comes around."" So I'm working part time on the side of my full time job, coming in and doing assistant work for the partners of the company. 

The other female in the office has a similar job and has been there for a few months prior to me. She's been friendly and her title is ""office assistant"" so essentially doing a similar job as I am. Just assisting around the office with things we need.

Immediately off the bat- I get thrown into a ton of projects that are clearly cleaning up a lot of things and finishing up adding information to spreadsheets. a lot of things that ARENT DONE. 

Today me and the one girl in the office get lunch one and one. I was talking to her a small bit about my struggle really getting integrated and knowing what my job is here. Usual new job struggles nothing crazy. Just asking for any advice from when she started.

Her response then really took me aback she super calmly just said ""Well I honestly don't know why they hired you. Honestly, they should've used the money to actual get us a new office""

At that point I kind of just was like ""ummmmm"" it was AWKWARD. I then explained how I got my job and that I know the owner from this industry I've been in it for awhile and he said they need a little extra help.

She then says ""Honestly I know them well... I think you're a diversity hire. They just want more women so they don't look bad. Don't take it personally. It's like being a personality hire.""

I'm somewhat used to being the only woman in the room in this industry but I am EXTREMELY qualified in my past experience and multiple degrees and honestly this position is probably below my pay grade and experience but I wanted the extra funds. I then told her ""don't you think that's a little bit rude to just say?"" to which she proceeds ""Well I'm being honest if you're gonna work here you need to accept that.. I'm helping you here"" with a stank face attitude. She then got up and walked out to her car and the car ride back to work was awkward. I tried to be super nice after that and ""thanked her"" for the advice.

however, am I the asshole for calling her rude or is this girl just projecting hard?

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
" if I told my friend her ""looking out for me"" was attention seeking during finals week?","Since I transferred to my university I've (21F) been friends with a woman I'll call Marie (24F). When my boyfriend (22M) who I'll call Ben, and I started dating, we realized she was our mutual friend. The three of us were close friends and hung out a lot, until Marie got very upset with Ben after he gave her advice she didn't agree with at a party I hosted. 

I didn't hear the whole conversation but Marie has a very turbulent love life and mental health that she's very open about, and seems to put off men. She's had terrible boyfriends in the past. Ben suggested she not give out her love so freely, which upset her. 

Ben apologized but Marie wanted a longer conversation with Ben, which she vented to me about. I didn't like her venting to me about Ben. Ben got irritated because he genuinely apologized, but he doesn't want to know all about her past traumas to be friends with her. It's finals week and he doesn't have the time. 

When I'm able to and she needs help I usually am there for her, but after that and with finals week it was hard for me. Yesterday she called me and I declined, so she texted me that she needed to ""talk to me asap... it's very important"". I asked if she was safe and said she was but she had important information I needed to know. This really stressed me out, and I figured it must be very important to tell me mid finals week. 

I call her and she told me something she found out about Ben from over two years ago, before either of us met him. I am not saying what that was here because it isn't anyone's business. I will say that it was nothing illegal or terrible. I am loyal, but not stupid. It's a red flag I would have walked away from if I'd just met him, but this is my long term boyfriend who I trust, love, and treats me and the world very well, each day through actions and words. I took it calmly on the phone, but Marie seemed very upset by this. 

Ben and I had a good conversation out of it. He said it was true, it was the lowest point in his life, and he wished I'd heard it from him. We aren't ones to talk at length about our past traumas so it never came up. We focus on building a future together, we are very healthy, and it feels strange that she would tell me this during finals week after being upset with Ben. If this ended or hurt our relationship which she seemed to expect, I could have failed my classes from added stress. 

I know she was trying to be a good friend and look out for me, but it feels really selfish that she brought up this information at this time, and it feels gossipy and juvenile to bring up Ben's teenage past at her 24 year old age. I did lots of stupid shit when I was nineteen that I wouldn't want Ben to know about and he doesn't want to know. 

People are different, relationships are different. I want to believe she had good intentions but the way she went about it, the dramatic texts and timing felt so attention seeking. WIBTA if I called her out on this when she was trying to look out for me? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting our friends daughter to our daughters birthday party,"My daughter is turning 7 and has been very excited about her birthday but has also decided not to invite our friends daughter.

  
During childcare years, my daughter would be beside herself, refusing to go to childcare because of this other girl. My daughter would tell me this girl would make her sad because she would physically block her from playing with other children, tell her she can't be friends with anyone other than her, and this went on for a while. 

  
My partner and I decided to speak to one of her carers, and she affirmed what is going on and told us she would work with my daughter to be more assertive. At no point did we take the approach that this other girl was doing something bad. The way we raise our children is to teach them to be kind and polite but at the same time to know how to say no, learn what is a good friend and bad friend, and choose who they want to spend time with. The teacher, with our blessing, wrote a letter to the school in the catchment area advising that my daughter should go with a girl she is really close with (now her BFF) and our friend's daughter to another class.

  
The information I am about to write in this sentence we DID NOT share with our friends, but the other parents were delighted because their daughter has the EXACT same challenges as ours with this other girl.

  
My partner and I decided that we have to let them know what is going on but she could not finish the sentence, the other parent EXPLODED. Got really mad saying, why are you saying something is wrong with my child and why did no one tell me so that she can have the opportunity to support her etc..  
 My partner was so shocked by this and felt so bad but managed to salvage the relationship by meeting with the parent over a coffee and explaining the situation. We are taking agency for the situation and not asking for her daughter to change and if they felt they needed to do something for their daughter, that's great. The parent then apologized to my partner admitting they have a tendency to be very emotional about these things and that was that 

  
Well, back to the start of my story 2 years later, my daughter does not want to invite her to her party. Our parenting style has always been based on being kind and considerate but not a people pleaser. She can choose who she wants to be friends with and say no, and that is how we have supported her through this conflict, so to suddenly tell her, yeah, well that lesson we taught you only applies when we feel like it but we as your parents can force you to invite her because we don't want to upset our friends is not something that sits well with me, we need to be consistent. Also remember they aren’t in the same class. They told us how cruel it is that we are excluding her daughter and questioned our values and parenting style  
So in short, am I the asshole?  
",AmItheAsshole
 for not inviting the neighbors? ,"My wife's birthday is coming up and we're planning a party. We're having a cookout and she wants to open up the pool (weather permitting). She wants to invite our neighbors and I immediately said no. We've been here two years, we're neighborly and always wave and say
hello and sometimes chat a bit, we've exchanged garden harvests in the summertime but that's it. lt's not a huge party as we both don't have a ton of friends. Maybe four friends, her aunt and uncle and sister, my sister and our nephews. I just don't feel it's an event to invite a neighbor to. We are total opposites and l'm the biggest introvert
ever and just don't want to bring my neighbors and invite them into my life. Am I being the asshole here? ",AmItheAsshole
 for not reminding a friend of the time we were supposed to hang out,I was supposed to have dinner with this friend yesterday but he flaked and ate somewhere else and said he forgot. But he said we can today. He hasn’t texted me at all today about it and I haven’t said anything to him asking if we are still on. Should I text and ask or just leave it be? ,AmItheAsshole
 ex throws temper tantrum ,"I (f21) have a 2 1/2 year old boy who’s autistic. My now ex(m21) has been in our life since he turned 1. Although we agreed originally that he would just be my boyfriend around the 3 month mark he told me to give him some responsibility. This was due to how stressed I was with court with my ex. 

Yesterday he broke up with me after he said he wanted to go out drinking with his friends. I told him I don’t want him to do that as Wednesdays he is supposed to be here with me and helping put my son to bed. (We’ve been together a year and a half and my son refuses to sleep most nights unless he’s here) I had been up since midnight at he was telling me this right before he was supposed to go out while still not being at mine. He was supposed to go to a festival this weekend but his friends changed there mind and he didn’t have money so I was going to give him some to go. So I was saying no to going out as after a year and a half and by his wish he has responsibilities to my son. Defending my 2 1/2 year olds routine as it’s important to him as he’s autistic. He broke up with me. 

The last time I saw him in person we were talking about wedding rings and laughing and joking. And now he’s claiming he’s been losing feelings for a while. He has been parading that we’re a “little family” spending loads of money on a night out last month for a date night. And spending over £200 on my Christmas presents and around that for my son. 

We’ve worked hard to get to a point where on Wednesday we both won’t be stressed as much as my son would go to a special nursery and that means that all of my appointments I can take will be for when he’s there. So it’s less stress for the month of us. But he claims he can’t handle the stress 

I don’t know why but his actions aren’t matching his words and I’m left heartbroken with a son who’s begging for my ex. And it feels like he’s just throwing a temper tantrum. 

Was I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend to get a job?,"Am i (22m) the asshole for telling my friend (22m) to get a job? Me and my friend have been friends since middle school, and as i grow up, he refuses to. He has never had a real job. He lives off his dad and doesn't have to pay a dime. He also has a younger brother (16m) who has a job. He will often beg his little brother for money and has gone as far to blackmail his brother for money. Whenever we hang out, I have to pay for us. 
Around October 2023 He said he was going to get a job. He applied, got an interview, didn't get the job. Well, he never applied for another job. His excuse before was ""I'm going to wait until the snow melts."" Which makes some sense because he would be walking to work. It's almost may and he still hasn't gotten a job or even applied anywhere. 
So earlier this week, I mentioned going on indeed. He said that he was ""getting to it"". Today he asked everyone in our group chat to play something with him because he was bored. Well everyone was already working or doing schoolwork. So, I mentioned that we were all busy and sent a link to indeed. I know it was a bit rude, but I don't know what else to do anymore. I can tell I upset him. ",AmItheAsshole
 for standing my ground on a group project?,"First ever post here, so hello everyone. I(18mtf) and my group mates(19y.o-20y.o) have a project for a class.

The project is that we choose a scene to modernize from an ancient Greek epic poem, shoot it, edit it, and then submit. For anonymity, I won't be giving the specific text.

This was given to us back in February and now we have to finish it within 3 weeks. I asked my teammates what scene they'd like to choose, but they'd always say ""we have time"" or something along those lines.

I, on the other hand, am a very strict person when it comes to homeworks. So I suggested that I write the script for us, then we talk about how we'd like to continue, they refused saying ""you don't need to do it now."" In March, I notified them again and it was the same excuse, but this time, I started drafting some ideas and talked about it with some other friends instead.

So this month, when I thought the submission date was closer to the end of May, our teacher re-informed us that it was in 3 weeks. I obviously panicked and let them know that we have to write a script. I stayed up late one night and wrote it for them to review (they still haven't).

The submission date is 10th of May and I am freaking out basically. I gave them a schedule of shoots and the equipment needed, they didn't say anything but ""sounds good.""

We were supposed to meet tomorrow for the first shoot, one of them canceled. I didn't say anything bad, but I did clafiry the situation many times saying that we need proper equipment, we need a place to shoot, and I need time editing it. I sent these messages in a group chat trying to explain myself, but they'd constantly say the same shit they were saying for months now. They are practically refusing to listen to me and I don't want to get a shitty grade for something I am losing my mind over. I want to say something but I already spammed the group chat and would feel like an asshole.

So, WIBTA for standing up?
And outside of the asshole thing, do y'all have any advice?",AmItheAsshole
 for arguing with my father and basically blaming all my problems on him,"I (M 17) just snapped with my dad (M 54) . For context, my mother (F 49) if finnish and my father is moraccan. We currently live in Finland, and my parents are distant at best from each other, even though they are still together and we all live under the same roof. My father is unemployed, and stays home all day, laying in bed and staring at his computer, and eating. He will get mad at the slightest thing, and will always threaten me when he does. Anyways, so today we agreed that I would move a box to the upstairs storage (we live in an apartment), while he goes to buy onions. While I was in the middle of looking for the storage key, he told me to go to the shop to get onions, and I simply said 'fine, I guess I'll do both', in admittedly a very teenager type of tone. He yelled at me for this, and I snapped, for the damn near first time actually yelling beck, about how he gets mad about the slightest thing, and makes messes that I always have to clean, and how he leeches of my mother. He went silent, and just left. Am I the asshole here?",AmItheAsshole
 for embarrassing my SIL? ,"I hate it but I’m a mom that’s overly sensitive about my kids…to the point where I would get more emotional about something more than they would and I’ve been trying to work on it. But my twin girls they were NICU babies so I’m sometimes over protective about them plus they did have some developmental delays because of that. So if I’m the AH please tell me. 

But twin A (F7) she’s my talkative one and the most outgoing one between the 2…however  twin B (F7) is the complete opposite she’s my loner one and more reserved…which I don’t have an issue with that…especially if it’s just her personality. But with them having such different personalities, friends and sometimes even family members would treat them differently from the other. Some I’ve even seen ignore twin B completely and just focus on twin A. Even though it doesn’t seem to bother Twin B..I still worry about her psyche. 

But recently my ex-SIL , she sees my kids quite a bit because they’re in the same gymnastic class and she always wants a hug from my girls and usually they do but Twin B doesn’t like to most of the time..she likes to hover under me mostly. But SIL tried to get a hug from Twin B obviously she was not into the idea..so she grabs Twin A and says right in front of Twin B…see this is why she’s my favorite because she gives me hugs and obviously Makes twin B feel bad so to prove to her aunt she would then go hug her.  When the girls went into class I asked politely please don’t tease her with that. I don’t want them growing up thinking they have to compete with each other and I thought she understood. Until yesterday we had gymnastic class and  the same thing happened, but this time Twin B got more upset and went to go pout in a corner. I was pissed and I checked my SIL in front of the whole den of other parents and she obviously got embarrassed. I don’t remember what I exactly said but I know I said something of the lines that she’s mean spirited…But I wasn’t done with her yet after we left the class I sent her text and told her I don’t want her hugging my kids anymore if she’s going to have that entitlement for a hug when she sees them.  Clearly it upset her because I get a nasty voicemail from the ex MIL about how I embarrassed SIL in front of everyone..making her seem like she was a monster in front of these parents…I’m starting to think if I was maybe being overly sensitive..because Twin B is fine and does not seem to care about the incident. So AITAH? ",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my south asian parents not to kiss my 2 months old daughter on lips,"My parents are not from US and I was also not born here. However, I’ve been away from home country for over a decade and I am having to deal with issues related to cultural differences
On a daily basis with my parents. It is worse when they are visiting us. 

No matter how hard I explain things that are done differently here to them, they don’t seem to try to acknowledge it. 

Very recently, I let them know about what our daughter’s Pediatrician told us; not to kiss the baby directly in her mouth. My mom did it anyway today. 

I was upset and mad that she didn’t respect that. In fact, there are other things they just listen and ignore. I feel like my words mean nothing to them. I burst into anger today. 

In my parent’s defense, “It would be an unbelievable thing to say back in home country. I was raised by feeding from their mouth (making food softer by chewing). I acted as if the baby is going to get a disease from them.”

I am exhausted from these kind of incidents with them. I can’t stay quiet because I can’t unsee them disregarding the things I request them to follow.  I am not sure what to do. I have already tried explaining things when everyone is calm. However, these things keep happening. 

My mom told me that she feels like I don’t treat her close to our puppy. Another thing they don’t like is the request I made to not post our daughter’s picture in facebook. Dad did it anyway and when I was upset about it, obviously it didn’t go well. 

Guys how do you deal with these incidents in your family if it applies? Sorry to bother you all, I am not fully sure if this is the right community for my story. Happens to be my first post so please go easy on me. Thanks all! ",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to give emotional support to my mom?,"(English is not my first language, I'm sorry in advance)

I'm F, 21, and since I was a child I've been serving as emotional support for my mom, every single time she had a minor inconvenience in her life. She used to call me the ""peacemaker"" of the family. I've got a slightly older brother, who is not very close to her since they argue 65% of the time. and a father, who died 4 years ago. Ever since my father died, I became the only source of happiness for my mom. She has no friends and has no interest in finding love again.

 She used to work a lot, after my dad passed away, so our family did not get into financial difficulties, which I am very grateful for, but I also helped her in every way I could, I worked hard and studied hard. Since I spent all my time wanting to help her, I did not have time to make close friends or get a boyfriend, my only worries were to get good grades, get into a free university, do all the housework and cooking, and work hard. 

But now my mom complains to me all the time about me not having a boyfriend, she even questioned if I was lesbian (which I don't take any offense in, but she is VERY conservative), and she worries about my future and me all the time, and every single day she has anxiety episodes where she will say her entire source of anxiety is my future. She did a bariatric surgery and her emotional state is even worse. now. And, since I'm taking care of her the entire day and night, it's been unbearable to handle her numerous mental breakdowns because of these worries that she has.

 I'm doing the best I can, I've never been a trouble-child and always did my best to be well-behaved, but it's been some years since I've been under that pressure, and that mental burden is making me way less productive, revenge procrastinate, and depressed. Since we're having to spend way more time together, every single little thing I forget to do (like washing one plate) has been a reason for us to fight. Every single time she calls me to her room to lay down on her bed and ""talk about life"" (which ends up being the same complaints about me), I simply refuse to go and I really don't want to talk to her about her emotional state. I'm very burnt out and I'm struggling with my own mental health already.

I've tried everything to help her with therapists, and psychiatrists, but she has a lot of stigmas about getting mental help from a professional and refuses to see one online or face to face. AITA for refusing to listen or help her by myself with her own problems?

",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to go on a solo weekend trip ?,"My boyfriend and I have been together for 5 years now, and we have travelled together here and there. But we never agree on the same places, and sometimes I don’t get to travel where I want to because he doesn’t like those places. Two years ago he went on a four month long trip with a friend and also did some solo traveling. I supported it because I don’t have attachment issues and find it normal and healthy when someone does this in a relationship. 

Now, I told him I wanted to plan a solo weekend trip to London, because I was born and raised there and haven’t been there for some time and want to revisit my childhood. He flipped saying that he is in a stage in the relaitonsip where he wants to travel with his partner. When I mentioned that he never wanted to go to London, he tried to block off the conversation and told me that it’s fine he will do his own thing with friends. He told me that I never want to travel with him(not true we planned a few things this summer). But I feel like I also would like to do something on my own cause I always travelled with other people.  

Now he isn’t talking to me and I feel like I don’t want to do the trip anymore and not excited about it. AITA for wanting to go on a solo trip while being in a LTR?",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting my stepdad sleep in my room?,"Hi this is my first time posting on here and I honestly don’t have anyone to talk to about my problems so I just want to see if there’s anything I missed all feedback is welcome 
Ok so on Monday afternoon me (18yo) and my stepdad (45yo) where sitting in the living room watching tv and having a good time while he was drinking a couple beers (on a Monday afternoon might I add) after a couple hours we decided to go to our rooms and sleep before work, (we work night shifts so we sleep during the day) and when we entered my parents room my mom was taking up the whole bed. My stepdad told my mom to move so that he could lay down and my mom jokingly says “no get out of my room” joking and fighting like this is pretty normal for us we play fight all the time and it’s just how we bond I guess so I didn’t take it seriously so my stepdad said okay fine and humorously stormed out of the room and went to mine and told me to stay with my mom and that he would sleep there in my room. Here’s where I may be the asshole, by the tone of his voice I figured he was still playing around so I said no and tried pushing him off my bed (I will admit part is f me didn’t want him to sleep in my room not cuz I have anything to hide just cuz it’s my space and I feel like it’s an invitation of privacy to me) and since we where both laughing I was still thinking this was all a big joke after a while of this happening and him insisting on sleeping in my room I kept saying no and i managed to push him off my bed when he hit the ground (my bed is like a foot off the floor) he got up and said “okay since you just basically kicked me out of your room I won’t let you into mine ether” in a slightly more serious tone and now actually stormed out of my room I ran to his room thinking he was just acting rlly well but he was actually upset and he actually kicked me out of their bedroom the sudden change of attitude shocked me to say the least and I was overwhelmed with emotion so I went crying to my room. Flash forward to today it’s Thursday and he still hasn’t spoken to me and at this point I don’t know what to do it’s a nightmare to work with him like this since he’s my boss so I kinda have to talk to him from time to time and at home it’s the same thing so I’m at a loss at this point. So am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for not making my daughter work or move out?,"I'm a single dad of a 19 year old daughter. Her mother passed away when she was 4. Ever since then I've been raising her alone. I haven't dated anyone since my ex passed, I've had a few casual hookups here and there, a few ""friends with benefits"" but nothing serious. I was too busy with my daughter, managing my company, renovating my house to even consider dating. 

I grew up poor, I first started working when I was 16. When I was 18 and finished school I was working 60+ hour weeks. I eventually started my own logistics company which meant even more hours. I always promised myself that if I had a kid they wouldn't have to go through what I went through. I tried to provide for my daughter as best as I could. I always paid for her hobbies whether it was horse riding when she was 9 or guitar lessons when she was 12. She's 19 now, she doesn't officially have a job but she works part time as a ""social media manager"" at my company, she basically manages the pages for my company. Makes new posts, replies to comments etc. On top of that she's taking photography classes and has done a few paid gigs. When she finished high school she said she didn't want to go to college which I supported. All I ever wanted was for her to have the chance to follow her dreams and passions, something I could never do. Yes I know she's a bit spoiled, she lives for free with me, I pay for everything, her car, phone, her photography classes. But I don't have an issue with that. 

Anyways, six months ago I started dating this woman I met through online dating that my daughter helped me set up a year ago. This whole thing was her idea. We don't live together but she spends most weekends at my place. But recently she started having an issue with my daughter. She doesn't like the fact that my daughter is ""spoiled"". It all started after her car broke down and she had it towed. It turned out her transmission failed and the cost to fix it was too expensive. She asked to use one of my cars to which I said no. And since then she's been really negative about my daughter. She keeps starting fights about her and I honestly don't know how to feel. This is the first woman I've loved since my ex died, but the constant fighting and her criticizing my daughter is just too much. I'm honestly just confused. She makes me feel like a bad parent for raising my daughter this way. So AITA here in this situation?",AmItheAsshole
 for ditching a friend at the airport in Mexico?,"I take frequent trips to Mexico for vacation. Last couple trips down there have been solo. I've been trying to get friends or family to join me but the timing never lines up. I've stayed in contact over the years with a buddy from my hometown that I went to middle school with. On one of our recent conversations he mentioned he had just got back from a trip to Peru and really enjoyed it. I figured he's familiar with traveling internationally and he's always been a good guy whenever I return to my hometown for visits, why not invite him to meet me in Mexico? He had never been there before and I thought it would be fun to show him around and have a travel buddy on this trip.

He agrees and we arrange a time and place to meet around the airport in the Mexican town we're traveling to. The day of our flights my flight is delayed by two hours. Getting through immigration takes FOREVER. My buddy arrived about 4 hours before I did and spent that time drinking at the airport bar. When I finally catch up with him, he's completely wasted. He begins accusing the bar staff of stealing his money. He's making really inappropriate comments to other tourists about how hot their wives/girlfriends are. I inform him I'm contacting the Uber and we need to meet him on the street outside the airport as Ubers aren't allowed on airport property. Arrival time for the Uber is 6 minutes, exactly enough time to make it to the street. My friend begins chasing women around the airport trying to get their phone numbers. I finally get him outside and close to the street. He spots a small group of female airport employees on their break on the side of the airport. He begins harassing  them and trying to get their phone numbers. He's not taking ""NO""  for an answer.

When they try to walk away from him, he grabs one of them by the arm and refuses to let go until she gives him her phone number. I plead with him to leave her alone and apologize like crazy to her. I get the notification that the Uber has arrived. I don't want to end up in a Mexican jail so I tell him we have to leave now! He refuses and says he'll kill me (jokingly...I'm pretty sure) if I interrupt his ""conversation"" with this airport employee. I informed him that I'm leaving right now with or without him. He ignores me. So I hop in the Uber and leave him stranded at the airport. I started receiving texts and calls from his friends and family about not hearing from him. I inform them of the situation and that I left him at the airport. They tell me I have to go back for him and I refused. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
" for telling my sister she was being ""scammed""","Well, not exactly scammed but don't know how else to describe it.

I'm 25. My sister is 40 something. She is living in the US since about 10 years and everything is going well for her and my nephews. We don't really get along because of the age difference and we never actually lived together, except for when I used to visit her city as a child with our mom. Basically we have nothing in common, I have more in common with my first nephew. I'm still living with our mom in out country (Venezuela)

So, as many Venezuelan immigrants she sometimes helps my mom with something, mostly groceries, and there are a few businesses for just that, selling packages of groceries and the person living in the US pays them in dollars and they deliver it to the family member.

However, we had bad experiences with those businesses, because they are ALWAYS late, and not like, 1 hour late or something, I mean DAYS late, in some cases, they say will deliver in the morning and arrive at night, and we had spoiled or near spoiled fruit, broken cookies, smaller meat that expected, and other issues. And those packages and delivery fees are EXPENSIVE. Of course, she pays it, but my mom could by MORE and better in a nearby grocery store with just the delivery cost.

About 2 weeks my sister paid to deliver one of those packages and they were 4 DAYS LATE! According to my sister, their excuse was ""they had no electricity"" We instantly called it BS because yes, we had many power outages, those are programmed to have 4 hours of electricity, and 4 hours without, this is because this year is so dry the dam we use to have energy is DRY. But we gave it the benefit of the doubt until the delivery guy arrived. We reviewed the groceries, everything seemed fine, and we asked where they were located. They mentioned a central location near a hospital.

It was definitely BS because they don't cut the electricity near hospitals. And if they had left that area 4 full days without electricity would be a DISASTER! It was actually offensive to say that to our faces.

I said to me sister that there was no way they would have been 4 days without electricity, but she defended the business. She rather believes a bad overcharging business than us, who are actually LIVING HERE!

This became a discussion, because she started to say ""YEAH SURE, YOU JUST REPEAT WHAT THE GOVERNMENT SAYS, THAT EVERYTHING IS GOOD AND FINE"" She always does this when we tell her that things are not as catastrophic as she thinks wants to start talking about the Venezuelan government. I called her out on that and told her that is their word against my living reality.

This had upset her and then complained to our mom, and my mom told me that I should have just stayed quiet, so AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 going nuclear on my brothers gf?,"This happened not so long ago. Me and my brother get home from some place not really relevant to the story. I get to my room and before i even get inside they’re already at each other about where he was or how he wasn’t allowed to go wherever he took me. I ignored them and went inside my room. Eventually it got to a point where they went to his room while yelling at each other, then she does what lit the fuse for me which was slam the hell out of the bathroom door.

 Now i hope you guys understand why i did what im about to say, mind you guys this house is the house i grew up in since a child. I’m 18 now, many things have happened since then like my mom separating from my dad and taking us, me moving back here and my dad passing a couple years ever since then. My dad having his last moments in this house to add. This woman has been around my brother for merely a year, and it’s been mostly nothing but trouble for him. I tried not to let it bother me but there’s only so much I could take from being passive to the disrespect happening to not only my brother but the very house my dad left for us his children.(There had been multiple instances of stuff like this before that I let slide)

Back to the story, i walk to the bathroom door and immediately state, “you will not slam doors in this house. If you have a problem with that you can get tf out because im no longer gonna allow you to disrespect this house. My dad had his last moments in that spot you love to slouch on for 6 hours of the day”(the spot where my dad was last alive before being taken by ambulance yes that’s her favorite spot to spend her days on.) In the middle of that, she opened the door and started trying to say something.

At this point we’re both yelling in a heated argument, my brother in between us telling me to calm down. I can’t really remember much of what I said but definitely harsh things. After that she locks herself in my brothers room, not long after she leaves and my brother leaves. I have not talked to my brother or her and I don’t really wish to to be honest. She’s gone for now and there’s finally some peace and quiet around. I just need to know was i the asshole for going off on my brothers gf?

edit - since some of you seem to think the place irrelevant to the story was a strip club, it wasn’t even as much as a bar. not even a restaurant.. we were gone 20 minutes max I grabbed some food and my brother bought a joint.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to protect myself and take some time apart from my best friend??,"I, Sarah (20), am a sophomore in college and became super close to my best friend, Emma (19), whom I just met this school year. We're part of a friend group of 7 girls (most of us met each other this school year), and although we're all close, ""It's one of those groups where everyone talks about each other. Emma and I prefer to stay out of the drama and just have fun with everyone.

Last year, one of the girls in our group, Angela, did something really hurtful by causing a rift between me and Olivia, texting me from Olivia's phone to end our friendship. I confided in Emma about it, and she saw the texts Angela sent me this year, stirring up more trouble about how I cant afford to go to this college anymore. Although Emma is friends with Angela, she's not very close to her and was surprised by her actions.

Recently, history repeated itself when Emma started getting close to Angela, who then started badmouthing me to Emma, trying to drive a wedge between us just like she did before. This brought back painful memories from last year, and I broke down in my dorm, telling Emma how much it hurt me.

Now, Emma and Angela hang out all the time, which makes me feel even more betrayed. When I expressed my feelings to Emma, she brushed them off, saying Angela didn't do anything to her and she wasn't involved last year. It's frustrating because Angela's actions are causing a strain on our friendship, and Emma doesn't seem to understand.

I tried to explain to Emma how Angela's behavior made her doubt our friendship for three days because of Angela's influence. I told her how much it hurts that she's getting close to someone who hurt me so deeply, especially when I live so close by and Angela lives in NJ and is also transferring. I asked for some space to think about our friendship, but Emma got upset, accusing me of pushing her away. So, am I the asshole for wanting to protect myself and take some time apart from my best friend?",AmItheAsshole
 For telling my brother it’s his own fault he can’t get a job,"I 1M recently went out with my brother 2M and bought a huge hot dog and my brother got angry with me for not sharing when I literally spent my own money on it and now he kicked me out of the house.

I’m currently sick and he won’t even bring me any ibuprofen and idk what to do considering he won’t even speak to me so please help me somehow if you can.

I walked down the hallway and ran and then shrek dragged me into the front rooms for dinner and I eat cheesecake and now I’m wanted by fbi for a 6 month international manhunt and I drank a water bottle on top of a milk jug and got into the car and drove for 2828283838 hours.

I literally didn’t even want to drive but my brother forced me to drive anyway so now I don’t know to do so I’m coming to you Reddit.

So Reddit AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 if I moved out of my college apartment with our jointly-owned cats?,"I (24F) live with two other roommates, one of them my age and then her older sister. We have lived together for almost 5 years. We get along pretty good, except for her older sister and I are both introverted and don't necessarily click well.

A year and a half ago, we came into ownership of two kittens. At the time, we had no real plans to move out or separate, as we have a pretty good living situation. I take care of the cats primarily as I work from home; I feed them, groom them (brush and trim their nails), clean up after them (vacuuming, sweeping, mopping, etc), play with them, cuddle them, etc. My two roommates' only responsibility is to take care of the litter box - which they fail to do oftentimes and I am stuck cleaning up the litter box for them.

The cats have chosen me as their favorite person. Even when my roommates are home, they are attached to me at the hip.

Our landlord has recently informed us that he plans on selling the property. He offered to sell it directly to us, but it's marked ridiculously high that we couldn't afford the mortgage even if we evenly split it. So - we're faced with either moving out, or praying that the new owners will not jack up rent prices or kick us out.

I believe our current landlord would let us break our lease early and move to avoid the hassle of showing a house with tenants occupying it. I want to live on my own and I would like to take the cats with me.

However, I think they are attached to the cats similarly to me. The cats are legally mine; their adoption paperwork and microchips are in my name. There is an apartment in a really nice complex that's right in my budget that I could move into next month, and I have a personal connection to the landlord.

WIBTA if I told my roommates I plan on trying to move into my own place ASAP and take the cats with me? They would still be able to visit them whenever they wanted, within reason, as I still like their company - I just need my own space.",AmItheAsshole
 for not saying much after my friend cut a guy off?,"so i (16f) am friends with someone (15f) who we’ll call jess. jess and i have been friends for a few years now, and we love talking to each other. 

recently (about 3 weeks ago), jess started talking to this guy. of course, i was all for it, because i love to see my friend happy. during the time she was talking to the guy, though, he was all she’d talk about - not exaggerating. from day to night, for those 2-3 weeks, the main topic of conversation was the guy she was talking to, and i’m sure you can predict that i was starting to get tired of it soon enough. 

less than half of the times in that whole time period did she ever ask about how i was doing or what was going on in my life, probably less than 10. even when she did, she’d usually just go back to talking about the boy again a couple messages after. that kinda hurt me, because i always make sure to ask her how she’s doing and what’s going on with her before i start talking to her.

so, today, jess messages me and tells me she cut him off because something felt off to her. i kind of just started at the message, because this was the same guy i feel she was kind of neglecting me for. i’ll admit, my responses were kind of dry, but i didn’t really know what to say in that situation because she would always talk about how she liked him so much then she suddenly ended things. along with that, i was kind of busy when she was telling me all of this, too, but i don’t think how occupied i was would’ve changed what i said. 

after a couple of messages back and forth about how she cut this guy off and why, she asks if she messed up. i said “i don’t know” because i honestly didn’t - this was her relationship, not mine. i barely even know who the guy is. after i say that, she responds with “nvm then”. when i tried to message her a couple hours later, she texted like she was mad at me for not giving her a better response. 

i want to be there for her, but i don’t exactly know what to do in this situation. i still feel bad though. aita?

tl/dr: my friend is upset bc i didn’t know what to say after she cut a guy off that she kind of neglected me for",AmItheAsshole
H for asking for a bigger diamond in my engagement ring?? ,"Hiiiii everyone! This is my first post on Reddit and I’m doing this because I am super conflicted and am getting conflicting responses from friends and family. 

I got engaged on February 4th (yay!). My fiancé bought my ring online after I essentially picked it out/approved it. It’s gorgeous and I truly do love it. Neither of us had ever done this before and I honestly haven’t put much thought or did much research about rings/diamonds, I just knew I wanted oval. 

When he proposed, I was soooo happy. The ring is stunning. I do have long fingers (I’m 6 foot even) and this makes the diamond look fairly small. It’s around 0.7 carats and I can’t shake the feeling that I want it to be bigger to fit my hand. I brought this up to my fiancé and, while he was a bit disappointed that I felt this way, he has been supportive and has taken me to the jeweler to look at bigger diamonds. I literally want to keep the same ring but just replace the center stone so it’s bigger. 

I have some people in my life that tell me this was okay and I was right to advocate for myself, and I have some saying that should have said nothing at all. Am I the asshole for this? I personally think this was okay since I will be wearing this forever and I don’t want to wish it was different than it is every time I look at it. 

I appreciate any feedback!! ",AmItheAsshole
 for being overly sensitive to smell?,"Hi, my fiancé (25M) and I (24M) have an argument about this every once in a while and I just want to settle it. I'm an autistic adult. I have a lot of sensory sensitivities, especially smell. If food has too strong of a smell for me, I have to leave the room/building and come back when he's done. My partner takes great offense to this, as he sees it as me trying to control what he eats. I am not trying to influence what he eats at all, just that it is too overstimulating and I need to leave until he's done, then come back. He tells me I need to ""get over it"", but I am physically unable to. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 the asshole for complaining my girlfriend took a bite too big out of my sandwich?,"So, tonight I and my girlfriend ordered dinner and, as we sometimes do when we ask for different meals, we agreed I would take a bite out of her sandwich and she would take a bite out of mine because they had different meats and toppings and in this way we can ""sample"" the food from each other.  


 I have just started swimming classes, so I was feeling a lot hungrier than normal when dinner arrived. We sat down to watch netflix, she offered her sandwich and I took a bite out of it, then I offered mine. She took a bite that seemed proportionally much larger than the one I took, and I (again, I was very hungry) said something on the lines of ""Whoa, you took too big of a bite for someone who's just sampling it"". I could tell she did not find it funny, so I just explained that if I'm biting into someone elses food I try to go for the smallest bite possible and then I did not press the issue any further, but I also said that I wasn't really angry about the bite. It could have just looked a big bite from my angle or it could be that I was just hungry. For me it was solved immediately: I made a comment, she did not like that, I won't insist, it's fine.   


But during the episode she got non-verbal and stopped interacting with me, giving me the silent treatment, so to speak.   
At the end of the episode the silence was really weird and upsetting. We had planned to see more stuff, so after she asked what to do I told her that if she was going to stay like that I would rather not share time together because it's just unpleasant to watch stuff in a situation like that.   
So she immediately was very angry with me. She said that she was feeling huge and disgusting and masculine because of what I said. This did not make any sense to me and I was very disoriented by this reaction, So maybe I was a insensitive by asking if this was not a bit much over a comment that was made in a irreverent way about a sandwich.   


To this, she got even more upset and told me that she has issues with her weight, that she has TOLD ME that before and that I was an being an asshole by saying she eats too much.   
Another disclaimer: She has complained to me about feeling clumsy and she did mention her weight a few times, but it is not constant.

So I explained that I didn't said that she eats too much. Complaining about a large bite in an un-serious manner is absolutely not the same as saying someone eats too much. I also said I could be wrong about and just hungry, which caused the comment.  


She said that it doesn't matter. You should never say that to someone that has weight issues. I said that I was sorry, but honestly I could not know she would feel so bad. To me, that is not such an obvious connection, because taking a large bite =/= eating too much. If she feels bad I understand, but I needed her to approach it differently.   


She again insisted it was absolutely cruel and mean-hearted of me. Anyway, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking to take a phone call at work!,"Am I the asshole for asking to take a phone call at work?
A bit of background
I’m 20F and my boyfriend J is 21M we will call him Jay. Jay left 1 month ago for Basic training in the US Army. Since arriving I have talked to him twice, not including 2 letters I have received from him. His phone is broken so if he gets to call it is from an unknown number because he is using a battle Buddy’s phone. 
I work as a cashier in a very small town near a high traffic freeway. We get a lot of truck drivers and travelers coming through our town. That being said my Boss is a total duchebag and has zero compassion or empathy for his employees. 
Onto the situation which occurred 2 weeks ago, I was working at the counter next to my boss during a large rush of people came into the store. In the middle of this rush I realized I was being called on my cellphone, I knew I couldn’t run off because I would probably be fired. Once the rush was over I told my boss I missed a very important phone call and asked if I could go call back. He said not now, that he had to run to the back office. 5 minutes later he came back up and said I could go call back. I walked out of the store and called the number back twice, to no answer. I then called my mom crying telling her the situation having an anxiety attack. After about 5 minutes I walked back into the store still freaking out (I have severe anxiety and didn’t have my meds to help calm me down so I was visibly distraught and still teary eyed). My boss asked what the phone call was about so I told him the situation, how I had possibly missed the chance to speak to my boyfriend and was very upset about it. My boss then went on a tangent about how I can’t just run away from the counter in the middle of a rush to answer a call and how it was very unprofessional of me to walk away from the counter when I was needed to “talk to some boy” mind you my boyfriend and I had lived together for over 6 months before he left and my boss was well aware of this. He is not “some boy” in any capacity. 
That was basically the end of the conversation, until the next week I got a call from my boyfriend’s mom while at the counter with no customers in the store. I answered the call and she told me she had Jay on the phone. Luckily my favorite manager was on shift and she ran to the counter when I said I had to go take a call. I got to speak to him for 5 minutes and he told me he had tried calling me the week before and I cried. 
Everyone I tell this story to says that my boss is the asshole for speaking to me the way he did and exaggerating what happened but also say I shouldn’t ever expect to be allowed to take care of personal business while at work. 
So AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not helping a homie out on his birthday gift ? ,"So basically I got VIP tickets for my homies bday so we can go see microwave ( yes that’s the bands name lol). I live in Sacramento and he lives in Bakersfield where I used to live but just couldn’t take it anymore honestly. anyways, we have gone to a bunch of concerts before in the past and I have always payed for the tickets AND the hotel except for one time where there was multiple people staying in a Airbnb so we all split it. he asked if he could stay at my place this time since the concert is in Sacramento anyways and wanted to save a few bucks on a hotel ,makes sense.  I told him since I just broke up with my partner and we live with one another that the atmosphere would be a bit uncomfortable and I would suggest him to get a hotel because I’d hate for his stay here to be uncomfortable. He told me that he doesn’t think he’d be able to afford it and asked if I could help split the cost and I told him I don’t think I’d really be able to afford the split of cost after purchasing these tickets that were nearly 400 bucks since I pay 2500 in rent split with my roommates which is still pretty heavy, keep in mind he lives with his parents he doesn’t pay rent and makes decent wage but still I chose not to get upset we all have bills at the end of the day. I started to notice a pattern where he would go out every night if not almost every night with a coworker he met at his job he started at less than a year ago ( probably about 7/8 months ago). He would go out with said coworker and drink huge tabs of beer and I’m not saying beer is crazy expensive but when you go out beer starts to add when it’s drank almost every night. I just wanna know am I the asshole for not helping pay for his hotel even tho I’ve done it numerous times in the past and am I the asshole for not letting him stay at my crib ?:/ #amitheasshole?",AmItheAsshole
 For wanting an explanation from my boyfriend on why he didn't come home until almost midnight when his training finished at 9:30?! ,"My boyfriend trains for ameture fights, his classes vary daily but I am familiar with the class schedule as i tag along occasionally with our son to watch. When I can't he ALWAYS calls me to let me know he was on his way home cause I worry about an accident or something (his driving makes me nervous). Well last night his class finished at 9:30 pm 10 a clock rolls around I don't think much of it as sometimes he stay a little longer to chat with his buddies. Then at 11:30 I start worrying because this just isn't like him and I know they close up shortly after class. I call him and he answers. I ask him where he's at. He says he been at the store for the last 15 minutes then I ask about the rest of the time in between that and his class ending he says he went to Wingstop which is right by our house and supposedly waited 10 minutes by left cause it was taking too long and he talked with his friend for like 30 minutes after class. Even with  drive time to and from these places he still can't tell me about the other hour. He got mad when I suggested him lying ""said what he Fuck ever"" and hung up comes home acts like it never happened. Realizes I'm upset but still won't explain him self or mention. It's the next day (today) got home from work ignores me for 2 hours then once he comes out of the room gets a call and rushes outside which he also doesn't do. So idk wtf to think he has a history of lying but this is the first he's ever done something like this I think he's acting guilty. Any opinions or advice?",AmItheAsshole
 for ignoring my father?,"so i (16F) have been purposely ignoring my fathers text messages. He had gone almost 13 years no contact and i genuinely forgot about him until around a year ago when he got into contact with me, we would message back and forth some times but lately i’ve been ignoring him, is it wrong that i feel so angry at myself for this? sometimes i cry just thinking about the fact some days he looks forward to my messages but i don’t message him back. he recently messaged me about the fact it was ANZAC day here in australia and i didn’t know how to answer him as he told me about the fact his father was in the war and i just ignored him, am i bad person for that? please help",AmItheAsshole
 for not giving my girlfriend the money my grandfather said should be her birthday present?,"My (23M) girlfriend (22F) and I live together and have a one-year-old son. It was an unplanned pregnancy, and we were not planning to start a family so soon. She’s not working as of now and takes care of our son full time, and we’ve been strapped for cash many times.

In one of those occasions, I had to ask my grandfather to loan us $5k. I was paying him back in installments and still owed him around 3,5k. I saw him when my family hosted a little party for my girlfriend on her birthday last week. I think he realized we were going through tough times, because he told me he would forgive the rest of the loan. Those were his exact words to both of us (my girlfriend was also present): “use the 3k for your family, and the other 500 can be a birthday gift to you (my girlfriend)”.

But now my girlfriend is expecting me to just give her 500 bucks from my bank account so she can get things for herself. I think we should enjoy my grandfather’s generosity to save it all up or use it towards our house bills. She says I’m being an AH for not giving it to her, since that was what my grandfather established. I then told her she was being selfish. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting my girlfriend's brother to move in with us?,"My girlfriend (19F) and I (19M) are planning to move into an apartment in the near future (6 months or so). She wants her brother (22M), to come with us to fulfill a childhood promise she made to him. My girlfriend and I have been together nearing two years now and I am yet to even INTRODUCE myself to this guy. All I know is his name, age, that he can't keep a job, and is horrible when it comes to borrowing money. In my eyes a couple getting their first place together, whether it be a house or an apartment, is an incredibly special milestone. It's something that needs to be between the partners. not the partners, and one's financially irresponsible brother. We've come to a compromise 2-strike system if he misses rent he's kicked out, but if I'm being honest I still don't want him in the picture at all. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my friend we’re not comfortable with her new bf coming over to our house when she house sits for us,"My spouse and I are leaving for a 7 day vacation in two days, and my friend agreed a few months ago to house sit for us. She has house sat for us several times in the past and I wholeheartedly trust her. I will say she is very hot and cold and cycles between emotions very quickly. The first time she ever house sat I did pay her, but she said after that she didn’t want us to pay her since we are friends and it felt weird. So flash forward to now, she has been dating a man she met on a dating site for a few weeks now. They’ve known each other for about 1 month or so. She says he is a really good guy but we have not met him yet. 

A few days ago she told me “I’m probably going to have him come over if you don’t care” I told her initially that I didn’t care but I would have to talk to my husband. After talking with my husband, he doesn’t feel comfortable and raised a few very good points (we have pets and a gun in the house, plus other valuables). We trust her but obviously don’t know anything about this man. I told her yesterday that my husband didn’t feel comfortable with her boyfriend coming over to our house without us there and we would prefer for it to be just her. She got very upset, stating that she is hurt that she feels like we don’t trust her and she would never bring someone into our house that would hurt it or our pets. And that we should let her have him over, especially since we aren’t paying her and she’s doing it for free. And she was only planning on having him over for one afternoon, and they already had plans to use our fire pit and cook dinner in our kitchen. (She still lives with her mom, not sure about the boyfriend’s living situation). Me and my husband talked about it, and since we live in a new city and don’t really know anyone, and don’t think we could find a place to board all 3 pets this quickly, we agreed to letting him come over for one afternoon. This friend had a history of being very hot and cold and we were afraid if we said no she wouldn’t watch the house at all.

Well this morning I was talking with some coworkers and they were making some good points about at least finding out a few details about the man. So I texted my friend asking a few details (last name, job, what city he lives in). And I looked up his Facebook page (which I feel most women would do?) And she got very upset stating that she is “honestly over it” and “this is getting too much for me” and then went on to say she would “pass on the opportunity” to house sit.

Thankfully I have some wonderful coworkers who are going to house sit for us, but I can’t help but feel bad that I upset her. 

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not wanting to cover my friend's husband shift the week of when their baby is due?,"I f(26) have been working for this small Korean family business for the past year. I was approached by my friend who is pregnant and her husband a year ago asking if I was willing to work for her dad's company. Her husband, Steve, said the company would hold my hand through it all and reassured I didn't need any experience in the field. At the time I had just recently quit a toxic job while also living in a toxic household. I didn't really think of it much and agreed because I honestly needed the money. The company was small and only had 5 employees including myself. The Boss (friend's dad), Floor manager (her husband), Accountant (her mom), Main Manager (dad's friend) and me. I found myself having to figure out everything as Steve was too busy to mentor me. They expected me to work during our lunch. ""We as a company need to prioritize the clients and must give the best services at all cost."" The work increased by a lot and it was clear I was not fitted to take this amount of work this early that required a lot more steps. I asked for help but was told to pull through. I started making mistakes, I got in trouble and then the yelling started for not knowing the steps even though the company has not handled this client before. I was told I didn't work fast enough, and needed to stay after hours to work to finish work. The boss yelled, saying how dumb I was, that I didn't have any common sense, everything was my fault. He continued to yell at me in Korean. I did not understand what he was saying, but he was using his gesture to mock me. I gathered my stuff and went downstairs and saw my friend sitting there waiting for her husband. I was embarrassed. My boss and wife would get extremely upset for the smallest things. I was belittled, mocked, and they made sure to tell their clients I wasn't Korean. I was being micromanaged for everything. I was set up to be given all the terrible clients, I was set for failure. I cried everyday. I started having panic attacks driving home, couldn't sleep, and started having nightmares. To top it off, the HR was Steve. There would be times when Steve would standing up for me but would also say I need to take the blame for everything even if the client is wrong, or if the boss was upset he would make sure to tell me that when the boss came in to just keep my head down, and work quietly. My friend will be due next week and Steve is expecting me to take over his workload so he can be with his wife and baby but his work is completed different than what I’m handling and I cant bare the thought of being yelled at again. I am planning on quitting tomorrow and I want to know if what I am doing is right. I do feel guilty that my friend’s husband might not be able to be with his family due to me quitting. 


AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for asking my friend to support me in paying a fine,"Me 19M and my friend 19M are both in film school. For his last film he wrote a screenplay that involved a car. He didn't have a car yet, nor does he have a driver's license and the nature of his screenplay was rather Hollywood-esque. So I proposed for him to lend my stepdad's old Mazda Miata for his movie. Basically I proposed that I would take the car from home and drive it all the way to the city of our school and there he could use it to shoot. 

  
The day comes and everything goes fine. I wake up early, take the train to my hometown, pick up the car and drive back to the city. I arrive at our school and he makes the movie in the car. A day later I come to pick the car back up. 

  
BUT I forgot to check one last thing. In our school's city there is a new low emission zone. Only since recently. I wasn't aware of this because I don't have my own car but I forgot to check too. I didnt see any signs on the drive into the city. So this week I get a fine in my mailbox for 350 euros. Which is a lot of money for students. 

  
I send it in our group chat to him and another girl who also used the car to film. NOTE - my movie did not need that car. The car was only in the school's city for their movies, not mine. Both of them ignore me at first. Obviously me sending it in the group chat was me asking if they would want to support me financially in paying it. Because I hoped that they would offer at least something, be that 10 euros or a beer. But they didn't. So I straight up told them that I did somewhat expect some help in paying it. The car was only in the city for their movies and not mine. Had it not been for the fine, then they would not have a movie and fail their year. Obviously a big part of it remains my fault. Me not checking online and according to my friend, me proposing to do it for them is different than them asking me to do it, makes me responsible for it. However, I'm paying anyway, the fine is for me and only for me, I only expected them to help me out a little bit or however much they want, with me paying all the rest. 

  
This spawned a giant argument with the both of them. Saying that they don't have to help at all, that they are not even related to that issue because it was me driving the car into the city and that if I hadn't proposed it that they would have used a different car (they had another option for a different car but they chose mine) and obviously me not checking online. And I agree with them on that. It is my fault. Hence why I'm paying. I just expected them to at least offer some kind of help considering it was for their movies and not mine. I expected them to do this out of some sort of empathy, and not because they were responsible, because they werent. 

  
AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for needing space from my best friends problems?,"This is about my best friend of 5 years, I’ve been feeling overtaxed with his issues for a while now, mostly about relationships, dating, sex etc. He’s been very determined to meet someone for the last 8 months or so and has been very volatile over how the dates/relationships have gone. I’ve watched him meet someone, get attached very quickly and decide they’re the best thing ever, all of their interests are new and amazing and now it’s all he talks about. Then they start to get distant or cancel plans or don’t follow through on making plans. Then it becomes him asking what’s wrong with him and spiraling about how he will be alone forever. 
Some days he’s complaining to me on and off all day about how he hasn’t heard from so and so in a few days and that he asked if they wanted to hang out and doesn’t understand why he hasn’t heard from them, and asks why they can’t just tell him they don’t want to hang out if that’s the case. 
Ive alternated between being a listening ear, providing advice and sharing my thoughts and experiences. When I’ve declined to offer advice or my thoughts he has pestered me about what I think or what I would do. 

I’ve expressed to him that I can’t be his therapist and that I miss my having my friend and that I need some space from the problems he is presenting to me almost daily. 

Last week I had to tell him again that I needed a break from all the relationship talk and then I didn’t talk to him for a few days. 

We start talking again this week and very quickly got right back to the same spot where he’s just constantly complaining about his lack of a relationship, his career, his personality and all of the issues he has with himself. 

We were talking about difficulties with relationships and intimacy and I said that those things really just come down to communication. Be observant and communicate was my very general advice and he told me that it’s hard to communicate and that being observant takes you out of the intimate moment. 

I believe that if you don’t feel like you can communicate with someone you shouldn’t be getting intimate with them yet. He thought that was harsh to say. 

It escalated from there with him telling me that I’m refusing to validate his feelings about relationships, and him accusing me of not appreciating the times he’s been there for me and that I’m not willing to admit that I could have done anything better in the interaction. 

I don’t think I should have to validate feelings I don’t agree with. He’s allowed to have those feelings and I’m allowed to think that they are unreasonable but understandable. I expressed to him that I understood why he got upset, I apologized, explained my actual intent, and I feel like that should be enough.

I’m just feeling at a loss, because I know I got a bit heated, but overall I feel like I’ve been pretty clear that I just need him to handle his problems without making them mine all day every day. 
 ",AmItheAsshole
" for walking into a girl's dorm ""uninvited""","I(a dude) was hanging out with three girls(who are much closer friends with each other than I am) when one has to stop by her room to get something. It's a double, and her roommate's in. The girl walks in the room followed by the two friends. She never verbally invites me in, but I follow right behind being the socially stupid person I am and not knowing what to do. I greet the roommate, compliment the room, and we're out of there, no more than a minute.

Afterwards the girl says something about how the roommate seemed annoyed but she didn't want to just shut the door on me.

I have no idea if this was wildly inappropriate or a minor inconvenience or somewhere in between. Wondering if I should ask the girl to tell her roommate that I'm sorry.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting my adult kids to acknowledge when I do things for them,"I have 2 fully grown, living on their own, adult kids. They are responsible, decent humans. However, when I do something for them, anything, there is never a thank you. OK, fine. But then, at least acknowledging it would be the decent thing to do, right? For example, loaning one a car when theirs was in the shop, and then they accidentally totaled it. No thanks, no apologies (of course I am just glad they were not hurt). Another example, I am a photographer and they will ask me to do portraits of them and their significant others. I go out of my way to do a great job, wherever they desire, make them feel fantastic. But then I send the photos, and not a single word. No thanks. No 'hey, I got them', nothing. Sending gifts (I do not live local) for holidays and birthdays? I never hear a peep. I ask if they received them, and get maybe a 'yes, thanks' at best. So, AITA for thinking it is a basic decent thing to acknowledge and may and occasional thanks for doing things for my adult kids, to help them or their significant others? (And in case you are wondering, I do see them say thanks and respond to other adults in their lives, for the most part.)",AmItheAsshole
 -Asking close friend to prom over my gf,"AITA

I (m) asked my close friend (f) to prom.we have been close friends for a while and have had a good  relationship the whole way through but she was not my first option to pick for prom. I originally asked my gf (of now nearly 2yrs) on around 3 occasions if she would like to attend with me (expecting a yes of course) but got a firm no each time. (The asking of whether or not she wanted to go with me took place over 2 months with the latest being a week ago).

 So given she had time to think eachtime and possibly change her mind but did not , i assumed her choice was sealed. These many rejections discouraged my decision into even going prom at all. However my friends have been trying to persuade me to go .Yesterday, i asked my close friend if she would be going and she said she was still on the fence…i am also still on the fence abt going. So i asked her if we do decide to go would she like to go with me? She said “yes”. And we are still to make up our minds to whether this become the case. 


Today i get a text message from my gf saying she knows im going with my close friend to prom. I say that its a possibility but may not even happen at all and we would be going as friends. She then says im a bad person and that she heard from someone else that i was going with my close friend and now looks like an idiot bc she said i would never do that to her. I then say i have done nothing wrong and that i asked her many times and got rejected..was i supposed to wait at her feet like a pet i dont get i.


 She is now trying to make me out to be the asshole is that the case?


Edit: i failed to mention that she is still definitely going to the prom , she just happened to turn me down.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my cousin to give her baby up if bingo means more to her than her own child?,"This was a while back and i still regret what i said...but my cousin would often leave her child with me or her siblings and go to bingo almost every night. She would often say she is broke but still has enough money to play bingo and would often leave her child with me no warning and i would have to look after her. I gotten up to a point to when she said she will pay me next time and that next time never came. So i placed my foot down and told her i will not be watching her child anymore until she pays me what she owes me. For context,  we often pay babysitters and i was a go to babysitter for many of my cousins and was paid well growing up. But for her, that ""next time"" never came. Once she gotten it through her head i won't be watching her kid she'd lay it off to her little brother who was only like 11 at the time. And he'd stop by my house to ask me to help him babysit her. Feeling pity for him, i helped and told him to text or call her and to go pick her up ask he wanted to hang with his friends. Dont get me wrong, i love them as family but during that time of a literal infant being taken care of nightly for the mother's habits by a young teen was too stressful. Like let us be kids before we learn to become adults......so....AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to support and help my friend,"
I 16M and my friend 15M had an argument because he was complaining about how he’s unable to not care when people shit on their art.

 It started when I was recommending stuff that would really help them with their account and they started complaining about how they don’t have motivation and professionalism but, also because people shit on his art. I tried to explain that people who say that don’t really matter. It continues and, he said he can’t control the fact that it bothers him when others shit on his art. I tried to explain that it doesn’t matter and if you take time to work on it won’t bother you. 

It continued as a back and forth argument trying to explain how I want to help him work on it so he’s less afraid to push his art out. He then said I’m not listening to him because he can’t control it and that he knows it life and such. He then sent a voice message of him crying how I’m not listening and this is why he doesn’t complain about anything and that all he wants is support from others.

 I tried to explain that it’s ok to complain but if you do it too much it pushes people away because of it and I’m willing to support him but only if he willing to listen and change. Later after more back in forth about how it’s ok to change but complaining will push others away he responds with “I dont give a fuck. If they cant handle it fuck them And if you cant handle it fuck you. Its a normal thing to complain”

I tried to explain that’s it’s ok to think like that because it pushes away and stops the people who want to help you change for the better. It continues to be just constant argument. 

After a while he then says that “what if I don’t want to change what if I want to be the same stay where I am” and, then started listing of people who support the fact he doesn’t change. 
 
It just continues on then with more argument and then stopped after he said “what if I don’t want help. What if I’m ok with it and I want to do things for myself.”

I understand why he thinks like that I used to be like that because like him I hated everyone. I never fitted in either and just wanted to be in my bubble with people who let me do this and that. I just want to help tho give him support to push him self out and into the world. Not be in the bubble of safety like he wants to. I just don’t know how to help when I want to I want to see him less worried,stressed and, anxious about everything. I just want to know was I the asshole",AmItheAsshole
H for getting pissed somebody lost my 165 check?,"I got a 165 dollar check from a competition. I put it in a pretty secure spot in the kitchen. I have no reason to hide it. Well I live with only one family member. I went to go look for my check because I was going to cash it and it was gone. 

I asked my family member ""Where did my check go?"".
He replied ""IDK I might have threw it away"". 

Lets say I got pretty pissed. I said some things I probably will regret.

Well the family member is saying its not a big deal and I should apologize. That I have to go through all this trouble and ask for a new check that I possibly will not get back. Basically its my problem now to possibly get a new one. I was mad as hell. 

Am I the asshole and is my family member justified? Because the family member is making it out to be no big deal.",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to move out on my own when my partner is strongly against it?,"I’m 21 and my and my boyfriend (Jake) have been together for 5 years. My mum and I had lots of conflicts and so after a big one when I was 18 I started staying with Jake and his parents.

Jake works a really good job atm and is studying and is not going to move out until his uni degree is done (at least 3 more years). His parents are letting us live there rent free for us to save for a house.

I go in between my mums house and his parents (staying more at his parents) because of my job being only 9 mins away from mum so I stay with her between shifts and then go back to his on my off days. 

I’ve always felt like quite an outsider within his family and recently it’s just becoming worse and worse for me. When Jake’s brother and sister IL come over for dinner, I get so much anxiety because I can go whole dinners without saying a word because him, his brother and his dad talk about things I have no idea about like cars and tools, and his sis IL and mum work in the same place so they only discuss work and gossip about people they know. 

For context, his bro and sis IL are both older than us but still in their mid to late 20s. 

Jake says I can just be on my phone like he does sometimes, but I get frustrated because I’m trying to be present and polite, and there’s less pressure for him around his own immediate family for him to not care if he’s on his phone or not/being social. 

Recently I’ve said that I want to move out and pay rent on my own to try and see if it improves things. 

I am part time at the moment (earning at least 1500/1700 per fortnight, not taking into account if it’s over a public holiday or if I pick up over time.)

 The rentals I’m looking at are around $350 per week and then I’d have to pay bills/food. I could also modify my roster now and try to a day or change to full time if needed (earning then at least $2300 a fortnight excluding penalties) 

Jake is strongly against saying it would be a silly financial decision and I have a really good opportunity to set myself up. I mentioned i acknowledge I would be financially difficult but potentially great for my mental state, and he said I could just work through my mental problems other ways. 
I talk to psychologists and they still haven’t made this feeling go away so it’s not like I haven’t tried to make this work. 
I don’t tell my mum anything about my anxiety because she usually makes me regret breaking down by telling me that I’m upsetting her for being so upset. 

The reason I mention this is because my mum is saying that renting is “dead throw away money” and that I should just wait longer and keep living with his parents because it’s such a good opportunity. And she said that it does sound good to go out and live on your own and be independent but I should save and wait and buy a really good house instead. She also said that if I do this, I would lose Jake, no doubt about it. 

So AITA for going against what Jake and my mum want and throwing away a great opportunity to save? ",AmItheAsshole
H cause 3’s a crowd?,"AITHA? I Really don’t know if I’m overreacting or if I’m justified in feeling the way I do so here we go. My husband is recovering from a major surgery which I was staying home to help take care of him I was doing stuff around the house including the laundry and 
I left the room to go start cooking dinner  came back in about 5-10 minutes later and he was openly pleasuring himself to something on his phone. I was shocked and said what the heck he closed his phone and refused to tell me anything. He won’t answer me 
When I said why do you have to do that in my face if you have to get off to other women why do you have to do that right in front of me? I asked why can’t you do that in private ? No response no apologies. He then flipped it on to me with filler statements. What do you want from me? You always take things to the extreme, etc  but no validation of what he was doing no explanation and won’t even give me peace of mind by saying it was pornhub or something and not a person he knows and now I’m at the point where I feel like I should be apologizing to him for interrupting  “so sorry sir I will keep your supper warm while you blow your load with this  strange woman, allow me to get you a tissue “ ",AmItheAsshole
 for turning away my new neighbour and her child?,"I (26F) just moved into a new, small apartment block two weeks ago. Been busy setting up the place, furniture, all of it.

The afternoon I moved in, one of my neighbours came up to the steps (each apartment has a little front area, and mine faces the carpark). She introduced herself, single mom with a 4 year old daughter and gave me a small succulent to say welcome. I was very appreciative, said thank you and we spoke for a few minutes.

I work three days from home, and am usually home in the evening after work and at night. This neighbour has started showing up a lot, can generally hear her approaching with her daughter and they'll show up with a painting, or something the daughter has made to give to me. It is nice, but I do prefer to keep to myself, and often I'm in my baggy tee or not dressed for visitors, I have to kind of make myself presentable in under a minute with no notice.

This latest instance, they showed up around 7pm. The daughter had made some kind of drawing and wanted to drop it off. I'd had a long day (was in a giant sweater, looking a mess but insanely comfy, ice cream on the couch, watching a film) saw them through the window, had to quickly jump up, put on shorts, and greet them at the door.

Said thank you as always, daughter wanted to come in, see what I was watching. Nothing terrible, just a bit too grown up for a 4 year old. I politely said, look, thank you but I'm really not in the mood tonight and could they please leave. My neighbour responded ""but she's just a kid, it'll only be a few minutes, she loves making things to show you"" and I said, ""look, I'm child-free by choice, can you please leave? Thank you and good night.""

They have not been back since, but left a note in my mailbox explaining I was rude and her daughter was upset, cried and they'd be open to an apology. I haven't responded but don't want to apologize. Am I the asshole for turning them away?

  
Update; have really taken all this advice on board. I'm going to speak to my neighbour in person in the morning (not a note reply) and say that I'm sorry for my choice of words but boundaries need to be in place and they cannot keep showing up unannounced. I don't plan for it be combative, just human to human. I realise I should've said something from the beginning, but that is neither here nor there. However she decides to respond, that's what it is",AmItheAsshole
 for choosing to partner up with a girl I'm simping for over my friend,"I'm reposting this on a few other subs. So this has gone thru a few revisions before reaching THIS sub

So to keep it simple I have a friend who I share a class with. There's also this girl who I'll call crush who I lowkey have a crush on but she doesn't gaf abt me. But I like working with her

So in this class we have a group project to work on. It's up to 3 but I asked Crush if she wants to do it and she said yes (I've done like all my projects with her and one of them went to finalists at a festival) 

So I told my friend that I'm working with Crush and idk what i was doing and said  ""Me and Crush are doing the assignment togeather since we are the dream team idk what your doing soo""

I litteraly have no idea wtf i was thinking typing that beacuse it sounds like such a dick thing to say. I like working with friend but idk what I was doing saying that. 

So rightfully now friend is pissed and as far as I'm concerned hates me beacuse she's made that I always pick Crush to work with. 

I'm trying to make things right (I'm a ppl pleaser if that means anything so I'm super stressing abt this) but I've only made things worse so far. I need divine intervention at this point.

EDIT 1: friend is mostly mad that I chose to work with Crush over her. She told me she feels like she's a 2nd thought to me.",AmItheAsshole
 for sniffing in front of my boyfriend?,"Me (23F) and my boyfriend (24M) have been together for around 4 years, and have lived together the majority of that time. My boyfriend absolutely hates the sound of sniffing. It can genuinely be the quietest sniff that I’m trying to get away with, but he will hear it and he will scowl at me. He tells me he’s been this way his entire life, even when living at home with his parents, and he does genuinely believe this is a medical issue as it makes him feel such a certain way that he can’t handle the sound. (The feeling he describes is mainly intense anger I believe)

Although I’ve tried to be understanding of this, unfortunately I am just one of a few people who’s nose runs pretty often. I experience a change in temperature, I eat warm food, I’m exercising, absolutely anything and my nose will run. My boyfriend’s problem isn’t that I do it often though, it’s when I do it at all.

Today, my boyfriend was watching football and his team scored, but when he jumped up and celebrated he scared the living daylights out of me. A few minutes later, my nose was running and I sniffed. He asked me to stop, to which I said, I don’t stop you celebrating because you’re in your own home, I need to sniff so I will. My boyfriend then said that I’m causing an argument when I know how uncomfortable it makes him, but I feel like I shouldn’t be restricted in the comfort of my own home. I carried on doing it and ignoring his scowls and how uncomfortable it makes him, but it’s caused this whole absolutely ridiculous argument, we’re both angry with each other and I’m not sure if me being so stubborn was worth it. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for saying i cant rely on my bf bc he didnt wake me up,"my (22f) boyfriend (23 m) knew i had an exam today and we had agreed he would wake me up. he sometimes is annoyed that i dont set my own alarms but the issue is that he will turn off my alarms if i dont wake up to mine first. Also, if hes going to set an alarm why would i set one myself for the same time? 

The problem is he works late. He got home 12:30am and we live in a studio. he kept telling me that he would finish up on his phone in a few minutes and put away the food he made,  and i just waited for him until 2 am. 

I woke up exhausted at 7am and hit snooze which annoyed him to hear two alarms, but then i was so tired i could barely move or stay awake. It was around 10:30 at this point and i asked him ""hey im having a really hard time i need sleep. can you wake me in like 30 minutes?"" 

He says okay, maybe in his sleep and not fully conscious but I also wasnt fully present so i just crashed and fell asleep, I woke up 10 minutes after my exam started and he just said ""youre going to miss your exam"" and i said ""why didnt you wake me?""

Then, this is what upset me. He said it was my fault and I shouldve gone to bed earlier and that i shouldnt have expected him to listen because he was tired. 

I feel like he shouldve said ""oh fuck were both really exhausted and idk how this happened either. lets go"" Like i dont care whose fault it was, we BOTH were exhausted. I just don't like that he's saying im irresponsible because I was exhausted and he's not. 

Thankfully I made it to my exam but he still thinks this is all my fault and im irresponsible. I wouldnt have relied on him in the first place if he didnt tell me i could have and it worries me that he will sabotage me in other ways if i fix this. My therapist suggested buying headphones so I only hear the alarm and don't have to worry about it bothering him and him turning it off. 

I told him this and said he let me down and he shouldnt have only blamed me and that if you agree to a responsibility you have to honor it. I just hate that he thinks if he doesnt like a responsibility after it was decided on that he can just not do it. 

He also said I dont even cook for him enough because months ago we agreed that he'd buy groceries and id cook them. But, he also said he'd help do the cleaning and he never does a good job, he just does the dishes and puts all my spices and cooking supplies on high shelves I cant reach and I have to ask him each time. I understand the logic of ""your needs are your responsibility"" about waking up but he doesn't even understand that its hypocritical to expect me to spend hours cooking each day and cleaning up after both of us but I cant ask him to wake me up every once in a while?  

TLDR: boyfriend didnt wake me up and i missed my exam and then he called me irresponsible. I told him he shouldnt agree to things and then not do them. 

&amp;#x200B;",AmItheAsshole
 for trying to postpone my sons wedding?,"My son (23) and I (F47) have always been very close. About 3 years ago, me and my family went to a new church and it was there that my son met his now wife. At the time, I thought she was really sweet and I really wanted them to get together. I was very excited and supportive. We saw them every other day for dinner. After 5 months of dating, they got engaged and I was very happy for them. They began preparing for their January wedding and my son bought a house 2 weeks after their engagement.   


  
Everything was fine, until one day, 7 weeks before the wedding. My son's fiancee came over and it was clear that they were fighting. They went to our family room where they proceeded to sit in silence while I made dinner. I served dinner, and they were both not talkative. My son's fiancee didn't even talk to me! Shortly after dinner, they left with only a few short exchanges of conversation. I was furious. Me and my husband told our son that she was never allowed in our home again because she disrespected me. After a few days, we agreed to meet with them, and I made it clear to her that she couldn't behave like that in my house. I expressed that she hadn't been raised right if she wasn't even going to talk to me in my own house and that we didn't raise my son like that. I expected this to fix things, but it got worse. My son's fiancee was often upset ever since and acted like she didn't want to be there.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

3 weeks before their wedding, they changed church pews under the pretense that ""they wanted to have their own row because they were getting married."" I felt so abandoned, because I my son told me he'd sit with me at church forever since he was family. He then moved out completely, and he didn't want to come over as much. I didn't know what to do, so I texted him and told him that I wouldn't pay for/host the wedding rehearsal. He said that he wanted us there, but I didn't believe him. My son came over the next day and I told him exactly how I felt. I told him his fiancee was a changed girl since she got a ring on her finger.  I tried to show him that she was manipulating, they were unhappy, and should postpone the wedding for his own good.   


  
After he pulled even further, we went to our son's house one night to talk to him. My husband begged my son to let me light the unity candle at the wedding, or else it would destroy me. My son told me he wouldn't replace me. 2 days later, I got a text from my son saying that that I couldn't light the candle since I did not support the marriage. Instead, he was going to have his MIL light both of them. I was heartbroken, so I just stopped responding to his texts and calls. I went to the wedding to show my son I supported him, but we did not talk to him or his new wife. To this day, he still believes he made the right call in banning me from the candle, even though he knew it would destroy me. I don't want to talk to him until he apologizes for picking a new mom. AITA for this?",AmItheAsshole
 for taking a work call on a Monday afternoon?,"AITA for taking a work call on a Monday afternoon?

My (42F) girlfriend Mary (41F) and I have been dating for 3 years. At first Mary seemed really fun and spontaneous and we would just laugh and have the best time when we hung out and went on dates. My family was really happy for me since I hadn't really dated anyone in a while.

As things got more serious Mary started to complain about my work schedule. She didn't like that on Wednesday evenings I had to drive about an hour away to attend client meetings for a project I'm leading. Mary's work schedule is 7am to 3pm and she seems to expect me to be free after 3pm since she is and would complain about me having ""messed up priorities"". My work schedule is closer to banker's hours (8am to 5pm) with the previously mentioned weekly client meetings. Note: I am not a work-a-holic and don't prioritize work above anything else but like most people I am trying to retain my job so I can continue to pay bills.  
Last weekend I went to stay with Mary (she lives about an hour away) and we had a really good time. I stayed through Monday and worked remotely from Mary's place that day. That afternoon, I got an unexpected meeting invite for a project progress call later that afternoon. It was important and we didn't have anything going on so I took the call and thought nothing of it. Then, as I was leaving Mary's to go back to my place, Mary announced that she wouldn't talk to me the next day because I had taken the afternoon work call. I didn't know what to say and she just shut down and wouldn't talk to me so I went home. I am really confused as to why this was such a big deal. Mary is still mad at me over this and told me today (Wednesday) that ""if I take your call while I'm still mad at you for working then I am condoning your bad behavior"".  
Am I the A-Hole for taking the work call? Would you consider this ""bad behavior""?",AmItheAsshole
 for bailing on a catch up with a friend who changed the plans,"I use to live on the west coast, made a friend from work &amp; through that met their partner who is lovely. I got a transfer in the same company to the east coast 9 years ago. I've seen my friend about 5 times since, 2 of which with the wife too. Anyway my friend is in the east coast for a 3 week temp role &amp; his wife came too. He reached out to catch up for lunch &amp; I picked a place close to his hotel as they don't have a car though it's about a 75 minute drive for me. He msg the day before the catch up &amp; said he's got to work now and mostly likely won't make it but his wife is still keen. 
She's nice but we've never hanged out just the two of us, it's always been a group setting. So I made an excuse and bailed. I would be driving for 2 &amp; half hrs return journey to not even see my friend. I'm pretty sure he knows my excuse was a lie too, but he changed the plans. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving for a trip to Jamaica on my BFs birthday?,"I’m female 25 and my bf is male 30.   


I was asked to be a filler for a ticket that was already bought. I have never been on an actual vacation out of the U.S. and only done one beach trip when I was a teenager.   


This ticket was for another family member who was able to get off work when the tickets were bought (months ago) but now the family member had lay offs at work and doesn’t know if they will be able to get off for the trip in June. 



Since the tickets are none refundable I was asked if I would like to go in the family member place if they couldn’t make it. I agreed.   


The departure date is the same day as my Bfs birthday. He freaked out when he found out and said his ex always did stuff with Her family on the days he found important and ruined his (their) vacations. 



We already compromised on this and where planning a trip to Orlando just the two of us at the end of May. I never once said to him I was not going to celebrate his birthday and was actually planning on doing things already, I was definitely going to celebrate it before I left no matter what day we both had off from work. but me saying it’s not about the day that matters, it’s about who you spend that day with, who is with you on ur big day, didn’t sit well with him.



 He broke up with me because i refused to say no to going…. When I was not even going technically, it was still up in the air. The family member still has first dibs if they can get off work.

 Am I the asshole on this situation? 

Should I have said no to the trip since I would be missing his birthday?",AmItheAsshole
 for telling off a strangers kids,"Hello all. Just looking for some outside perspective.

A friend and myself (F34) went to a video game arcade a few days back for a day of nerdy childish fun.

There were plenty of kids around, which of course there was. No issue there. Until we started hearing unholy screaming coming out of a zombie game. And I’m talking too of lungs, screaming. Not “whooooo” I’m excited screaming but the sound of someone just making the loudest noise they can. And it was a lot. Lots of people kept going over to investigate but backing off. Just staring and not saying anything.

Now this was annoying af but I tried to ignore it.

Until it kept going on. For at least 10 minutes. It was clear 1) this was on purpose and 2) no one was gonna do anything about it. Certainly no parents. You could hear this above 70 arcade machines and various people.

I finally snapped. Went right up to the game, yanked the curtain aside and there were two boys I’d say about 11-13?. I didn’t raise my voice I just went “You two. Stop that. Right. Now. Are we clear?” They nodded and I left. No further screams the rest of the day.

I mentioned this to a friend in a convo about people not knowing how to act in public these days as an example and they said I was an asshole for doing that. That I wasn’t their parent and have no right to tell off a strangers kids. 

My argument is there where countless signs that all children needed to be supervised and clearly that wasn’t happening and the people working there are probably worried about blowback from parents for getting involved, my job couldn’t be threatened 🤷🏻‍♀️. And this was not only upsetting myself but there were plenty of worried people milling around. 

We can’t seem to agree so I thought I’d leave it in your judgement.",AmItheAsshole
 for being pissed because my mom makes me feel like I can't be a kid? ,"I (16F) have been very upset with my mother (34F) as of late. I have 3 younger siblings (15F, 10F, and 8M) and one on the way. For context I've been working since I was 14. I tutor four times a week and I reply to inquiries regarding houses (I answer simple questions like how much, location, stuff like that) and I earn 120-200 dollars a month (that's a lot from where I'm from) so that I can pay for the things I need and school, my transpo, my food, and I help my mom out whenever she asks for some. 
My mom is 7 months pregnant, she works while my dad stays at home (he quit his job months ago) my mom has been struggling with money lately, and she's been asking me to help her out at her job, I would but I'm still in school and my schedule is already busy enough as it is. But she makes me feel so guilty, idk... She always says ""you're the only one I can rely on here"" And so I'm trying to find more tutoring gigs during weekends. But I am exhausted, I'm an honor student and I try to maintain that while doing everything else. My sister (15F) isn't any help either, and I'm not mad at her or anything because I know we're just kids but I feel like it's so unfair that I'm the only one helping out so much. And my dad is utterly fucking useless. 
I'm annoyed and pissed off because earlier my mom was crying and she told me to stop being a kid and just enjoy my life later. This family is unbelievable. I feel physically, mentally, and emotionally so tired. ",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to uninvite a group of friends to my birthday,"For context, I am not the type to really want to celebrate my birthday at all, let alone extravagantly.

This past year, I joined a new gym and quickly realised how cliquey it truly was between a few members, especially in particular sessions when both groups would tend to show up. I myself, have no issues with anyone since this has been going on since way before I joined and none of them have done anything wrong to me personally. All have welcomed me with opened arms, though I would say I’m slightly closer to one group (Jane and Julie) as we usually commute to and from the gym together. With the other group, we actually have banter and is just nice to constantly have a laugh. 

This year, I’ve decided to head into London for a night out to celebrate and originally just wanted my close friends from school. However, thought it’d be nice to invite more people as I have finally started coming out of my shell again (I also know mixing groups can sometimes be awkward). When I mentioned this to Jane and Julie, I told them I was opening the invite to everyone at the gym. Jane in particular, said she didn’t want to go anymore and made it clear it was because the other group going (as Julie was busy my bday weekend and Jane didn’t want to end up alone). I said I didn’t want to be put in the middle but they told me I’ve pretty much sided with the other group. I personally feel that it was selfish of her to even say that to begin with and would have much rathered a “don’t think I’ll be able to make it but let’s do a bday dinner when your free”, just so that it was more about the celebrant rather than her personal issues with other people. Or at least that’s what I would’ve done, situation reversed.

This has now made me not want to celebrate my birthday at all as I don’t want it to be awkward at the gym. I’ve finally found a place I truly feel comfortable to work on myself but I hate that it’s come down to this. 

WIBTA if I uninvited my gym friends and just wanted my actual friends I have known since childhood?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to uninvite my boyfriend from a group holiday just because he works with my friend? ,"My friend “Lori” works at the same company as my boyfriend “Max” (we met at her company Christmas party). I am planning a big group holiday in July, and I invited 9 people, including both Max and Lori. Lori and I share a friend group so everyone who is going is a mutual friend of ours. 

Lori has asked that I not invite Max on the holiday, because she says it’s weird to have someone who works with her on holiday with her. She said she doesn’t want him to see her partying/drinking etc., considering he holds a very high up position in the company. 

She and Max don’t work in the same department, so it’s not like his opinion of her is going to affect her work (not that he would care about her partying anyway, he isn’t like that), so I said I’m not going to uninvite him. Lori said this is unfair, and I should care more about her comfort than bringing Max, especially since everyone going is her friend, too, and I’m basically excluding her. 

The friend group is split on whether I should try and find a compromise with her. I think she’s overreacting. AITA? ",AmItheAsshole
 for snapping at a disabled person?,"Hey all.

I (17F) am in a theatre class with two girls, Emily (18F) and Ruby (17F). 

Emily and I have been friendly since middle school. We're both autistic and in a few dance classes together, so we kinda gravitated toward each other because nobody else liked either of us. I've never found it particularly easy to get along with Emily, though.

She has a short temper and often lashes out, screaming and insulting and stomping her feet whenever something annoys her. I kinda get it, though, since I know what it's like to be overwhelmed when plans change or when sensory issues come up, so I've always been supportive of her and just smile and nod along with whatever she wants.

The other day, though, was different. Ruby and I were practicing our class monologues together, and Emily kept interrupting to yell at us that we should shut up or that our performances were bad. I knew she was probably in the middle of a meltdown, and I was used to just stepping back, smiling, and nodding when she got like this, so I didn't say much at first.

Then Emily started targeting Ruby, though. She called Ruby annoying and got in her face insulting her and yelling. I don't know what happened, but I guess that crossed some kind of line for me, because I snapped at Emily to leave us alone and go sit with the teachers if she couldn't handle being here.

Emily seemed hurt and angry (i admittedly raised my voice at her) and screamed at me that she'd never take advice from someone who ""dresses like a clown"" and ""couldn't even manage her weight"" (i'm admittedly on the fatter side).

I called her a bad person and then walked back to the black box with Ruby because we didn't want to be screamed at anymore. We told the teachers that Emily was disrupting our practice, but they scolded us for not being more accommodating of a student with disabilities and that I wouldn't get it because I'm more ""high functioning"" than Emily.

My argument is that I actually DO understand what it's like to have autistic meltdowns and be overstimulated, but that it doesn't give Emily a license to get in people's faces screaming and insulting them, and that even IF she's actually physically incapable of containing her rage when she's in that kind of state, then it's still her job to go somewhere private instead of cornering other kids for just doing their class work!

Still, though, I feel bad, especially since Emily and I have been friends for years. I'm used to her acting like this, and I've never lost my temper on her before, so why is it suddenly okay for me to do it now? Plus she IS disabled and I know meltdowns are hard, plus I know not all autistic people are the same, so she may not be able to handle things the same way I do.

Idk, am I the asshole here?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to give an ultimatum relating to covering hotel costs for a financially unstable/irresponsible friend for an upcoming holiday?,"Towards the end of last year, my good friend and I of several years went on about a 1.5 week trip to an international destination and we ended up having a great time.

I was initially planning on it being a solo trip as whilst I had been there twice before, I’d never explored the country on my own.

Fast forward about a month and my friend messages me asking when I was going to said country and saying that they were thinking of coming too (inviting themselves). Several weeks after that message the same airline ended up having another sale and they managed to snag themselves some tickets.

I did not have an issue with them coming along, however, a condition of them “inviting themselves” to the trip was that they were to book and pay for their own accommodation, as I had already booked my own. This was fine with them.

They managed to only save enough for in country transport and daily spending money. Feeling kinda bad for them, I ended up changing my hotel rooms to twin rooms and told them that I would cover the hotel costs so long as they paid their way for everything else, which they did.



Now to the main moral conundrum.



Between the end of last trip and March they managed to get gifted quite the sum of money. Not a massive amount, but not a small amount either.

Knowing this, when another sale came up in March to the same destination, we booked a 2 week trip in October. This time with agreement that we’d split the costs of hotels.

Up to now I’ve been witnessing them splashing their money on frivolous purchases like very expensive tech products, car mods, etc. To the point where they have next to nothing leftover for the trip itself. One would think that one would hold onto as much of that money as possible between now and the trip as they certainly would need to if their current financial situation doesn’t change.

They aren’t in the most financially stable position as they only have a casual job that before the previous trip they were working quite a few shifts for, now they don't and they don’t seem interested in picking back up shifts there.

I’ve booked twin rooms for a couple of the places we are planning on staying. I have told them that if needed I am happy to cover hotel costs again, so long as they are able to save up enough for other expenses. However, I am having my doubts that they will be able to save the money required in the time left.

I'm thinking of cancelling the hotels booked so far and rebooking for myself, giving the ultimatum that if they are able to prove that they are saving enough money, then I’ll happily rebook back to twin rooms (since I will be the one covering those costs). If they are not able to save in time and ultimately not have enough money to come, my accommodation will be at cheaper rates (since it’s booked further in advance) and I’d embark on that solo trip instead.



WIBTA for giving them this ultimatum considering they wasted their money that could have been used for the trip considering their current financial situation?",AmItheAsshole
 Bride VS Bridesmaid,"My friend FM 24 (we will call her Jessica) and I FM 26 have been friends since freshman year of high school. we have always had a great friendship. However we have had 1 falling out after sophomore year of high school, where we didn't speak for 2 years due to her moving out of state. (we of course tried to stay in touch but it was hard to, due to opposite schedules).  After high school ended she moved back and we became closer than ever. We would hangout a lot especially after i found out she only lived 15 minutes away from me. 

(Anyways... now getting to the good stuff)

Jessica got engaged last year and asked me to be a bridesmaid. I of course said yes. I saved up a lot of money (it was a little difficult especially because i didn't have a job at the time) for the dress, the shoes, accessories, etc. 

Jessica and I have had a couple of arguments recently. For example, 2 weeks ago Jessica invited me to go to a church service with her at one of her community churches that she volunteers at. I was very excited to go. However that same day of the church service one of my other friends and her friend group wanted to take me out for my birthday dinner that same day (before anyone asks yes i tried to change dates for this but with everyones work schedule and everyone being busy, that day was the only day everyone was free), so I texted Jessica and asked her when the service started and when it ended and she told me the service started at 7 pm and ended at 8 pm. I told her that sounds good because RIGHT AFTER I made plans with some other friends, BUT I will still hangout with you. I would just have to leave right at 8 pm. Jessica got MAD and told me that I was a horrible friend. I let it slide because I knew she was really stressed out because of the wedding. Jessica was suppose to pick me up at 6 pm for the church service but never did. I reached out to her and thats when she told me she didnt want me to show up. I told her I would still show up because I really wanted to spend time with her, but then she told me she would rather not see me. 

Later that night. I got a call from Jessica. She told me that she was kicking me out of the wedding because she felt that I didn't care about her and our friendship. She told me how I always make plans with other people right after we make plans, when that is simply not true. I do make plans and I always follow through with all of them. I was there for her when her and her abusive boyfriend broke up, and she needed to move back home. I was there for her when she was moving in with her (current partner/soon to be husband). I was there for her whenever she needed it. I was very upset, I had spent lots of money on everything, and I couldn't return any of it.  

She then asked me if I could give her the dress that I PAID FOR to the bridesmaid that would be taking my place, and that she would pay me $100 for it (the dress and everything total costs around $300) I told her no and I hung up the phone.",AmItheAsshole
 for backing out of being a bridesmaid a month before the wedding?,"I (F27) was supposed to be a bridesmaid next month for my old roommate Natalie (F26). We lived together for 2 1/2 years up until I married my husband (M31) last year. We became very close to me and my husband and was a huge part of making our wedding so special..Right after we got married she started dating Mark (M25). He was clingy but he seemed sweet and treated her like a queen. Overtime he distanced her from all her friends and none of us saw her anymore.

She and I had a trip planned to Cabo and 3 months before I thought it’d be nice to open it up to our SOs so they wouldn’t feel left out. She had only been dating Mark 4 months but they seemed serious. (They ended up getting engaged 2 two weeks before our trip).I hadn’t seen Natalie in months and I kept asking if we could have some 1:1 time, not a whole day but just 1-2 hours. She kept avoiding the subject and my husband decided to reach out to Mark to plan a guys night, so Natalie and I could also have time. I hadn’t asked him to do that but he saw how stressed I was and he also wanted to get to know Mark better. Mark said no and that he “only wanted to be with his fiance during our trip.” I was really upset and after a lot of back and forth Natalie asked me to apologize to Mark for “not getting his help to plan the trip.” I was so confused how this was the root of the issue since there was nothing to plan. All we did was book a hotel but I wanted to resolve things so I sent a text apologizing (that she approved). His response back was so hurtful saying I was being manipulative and making him look bad by running to Natalie behind his back. All I was trying to do was plan a single meal or drinks with my friend on a 5 day vacation. My husband ended up sending a text to mark being more direct and clarifying the situation. Mark lost it and canceled their reservations. 

It’s been 5 months and I kept trying to make plans with Natalie. She still wanted me to be a bridesmaid and I got a dress (which she approved). We finally saw each other for the first time two weeks ago and while it was awkward at times it was still fun. A week later she sent me a text that they are no longer inviting my husband to the wedding but she still wanted me in the wedding. I was furious. The wedding is 5 weeks away. I backed out and said I’m sticking with my husband. While she was a good friend to me at times this last year she has been MIA and I was 100% going to pick my husband over her. While I appreciate she’s doing something similar by sticking with her fiance I am just so confused how she thought it was normal to not invite my SO (to a 200+ wedding). It just felt like Mark was trying to make a statement by excluding my husband. Everyone in my life is on my side but Natalie won’t stop texting me and saying how she isn’t trying to end a friendship over this but that I am being hurtful. So, am I the asshole here?",AmItheAsshole
 For Calling my Mother's dead friend a Dead Junkie,"Ok so let's start I am 17 and still live with my mother

and for context, my mother's friend died around 4 years ago from a fentanyl overdose 

Her dog was given to her sister but sometimes my mother takes care of the dog

you see the issue is that I am allergic to dogs 

 I hated my mum's friend because of the events that happened after her death

 a month before she died my father passed away and I was still in shock from his death

My mother was emotionally distant after her friend died When I needed attention and help the most

which had caused me to resent the friend.

Now we get to today when My mother bought that dog over 

I Haf Completely burst because I was very stressed about things 

and screamed at my mother JUST BECAUSE SOME JUNKIE DIED DOESNT MEAN YOU HAVE A REASON TO BRING THAT DOG OVER 

And my mother just yelled at me and threatened me 

am I in the wrong",AmItheAsshole
 for getting pissed about my boyfriend constantly watching YouTube shorts?,"Okay so. I am 18F and my boyfriend is 21M. He is living with me and I’m happy about it, but there’s a big problem.

My boyfriend watches videos *constantly* without headphones. He scrolls mindlessly through YouTube shorts at all hours and it frustrates me, because he doesn’t use his Bluetooth headphones. It’s even worse when I am trying to sleep, and the sounds come sporadically.

I get overstimulated and overwhelmed very easily, especially with audio. He watches these videos all the time without his headphones, and even when he wears headphones I can hear it because he watches videos on such high volume. I have asked him to wear his headphones when we’re sitting together, but he will pout and complain. It infuriates me. 

It’s bad when he watches them at night, because the blue light from his screen as well as the blinking light on his headphones keeps me awake. I struggle to sleep at the best of times, and it’s difficult especially because I like to cuddle.

I’m fine with him doing what he wants to do, but it affects me too. He struggles with feeling like he has no control, so he tries to take his control in his own way. I just want him to stop watching these videos all the goddamn time and be a bit more understanding.

So AITA for getting mad at him for watching YouTube Shorts all the time?

Ps. He is currently sitting next to me watching his videos with his headphones on after I asked, but I can hear every word of his videos. Kill me",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to talk to my best friend about her clearly toxic relationship?,"For 7 months, my best friend, (19F), has been in an off-and-on relationship with a guy who is clearly not good for her. They've only hung out in person for probably around a total of eight hours, and every single time they do he asks her to suck him off. At first, during the beginning of the relationship, I, (19F), thought this was fine because she told me they had a long discussion about what they want for their future. They both came to the conclusion they want serious, long-term relationships but also want to have fun.

Things were going fine at first before he began leading her on to get a blowjob. Any other time she asked to hang out, he was always busy. I started to get a feeling that the whole talk they had was just so he could get in her pants, and voiced my concerns when she started to get upset about their lack of communication. When I told her my thoughts, she told me that she knows him, that he's just busy, and that they talked about what they’re looking for in the relationship.

Things didn't end well, needless to say, and months later after many FT calls of her sobbing to me about this guy saying he didn't want a relationship at the moment, and me comforting her for weeks on end, the relationship seemed to die out. That was until a couple of months ago when she told me he started to snap her again and asked to be FWB. I told her that it was a bad idea, that no one who knew this guy or heard her talk about him liked him, and that he was just going to use her. She told me she'd be fine and wanted to be FWB for her, not for him. I knew that she still had feelings for him, but told myself if it was what she wanted, then it should be fine.

Soon after their situation began, I found out she was sending him nudes. I told her that he was definitely showing his friends or sending the pictures around, but she insisted that he wasn’t that kind of person and that his friends wouldn't want to see nudes as they were super religious. I once again said okay with a warning, but continued to listen to her talk about him and support her nonetheless.

A month or so after this situation started, she got upset over him again, finding out he'd been talking to other girls and commenting on their insta posts when they had said they wouldn't be seeing other people. And so it began all over again. She was super upset and called me on the phone crying over him or angry. I told her that he's not good for her and I kept saying she needed to listen to me because he was going to keep hurting her and is an awful person. 

However, just last week when I thought things were over, she claimed she's in love with him and isn't ready to let go yet and continues to meet up with him for things and send pictures. Because of this, I told her that next time he hurts her, she can't come crying to me.

I love this girl, but I can't keep listening to her cry about it when I've told her thousands of times he's bad for her.

AITA for telling her not to talk to me about it anymore?",AmItheAsshole
 for believing I should have been chosen as head captain,"For one im in color guard and auditioned for a captain position. So recently our leadership audition results have come out. I auditioned to be a captain on my team and was really hoping for head captain. 

The girl that got it I am very happy for but I don't think she deserved it. FYI we do two seasons a year one in fall and one in winter.  In fall we have 1 big team and in winter it is divided into 2 a jv and varsity. For context she has only done 2 seasons and was on jv. Because of this she was offered to audition for jv leadership and got it. 

But now we have both auditioned for fall. She ended up getting head captain. But I believe I should have gotten it. This is because I have done 4 seasons, was on varsity, spin all pieces of equipment, and I am in the required winter class. Meanwhile she was on jv, doesn't spin Sabre and is not in the class. 

Not only that but most of our team keeps telling me it should have been me. I honestly don't know why they picked her other than she has leadership experience, but I didn't have that opportunity because I was on varsity. 

Not only do I spin Sabre but I also spin the other pieces of equipment and at a higher level than her. I ended up getting co-captain and I am happy for her because she is my friend but I still feel like it should have been me instead. 

Should I ask my director why I wasn't picked or just keep on doing what I normally do knowing I'm doing better than her. I'm not trying to be mean it's just I've put so much work in to be overlooked and I'm just disappointed. So AITA.",AmItheAsshole
H for not reaching out to my best friend until I get a real apology?,"First time poster here. Bare with me, formatting is hard on mobile

I(21F) recently started streaming videogames as a ""pretty"" woman that likes to dress up and do makeup for each stream. All of my friends have been supportive especially my friend (20f, let's call her Sam). One stream I had a viewer who encouraged me to do shots, called me pretty throughout my stream &amp; helped me get to affiliate on twitch (where I can monetize my account).

My friends were concerned about the way he spoke but they all supported &amp; trusted me. I told them that their concerns were valid &amp; I did actually report him for botting my account the next day(creating fake followers to boost it) once I realized he had. However, he also offered me $1000 for a call that same night and I said no. Later he offered me $3000 for a 15 min call with no nudity. All my friends said secure the bag but Sam got really offended that I was even considering it.

She kept questioning why I would consider it, telling me she didn't think that was the point of my streams, asking if I was going to start selling nudes, &amp; saying selling my body seems like the whole point of my streams. She even said ""There’s definitely a difference between taking advantage of simps that happen to go into your stream and then specifically playing it up and selling your body"" which really upset me and all I said was ""lol"" in response which upset her even more; she felt I was dismissing her opinion. I told her she really upset me because she knows my history with men is bad &amp; that I felt I was in a place to set boundaries and maintain them. Her response was,

""Im sorry I wasn't trying to hurt you my words definitely came out harsher than I intended. I knew you were planning to take advantage of any potential creeps, but it just feels different when you’re actively engaging with them and giving them what they want even if it is for your own personal gain. I'm not very comfortable with the idea of it right now because it's still very new and i am worried about all the things that could potentially go wrong. I know that you are an adult that is capable of setting boundaries and blocking people but I am still nervous anyways. I am having a hard time expressing that without worrying that you will take it as an attack on your abilities to handle these types of situations, but its really the kind of worry that i cant make go away even if everything is going right. But besides all of that I am sorry i hurt you, and this is the best way i can put my thoughts into text""

I explained that I need friends that will support me &amp; the decisions I make and that her ""concern"" felt like judgement &amp; hypocrisy considering we are similar with men just with different motives. The conversation didn't move forward from there, eventually I just told her I was going to bed. We haven't talked to each other since (April 8th). Everyone I've talked to said that I shouldn't be the one to reach out to her &amp; I should just wait for her to but I don't even know. This whole situation feels wrong so I just want to know, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for calling my parents' plan stupid?,"I (17m) have a sister (one month away from 15) who recently had 3 of her good friends die. She was very energetic and, to be honest, rather ""girly"" before that. Now she's stopped styling her hair (something she spent a lot of time and effort doing once), she does the bare minimum bathing and grooming, and wears the same few hoodies and sweatpants. More strangely, she's been going at cardboard boxes with a knife until they look like the product of an angry animal. She's also been drawing herself hanging out and doing activities with these two characters I've never heard of: Sunny from Omori and Kris from Deltarune (if anyone has knowledge, appreciated)

Our parents want to ""incentivize"" her to go back to her old self. They talked about removing the non-pink and white girl stuff from her closet while she's showering and redecorating her room while she's at a cheer practice(which they haven't let her quit after she asked) to try and ""get her into the correct headspace""

I straight up laughed and called that the dumbest idea I ever heard. They ignored me at first, but I continued and said that I will not let them live their failure down.

They said if they wanted my thoughts, they'd ask. Things got heated, and I said that with them, there's no wonder she's miserable.

They've begun to give me the silent treatment. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 Taking Advice And Responding Negatively ,"AITA Taking Advice And Responding Negatively 

18M This is not a specific situation just a pattern in my own behavior I have noticed and disliked. Whenever someone explains something to me and I already know it or understand I will become irritated and feel insulted. I’ll usually respond with I know in a condescending tone or something of that nature. I often do this to friends and family whenever they explain something to the point that they brought it to my attention. On one occasion I berated my friend about being stupid thinking I didn’t understand what he was trying to tell me ( which I realize makes me look stupid). I also do this to my other family members. I’m being to think that I’m the problem and not them. (As if I didn’t realize) the text in brackets is an example of something I would think to myself. This has caused me to unintentionally alienate myself from some of my friends and my sister in particular. but I’m looking to change and wonder if I have to big of an ego or something. Any advice?",AmItheAsshole
 For excluding a classmate?,"I (15F) am in a very small catholic school, only around 100 students. My class has 7 students and we’re all very close friends except for one kid, Conner (14M). He joined our school just this year. I will admit, the second he stepped into the classroom on the first day, I had a bad feeling in my stomach, and I always trust my gut, so I might be a little biased. 

The six of us, who I’ll just refer to as “my group,” have been friends since elementary school, but we did our best to make Conner feel as welcome as possible. 

For context, our group has two trios. Conner gravitated more towards mine - he sat with us at lunch, hung with us at recess, just spent time with us. The two others in my trio are kind of innocent and don’t feel comfortable with inappropriate/sexual jokes. Although we made this clear to set boundaries, Conner still made some. He was borderline harassing myself and the other girl in my trio. Then, he crossed a line. 

One day, we were at lunch, and Conner told my guy best friend “You look like Shrek because you have the extra layers.” I didn’t hear it, but the other girl in my trio did, and she pulled me into the bathroom to talk to me about it. Once I’d heard what he did, I was fuming. 

I immediately marched up to Conner and said, “No one speaks to my friends like that. If you want to disrespect us, you can leave.” He played the victim of course, but from then on, I avoided and ignored him. 
We told the our other three friends, and they distanced themselves from Conner. 

That all happened in September. It is now April. No one likes to interact with him, including the grade below us, because along the school year, he’s done and said other hurtful things. 

I feel bad, however, because he seems to have had a bad childhood. He lives with his grandparents and has mentioned other things that aren’t my place to talk about, but they weren’t good. 

I’ve tried to bring myself to apologize for ignoring him and the like, but my gut feeling won’t let me. Another thing: he is friends with other boys that sexually harass and bully the girls in their class, along with others, and I’ll be honest, I hate them too. 

I feel bad for not including him in literally anything and not speaking to him, but I feel like he’ll say something or do something to hurt my friends again if I accept him into our group. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for not taking insult to my daughter involving her mothers ex in her life?,"Complicated backstory so you’ll have to excuse any grammatical errors or if it’s confusing.
 
When I was 25 I got my then girlfriend “Linda” who was 30 at that time pregnant - we had a daughter, “Cleo” and a year later we were expecting our son which is when we broke up.

3 years after breaking up Linda started dating her ex girlfriend “Sam” who at that time was like, I want to say say 18? Sam was the go between for me and Linda, Linda didn’t want to speak to me and quite frankly I felt the same. But I can admit now it wasn’t fair on Sam, Sam had this massive ideal on parenting - she’s a child psychologist now so maybe she had a point, she was soft and warm: which Linda openly admits she fed off, Linda has this habit of attaching herself to others and becoming dependent on them.

I had depression, Linda worked a lot - I can just openly admit neither of us were ready to be parents and Sam took the brunt of it.

But I guess life has its way because 20 years later at our daughters 23rd birthday me and Linda rekindled and we’ve been married for 2 years, well our daughter is pregnant and she’s been heavily relying on Sam. Linda has issue with this.

I spoke to my daughter openly and said whilst I wasn’t a good dad I’m trying to change, and if she needs Sam I’ll support her, however I am trying to change and hope to be her support system. Well, Linda has been bugging and isn’t talking to me claiming I’m trying to back out again and that she signed off rights to her and Sams children (10, 12) because that was my boundary and now I’m not supporting her boundary. I said she agreed to that before we even got back together, she didn’t ask me this before we got back together.

AITA?",AmItheAsshole
H: If I don’t attend my BF’s sister’s birthday because i don’t want to pay $400 to sleep on a couch?,"Like i said, she’s planning a trip 3 hours away to stay at a cabin resort. They planned this very very last minute and just told my BF and I yesterday that it would cost around $400 for the two of us. We’re both college students so $5-600(total cost of trip) is A LOT to save up in 1 and 1/2 weeks.

In total, the cabin resort costs ~$1200. They charge PER PERSON. There are 9 of us total. His sister, her husband and their three kids. My Bf and I, and my Bf’s parents.

That already raised some red flags. Why are we paying $400 for two people, and they’re paying $400 for 5 people? Math isn’t adding up but I let it slide because it’s her birthday so whatever.

But then they showed us the cabin:
1 Queen sized bedroom
1 Bedroom with 2 bunk beds(4 beds total)
1 couch.

His sister and her husband are sharing the Queen bed, which means the kids, his parents, and us would share the room with twin bunk beds. NO THANK YOU. Fuck that. Absolutely fucking not. 

The other cabin option they gave us:
1 Queen Bed,
2 Twin Beds
2 Bunk Beds
1 Couch.

They get Queen bed, parents get twin beds and we get to choose between sleeping with 3 toddlers or on a couch. Again, Fuck that, no thank you.

3rd cabin option had the queen bed(her and her husband), 1 bunk bed(kids), and another room with a queen bed(his parents)with a ladder leading to two twin beds above it.(us)

Although that sounds like a MUCH better option (its $100 cheaper) than the two originally proposed, i still don’t understand or see the logic in all of us paying the exact same price to be sleeping in unfair sleep arrangements. Plus his parents are light sleepers and easily irritated by noise and talking at night so it would be awkward for us to sleep above them.

Not to mention the fact that i’m not even interested in going to the resort beyond hanging out with them. It’s mostly kid themed. So the 3 hour drive plus the costs, plus the sleeping arrangement is throwing me off.

Even if we stayed at a hotel and paid for park entrance and parking, it’s only $30-50 cheaper. Not really worth it. And my BF thinks theres no point in going if we’re not going to get the full experience. Plus, if we don’t go, his parents would have to pay $600 instead to cover the costs.

My BF still really wants to go and won’t go unless I do. So i feel guilty and pressured. WIBTAH if I don’t go? 

I had to cut out a lot due to word count so ask away if you have questions for additional information.",AmItheAsshole
 For Telling My Friend This Advice?,"A while back one of my friends tried asking another friend if they had any topics or boundaries to avoid bringing up in conversation with them because he didn’t want to hurt their friendship and he was told the friend didn’t have any topics or boundaries as I was told by my friend, he said he didn’t have either himself. They both agreed if a boundary or topic was crossed they didn’t want to discuss to let each other know. Friend asked his friend what friend thought of figure photography which is the same as figure drawing and friend said they had no opinion, when he was asked his opinion he told me he said no opinion just that it’s a tricky art to do because it requires a lot of trust in both artist and one modeling. Friends friend told him if he wanted friend could ask if any they knew wanted to try it and he politely said nah it’s more trouble than anything because people might not see it as art. The next day my friend got a text from that friend saying the discussion they had day prior made the friend uncomfortable with uncomfortable typed in caps locks and asked to never bring it up again, my friend replied he wouldn’t bring it up again and apologized but got no response. Later he saw the friend and tried apologizing in person but instead got told in a calm voice “not the time” followed by an even more angrier tone “NOT THE TIME!!!” Apparently he saw friend collecting their trash barrels and thought they could spare one minute so he could apologize but it sounds to me it went unheard. My friend immediately backed off and according to my friend they haven’t talked since September of last year. I told him he did the right thing by apologizing both in text and in person but the other person shouldn’t have snapped at him way they did and instead said, “I got your apology but I need some space away from you right now please.” When friend came to me for advice I said just keep his distance. Am I The Asshole though for saying for additional advice that he needs to now just stay away from the person because if his apology is going to go not acknowledged then don’t acknowledge that person again because a true person would acknowledge that he apologized and ask for space but not be so aggressive towards him.",AmItheAsshole
 for not being OK with my boyfriend backing out of giving me a ride to the airport last minute?,"My boyfriend is a frequent traveler and vacationer, and per his request I drive him to the airport often. The airport is 30 min to 1 hour from where we live, which is a while out. I work in medicine and work around 50-60 hours a week, and he works around 1-2 hours a day at home as a software engineer. He has asked me last minute to take to him to the airport before while I was in the middle of working early in the morning. I felt bad for him so I took him, but it was challenging as I was really risking it while doing that in the midst of my busy schedule. I don’t have time to vacation very much, but he goes on vacation probably every other month.

For the first time in forever, I am finally going on vacation. I booked the flight three months prior and am headed out this week. My boyfriend promised that he would take me to the airport several times throughout this past month for this trip. He said he was excited to finally drive me to the airport.

Time comes around for my flight, it’s 2 days out from now. Yesterday he told me he has an appointment at 10 AM, which he says he really doesn’t want to miss and will get a $79 fee if he misses. My flight is at 1PM, so he originally planned to take me there at 10AM. I asked him if he could just drop me off at the airport earlier at 8AM because I have to do work too online on patient charting related items before I take off for my flight. He said no, because he’s too tired in the morning and he really doesn’t want to risk missing his appointment. I told him if he drops me off early he won’t miss his appointment. He said I can just take the rail, and what difference does it make if I work on the rail while heading to the airport vs me getting a ride with him. I won’t have signal on the rail and I’m just very stacked w a lot of work with my patients that needs to be shaped away before I go.

I told him this hurts my feelings because I drove him to the airport early in the morning, even while I had work and have so much on my plate. I started crying because I was so shocked that he did such a 180 and I’m so overwhelmed right now with work, as well as he didn’t seem to care, and he said “well you hurt my feelings too”.

I feel so hurt and angry that he wouldn’t return the favor after he promised this, and I mentioned how it didn’t feel fair with all the times I drove him to the airport. He said I was manipulating him and guilt tripping him, and that he will NOT be driving me to the airport no matter what and this is his boundary.

AITA, or is he?",AmItheAsshole
? For not letting my ex see his child?,"Theres a lot to this story many parts could be needed involving more people and more drama but I’m going to try get to the point. A few years ago I met a man we will call him Jim he seemed lovely man we went on dates got together everything was normal. He had told me stories about his child being deceased from a heart condition he has ( Aortic valve stenosis) Jim has his condition as well . 


A short while being with him in the middle of the night his daughter from a previous relationship had passed on due to this condition it was heartbreaking to watch him suffer he got a phone call telling him I was asleep .for context his children was in england. I fell pregnant a while after this and we was happy… fast forward some time later we had social socials over a neighbour  asking false accusations  which made them dig up histories. 

They was fine with me but not Jim they felt there wasn’t something right! They was CORECT!!  Jim had lied about his kids being deceased, when I found this out after my daughter was born I left him there is a lot more too it with his behaviour making fake Tiners of me and the blaming me just for argument and attention and many more but that was enough for me to leave. He made several threats and harassed me for ages and my family. 

I had to jump through hoops for social after because of him and even had my kids taken for 3 months as him and his so called sister ( who pretended to be my friend through all this) made accusations anonymously about me and the kids so he could get her and they believed them. When I got my children back because Social realised it was all lies my son was okay he was just glad to be home my daughter though was clung to me she has serious attachments issues and is all about mummy. 

Jim was on dating websites telling girls our daughter had passed on I received messages from them. He has since got with another woman had more children and now is demanding to see her 5 years later there is a lot more things put there is literally so much I feel like this would set my daughter back and he always is harassing me and making out I’m the bad one he even went as far to make a fake headstone with his sons name on it I have a picture so with this information alone guys AITA????

P.S he did bring this matter to a court a few years ago and they denied him contact at that time he currently trying to bring it back up again so this is pending … also after being harassed for 2 years I tried to let him have contact through FaceTime and  let him know about her life and the next morning when I wasn’t awake by 7 am because she was unwell so we both slept in I had 60 miss calls and he rang social and made more lies as I didn’t pick  the phone when he wanted to talk to her. So I stopped after that.",AmItheAsshole
 For not apologizing (even after I tried) to my dad?,"I’m 17 years old in grade 12. I live with my 2 older brothers (20 and 23M) and my mother and father. My dad doesn’t talk to us much, and I think the last time he said good night or good morning to me was maybe 6-10 years ago. He never really has or showed any affection, and I hate to say it but my mom has essentially raised us 3 my whole life and done a real good job at it. 

Recently, my close friend got really lucky in the crypto market and ended up cleaning 100-200k give or take so for spring break he ended up taking 2 of us on a trip to Miami for our last spring break in high school (March 13-17) and dropping about 30-45k on the trip. I told my parents about it and my mom said she didn’t really support it but she understood is was my last spring break and a free trip and she essentially just said update me and be safe and make sure you talk to dad about it before you go. So 2ish maybe 3 weeks before I tried talking to my dad about it and he said no understandably but I kind of told him I’m sorry I might go anyways it’s paid for etc.

 I ended up going, and ever since I got back he hasn’t talked to my mom other than one or two word texts, and hasn’t texted, looked at me, or acknowledged me at all. My mom never really said I could go either but we’re on good terms now and she recognizes and understands that what’s done is done and we have to move on in life and kids are going to be young and dumb etc. I went to my dads mother (grandmas) house today hoping to just have a happy visit like usual as today is one of the only days I don’t work and am not busy and instead of it being a normal visit she blew up on me saying how I completely disrespected him and how we all paint my dad to be this bad guy and how I have to apologize. Thing is I have tried to apologize I’ve tried to start conversations I’ve tried to help him with shit and he just still never acknowledges me after and it’s been a month and I don’t think anything is going to change really me and my mom don’t know how long this is going to be dragged on and I feel like he’ll regret not spending this time with me when I move out in time. I’m even looking into student loans with my mom as we think he might go as far to not even pay or help me with my schooling now anymore and my mom can’t take money out of the savings account because he’ll blow up and get mad. Am I the asshole here? Also just wanted to vent.",AmItheAsshole
 for saying my best friends club was stupid?,"So preface this with i have no thing against video games, i'd definitely consider myself a video game guy.

Anyways today i found out for the first time my friend was in a club while she was talking about it and i was happy for her because she has some issues socializing sometimes. So i asked ""What's the club?"" and she told me ""the video game club"" and in response i said ""Oh so do you just like play video games and talk about them?"" and then she says ""no we just play games"". This was where i stopped for a second because i knew she played games but from what i knew they were all single player and on her phone so i asked ""haha you just sit there playing games?"" and then she said ""yeah we just sit and play""

after this i asked more and more questions and figured out everyday on tuesdays wednesdays and thursday she'd stay an hour after school to not sit in a classroom but in the HALLWAY on the FLOOR. And they would sit together and play single player mobile games in SILENCE. i was obviously surprised so i said ""that's stupid"" and now she's mad at me because i called her ""passion"" stupid. AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for arguing with my roommate over our friend group?,"  
My roommate (18M) and I (18M) didn't click when I first moved in. We were very independent people, he had his own friends, and I was starting to make mine. I don't know exactly when we started to become friends, it just seemed like we went from nothing to best friends overnight. We have our own small little friend group now and I love all of them dearly. However, recently, my roommate started spending a lot of time with our friends without me. I got upset and pushed him away which made him spend even more time with him. It went from things being okay to all of a sudden falling apart. Then he snapped at me over text. I went out late with a friend and he sent me probably one of the longest texts I've ever read about why I NEED to check in with him and why me going out like that wasn't okay. He's since apologized and I know he was just worried but some of what he said freaked me out. Since then though it hasn't been getting better. We started to repair our relationship once or twice but then he would disappear again. He's said nice things to me and apologized but then I don't see him, and his actions aren't changing.  He knows I'm upset because I feel left out but isn't doing anything to change that. I feel like my emotions are justified but when I told my parents about what was going on, my dad seemed to think that I was in the wrong. I know maybe I could've handled things better but it's tough going from things being picture perfect to them falling apart.  
  
   
  
TL;DR: I started an argument with my roommate because he was leaving me out of the friend group. He's apologized since but his actions aren't changing, and I feel just as hurt.",AmItheAsshole
 for telling my boyfriend that i want to walk home alone?,"For context, we’ve been dating for 2 years and 5 months now. Even though we have issues, we love and cherish each other. He(25M) loves to travel and do various activities, i(23F) am more like a home person(like netflix and chill). We are both college students (we study the same branch), + he earns 4 times more money then me. We have the same He is (at least as far as i knew) loyal, loving, and jealous man.  
2 months ago, we gave a break on us. He wanted to think. And the reason was that he wants to travel, go a theater or concert every week. But i didn’t show any extra enthusiasm for these activites. We made up after 1 week of not talking. For the first month, everything was okay and we did a lots of stuff, but the second(the last) month, we couldn’t do anything but it wasn’t because of us. We had a 9 days holiday and we both went other cities where our families live. Also we had midterms and we were busy studying.   
He has been distant for the last couple of days. I kept asking why and he kept telling me ‘ill tell you why after midterms’. The midterms are not over yet but i insisted today and he finally talked to me. He told me that he know that i'm gonna get mad but he cheated on me two times. first time was when he went back to the city where his family lives like 8 months ago. he flirted with some girl he didn't knew and kissed her on the cheek. the second was 3 weeks ago, when we both went to our hometown. he was just sitting with a 'FRIEND' and they flirted a little after talking about the her sex life(???). 

to be fair, i don't think flirting is cheating, it's just a way of refreshing confidence. but the deal is, he thinks that this is cheating. so there is 2 things i'm mad at: he did something that he thinks is 'cheating', and he kissed another girl.

so after this talk, i told him that i need to think about it but it's not the time since we have another midterm together and we need to study. so we studied with couple of friends and i left early since i was a little dizzy. but i couldn't manage to leave school because the dizziness went so bad that i couldn't walk straight so i sat somewhere in the school. it turns out that he decided to leave just a couple minutes later than me and he saw me sitting. i told him i was fine but after insisting a little, i explained my situation to him. he told me that he wants to walk me home. after 2 minutes of walking, i stopped and asked, 'why do you even want to walk me home?' and he told me that because i am dizzy but if i want to walk alone, he would let me walk alone. after a couple seconds of silence, i looked straight to his eyes, and told him 'i want to walk alone.'. 

the look on this face was inexplicable. he was in pain, sad, just about the cry. 

So, AITA for telling him i want to walk alone?",AmItheAsshole
 for posting a negative review for my former company with email screenshots ?,"I worked at a gym for around half a year on the front desk (dealing with customers and admin etc). I left the job on good terms but I found out that my manager changed my gym profile status from staff to member and had started billing me. Once I realised what was happening a few months later I contacted him and asked to be reimbursed and for my ‘membership’ to be cancelled. He refused to refund and said I can cancel by coming in and would be subject to the standard 30 day notice period for cancelling members, saying it was policy which led to a long exchange of emails and messages. I ended up leaving a negative Google review of the gym with my opinion of the manager and his dodgy business tactics, one of the main points being that he paid a company to leave positive reviews to boost his overall star rating. I have a photo of the receipt for this purchase that I took off the gym email that I had access to and I posted it. Was this too far or potentially illegal?

",AmItheAsshole
 if I blocked a guy for asking about my dead mother?,"F18, I've been talking to this guy(M22) who I met at a festival. He's located in a different city so most of our communication has been through text. While texting he disclosed that his mother had passed two years ago, I went on to divulge how I had lost my mother as well. Of his own free will, he went more in-depth given the situation was a bit complicated and sudden. For me, however, I told him how I watched my mother battle lung cancer for four years until she passed in 2020, and left it at that. I felt as though there wasn't much else to say, at least not anything worth discussing with someone I'd talked to for such a short time, and not anything to write over text as it is very heavy stuff.  
  
Fast forward to four days ago, we got into an argument, but it wasn't anything I thought couldn't be resolved. We didn't talk much the next day until he suddenly sent in a ""Heyy"" at 10 pm. As I opened his text I noticed he had pinned a message. Imagine my surprise when I saw the paragraph from when I told him about my mother's passing. I saw the message 20 minutes after he sent it, meaning he waited for me to see the pinned message along with his casual ""Heyy"". I was confused and devastated, to say the least.  
  
In tears, I asked him why he had done something like that. This boy told me that he had been gathering the courage to ask me something about the situation. He had pinned the message because he thought he would forget it. Who forgets a question related to something like that? And no he doesn't usually pin stuff. At this point I was enraged, what was there to ask, where was the etiquette in the way he approached the situation? He said he meant well but in the moment, I didn't believe him. For clarity, I asked him to tell me what the question was, maybe it would shed more light on his perspective. He wanted to ask about the process leading up to my mother's passing... Not what I went through, or how I felt about it, he wanted to know more about the process of my mother dying. and in more confusion and hurt, I asked him what he meant, and yes he wanted to know how exactly my mother died... I lost it, called him emotionally inept and immature, and even though he tried to apologize, I couldn't be eased. He continued to apologize saying he meant well while I ranted on and on. I'm not proud of it, but what was I supposed to do at that moment? Eventually, he got ""fed up"" and started playing the victim, saying that I was wrong for calling him emotionally dumb knowing how he struggles and given he meant well. Also, he doesn't have any sort of neuro-divergency, at least not anything diagnosed by the psychiatrist he saw after his mother passed. I decided to just ignore him. It's been 3 days since then and I'm contemplating blocking him. Could he have done that to hurt me? I'm struggling to see things from his perspective, could he have done this intentionally? Is silently blocking him the best option or is there any other way of going about this?",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving a party at my own house to go to sleep?,"TLDR: Been stressed and tired lately, so I left a party at my own house to go to sleep.

I (39y M) live with my wife (39y F), son (4y M), and MIL (66y F).  My business is running into problems lately, so I have been stressed and unable to sleep much.  In the last 5 days, I have probably slept maybe 20 hours.  I have been occasionally breaking out into hives lately as well which may or may not be stress related.

My wife wanted to throw a party, invite maybe 30-ish people of our mutual friends, her own friends and co-workers, and their kids.  She let me know the day before.  I was a bit annoyed with the short notice, but I have long accepted that my wife is very sociable and outgoing, so I don't argue about those sort of things.  I am more of an introvert, but I usually try my best to keep up with her.  Plus she said that if I needed to work late that night, it's okay, don't worry about anything, and she would have a plate of food ready for me when I got home.

So I got home at around 8:00 PM, and everyone was basically there.  I ate a bit, and made the rounds to visit people.  My social battery went to zero pretty quickly, and I had popped a Benadryl (instead of my usual Claritin), so I was actually getting tired.  Our house is not that big, so there were people just about everywhere.  No real place of refuge, and regardless, it would have been too loud to truly fall asleep.

I told my wife that I am tired and that I am going to sleep in my car.  I thought better of it once I got in my car, figuring that everyone would think I am weird whenever they ended up seeing me.  So I decided to drive to my other house, where my parents live, to go crash on their couch (they were at home and not in attendance at the party).  Also figured that no one would truly notice.  People outside would think I'm inside, people inside would think I'm outside, etc.  This was around 9:15 PM.

Woke up the next morning to a few missed calls from my wife, and one of our friends.  They had called between midnight and 1 AM.  Came home at like 6 AM before anyone woke up, made breakfast for everyone, got ready for work, and got my son ready for school.  My wife said that I am an AH for leaving, which embarrassed her in front of her friends, and not helping clean up afterwards.  I assume my MIL thinks the same way because she is giving me the silent treatment.  AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for throwing a temper tantrum,"I am a high highschooler and do MUNs regularly now I want to go to another one because they are fun and I had friends wanting me to go as well as teachers but the thing my parents are as I think overprotective as they don't allow me to go because of transportation and the deed of consent.

Which states ""If anything happens in the conference they are not responsible"" which is a common thing for all MUNs but my parents think that something will happen because they will not take responsibility and I have been dealing with this for a while I had debated to my teachers why the deed of consents was stated that way with long paragraphs to prove them(my parents) but they just forget when a new one comes to town.

They asked why I wasn't going with the school which I replied ""They have selected a group to go since there weren't enough spaces in the bus"" which they also got mad at the school stating ""So they just said you will not be going with us and you can go by yourself if you want it doesn't matter"" so when I was angry about the topic I went into my room and in rage hit my table with my fist and throwing some pillows and hitting my bed which obv made some noise which made my father angry in turn took away my electric guitar and amp.

So AITA for being enraged or is he the asshole for taking away my stuff. (MUN is the abv for Model United Nations which is a mockup version of the United Nations for college and high schoolers)",AmItheAsshole
 to be angry with a friend for applying for jobs against me?,"AITA for being aggravated with a friend? Im not sure where to go with my friend from here or if I'm wrong to be irked.

I've been unemployed since August. I get nothing but ghosted and run around by potential employers. One company keeps posting and reposting jobs. I've applied repeatedly for 2 jobs with them, 5 times since February. They won't even give me a ""we're going with other candidates fuck off"" email. Ive emailed them directly, messaged through indeed and called them. Nadda. 

This evening, we went out for trivia. The very first thing my friend tells me is about her application/interview with this same company I've been applying and applying to. She hadn't mentioned applying there, I know I've mentioned applying there to her. She has a job and would be taking a small pay cut for the position with the company.  This is the 2nd job I know of that we both applied for. 

I feel betrayed and angry. She knows I'm struggling in this job market, but she makes it even worse by applying to the same jobs when she doesn't need it. 

To make it worse, she sends me links/screenshots of jobs like janitorial and entry retail or fast food. We worked at The same place when we met. When she was promoted, I took on most of her old duties. She is more qualified for these jobs, but not by a huge amount. I feel like she's saying all I'm qualified for is fast food. 

Am I justified in being upset with her or am I over reacting? What would you do?",AmItheAsshole
 for hurting my brothers feelings?,"I (16M) let my brother use my phone to text his girlfriend because his phone had died. This was almost two months ago. The problem is when my brother gave me my phone back he had told me he ""accidentally"" read some of my messages and wanted to talk to me about it. When he told me what messages he read I never really trusted him after that. He kept trying to talk to me about what he read and I constantly told him that I was fine but no it wasn't good enough. 

After he kept pressuring me we finally had a long uncomfortable talk about everything and I had to literally convince him not to tell our parents even though he read MY PRIVATE messages. I physically can't stand him anymore because I can feel him judging me and I used to cry myself to sleep because of it. I recently started distancing myself from him as I'm now uncomfortable being around him and I guess he got upset at that because he confronted me about it last week and he basically told me that I was hurting his feelings because he felt as if I hated him?

I told him that I didn't hate him I just didn't want to be around him for the time being. I told him that he shouldn't have confronted me about something that he shouldn't have read in the first place and that he violated my trust and just made everything worse for me. He got upset with me and tried telling me that he didn't mean no harm and stuff but Idrc. He left not long after that and cut the visit short. Like short short. He was there for like 20 minutes at most. He hasn't been over since when he used to come over at least two-three times a week but hasn't came over at all this week so far and it's caused our parents to be sad.",AmItheAsshole
"H for giving my friend unnecessary advice?
","

Quick recap on everything. I (18M) am friends with a Claire(not her name, 18). She dated a guy for two years, broke yup, started flirting for two months with another, didn't work out. This might seem unnecessary but it is important.

Last Monday we were all hanging out with our group of friends and she got a text that the guy she was flirting with was there as well. She, beforehand, told me in private that two guys were hitting on her, but she didn't want anything because she was looking to score a goal with the other. Let's call one of the guys that was hitting on her Mark.

She came back a couple hours later, pretty angry and sad because the guy was clearly flirting with her, to a stupid degree, and when she reciprocated he got cold feet. 

Anyways, she started to get pretty close to Mark. It was more the other way around, but ok. My friends and I noticed that in the following days, she was pretty close to Mark as she once was with the other guy. Some of us felt that she should be just a bit careful.

Before that, I was talking to her, trying to support and confort her in whatever ways possible. I do not have feelings for her, I was just a Friend trying to help her out. 

Two days ago I noticed that it was as if they were in a situationship similar to the last one she had, and some friends just told her to be careful and not to get carried away. I later that day wrote the next message ""Hey, just wanted to say that I noticed that this guy was getting pretty close to you, yo know what I mean. The rest of the group also noticed. Just rememnyhe was hitting on you pretty hard the other day, be careful""

I thought nothing of it until yesterday that she said she had to speak with me about the message. We spoke today and she told me that she was very upset about what I said because she felt that we thought she couldn't live without a man, and that her pretty angry at me. She wanted to talk to me first before taking it to the group chat. 

I told her that I wasn't trying to be degrading in any way, rather I was trying to help. Age told me that they were just friends and played a lot of games together, which got them close in the end. I have nothing against that, and I told her so. I also explained to her what we saw, which is what I told you before. O said that I was extremely sorry for making feeling her that way, and she said that the both of us got the wrong thing for misunderstanding situations, and forgave me. 

It seemed that the call ended in somewhat good terms, but I feel pretty bad for making her feel that way. Perhaps had I writen the text in another way she wouldn't have felt degraded or that we thought of her that way. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to drop a friend of 16 years while she's sick? Need objective opinions,"**\[Long post, TLDR below\]**  
I (23F) and Kylie (23F) have been close since grade 2, but our friendship has strained due to communication issues.  
Throughout our friendship, Kylie has exhibited a pattern of disappearing for extended periods. In uni, there was a major falling out where she actively avoided me and our other friends, Sylvie and Sabrina. After a few months, she apologized and admitted to lacking communication and effort.   


However, this pattern continued with her missing another planned hangout and leaving me waiting outside for hours and later not offering any explanation for it. Fast forward, a few months, Sabrina, a friend of ours has us have a sit-down and we patch up after she apologizes. Before this, she ghosted another mutual close friend in the group, Sylvie.  
Presently, Kylie lives in another country. This has further strained communication. She has minimized contact with Sylvie and Sabrina, causing tension within the friend group. Despite this, I have continued to speak with her. However, she has missed several calls we arranged, including the group calls she set up. When questioned about these missed calls, her excuses included ""I don't have anything to say"" and ""I forget. Besides, I talk to you. You're my adhesive to them"".  
A fortnight ago I texted Kylie regarding my situation of family abuse. Her response was a single text: das not good; with a SpongeBob emoji and the letters ""trauma"". She then let me know she was sick (bleeding for over a month now) and I asked her if she got tests done, etc. She set up a call over the weekend but again, didn't show up or text about it.  
Worried about her well-being, I eventually contacted her boyfriend (whom I don't know well) 2 days ago, to confirm she was alright. He confirmed she was a bit erratic but functional (eating, sleeping, working). Today Kylie texted me with a generic text: ""Hey, how you? I'm sorry I disappeared for so long. Also, thank you for checking on me with bf. I hope I didn't make you too angry/ worried.""  


We had talks a few months ago about me going to her country and I've been saving up. It feels like I am again going the extra mile to get the ""present"" version of her.   
I've repeatedly spoken to Kylie about communication issues, hoping for improvement. However, her apologies have yet to translate into consistent effort. I'm now questioning whether to end the friendship. While I value our 16-year history, I'm emotionally drained from the constant one-sided effort and feeling disrespected by her behavior towards both me and our other friends.

  
**WIBTA for ending this friendship without informing her when she is sick?**   


**TL;DR:** Me (23F) and Kylie (23F) have been friends since childhood, but she constantly ghosts me,  is dismissive of our other friends too. After I opened up about family issues, she barely responded. I'm tired &amp; considering walking away.  
",AmItheAsshole
: Baby’s Daddy Leaves to shower at HIS mom’s house every morning. ,"Am I the asshole? Me and my partner, the father of my 6 week old son, live together in a small 2 bed 1 bath apartment. We have all the amenities and I clean and cook to keep the apartment nice and in good living condition in addition to recovering after birth and taking the bulk caring for our son. BD has been back at work for 2 weeks now and each day he leaves an hour to 2 hours before work to go to his mom’s house about 20 minutes away to shower. Sure, his mom’s shower is a nice remodeled spa shower and we have a standard tub shower combo, but is everyday excessive especially with a new born at home? He often stops by his mom’s house after work too to smoke and shower and catch up and eat. I told him it bothers me because this habit is taking hours away from helping to care for his kid every day. He says I am in the wrong for caring about where he showers but I think he is wrong for avoiding responsibilities with his son. 
",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to go on a trip with my parents and instead stay with my god mother.,"My parents planned a 2 week holiday and told me about it yesterday, the trip is a no wifi trip where im out in the nature with them doing mountain biking/climbing and other outdoor activities.

My parents claim that I need to get away from wifi and be outside even though I go to the park with my friends at least 2 times a week and absolutely love being outside when it’s warm. I’m even apart of my schools soccer team.

I told them I wouldn’t enjoy a wifi free 2 weeks as I like being able to message my friends and family.

They claim that im addicted to my phone and need time away from it even if they had higher screen times last time we looked. (You can see the screen times on iPhone)

I asked my god mother and she is happy to take me in for the 2 weeks but my parents think I’m being rude and I need to go.

I’m refusing and plan on staying with my godmother.

AITA?

",AmItheAsshole
 for asking money from my dad?,"Hi!
Me (nb15) and my dad (m50) have always had an abusive relationship of shorts. Because of that, I decided to go stay with my mom for fulltime. (They broke up when I was 5) However as Im autistic and its really hard for me to cut people off, I still keep some contact with him. So for context: He needs to pay my mom for my maintance payment and hobbys. Well with my other mental health problems I cant socialize and quit my other hobbys. It's really hard to even get friends in school or outside it. 
I've now gotten a few friends and we were supposed to go to hang out at the mall. As me and my mom are pretty poor, I tried selling my stuff to make some money, it didnt work. As a last resort I thought I could ask my dad for some.(hes pretty rich, works a good job) I asked him and he said I'm a brat and spoiled and a massive a-hole. Now that I have thought about this, I think it should go under a hobby. But Im still left thinking if I am the A-hole",AmItheAsshole
 for sending my abusive ex’s mother flowers for Mother’s Day?,"In a way it doesn't seem like I would be, although he lives with his mom and I know he would see the flowers.
We didn't end well, we had an awful relationship that lasted 4 1/2 years, during those years he physically, mentally and emotionally abused me ending in multiple charges and a no contact order (this is not still standing).
His mom was always there, looking out for me.
She took time to make sure I was okay, had everything I needed as well as genuinely just cared for me. We (his mother and I) haven’t talked in a few years,
I don't want the gift to come off as vindictive or toxic. We haven't been together for about 4 years, I recently got the news his mother's health has started to go down hill and I feel guilty now that we stressed her out as much as we did.
This being said, I don't want these flowers to become a problem with my ex boyfriend.
I am in a relationship, I'm happy and not interested in re-kindling any sort of flame.
I guess I just think he would look at it as an asshole move? Do you guys feel it would be an asshole move to send them? ",AmItheAsshole
 for sabotaging my friends academics?,"Am I The Asshole

I (17F) have a friend, Emma (17F). We go to an academically rigorous school and take a few dual credit college classes at our community college. I’ve always been an academically driven person and highly pride myself in my ability to study and perform well in school. Emma prides herself in the same things, however, she rarely puts in the same amount of work as I do. 

Current school work is becoming an issue. We take MATH143 and CHEM111 which are both necessary for high school graduation. She completely relies on me to remind her of due dates for every assignment in our college classes. This wouldn’t necessarily be a problem, but she always texts me asking if there is anything due that night or tomorrow. She texts me really late at night asking if I’ve done an assignment and if I’ll send the answers. She texts me to ask about the most basic and simple things that you can find in the syllabus.

So, she is just constantly telling me for things she can do on her own. Don’t get me wrong, I wouldn’t mind collaborating, going 50/50, or answering a few questions, but sometimes when she is fully aware of an assignment, she’ll just not do it and fully expect me to give her all of my answers. So, I’ve begun to stop reminding her about what is due. I know that so far she has missed about half of a semester’s worth of math homework. 

Tonight, we had chemistry lab calculations, and as I’m doing 3 math assignments so that night, she is asking me how to do the chemistry. I hadn’t done it, I tell her that, and she literally doesn’t even do it. After our math zoom, I ask her if she has done it and she says no. Then, she asks if I will send it to her once I am done. At this point, I’ve sent her so much homework of mine and done so much to help her, but truly, I’m over being walked all over. I say I’ll go 50/50 (we were lab partners) and she has the audacity to say no. I do the lab by myself, and I’m confident that she will just get points deducted for lateness. She is so fucking lazy.

Even though I believe I’m fully in reason for doing all this, I still feel awful when I know that there is an important deadline or assignment due and she has no idea. I’m busy working away and she is out with her friends. I feel like a bad person, and that it would just be easier and less stressful to just give her what she wants. But the more I give to her, I know that she will only want more. So, am I the asshole in this situation? Should I just remind her about deadlines and send her what she wants?",AmItheAsshole
 when i don't want a wedding but my fiancé does?,"
i (25F) have been with my fiancé (25M) for 6 years. i've always made it clear i don't want a wedding. he's always made it clear he does. 

backstory then my way of compromising:

my fiancé is a VERY big family man. like extremely close with everyone. his siblings (2) his mom. his aunts and uncles (6) his cousins (9). his grandparents (2). 

so close that they have get togethers every year and have memories and all that. 

edit: i wanna say i'm VERY close with his family. we've done stuff i've never in a million years imagined to do with my own. they're great people. a lot of what we so is with HIS FAMILY. even when mine were alive. I JUST WANT A BREAK. I JUST WANT A DAY THAT IS US. i already get so emotional around his family because i don't have mine. nor had a relationship with them like he does his. and it's exhausting sometimes. it's emotional. 

me though, both my parents are dead. my grandparents are dead. all my aunts and uncles are dead but one and we're not close. my two brothers (not biological) are in their 50s whom i am not close with at all either. 


my friend's are really all i have who feel like family nowadays. 

i told him we could have an after party where we invite friends and family if that makes it better. but i'd prefer to have a dou wedding. just us, dressed up. and the person to make it official (and photographer). i said it would be romantic and it wouldn't make the wedding feel one sided. 

he says he wants his close family there at least. i kinda went off and said i wish i did too... but they're dead. ik i'm an asshole for that part. 

am i being unreasonable? weddings are supposed to be a big day for both partners... and we could throw an after party afterwards where i still walk in with my gown and he walks in dressed up too. 

edit: misleading title. i DO want a wedding. just without family / friends. everything the same as a traditional one tho. 

edit 2: also i don't know half my families names. though they know mine. so that would be mad uncomfortable on my end, not to mention forgetting people.",AmItheAsshole
 if I back out of helping my sister pay for a car because she went and got a 65k jeep instead of what we originally agreed on.,"My sister (18 f) is starting college this fall. She doesn't have a car but will need one because she'll be commuting to school while living at home.

At the beginning of the year, I (27 m) told her that I'd help her pay for a car as a graduation gift, and I'd pay for the first 5k of her monthly payments. She has an almost full-ride scholarship and is living at home, so this will probably be her only recurring bill outside of school fees and supplies. I did this so that when she started working, she could build as much of a savings net as possible if something came up.

My parents, my sister, and I originally agreed on a max of 25k-30k. This car isn't meant to last her a decade. She's never owned a car before; this is her ""baby's first car."" It's supposed to be an affordable used car for a college kid to get around in. It should last her for college, and then she can figure out what to do from there.

Well, I was lied to because she and my parents went out and bought a brand-new Jeep yesterday. I'm livid my parents co-signed for her to get this. Not only did they buy a 65k brand-new car, but they financed(!) a 10k down payment at an even higher APR for some reason! For some insight, my parents cannot afford this car themselves, and they can't even afford the new payments on the loan they got for the 10k. There's a reason I'm the one helping out with the payments on this, not them. My sister does not even have a job yet, which was supposed to be step 1 before we even got her the car.

I'm livid. The 5k I had set aside for her won't even last the summer if we put it towards the car and loan payments. The whole reason I did this is now basically moot because she'll have to cover the payments while she's in school. My parents have good credit somehow but ave 0 cash at the end of each month, so I'm pretty sure once my 5k runs dry, the car will be repoed for nonpayment in the next year or so. What boils my blood even more is they know I'm livid but don't care. Mom went on a whole hour about how sisters ""eyes lit up at the sight of the car"" and ""you would not have said no either if you were there."" We had talked about this for months. My sister and parents both know 100% that she will not be able to afford this car, but they don't care now.

I'm considering backing out. I'll tell them to return the car, and we return to the original plan, or else I'll just invest the 5k in a 5-year bond for my sister. I want some opinions on this plan,

Edit: Quick clarification.

My gift to her is a total of 5k that was to be used for monthly payments. The way I worded it was weird I think originally. I did not promise to help with a downpayment or anything else fee related. She had saving to cover that. I was going to pay the first 5k of monthly payments after that.

edit 2 and update:   
Some people are asking why the original car purchase price we decided of 25k-30k was so high. I agree, that's pretty high for an unemployed college kid. That was meant to be an ""absolute max that you need to think very carefully about"" total (fee's included.) I was encouraging them to go for 10-15k but was talked up to a 25-30k max. 

I also just got confirmation that the deal was finalized yesterday. There's no returning the jeep, I was mistake about how used vs new cars are treated with cool down period laws. She and my parents are screwed. Thanks for the advice so far, going to think this over tonight and figure out how much of his circus I want to be apart of. ",AmItheAsshole
 for leaving my husband at our lake house with his family.,"My husband and I own a lake house that we spend most of our free time at when it's warm. 

We go there over the winter to check on it and do any basic maintenance that is required. It is not set up for winter living. 

We often invite friends and family over. We have almost two acres of land and there is lots of room to park an RV or set up a tent. 

The house has a septic tank for the toilet. All the other water goes to a grey water tank we use for the garden and lawn. We only use biosafe products. We have a very well built and ventilated outhouse for when we have people over. 

So last weekend was the one where we went out to get the house ready for the spring and summer. 

We ordered the water truck to fill our tank. The propane guys to fill up that tank. We ran water through the pipes to flush them out and get them ready to use. 

And his mom and dad showed up with his brother and his family. Which would be fine except it was a cold and shitty weekend. So they didn't want to set up tents and stay outside. 

I asked him why they were here. He said that he told them we were going  out and they sort of invited themselves out. 

They didn't bring out much besides some sandwiches and a bunch of beer. They didn't understand why we didn't have any of the water toys ready. THERE WAS STILL ICE ON THE LAKE. I asked my husband to tell them that we were not ready for guests and that they needed to leave or help. He wouldn't do it. 

So I left. I said I needed to run to the store. I took my car and went to the grocery store five blocks from my house. It is an asian market with great sushi. 

I think my husband expected me to just be going to the gas station a mile from the lake.

I left him out there to prep the house and deal with his guests. He is upset now that I left without telling him that I wasn't coming back. That he had to do all the work by himself. That he had to clean the house by himself. He said his family thought I was rude not to stick around and host. 

I did not invite them. I told him that the house was not ready for guests. I told him that we did not have enough toilet paper for eight people. He knew that we only had food for the two of us for the weekend. I think it's his fault and his problem. 

Should I have sucked it up and taken one for the team or am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 for wanting to be NC with my MIL,"Posting this anonymously from a throwaway for privacy reasons. I (26F) have been married to my husband (26M) for two years. We were high school sweethearts and have been together since we were 16. We have a beautiful baby (7mo M) and for the sake of our family's safety, I want to go NC with my MIL, even temporarily.
We've had spats here and there but it's never been anything too serious. We moved a few states away from where we grew up and MIL came with. She helped with the moving costs so we were extremely appreciative and open to it. After moving, my MIL met her boyfriend and in the beginning, everything seemed great. Both my husband and I were really happy for her because she left her entire life behind to move and start over and we were excited she found someone to start over with. He was over the top, but again, we were just happy for my MIL. 
We began to see his true colors as time went on, specifically his drinking problem and financial issues. We suspect he is probably using some sort of drug but we can't prove it so that's just our suspicion. In the time they've been together he's had 2 cars repossessed and been evicted from 3 apartments.
My MIL moved in with us and subsequently her boyfriend did as well. They regularly borrowed money from my husband, paid no bills, and contributed nothing towards groceries/utilities/etc, despite both of them working average decent-paying jobs. She was not making payments on her car and her boyfriend didn't have one, so my husband and I quite literally had no idea where all of their money was going. 
A few weeks ago, we received a notice from our landlord that they had 14 days to move due to it being a 2 bedroom apartment over occupancy issues. This obviously stressed out both of them and while this is happening, she loses her car. She was using a rental for a little bit but now wants to rely on us for rides everywhere. She and boyfriend moved into an apartment a few miles up the road but she works over 45 minutes away and night shift, so we'd have to take her and pick her up. They absolutely lost it when we said no.
MIL was basically claiming my husband owed her? She wasn't even really asking for help, just berating us, telling us we HAVE to help her because she's ""broke"" and can't afford to Uber or rent a car, yet her boyfriend buys a case of beer and bottle of liquor every two days. Her boyfriend is very manic and unpredictable, to the point that we changed our locks and moved our car in front of our apartments office building where there's cameras because we were afraid he'd vandalize our car for not helping. We can't have any time with just my MIL because her boyfriend is always with her, so we can't even talk to her about our concerns. I haven't discussed this NC idea with my husband yet because I don't think he'd agree but I don't want to have to worry about our safety because of my MIL boyfriend. I just want to know from an outsider perspective AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for refusing to talk to my mom for 2 months ,"I (16) refused to talk to my mom for 2 months. For some context, I've been mad at her since June. I spent a week in June earning my motorcycle endorsement and planned on getting a motorcycle after my birthday. 

I spent the previous 5 years talking about it and saving up enough money for it. I was fully prepared to pay for insurance and the full price of a new motorcycle as I've been working since I was 14. She even had me call the dealer and insurance company to make sure it was legal and everything. I got everything ready and right before my birthday she changed her mind and said I couldn't get it. I was pissed but tried to be understanding of her perspective. She told me that she didn't take me seriously and didn't know I even wanted a motorcycle.

 It caused a lot of arguments through August and she started to threaten to take away my car (which I paid for by myself) and then threatened to make me transfer schools and quit my job if I didn't stop bringing it up. 

Whenever I asked for an apology about her not taking me seriously she would say ""I'm sorry that you feel that way"" and got angry with me for refusing to accept an apology like that. 

I continued to treat her normally after this until November when I was volunteering at her work. I catered an event for her. When we got home, my brother started playing fighting with me and I kicked him back (gently as I do sparring and didn't want to hurt him) when Mom saw, she started screaming at me. I'm fairly certain she was just taking the stress of the day out on me. 

I asked her for a bit of space and started to stay in my room more. She kept coming in my room and refusing to leave me alone. I stopped responding to her and speaking to her and this went on for two months. At the end of the second month, she told me that if I didn't start talking to her again she would take my car and make me quit my job and all of the classes I take outside of school (judo, welding, etc). She also started to accuse me of stuff I've never done. She started trying to diagnose me with stuff and apparently told my grandma. I had to start talking to her because I was scared of what she would do if I didn't. Her therapist said she was doing the right thing and had every right to threaten me as she is my parent.

So AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for playing music in Spanish when all but 1 coworker dislikes it?,"
It's been a challenging time at work lately. I'm a Hispanic guy working in a sterile compounding pharmacy, where we often listen to music to pass the time. My coworker, who's also Hispanic, and I enjoy genres like reggaeton and Dembow when we're alone, but things got tense when our female coworker expressed dislike for Dominican Dembow, saying it made her uneasy. I respected her wishes and stopped playing it, but then she started complaining about other Hispanic genres too, like salsa and banda, saying they were too loud.

What really got to me was when she singled me out for playing Spanish music, claiming it was inconsiderate because she didn't understand it. I pointed out we have other Hispanic colleagues who don’t have a problem with it and actually encourage it. I played music in Japanese in response, a language we both don’t understand, which she was fine with. It felt like she had a problem specifically with Hispanic/Latino music.

The situation escalated when she tried to backtrack, claiming her issue wasn't with the language but with the ""melodies"" in the music. I couldn't help feeling frustrated and offended by her comments, especially since I've never criticized her for speaking exclusively in Polish with another coworker.

I can't help but wonder if I'm blowing this out of proportion, but it's hard not to feel unfairly targeted, and I’m left wondering whether this is worth bringing up to HR.",AmItheAsshole
 for kicking my FIL out?,"My husband and I own a van that we purchased as we were wanting to travel around, due to the cost of living ect, we have not been able to. We were temporarily living in it until we got our own place, after that it was stored at a family members property they had to move with all their farm animals in a matter of 2-3 weeks which wasn't enough time to set up any pens at the new property. To help them out we offered for FIL to live in the van for a few months to help sort out the animals living arrangements . Unfortunately not much has been done, they are mostly the same animal and are safe contained just not separated by breed. Instead he is opting to sleep all day, drink all night and not contribute to the household. He was kindly reminded that the van will be moved in 5 weeks. He has not personally responded to me but has contacted my husband about becoming homeless, he posted a ""funny"" video demanding he is supplied the goods in which to live in his car comfortably, if not he will ""hold the van hostage"". The only time he is reaching out is to harass my husband for money for his alcohol. At this point in time I have been told all I can do is wait for the date he has been given to be moved out by, unless the situation escalates. Am I the asshole?",AmItheAsshole
 if I told my Dad and Stepmom they can't be in our house when we're not there?,"My husband and I are hosting a celebration weekend (events are on SAT evening &amp; SUN afternoon). Some family will come early and stay for the events. Some family will come for the events and stay later. However they plan it, it's up to them.  
  
My husband and I happen to be traveling that week, so we won't get back to town till SAT afternoon. My Dad and Stepmom will get into town FRI afternoon (while my husband and I are still out of town) and plan to stay till WED.  
  
We'd like them to stay with us, but my husband's not comfortable with ppl being in our house when we're not there. Not even his own parents.  
  
We also have a skittish cat named Snickers that was a rescue. This is the first time my Dad and Stepmom will stay with us (we live in TN, they live in TX). They don't know Snickers and Snickers doesn't know them and we think it's a recipe for disaster. Esp since my husband and me are not there to calm both Snickers and my Stepmom.  
  
WIBTA if I tell my parents, ""We'd like for yall to stay with us, but only after we get back in town."" 

This means they'd need to find a place to stay for FRI night. They used to live here in TN, so they could stay with friends or get a hotel. But they were also trying to save money. I feel like they will be offended and think I'm putting Snickers above them.  
  
BTW Snickers is my husband's pride and joy. He kids that he will ""divorce me"" if I let anything happens to Snickers. But deep down, I feel like he's not even kidding.",AmItheAsshole
 for not letting the housemaid sleep in my house for the night?,"For reference im a 30yo man. My housemaid (+-60yo F) is an old family friend and knows practically everyone in my family. She works in my house 1,5 days every week. She also works for my neighbor (my uncle +-70yo male) the same amount of time in different days. Recently her car stopped working and had to go to the mechanic for a few days but to keep working she came by taxi/public transports. Since the days she works in my apartment and my uncle's apartment are next to each other she asked if she could sleep over in my spare room. Even tough she is a family friend i prefer not having her sleep here (i prefer my privacy) so i said i'd prefer not. But i am understanding of her situation so i volunteered to pay for her extra travel expenses (taxi/uber/anything) until her car was fixed. That way she could sleep at her own home peacefully. Her reaction? She refused and after she left for the day she went to complain to my uncle and to the rest of my ENTIRE family (other uncles, aunts, cousins, etc...)  that i was unfair and refused her to let her sleep in my house. \[EDIT (forgot to mention but most of my family agrees with her including that uncle of mine)\]. What i find hypocritical is that that same uncle of mine also lives alone and also has spare bedrooms in his house (identical houses) and yet she either didnt ask him (which is unfair) or she did but he also didnt allow her to sleep there (hypocritical). Now all of a sudden i became the black sheep of the family just for choosing not to let her sleep at my house. So, AITA?",AmItheAsshole
 for insisting on no kids at engagement party?,"Gaaa my partner and I have been at odds over our engagement party and it's driving me crazy!

We really do have a wonderful relationship and this isn't symptomatic of awfulness but we just cannot see eye to eye on the party. We got engaged over Xmas and had planned on throwing ourselves a chill engagement party at a brewery or something the first weekend of May but now we’re having it at our brand-new house on a bunch of land which is so exciting!

The problem is he now sees it as a housewarming and I'm trying to keep it to people we're gong to invite to our wedding so we can talk about our wedding plans and focus on our families meeting and keep it chill -- my antisocial mom even tried to get out of coming and I convinced her by promising the party would be small. **She and my stepdad are flying in, as is my adult niece**. His family is driving a couple hours to get here.

Fiance and I went back and forth endlessly with him trying to enlarge the guest list and me trying to cut it down. We finally compromised on like \~60 people (down from his 100 and up from my 30). We also landed on no kids, mostly on my account. **He doesn't particularly want them here** either, but he doesn't think it would be a big deal if they came. I just want it to be small and easy and we also have minibikes and other new farm nonsense I want the adults to be able to fuck around on and not deal with a bunch of kids crying bc they can't use them or god forbid hurting themselves.

But now, a couple of his good friends are saying they might not be able to come without their kids. My reaction is that sucks but it is what it is, **let's have a bigger housewarming party later and invite them then. He doesn't want to**, says a few people are coming from out of town for this one and won't be able to come to another in a few months. He nicely suggested I reconsider yesterday ... am I a dick for saying hell no? \[EDIT: Sorry I misspoke here, I shouldn't have written that my response was ""hell no."" I just meant I held firm when he asked. We did communicate nicely about it. It was more like that's too bad but no, let's hold firm on this please\]

I guess I'm looking for validation that it's okay to hold firm on this. The friends in question are really lovely people \[EDIT: and are **local, not traveling**, why do people think that?\] and I am sad for him that they might have to miss it but I have absolutely 100% watched them let their combined horde take over breweries screaming and playing and I would be SO upset if they let them take over this party too. Thanks for indulging my rambling.

EDIT: bolding for for those with limited reading comprehension",AmItheAsshole
" for asking my friend to pay $8,000 to break my lease after they backed out of the agreement?","My close friend (Andrew 31M) of over a decade went through a breakup and he was forced to move out of his apartment that he shared with his now ex.

My (31F) lease was set to be renewed within three weeks of this happening. I currently live in a 2 bedroom / 2 bath apartment $4k/month with a housemate who has commitments to move out in August, so I was planning to renew the lease for 6 months then live in a different city on my own.

Andrew and I live nearby each other, so I asked him if he wanted to live with me and he agreed. Because the room won’t be available until August, Andrew got a short term lease for an apartment nearby.

After living in his apartment for a month, Andrew told me he doesn’t want to leave and offered to help me post to find someone to replace him.

I don’t want to live with a stranger, and I don’t think I should be responsible for the cost of breaking the lease, which is 2 months rent.

WIBTA for asking him to pay the full $8,000 to break the lease? He didn't sign a contract, it was a verbal agreement between us.

ETA: Adding this edit to clarify that he agreed to living with me before I renewed the lease, but it was a verbal agreement. He knew the termination clause and that I was only renewing for a year because he was moving in.",AmItheAsshole
; I got quite angry at a man who approached me outside of my bank trying to convert people to his religion and get a donation.,"I'm only asking this here due to my Mother literally calling me an asshole; for not taking the man's pamphlet and walking on when we got further down the street. Claiming I ""embarrassed myself and her publicly""

What happened, in a nutshell, was quite a brief exchange that I really didn't think much about, but apparently Mother thinks I took it ""too far.""

So I walked past and crossed the road to avoid the person standing with his God signs and pamphlets that many others were avoiding. Just to be accosted on the other side of the street by his partner who blocked my path. (He clearly seen me cross the street to avoid his partner). 

He handed me the pamphlet, with the usual iconography of fear mongering claiming my soul needed saving, requesting a donation of 2 pounds for his 'mission' ...

I immediately and impulsivly shook my head, sighed and stepped to walk past the man, walked to a nearby bin and put the pamphlet in the bin. 

Then as I tried to walk on he followed me, ringing a bell that he whipped out from who knows where and shouted; 'Why do you hate God when he loves you.' I tried to ignore him but he was speeding up and getting closer and kept shouting the same thing. 'Why do you hate God?' 'God loves you!' etc...

So I, still walking away, turned my head and said; 'I have no hate for something that I believe to be made up. Now stop stalking me with your little bell and find someone else to bother please, I'm busy.'

Then he didn't take the hint and still followed, so I raised my voice for the first and only time and said, ""Can you PLEASE stop STALKING ME. Fuck off!"" ... This made him stop moving, but he continued preaching in my direction as I quickly got away.

Apparently the ending exchange (saying I have no hate for something I believe to be made up then accusing him of being a stalker and swearing at him when he continued following me well down the street) is what I did that made me the asshole.

Why can religious people do and say whatever they want..? But I can't? When I didn't harm anyone, I simply binned what I considered to be rubbish. 

Tbh I'm actually not too happy with my Mum, I spoke with her and now she claims she gets where I'm coming from. But I kinda feel like she was a bit tone-deaf...

A little background; I'm gay and was very badly bullied and picked on by hyper religious kids and teachers at my all catholic school... I was also raised extremely religious and it took a lot of work to distance myself from the massive amount of trauma being religious and knowing I was 'Evil and going to hell' etc all that shit... or at least that's what I was taught, especially in school.

So I'm basically the worst person to start preaching to as I have massive trauma related to religion and how it's directly affected me and my self esteem/self worth.

To end this I'll say, yes maybe I could have avoided all this and just took his pamphlet. But I feel like that just encourages this kind of weird behaviour.

So after all that AITA?",AmItheAsshole
H for asking my friend to share the profits from the sale of tickets of an event we were going to?,"My friend, A (28M) and I (27F) have a habit of using an app (Splitwise) to manage what we are owed (movies, concerts, restaurants, Uber etc.). It can sometimes take months before we add expenses.
A little over a month ago, A suggested we go to a certain concert and asked if I’d be interested in joining. I told him I would listen to the artist work and get back to him. In the meantime, A bought 2 tickets. When I confirmed I would be joining him, tickets were still selling at face value.
The day of the event my friend asks me if I’d be okay with not going  staying in instead, and that he found someone that would buy the tickets for xx more than he paid for.  I agreed for us to change plans.
Today, I added the profit from the sale of one ticket as money owed on the Splitwise app.
Now, A believes he should keep the profit from both tickets as he is the one who bought them and sold them. I believe that my confirming I would be joining him, meant we had an agreement the second ticket he bought was now mine.
AITAH for expecting to be returned the profit from the sale of one of the tickets?",AmItheAsshole
[CA] Felony Vandalism ," I was charged with felony vandalism in California for causing damages totaling $300. I have since fully repaid the victim and obtained a signed letter confirming the repayment. The victim did not press charges against me. I have a clean record with no prior convictions, and I am unable to afford legal representation for my upcoming court date in two weeks. 

How fucked am I? Will I be going to prison did I ruin my life forever? I haven’t been able to sleep from this. This incident happened when I was withdrawing heavily from alcohol and started hallucinating and went manic. I jumped on top of a neighbors car because of it. I’ve stayed sober since. Is a public defender a bad idea? Im currently unemployed due to my alcoholism. I feel this will make finding a job even harder now. Any tips or advice will be greatly appreciated. ",AskLawyers
[non-US] Denied Service at Wendy's - Age/Gender Discrimination? (Canada),"I recently had a very upsetting experience at a Wendy's location in Ontario, Canada. I was with two female friends, and while they were allowed to order and dine in, I was told I could order but not sit and eat with them. The manager claimed there had been issues with ""teenage boys"" in the past.

Here's what I've done so far:

- Filed a formal complaint with Wendy's corporate (with a case number).
- Contacted my school principal, who is willing to intervene on my behalf.
- Reached out to the Ontario Human Rights Commission to report the incident.

I'm wondering what further steps I should take. Here are some specific questions:

- Does this situation qualify as discrimination based on age and/or gender?
- Is there any benefit to me recording a future interaction?
- What other resources or organizations should I be aware of?

Additional Notes:

I am Indigenous, but it's not very noticeable. I believe the discrimination stemmed primarily from my gender.",AskLawyers
"[WA] For *private* LTD denial, am I better off doing one final review with the insurance company (with added visit notes) OR going straight to appeal with support of a lawyer? ","I was denied a few weeks ago pretty spontaneously because my LTD insurer essentially decided they won’t pay attention to my neuropsych exam anymore because it’s now 2 years old.

My case manager said she’s willing to submit one more review if I send in my most recent visit notes within a month of my denial. Would it be a bad idea to try resubmitting my last few months of visit notes? And if I could get in to see the neuropsychologist again would they even accept the updated test results because it’s dated after the previous review period? 

I don’t know if I can truly afford legal representation. I’ll obviously have to find a way, but I’m trying to weigh if one more review may give me a shot of being approved or if it’s just going to make life harder for me if and when I have to do a formal appeal. 

I’m aware of how ERISA works in the sense that when I do an appeal I need to make sure everything under the sun is included because we can’t add things later. So I am being hyper sensitive about making sure they’re not trying to con me into submitting an appeal and just calling it a re-review. 

My disability is cognitive in nature, so I want to make sure I’m not getting gaslit or there isn’t something I’m missing and should be aware of. ",AskLawyers
[Nj] referral fee?,"How does a referral fee work from a different laywer in a different litigation field? 

Ie. Family injury laywer referred a personal injury client. 

",AskLawyers
[MS] is a go fund me sign considered panhandling?,I’m in an emergency situation and my mechanic expects a larger than expected amount. Can I go on the side of the road and hold up my go fund me sign for car repairs in MS? ,AskLawyers
[non-US] can I sue the city ?,"Canadian victim services didn't notify me that my attacker was released from jail , do I have grounds for a case ?",AskLawyers
[GA] Illegal request or just malicious?,"\[GA\] My job terminated my employment recently, and they had paid for a flight and airbnb for professional development this summer. Since I was terminated, I cancelled both bookings. Airbnb returned maybe 5% to the business's credit card, but delta only refunded in flight credit. 

Now the business is demanding I reimburse them in cash for the flight credit. 

Am I obligated to pay them back for a trip that they had agreed and paid for prior to termination? I don't really have $1,000 to give to them as I am now unemployed...",AskLawyers
[non-US] Differences between procurator and prosecutor,"I am a law undergraduate. I am conducting some research about comparison between difference judicial system. Then I see these two terms, which made me confusing. The only difference I knew is that one used in Soviet judicial system, and one used in the others. 

Can you please explain the differences?",AskLawyers
"[non-US] How many of you have watched the UK based TV show ""Defending the Guilty"" and how accurate is it to real life Lawyering? ",Seems like I've inadvertently written my question in the title... Anyhoo; have at it. Have you watched it? And does this stuff actually happen to you bunch of nutters when you are in your early career? It seems mad but I really enjoyed watching it. ,AskLawyers
[FL] Home buyers want to sue us,"My husband and I recently sold our house. The house had been in disrepair when he purchased it almost 10 years ago (before we met), including a flooded basement due to a broken water main, and he put a lot of work into fixing it up, both DIY and contracted. We had no major issues with the home for the time that he, and then we, lived in the house. We listed the house as-is, and still made several accommodations for the buyers, including covering their closing costs, paying for the minor issues found on inspection, and closing 3 weeks early at their last-minute request.

Since we have moved out, the new buyers have had some issues. The first was a septic backup issue; turns out a tree root had grown into the pipes somewhere along the line. We told them we had never had any issues of the sort, and it was chalked up to us having 1-2 people max, whereas they have 5 people in the home and are now overloading the septic system.

Now, after some heavy rains, the basement has flooded. They are claiming that we failed to disclose relevant issues, that when we finished the basement prior to selling we “covered it up,” and/or that the work we had done on the basement was the cause of the flooding somehow (I’m hearing this from my husband who heard it from our realtor who I guess heard it from their realtor, this doesn’t make sense to me but my husband doesn’t have more specifics). They had the damage assessed around $20k, and have threatened legal action.

Now our realtor wants us to sign a hold harmless agreement and pay them $13k. My husband says this document was drafted by “a lawyer,” I’m assuming for the real estate group. They said if we move to the court system, legal fees will mount up and we should just pay and be done with it. 

I feel like this lawyer is watching out for them, not for us, and that we should fight it, or at the very least hire our own representation. I have no idea even a ballpark of how much that would cost. We have never had issues like this before, so there was nothing to disclose, and we lived in that house through 3 hurricanes. If the construction is truly the root cause of the issue, then 1) they bought the house as-is, 2) they had an inspection done and it was up to them to find issues, and 3) those problems need to be taken up with the construction company and possibly have them held responsible, not us.

Is it worth pursuing or should we just write the check?",AskLawyers
[non-US] Bullying at work?,"Hi, I’ve made a new account because I’m fearful that my workplace stalks my online accounts. 

Background on myself;
I’m self employed that is contracted for a daily service. I’ve worked for this company for at least 15 years. I also live in the UK.

I’ve recently been accused of bullying by someone at work but I’m not sure what I’ve done. I’ve asked and I’ve been shot down every time without being given a proper response. I’ve been treated as guilty for the past 2 and a half months and have had a lot of restrictions imposed upon me without ever having anything proven. I’ve also been harassed and badgered by employees of the company. I feel that I’m the one being bullied and actively targeted. 

The person who has accused me of bullying is also self employed but works closely with my employer. I’ve contacted ACAS and they’ve recommended I send a formal letter to my workplace asking for evidence. I fear that doing so will just worsen my situation. 

Can I get some recommendations on what steps I should take to get support from a specialist or is there anyone here that could kindly listen to my full story and offer assistance.

If there is a lawyer or solicitor reading this then I’m more than happy to pay regular rates. ",AskLawyers
[NJ] patient fled physician’s office without paying for cosmetic services,"Hello lawyers of Reddit. What say you about this situation: a new-to-the-practice patient sought Botox on the order of 1000+ for cosmetic purposes from a family doctor, then upon conclusion of the visit, fled the waiting room without paying for services. it goes without saying these cosmetic treatments are never covered by insurance. What is the physician to do? Is it a HIPAA violation to file a police report?",AskLawyers
[CA] Breaking my lease ,"For context, I am in California. 

I have a family emergency which is requiring me to move back home in June. I have my own lease and so does my roommate (it’s not joint). I tried to find a replacement to transfer the lease over but no luck. I want to break my lease. Now I am scared that my roommate will be left with the rest of the cost since the rent is split 50/50. Can I be sued for this? Moving is something I cannot avoid. Will a 30 notice suffice? From what I know that will put the ownace on him to ether find another roommate in 30 days or to move out. Please confirm my options. Thanks you! ",AskLawyers
[IN][non-US] Scammed in Aruba,"On Thursday, 04/11/24, my wife and I (residents of Indiana) were on a Caribbean cruise and had stopped in Aruba. It was getting close to the final boarding time and we were on our way back to our cruise ship, some lady handed us scratch off tickets, my wife ""won the grand prize"", but to receive it, we had to sit through a presentation, they kept promising to get us back to our ship on time. We should have known from the beginning, but we weren’t thinking very clearly -- it was a vacation and we had some drinks while we were on the island, it was very hot, we were very tired, they had air conditioning and cold drinks, and were so very *nice* and so very *convincing* that this was an *incredibly good deal* that we had to take advantage of **right away**. Yeah, we were idiots.

They kept us there until we had less than 5 minutes to get to the ship and make the final boarding time, and we got pressured into signing for a vacation package in part because they promised to drive us back to the ship which they'd made us late for. We had no time to read the documents before signing them.

Thankfully, we never bring credit cards off the ship and only a minimal amount of cash, but they pressured my wife into sending a Zelle payment of something like 4800 dollars from her business account (Old National bank; business is registered in Indiana) to a private individual, not any kind of official business account, to serve as a deposit on the membership, and expected us to pay the rest when we could retrieve our credit cards.

Thankfully, Zelle flagged it as fraud, and when we got back to the ship we realized they hadn’t given us any of the documents we signed, and they had kept my wife's driver's license. They’d told her they needed it to verify her identity or something, but they didn’t give it back.

We immediately realized it was a complete fraud, contacted the bank to cancel it and found that Zelle already had blocked it. We also contacted the state of Indiana and reported her ID stolen. 

Now they're sending her threatening emails about paying them, and have forwarded an email from a collections company. 

What can we do? 

Googling has shown me that this is a common scam, and usually the scammers have successfully collected the money by the time people get suspicious, and they are only successful in getting their money back in some cases where they credit card company determines it’s fraudulent. 

In our case, Zelle prevented that from happening (which has incidentally apparently caused a permanent ban on both my wife and her business from using Zelle). But the scam company is demanding payment of thousands of dollars and is now pursuing this supposed debt with a collection agency.

Because they didn’t give us copies of these documents, we don’t even know what we signed. We were still somewhat intoxicated and the heat and the long walk and the worry about missing the boat had us thinking not clearly, plus we were still waiting for her “grand prize” … which was another scam vacation thing. That’s the only paper we were given when they finally let us get into the car with the nice young saleslady scammer who must do this exact same thing multiple times every week.

Are we going to be able to make this go away without paying these bastards? Will getting a lawyer involved help? Thanks!",AskLawyers
[MA] Confused and frustrated ,"Alright so I’ve been working at a grocery store for 3 years, I’m a cashier. My birthday was April 10th and I took that week and the next week off for vacation when I came back I worked two days then got called into the security room and talked to the NEW store manager which I’ve never met before and the security guy or smth anyways they told me I lost them $47 dollars in coupons and they said I wasn’t aloud to gives other ppls coupons to other ppl which I didn’t know and they told me I have to pay it back. I asked them to show proof of this happening and told me they couldn’t so like why would I pay it if there’s no proof of that happening. They also said this happened all the way in March and they said they observed me doing it but like who did? The cameras? The manager? I don’t care if I have to get another job it’s just dumb. I also had no intention of “costing the company $47” it was all an accident. And shouldn’t the company pay for it?! These things happen everyday why do I have to pay it back. I’ve talked to my Grandparents who are the smartest ppl I know and they even said not to pay it so please someone help me I don’t know what to do. Thank you!!",AskLawyers
[TX] City put a road on my friends property without permission ,Hey! So a friend of mine informed me that the city put a road across a section of her property (we live out of state) without permission and was wondering what would be the best course of action (she owns land on both sides of the road) to take and what she legally can do to ensure people are not trespassing and getting hurt on her property?,AskLawyers
[NY] Hit and Run Pedestrian Hosiptal Bill,"I was hit by an unidentified car in New York City and the police were not able to find the car and the driver. I have also received some treatment in a hospital through ambulance services. Now that I have received a bill from the ambulance collections department. The letter says I can only use a no-fault carrier or workers' compensation, and the rep insists that Medicaid won't work since this is a car accident. 

Normally, the at-fault driver will be providing their insurance, now that there are no alternatives and I don't own any no-fault insurance, does my NYS Medicaid cover the medical and ambulance costs?

",AskLawyers
[IN] I was given temporary custody through DCS over my child and my exes other child who I also take care of. Lawyer for bio dad called telling me he will be picking her up. ,Bio dad doesn't see her except 4 times a year. He is not on the birth certificate and has not had paternity established .DCS told him he will not be able to get temporary custody until paternity is established. Do I have to let him pick her up? ,AskLawyers
[CA] is taunting people to fight me at the Palestinian protests valid for me to sue them?,"Hey so I’m a pretty poor student getting fucked by student loans currently attending ucla. I work as a bartender and do Uber on the side to try and eke out enough money to pay for this dump.

Meanwhile you have this troop of rich kids who have the bank of mom and dad to rely on going crazy on campus.

My question is if I take an Israeli flag and start vocally supporting Israel’s war in Palestine on campus and someone reacts badly and beats the shit out of me is that grounds for me to sue them? Or is there like an “asking for it” clause in the law where I’m at fault for counter protesting or something.

I don’t care if this is morally righteous and I don’t give a fuck about Israel and Palestine I’m struggglinnnggg to pay my way through college and I just want to understand if I can get that bag and maybe pay for a semester or two of college. ",AskLawyers
[MA] Can my Landlord increase rent mid lease term?,So for reference I live in Boston in a studio apartment and recently signed the new lease which goes into affect 9/01/2024. This new lease has an increased lease however our contract says that our current lease is valid from 9/1/2023-8/29/2024 or something like that. I went to pay rent and there is an extra charge for the exact amount that they raised rent by that says “month rent increase” is this legal? can they raise the rent now even though we have a contract until september?,AskLawyers
[FL] Bullied for years at work until I recently refused to work with my bully. They've now put me on unpaid leave until I agree to work with him. I don't want to blow up my career by suing. Can anything be done?,"I'm hesitant to reach out to a lawyer because I'm not sure what can be done, but as this has unfolded MANY people I work with have encouraged me to speak with someone because they feel our employers treatment of me has been so horrendous. 

  
I work in a hospital and I've worked at this hospital for over a decade. I have a great working relationship with everyone I interact with. I have never been written up or reprimanded and have had only stellar performance reviews from every supervisor I've had over the years. I have worked with many other physicians without these complaints and those physicians have been supportive of me through all this. I am the most senior employee in my position and I work very hard to support our practice. I am always available to help when needed and I carry more than twice the work load of others in my position because of my seniority.

  
About 4 years ago a new physician joined our hospital. Pretty quickly he revealed himself to be very abrasive and difficult to work with. He shoved nurses, screamed at employees and regularly picked fights and threw fits over things that were far beyond the individual's control. He was spoken to by administration twice in his first year about how he needed to treat staff better or he would be asked to leave. The behavior has continued and management has difficulty staffing his surgical cases because so many people refuse to work in his room. 

  
I was assigned to work closely with him when he arrived and we worked amicably together for a few months. About 3-4 months in he abruptly decided he didn't want to work with me and complained that I ""couldn't be trusted with patients"" to our hospital's COO. He started making complaints that I was unreliable or unprofessional. For example, adding an emergency surgery to the schedule and not telling me, but later reporting me for not being there. Or, giving me instructions on what he wanted me to do for a patient, but then telling my manager he told me something different and I disobeyed him. I was interviewed by the COO about these complaints but I was not reprimanded. I continued to work with other physicians and he did not work with me. This went on for about a year. 

  
One day the charge nurse of the OR called and said he asked if I could help with a case in the OR and I obliged. We gradually began working together more regularly and things seemed fine. We never directly addressed those previous complaints. 

About a year ago I had abdominal surgery and when I returned to work I was limited to lifting no more than 10lbs for some time. I had FMLA coverage documented and filed for my light duty when I returned to work. I started hearing rumors that this physician was complaining that I was ""lazy"" and just trying to get out of doing work. When I was released by my doctor I returned to my full duties. 

About 9 months ago he wrote a note in a patients medical record accusing me of ""failing to escalate the patient's declining status to a physician"" when I had seen her earlier in the week. (This was objectively false. She was stable when I saw her and I discussed her status with HER physician, which was not him.) He reported this to my supervisor. I was investigated and was found to have handled the situation appropriately. 

The day after he wrote that note I received a narcotic prescription request from one of his patients. Given what he had written in that note and the uncertainty of the situation, I felt it was best to get his written confirmation before I filled it. I forwarded him the request with a note, ""do you want to fill this?"" A few hours later he came storming up to our front desk yelling about how I've been prescribing narcotics inappropriately and how I should never be allowed to treat his patients. Our 2 front desk receptionists reported this to me and to our office manager. 

3 days later an employee was standing next to him while he told someone that I am a useless waste of space. He said our office would be better off without me and he won't stop until I'm fired. The employee reported this to HR. 

A week or so later I was in my office when I heard him screaming in the hallway ""She's incompetent and I stand by everything I said!"" his supervisor asked him to step out of the hallway because ""she's sitting right over there"". 

Soon after that I had a meeting with HR where they told me that he had been spoken to about this. He requested not to work with me anymore and they were going to honor that. I went on working with other physicians for the next 6 months. 

Over the last six months I have had many people come up to me with comments like, ""have you heard the s\*\*\* he's saying about you when you're not around?"", comments that I'm lazy and I sit around and don't do anything.  I've heard these reports from over a dozen people, from different departments, all at different times regarding different instances/comments. 

Fast forward to now. I was approached to work with him again and I declined. We are a bigger practice now than we were back then. He now has 3 other people dedicated to supporting his practice and I alone support our two other physicians. For the last 3 weeks we've had many meetings with my supervisor, his supervisor and HR. He has admitted to writing that inappropriate note but claims someone else told him to do it; ""he thinks I'm great"" and can't wait to work with me again. HR tells me they have nothing to support any reason why I shouldn't be required to work with him. When I've asked ""what about all these comments he makes about me all over the hospital?"" they say that they asked him about it and he says he's never said those things.  I've cited their own policies of ""zero tolerance"" for workplace violence (which includes bullying, conspiracy, verbal and physical aggression) and said that all I want is a safe work environment, and that working with him is not safe. I suggested that I will continue to work, as I have for the last 6 months, with the two other physicians which is more than enough work to fill a full time schedule. 

So I was brought in last week and told that I'm on unpaid leave for a maximum of 60 days or until I agree to work with him. I would rather move on to another job than trust this man not to throw me under the bus AGAIN, but it is difficult to leave a job that I otherwise love and a team that I really enjoy working with. At the very least I feel the hospital should pay for my malpractice tail coverage when I leave, given that they are excusing his false documentation that leaves me open to lawsuit. 



TLDR: Documented harassment for 4 years from a specific person, reported to superiors and HR. Said person has refused to work with me for the last 6 months. Now he wants my help. I'm put on unpaid leave because I refuse to help him. 



I don't want ""lawsuit"" to come up whenever my name is searched for the rest of my career. Lawyers of reddit, are there any other options for me that don't involve a public lawsuit? Where do I start?",AskLawyers
[WA],"Labor and industry advice needed 


Hello everyone 

I own a LLC in WA state (landscaping business ) and recently got into some trouble with LNI. I left work and went to pickup supplies from Home Depot.
I came back and my worker was in the ditch digging further (4 ft hole when | left) despite being told to wait for the supplies. Someone called LNI and they took pictures of the whole ordeal.

I even fired this worker, took their compliance OSHA classes but here I am now with a 125,000$. $45,000 for no hard hat on him. $75,000 no trench digging plates ( literally in my truck as I just bought it from Home Depot and was coming back with it even showed my receipt to the officer). $5,000 for me not being on site.

We hired a lawyer from the community and the lawyers a bit confusing and gives me "" get rid of this"" type of vibe.

He told me to make a payment plan and to get on with it on a monthly basis. After speaking to a few of my friends who have used his services they all said to get rid of this lawyer. He's good at making payment plans (settling) and not at actually fighting for the client and the clients interests.

I'm extremely grateful for this work but I'm fighting hard to make ends meet.

The work I did was less than $40,000 on site so this fine of 125k is hurting me way more than I even profited

The labor and industry officer is telling me that despite having an LLC they will and can go after my house / cars and other things like my kids bank accounts (5 year old, 7 year old kids savings account) because I'm the main account holder and they're minors.

I thought the purpose of having an LLC is to protect me personally. I'm the sole proprietor. They emailed 
Today after I told them I'm broke and can't do these payments for $125k.

Their deal now is final offer $80,000 in payment plan: the next 3 years but I have to waive my rights to ever appeal.


I have no clue what to do. I'm ready to close my company but l'm afraid they will come after my personal assets including my kids savings account. I'm an only parent and I would be devastated if they did this. Please help.",AskLawyers
[AZ] Mother in law and brother in law own a house. She has passed,"Hello everyone,  my mother in laws passed away four years ago.  Her son in law (no relations to me only by marriage)  Own a house that is being foreclosed. My sister and her husband (brother in law) live in the house.  The house is going to be auctioned or sold by June. If this was to happen does the house get split between all siblings and brother in law?  Or is just him? I just want to make sure all my ducks are in a row before we talk to them.  Thank you all",AskLawyers
"[NV] ""Under Duress"" vs ""Necessity""--where's the line and how much proof needs to be provided?","Hopefully this question is alright for this sub--if not, I'd appreciate redirection to the appropriate one. I'm writing a story where a character, Al, gets in trouble in Las Vegas. He'd have a gambling addiction, end up borrowing money from shady people, and then be directed toward crimes in order to ""pay them back"" under threats of violence if he didn't. The one I was thinking about him getting caught on was b&amp;e to steal valuables to sell off.

Considering Al was only doing it to avoid personal harm, would that lessen his charges? If so, how much evidence would he have to provide in order for it to do so? He (reasonably) wouldn't want to snitch on the people who he was indebted to because of the whole ""snitches get stitches"" thing--but would he be required to in order for his charges to be lessened? I'm hoping to find some crimes that'd lead to him having either up to two years in jail, rehab for his addictions to alcohol and gambling, and/or up to two years of probation. ",AskLawyers
[NE]Work forcing you to go to doctors but also,"So I feel like this is twisted and want to know if legally this is in order. I work at DQ 13 buckaroos an hour. If I'm sick I have to have a Drs note or be fired. 

Now we have to also self report any symptoms (ie.diahrea,sore throat , fatigue, loss of taste or smell) on a paper by circling yes or no. So it's the date the time the name of employee and then question as if we have been in contact with someone who has these symptoms we have them or if anyone is being tested for COVID along with our temp and signature saying that we are not lying and if we are found to be lying we will be fired. 

With such vague symptoms that could be from anything is it legal to require someone to go to the doctors and pay $55+ for them to say the symptom was real? 
I feel compensation should be provided for doctor visits if mandated by a job personally. 

Ignoreing my personal feelings is this legal to require? 

Edit; i guess I'm just frustrated that I'm getting sent home and having to spend a lot of money because I have seasonal allergies. If I don't report these symptoms that I know are allergies I get fired, if I do and can't go to the doctor, I get fired. ",AskLawyers
[CA] Stolen Childhood Settlement ,"Stolen Childhood Settlement 

I was ran over as a child. Eight years old; almost every rib broken or cracked, lung punctured by my rib and I’m pretty sure I have breathing problems from the ensuing scar tissue that developed on my lung; concussion, liver bruised, both eye vessels popped and the whites of my eyes filled with blood. Was out of school for months. My mother sued and I very specifically remember being told for years, even by the lawyer, that I had $120,000 put into an account that couldn’t be accessed until I turned 18. My mother was given 5k to spend there and then. I remember her joking to the lawyer that the money needed to be locked up or she’d spend it all.I remember being told it was put into a specific account that would gain interest over the years, so the amount would be even higher when I finally got it, but they had no way of knowing by how much. Or that it would be a small amount, can’t remember which, just definitely remember it was in an investment type of account that was supposed to grow.

When I turned 18, I asked my mother to go to the bank, but she kept getting irritated and telling me to be patient. A few weeks later she comes to me with a bank account card from Bank of America with HER name on it, and tells me there is 60k on it. Immediately I am confused. She tells me that since she was the guardian of the account, it was distributed automatically in her name and that I had to go into the bank to switch the card over to my name. She also shows me statements from the lawyer, showing that apparently the lawyer didn’t collect their fee until I turned 18, and to the tune of over half of what I was supposed to receive. It looked like a freshly printed picture with lawyer “deductions” on it, I still have it somewhere. No mention of investment accounts. 

Now, I was a really naive 18 year old. My mother was also incredibly abusive and kept me as drugged up as possible through my childhood, I’m talking taking me to numerous doctors to get me diagnosed with anything under the sun, putting me on up to 12 kinds of pills a day for anything and everything, lying and exaggerating symptoms to doctors to continually try to get me hospitalized, constantly moving to doge CPS and to find new doctors. This definitely ramped up after I was ran over. All while locking me in basements and letting her husband choke me, then claiming me acting out was a personality disorder (and not a symptom of abuse). The more I look back, the more I wonder if she was trying to get me declared mentally unfit so she could take over the account before I turned 18, and have an argument to take it over in her name. 

When I turned 17, I started refusing to take anything and instead turned to weed and alcohol. I don’t think I was stupid, but I was so used to dissociating that I just..didn’t really think about it. Did I suspect she was stealing from me? Yes. She would constantly make comments about how much my bills from a suicide attempt cost, and I had overdosed earlier in the year. Only to wake up and be told by her that the police were saying if I didn’t go to rehab, they would send me to jail because of all the pills I had taken. Never signed anything, was never told it myself, and I mentioned it once in rehab only to be told by my therapist that they had zero record of such an agreement. And wouldn’t they have to? In fact, as I type this, I feel so stupid putting the pieces together. Perhaps she sent me to rehab and then petioned the court to get the money? It would explain how she even paid for rehab, and how half of it was already gone. But maybe not.

Tbh, I did suspect she had done something shady, maybe forged my signature, definitely spending a couple grand of my money because it was in her name. But after all the abuse and guilt tripping about rehab/hospital bills, I thought maybe it would be okay if she did skim a little. 

Now, I told her I couldn’t transfer a bank card in her name to mine. I even called the bank and asked and they didn’t understand. She said she would change it herself? I didn’t understand how banks worked then either. I know now she never could have changed it over to my name without me even being present, but I wanted to believe then. I set my own bank account up and she was supposed to transfer the rest to me, but she kept saying that if she sent more than $600 at a time, I would get heavily taxed. So it would be easier if I just asked her for $600 when I needed it while she figured out how to transfer it all. This goes on for not even eight months, my boyfriend and I traveling and smoking weed, literally the most we spent being at a nice hotel at the beach that was $300 and we only went to things like that a few times, most of the time we would camp. Before she says it’s all gone somehow and I only have 2k left, not even a year later. We get into a fight because this doesn’t make sense to me. I threaten to go to the police because I suspect she has stolen a lot at this point, she cuts me off. I don’t go to the police because I figure she has stolen at least 20k, and this would mean prison time. I also figured at the time there was no way to recover the money, so why send her to jail and ruin my younger siblings life’s too? Who weren’t even teenagers yet? But then I find out that 25k I had told her to spend on a joint property, a plot A and B, was never spent. She always spoke about owning property my whole life. When I received the money I wanted to as well, just plain property I could build a cannabis grow on (I’m in California). It was the start of legalization so could have started off big. I had friends who were willing to put the equipment needed in if I had the property. She said if I paid off all of plot A, it would help her qualify for payments for plot B. I didn’t care if she was stealing as long as I had the property. I kept asking for a deed but she kept putting it off, and finally after the argument about there being no money left I called the land place myself. They said she put 5k down, made $800 payments for three months, then ghosted them and tried going to a sister company to buy property out of state.

At this point, she refuses to give me any answers and I’m drinking heavy so I’m not thinking clearly. I figure the money is gone. I get pregnant at 20, at 21 I give birth and I get back in touch with her because I am broke and need help. At 23/24 she gives me a story about how what really happened is the child support agency took all of it because her husbands ex went after him for 18 years of child support. I still don’t know how the money was in her name or how much she took.

I’m 25 now. I heard a commercial on YouTube about California settlements for car accidents this week, and specifically how broken bones usually amount to over $100k. It started me thinking. I contacted my mother again, and she’s incredibly dodgy about it. I start doing research. I start wondering if perhaps I had a structured settlement set up, and if perhaps she is still receiving money. She somehow has over 40 acres of property in Kentucky she moved to when I turned 21, though she claims they are on payments. All of her husbands child support was supposably paid off when I tuned 18.  At 23/25, she has somehow started developing her property and can afford things like sending my sister to the UK for a month and paying her braces off, even though she complains about barely making money as a nurse. Less than 4k a month after tax.

The more I think about it, the more I am suspicious that she lied about there only being 60k left ten years later when I finally turned 18. I am suspicious about her lying about not forging my signature to recieve the money. And while doing research this week, I found out that if she used stolen money to pay off a legitimate debt, that money can be returned. I tried approaching this with her because she claims the money was in her name legitimately as the guardian of the account, so can’t she explain to the child support agency that money wasn’t theirs? She refused to answer me.

I am consulting with a lawyer this week. I am just curious if anyone can give me insights into what potentially happened here, and if recovery is possible. Even recovering the child support money would greatly benefit my child and I. My siblings are old enough that I am ready to persue legal actions and get real answers, like how much money she stole, where it went, and how she stole it. ",AskLawyers
[Wi] need help with form,"[Wi]


Back when i was under 18 i got cought commiting a felony under WI law. I applied for my ccw and it go denied due to a firearm restriction on my record. The case was expunged after i completed some requirements. Now im trying to remove said firearm restiction with form jd-1771 but unsure how to answer question 2,3 i called civil lawyers but no calls back. Its been 10 years or more no domistic no felonys no drug charges. Pretty clean id say. Thanks!",AskLawyers
